BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 11.07.010 and 1998 c
292 s 118 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section applies
to all nonprobate assets, wherever situated, held at the time of entry by a
superior court of this state of a decree of dissolution of marriage or a
declaration of invalidity.

(2)(a) If a marriage is
dissolved or invalidated, a provision made prior to that event that relates to
the payment or transfer at death of the decedent's interest in a nonprobate
asset in favor of or granting an interest or power to the decedent's former
spouse is revoked. A provision affected by this section must be interpreted, and
the nonprobate asset affected passes, as if the former spouse failed to survive
the decedent, having died at the time of entry of the decree of dissolution or
declaration of invalidity.

(b) This subsection
does not apply if and to the extent that:

(i) The instrument
governing disposition of the nonprobate asset expressly provides otherwise;

(ii) The decree of
dissolution or declaration of invalidity requires that the decedent maintain a
nonprobate asset for the benefit of a former spouse or children of the
marriage, payable on the decedent's death either outright or in trust, and
other nonprobate assets of the decedent fulfilling such a requirement for the
benefit of the former spouse or children of the marriage do not exist at the
decedent's death; or

(iii) If not for this
subsection, the decedent could not have effected the revocation by unilateral
action because of the terms of the decree or declaration, or for any other
reason, immediately after the entry of the decree of dissolution or declaration
of invalidity.

(3)(a) A payor or other
third party in possession or control of a nonprobate asset at the time of the
decedent's death is not liable for making a payment or transferring an interest
in a nonprobate asset to a decedent's former spouse whose interest in the
nonprobate asset is revoked under this section, or for taking another action in
reliance on the validity of the instrument governing disposition of the
nonprobate asset, before the payor or other third party has actual knowledge of
the dissolution or other invalidation of marriage. A payor or other third
party is liable for a payment or transfer made or other action taken after the
payor or other third party has actual knowledge of a revocation under this
section.

(b) This section does not
require a payor or other third party to pay or transfer a nonprobate asset to a
beneficiary designated in a governing instrument affected by the dissolution or
other invalidation of marriage, or to another person claiming an interest in
the nonprobate asset, if the payor or third party has actual knowledge of the
existence of a dispute between the former spouse and the beneficiaries or other
persons concerning rights of ownership of the nonprobate asset as a result of
the application of this section among the former spouse and the beneficiaries
or among other persons, or if the payor or third party is otherwise uncertain
as to who is entitled to the nonprobate asset under this section. In such a
case, the payor or third party may, without liability, notify in writing all
beneficiaries or other persons claiming an interest in the nonprobate asset of
either the existence of the dispute or its uncertainty as to who is entitled to
payment or transfer of the nonprobate asset. The payor or third party may also,
without liability, refuse to pay or transfer a nonprobate asset in such a
circumstance to a beneficiary or other person claiming an interest until the
time that either:

(i) All beneficiaries
and other interested persons claiming an interest have consented in writing to
the payment or transfer; or

(ii) The payment or
transfer is authorized or directed by a court of proper jurisdiction.

(c) Notwithstanding
subsections (1) and (2) of this section and (a) and (b) of this subsection, a
payor or other third party having actual knowledge of the existence of a
dispute between beneficiaries or other persons concerning rights to a
nonprobate asset as a result of the application of this section may condition
the payment or transfer of the nonprobate asset on execution, in a form and
with security acceptable to the payor or other third party, of a bond in an
amount that is double the fair market value of the nonprobate asset at the time
of the decedent's death or the amount of an adverse claim, whichever is the lesser,
or of a similar instrument to provide security to the payor or other third
party, indemnifying the payor or other third party for any liability, loss,
damage, costs, and expenses for and on account of payment or transfer of the
nonprobate asset.

(d) As used in this
subsection, "actual knowledge" means, for a payor or other third
party in possession or control of the nonprobate asset at or following the
decedent's death, written notice to the payor or other third party, or to an
officer of a payor or third party in the course of his or her employment,
received after the decedent's death and within a time that is sufficient to
afford the payor or third party a reasonable opportunity to act upon the
knowledge. The notice must identify the nonprobate asset with reasonable
specificity. The notice also must be sufficient to inform the payor or other
third party of the revocation of the provisions in favor of the decedent's
spouse by reason of the dissolution or invalidation of marriage, or to inform
the payor or third party of a dispute concerning rights to a nonprobate asset
as a result of the application of this section. Receipt of the notice for a
period of more than thirty days is presumed to be received within a time that
is sufficient to afford the payor or third party a reasonable opportunity to
act upon the knowledge, but receipt of the notice for a period of less than
five business days is presumed not to be a sufficient time for these purposes.
These presumptions may be rebutted only by clear and convincing evidence to the
contrary.

(4)(a) A person who
purchases a nonprobate asset from a former spouse or other person, for value
and without actual knowledge, or who receives from a former spouse or other
person payment or transfer of a nonprobate asset without actual knowledge and
in partial or full satisfaction of a legally enforceable obligation, is neither
obligated under this section to return the payment, property, or benefit nor is
liable under this section for the amount of the payment or the value of the
nonprobate asset. However, a former spouse or other person who, with actual
knowledge, not for value, or not in satisfaction of a legally enforceable
obligation, receives payment or transfer of a nonprobate asset to which that
person is not entitled under this section is obligated to return the payment or
nonprobate asset, or is personally liable for the amount of the payment or
value of the nonprobate asset, to the person who is entitled to it under this
section.

(b) As used in this
subsection, "actual knowledge" means, for a person described in (a)
of this subsection who purchases or receives a nonprobate asset from a former
spouse or other person, personal knowledge or possession of documents relating
to the revocation upon dissolution or invalidation of marriage of provisions
relating to the payment or transfer at the decedent's death of the nonprobate
asset, received within a time after the decedent's death and before the
purchase or receipt that is sufficient to afford the person purchasing or
receiving the nonprobate asset reasonable opportunity to act upon the
knowledge. Receipt of the personal knowledge or possession of the documents
for a period of more than thirty days is presumed to be received within a time
that is sufficient to afford the payor or third party a reasonable opportunity
to act upon the knowledge, but receipt of the notice for a period of less than
five business days is presumed not to be a sufficient time for these purposes.
These presumptions may be rebutted only by clear and convincing evidence to the
contrary.

(5) As used in this
section, "nonprobate asset" means those rights and interests of a
person having beneficial ownership of an asset that pass on the person's death
under only the following written instruments or arrangements other than the
decedent's will:

(a) A payable-on-death
provision of a life insurance policy, employee benefit plan, annuity or similar
contract, or individual retirement account, unless provided otherwise by
controlling federal law;

(b) A payable-on-death,
trust, or joint with right of survivorship bank account;

(c) A trust of which
the person is a grantor and that becomes effective or irrevocable only upon the
person's death; or

(d) Transfer on death
beneficiary designations of a transfer on death or pay on death security, if
such designations are authorized under Washington law.

For the general
definition in this title of "nonprobate asset," see RCW 11.02.005(15)
and for the definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to testamentary
disposition of nonprobate assets, see RCW 11.11.010(7).

(6) This
section is remedial in nature and applies as of July 25, 1993, to decrees of
dissolution and declarations of invalidity entered after July 24, 1993, and
this section applies as of January 1, 1995, to decrees of dissolution and
declarations of invalidity entered before July 25, 1993.

--- END ---