BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to establish a process for public and nonpublic prekindergarten programs to
seek voluntary accreditation, by the state board of education, of their child
development and educational offerings. The purpose of the accreditation is to
give parents and other consumers of prekindergarten programs some standard to
use to assess the quality of prekindergarten programs and the program's ability
to prepare children for kindergarten.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. By rule, the state board
of education shall adopt standards and procedures for the accreditation of all
public and nonpublic prekindergarten programs. The standards for accreditation
shall require that the programs provide the children with the academic skills
that are needed for the children to be successful as they enter into the next
level of school. Such programs are encouraged to apply for accreditation. In
developing standards, the state board of education shall review nationally
developed standards. However, before any standards or procedures for
accreditation of prekindergarten programs are implemented, the state board of
education shall present the standards and procedures to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the committees'
review and comment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The state board of
education shall post a list of accredited prekindergarten programs on the
board's internet web site.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of
this act are each added to chapter 28A.215 RCW.

---
END ---