BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.655.020 and 1999
c 388 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The academic
achievement and accountability commission is established.

(2) The primary purpose
of the commission is to provide oversight of the state's educational accountability
system.

(3) The commission
shall consist of nine members selected as follows:

(a) One member shall be
the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee; and

(b)(i) Eight
members shall be appointed by the governor. All members appointed by the
governor are subject to confirmation by the senate.

(ii) For members
appointed before June 30, 2002, four of the members shall be selected as
follows: Each major caucus of the house of representatives and the senate
shall submit a list of three names. The lists may not include the names of
members of the legislature. The governor shall select a member from each list
provided by each caucus. ((All members appointed by the governor shall be
subject to confirmation by the senate.)) The provisions of this
subsection (3)(b)(ii) shall not be used for appointments made on or after June
30, 2002.

(4) The governor shall
appoint a chair from among the commission members.

(5) Appointees shall be
individuals who are supportive of educational improvement, who have a positive
record of service, and who will devote sufficient time to the responsibilities
of the commission to ensure that the objectives of the commission are
achieved. The commission shall be composed of a balance of individuals from
within and outside the public education system. The commission shall include
educators, business leaders, and parents.

(6) The governor shall
appoint its initial commission members by July 1, 1999. The first meeting of
the commission shall be convened by the superintendent of public instruction no
later than July 30, 1999.

(7) Appointed members
shall serve for terms of four years, with the terms expiring on June 30th of
the fourth year of the term. However, in the case of the initial members, four
members shall serve four-year terms, two members shall serve three-year terms,
and two members shall serve two-year terms, with each of the terms expiring on
June 30th of the applicable year. Appointees may be reappointed to serve more
than one term.

(8) The
governor shall fill any vacancy in appointments that may occur. When filling a
vacancy of a member nominated by a major caucus of the legislature, the
governor shall select the new member from a list of three names submitted by
the same caucus that provided the list from which the retiring member was
appointed.

--- END ---