BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that bicycling and walking are becoming increasingly popular in Washington as
clean and efficient modes of transportation, as recreational activities, and as
organized sports. Future plans for the state's transportation system will
require increased access and safety for bicycles and pedestrians on our common
roadways, and federal transportation legislation and funding programs have
created strong incentives to implement these changes quickly. As a result,
many more people are likely to take up bicycling in Washington both as a
leisure activity and as a convenient, inexpensive form of transportation.
Bicyclists are more vulnerable to injury and accident than motorists, and both
should be knowledgeable about traffic laws. Bicyclists should be highly
visible and predictable when riding in traffic, and be encouraged to wear
bicycle safety helmets. Hundreds of bicyclists and pedestrians are seriously
injured every year in accidents, and millions of dollars are spent on health
care costs associated with these accidents. There is clear evidence that
organized training in the rules and techniques of safe and effective cycling
can significantly reduce the incidence of serious injury and accidents,
increase cooperation among road users, and significantly increase the incidence
of bicycle helmet use, particularly among minors. A reduction in accidents
benefits the entire community. Therefore, it is appropriate for businesses and
community organizations to provide donations to bicycle and pedestrian safety
training programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Cooper Jones Act
license plates" means license plates that display the symbol of bicycle
safety created in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

In cooperation with the
Washington state patrol and the department of licensing, the traffic safety
commission shall create and design, and the department shall issue, a special
license plate displaying a symbol of bicycle safety that may be used in lieu of
regular or personalized license plates for motor vehicles required to display
two motor vehicle license plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter
46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by the department. These
special plates will fund the Cooper Jones act and provide funding for bicyclist
and pedestrian safety education, enforcement, and encouragement.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c
291 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may
establish a fee for each type of special license plates issued under RCW
46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by section 5,
chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in an amount calculated to offset the cost of
production of the special license plates and the administration of this
program. ((Until December 31, 1997,)) The fee shall not exceed
((thirty-five dollars, but effective with vehicle registrations due or to
become due on January 1, 1998, the department may adjust the fee to no more
than)) forty dollars. This fee is in addition to all other fees required
to register and license the vehicle for which the plates have been requested.
All such additional special license plate fees collected by the department
shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the motor vehicle
fund.

(2) ((Until December
31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application, registration, and renewal registration of a motor vehicle, the
holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection expenses
incurred by it. The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production,
shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(3) Effective with
vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 1998,)) In addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the
holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of
each fee collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the
custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The
state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate collegiate license
plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(((4))) (3)
Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 1999, in
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay a fee
of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted
to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(((5))) (4)
In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a special baseball stadium
license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The
remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds
issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW
82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary preconstruction costs, while the taxes
are being collected under RCW 82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer
shall credit the funds to the state general fund.

(((6))) (5)
Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 1999, in
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a special baseball stadium license plate
shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not
to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds
shall be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
state general fund.

(6) Effective with
vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 2003, in addition to
all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and registration of a
motor vehicle, the holder of a Cooper Jones license plate shall pay an initial
fee of twenty-five dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to
exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds
shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to
the bicycle and pedestrian safety account as established in RCW 43.59.150.

(7) Effective with
annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 2004, in addition to all
fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle
registration, the holder of a Cooper Jones license plate shall, upon
application, pay a fee of twenty dollars. The department shall deduct an
amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection
for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
bicycle and pedestrian safety account as established in RCW 43.59.150.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.16.290 and 1997 c
291 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In any
case of a valid sale or transfer of the ownership of any vehicle, the right to
the certificates properly transferable therewith, except as provided in RCW
46.16.280, and to the vehicle license plates passes to the purchaser or
transferee. It is unlawful for the holder of such certificates, except as
provided in RCW 46.16.280, or vehicle license plates to fail, neglect, or
refuse to endorse the certificates and deliver the vehicle license plates to
the purchaser or transferee. If the sale or transfer is of a vehicle licensed
by the state or any county, city, town, school district, or other political
subdivision entitled to exemption as provided by law, or, if the vehicle is
licensed with personalized plates, amateur radio operator plates, medal of
honor plates, disabled person plates, disabled veteran plates, prisoner of war
plates, Cooper Jones license plates, or other special license plates
issued under RCW 46.16.301 as it existed before amendment by section 5, chapter
291, Laws of 1997, the vehicle license plates therefor shall be retained and
may be displayed upon a vehicle obtained in replacement of the vehicle so sold
or transferred.

---
END ---