BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 47.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
department may enter into exchange agreements with local, state, or federal
agencies, or private nonprofit groups incorporated in this state that are
organized for environmental conservation purposes, to convey properties under
the jurisdiction of the department that serve as environmental mitigation
sites, as full or part consideration for the grantee assuming all future
maintenance and operation obligations and costs required to maintain and
operate the environmental mitigation site in perpetuity. The conveyances must
be by quitclaim deed executed by the secretary of transportation, and must
expressly restrict the use of the property to a mitigation site consistent with
preservation of the functions and values of the site, and must provide for the
automatic reversion to the department if the property is not used as a
mitigation site or is not maintained in a manner that complies with applicable
permits, laws, and regulations pertaining to the maintenance and operation of
the mitigation site.

--- END ---