BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 34.05.360 and 1988 c
288 s 311 are each amended to read as follows:

The order of adoption
by which each rule is adopted by an agency shall contain all of the following:

(1) The signature of
the governor;

(2) The date the
agency adopted the rule;

(((2))) (3)
A concise statement of the purpose of the rule;

(((3))) (4)
A reference to all rules repealed, amended, or suspended by the rule;

(((4))) (5)
A reference to the specific statutory or other authority authorizing adoption
of the rule;

(((5))) (6)
Any findings required by any provision of law as a precondition to adoption or
effectiveness of the rule; and

(((6)))
(7) The effective date of the rule if other than that specified in RCW
34.05.380(2).

--- END ---