BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.300.040 and 1999
c 348 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any
other powers and duties as provided by law, the powers and duties of the
superintendent of public instruction shall be:

(1) To have supervision
over all matters pertaining to the public schools of the state;

(2) To report to the
governor and the legislature such information and data as may be required for
the management and improvement of the schools;

(3) To prepare and have
printed such forms, registers, courses of study, rules for the government of
the common schools, and such other material and books as may be necessary for
the discharge of the duties of teachers and officials charged with the
administration of the laws relating to the common schools, and to distribute
the same to educational service district superintendents;

(4) To travel, without
neglecting his or her other official duties as superintendent of public
instruction, for the purpose of attending educational meetings or conventions,
of visiting schools, of consulting educational service district superintendents
or other school officials;

(5) To prepare and from
time to time to revise a manual of the Washington state common school code,
copies of which shall be provided in such numbers as determined by the
superintendent of public instruction at no cost to those public agencies within
the common school system and which shall be sold at approximate actual cost of
publication and distribution per volume to all other public and nonpublic
agencies or individuals, said manual to contain Titles 28A and 28C RCW, rules
related to the common schools, and such other matter as the state
superintendent or the state board of education shall determine. Proceeds of
the sale of such code shall be transmitted to the public printer who shall
credit the state superintendent's account within the state printing plant
revolving fund by a like amount;

(6) To act as ex
officio member and the chief executive officer of the state board of education;

(7) To file all papers,
reports and public documents transmitted to the superintendent by the school
officials of the several counties or districts of the state, each year
separately. Copies of all papers filed in the superintendent's office, and the
superintendent's official acts, may, or upon request, shall be certified by the
superintendent and attested by the superintendent's official seal, and when so
certified shall be evidence of the papers or acts so certified to;

(8) To require annually,
on or before the 15th day of August, of the president, manager, or principal of
every educational institution in this state, a report as required by the
superintendent of public instruction; and it is the duty of every president,
manager, or principal, to complete and return such forms within such
time as the superintendent of public instruction shall direct;

(9) To keep in the
superintendent's office a record of all teachers receiving certificates to
teach in the common schools of this state;

(10) To issue
certificates as provided by law;

(11) To keep in the
superintendent's office at the capital of the state, all books and papers
pertaining to the business of the superintendent's office, and to keep and
preserve in the superintendent's office a complete record of statistics, as
well as a record of the meetings of the state board of education;

(12) With the
assistance of the office of the attorney general, to decide all points of law
which may be submitted to the superintendent in writing by any educational
service district superintendent, or that may be submitted to the superintendent
by any other person, upon appeal from the decision of any educational service
district superintendent; and the superintendent shall publish his or her
rulings and decisions from time to time for the information of school officials
and teachers; and the superintendent's decision shall be final unless set aside
by a court of competent jurisdiction;

(13) To administer
oaths and affirmations in the discharge of the superintendent's official
duties;

(14) To deliver to his
or her successor, at the expiration of the superintendent's term of office, all
records, books, maps, documents and papers of whatever kind belonging to the
superintendent's office or which may have been received by the superintendent's
for the use of the superintendent's office;

(15) To administer
family services and programs to promote the state's policy as provided in RCW
74.14A.025;

(16) To perform such
other duties as may be required by law.

For rules adopted
under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the superintendent of
public instruction may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of
legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section
or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely
solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general
enabling provisions establishing the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.50.050 and 1995 c
239 s 317 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall:

(1) Have the authority
to organize the department into not more than four divisions, each headed by an
assistant director;

(2) Have free access to
all files and records of various funds assigned to the department and inspect
and audit the files and records as deemed necessary;

(3) Employ personnel to
carry out the general administration of the department;

(4) Submit an annual
written report of the activities of the department to the governor and the
chairs of the appropriate legislative committees with one copy to the staff of
each of the committees, including recommendations for statutory changes the
director believes to be desirable;

(5) Adopt ((such))
rules ((and regulations)) as are necessary to carry out the powers,
duties, and functions of the department pursuant to the provisions of chapter
34.05 RCW. For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after
July 1, 2002, the director may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant
of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory
section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not
rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the
general enabling provisions establishing the department.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.06A.030 and 1996
c 131 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The ombudsman shall
perform the following duties:

(1) Provide information
as appropriate on the rights and responsibilities of individuals receiving
family and children's services, and on the procedures for providing these
services;

(2) Investigate, upon
his or her own initiative or upon receipt of a complaint, an administrative act
alleged to be contrary to law, rule, or policy, imposed without an adequate
statement of reason, or based on irrelevant, immaterial, or erroneous grounds;
however, the ombudsman may decline to investigate any complaint as provided by
rules adopted under this chapter;

(3) Monitor the
procedures as established, implemented, and practiced by the department to
carry out its responsibilities in delivering family and children's services
with a view toward appropriate preservation of families and ensuring children's
health and safety;

(4) Review periodically
the facilities and procedures of state institutions serving children, and
state-licensed facilities or residences;

(5) Recommend changes
in the procedures for addressing the needs of families and children;

(6) Submit annually to
the committee and to the governor by November 1st a report analyzing the
work of the office including recommendations;

(7) Grant the committee
access to all relevant records in the possession of the ombudsman unless
prohibited by law; and

(8) Adopt rules
necessary to implement this chapter. For rules adopted under the provisions
of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the ombudsman may only adopt rules derived
from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the
specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is
derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent
or purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the department or
the ombudsman's office.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 43.17 RCW to read as follows:

For rules adopted under
the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the director of each
department may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative
authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections
from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a
section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing each department.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.19.011 and 1999 c
229 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of
general administration shall supervise and administer the activities of the
department of general administration and shall advise the governor and the
legislature with respect to matters under the jurisdiction of the department.

(2) In addition to
other powers and duties granted to the director, the director shall have the
following powers and duties:

(a) Enter into
contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(b) Accept and expend
gifts and grants that are related to the purposes of this chapter, whether such
grants be of federal or other funds;

(c) Appoint a deputy
director and such assistant directors and special assistants as may be needed
to administer the department. These employees are exempt from the provisions
of chapter 41.06 RCW;

(d) Adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other functions necessary and
proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter. For rules adopted under the
provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the director may only adopt
rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must
include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a
statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the
department of general administration;

(e) Delegate powers,
duties, and functions as the director deems necessary for efficient
administration, but the director shall be responsible for the official acts of
the officers and employees of the department; and

(f) Perform other
duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

(3) The director may
establish additional advisory groups as may be necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter.

(4) The internal
affairs of the department shall be under the control of the director in order
that the director may manage the department in a flexible and intelligent
manner as dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless specifically
limited by law, the director shall have complete charge and supervisory powers
over the department. The director may create such administrative structures as
the director deems appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law, and the
director may employ such personnel as may be necessary in accordance with
chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided by law.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.21A.064 and 1997
c 443 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to RCW
43.21A.068, the director of the department of ecology shall have the following
powers and duties:

(1) The supervision of
public waters within the state and their appropriation, diversion, and use, and
of the various officers connected therewith;

(2) Insofar as may be
necessary to ((assure)) ensure safety to life or property, the
director shall inspect the construction of all dams, canals, ditches,
irrigation systems, hydraulic power plants, and all other works, systems, and
plants pertaining to the use of water, and may require such necessary changes
in the construction or maintenance of said works, to be made from time to time,
as will reasonably secure safety to life and property;

(3) The director shall
regulate and control the diversion of water in accordance with the rights
thereto;

(4) The director shall
determine the discharge of streams and springs and other sources of water
supply, and the capacities of lakes and of reservoirs whose waters are being or
may be utilized for beneficial purposes;

(5) The director shall,
if requested, provide assistance to an applicant for a water right in obtaining
or developing an adequate and appropriate supply of water consistent with the
land use permitted for the area in which the water is to be used and the
population forecast for the area under RCW 43.62.035. If the applicant is a
public water supply system, the supply being sought must be used in a manner
consistent with applicable land use, watershed and water system plans, and the
population forecast for that area provided under RCW 43.62.035;

(6) The director shall
keep such records as may be necessary for the recording of the financial
transactions and statistical data thereof, and shall procure all necessary
documents, forms, and blanks. The director shall keep a seal of the office,
and all certificates covering any of the director's acts or the acts of the
director's office, or the records and files of that office, under such seal,
shall be taken as evidence thereof in all courts;

(7) The director shall
render when required by the governor, a full written report of the office's
work with such recommendations for legislation as the director deems advisable
for the better control and development of the water resources of the state;

(8) The director and
duly authorized deputies may administer oaths;

(9) The director shall
establish and ((promulgate)) adopt rules governing the
administration of chapter 90.03 RCW. For rules adopted under the provisions
of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the director may only adopt rules derived
from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the
specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is
derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent
or purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the department;

(10) The director shall
perform such other duties as may be prescribed by law.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.24.016 and 1999 c
240 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of
licensing shall supervise and administer the activities of the department of
licensing and shall advise the governor and the legislature with respect to
matters under the jurisdiction of the department.

(2) In addition to
other powers and duties granted to the director, the director has the following
powers and duties:

(a) Enter into
contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the responsibilities of the
department;

(b) Accept and expend
gifts and grants, whether such grants be of federal or other funds;

(c) Appoint a deputy
director and such assistant directors, special assistants, and administrators
as may be needed to administer the department. These employees are exempt from
the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW;

(d) Adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other functions necessary to
carry out the responsibilities of the department. For rules adopted under
the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the director may only adopt
rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must
include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a
statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the
department;

(e) Delegate powers,
duties, and functions as the director deems necessary for efficient
administration, but the director is responsible for the official acts of the
officers and employees of the department; and

(f) Perform other
duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

(3) The director may
establish advisory groups as may be necessary to carry out the responsibilities
of the department.

(4) The internal
affairs of the department shall be under the control of the director in order
that the director may manage the department in a flexible and intelligent
manner as dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless specifically
limited by law, the director shall have complete charge and supervisory powers
over the department. The director may create such administrative structures as
the director deems appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law, and the
director may employ such personnel as may be necessary in accordance with
chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided by law.

Sec. 8. RCW 43.27A.090 and 1988
c 127 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall be
empowered as follows:

(1) To represent the
state at, and fully participate in, the activities of any basin or regional
commission, interagency committee, or any other joint interstate or
federal-state agency, committee or commission, or publicly financed entity
engaged in the planning, development, administration, management, conservation
or preservation of the water resources of the state.

(2) To prepare the
views and recommendations of the state of Washington on any project, plan or
program relating to the planning, development, administration, management,
conservation and preservation of any waters located in or affecting the state
of Washington, including any federal permit or license proposal, and appear on
behalf of, and present views and recommendations of the state at any
proceeding, negotiation or hearing conducted by the federal government,
interstate agency, state or other agency.

(3) To cooperate with,
assist, advise and coordinate plans with the federal government and its
officers and agencies, and serve as a state liaison agency with the federal
government in matters relating to the use, conservation, preservation, quality,
disposal or control of water and activities related thereto.

(4) To cooperate with
appropriate agencies of the federal government and/or agencies of other states,
to enter into contracts, and to make appropriate contributions to federal or
interstate projects and programs and governmental bodies to carry out the
provisions of this chapter.

(5) To apply for,
accept, administer and expend grants, gifts and loans from the federal
government or any other entity to carry out the purposes of this chapter and
make contracts and do such other acts as are necessary insofar as they are not
inconsistent with other provisions hereof.

(6) To develop and
maintain a coordinated and comprehensive state water and water resources
related development plan, and adopt, with regard to such plan, such policies as
are necessary to ((insure)) ensure that the waters of the state
are used, conserved and preserved for the best interest of the state. There
shall be included in the state plan a description of developmental objectives
and a statement of the recommended means of accomplishing these objectives. To
the extent the director deems desirable, the plan shall integrate into the
state plan, the plans, programs, reports, research and studies of other state
agencies.

(7) To assemble and
correlate information relating to water supply, power development, irrigation,
watersheds, water use, future possibilities of water use and prospective
demands for all purposes served through or affected by water resources
development.

(8) To assemble and
correlate state, local and federal laws, regulations, plans, programs and
policies affecting the beneficial use, disposal, pollution, control or
conservation of water, river basin development, flood prevention, parks,
reservations, forests, wildlife refuges, drainage and sanitary systems, waste
disposal, water works, watershed protection and development, soil conservation,
power facilities and area and municipal water supply needs, and recommend
suitable legislation or other action to the legislature, the congress of the
United States, or any city, municipality, or to responsible state, local or
federal executive departments or agencies.

(9) To cooperate with
federal, state, regional, interstate and local public and private agencies in
the making of plans for drainage, flood control, use, conservation, allocation
and distribution of existing water supplies and the development of new water
resource projects.

(10) To encourage,
assist and advise regional, and city and municipal agencies, officials or
bodies responsible for planning in relation to water aspects of their programs,
and coordinate local water resources activities, programs, and plans.

(11) To ((promulgate
such)) adopt rules ((and regulations)) as are necessary to
carry out the purposes of this chapter. For rules adopted under the
provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the department may only adopt
rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must
include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a
statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the
department.

(12) To hold public
hearings, and make such investigations, studies and surveys as are necessary to
carry out the purposes of the chapter.

(13) To subpoena
witnesses, compel their attendance, administer oaths, take the testimony of any
person under oath and require the production of any books or papers when the
department deems such measures necessary in the exercise of its rule-making
power or in determining whether or not any license, certificate, or permit
shall be granted or extended.

Sec. 9. RCW 43.30.150 and 1988 c
128 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall:

(1) Perform duties relating
to appraisal, appeal, approval and hearing functions as provided by law;

(2) Establish policies
to ((insure)) ensure that the acquisition, management and
disposition of all lands and resources within the department's jurisdiction are
based on sound principles designed to achieve the maximum effective development
and use of such lands and resources consistent with laws applicable thereto;

(3) Constitute the
board of appraisers provided for in Article 16, section 2 of the state
Constitution;

(4) Constitute the
commission on harbor lines provided for in Article 15, section 1 of the state
Constitution as amended;

(5) Hold regular
monthly meetings at such times as it may determine, and such special meetings
as may be called by the ((chairman)) chair or majority of the
board membership upon written notice to all members thereof: PROVIDED, That
the board may dispense with any regular meetings, except that the board shall
not dispense with two consecutive regular meetings;

(6) Adopt and enforce
((such)) rules ((and regulations)) as may be deemed necessary and
proper for carrying out the powers, duties and functions imposed upon it by
this chapter. For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after
July 1, 2002, the board may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of
legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section
or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely
solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general
enabling provisions establishing the board or the department;

(7) Employ and fix the
compensation of such technical, clerical and other personnel as may be deemed
necessary for the performance of its duties;

(8) Appoint such
advisory committees as it may deem appropriate to advise and assist it to more
effectively discharge its responsibilities. The members of such committees
shall receive no compensation, but shall be entitled to reimbursement for
travel expenses in attending committee meetings in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended;

(9) Meet and organize
within thirty days after March 6, 1957, and on the third Monday of each
January following a state general election at which the elected ex officio
members of the board are elected. The board shall select its own ((chairman))
chair. The commissioner of public lands shall be the secretary of the
board. The board may select a ((vice chairman)) vice-chair from
among its members. In the absence of the ((chairman)) chair and
((vice chairman)) vice-chair at a meeting of the board, the
members shall elect a ((chairman)) chair pro tem. No action
shall be taken by the board except by the agreement of at least four members.
The department and the board shall maintain its principal office at the
capital;

(10) Be entitled to
reimbursement individually for travel expenses incurred in the discharge of
their official duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now
existing or hereafter amended.

Sec. 10. RCW 43.31C.060 and 2000
c 212 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The department must
administer this chapter and has the following powers and duties:

(1) To monitor the
implementation of chapter 212, Laws of 2000 and submit reports evaluating the
effectiveness of the program and any suggestions for legislative changes to the
governor and legislature by December 1, 2000;

(2) To develop
evaluation and performance measures for local governments to measure the effectiveness
of the program at the local level on meeting the objectives of this chapter;

(3) To provide
information and appropriate assistance to persons desiring to locate and
operate a business in a community empowerment zone;

(4) To work with
appropriate state agencies to coordinate the delivery of programs, including
but not limited to housing, community and economic development, small business
assistance, social service, and employment and training programs which are
carried on in a community empowerment zone; and

(5) To develop rules
necessary for the administration of this chapter. For rules adopted under
the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the department may only
adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules
must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a
statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the
department.

Sec. 11. RCW 43.33.040 and 1965 c
8 s 43.33.040 are each amended to read as follows:

The state finance
committee may ((make)) adopt appropriate rules ((and
regulations)) for the performance of its duties. The state treasurer shall
act as ((chairman)) chair of the committee. For rules adopted
under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the state finance
committee may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative
authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections
from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a
section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the state finance committee.

Sec. 12. RCW 43.33A.110 and 1994
c 154 s 310 are each amended to read as follows:

The state investment
board may ((make)) adopt appropriate rules ((and regulations))
for the performance of its duties. The board shall establish investment
policies and procedures designed exclusively to maximize return at a prudent
level of risk. However, in the case of the department of labor and industries'
accident, medical aid, and reserve funds, the board shall establish investment
policies and procedures designed to attempt to limit fluctuations in industrial
insurance premiums and, subject to this purpose, to maximize return at a
prudent level of risk. The board shall adopt rules to ensure that its members
perform their functions in compliance with chapter 42.52 RCW. Rules adopted by
the board shall be adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

For rules adopted
under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the state investment
board may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative
authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections
from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a
section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the state investment board.

Sec. 13. RCW 43.59.070 and 1967
ex.s. c 147 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall be
secretary of the commission and shall be responsible for carrying into effect
the commission's orders and rules ((and regulations promulgated)) adopted
by the commission. The director shall also be authorized to employ such staff
as is necessary pursuant to the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW. The
commission shall adopt ((such)) rules ((and regulations)) as
shall be necessary to carry into effect the purposes of this chapter.

For rules adopted
under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the Washington state
traffic safety commission may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of
legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section
or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely
solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general
enabling provisions establishing the commission.

Sec. 14. RCW 43.61.040 and 1977 c
75 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of
veterans affairs shall ((make such)) adopt rules ((and
regulations)) as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this
chapter. For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July
1, 2002, the director of veterans affairs may only adopt rules derived from a
specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific
statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and
may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose
or the general enabling provisions establishing the department of veterans
affairs. The department shall furnish information, advice, and assistance
to veterans and coordinate all programs and services in the field of veterans'
claims service, education, health, vocational guidance and placement, and
services not provided by some other agency of the state or by the federal
government. The director shall submit a report of the departments' activities
hereunder each year to the governor.

Sec. 15. RCW 43.63A.475 and 1993
c 124 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
adopt all rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement chapter 124,
Laws of 1993, giving due consideration to standards and regulations adopted by
the secretary of housing and urban development under the National Manufactured
Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 (800 Stat. 700; 42 U.S.C.
Secs. 5401-5426) for manufactured housing construction and safety standards. For
rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the
department of community, trade, and economic development may only adopt rules
derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include
the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is
derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent
or purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the department of
community, trade, and economic development.

Sec. 16. RCW 43.70.580 and 1995 c
43 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The primary
responsibility of the public health system, is to take those actions necessary
to protect, promote, and improve the health of the population. In order to
accomplish this, the department shall:

(1) Identify, as part
of the public health improvement plan, the key health outcomes sought for the
population and the capacity needed by the public health system to fulfill its
responsibilities in improving health outcomes.

(2)(a) Distribute state
funds that, in conjunction with local revenues, are intended to improve the
capacity of the public health system. The distribution methodology shall
encourage system-wide effectiveness and efficiency and provide local health
jurisdictions with the flexibility both to determine governance structures and
address their unique needs.

(b) Enter into with
each local health jurisdiction performance-based contracts that establish clear
measures of the degree to which the local health jurisdiction is attaining the
capacity necessary to improve health outcomes. The contracts negotiated
between the local health jurisdictions and the department of health must
identify the specific measurable progress that local health jurisdictions will
make toward achieving health outcomes. A community assessment conducted by the
local health jurisdiction according to the public health improvement plan,
which shall include the results of the comprehensive plan prepared according to
RCW 70.190.130, will be used as the basis for identifying the health outcomes.
The contracts shall include provisions to encourage collaboration among local
health jurisdictions. State funds shall be used solely to expand and
complement, but not to supplant city and county government support for public
health programs.

(3) Develop criteria to
assess the degree to which capacity is being achieved and ensure compliance by
public health jurisdictions.

(4) Adopt rules
necessary to carry out the purposes of chapter 43, Laws of 1995. For rules
adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the department
may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority.
The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which
the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions
establishing the department.

(5) Biennially, within
the public health improvement plan, evaluate the effectiveness of the public
health system, assess the degree to which the public health system is attaining
the capacity to improve the status of the public's health, and report progress
made by each local health jurisdiction toward improving health outcomes.

Sec. 17. RCW 43.101.085 and 2001
c 167 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to its
other powers granted under this chapter, the commission has authority and power
to:

(1) Adopt, amend, or
repeal rules as necessary to carry out this chapter. For rules adopted
under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the commission may
only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The
rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the
grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing
the commission;

(2) Issue subpoenas and
administer oaths in connection with investigations, hearings, or other
proceedings held under this chapter;

(3) Take or cause to be
taken depositions and other discovery procedures as needed in investigations,
hearings, and other proceedings held under this chapter;

(4) Appoint members of
a hearings board as provided under RCW 43.101.380;

(5) Enter into
contracts for professional services determined by the commission to be
necessary for adequate enforcement of this chapter;

(6) Grant, deny, or
revoke certification of peace officers under the provisions of this chapter;

(7) Designate
individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and statements of charges under the
provisions of this chapter; and

(8) Employ such
investigative, administrative, and clerical staff as necessary for the
enforcement of this chapter.

Sec. 18. RCW 43.115.040 and 1993
c 261 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall
have the following powers and duties:

(1) Elect one of its
members to serve as ((chairman)) chair;

(2) Adopt rules ((and
regulations)) pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. For rules adopted under
the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the commission may only
adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules
must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a
statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the
commission;

(3) Examine and define
issues pertaining to the rights and needs of Hispanics, and make
recommendations to the governor and state agencies for changes in programs and
laws;

(4) Advise the governor
and state agencies on the development and implementation of policies, plans,
and programs that relate to the special needs of Hispanics;

(5) Advise the
legislature on issues of concern to the Hispanic community;

(6) Establish
relationships with state agencies, local governments, and private sector
organizations that promote equal opportunity and benefits for Hispanics; and

(7)
Receive gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources that are
made for the use or benefit of the commission and expend, without
appropriation, the same or any income from the gifts, grants, or endowments
according to their terms.

Sec. 19. RCW 43.117.050 and 1974
ex.s. c 140 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall:

(1) Elect one of its
members to serve as ((chairman)) chair; and also such other
officers as necessary to form an executive committee;

(2) Adopt rules ((and
regulations)) pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. For rules adopted under
the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the commission may only
adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules
must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a
statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the
commission;

(3) Meet at the call of
the ((chairman)) chair or the call of a majority of its members,
but in no case less often than once during any three month period;

(4) Be authorized to
appoint such citizen task force as it deems appropriate.

Sec. 20. RCW 43.121.050 and 1988
c 278 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

To carry out the
purposes of this chapter, the council may:

(1) Contract with
public or private nonprofit organizations, agencies, schools, or with qualified
individuals for the establishment of community-based educational and service
programs designed to:

(a) Reduce the occurrence
of child abuse and neglect; and

(b) Provide for
parenting skills which include: Consistency in parenting; providing children
with positive discipline that provides firm order without hurting children
physically or emotionally; and preserving and nurturing the family unit.
Programs to provide these parenting skills may include the following:

(i) Programs to teach
positive methods of disciplining children;

(ii) Programs to
educate parents about the physical, mental, and emotional development of children;

(iii) Programs to
enhance the skills of parents in providing for their children's learning and
development; and

(iv) Learning
experiences for children and parents to help prepare parents and children for
the experiences in school. Contracts also may be awarded for research programs
related to primary and secondary prevention of child abuse and neglect, and to
develop and strengthen community child abuse and neglect prevention networks.
Each contract entered into by the council shall contain a provision for the
evaluation of services provided under the contract. Contracts for services to
prevent child abuse and child neglect shall be awarded as demonstration
projects with continuation based upon goal attainment. Contracts for services
to prevent child abuse and child neglect shall be awarded on the basis of
probability of success based in part upon sound research data.

(2) Facilitate the
exchange of information between groups concerned with families and children.

(3) Consult with
applicable state agencies, commissions, and boards to help determine the
probable effectiveness, fiscal soundness, and need for proposed educational and
service programs for the prevention of child abuse and neglect.

(4) Establish fee
schedules to provide for the recipients of services to reimburse the state
general fund for the cost of services received.

(5) Adopt its own
bylaws.

(6) Adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. For
rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the
council may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative
authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections
from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a
section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the council.

Sec. 21. RCW 43.155.040 and 1985
c 446 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The board may:

(1) Accept from any
state or federal agency, loans or grants for the planning or financing of any
public works project and enter into agreements with any such agency concerning
the loans or grants;

(2) Provide technical
assistance to local governments;

(3) Accept any gifts,
grants, or loans of funds, property, or financial or other aid in any form from
any other source on any terms and conditions which are not in conflict with
this chapter;

(4) Adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the
board may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative
authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections
from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a
section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the board;

(5) Do all acts and
things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted or
implied under this chapter.

Sec. 22. RCW 43.160.050 and 1996
c 51 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The board may:

(1) Adopt bylaws for
the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business.

(2) Adopt an official
seal and alter the seal at its pleasure.

(3) Utilize the
services of other governmental agencies.

(4) Accept from any
federal agency loans or grants for the planning or financing of any project and
enter into an agreement with the agency respecting the loans or grants.

(5) Conduct
examinations and investigations and take testimony at public hearings of any
matter material for its information that will assist in determinations related
to the exercise of the board's lawful powers.

(6) Accept any gifts,
grants, or loans of funds, property, or financial or other aid in any form from
any other source on any terms and conditions which are not in conflict with
this chapter.

(7) Exercise all the
powers of a public corporation under chapter 39.84 RCW.

(8) Invest any funds
received in connection with industrial development revenue bond financing not
required for immediate use, as the board considers appropriate, subject to any
agreements with owners of bonds.

(9) Arrange for lines
of credit for industrial development revenue bonds from and enter into
participation agreements with any financial institution.

(10) Issue industrial
development revenue bonds in one or more series for the purpose of defraying
the cost of acquiring or improving any industrial development facility or
facilities and securing the payment of the bonds as provided in this chapter.

(11) Enter into
agreements or other transactions with and accept grants and the cooperation of
any governmental agency in furtherance of this chapter.

(12) Sell, purchase, or
insure loans to finance the costs of industrial development facilities.

(13) Service, contract,
and pay for the servicing of loans for industrial development facilities.

(14) Provide financial
analysis and technical assistance for industrial development facilities when
the board reasonably considers it appropriate.

(15) Collect, with
respect to industrial development revenue bonds, reasonable interest, fees, and
charges for making and servicing its lease agreements, loan agreements,
mortgage loans, notes, bonds, commitments, and other evidences of
indebtedness. Interest, fees, and charges are limited to the amounts required
to pay the costs of the board, including operating and administrative expenses
and reasonable allowances for losses that may be incurred.

(16) Procure insurance
or guarantees from any party as allowable under law, including a governmental
agency, against any loss in connection with its lease agreements, loan
agreements, mortgage loans, and other assets or property.

(17) Adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. For
rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the
board may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative
authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections
from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a
section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the board.

(18) Do all acts and
things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted or
implied under this chapter.

Sec. 23. RCW 43.163.100 and 1990
c 53 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to
accomplishing the economic development finance programs specifically authorized
in this chapter, the authority may:

(1) Maintain an office
or offices;

(2) Sue and be sued in
its own name, and plead and be impleaded;

(3) Engage consultants,
agents, attorneys, and advisers, contract with federal, state, and local
governmental entities for services, and hire such employees, agents and other
personnel as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish
its purposes;

(4) Make and execute
all manner of contracts, agreements and instruments and financing documents
with public and private parties as the authority deems necessary, useful, or
convenient to accomplish its purposes;

(5) Acquire and hold
real or personal property, or any interest therein, in the name of the
authority, and to sell, assign, lease, encumber, mortgage, or otherwise dispose
of the same in such manner as the authority deems necessary, useful, or
convenient to accomplish its purposes;

(6) Open and maintain
accounts in qualified public depositaries and otherwise provide for the
investment of any funds not required for immediate disbursement, and provide
for the selection of investments;

(7) Appear in its own
behalf before boards, commissions, departments, or agencies of federal, state,
or local government;

(8) Procure such
insurance in such amounts and from such insurers as the authority deems
desirable, including, but not limited to, insurance against any loss or damage
to its property or other assets, public liability insurance for injuries to
persons or property, and directors and officers liability insurance;

(9) Apply for and
accept subventions, grants, loans, advances, and contributions from any source
of money, property, labor, or other things of value, to be held, used and
applied as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish
its purposes;

(10) Establish
guidelines for the participation by eligible banking organizations in programs
conducted by the authority under this chapter;

(11) Act as an agent,
by agreement, for federal, state, or local governmental entities to carry out
the programs authorized in this chapter;

(12) Establish, revise,
and collect such fees and charges as the authority deems necessary, useful, or
convenient to accomplish its purposes;

(13) Make such
expenditures as are appropriate for paying the administrative costs and
expenses of the authority in carrying out the provisions of this chapter:
PROVIDED, That expenditures with respect to the economic development financing
programs of the authority shall not be made from funds of the state;

(14) Establish such
reserves and special funds, and controls on deposits to and disbursements from
them, as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its
purposes;

(15) Give assistance to
public bodies by providing information, guidelines, forms, and procedures for
implementing their financing programs;

(16) Prepare, publish
and distribute, with or without charge, such studies, reports, bulletins, and
other material as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to
accomplish its purposes;

(17) Delegate any of
its powers and duties if consistent with the purposes of this chapter;

(18) Adopt rules
concerning its exercise of the powers authorized by this chapter. For rules
adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the authority
may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority.
The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which
the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions
establishing the authority; and

(19) Exercise any other
power the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its
purposes and exercise the powers expressly granted in this chapter.

Sec. 24. RCW 43.180.040 and 1995
c 399 s 98 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is ((hereby))
established a public body corporate and politic, with perpetual corporate
succession, to be known as the Washington state housing finance commission.
The commission is an instrumentality of the state exercising essential
government functions and, for purposes of the code, acts as a constituted
authority on behalf of the state when it issues bonds pursuant to this
chapter. The commission is a "public body" within the meaning of RCW
39.53.010.

(2) The commission
shall consist of the following voting members:

(a) The state
treasurer, ex officio;

(b) The director of
community, trade, and economic development, ex officio;

(c) An elected local
government official, ex officio, with experience in local housing programs, who
shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate;

(d) A representative of
housing consumer interests, appointed by the governor with the consent of the
senate;

(e) A representative of
labor interests, appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate,
after consultation with representatives of organized labor;

(f) A representative of
low-income persons, appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate;

(g) Five members of the
public appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, on the basis
of geographic distribution and their expertise in housing, real estate, finance,
energy efficiency, or construction, one of whom shall be appointed by the
governor as chair of the commission and who shall serve on the commission and
as chair of the commission at the pleasure of the governor.

The term of the persons
appointed by the governor, other than the chair, shall be four years from the
date of their appointment, except that the terms of three of the initial
appointees shall be for two years from the date of their appointment. The
governor shall designate the appointees who will serve the two-year terms. An
appointee may be removed by the governor for cause pursuant to RCW 43.06.070
and 43.06.080. The governor shall fill any vacancy in an appointed position by
appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term. If the department of
community, trade, and economic development is abolished, the resulting
vacancy shall be filled by a state official who shall be appointed to the
commission by the governor. If this official occupies an office or position
for which senate confirmation is not required, then his or her appointment to
the commission shall be subject to the consent of the senate. The members of
the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and may be
reimbursed, solely from the funds of the commission, for expenses incurred in
the discharge of their duties under this chapter, subject to the provisions of
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. A majority of the commission constitutes a
quorum. Designees shall be appointed in such manner and shall exercise such
powers as are specified by the rules of the commission.

(3) The commission may
adopt an official seal and may select from its membership a vice-chair,
a secretary, and a treasurer. The commission shall establish rules concerning
its exercise of the powers authorized by this chapter. The rules shall be
adopted in conformance with chapter 34.05 RCW. For rules adopted under the
provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the commission may only adopt
rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must
include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a
statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the
commission.

Sec. 25. RCW 43.200.070 and 1989
c 322 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
ecology shall adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out responsibilities
under this chapter. The department of ecology is authorized to adopt such
rules as are necessary to carry out its responsibilities under chapter 43.145
RCW. For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July 1,
2002, the department of ecology may only adopt rules derived from a specific
grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory
section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not
rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general
enabling provisions establishing the department of ecology.

Sec. 26. RCW 43.210.060 and 1995
c 399 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
community, trade, and economic development or its statutory successor shall
adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out the purposes of
this chapter. For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after
July 1, 2002, the department of community, trade, and economic development may
only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The
rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the
grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions
establishing the department of community, trade, and economic development.

Sec. 27. RCW 43.250.090 and 1986
c 294 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The state finance committee
shall administer this chapter and adopt appropriate rules. For rules
adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the state
finance committee may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of
legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section
or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely
solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general
enabling provisions establishing the state finance committee.

Sec. 28. RCW 43.320.040 and 1993
c 472 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of
financial institutions may adopt any rules, under chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary
to implement the powers and duties of the director under this chapter. For
rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the
director of financial institutions may only adopt rules derived from a specific
grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory
section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not
rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the
general enabling provisions establishing the department of financial
institutions.

Sec. 29. RCW 43.330.040 and 1993
c 280 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
supervise and administer the activities of the department and shall advise the
governor and the legislature with respect to community and economic development
matters affecting the state.

(2) In addition to
other powers and duties granted to the director, the director shall have the
following powers and duties:

(a) Enter into
contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(b) Act for the state
in the initiation of or participation in any multigovernmental program relative
to the purpose of this chapter;

(c) Accept and expend
gifts and grants, whether such grants be of federal or other funds;

(d) Appoint such deputy
directors, assistant directors, and up to seven special assistants as may be
needed to administer the department. These employees are exempt from the
provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW;

(e) Prepare and submit
budgets for the department for executive and legislative action;

(f) Submit
recommendations for legislative actions as are deemed necessary to further the
purposes of this chapter;

(g) Adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other functions necessary and
proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter. For rules adopted under
the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the director may only adopt
rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must
include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a
statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the
department;

(h) Delegate powers,
duties, and functions as the director deems necessary for efficient
administration, but the director shall be responsible for the official acts of
the officers and employees of the department; and

(i) Perform other
duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

(3) When federal or
other funds are received by the department, they shall be promptly transferred
to the state treasurer and thereafter expended only upon the approval of the
director.

(4) The director may
request information and assistance from all other agencies, departments, and
officials of the state, and may reimburse such agencies, departments, or
officials if such a request imposes any additional expenses upon any such
agency, department, or official.

(5) The director shall,
in carrying out the responsibilities of office, consult with governmental
officials, private groups, and individuals and with officials of other states.
All state agencies and their officials and the officials of any political
subdivision of the state shall cooperate with and give such assistance to the
department, including the submission of requested information, to allow the
department to carry out its purposes under this chapter.

(6) The director may
establish additional advisory or coordinating groups with the legislature,
within state government, with state and other governmental units, with the
private sector and nonprofit entities or in specialized subject areas as may be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(7) The internal
affairs of the department shall be under the control of the director in order
that the director may manage the department in a flexible and intelligent
manner as dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless specifically
limited by law, the director shall have complete charge and supervisory powers
over the department. The director may create such administrative structures as
the director deems appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law, and the
director may employ such personnel as may be necessary in accordance with
chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided by law.

Sec. 30. RCW 47.01.071 and 1981 c
59 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The transportation
commission shall have the following functions, powers, and duties:

(1) To propose policies
to be adopted by the legislature designed to ((assure)) ensure
the development and maintenance of a comprehensive and balanced statewide
transportation system which will meet the needs of the people of this state for
safe and efficient transportation services. Wherever appropriate the policies
shall provide for the use of integrated, intermodal transportation systems to
implement the social, economic, and environmental policies, goals, and
objectives of the people of the state, and especially to conserve nonrenewable
natural resources including land and energy. To this end the commission shall:

(a) Develop
transportation policies which are based on the policies, goals, and objectives
expressed and inherent in existing state laws;

(b) Inventory the
adopted policies, goals, and objectives of the local and area-wide governmental
bodies of the state and define the role of the state, regional, and local
governments in determining transportation policies, in transportation planning,
and in implementing the state transportation plan;

(c) Propose a
transportation policy for the state, and after notice and public hearings,
submit the proposal to the legislative transportation committee and the senate
and house transportation committees by January 1, 1978, for consideration in
the next legislative session;

(d) Establish a
procedure for review and revision of the state transportation policy and for
submission of proposed changes to the legislature;

(e) To integrate the
statewide transportation plan with the needs of the elderly and handicapped,
and to coordinate federal and state programs directed at assisting local
governments to answer such needs;

(2) To establish the
policy of the department to be followed by the secretary on each of the following
items:

(a) To provide for the
effective coordination of state transportation planning with national
transportation policy, state and local land use policies, and local and
regional transportation plans and programs;

(b) To provide for
public involvement in transportation designed to elicit the public's views both
with respect to adequate transportation services and appropriate means of
minimizing adverse social, economic, environmental, and energy impact of
transportation programs;

(c) To provide for the
administration of grants in aid and other financial assistance to counties and
municipal corporations for transportation purposes;

(d) To provide for the
management, sale, and lease of property or property rights owned by the
department which are not required for transportation purposes;

(3) To direct the
secretary to prepare and submit to the commission a comprehensive and balanced
statewide transportation plan which shall be based on the transportation policy
adopted by the legislature and applicable state and federal laws. After public
notice and hearings, the commission shall adopt the plan and submit it to the
legislative transportation committee and to the house and senate standing
committees on transportation before January 1, 1980, for consideration in the
1980 regular legislative session. The plan shall be reviewed and revised prior
to each regular session of the legislature during an even-numbered year
thereafter. A preliminary plan shall be submitted to such committees by
January 1, 1979.

The plan shall take
into account federal law and regulations relating to the planning,
construction, and operation of transportation facilities;

(4) To propose to the
governor and the legislature prior to the convening of each regular session
held in an odd-numbered year a recommended budget for the operations of the
commission as required by RCW 47.01.061;

(5) To approve and
propose to the governor and to the legislature prior to the convening of each
regular session during an odd-numbered year a recommended budget for the
operation of the department and for carrying out the program of the department
for the ensuing biennium. The proposed budget shall separately state the
appropriations to be made from the motor vehicle fund for highway purposes in
accordance with constitutional limitations and appropriations and expenditures
to be made from the general fund, or accounts thereof, and other available
sources for other operations and programs of the department;

(6) To review and
authorize all departmental requests for legislation;

(7) To approve the
issuance and sale of all bonds authorized by the legislature for capital
construction of state highways, toll facilities, Columbia Basin county roads
(for which reimbursement to the motor vehicle fund has been provided), urban
arterial projects, and aviation facilities;

(8) To adopt ((such))
rules((, regulations,)) and policy directives as may be necessary to
carry out reasonably and properly those functions expressly vested in the
commission by statute. For rules adopted under the provisions of this
chapter after July 1, 2002, the commission may only adopt rules derived from a
specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific
statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and
may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose
or the general enabling provisions establishing the department;

(9) To delegate any of
its powers to the secretary of transportation whenever it deems it desirable
for the efficient administration of the department and consistent with the
purposes of this title;

(10) To exercise such
other specific powers and duties as may be vested in the transportation
commission by this or any other provision of law.

Sec. 31. RCW 48.02.060 and 1947 c
79 s .02.06 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commissioner
shall have the authority expressly conferred upon him or her by or
reasonably implied from the provisions of this code.

(2) The commissioner
shall execute his or her duties and shall enforce the provisions of this
code.

(3) The commissioner
may:

(a) ((Make)) Adopt
reasonable rules ((and regulations)) for effectuating any provision of
this code, except those relating to his or her election, qualifications,
or compensation. No ((such)) rules ((and regulations shall be)) are
effective prior to their being filed for public inspection in the
commissioner's office. For rules adopted under the provisions of this
chapter after July 1, 2002, the commissioner may only adopt rules derived from
a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific
statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and
may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose
or the general enabling provisions establishing the office of the insurance
commissioner.

(b) Conduct
investigations to determine whether any person has violated any provision of
this code.

(c) Conduct
examinations, investigations, hearings, in addition to those specifically
provided for, useful and proper for the efficient administration of any
provision of this code.

Sec. 32. RCW 48.44.050 and 1947 c
268 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The insurance
commissioner shall ((make)) adopt reasonable ((regulations))
rules in aid of the administration of this chapter which may include,
but shall not be limited to ((regulations)) rules concerning the
maintenance of adequate insurance, bonds, or cash deposits, information
required of registrants, and methods of expediting speedy and fair payments to
claimants. For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after
July 1, 2002, the insurance commissioner may only adopt rules derived from a
specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific
statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and
may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose
or the general enabling provisions establishing the office of the insurance
commissioner.

Sec. 33. RCW 48.46.200 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 290 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

The commissioner may,
in accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter
34.05 RCW, ((promulgate)) adopt rules ((and regulations))
as necessary or proper to carry out the provisions of this chapter. For
rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the
commissioner may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative
authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections
from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a
section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the office of the insurance commissioner. Nothing
in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the commissioner from requiring
changes in procedures previously approved by him.

Sec. 34. RCW 66.08.0501 and 1997
c 321 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

The liquor control
board may adopt appropriate rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW for the purpose
of carrying out the provisions of chapter 321, Laws of 1997. For rules
adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the liquor
control board may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative
authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections
from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a
section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the liquor control board.

Sec. 35. RCW 77.04.055 and 2000 c
107 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In establishing
policies to preserve, protect, and perpetuate wildlife, fish, and wildlife and
fish habitat, the commission shall meet annually with the governor to:

(a) Review and
prescribe basic goals and objectives related to those policies; and

(b) Review the
performance of the department in implementing fish and wildlife policies.

The commission shall
maximize fishing, hunting, and outdoor recreational opportunities compatible
with healthy and diverse fish and wildlife populations.

(2) The commission
shall establish hunting, trapping, and fishing seasons and prescribe the time,
place, manner, and methods that may be used to harvest or enjoy game fish and
wildlife.

(3) The commission
shall establish provisions regulating food fish and shellfish as provided in
RCW 77.12.047.

(4) The commission shall
have final approval authority for tribal, interstate, international, and any
other department agreements relating to fish and wildlife.

(5) The commission
shall adopt rules to implement the state's fish and wildlife laws. For
rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the
commission may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative
authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections
from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a
section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the commission or the department.

(6) The commission
shall have final approval authority for the department's budget proposals.

(7) The commission
shall select its own staff and shall appoint the director of the department.
The director and commission staff shall serve at the pleasure of the
commission.

Sec. 36. RCW 80.01.040 and 1985 c
450 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The utilities and
transportation commission shall:

(1) Exercise all the
powers and perform all the duties prescribed therefor by this title and by
Title 81 RCW, or by any other law.

(2) Regulate in the
public interest, as provided by the public service laws, the rates, services,
facilities, and practices of all persons engaging in the transportation by
whatever means of persons or property within this state for compensation, and
related activities; including, but not limited to, air transportation
companies, auto transportation companies, express companies, freight and
freight line companies, motor freight companies, motor transportation agents,
private car companies, railway companies, sleeping car companies, steamboat companies,
street railway companies, toll bridge companies, storage warehousemen, and
wharfingers and warehousemen.

(3) Regulate in the
public interest, as provided by the public service laws, the rates, services,
facilities, and practices of all persons engaging within this state in the
business of supplying any utility service or commodity to the public for
compensation, and related activities; including, but not limited to, electrical
companies, gas companies, irrigation companies, telecommunications companies,
and water companies.

(4) ((Make
such)) Adopt rules ((and regulations)) as may be necessary to
carry out its other powers and duties. For rules adopted under the
provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2002, the commission may only adopt
rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must
include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a
statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the
commission.

---
END ---