BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 15.17.230 and 1998 c
154 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

For the
purpose of this chapter the state shall be divided into not less than ((three))
two fruit and vegetable inspection districts ((to which the director
may assign a district manager who shall supervise and administer regulatory and
inspection affairs of the districts)). The director, by rule, shall
establish the boundaries of the districts and may adjust the boundaries for
purposes of efficiency and economy.

Sec. 2. RCW 15.17.240 and 1998 c
154 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The district
managers shall collect the fees provided for under this chapter and deposit
them in the fruit and vegetable district fund in any bank in the district
approved for the deposit of state funds. The fees shall be used to carry out
the provisions of this chapter and no appropriation is required for
disbursement from the fund. District managers shall approve payments from the
fruit and vegetable inspection district funds to the fruit and vegetable
inspection trust account in accordance with RCW 15.17.245. On a monthly basis,
each district manager shall provide to the director a detailed account of the
receipts and disbursements for the preceding month.

(2) Assessments and
other fees approved by the director or authorized by law and collected by the
district managers shall be deposited in the fruit and vegetable inspection
district funds and distributed to the appropriate fund or agency.)) The fruit and vegetable inspection account
is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All fees collected under
this chapter must be deposited into the account. The director may authorize
expenditures from the account solely for the implementation and enforcement of
this chapter and any other expenditures authorized by statute or session law
and applying specifically to the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

The director shall
establish and maintain an account within the fruit and vegetable inspection
account for each district established under RCW 15.17.230.

(2) By August 1,
2004, and by August 1st of each even-numbered year thereafter, the director
shall review the balance of each of the district accounts in the fruit and
vegetable inspection account at the end of the previous fiscal year. If the
balance in the district account exceeds the sum of the following: An amount
equal to the total expenditures of the district served by that account for the
last six months of that previous fiscal year; any budgeted capital expenditures
from the account for the current fiscal year; and six hundred thousand dollars,
the director shall temporarily and equally, on a percentage basis, reduce each
of the fees accruing to the district account until such time that the district
account has a balance equal to the amount of the total expenditures from the
account for the last seven months of the previous fiscal year, at which time
the fees shall be returned to the amounts before the temporary reduction. In
making the reductions, the director shall attempt to reduce fees for a twelve‑month
period so as to apply the reductions to as many of the persons who annually pay
fees for services provided by the district. The temporary fee reductions shall
be initially provided through the adoption of emergency rules. The emergency
and subsequent rules temporarily reducing the fees are exempt from the
requirements of RCW 34.05.310 and chapter 19.85 RCW. These fees shall be
reinstated through the expiration of the rules temporarily reducing them and
the authority to reinstate them is hereby granted.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Any residual balance
in any fruit and vegetable district fund on the effective date of this act
shall be transferred to the fruit and vegetable inspection account established
in RCW 15.17.240. Any such residual balance in the district fund for district
number 2, as the district is constituted by rule on January 1, 2002, shall be
transferred to the district account for the district containing Yakima county.
Any such residual balance in the district fund for any other district shall be
transferred to the district account for the district not containing Yakima
county. Any residual balance in the fruit and vegetable inspection trust account
on the effective date of this act shall be transferred to the fruit and
vegetable inspection account established in RCW 15.17.240 and shall be equally
distributed among the district accounts.

(2) The director shall
review the residual balance of each of the district funds transferred to the
fruit and vegetable inspection account under subsection (1) of this section.
If such a residual balance in the district fund exceeds an amount equal to the
total of the expenditures of the district served by that fund for the last six
months of fiscal year 2002, the director of agriculture shall temporarily
reduce each of the inspection fees adopted by rule which accrue to the district
account into which the residual balance from that fund was transferred under
this section. The fees shall be temporarily reduced by twelve and one-half
percent for the district served by the district account and shall remain
temporarily reduced until such time as the district account has a balance equal
to the amount of the total expenditures from the district fund, from which the
district account received such a residual balance exceeding the six-month
expenditures, for the seven months ending June 30, 2002. At such time, the
fees charged shall return to the level of the fees adopted by rule.

Sec. 4. RCW 15.17.243 and 2001 c
92 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The district manager
for district two as defined in WAC 16‑458‑075 is authorized to
transfer two hundred thousand dollars from the fruit and vegetable district
fund to the plant pest account within the agricultural local fund. The amount
transferred is to be derived from fees collected for state inspections of tree
fruits and is to be used solely for activities related to the control of Rhagoletis
pomonella in district two. The transfer of funds shall occur by June 1, 1997.
On June 30, 2003, any unexpended portion of the two hundred thousand dollars
shall be ((returned)) transferred to the fruit and vegetable ((district
fund)) inspection account and deposited in the district account for the
district that includes Yakima county.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2001
c 201 s 4 and 2001 c 184 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Money in the
treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state
treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same
extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2) All income received
from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set aside in an account
in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.

(3) The investment
income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on
behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial
institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a) Monthly, the
state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the investment income
account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The
college savings program account, the Washington advanced college tuition
payment program account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship
endowment fund, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the
fruit and vegetable inspection account, the game farm alternative account,
the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving
fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the children's trust fund.
However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(c) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the advanced environmental
mitigation revolving account, the city and county advance right-of-way
revolving fund, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high
occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. If fruit and vegetable
inspection districts that existed on January 1, 2002, under RCW 15.17.230 are
consolidated or otherwise altered during 2002, the consolidation or alternation
must not result in a reduction of inspection services or the availability or
quality of those services in any of the districts, but may result in a
consolidation of administrative support for those services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. RCW 15.17.245 (Fruit and vegetable
inspection trust account) and 1998 c 154 s 19, 1987 c 393 s 2, 1986 c 203 s 1,
1969 ex.s. c 76 s 1, & 1961 c 11 s 15.04.100 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002. However, the director of the department of agriculture and the
state treasurer may take actions before July 1, 2002, to permit the creation of
the fruit and vegetable inspection account and the district accounts described
in RCW 15.17.240 by July 1, 2002.

---
END ---