BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79.01.184 and 2001 c
250 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

When the department of
natural resources shall have decided to sell any state lands or valuable
materials thereon, or with the consent of the board of regents of the
University of Washington, or by legislative directive, shall have decided to
sell any lot, block, tract, or tracts of university lands, or the valuable
materials thereon, it shall be the duty of the department to fix the date,
place, and time of sale, and no sale shall be had on any day which is a legal
holiday.

The department shall ((give))
provide notice of the sale by advertisement published not less than two
times during a four-week period prior to the time of sale in at least
one newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the ((whole, or
any part of any lot, block, or tract of)) land ((to be sold,)) or ((the))
valuable material ((upon which is)) to be sold is situated((,
and by posting)). The department of natural resources must post a
copy of the notice in a conspicuous place in the department's Olympia office,
the region headquarters administering such sale, and in the office of the
county auditor of such county. The notice shall specify the place, date, and
time of sale, the appraised value thereof, ((and describe with particularity))
the location of each parcel of land to be sold, or from which valuable
materials are to be sold((. In the case of valuable materials sales, the
estimated volume will be identified and the terms of sale will be available in
the region headquarters and the department's Olympia office)), and
describe where additional information regarding the sale can be obtained.

Prior to selling
valuable materials, the department of natural resources must widely advertise
during a four-week period. The advertisement must specify the place, date, and
time of sale, the minimum bid, and the estimated volume. The terms of sale
must also be made available in the region headquarters and the department's
Olympia office. The commissioner of public lands may use any means of
advertising available to reach as many prospective interested parties as
possible.

The advertisement is
for informational purposes only, and under no circumstances does the
information in the notice of sale constitute a warranty that the purchaser will
receive the stated values, volumes, or acreage. All purchasers are expected to
make their own measurements, evaluations, and appraisals.

A direct
sale of valuable materials may be sold to the applicant for cash at full
appraised value without notice or advertising. The board of natural resources
shall, by resolution, establish the value amount of a direct sale not to exceed
twenty thousand dollars in appraised sale value, and establish procedures to
ensure that competitive market prices and accountability will be guaranteed.

--- END ---