BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that it is in the best interest of the trust beneficiaries to capture
additional revenues while providing for additional environmental protection on
timber sales. Further, the legislature finds that contract harvesting is one
method to achieve these desired outcomes. Therefore, the legislature directs
the department of natural resources to establish and implement contract
harvesting where there exists the ability to increase revenues for the
beneficiaries of the trusts while obtaining increases in environmental
protection.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.

(2) "Contract
harvesting" means a timber operation occurring on state forest lands, in
which the department contracts with a firm or individual to perform all the
necessary harvesting work to process trees into logs sorted by department
specifications. The department then sells the individual log sorts.

(3)
"Department" means the department of natural resources.

(4) "Harvesting
costs" are those expenses related to the production of log sorts from a
stand of timber. These expenses typically involve road building, labor for
felling, bucking, and yarding, as well as the transporting of sorted logs to
the forest product purchasers.

(5) "Net
proceeds" means gross proceeds from a contract harvesting sale less
harvesting costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The department may
establish a contract harvesting program by directly contracting for the removal
of timber and other valuable materials from state lands.

(2) The contract
requirements must be compatible with the office of financial management's guide
to public service contracts.

(3) Contract harvesting
may be used anywhere in the state except for the area east of the Okanogan
river, north of the Columbia river, and north of the main channel of the
Spokane river.

(4) The department may
not use contract harvesting for more than ten percent of the total annual
volume of timber offered for sale.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The contract harvesting
revolving account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from the gross proceeds of the sale of logs from a contract harvesting
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the payment of harvesting costs incurred on contract harvesting
sales. Only the commissioner or the commissioner's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The board of natural resources has oversight of
the account, and the commissioner must periodically report to the board of
natural resources as to the status of the account, its disbursement, and
receipts. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

When the logs from a
contract harvesting sale are sold, the gross proceeds must be deposited into
the contract harvesting revolving account. Moneys equal to the harvesting
costs must be retained in the account and be deducted from the gross proceeds
to determine the net proceeds. The net proceeds from the sale of the logs must
be distributed in accordance with RCW 43.85.130(1)(b). The final receipt of
gross proceeds on a contract harvesting sale must be retained in the contract
harvesting revolving account until all required costs for that sale have been
paid. The contract harvesting revolving account is an interest-bearing account
and the interest must be credited to the account. The account may not exceed
one million dollars. Moneys in excess of one million dollars must be disbursed
according to RCW 76.12.030, 76.12.120, and 79.64.040. If the department
permanently discontinues the use of contract harvesting sales, any sums
remaining in the contract harvesting revolving account must be returned to the
resource management cost account and the forest development account in
proportion to each account's contribution to the initial balance of the
contract harvesting revolving account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The board of natural
resources must determine whether any special appraisal practices are necessary
for logs sold by the contract harvesting processes, and if so, must adopt the
special appraisal practices or procedures. In its consideration of special
appraisal practices, the board of natural resources must consider and adopt
procedures to rapidly market and sell any log sorts that failed to receive the
required minimum bid at the original auction, which may include allowing the
department to set a new appraised value for the unsold log sort.

The board of natural
resources must establish and adopt policy and procedures by which the
department evaluates and selects certified contract harvesters. The procedures
must include a method whereby a certified contract harvester may appeal a
decision by the department or board of natural resources to not include the
certified contract harvester on the list of approved contract harvesters.

Sec. 6. RCW 76.12.030 and 1997 c
370 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If any land acquired by
a county through foreclosure of tax liens, or otherwise, comes within the
classification of land described in RCW 76.12.020 and can be used as state
forest land and if the department deems such land necessary for the purposes of
this chapter, the county shall, upon demand by the department, deed such land
to the department and the land shall become a part of the state forest lands.

Such land shall be held
in trust and administered and protected by the department as other state forest
lands. Any moneys derived from the lease of such land or from the sale of
forest products, oils, gases, coal, minerals, or fossils therefrom, shall be
distributed as follows:

(1) The expense
incurred by the state for administration, reforestation, and protection, not to
exceed twenty-five percent, which rate of percentage shall be determined by the
board of natural resources, shall be returned to the forest development account
in the state general fund.

(2) Any balance
remaining shall be paid to the county in which the land is located to be paid,
distributed, and prorated, except as hereinafter provided, to the various funds
in the same manner as general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of
payment: PROVIDED, That any such balance remaining paid to a county with a
population of less than sixteen thousand shall first be applied to the
reduction of any indebtedness existing in the current expense fund of such
county during the year of payment.

In the event that
the department sells logs using the contract harvesting process described in
chapter 79.-- RCW (sections 2 through 5 of this act), the moneys derived
subject to this section are the net proceeds from the contract harvesting sale.

Sec. 7. RCW 76.12.120 and 2000 c
148 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in
RCW 76.12.125, all land, acquired or designated by the department as state
forest land, shall be forever reserved from sale, but the timber and other
products thereon may be sold or the land may be leased in the same manner and
for the same purposes as is authorized for state granted land if the department
finds such sale or lease to be in the best interests of the state and approves
the terms and conditions thereof.

Except as provided in
RCW 79.12.035, all money derived from the sale of timber or other products, or
from lease, or from any other source from the land, except where the
Constitution of this state or RCW 76.12.030 requires other disposition, shall
be disposed of as follows:

(1) Fifty percent shall
be placed in the forest development account.

(2) Fifty percent shall
be prorated and distributed to the state general fund, to be dedicated for the
benefit of the public schools, and the county in which the land is located
according to the relative proportions of tax levies of all taxing districts in
the county. The portion to be distributed to the state general fund shall be
based on the regular school levy rate under RCW 84.52.065 as now or hereafter
amended and the levy rate for any maintenance and operation special school
levies. With regard to the portion to be distributed to the counties, the
department shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be distributed
within seven working days of receipt of the money. The state treasurer shall
distribute funds to the counties four times per month, with no more than ten
days between each payment date. The money distributed to the county shall be paid,
distributed, and prorated to the various other funds in the same manner as
general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of payment.

In the event that
the department sells logs using the contract harvesting process described in
chapter 79.-- RCW (sections 2 through 5 of this act), the moneys received
subject to this section are the net proceeds from the contract harvesting sale.

Sec. 8. RCW 79.64.040 and 2001 c
250 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall
determine the amount deemed necessary in order to achieve the purposes of this
chapter and shall provide by rule for the deduction of this amount from the
moneys received from all leases, sales, contracts, licenses, permits,
easements, and rights of way issued by the department and affecting public
lands, provided that no deduction shall be made from the proceeds from
agricultural college lands. Moneys received as deposits from successful
bidders, advance payments, and security under RCW 79.01.132 and 79.01.204 prior
to December 1, 1981, which have not been subjected to deduction under this
section are not subject to deduction under this section. The deductions
authorized under this section shall in no event exceed twenty-five percent of
the moneys received by the department in connection with any one transaction
pertaining to public lands other than second class tide and shore lands and the
beds of navigable waters, and fifty percent of the moneys received by the
department pertaining to second class tide and shore lands and the beds of
navigable waters.

In the event that
the department sells logs using the contract harvesting process described in
chapter 79.-- RCW (sections 2 through 5 of this act), the moneys received
subject to this section are the net proceeds from the contract harvesting sale.

Sec. 9. RCW 43.85.130 and 1981
2nd ex.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall deposit daily all moneys and fees collected or received by the
commissioner of public lands and the department of natural resources in the
discharge of official duties as follows:

(a) The department
shall pay moneys received as advance payments, deposits, and security from
successful bidders under RCW 79.01.132 and 79.01.204 to the state treasurer for
deposit under subsection (1)(b) of this section. Moneys received from
unsuccessful bidders shall be returned as provided in RCW 79.01.204;

(b) The department
shall pay all moneys received on behalf of a trust fund or account to the state
treasurer for deposit in the trust fund or account after making the deduction
authorized under RCW 76.12.030, 76.12.120, ((and)) 79.64.040, and
section 4 of this act;

(c) The natural
resources deposit fund is hereby created. The state treasurer is the custodian
of the fund. All moneys or sums which remain in the custody of the
commissioner of public lands awaiting disposition or where the final
disposition is not known shall be deposited into the natural resources deposit
fund. Disbursement from the fund shall be on the authorization of the
commissioner or the commissioner's designee, without necessity of
appropriation;

(d) If it is required
by law that the department repay moneys disbursed under subsections (1)(a) and
(1)(b) of this section the state treasurer shall transfer such moneys, without
necessity of appropriation, to the department upon demand by the department
from those trusts and accounts originally receiving the moneys.

(2) Money shall not be
deemed to have been paid to the state upon any sale or lease of land until it
has been paid to the state treasurer.

Sec. 10. RCW 43.84.092 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 14 s 608, 2001 c 273 s 6, 2001 c 141 s 3, and 2001 c 80 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the contract harvesting revolving account,
the county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction account, the
deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
drinking water assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education construction
fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving account, the
health services account, the public health services account, the health system
capacity account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise
tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use
tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the
multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural
resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system
plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the public health supplemental account, the Puyallup tribal
settlement account, the resource management cost account, the site closure
account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account,
the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account,
the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the Washington
judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account,
the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol
retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving
fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal
school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to
their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under
this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 11. RCW 84.33.078 and 1986 c
65 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

When any timber
standing on public land, other than federally owned land, is sold separate from
the land, the department of natural resources or other governmental unit, as
appropriate, shall state in its notice of the sale or prospectus that timber
sold separate from the land is subject to property tax and that the amount of
the tax paid may be used as a credit against any tax imposed with respect to
business of harvesting timber from publicly owned land under RCW 84.33.041. If
the timber from public land is harvested by the state, its departments and
institutions and political subdivisions, or any municipal corporation therein,
the governmental unit, or governmental units, that harvest or market the timber
must provide the harvester purchasing the timber with its harvesting and
marketing costs as defined in RCW 84.33.035(7).

Sec. 12. RCW 84.33.035 and 2001 c
249 s 1 and 2001 c 97 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Agricultural
methods" means the cultivation of trees that are grown on land prepared by
intensive cultivation and tilling, such as irrigating, plowing, or turning over
the soil, and on which all unwanted plant growth is controlled continuously for
the exclusive purpose of raising trees such as Christmas trees and
short-rotation hardwoods.

(2) "Average rate
of inflation" means the annual rate of inflation as determined by the
department averaged over the period of time as provided in RCW 84.33.220 (1)
and (2). This rate shall be published in the state register by the department
not later than January 1st of each year for use in that assessment year.

(3) "Composite
property tax rate" for a county means the total amount of property taxes
levied upon forest lands by all taxing districts in the county other than the
state, divided by the total assessed value of all forest land in the county.

(4) "Forest
land" is synonymous with "designated forest land" and means any
parcel of land that is twenty or more acres or multiple parcels of land that
are contiguous and total twenty or more acres that is or are devoted primarily
to growing and harvesting timber. Designated forest land means the land only
and does not include a residential homesite. The term includes land used for
incidental uses that are compatible with the growing and harvesting of timber
but no more than ten percent of the land may be used for such incidental uses.
It also includes the land on which appurtenances necessary for the production,
preparation, or sale of the timber products exist in conjunction with land
producing these products.

(5)
"Harvested" means the time when in the ordinary course of business
the quantity of timber by species is first definitely determined. The amount
harvested shall be determined by the Scribner Decimal C Scale or other
prevalent measuring practice adjusted to arrive at substantially equivalent
measurements, as approved by the department.

(6)
"Harvester" means every person who from the person's own land or from
the land of another under a right or license granted by lease or contract,
either directly or by contracting with others for the necessary labor or
mechanical services, fells, cuts, or takes timber for sale or for commercial or
industrial use. When the United States or any instrumentality thereof, the
state, including its departments and institutions and political subdivisions,
or any municipal corporation therein so fells, cuts, or takes timber for sale
or for commercial or industrial use, the harvester is the first person other
than the United States or any instrumentality thereof, the state, including its
departments and institutions and political subdivisions, or any municipal
corporation therein, who acquires title to or a possessory interest in the
timber. The term "harvester" does not include persons performing
under contract the necessary labor or mechanical services for a harvester.

(7) "Harvesting
and marketing costs" means only those costs directly associated with
harvesting the timber from the land and delivering it to the buyer and may
include the costs of disposing of logging residues. Any other costs that are
not directly and exclusively related to harvesting and marketing of the timber,
such as costs of permanent roads or costs of reforesting the land following
harvest, are not harvesting and marketing costs.

(8) "Incidental
use" means a use of designated forest land that is compatible with its
purpose for growing and harvesting timber. An incidental use may include a gravel
pit, a shed or land used to store machinery or equipment used in conjunction
with the timber enterprise, and any other use that does not interfere with or
indicate that the forest land is no longer primarily being used to grow and
harvest timber.

(9) "Local
government" means any city, town, county, water-sewer district, public
utility district, port district, irrigation district, flood control district,
or any other municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or other
political subdivision authorized to levy special benefit assessments for
sanitary or storm sewerage systems, domestic water supply or distribution
systems, or road construction or improvement purposes.

(10) "Local
improvement district" means any local improvement district, utility local
improvement district, local utility district, road improvement district, or any
similar unit created by a local government for the purpose of levying special
benefit assessments against property specially benefited by improvements
relating to the districts.

(11) "Owner"
means the party or parties having the fee interest in land, except where land
is subject to a real estate contract "owner" means the contract
vendee.

(12)
"Primarily" or "primary use" means the existing use of the
land is so prevalent that when the characteristic use of the land is evaluated
any other use appears to be conflicting or nonrelated.

(13)
"Short-rotation hardwoods" means hardwood trees, such as but not
limited to hybrid cottonwoods, cultivated by agricultural methods in growing
cycles shorter than fifteen years.

(14) "Small
harvester" means every person who from his or her own land or from the
land of another under a right or license granted by lease or contract, either
directly or by contracting with others for the necessary labor or mechanical
services, fells, cuts, or takes timber for sale or for commercial or industrial
use in an amount not exceeding two million board feet in a calendar year. When
the United States or any instrumentality thereof, the state, including its
departments and institutions and political subdivisions, or any municipal
corporation therein so fells, cuts, or takes timber for sale or for commercial
or industrial use, not exceeding these amounts, the small harvester is the
first person other than the United States or any instrumentality thereof, the
state, including its departments and institutions and political subdivisions,
or any municipal corporation therein, who acquires title to or a possessory
interest in the timber. Small harvester does not include persons performing
under contract the necessary labor or mechanical services for a harvester, and
it does not include the harvesters of Christmas trees or short-rotation
hardwoods.

(15) "Special
benefit assessments" means special assessments levied or capable of being
levied in any local improvement district or otherwise levied or capable of
being levied by a local government to pay for all or part of the costs of a
local improvement and which may be levied only for the special benefits to be realized
by property by reason of that local improvement.

(16) "Stumpage
value of timber" means the appropriate stumpage value shown on tables
prepared by the department under RCW 84.33.091, provided that for timber
harvested from public land and sold under a competitive bidding process,
stumpage value shall mean the actual amount paid to the seller in cash or other
consideration. The stumpage value of timber from public land does not
include harvesting and marketing costs if the timber from public land is
harvested by, or under contract for, the United States or any instrumentality
of the United States, the state, including its departments and institutions and
political subdivisions, or any municipal corporation therein. Whenever
payment for the stumpage includes considerations other than cash, the value
shall be the fair market value of the other consideration. If the other
consideration is permanent roads, the value of the roads shall be the appraised
value as appraised by the seller.

(17) "Timber"
means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or publicly owned land, and
except as provided in RCW 84.33.170 includes Christmas trees and short-rotation
hardwoods.

(18) "Timber
assessed value" for a county means a value, calculated by the department
before October 1st of each year, equal to the total stumpage value of timber
harvested from privately owned land in the county during the most recent four
calendar quarters for which the information is available multiplied by a
ratio. The numerator of the ratio is the rate of tax imposed by the county
under RCW 84.33.051 for the year of the calculation. The denominator of the
ratio is the composite property tax rate for the county for taxes due in the
year of the calculation, expressed as a percentage of assessed value.

(19) "Timber
assessed value" for a taxing district means the timber assessed value for
the county multiplied by a ratio. The numerator of the ratio is the total
assessed value of forest land in the taxing district. The denominator is the total
assessed value of forest land in the county. As used in this section,
"assessed value of forest land" means the assessed value of forest
land for taxes due in the year the timber assessed value for the county is
calculated.

(20) "Timber
management plan" means a plan prepared by a trained forester, or any other
person with adequate knowledge of timber management practices, concerning the
use of the land to grow and harvest timber. Such a plan includes:

(a) A legal description
of the forest land;

(b) A statement that
the forest land is held in contiguous ownership of twenty or more acres and is
primarily devoted to and used to grow and harvest timber;

(c) A brief description
of the timber on the forest land or, if the timber on the land has been harvested,
the owner's plan to restock the land with timber;

(d) A statement about
whether the forest land is also used to graze livestock;

(e) A statement about
whether the land has been used in compliance with the restocking, forest
management, fire protection, insect and disease control, and forest debris
provisions of Title 76 RCW; and

(f) If the land has
been recently harvested or supports a growth of brush and noncommercial type
timber, a description of the owner's plan to restock the forest land within
three years.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. (1) The sum of two
hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the resource
management cost account to the contract harvesting revolving account for the
purposes of this act.

(2) The sum of two
hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the forest development
account to the contract harvesting revolving account for the purposes of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. The department of natural
resources must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature concerning the costs and effectiveness of the contract harvesting
program. The report must be submitted by December 31, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. Sections 2 through 5 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 79 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---