BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 9.91 RCW to read as follows:

Every
person who operates a private airplane in violation of federal law or
regulation by flying closer than one thousand feet to the Washington state
legislative building or the governor's mansion is guilty of a class C felony.

--- END ---