BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.31.020 and 1998 c 228 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:

((Unless a different meaning is clearly required by the context,
the following words and phrases, as hereinafter used in this chapter,
shall have the following meanings:))

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Employment agency" is synonymous with "agency" and ((shall))
means any business in which any part of the business gross or net
income is derived from a fee received from applicants, and in which any
of the following activities are engaged in:

(a) The offering, promising, procuring, or attempting to procure
employment for applicants;

(b) The giving of information regarding where and from whom
employment may be obtained; or

(c) The sale of a list of jobs or a list of names of persons or
companies accepting applications for specific positions, in any form.

In addition, the term "employment agency" ((shall)) means and
includes any person, bureau, employment listing service, employment
directory, organization, or school which for profit, by advertisement
or otherwise, offers, as one of its main objects or purposes, to
procure employment for any person who pays for its services, or which
collects tuition, or charges for service of any nature, where the main
object of the person paying the same is to secure employment. It also
includes any business that provides a resume to an individual and
provides that person with a list of names to whom the resume may be
sent or provides that person with preaddressed envelopes to be mailed
by the individual or by the business itself, if the list of names or
the preaddressed envelopes have been compiled and are represented by
the business as having job openings. The term "employment agency"
((shall)) does not include labor union organizations, temporary service
contractors, proprietary schools operating within the scope of
activities for which the school is licensed under chapter 28C.10 RCW,
nonprofit schools and colleges, career guidance and counseling
services, employment directories that are sold in a manner that allows
the applicant to examine the directory before purchase, theatrical
agencies, modeling agencies, farm labor contractors, or the Washington
state employment agency.

(2) "Temporary service contractors" ((shall)) means any person,
firm, association, or corporation conducting a business which consists
of employing individuals directly for the purpose of furnishing such
individuals on a part time or temporary help basis to others.

(3) "Modeling agency" means a person, firm, association, or
corporation engaged in the business of conducting an agency, bureau,
office, or other place for the purpose of procuring, offering,
promising, or attempting to provide engagements for persons who want to
procure employment as models, or giving information as to where these
engagements may be procured or provided.

(4) "Theatrical agency" means ((any person who, for a fee or
commission, procures on behalf of an individual or individuals,
employment or engagements for circus, vaudeville, the variety field,
the legitimate theater, motion pictures, radio, television, phonograph
recordings, transcriptions, opera, concert, ballet, modeling, or other
entertainments, exhibitions, or performances. The term "theatrical
agency" does not include any person charging an applicant a fee prior
to or in advance of:

(a) Procuring employment for the applicant;

(b) Giving or providing the applicant information regarding where
or from whom employment may be obtained;

(c) Allowing or requiring the applicant to participate in any
instructional class, audition, or career guidance or counseling; or

(d) Allowing the applicant to be eligible for employment through
the person.

(4))) a person, firm, association, or corporation conducting an
agency, bureau, office, or other place for the purpose of procuring,
offering, promising, or attempting to provide engagements for persons
who want employment in the following occupations: Circus, theater,
motion pictures, radio, television, studio recordings, transcriptions,
opera, concert, ballet, or other entertainments, exhibitions, or
performances; or of giving information as to where these engagements
may be procured or provided.

(5) "Farm labor contractor" means any person, or his or her agent,
who, for a fee, employs workers to render personal services in
connection with the production of any farm products, to, for, or under
the direction of an employer engaged in the growing, producing, or
harvesting of farm products, or who recruits, solicits, supplies, or
hires workers on behalf of an employer engaged in the growing,
producing, or harvesting of farm products or who provides in connection
with recruiting, soliciting, supplying, or hiring workers engaged in
the growing, producing, or harvesting of farm products, one or more of
the following services: Furnishes board, lodging, or transportation
for such workers, supervises, times, checks, counts, sizes, or
otherwise directs or measures their work; or disburses wage payments to
such persons.

(((5))) (6) "Employer" means any person, firm, corporation,
partnership, or association employing or seeking to enter into an
arrangement to employ a person through the medium or service of an
employment agency.

(((6))) (7) "Applicant", except when used to describe an applicant
for an employment agency license, means any person, whether employed or
unemployed, seeking or entering into any arrangement for his or her
employment or change of his or her employment through the medium or
service of an employment agency.

(((7))) (8) "Person" includes any individual, firm, corporation,
partnership, association, company, society, manager, contractor,
subcontractor, bureau, agency, service, office, or an agent or employee
of any of the foregoing.

(((8))) (9) "Director" ((shall)) means the director of licensing.

(((9))) (10) "Resume" means a document of the applicant's
employment history that is approved, received, and paid for by the
applicant.

(((10))) (11) "Fee" means anything of value. The term includes
money or other valuable consideration or services or the promise of
money or other valuable consideration or services, received directly or
indirectly by an employment agency from a person seeking employment, in
payment for the service.

(((11))) (12) "Employment listing service" means any business
operated by any person that provides in any form, including written or
verbal, lists of specified positions of employment available with any
employer other than itself or that holds itself out to applicants as
able to provide information about specific positions of employment
available with any employer other than itself, and that charges a fee
to the applicant for its services and does not set up interviews or
otherwise intercede between employer and applicant.

(((12))) (13) "Employment directory" means any business operated by
any person that provides in any form, including written or verbal,
lists of employers, does not provide lists of specified positions of
employment, that holds itself out to applicants as able to provide
information on employment in specific industries or geographical areas,
and that charges a fee to the applicant for its services.

(((13))) (14) "Career guidance and counseling service" means any
person, firm, association, or corporation conducting a business that
engages in any of the following activities:

(a) Career assessment, planning, or testing through individual
counseling or group seminars, classes, or workshops;

(b) Skills analysis, resume writing, and preparation through
individual counseling or group seminars, classes, or workshops;

(c) Training in job search or interviewing skills through
individual counseling or group seminars, classes, or workshops:
PROVIDED, That the career guidance and counseling service does not
engage in any of the following activities:

(i) Contacts employers on behalf of an applicant or in any way
intercedes between employer and applicant;

(ii) Provides information on specific job openings;

(iii) Holds itself out as able to provide referrals to specific
companies or individuals who have specific job openings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) "Modeling agency" means a person, firm,
association, or corporation engaged in the business of conducting an
agency, bureau, office, or other place for the purpose of procuring,
offering, promising, or attempting to provide engagements for persons
who want to procure employment as models, or giving information as to
where these engagements may be procured or provided.

(2) "Theatrical agency" means a person, firm, association, or
corporation conducting an agency, bureau, office, or other place for
the purpose of procuring, offering, promising, or attempting to provide
engagements for persons who want employment in the following
occupations: Circus, theater, motion pictures, radio, television,
studio recordings, transcriptions, opera, concert, ballet, or other
entertainments, exhibitions, or performances; or of giving information
as to where these engagements may be procured or provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If a modeling or theatrical agency charges
a fee for a service, the agency must, before the service is provided to
an applicant, provide each applicant with a written contract specifying
all fees charged to the applicant. The contract must contain the
following:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the agency;

(2) The date of the contract;

(3) The name of the applicant;

(4) The amount of the fee to be charged the applicant, the method
of computation of the fee, and the time and method of payments; and

(5) A notice in eight-point bold face type or larger directly above
the space reserved in the contract for the signature of the buyer. The
caption "NOTICE TO APPLICANT--READ BEFORE SIGNING" must precede the
body of the notice and must be in ten-point bold face type or larger.
The notice must read as follows:

"This is a contract. If you accept the services provided by this
agency, you will be liable for the payment of the fee as set out above.
Do not sign this contract before you read it or if any spaces intended
for the agreed terms are left blank. You must be given a copy of this
contract at the time you sign it."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) A contract for the sale of services from
a modeling or theatrical agency may be canceled at the option of the
purchaser if the purchaser sends notice of the cancellation by
certified mail, return receipt requested, to the modeling or theatrical
agency at the address contained in the contract and if the notice is
postmarked not later than midnight of the seventh calendar day
following the day on which the contract is signed. In addition to this
cancellation right, a purchaser who signs a contract for the sale of
services of any description from a modeling or theatrical agency
without having received the written disclosures required in subsection
(2) of this section has cancellation rights until seven calendar days
after the receipt of the written disclosures. A purchaser must request
cancellation of a contract by sending the notice of cancellation by
certified mail, return receipt requested, postmarked not later than
midnight of the seventh calendar day following the day on which the
contract is signed to the modeling or theatrical agency at the address
contained in the contract. The purchaser may use the cancellation form
prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, however, notice of
cancellation is sufficient if it indicates the intention of the
purchaser not to be bound by the contract. The purchaser's right of
cancellation of a contract for the sale may not be waived.

(2) A contract for the sale of services from a modeling or
theatrical agency must include the following statement in at least ten-point bold-face type immediately before the space for the purchaser's
signature:

"Purchaser's right to cancel: You may cancel this contract without any
cancellation fee or other penalty, or stated reason for doing so, by
sending notice of cancellation by certified mail, return receipt
requested, to . . . . . . . (insert name of agency at the address
indicated below). The notice must be postmarked by midnight of the
seventh calendar day following the day on which this contract is signed
by you. The day on which the contract was signed is not included as a
"calendar day," and if the seventh calendar day falls on a Sunday or
legal holiday, then the right to cancel this contract expires on the
day immediately following that Sunday or legal holiday.

TO CANCEL THIS CONTRACT, SEND A COPY OF THIS NOTICE OF CANCELLATION OR
OTHER WRITTEN NOTICE OF CANCELLATION TO:

. . . . . . . . . . . .. . . . . . . . . . . .

(Name of Theatrical or Modeling Agency)

. . . . . . . . . . . .. . . . . . . . . . . .

(Address of Theatrical or Modeling Agency)

(Date)

I HEREBY CANCEL THIS CONTRACT

(Date)

. . . . . . . . . . . .. . . . . . . . . . . .

(Purchaser's Signature)

. . . . . . . . . . . .. . . . . . . . . . . .

(Printed Name)

. . . . . . . . . . . .. . . . . . . . . . . .

(Purchaser's Address)"

(3) Within seven calendar days following timely receipt of notice
of cancellation from the purchaser, the modeling or theatrical agency
must provide evidence that the contract has been canceled and return
any money or other consideration paid by the purchaser. However, the
modeling or theatrical agency may retain payments made for specific
services utilized by the purchaser.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. In any action arising out of this chapter,
the prevailing party is entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees and
costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections 2 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---