BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 67.08.002 and 1999 c
282 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Amateur"
means a person who engages in athletic activities as a pastime and not as a
professional.

(2) "Boxing"
means a contest in which the contestants exchange blows with their fists, but
does not include professional wrestling.

(3) "Chiropractor"
means a person licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW as a doctor of chiropractic or
under the laws of any jurisdiction in which that person resides.

(4)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(((4))) (5)
"Director" means the director of the department of licensing or the
director's designee.

(((5))) (6)
"Event" includes, but is not limited to, a boxing, wrestling, or
martial arts contest, sparring, fisticuffs, match, show, or exhibition.

(((6))) (7)
"Event physician" means the physician licensed under RCW 67.08.100
and who is responsible for the activities described in RCW 67.08.090.

(((7))) (8)
"Face value" means the dollar value of a ticket or order, which value
must reflect the dollar amount that the customer is required to pay or, for a
complimentary ticket, would have been required to pay to purchase a ticket with
equivalent seating priority, in order to view the event.

(((8))) (9)
"Gross receipts" means the amount received from the face value of all
tickets sold and complimentary tickets redeemed.

(((9))) (10)
"Kickboxing" means a type of boxing in which blows are delivered with
the hand and any part of the leg below the hip, including the foot.

(((10))) (11)
"Martial arts" means a type of boxing including sumo, judo, karate,
kung fu, tae kwon do, pankration, muay thai, or other forms of full-contact
martial arts or self-defense conducted on a full-contact basis.

(((11))) (12)
"Physician" means a person licensed under chapter 18.57, 18.36A, or
18.71 RCW as a physician or a person holding an osteopathic or allopathic
physician license under the laws of any jurisdiction in which the person
resides.

(((12))) (13)
"Professional" means a person who has received or competed for money
or other articles of value for participating in an event.

(((13))) (14)
"Promoter" means a person, and includes any officer, director,
employee, or stockholder of a corporate promoter, who produces, arranges,
stages, holds, or gives an event in this state involving a professional boxing,
martial arts, or wrestling event, or shows or causes to be shown in this state
a closed circuit telecast of a match involving a professional participant
whether or not the telecast originates in this state.

(((14))) (15)
"Wrestling exhibition" or "wrestling show" means a form of
sports entertainment in which the participants display their skills in a
physical struggle against each other in the ring and either the outcome may be
predetermined or the participants do not necessarily strive to win, or both.

Sec. 2. RCW 67.08.090 and 1999 c
282 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each contestant for
boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts events shall be examined within twenty-four
hours before the contest by an event physician licensed by the department. The
event physician shall report in writing and over his or her signature before
the event the physical condition of each and every contestant to the inspector
present at such contest. No contestant whose physical condition is not
approved by the event physician shall be permitted to participate in any
event. Blank forms for event physicians' reports shall be provided by the
department and all questions upon such blanks shall be answered in full. The
event physician shall be paid a fee and travel expenses by the promoter.

(2) The department may
require that an event physician be present at a wrestling event. The promoter
shall pay the event physician present at a wrestling event. A boxing,
kickboxing, or martial arts event may not be held unless an event physician
licensed by the department is present throughout the event. In addition to
the event physician, a chiropractor may be included as a licensed official at a
boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts event.

(3) Any physician
licensed under RCW 67.08.100 may be selected by the department as the event
physician. The event physician present at any contest shall have authority to
stop any event when in the event physician's opinion it would be dangerous to a
contestant to continue, and in such event it shall be the event physician's
duty to stop the event.

(4) The department may
have a participant in a wrestling event examined by an event physician licensed
by the department prior to the event. A participant in a wrestling event whose
condition is not approved by the event physician shall not be permitted to
participate in the event.

(5) Each contestant for
boxing, kickboxing, martial arts, or wrestling events may be subject to a
random urinalysis or chemical test within twenty-four hours before or after a
contest. An applicant or licensee who refuses or fails to submit to the
urinalysis or chemical test is subject to disciplinary action under RCW
67.08.240. If the urinalysis or chemical test is positive for substances
prohibited by rules adopted by the director, disciplinary action shall be taken
under RCW 67.08.240.

Sec. 3. RCW 67.08.100 and 2001 c
246 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department upon
receipt of a properly completed application and payment of a nonrefundable fee,
may grant an annual license to an applicant for the following: (a) Promoter;
(b) manager; (c) boxer; (d) second; (e) wrestling participant; (f) inspector;
(g) judge; (h) timekeeper; (i) announcer; (j) event physician; (k) chiropractor;
(l) referee; (((l))) (m) matchmaker; (((m))) (n)
kickboxer; and (((n))) (o) martial arts participant.

(2) The application for
the following types of licenses shall include a physical performed by a
physician, as defined in RCW 67.08.002, which was performed by the physician
with a time period preceding the application as specified by rule: (a) Boxer; (b)
wrestling participant; (c) kickboxer; (d) martial arts participant; and (e)
referee.

(3) An applicant for
the following types of licenses for the sports of boxing, kickboxing, and
martial arts shall provide annual proof of certification as having adequate
experience, skill, and training from an organization approved by the
department, including, but not limited to, the association of boxing
commissions, the international boxing federation, the international boxing
organization, the Washington state association of professional ring officials,
the world boxing association, the world boxing council, or the world boxing
organization for boxing officials, and the united full contact federation for
kickboxing and martial arts officials: (a) Judge; (b) referee; (c) inspector;
(d) timekeeper; or (e) other officials deemed necessary by the department.

(4) Any license may be
revoked, suspended, or denied by the director for a violation of this chapter
or a rule adopted by the director.

(5) No person shall
participate or serve in any of the above capacities unless licensed as provided
in this chapter.

(6) The referees,
judges, timekeepers, event physicians, chiropractors, and inspectors for
any boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts event shall be designated by the
department from among licensed officials.

(7) The referee for any
wrestling event shall be provided by the promoter and shall be licensed as a
wrestling participant.

(8) The department
shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been
certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the
person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during
the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic
upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the department of social
and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

(9) A person may not be
issued a license if the person has an unpaid fine outstanding to the
department.

(10) A person may not
be issued a license unless they are at least eighteen years of age.

(11) This section shall
not apply to contestants or participants in events at which only amateurs are
engaged in contests and/or fraternal organizations and/or veterans'
organizations chartered by congress or the defense department or any recognized
amateur sanctioning body recognized by the department, holding and promoting
athletic events and where all funds are used primarily for the benefit of their
members. Upon request of the department, a promoter, contestant, or
participant shall provide sufficient information to reasonably determine
whether this chapter applies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003.

---
END ---