BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 67.08.160 and 1999 c
282 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

((A))
Boxing and martial arts promoters shall have an ambulance ((or
paramedical unit)) present at the event location. Wrestling promoters
shall have an ambulance or a first responder present at the event location.
First responders must be certified by the secretary of health as provided by
RCW 18.73.081.

--- END ---