BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

ARTICLE 1

DEFINITIONS; FIDUCIARY DUTIES AND POWERS; REMEDIES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. SHORT TITLE. This act may be cited as
the Washington principal and income act of 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. DEFINITIONS. In this
act:

(1) "Accounting
period" means a calendar year unless another twelve‑month period is
selected by a fiduciary. The term includes a portion of a calendar year or
other twelve‑month period that begins when an income interest begins or
ends when an income interest ends.

(2)
"Beneficiary" includes, in the case of a decedent's estate, an heir,
legatee, and devisee and, in the case of a trust, an income beneficiary and a
remainder beneficiary.

(3)
"Fiduciary" means a personal representative or a trustee. The term
includes an executor, administrator, successor personal representative, special
administrator, and a person performing substantially the same function.

(4) "Income"
means money or property that a fiduciary receives as current return from a principal
asset. The term includes a portion of receipts from a sale, exchange, or
liquidation of a principal asset, to the extent provided in Article 4 of this
act.

(5) "Income
beneficiary" means a person to whom net income of a trust is or may be
payable.

(6) "Income
interest" means the right of an income beneficiary to receive all or part
of net income, whether the terms of the trust require it to be distributed or
authorize it to be distributed in the trustee's discretion.

(7) "Mandatory
income interest" means the right of an income beneficiary to receive net
income that the terms of the trust require the fiduciary to distribute.

(8) "Net
income" means the total receipts allocated to income during an accounting
period minus the disbursements made from income during the period, plus or
minus transfers under this act to or from income during the period.

(9) "Person"
means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership,
limited liability company, association, joint venture, or government;
governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; public corporation; or
any other legal or commercial entity.

(10)
"Principal" means property held in trust for distribution to a
remainder beneficiary.

(11) "Remainder
beneficiary" means a person entitled to receive principal, including when
an income interest ends.

(12) "Terms of a
trust" means the manifestation of the intent of a settlor or decedent with
respect to the trust, expressed in a manner that admits of its proof in a
judicial proceeding. The "terms of a trust" shall include without
limitation such modifications as may be made from time to time with respect to
the trust under chapter 11.96A RCW or otherwise under Washington or applicable
federal laws.

(13)
"Trustee" includes an original, additional, or successor trustee,
whether or not appointed or confirmed by a court.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
103. FIDUCIARY DUTIES; GENERAL
PRINCIPLES. (a) In allocating receipts and disbursements to or between
principal and income, and with respect to any matter within the scope of this
act, a fiduciary:

(1) Shall administer a
trust or estate in accordance with the terms of the trust or the will, even if
there is a different provision in this act;

(2) May administer a trust
or estate by the exercise of a discretionary power of administration given to
the fiduciary by the terms of the trust or the will, even if the exercise of
the power produces a result different from a result required or permitted by
this act;

(3) Shall administer a
trust or estate in accordance with this act if the terms of the trust or the
will do not contain a different provision or do not give the fiduciary a
discretionary power of administration; and

(4) Shall add a receipt
or charge a disbursement to principal to the extent that the terms of the trust
and this act do not provide a rule for allocating the receipt or disbursement
to or between principal and income.

(b) In exercising the
power to adjust under section 104 (a) or (e) of this act or another
discretionary power of administration regarding a matter within the scope of
this act, whether granted by the terms of a trust, a will, or this act, a
fiduciary shall administer a trust or estate impartially, based on what is fair
and reasonable to all of the beneficiaries, except to the extent that the terms
of the trust or the will clearly manifest an intention that the fiduciary shall
or may favor one or more of the beneficiaries. A determination in accordance
with this act is presumed to be fair and reasonable to all of the
beneficiaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
104. FIDUCIARY'S POWER TO
ADJUST. (a) A trustee may adjust between principal and income to the extent
the trustee considers necessary if the trustee invests and manages trust assets
as a prudent investor, the terms of the trust describe the amount that may or
must be distributed to a beneficiary by referring to the trust's income, and
the trustee determines, after applying the rules in section 103(a) of this act,
that the trustee is unable to comply with section 103(b) of this act.

(b) In deciding whether
and to what extent to exercise the power conferred by subsection (a) of this
section, a trustee shall consider all factors relevant to the trust and its
beneficiaries, including the following factors to the extent they are relevant:

(1) The nature,
purpose, and expected duration of the trust;

(2) The intent of the
settlor;

(3) The identity and
circumstances of the beneficiaries;

(4) The needs for
liquidity, regularity of income, and preservation and appreciation of capital;

(5) The assets held in
the trust; the extent to which they consist of financial assets, interests in
closely held enterprises, tangible and intangible personal property, or real
property; the extent to which an asset is used by a beneficiary; and whether an
asset was purchased by the trustee or received from the settlor;

(6) The net amount
allocated to income under the other sections of this act and the increase or
decrease in the value of the principal assets, which the trustee may estimate
as to assets for which market values are not readily available;

(7) Whether and to what
extent the terms of the trust give the trustee the power to invade principal or
accumulate income or prohibit the trustee from invading principal or
accumulating income, and the extent to which the trustee has exercised a power
from time to time to invade principal or accumulate income;

(8) The actual and
anticipated effect of economic conditions on principal and income and effects
of inflation and deflation; and

(9) The anticipated tax
consequences of an adjustment.

(c) A trustee may not
make an adjustment:

(1) That diminishes the
income interest in a trust that requires all of the income to be paid at least
annually to a spouse and for which an estate tax or gift tax marital deduction
would be allowed, in whole or in part, if the trustee did not have the power to
make the adjustment;

(2) That reduces the
actuarial value of the income interest in a trust to which a person transfers
property with the intent to qualify for a gift tax exclusion;

(3) That changes the
amount payable to a beneficiary as a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the
value of the trust assets;

(4) From any amount
that is permanently set aside for charitable purposes under a will or the terms
of a trust unless both income and principal are so set aside;

(5) If possessing or
exercising the power to make an adjustment causes an individual to be treated
as the owner of all or part of the trust for income tax purposes, and the
individual would not be treated as the owner if the trustee did not possess the
power to make an adjustment;

(6) If possessing or
exercising the power to make an adjustment causes all or part of the trust
assets to be included for estate tax purposes in the estate of an individual
who has the power to remove a trustee or appoint a trustee, or both, and the
assets would not be included in the estate of the individual if the trustee did
not possess the power to make an adjustment;

(7) If the trustee is a
beneficiary of the trust; or

(8) If the trustee is
not a beneficiary, but the adjustment would benefit the trustee directly or
indirectly.

(d) If subsection
(c)(5), (6), (7), or (8) of this section applies to a trustee and there is more
than one trustee or an additional trustee who is appointed by a court order, a
binding agreement, or otherwise under chapter 11.96A RCW, a cotrustee to whom
the provision does not apply may make the adjustment unless the exercise of the
power by the remaining trustee or trustees is not permitted by the terms of the
trust.

(e) A personal
representative serving with nonintervention powers under chapter 11.68 RCW may
adjust between principal and income to the extent the personal representative
considers necessary, if the personal representative invests and manages assets
of the estate as a prudent investor and the personal representative determines,
after applying the rules of section 103(a) of this act, that the personal
representative is unable to comply with section 103(b) of this act. In
deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the power conferred by this
subsection, the personal representative shall consider all factors relevant to
the estate and its beneficiaries, including factors comparable to those a
trustee would consider under subsection (b) of this section if considering such
an adjustment. A personal representative may not make an adjustment under
circumstances comparable to those that are described in subsection (c) of this
section and that prohibit a trustee from making such an adjustment, although a
copersonal representative, or an additional personal representative who is
appointed by a court order, a binding agreement, or otherwise under chapter
11.96A RCW, to whom such limitations do not apply may make the adjustment
unless the exercise of the power by the remaining personal representative or
personal representatives is not permitted by the terms of a will.

(f) A fiduciary may
release the entire power conferred by subsection (a) of this section or may
release only the power to adjust from income to principal or the power to
adjust from principal to income if the fiduciary is uncertain about whether
possessing or exercising the power will cause a result described in subsection
(c)(1) through (6) or (8) of this section or if the fiduciary determines that
possessing or exercising the power will or may deprive the trust of a tax
benefit or impose a tax burden not described in subsection (c) of this
section. The release may be permanent or for a specified period, including a
period measured by the life of an individual.

(g) Terms of a trust
that limit the power of a fiduciary to make an adjustment between principal and
income do not affect the application of this section unless it is clear from
the terms of the trust that the terms are intended to deny the fiduciary the
power of adjustment conferred by subsection (a) of this section.

(h) Unless a
beneficiary has requested the fiduciary in writing that the fiduciary consider
an adjustment, nothing in this section imposes a duty on the fiduciary to make
an adjustment and the fiduciary is not liable for not considering whether to
make an adjustment under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
105. JUDICIAL CONTROL OF
DISCRETIONARY POWERS. (a) A court shall not change a fiduciary's decision to
exercise or not to exercise a discretionary power conferred by this act unless
it determines that the decision was an abuse of the fiduciary's discretion. A
court shall not determine that a fiduciary abused its discretion merely because
the court would have exercised the discretion in a different manner or would
not have exercised the discretion.

(b) The decisions to
which subsection (a) of this section apply include:

(1) A determination
under section 104 (a) or (e) of this act of whether and to what extent an
amount should be transferred from principal to income or from income to
principal.

(2) A determination
of: (i) The factors that are relevant to the trust or estate and its
beneficiaries; (ii) the extent to which they are relevant; and (iii) the
weight, if any, to be given to the relevant factors, in deciding whether and to
what extent to exercise the power conferred by section 104 (a) or (e) of this
act.

(3) A determination
under section 106(g) of this act.

(c) If a court
determines that a fiduciary has abused its discretion, the remedy is to restore
the income and remainder beneficiaries to the positions they would have
occupied if the fiduciary had not abused its discretion, according to the
following principles:

(1) To the extent that
the abuse of discretion has resulted in no distribution to a beneficiary or a
distribution that is too small, the court may require the fiduciary to
distribute from the trust to the beneficiary an amount that the court
determines will restore the beneficiary, in whole or in part, to his or her
appropriate position.

(2) To the extent that
the abuse of discretion has resulted in a distribution to a beneficiary that is
too large, the court may restore the beneficiaries, the trust, or both, in
whole or in part, to their appropriate positions by requiring the fiduciary to
withhold an amount from one or more future distributions to the beneficiary who
received the distribution that was too large or requiring that beneficiary to
return some or all of the distribution to the trust.

(3) To the extent that
the court does not restore under (1) and (2) of this subsection the
beneficiaries, the trust, or both, to the positions they would have occupied if
the fiduciary had not abused its discretion, the court may require the
fiduciary to pay an appropriate amount from its own funds to one or more of the
beneficiaries or the trust, or both. The fiduciary has no liability under this
section unless the beneficiary alleging the abuse of discretion establishes
that the fiduciary did not exercise its discretion in good faith and with
honest judgment.

(d) Upon a petition by
the fiduciary, the court having jurisdiction over the trust or estate shall
determine whether a proposed exercise or nonexercise by the fiduciary of a
discretionary power conferred by the act will result in an abuse of the
fiduciary's discretion. If the petition describes the proposed exercise or
nonexercise of the power and contains sufficient information to inform the
beneficiaries of the reasons for the proposal, the facts upon which the
fiduciary relies, and an explanation of how the income and remainder
beneficiaries will be affected by the proposed exercise or nonexercise of the
power, a beneficiary who challenges the proposed exercise or nonexercise has
the burden of establishing that it will result in an abuse of discretion.

(e) The fiduciary shall
be reimbursed for any and all costs, including without limitation all
attorneys' fees and costs of defense, and all liabilities that the fiduciary
may incur in connection with any claim or action relating in any way to the
fiduciary's exercise of its discretion under this act, except to the extent
that the beneficiary establishes that the fiduciary did not exercise its
discretion in good faith and with honest judgment. All attorneys' fees and
costs shall be advanced to the fiduciary as incurred and shall only be
collected from the fiduciary after it has been determined that the fiduciary
did not exercise its discretion in good faith and with honest judgment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
106. POWER TO CONVERT TO
UNITRUST. (a) In this section, "beneficiary" means a person who has
an interest in the trust to be converted and who has the legal capacity to act
in his, her, or its own right with respect to all actions that such person may
take under this section.

(b) Unless expressly
prohibited by the terms of the trust, a trustee may release the power to make
adjustments under section 104 of this act and convert a trust into a unitrust
as described in this section if all of the following apply:

(1) The trustee
determines that the conversion will enable the trustee better to carry out the
intent of the settlor or testator and the purposes of the trust.

(2) The trustee gives
written notice of the trustee's intention to release the power to adjust and to
convert the trust into a unitrust and of how the unitrust will operate,
including what initial decisions the trustee will make under this section, to
all beneficiaries:

(i) Who are currently
eligible to receive income from the trust; or

(ii) Who would receive,
if no powers of appointment were exercised, a distribution of principal if the
trust were to terminate immediately before the notice is given.

(3) There is at least
one beneficiary under (2)(i) of this subsection and at least one other person
who is a beneficiary under (2)(ii) of this subsection.

(4) No beneficiary
objects to the conversion to a unitrust in a writing delivered to the trustee
within sixty days after the notice is given under (2) of this subsection.

(c) The parties, as
defined by RCW 11.96A.030(4), may agree to convert a trust to or from a
unitrust by means of a binding agreement under chapter 11.96A RCW.

(d)(1) The trustee may
petition the court under chapter 11.96A RCW to order a conversion to a unitrust
if either of the following apply:

(i) A party, as defined
by RCW 11.96A.030(4), timely objects to the conversion to a unitrust; or

(ii) There are no
beneficiaries under (2)(i) and (ii) of this subsection.

(2) A party, as defined
by RCW 11.96A.030(4), may request a trustee to convert to a unitrust. If the
trustee does not convert, the party, as defined by RCW 11.96A.030(4), may
petition the court to order the conversion.

(3) The court shall
approve the conversion or direct the requested conversion if the court
concludes that the conversion will enable the trustee to better carry out the
intent of the settlor or testator and the purposes of the trust.

(e) In deciding whether
to exercise a power to convert to a unitrust under this section, a trustee may
consider, among other things, the factors set forth in section 104(b) of this
act.

(f) After a trust is
converted to a unitrust, all of the following apply:

(1) The trustee shall
follow an investment policy seeking a total return for the investments held by
the trust, whether the return is to be derived:

(i) From appreciation
of principal;

(ii) From earnings and
distributions from principal; or

(iii) From both.

(2) The trustee shall
make regular distributions in accordance with the terms of the trust, or the
terms of the will, as the case may be, construed in accordance with the
provisions of this section.

(3) The term
"income" in the terms of a trust or a will means an annual
distribution, the "unitrust distribution", equal to four percent, the
"payout percentage", of the net fair market value of the trust's
assets, whether such assets would be considered income or principal under other
provisions of this act, averaged over the lesser of:

(i) The three preceding
years; or

(ii) The period during
which the trust has been in existence.

(g) The trustee may in
the trustee's discretion from time to time determine all of the following:

(l) The effective date
of a conversion to a unitrust.

(2) The provisions for
prorating a unitrust distribution for a short year in which a beneficiary's
right to payments commences or ceases.

(3) The frequency of
unitrust distributions during the year.

(4) The effect of other
payments from or contributions to the trust on the trust's valuation.

(5) Whether to value
the trust's assets annually or more frequently.

(6) What valuation
dates to use.

(7) How frequently to
value nonliquid assets and whether to estimate their value.

(8) Whether to omit
from the calculations trust property occupied or possessed by a beneficiary.

(9) Any other matters
necessary for the proper functioning of the unitrust.

(h)(1) Expenses which
would be deducted from income if the trust were not a unitrust may not be
deducted from the unitrust distribution.

(2) Unless otherwise
provided by the terms of the trust, the unitrust distribution shall be paid
from net income, as such term would be determined if the trust were not a
unitrust. To the extent net income is insufficient, the unitrust distribution
shall be paid from net realized short-term capital gains. To the extent net
income and net realized short-term capital gains are insufficient, the unitrust
distribution shall be paid from net realized long-term capital gains. To the
extent net income and net realized short-term and long-term capital gains are
insufficient, the unitrust distribution shall be paid from the principal of the
trust.

(i) The trustee or, if
the trustee declines to do so, a beneficiary may petition the court:

(1) To select a payout
percentage different than four percent.

(2) To provide for a
distribution of net income, as would be determined if the trust were not a
unitrust, in excess of the unitrust distribution if such distribution is
necessary to preserve a tax benefit.

(3) To average the
valuation of the trust's net assets over a period other than three years.

(4) To reconvert from a
unitrust.

(j) Upon a
reconversion, the power to adjust under section 104 of this act is revived.

(k) A conversion to a
unitrust does not affect a provision in the terms of a trust directing or
authorizing the trustee to distribute principal or authorizing a beneficiary to
withdraw a portion or all of the principal.

(l) A trustee may not
possess or exercise any power under this section in any of the following
circumstances:

(1) The unitrust
distribution would be made from any amount that is permanently set aside for
charitable purposes under the terms of a trust and for which a charitable
deduction from a federal gift or estate tax has been taken.

(2) The possession or
exercise of the power would cause an individual to be treated as the owner of
all or part of the trust for federal income tax purposes and the individual
would not be treated as the owner if the trustee did not possess or exercise
the power.

(3) The possession or
exercise of the power would cause all or any part of the trust estate to be
subject to any federal gift or estate tax with respect to the individual and
the trust estate would not be subject to such taxation if the trustee did not
possess or exercise the power.

(4) The possession or
exercise of the power would result in the disallowance of a federal gift or
estate tax marital deduction which would be allowed if the trustee did not have
the power.

(5) The trustee is a
beneficiary of the trust.

(m) If subsection
(l)(2), (3), or (5) of this section applies to a trustee and there is more than
one trustee or an additional trustee who is appointed by a court order, a
binding agreement, or otherwise under chapter 11.96A RCW, a cotrustee to whom
subsection (l)(2), (3), or (5) of this section does not apply may possess and
exercise the power unless the possession or exercise of the power by the remaining
trustee or trustees is not permitted by the terms of the trust. If subsection
(l)(2), (3), or (5) of this section restricts all trustees from possessing or
exercising a power under this section, the trustee may petition a court under
chapter 11.96A RCW for the court to effect the intended conversion or action.

(n) A trustee may
release any power conferred by this section if any of the following applies:

(1) The trustee is
uncertain about whether possessing or exercising the power will cause a result
described in subsection (l)(2), (3), or (4) of this section.

(2) The trustee
determines that possessing or exercising the power will or may deprive the
trust of a tax benefit or impose a tax burden not described in subsection (l)
of this section.

The release may be
permanent or for a specified period, including a period measured by the life of
an individual.

ARTICLE
2

DECEDENT'S ESTATE OR TERMINATING INCOME
INTEREST

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. DETERMINATION AND
DISTRIBUTION OF NET INCOME. After a decedent dies, in the case of an estate,
or after an income interest in a trust ends, the following rules apply:

(1) A fiduciary of an
estate or of a terminating income interest shall determine the amount of net
income and net principal receipts received from property specifically given to
a beneficiary under the rules in Articles 3 through 5 of this act which apply
to trustees and the rules in subsection (5) of this section. The fiduciary
shall distribute the net income and net principal receipts to the beneficiary
who is to receive the specific property.

(2) A fiduciary shall
determine the remaining net income of a decedent's estate or a terminating
income interest under the rules in Articles 3 through 5 of this act which apply
to trustees, except to the extent that the following apply:

(i) The fiduciary shall
include in net income all income from property used to discharge liabilities;

(ii) The fiduciary
shall pay from income or principal, in the fiduciary's discretion, family
allowances; fees of attorneys, accountants, and fiduciaries; court costs and
other expenses of administration; and interest on death taxes, but the
fiduciary may pay those expenses from income of property passing to a trust for
which the fiduciary claims an estate tax marital or charitable deduction only
to the extent that the payment of those expenses from income will not cause the
reduction or loss of the deduction; and

(iii) The fiduciary
shall pay from principal all other disbursements made or incurred in connection
with the settlement of a decedent's estate or the winding up of a terminating
income interest, including debts, funeral expenses, disposition of remains, and
death taxes and related penalties that are apportioned to the estate or
terminating income interest by the will, the terms of the trust, or applicable
law.

(3) A fiduciary shall
distribute to a beneficiary who receives a pecuniary amount outright the
interest or any other amount provided by the will, the terms of a trust, or
applicable law from net income determined under subsection (2) of this section
or from principal to the extent that net income is insufficient. Otherwise, no
outright gift of a pecuniary amount whether under a will, or under a trust
after an income interest ends shall receive interest or any other income.

(4) A fiduciary shall
distribute the net income remaining after distributions required by subsection (3)
of this section in the manner described in section 202 of this act to all other
beneficiaries, including a beneficiary who receives a pecuniary amount in
trust, even if the beneficiary holds an unqualified power to withdraw assets
from the trust or other presently exercisable general power of appointment over
the trust.

(5) A fiduciary may not
reduce principal or income receipts from property described in subsection (1)
of this section because of a payment described in section 501 or 502 of this
act to the extent that the will, the terms of the trust, or applicable law
requires the fiduciary to make the payment from assets other than the property
or to the extent that the fiduciary recovers or expects to recover the payment
from a third party. The net income and principal receipts from the property
are determined by including all of the amounts the fiduciary receives or pays
with respect to the property, whether those amounts accrued or became due
before, on, or after the date of a decedent's death or an income interest's
terminating event, and by making a reasonable provision for amounts that the
fiduciary believes the estate or terminating income interest may become
obligated to pay after the property is distributed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. DISTRIBUTION TO RESIDUARY
AND REMAINDER BENEFICIARIES. (a) Each beneficiary described in section 201(4)
of this act is entitled to receive a portion of the net income equal to the
beneficiary's fractional interest in undistributed principal assets, using
values as of the distribution date. If a fiduciary makes more than one
distribution of assets to beneficiaries to whom this section applies, each
beneficiary, including one who does not receive part of the distribution, is
entitled, as of each distribution date, to the net income the fiduciary has
received after the date of death or terminating event or earlier distribution
date but has not distributed as of the current distribution date.

(b) In determining a
beneficiary's share of net income, the following rules apply:

(1) The beneficiary is
entitled to receive a portion of the net income equal to the beneficiary's
fractional interest in the undistributed principal assets immediately before
the distribution date, including assets that later may be sold to meet
principal obligations.

(2) The beneficiary's
fractional interest in the undistributed principal assets must be calculated
without regard to property specifically given to a beneficiary and property
required to pay pecuniary amounts not in trust.

(3) The beneficiary's
fractional interest in the undistributed principal assets must be calculated on
the basis of the aggregate value of those assets as of the distribution date
without reducing the value by any unpaid principal obligation.

(4) The distribution
date for purposes of this section may be the date as of which the fiduciary
calculates the value of the assets if that date is reasonably near the date on
which assets are actually distributed.

(c) If a fiduciary does
not distribute all of the collected but undistributed net income to each person
as of a distribution date, the fiduciary shall maintain appropriate records
showing the interest of each beneficiary in that net income.

(d) A fiduciary may
apply the rules in this section, to the extent that the fiduciary considers it
appropriate, to net gain or loss realized after the date of death or
terminating event or earlier distribution date from the disposition of a
principal asset if this section applies to the income from the asset.

ARTICLE
3

APPORTIONMENT AT BEGINNING AND END OF
INCOME INTEREST

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. WHEN RIGHT TO INCOME BEGINS
AND ENDS. (a) An income beneficiary is entitled to net income from the date on
which the income interest begins. An income interest begins on the date
specified in the terms of the trust or, if no date is specified, on the date an
asset becomes subject to a trust or successive income interest.

(b) An asset becomes
subject to a trust:

(1) On the date it is
transferred to the trust in the case of an asset that is transferred to a trust
during the transferor's life;

(2) On the date of a
testator's death in the case of an asset that becomes subject to a trust by
reason of a will, even if there is an intervening period of administration of
the testator's estate; or

(3) On the date of an
individual's death in the case of an asset that is transferred to a fiduciary
by a third party because of the individual's death.

(c) An asset becomes
subject to a successive income interest on the day after the preceding income
interest ends, as determined under subsection (d) of this section, even if
there is an intervening period of administration to wind up the preceding
income interest.

(d) An income interest
ends on the day before an income beneficiary dies or another terminating event
occurs, or on the last day of a period during which there is no beneficiary to
whom a trustee may distribute income.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. APPORTIONMENT OF RECEIPTS
AND DISBURSEMENTS WHEN DECEDENT DIES OR INCOME INTEREST BEGINS. (a) A trustee
shall allocate an income receipt or disbursement other than one to which
section 201(1) of this act applies to principal if its due date occurs before a
decedent dies in the case of an estate or before an income interest begins in
the case of a trust or successive income interest.

(b) A trustee shall
allocate an income receipt or disbursement to income if its due date occurs on
or after the date on which a decedent dies or an income interest begins and it
is a periodic due date. An income receipt or disbursement must be treated as
accruing from day to day if its due date is not periodic or it has no due
date. The portion of the receipt or disbursement accruing before the date on
which a decedent dies or an income interest begins must be allocated to
principal and the balance must be allocated to income.

(c) An item of income
or an obligation is due on the date the payer is required to make a payment.
If a payment date is not stated, there is no due date for the purposes of this
act. Distributions to shareholders or other owners from an entity to which
section 401 of this act applies are deemed to be due on the date fixed by the
entity for determining who is entitled to receive the distribution or, if no
date is fixed, on the declaration date for the distribution. A due date is
periodic for receipts or disbursements that must be paid at regular intervals
under a lease or an obligation to pay interest or if an entity customarily
makes distributions at regular intervals.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
303. APPORTIONMENT WHEN INCOME
INTEREST ENDS. (a) In this section, "undistributed income" means net
income received before the date on which an income interest ends. The term
does not include an item of income or expense that is due or accrued or net
income that has been added or is required to be added to principal under the
terms of the trust.

(b) When a mandatory
income interest ends, the trustee shall pay to a mandatory income beneficiary
who survives that date, or the estate of a deceased mandatory income
beneficiary whose death causes the interest to end, the beneficiary's share of
the undistributed income that is not disposed of under the terms of the trust
unless the beneficiary has an unqualified power to revoke more than five
percent of the trust principal immediately before the income interest ends. In
the latter case, the undistributed income from the portion of the trust that
may be revoked must be added to principal.

(c) When a trustee's
obligation to pay a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the value of the
trust's assets ends, the trustee shall prorate the final payment if and to the
extent required by applicable law to accomplish a purpose of the trust or its
settlor relating to income, gift, estate, or other tax requirements.

ARTICLE
4

ALLOCATION OF RECEIPTS DURING
ADMINISTRATION OF TRUST

PART 1: RECEIPTS FROM ENTITIES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. CHARACTER OF RECEIPTS.
(a) In this section, "entity" means a corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, regulated investment company, real estate investment
trust, common trust fund, or any other organization in which a trustee has an
interest. "Entity" does not mean a trust or estate to which section
402 of this act applies, a business or activity to which section 403 of this
act applies, or an asset-backed security to which section 415 of this act
applies.

(b) Except as otherwise
provided in this section, a trustee shall allocate to income money received
from an entity.

(c) A trustee shall
allocate the following receipts from an entity to principal:

(1) Property other than
money;

(2) Money received in
one distribution or a series of related distributions in exchange for part or
all of a trust's interest in the entity;

(3) Money received in
total or partial liquidation of the entity; and

(4) Money received from
an entity that is a regulated investment company or a real estate investment
trust if the money distributed is a capital gain dividend for federal income
tax purposes.

(d) Money is received
in partial liquidation:

(1) To the extent that
the entity, at or near the time of a distribution, indicates that it is a
distribution in partial liquidation; or

(2) If the total amount
of money and property distributed in a distribution or series of related
distributions is greater than twenty percent of the entity's gross assets, as
shown by the entity's year-end financial statements immediately preceding the
initial distribution.

(e) Money is not
received in partial liquidation, nor may it be taken into account under
subsection (d)(2) of this section, to the extent that it does not exceed the
amount of income tax that a trustee or beneficiary must pay on taxable income
of the entity that distributes the money.

(f) A trustee may rely
upon a statement made by an entity about the source or character of a
distribution if the statement is made at or near the time of distribution by
the entity's board of directors or other person or group of persons authorized
to exercise powers to pay money or transfer property comparable to those of a
corporation's board of directors.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. DISTRIBUTION FROM TRUST
OR ESTATE. A trustee shall allocate to income an amount received as a
distribution of income from a trust or an estate in which the trust has an
interest other than a purchased interest in a trust that is an investment
entity, and shall allocate to principal an amount received as a distribution of
principal from such a trust or estate. If a trustee purchases an interest in a
trust that is an investment entity, or a decedent or donor transfers an
interest in such a trust to a trustee, section 401 or 415 of this act applies
to a receipt from the trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
403. BUSINESS AND OTHER
ACTIVITIES CONDUCTED BY TRUSTEE. (a) If a trustee who conducts a business or
other activity determines that it is in the best interest of all the
beneficiaries to account separately for the business or activity instead of
accounting for it as part of the trust's general accounting records, the
trustee may maintain separate accounting records for its transactions, whether
or not its assets are segregated from other trust assets. The trustee shall
maintain such records in accordance with principles of accounting that are
generally accepted.

(b) A trustee who
accounts separately for a business or other activity may determine the extent
to which its net cash receipts must be retained for working capital, the
acquisition or replacement of fixed assets, and other reasonably foreseeable
needs of the business or activity, and the extent to which the remaining net
cash receipts are accounted for as principal or income in the trust's general
accounting records. If a trustee sells assets of the business or other
activity, other than in the ordinary course of the business or activity, the
trustee shall account for the net amount received as principal in the trust's
general accounting records to the extent the trustee determines that the amount
received is no longer required in the conduct of the business.

(c) Activities for
which a trustee may maintain separate accounting records include:

(1) Retail,
manufacturing, service, and other traditional business activities;

(2) Farming;

(3) Raising and selling
livestock and other animals;

(4) Management of
rental properties;

(5) Extraction of
minerals and other natural resources;

(6) Timber operations;
and

(7) Activities to which
section 414 of this act applies.

PART 2: RECEIPTS NOT NORMALLY APPORTIONED

NEW SECTION. Sec.
404. PRINCIPAL RECEIPTS. A
trustee shall allocate to principal:

(1) To the extent not
allocated to income under this act, assets received from a transferor during
the transferor's lifetime, a decedent's estate, a trust with a terminating
income interest, or a payer under a contract naming the trust or its trustee as
beneficiary;

(2) Money or other
property received from the sale, exchange, liquidation, or change in form of a
principal asset, including realized profit, subject to this Article;

(3) Amounts recovered
from third parties to reimburse the trust because of disbursements described in
section 502(a)(7) of this act or for other reasons to the extent not based on
the loss of income;

(4) Proceeds of
property taken by eminent domain, but a separate award made for the loss of
income with respect to an accounting period during which a current income
beneficiary had a mandatory income interest is income;

(5) Net income received
in an accounting period during which there is no beneficiary to whom a trustee
may or must distribute income; and

(6) Other receipts as
provided in Part 3 of this Article.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
405. RENTAL PROPERTY. To the
extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from rental property pursuant to
this section, the trustee shall allocate to income an amount received as rent
of real or personal property, including an amount received for cancellation or
renewal of a lease. An amount received as a refundable deposit, including a
security deposit or a deposit that is to be applied as rent for future periods,
must be added to principal and held subject to the terms of the lease and is
not available for distribution to a beneficiary until the trustee's contractual
obligations have been satisfied with respect to that amount.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
406. OBLIGATION TO PAY MONEY.
(a) An amount received as interest, whether determined at a fixed, variable, or
floating rate, on an obligation to pay money to the trustee, including an
amount received as consideration for prepaying principal, must be allocated to
income without any provision for amortization of premium.

(b) A trustee shall
allocate to principal an amount received from the sale, redemption, or other
disposition of an obligation to pay money to the trustee more than one year
after it is purchased or acquired by the trustee, including an obligation whose
purchase price or value when it is acquired is less than its value at
maturity. If the obligation matures within one year after it is purchased or
acquired by the trustee, an amount received in excess of its purchase price or
its value when acquired by the trust must be allocated to income.

(c) This section does
not apply to an obligation to which section 409, 410, 411, 412, 414, or 415 of
this act applies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
407. INSURANCE POLICIES AND
SIMILAR CONTRACTS. (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this
section, a trustee shall allocate to principal the proceeds of a life insurance
policy or other contract in which the trust or its trustee is named as
beneficiary, including a contract that insures the trust or its trustee against
loss for damage to, destruction of, or loss of title to a trust asset. The
trustee shall allocate dividends on an insurance policy to income if the
premiums on the policy are paid from income, and to principal if the premiums
are paid from principal.

(b) A trustee shall
allocate to income proceeds of a contract that insures the trustee against loss
of occupancy or other use by an income beneficiary, loss of income, or, subject
to section 403 of this act, loss of profits from a business.

(c) This section does
not apply to a contract to which section 409 of this act applies.

PART 3: RECEIPTS NORMALLY
APPORTIONED

NEW SECTION. Sec.
408. INSUBSTANTIAL ALLOCATIONS
NOT REQUIRED. If a trustee determines that an allocation between principal and
income required by section 409, 410, 411, 412, or 415 of this act is
insubstantial, the trustee may allocate the entire amount to principal unless
one of the circumstances described in section 104(c) of this act applies to the
allocation. This power may be exercised by a cotrustee in the circumstances
described in section 104(d) of this act and may be released for the reasons and
in the manner described in section 104(f) of this act. An allocation is
presumed to be insubstantial if:

(1) The amount of the
allocation would increase or decrease net income in an accounting period, as
determined before the allocation, by less than ten percent; or

(2) The value of the
asset producing the receipt for which the allocation would be made is less than
ten percent of the total value of the trust's assets at the beginning of the
accounting period.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
409. DEFERRED COMPENSATION,
ANNUITIES, AND SIMILAR PAYMENTS. (a) In this section, "payment" means
a payment that a trustee may receive over a fixed number of years or during the
life of one or more individuals because of services rendered or property
transferred to the payer in exchange for future payments. The term includes a
payment made in money or property from the payer's general assets or from a
separate fund created by the payer, including a private or commercial annuity,
an individual retirement account, and a pension, profit-sharing, stock-bonus,
or stock-ownership plan.

(b) To the extent that
a payment is characterized as interest or a dividend or a payment made in lieu
of interest or a dividend, a trustee shall allocate it to income. The trustee
shall allocate to principal the balance of the payment and any other payment
received in the same accounting period that is not characterized as interest, a
dividend, or an equivalent payment.

(c) If no part of a
payment is characterized as interest, a dividend, or an equivalent payment, a
trustee shall allocate to income four percent of the total value of the
interests of the trustee in the plan, annuity, or similar payment as of the
first business day of the accounting period and the balance to principal.

(d) If, to obtain an
estate tax marital deduction for a trust, a trustee must allocate more of a
payment to income than provided for by this section, the trustee shall allocate
to income the additional amount necessary to obtain the marital deduction.

(e) This section does
not apply to payments to which section 410 of this act applies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
410. LIQUIDATING ASSET. (a)
In this section, "liquidating asset" means an asset whose value will
diminish or terminate because the asset is expected to produce receipts for a
period of limited duration. The term includes a leasehold, patent, copyright,
royalty right, and right to receive payments during a period of more than one
year under an arrangement that does not provide for the payment of interest on
the unpaid balance. The term does not include a payment subject to section 409
of this act, resources subject to section 411 of this act, timber subject to
section 412 of this act, an activity subject to section 414 of this act, an
asset subject to section 415 of this act, or any asset for which the trustee
establishes a reserve for depreciation under section 503 of this act.

(b) A trustee shall
allocate to income ten percent of the receipts from a liquidating asset and the
balance to principal.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
411. MINERALS, WATER, AND
OTHER NATURAL RESOURCES. (a) To the extent that a trustee accounts for
receipts from an interest in minerals or other natural resources pursuant to
this section, the trustee shall allocate them as follows:

(1) If received as
nominal delay rental or nominal annual rent on a lease, a receipt must be
allocated to income;

(2) If received from a
production payment, a receipt must be allocated to income if and to the extent
that the agreement creating the production payment provides a factor for
interest or its equivalent. The balance must be allocated to principal;

(3) If an amount
received as a royalty, shut-in-well payment, take-or-pay payment, bonus, or
delay rental is more than nominal, ninety percent must be allocated to
principal and the balance to income; or

(4) If an amount is
received from a working interest or any other interest not provided for in
subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section, ninety percent of the net amount
received must be allocated to principal and the balance to income.

(b) An amount received
on account of an interest in water that is renewable must be allocated to
income. If the water is not renewable, ninety percent of the amount must be
allocated to principal and the balance to income.

(c) This act applies
whether or not a decedent or donor was extracting minerals, water, or other
natural resources before the interest became subject to the trust.

(d) If a trust owns an
interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources on January 1, 2003, the
trustee may allocate receipts from the interest as provided in this act or in
the manner used by the trustee before January 1, 2003. If the trust acquires
an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources after January 1,
2003, the trustee shall allocate receipts from the interest as provided in this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
412. TIMBER. (a) To the
extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from the sale of timber and related
products pursuant to this section, the trustee shall allocate the net receipts:

(1) To income to the
extent that the amount of timber removed from the land does not exceed the rate
of growth of the timber during the accounting periods in which a beneficiary
has a mandatory income interest;

(2) To principal to the
extent that the amount of timber removed from the land exceeds the rate of
growth of the timber or the net receipts are from the sale of standing timber;

(3) To or between
income and principal if the net receipts are from the lease of timberland or
from a contract to cut timber from land owned by a trust, by determining the
amount of timber removed from the land under the lease or contract and applying
the rules in (1) and (2) of this subsection; or

(4) To principal to the
extent that advance payments, bonuses, and other payments are not allocated
pursuant to (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection.

(b) In determining net
receipts to be allocated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, a trustee
shall deduct and transfer to principal a reasonable amount for depletion.

(c) This act applies
whether or not a decedent or transferor was harvesting timber from the property
before it became subject to the trust.

(d) If a trust owns an
interest in timberland on January 1, 2003, the trustee may allocate net
receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided in this act
or in the manner used by the trustee before January 1, 2003. If the trust
acquires an interest in timberland after January 1, 2003, the trustee shall
allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided
in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
413. PROPERTY NOT PRODUCTIVE
OF INCOME. (a) If a marital deduction is allowed for all or part of a trust
whose assets consist substantially of property that does not provide the spouse
with sufficient income from or use of the trust assets, and if the amounts that
the trustee transfers from principal to income under section 104 of this act
and distributes to the spouse from principal pursuant to the terms of the trust
are insufficient to provide the spouse with the beneficial enjoyment required
to obtain the marital deduction, the spouse may require the trustee to make
property productive of income, convert property within a reasonable time, or
exercise the power conferred by section 104(a) of this act. The trustee may
decide which action or combination of actions to take.

(b) In cases not
governed by subsection (a) of this section, proceeds from the sale or other
disposition of an asset are principal without regard to the amount of income
the asset produces during any accounting period.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
414. DERIVATIVES AND OPTIONS.
(a) In this section, "derivative" means a contract or financial
instrument or a combination of contracts and financial instruments which gives
a trust the right or obligation to participate in some or all changes in the
price of a tangible or intangible asset or group of assets, or changes in a
rate, an index of prices or rates, or other market indicator for an asset or a
group of assets.

(b) To the extent that
a trustee does not account under section 403 of this act for transactions in
derivatives, the trustee shall allocate to principal receipts from and
disbursements made in connection with those transactions.

(c) If a trustee grants
an option to buy property from the trust, whether or not the trust owns the
property when the option is granted, grants an option that permits another
person to sell property to the trust, or acquires an option to buy property for
the trust or an option to sell an asset owned by the trust, and the trustee or
other owner of the asset is required to deliver the asset if the option is
exercised, an amount received for granting the option must be allocated to
principal. An amount paid to acquire the option must be paid from principal.
A gain or loss realized upon the exercise of an option, including an option
granted to a settlor of the trust for services rendered, must be allocated to
principal.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
415. ASSET-BACKED SECURITIES.
(a) In this section, "asset-backed security" means an asset whose
value is based upon the right it gives the owner to receive distributions from
the proceeds of financial assets that provide collateral for the security. The
term includes an asset that gives the owner the right to receive from the
collateral financial assets only the interest or other current return or only
the proceeds other than interest or current return. The term does not include
an asset to which section 401 or 409 of this act applies.

(b) If a trust receives
a payment from interest or other current return and from other proceeds of the
collateral financial assets, the trustee shall allocate to income the portion
of the payment which the payer identifies as being from interest or other
current return and shall allocate the balance of the payment to principal.

(c) If a trust receives
one or more payments in exchange for the trust's entire interest in an
asset-backed security in one accounting period, the trustee shall allocate the
payments to principal. If a payment is one of a series of payments that will
result in the liquidation of the trust's interest in the security over more
than one accounting period, the trustee shall allocate ten percent of the
payment to income and the balance to principal.

ARTICLE
5

ALLOCATION OF DISBURSEMENTS DURING
ADMINISTRATION OF TRUST

NEW SECTION. Sec.
501. DISBURSEMENTS FROM
INCOME. A trustee shall make the following disbursements from income to the
extent that they are not disbursements to which section 201(2) (ii) or (iii) of
this act applies:

(1) One-half of the regular
compensation of the trustee and of any person providing investment advisory or
custodial services to the trustee;

(2) One‑half of
all expenses for accountings, judicial proceedings, or other matters that
involve both the income and remainder interests;

(3) All of the other
ordinary expenses incurred in connection with the administration, management,
or preservation of trust property and the distribution of income, including
interest, ordinary repairs, regularly recurring taxes assessed against principal,
and expenses of a proceeding or other matter that concerns primarily the income
interest; and

(4) Recurring premiums
on insurance covering the loss of a principal asset or the loss of income from
or use of the asset.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
502. DISBURSEMENTS FROM
PRINCIPAL. (a) A trustee shall make the following disbursements from
principal:

(1) The remaining
one-half of the disbursements described in section 501 (1) and (2) of this act;

(2) All of the trustee's
compensation calculated on principal as a fee for acceptance, distribution, or
termination, and disbursements made to prepare property for sale;

(3) Payments on the
principal of a trust debt;

(4) Expenses of a
proceeding that concerns primarily principal, including a proceeding to
construe the trust or to protect the trust or its property;

(5) Premiums paid on a
policy of insurance not described in section 501(4) of this act of which the
trust is the owner and beneficiary;

(6) Estate,
inheritance, and other transfer taxes, including penalties, apportioned to the
trust; and

(7) Disbursements
related to environmental matters, including reclamation, assessing
environmental conditions, remedying and removing environmental contamination,
monitoring remedial activities and the release of substances, preventing future
releases of substances, collecting amounts from persons liable or potentially
liable for the costs of those activities, penalties imposed under environmental
laws or regulations and other payments made to comply with those laws or
regulations, statutory or common law claims by third parties, and defending
claims based on environmental matters.

(b) If a principal
asset is encumbered with an obligation that requires income from that asset to
be paid directly to the creditor, the trustee shall transfer from principal to
income an amount equal to the income paid to the creditor in reduction of the
principal balance of the obligation.

(c) For disbursements
not covered in this section or section 501 of this act, see section 103(a)(4)
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
503. TRANSFERS FROM INCOME TO
PRINCIPAL FOR DEPRECIATION. (a) In this section, "depreciation"
means a reduction in value due to wear, tear, decay, corrosion, or gradual
obsolescence of a fixed asset having a useful life of more than one year.

(b) A trustee may
transfer to principal a reasonable amount of the net cash receipts from a
principal asset that is subject to depreciation, but may not transfer any amount
for depreciation:

(1) Of that portion of
real property used or available for use by a beneficiary as a residence or of
tangible personal property held or made available for the personal use or
enjoyment of a beneficiary; or

(2) Under this section
if the trustee is accounting under section 403 of this act for the business or
activity in which the asset is used.

(c) An amount
transferred to principal need not be held as a separate fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
504. TRANSFERS FROM INCOME TO
REIMBURSE PRINCIPAL. (a) If a trustee makes or expects to make a principal
disbursement described in this section, the trustee may transfer an appropriate
amount from income to principal in one or more accounting periods to reimburse
principal or to provide a reserve for future principal disbursements.

(b) Principal
disbursements to which subsection (a) of this section applies include the
following, but only to the extent that the trustee has not been and does not
expect to be reimbursed by a third party:

(1) An amount
chargeable to income but paid from principal because it is unusually large,
including extraordinary repairs;

(2) A capital
improvement to a principal asset, whether in the form of changes to an existing
asset or the construction of a new asset, including special assessments;

(3) Disbursements made
to prepare property for rental, including tenant allowances, leasehold
improvements, and broker's commissions;

(4) Periodic payments
on an obligation secured by a principal asset to the extent that the amount
transferred from income to principal for depreciation is less than the periodic
payments; and

(5) Disbursements
described in section 502(a)(7) of this act.

(c) If the asset whose
ownership gives rise to the disbursements becomes subject to a successive
income interest after an income interest ends, a trustee may continue to
transfer amounts from income to principal as provided in subsection (a) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
505. INCOME TAXES. (a) A tax
required to be paid by a trustee based on receipts allocated to income must be
paid from income.

(b) A tax required to
be paid by a trustee based on receipts allocated to principal must be paid from
principal, even if the tax is called an income tax by the taxing authority.

(c) A tax required to
be paid by a trustee on the trust's share of an entity's taxable income must be
paid proportionately:

(1) From income to the
extent that receipts from the entity are allocated to income; and

(2) From principal to
the extent that:

(i) Receipts from the
entity are allocated to principal; and

(ii) The trust's share
of the entity's taxable income exceeds the total receipts described in (1) and
(2)(i) of this subsection.

(d) For purposes of
this section, receipts allocated to principal or income must be reduced by the
amount distributed to a beneficiary from principal or income for which the
trust receives a deduction in calculating the tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
506. ADJUSTMENTS BETWEEN
PRINCIPAL AND INCOME BECAUSE OF TAXES. (a) A fiduciary may make adjustments
between principal and income to offset the shifting of economic interests or
tax benefits between income beneficiaries and remainder beneficiaries which
arise from:

(1) Elections and
decisions, other than those described in subsection (b) of this section, that
the fiduciary makes from time to time regarding tax matters;

(2) An income tax or
any other tax that is imposed upon the fiduciary or a beneficiary as a result
of a transaction involving or a distribution from the estate or trust; or

(3) The ownership by an
estate or trust of an interest in an entity whose taxable income, whether or
not distributed, is includable in the taxable income of the estate, trust, or a
beneficiary.

(b) If the amount of an
estate tax marital deduction or charitable contribution deduction is reduced
because a fiduciary deducts an amount paid from principal for income tax
purposes instead of deducting it for estate tax purposes, and as a result
estate taxes paid from principal are increased and income taxes paid by an
estate, trust, or beneficiary are decreased, each estate, trust, or beneficiary
that benefits from the decrease in income tax shall reimburse the principal
from which the increase in estate tax is paid. The total reimbursement must
equal the increase in the estate tax to the extent that the principal used to
pay the increase would have qualified for a marital deduction or charitable
contribution deduction but for the payment. The proportionate share of the
reimbursement for each estate, trust, or beneficiary whose income taxes are
reduced must be the same as its proportionate share of the total decrease in income
tax. An estate or trust shall reimburse principal from income.

ARTICLE
6

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
601. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 11.104.010 (Definitions) and 1997 c
252 s 78 & 1985 c 30 s 84;

(2) RCW 11.104.020 (Duty of trustee as to
receipts and expenditures) and 1985 c 30 s 85;

(3) RCW 11.104.030
(Income--Principal--Charges) and 1985 c 30 s 86;

(4) RCW 11.104.040 (When right to income
arises--Apportionment of income) and 1985 c 30 s 87;

(5) RCW 11.104.050 (Income earned during
administration of a decedent's estate) and 1993 c 161 s 1 & 1985 c 30 s 88;

(6) RCW 11.104.060 (Corporate distribution)
and 1985 c 30 s 89;

(7) RCW 11.104.070 (Bond premium and discount)
and 1985 c 30 s 90;

(8) RCW 11.104.071 (Charitable remainder
unitrusts) and 1997 c 252 s 79;

(9) RCW 11.104.080 (Trade, business and
farming operations) and 1985 c 30 s 91;

(10) RCW 11.104.090 (Disposition of receipts
from natural resources) and 1985 c 30 s 92;

(11) RCW 11.104.100 (Timber) and 1971 c 74 s
10;

(12) RCW 11.104.110 (Other property subject to
deferred payment right--Inventory value determination) and 1997 c 252 s 80
& 1971 c 74 s 11;

(13) RCW 11.104.120 (Underproductive
property--Definition) and 1985 c 30 s 93;

(14) RCW 11.104.130 (Charges against income
and principal) and 1985 c 30 s 94;

(15) RCW 11.104.900 (Application of chapter)
and 1971 c 74 s 14;

(16) RCW 11.104.901 (Application of RCW
11.104.010 through 11.104.130 as of January 1, 1985) and 1985 c 30 s 142;

(17) RCW 11.104.910 (Short title) and 1971 c
74 s 15;

(18) RCW 11.104.920 (Severability--1971 c 74)
and 1971 c 74 s 16;

(19) RCW 11.104.930 (Section headings not part
of law) and 1971 c 74 s 18; and

(20) RCW 11.104.940 (Effective date--1971 c
74) and 1971 c 74 s 19.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
602. UNIFORMITY OF APPLICATION
AND CONSTRUCTION. In applying and construing this act, consideration must be
given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject
matter among states that enact similar laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
603. APPLICATION OF CHAPTER
11.96A RCW. Nothing in this act is intended to restrict the application of
chapter 11.96A RCW to issues, questions, or disputes that arise under or that
relate to this act. Any and all such issues, questions, or disputes shall be
resolved judicially or nonjudicially under chapter 11.96A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
604. SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
605. Captions, article
headings, and part headings used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
606. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act
takes effect January 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
607. APPLICATION OF ACT TO
EXISTING TRUSTS AND ESTATES. Except as specifically provided otherwise in the
terms of a trust or a will, this act shall apply to any receipt or expense
received or incurred on or after January 1, 2003, by any trust or
decedent's estate, whether established before, on, or after January 1, 2003,
and whether the asset involved was acquired by the fiduciary before, on, or
after January 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 608. Sections 101 through 506
and 602 through 606 of this act are each added to chapter 11.104 RCW.

---
END ---