BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that access to prescription drugs is vital to the health of many Washington
residents. However, increased cost and utilization of such drugs is straining
the resources of many individuals, and public and private entities. Studies
suggest that the elderly in particular are at risk for inappropriate drug
utilization, leading to unnecessary costs and adverse outcomes. The
legislature therefore intends to implement strategies to reduce the state's
prescription drug expenditures, and assist state residents in accessing
necessary, appropriate, and affordable medications.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The department shall
award prescription drug information and education grants to local government or
nonprofit organizations for the design and implementation of programs intended
to inform and train persons age sixty-five and older in the safe, appropriate,
and cost-effective use of prescription and nonprescription medications.

(2) The grants shall be
awarded on a competitive basis, using the following criteria:

(a) The demonstrated
ability of the applicant organization to effectively administer such a program,
including appropriate outreach and follow-up;

(b) The financial and
in-kind resources that the applicant organization will bring to the program in
addition to those funded by the grant;

(c) The extent to which
the proposed program design reflects a comprehensive understanding of issues
related to the safe and appropriate use of prescription drugs by seniors, and
how to effectively communicate with the target audience;

(d) The extent to which
the proposed program reflects a collaborative effort between the applicant
organization and other health care providers and programs in the location to be
served, including doctors, pharmacists, and long-term care providers;

(e) The extent to which
the proposed program will serve as a model that can be replicated by other
organizations around the state; and

(f) Any other criteria
deemed appropriate by the department to ensure the quality and
cost-effectiveness of the programs funded.

In awarding the grants,
the department shall make every effort to ensure that the programs are
geographically dispersed around the state. No single program shall be awarded
more than twenty-five thousand dollars annually.

The department may
solicit and accept gifts, grants, bequests, devises, and other funds from
public and private sources to fund the prescription drug information and
education grants authorized under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The department may
implement any senior prescription drug assistance program authorized and funded
by the federal government in accordance with the standards established under
that authorization.

Sec. 4. RCW 41.05.021 and 1999 c
372 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington
state health care authority is created within the executive branch. The
authority shall have an administrator appointed by the governor, with the
consent of the senate. The administrator shall serve at the pleasure of the
governor. The administrator may employ up to seven staff members, who shall be
exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are
necessary to administer this chapter. The administrator may delegate any power
or duty vested in him or her by this chapter, including authority to make final
decisions and enter final orders in hearings conducted under chapter 34.05
RCW. The primary duties of the authority shall be to: Administer state
employees' insurance benefits and retired or disabled school employees'
insurance benefits; administer the basic health plan pursuant to chapter 70.47
RCW; study state-purchased health care programs in order to maximize cost
containment in these programs while ensuring access to quality health care; and
implement state initiatives, joint purchasing strategies, and techniques for
efficient administration that have potential application to all state-purchased
health services. The authority's duties include, but are not limited to, the
following:

(a) To administer
health care benefit programs for employees and retired or disabled school
employees as specifically authorized in RCW 41.05.065 and in accordance with
the methods described in RCW 41.05.075, 41.05.140, and other provisions of this
chapter;

(b) To analyze
state-purchased health care programs and to explore options for cost
containment and delivery alternatives for those programs that are consistent
with the purposes of those programs, including, but not limited to:

(i) Creation of
economic incentives for the persons for whom the state purchases health care to
appropriately utilize and purchase health care services, including the
development of flexible benefit plans to offset increases in individual
financial responsibility;

(ii) Utilization of
provider arrangements that encourage cost containment, including but not
limited to prepaid delivery systems, utilization review, and prospective
payment methods, and that ensure access to quality care, including assuring
reasonable access to local providers, especially for employees residing in
rural areas;

(iii) Coordination of
state agency efforts to purchase drugs effectively, including the
development of a preferred drug list as provided in RCW 70.14.050, the
development of consolidated prescription drug purchasing strategies, and more
effective use of pharmacy-based services in the delivery of any prescription
drug benefit;

(iv) Development of
recommendations and methods for purchasing medical equipment and supporting
services on a volume discount basis; and

(v) Development of data
systems to obtain utilization data from state-purchased health care programs in
order to identify cost centers, utilization patterns, provider and hospital
practice patterns, and procedure costs, utilizing the information obtained
pursuant to RCW 41.05.031;

(c) To analyze areas of
public and private health care interaction;

(d) To provide information
and technical and administrative assistance to the board;

(e) To review and
approve or deny applications from counties, municipalities, and other political
subdivisions of the state to provide state-sponsored insurance or
self-insurance programs to their employees in accordance with the provisions of
RCW 41.04.205, setting the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined
in RCW 41.05.050;

(f) To appoint a health
care policy technical advisory committee as required by RCW 41.05.150;

(g) To establish
billing procedures and collect funds from school districts and educational
service districts under RCW 28A.400.400 in a way that minimizes the
administrative burden on districts; and

(h) To promulgate and
adopt rules consistent with this chapter as described in RCW 41.05.160.

(2) On and after
January 1, 1996, the public employees' benefits board may implement strategies
to promote managed competition among employee health benefit plans. Strategies
may include but are not limited to:

(a) Standardizing the
benefit package;

(b) Soliciting
competitive bids for the benefit package;

(c) Limiting the
state's contribution to a percent of the lowest priced qualified plan within a
geographical area;

(d) Monitoring the impact
of the approach under this subsection with regards to: Efficiencies in health
service delivery, cost shifts to subscribers, access to and choice of managed
care plans statewide, and quality of health services. The health care
authority shall also advise on the value of administering a benchmark
employer-managed plan to promote competition among managed care plans.

Sec. 5. RCW 41.05.026 and 1991 c
79 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When soliciting
proposals for the purpose of awarding contracts for goods or services, the
administrator shall, upon written request by the bidder, exempt from public
inspection and copying such proprietary data, trade secrets, or other
information contained in the bidder's proposal that relate to the bidder's
unique methods of conducting business or of determining prices or premium rates
to be charged for services under terms of the proposal.

(2) Actuarial formulas,
statistics, cost and utilization data, or other proprietary information
submitted upon request of the administrator or board by a contracting insurer,
health care service contractor, health maintenance organization, or vendor may
be withheld at any time from public inspection when necessary to preserve trade
secrets or prevent unfair competition.

(3) Proprietary
information submitted upon request of the administrator by any insurer, vendor,
or other person or entity for the purpose of analyzing and developing cost
containment options, delivery alternatives, and consolidated purchasing for
state-purchased health care programs may be withheld at any time from public
inspection when necessary to preserve trade secrets or prevent unfair
competition.

(4) The board
may hold an executive session during any regular or special meeting to discuss
information submitted in accordance with subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

Sec. 6. RCW 70.14.050 and 1986 c
303 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each agency listed
in ((RCW 70.14.010)) subsection (5) of this section shall
individually or in cooperation with other agencies take any necessary actions
to control costs without reducing the quality of care when reimbursing for or
purchasing drugs. To accomplish this purpose, each agency shall investigate
the feasibility of and may establish a ((drug formulary)) preferred
drug list designating which drugs may be paid for through their health care
programs. For purposes of this section, a ((drug formulary)) preferred
drug list means a list of drugs, either inclusive or exclusive, that
defines which drugs are eligible for reimbursement by the agency.

(2) In developing the
((drug formulary)) preferred drug list authorized by this
section, agencies:

(a) Shall prohibit
reimbursement for drugs that are determined to be ineffective by the United
States food and drug administration;

(b) Shall adopt rules
in order to ensure that less expensive generic drugs will be substituted for
brand name drugs in those instances where the quality of care is not diminished;

(c) Where possible, may
authorize reimbursement for drugs only in economical quantities;

(d) May limit the
prices paid for drugs by such means as central purchasing, volume contracting,
or setting maximum prices to be paid;

(e) Shall consider the
approval of drugs with lower abuse potential in substitution for drugs with
significant abuse potential; and

(f) May take other
necessary measures to control costs of drugs without reducing the quality of
care.

(3) Agencies may
provide for reasonable exceptions to the ((drug formulary)) preferred
drug list required by this section.

(4) Agencies may
establish medical advisory committees, or utilize committees already
established, to assist in the development of the ((drug formulary)) preferred
drug list required by this section.

(5) This section
applies to the department of social and health services, the health care
authority, the department of health, the department of labor and industries,
the department of veterans affairs, and the department of corrections.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. No later than January 1,
2003, the administrator of the health care authority shall submit to the
governor and the legislature a progress report regarding the implementation of
efforts to coordinate state agency drug purchasing pursuant to RCW
41.05.021(1)(b)(iii), including an explanation of and rationale for the
strategies developed, and the timeline for implementation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The sum of forty-nine
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the department
of social and health services, all of which the department of social and health
services must award to local governments and nonprofit organizations under
section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. Sections 2 and 3 of this
act are each added to chapter 74.09 RCW.

---
END ---