BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.20.100 and 1998
c 95 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governance of
the University of Washington shall be vested in a board of regents to consist
of ten members, one of whom shall be a student. The governor shall select the
student member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than
five, submitted by the governing body of the associated students. They shall
be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate, and, except for
the student member, shall hold their offices for a term of six years from the
first day of October and until their successors shall be appointed and
qualified. The student member shall hold his or her office for a term of ((one))
up to two years from the first day of June until his or her
successor is appointed and qualified. The board of regents shall determine
the length of the student term. The student member shall be a full-time
student in good standing at the university at the time of appointment.

(2) Six members of said
board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In the case
of a vacancy, or when an appointment is made after the date of the expiration
of a term, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of
the regent whose office has become vacant or expired.

(3) Except for the term
of the student member, no more than the terms of two members will expire
simultaneously on the last day of September in any one year.

(4) A student appointed
under this section shall excuse himself or herself from participation or voting
on matters relating to the hiring, discipline, or tenure of faculty members and
personnel.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.30.100 and 1998
c 95 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governance of
Washington State University shall be vested in a board of regents to consist of
ten members one of whom shall be a student. The governor shall select the
student member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than
five, submitted by the governing body of the associated students. They shall
be appointed by the governor, by and with the consent of the senate and, except
for the student member, shall hold their offices for a term of six years from
the first day of October and until their successors are appointed and
qualified. The student member shall hold his or her office for a term of ((one))
up to two years from the first day of June until his or her
successor is appointed and qualified. The board of regents shall determine
the length of the student term. The student member shall be a full-time
student in good standing at the university at the time of appointment.

(2) Six members of said
board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In the case
of a vacancy or when an appointment is made after the date of the expiration of
a term, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of
the regent whose office has become vacant or expired.

(3) Except for the term
of the student member, no more than the terms of two members will expire
simultaneously on the last day of September in any one year.

(4) Each regent shall,
before entering upon the discharge of his respective duties as such, execute a
good and sufficient bond to the state of Washington, with two or more
sufficient sureties, residents of the state, or with a surety company licensed
to do business within the state, in the penal sum of not less than five
thousand dollars, conditioned for the faithful performance of his duties as
such regent: PROVIDED, That the university shall pay any fees incurred for any
such bonds for their board members.

(5) A student appointed
under this section shall excuse himself or herself from participation or voting
on matters relating to the hiring, discipline, or tenure of faculty members and
personnel.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.35.100 and 1998
c 95 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governance of
each of the regional universities shall be vested in a board of trustees
consisting of eight members, one of whom shall be a student. The governor
shall select the student member from a list of candidates, of at least three
and not more than five, submitted by the governing body of the associated
students. They shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the
senate and, except for the student member, shall hold their offices for a term
of six years from the first day of October and until their successors are appointed
and qualified. The student member shall hold his or her office for a term of
((one)) up to two years from the first day of June and
until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. The board of
trustees shall determine the length of the student term. The student
member shall be a full-time student in good standing at the respective
university at the time of appointment.

(2) Five members of the
board constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In case of a
vacancy, or when an appointment is made after the date of expiration of the
term, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the
trustee whose office has become vacant or expired.

(3) Except for the term
of the student member, no more than the terms of two members will expire
simultaneously on the last day of September in any one year.

(4) A student appointed
under this section shall excuse himself or herself from participation or voting
on matters relating to the hiring, discipline, or tenure of faculty members and
personnel.

Sec. 4. RCW 28B.40.100 and 1998
c 95 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governance of
The Evergreen State College shall be vested in a board of trustees consisting
of eight members, one of whom shall be a student. The governor shall select
the student member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more
than five, submitted by the student body. They shall be appointed by the
governor with the consent of the senate and, except for the student member,
shall hold their offices for a term of six years from the first day of October
and until their successors are appointed and qualified. The student member
shall hold his or her office for a term of ((one)) up to two years
from the first day of June and until his or her successor is appointed and
qualified. The board of trustees shall determine the length of the student
term. The student member shall be a full-time student in good standing at
the college at the time of appointment.

(2) Five members of the
board constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In case of a
vacancy, or when an appointment is made after the date of expiration of the
term, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the
trustee whose office has become vacant or expired.

(3) Except for the term
of the student member, no more than the terms of two members will expire
simultaneously on the last day of September in any one year.

(4) A student appointed
under this section shall excuse himself or herself from participation or voting
on matters relating to the hiring, discipline, or tenure of faculty members and
personnel.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---