BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any
other provisions of law, the secretary may enter into contracts with health
care practitioners, health care facilities, and other entities or agents as may
be necessary to provide basic medical care to residents. The contracts shall
not cause the termination of classified employees of the department rendering
the services at the time the contract is executed.

(2) In contracting for
services, the secretary is authorized to provide for indemnification of health
care practitioners who cannot obtain professional liability insurance through
reasonable effort, from liability on any action, claim, or proceeding
instituted against them arising out of the good faith performance or failure of
performance of services on behalf of the department. The contracts may provide
that for the purposes of chapter 4.92 RCW only, those health care practitioners
with whom the department has contracted shall be considered state employees.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.09.020 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(2) "Health
care facility" means any hospital, hospice care center, licensed or
certified health care facility, health maintenance organization regulated under
chapter 48.46 RCW, federally qualified health maintenance organization,
federally approved renal dialysis center or facility, or federally approved
blood bank.

(3) "Health
care practitioner" means an individual or firm licensed or certified to
engage actively in a regulated health profession.

(4) "Health
care services" means those services provided by health professionals
licensed pursuant to RCW 18.120.020(4).

(5) "Health
profession" means those licensed or regulated professions set forth in RCW
18.120.020(4).

(6) "Less
restrictive alternative" means court‑ordered treatment in a setting
less restrictive than total confinement which satisfies the conditions set
forth in RCW 71.09.092.

(((3))) (7)
"Likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not confined in
a secure facility" means that the person more probably than not will
engage in such acts if released unconditionally from detention on the sexually
violent predator petition. Such likelihood must be evidenced by a recent overt
act if the person is not totally confined at the time the petition is filed
under RCW 71.09.030.

(((4))) (8)
"Mental abnormality" means a congenital or acquired condition
affecting the emotional or volitional capacity which predisposes the person to
the commission of criminal sexual acts in a degree constituting such person a
menace to the health and safety of others.

(((5))) (9)
"Predatory" means acts directed towards: (a) Strangers; (b)
individuals with whom a relationship has been established or promoted for the
primary purpose of victimization; or (c) persons of casual acquaintance with
whom no substantial personal relationship exists.

(((6))) (10)
"Recent overt act" means any act or threat that has either caused
harm of a sexually violent nature or creates a reasonable apprehension of such
harm in the mind of an objective person who knows of the history and mental
condition of the person engaging in the act.

(((7))) (11)
"Risk potential activity" or "risk potential facility"
means an activity or facility that provides a higher incidence of risk to the
public from persons conditionally released from the special commitment center.
Risk potential activities and facilities include: Public and private schools,
school bus stops, licensed day care and licensed preschool facilities, public
parks, publicly dedicated trails, sports fields, playgrounds, recreational and
community centers, churches, synagogues, temples, mosques, and public
libraries.

(((8))) (12)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services or the
secretary's designee.

(((9))) (13)
"Secure facility" means a residential facility for persons civilly
confined under the provisions of this chapter that includes security measures sufficient
to protect the community. Such facilities include total confinement
facilities, secure community transition facilities, and any residence used as a
court-ordered placement under RCW 71.09.096.

(((10))) (14)
"Secure community transition facility" means a residential facility
for persons civilly committed and conditionally released to a less restrictive
alternative under this chapter. A secure community transition facility has
supervision and security, and either provides or ensures the provision of sex
offender treatment services. Secure community transition facilities include
but are not limited to the facilities established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250 and
any community‑based facilities established under this chapter and
operated by the secretary or under contract with the secretary.

(((11))) (15)
"Sexually violent offense" means an act committed on, before, or
after July 1, 1990, that is: (a) An act defined in Title 9A RCW as rape in the
first degree, rape in the second degree by forcible compulsion, rape of a child
in the first or second degree, statutory rape in the first or second degree,
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion, indecent liberties against a child
under age fourteen, incest against a child under age fourteen, or child molestation
in the first or second degree; (b) a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1990, that is comparable to a sexually violent offense as defined in
(a) of this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for a felony
offense that under the laws of this state would be a sexually violent offense
as defined in this subsection; (c) an act of murder in the first or second
degree, assault in the first or second degree, assault of a child in the first
or second degree, kidnapping in the first or second degree, burglary in the
first degree, residential burglary, or unlawful imprisonment, which act, either
at the time of sentencing for the offense or subsequently during civil
commitment proceedings pursuant to this chapter, has been determined beyond a
reasonable doubt to have been sexually motivated, as that term is defined in
RCW 9.94A.030; or (d) an act as described in chapter 9A.28 RCW, that is an
attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of the
felonies designated in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection.

(((12))) (16)
"Sexually violent predator" means any person who has been convicted
of or charged with a crime of sexual violence and who suffers from a mental
abnormality or personality disorder which makes the person likely to engage in
predatory acts of sexual violence if not confined in a secure facility.

(((13))) (17)
"Total confinement facility" means a facility that provides
supervision and sex offender treatment services in a total confinement setting.
Total confinement facilities include the special commitment center and any
similar facility designated as a secure facility by the secretary.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---