BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.20A.080 and 2000
c 86 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary may
issue to any person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision,
department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the
United States, an order to withhold and deliver property of any kind, including
but not restricted to earnings which are or might become due, owing, or
belonging to the debtor, when the secretary has reason to believe that there is
in the possession of such person, firm, corporation, association, political
subdivision, department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or
instrumentality of the United States property which is or might become due,
owing, or belonging to said debtor. Such order to withhold and deliver may be
issued:

(a) At any time, if a
responsible parent's support order:

(i) Contains notice
that withholding action may be taken against earnings, wages, or assets without
further notice to the parent; or

(ii) Includes a
statement that other income-withholding action under this chapter may be taken
without further notice to the responsible parent;

(b) Twenty-one days
after service of a notice of support debt under RCW 74.20A.040;

(c) Twenty-one days
after service of a notice and finding of parental responsibility under RCW
74.20A.056;

(d) Twenty-one days
after service of a notice of support owed under RCW 26.23.110;

(e) Twenty-one days
after service of a notice and finding of financial responsibility under RCW
74.20A.055; or

(f) When appropriate
under RCW 74.20A.270.

(2) The order to
withhold and deliver shall:

(a) State the amount to
be withheld on a periodic basis if the order to withhold and deliver is being
served to secure payment of monthly current support;

(b) State the amount of
the support debt accrued;

(c) State in summary
the terms of RCW 74.20A.090 and 74.20A.100;

(d) Be served:

(i) In the manner
prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action;

(ii) By certified mail,
return receipt requested;

(iii) By electronic
means if there is an agreement between the secretary and the person, firm,
corporation, association, political subdivision, department of the state, or
agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States to accept service
by electronic means; ((or))

(iv) By regular mail to
a responsible parent's employer unless the division of child support reasonably
believes that service of process in the manner prescribed in (d)(i) or (ii) of
this subsection is required for initiating an action to ensure employer
compliance with the withholding requirement; or

(v) By regular mail
to an address if designated by the financial institution as a central levy or
garnishment address, and if the notice is clearly identified as a levy or
garnishment order. Before the division of child support may initiate an action
for noncompliance with a withholding action against a financial institution,
the division of child support must serve the order to withhold and deliver on
the financial institution in the manner described in (d)(i) or (ii) of this
subsection.

(3) The division of
child support may use uniform interstate withholding forms adopted by the
United States department of health and human services to take withholding
actions under this section when the responsible parent is owed money or
property that is located in this state or in another state.

(4) Any person, firm,
corporation, association, political subdivision, department of the state, or
agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States upon whom service
has been made is hereby required to:

(a) Answer said order
to withhold and deliver within twenty days, exclusive of the day of service,
under oath and in writing, and shall make true answers to the matters inquired
of therein; and

(b) Provide further and
additional answers when requested by the secretary.

(5) The returned answer
or a payment remitted to the division of child support by the employer
constitutes proof of service of the order to withhold and deliver in the case
where the order was served by regular mail.

(6) Any such person,
firm, corporation, association, political subdivision, department of the state,
or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States in possession
of any property which may be subject to the claim of the department shall:

(a)(i) Immediately
withhold such property upon receipt of the order to withhold and deliver; and

(ii) Within seven
working days deliver the property to the secretary;

(iii) Continue to
withhold earnings payable to the debtor at each succeeding disbursement
interval as provided for in RCW 74.20A.090, and deliver amounts withheld from
earnings to the secretary within seven working days of the date earnings are
payable to the debtor;

(iv) Deliver amounts
withheld from periodic payments to the secretary within seven working days of
the date the payments are payable to the debtor;

(v) Inform the
secretary of the date the amounts were withheld as requested under this
section; or

(b) Furnish to the
secretary a good and sufficient bond, satisfactory to the secretary,
conditioned upon final determination of liability.

(7) An order to
withhold and deliver served under this section shall not expire until:

(a) Released in writing
by the division of child support;

(b) Terminated by court
order;

(c) A person or entity,
other than an employer as defined in Title 50 RCW, who has received the order
to withhold and deliver does not possess property of or owe money to the
debtor; or

(d) An employer who has
received the order to withhold and deliver no longer employs, contracts, or
owes money to the debtor under a contract of employment, express or implied.

(8) Where money is due
and owing under any contract of employment, express or implied, or is held by
any person, firm, corporation, or association, political subdivision, or
department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the
United States subject to withdrawal by the debtor, such money shall be
delivered by remittance payable to the order of the secretary.

(9) Delivery to the
secretary of the money or other property held or claimed shall satisfy the
requirement and serve as full acquittance of the order to withhold and deliver.

(10) A person, firm,
corporation, or association, political subdivision, department of the state, or
agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States that complies with
the order to withhold and deliver under this chapter is not civilly liable to
the debtor for complying with the order to withhold and deliver under this
chapter.

(11) The secretary may
hold the money or property delivered under this section in trust for
application on the indebtedness involved or for return, without interest, in
accordance with final determination of liability or nonliability.

(12) Exemptions
contained in RCW 74.20A.090 apply to orders to withhold and deliver issued
under this section.

(13) The secretary
shall also, on or before the date of service of the order to withhold and
deliver, mail or cause to be mailed a copy of the order to withhold and deliver
to the debtor at the debtor's last known post office address, or, in the
alternative, a copy of the order to withhold and deliver shall be served on the
debtor in the same manner as a summons in a civil action on or before the date
of service of the order or within two days thereafter. The copy of the order
shall be mailed or served together with a concise explanation of the right to
petition for judicial review. This requirement is not jurisdictional, but, if
the copy is not mailed or served as in this section provided, or if any
irregularity appears with respect to the mailing or service, the superior
court, in its discretion on motion of the debtor promptly made and supported by
affidavit showing that the debtor has suffered substantial injury due to the
failure to mail the copy, may set aside the order to withhold and deliver and
award to the debtor an amount equal to the damages resulting from the
secretary's failure to serve on or mail to the debtor the copy.

(14) An order to
withhold and deliver issued in accordance with this section has priority over
any other wage assignment, garnishment, attachment, or other legal process.

(15) The
division of child support shall notify any person, firm, corporation,
association, or political subdivision, department of the state, or agency,
subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States required to withhold and
deliver the earnings of a debtor under this action that they may deduct a
processing fee from the remainder of the debtor's earnings, even if the
remainder would otherwise be exempt under RCW 74.20A.090. The processing fee
shall not exceed ten dollars for the first disbursement to the department and
one dollar for each subsequent disbursement under the order to withhold and
deliver.

--- END ---