BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.45 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature
recognizes that water rights are appurtenant to land and can be transferred
along with the land or can be transferred separately, becoming appurtenant to
other land. The legislature also recognizes that the department of ecology
administers water rights records and counties administer real property
records. It is the intent of this act to establish a source of funds to help
improve and integrate records relating to water rights ownership that the
department of ecology and counties each administer. Revenue collected by the
state from that portion of the existing real estate excise tax that is
attributable to sales of water rights is dedicated to this purpose. Use of the
revenue by the departments of ecology and revenue and counties to develop and
implement improvements in administration of records relating to water rights
ownership is authorized.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.45.180 and 1998 c
106 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For taxes collected
by the county under this chapter, the county treasurer shall collect a
two-dollar fee on all transactions required by this chapter where the
transaction does not require the payment of tax. A total of two dollars shall
be collected in the form of a tax and fee, where the calculated tax payment is
less than two dollars. The county treasurer shall place one percent of the
proceeds of the tax imposed by this chapter and the treasurer's fee in the
county current expense fund to defray costs of collection and shall pay over to
the state treasurer and account to the department of revenue for the remainder
of the proceeds at the same time the county treasurer remits funds to the state
under RCW 84.56.280. The state treasurer shall deposit the proceeds in the
general fund for the support of the common schools, except that the proceeds
of taxes upon sales identified in section 3 of this act shall be deposited to
the water rights records account created in section 4 of this act.

(2) For taxes collected
by the department of revenue under this chapter, the department shall remit the
tax to the state treasurer who shall deposit the proceeds of any state tax in
the general fund for the support of the common schools, except that the
proceeds of taxes upon sales identified in section 3 of this act shall be
deposited to the water rights records account created in section 4 of this act.
The state treasurer shall deposit the proceeds of any local taxes imposed under
chapter 82.46 RCW in the local real estate excise tax account hereby created in
the state treasury. Moneys in the local real estate excise tax account may be
spent only for distribution to counties, cities, and towns imposing a tax under
chapter 82.46 RCW. Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of
investments of balances in the local real estate excise tax account shall be
credited to the local real estate excise tax account and distributed to the
counties, cities, and towns monthly. Monthly the state treasurer shall make
distribution from the local real estate excise tax account to the counties,
cities, and towns the amount of tax collected on behalf of each taxing
authority. The state treasurer shall make the distribution under this
subsection without appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.45 RCW to read as follows:

The real estate excise
tax affidavit form prescribed and furnished by the department pursuant to RCW
82.45.150 shall provide for separate identification of sales subject to this
chapter that are solely the sale of a water right or an interest in a water right.
The department and counties each shall separately identify proceeds of taxes
collected upon such sales when paying such proceeds over to the state treasurer
as provided in RCW 82.45.180.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

The water rights
records account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from proceeds
identified in section 3 of this act must be deposited in the account. Moneys
in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used for improving and integrating the administration of such
records relating to ownership of water rights as are administered by the
department and counties respectively. From amounts appropriated, the
department may make grants to counties to assist with this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

The departments of
ecology and revenue shall work with county treasurers, auditors, and assessors,
as appropriate, to develop and implement procedures for improving and
integrating state and local administration of records relating to ownership of
water rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. By November 1, 2004, the
department of ecology shall report to the appropriate standing committees of
the senate and house of representatives regarding implementation of this act
and make recommendations for administrative and legislative actions to improve
records and information management regarding water rights ownership.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Sections 2 and 3 of this
act take effect January 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. Sections 5 and 6 of this
act take effect July 1, 2003.

---
END ---