BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that:

(a) Periodontal disease
is a serious public health problem that poses a potential threat to the health
of millions of Americans, three-quarters of whom will experience at least mild
periodontal disease during their lifetime;

(b) Studies have
indicated that people with periodontal disease may be at higher risk of
developing heart disease, stroke, uncontrolled diabetes, and respiratory
disease. Women with periodontal disease may be at a higher risk of delivering
premature babies;

(c) Periodontal
disease, a bacterial infection, is preventable;

(d) A lack of access
to, and coverage for, preventative dental health and periodontal services
threatens the health status of residents of the state; and

(e) Educating the
public and the health care community about the extent to which the lack of
insurance coverage for periodontal services is a barrier to accessing
appropriate periodontal care is a benefit to all the residents of the state.

(2) The office of the
insurance commissioner must conduct a study to:

(a) Determine the level
of insurance coverage provided for a range of services known to be effective in
preventing and treating periodontal disease; and

(b) Assess whether the
level of coverage is adequate to meet the public need and make appropriate
recommendations to the legislature about strategies for meeting those needs,
and the costs and benefits of implementing these strategies.

(3) In conducting the
study required under subsection (2) of this section, the office of the
insurance commissioner must:

(a) Consult with public
and private purchasers of health services. This includes health carriers,
health care providers, including but not limited to dentists and periodontal
specialists, and consumers of dental health services, to facilitate in the
design of the study; and

(b) Consider the
following questions in assessing the level of insurance coverage for services
known to be effective in preventing and treating periodontal disease:

(i) To what extent is
coverage available for the range of services that are generally recognized as
necessary to meet basic oral health needs?;

(ii) Does the available
coverage encourage services that promote prevention?;

(iii) Do different
types of insurance plans, whether indemnity, preferred provider organization,
point of service, managed care, or other types offer different levels of
coverage and cost sharing?;

(iv) If coverage for
certain services is not available, to what extent has a lack of coverage
resulted in people not receiving needed services?;

(v) If coverage for
certain services is not available, has the lack of coverage resulted in
unreasonable financial hardship?; and

(vi) To what extent
would broader coverage increase the cost of health care services and premiums
for coverage?

(4) The office of the
insurance commissioner must submit a report of its findings to the legislature
by December 31, 2003, and the report must include recommendations required
under subsection (2)(b) of this section.

(5) The
office of the insurance commissioner may accept grants, services, and property
from the federal government, foundations, organizations, medical schools, and
other entities as are available for carrying out the purposes of this act.

---
END ---