BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.68.070 and 1972
ex.s. c 103 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

There is
created in the state treasury a permanent fund to be known as the motor vehicle
fund to the credit of which shall be deposited all moneys directed by law to be
deposited therein. This fund shall be for the use of the state, and through
state agencies, for the use of counties, cities, and towns for proper road,
street, and ((highway)) transportation purposes, including the
purposes of RCW 47.30.030.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.68.090 and 1999 c
269 s 2 and 1999 c 94 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All moneys that have
accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle fund from the motor vehicle fuel tax
and special fuel tax shall be first expended for purposes enumerated in (a) and
(b) of this subsection. The remaining net tax amount shall be distributed
monthly by the state treasurer in the proportions set forth in (c) through (l)
of this subsection.

(a) For payment of
refunds of motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax that has been paid and
is refundable as provided by law;

(b) For payment of
amounts to be expended pursuant to appropriations for the administrative
expenses of the offices of state treasurer, state auditor, and the department
of licensing of the state of Washington in the administration of the motor
vehicle fuel tax and the special fuel tax, which sums shall be distributed
monthly;

(c) For distribution to
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 44.387 percent to be expended for ((highway))
transportation purposes of the state as defined in RCW 46.68.130;

(d) For distribution to
the special category C account, hereby created in the motor vehicle fund, an
amount equal to 3.2609 percent to be expended for special category C projects.
Special category C projects are category C projects that, due to high cost only,
will require bond financing to complete construction.

The following criteria,
listed in order of priority, shall be used in determining which special
category C projects have the highest priority:

(i) Accident
experience;

(ii) Fatal accident
experience;

(iii) Capacity to move
people and goods safely and at reasonable speeds without undue congestion; and

(iv) Continuity of
development of the highway transportation network.

Moneys deposited in the
special category C account in the motor vehicle fund may be used for payment of
debt service on bonds the proceeds of which are used to finance special
category C projects under this subsection (1)(d);

(e) For distribution to
the Puget Sound ferry operations account in the motor vehicle fund an amount
equal to 2.3283 percent;

(f) For distribution to
the Puget Sound capital construction account in the motor vehicle fund an
amount equal to 2.3726 percent;

(g) For distribution to
the urban arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
7.5597 percent;

(h) For distribution to
the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund an amount
equal to 5.6739 percent and expended in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;

(i) For distribution to
the cities and towns from the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 10.6961
percent in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;

(j) For distribution to
the counties from the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 19.2287 percent:
(i) Out of which there shall be distributed from time to time, as directed by
the department of transportation, those sums as may be necessary to carry out
the provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any amounts appropriated to the
county road administration board to implement the provisions of RCW
47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be distributed monthly
as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW 46.68.120;

(k) For distribution to
the county arterial preservation account, hereby created in the motor vehicle
fund an amount equal to 1.9565 percent. These funds shall be distributed by
the county road administration board to counties in proportions corresponding
to the number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each
county and shall be used for improvements to sustain the structural, safety,
and operational integrity of county arterials. The county road administration
board shall adopt reasonable rules and develop policies to implement this
program and to assure that a pavement management system is used;

(l) For distribution to
the rural arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
2.5363 percent and expended in accordance with RCW 36.79.020.

(2) Nothing in this
section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so as to violate any terms or
conditions contained in any highway construction bond issues now or hereafter
authorized by statute and whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid
from any excise taxes on motor vehicle fuel and special fuels.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.68.130 and 1999 c
269 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The tax amount
distributed to the state in the manner provided by RCW 46.68.090, and all
moneys accruing to the motor vehicle fund from any other source, less such sums
as are properly appropriated and reappropriated for expenditure for costs of
collection and administration thereof, shall be expended, subject to proper
appropriation and reappropriation, solely for ((highway)) transportation
purposes of the state, including the purposes of RCW 47.30.030. For the
purposes of this section, the term "((highway)) transportation
purposes of the state" does not include those expenditures of the
Washington state patrol heretofore appropriated or reappropriated from the
motor vehicle fund. Nothing in this section or in RCW 46.68.090 may be
construed so as to violate terms or conditions contained in highway
construction bond issues authorized by statute as of July 1, 1999, or
thereafter and whose payment is, by the statute, pledged to be paid from excise
taxes on motor vehicle fuel and special fuels.

Sec. 4. RCW 47.01.011 and 1977
ex.s. c 151 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature hereby
recognizes the following imperative needs within the state: To create a statewide
transportation development plan which identifies present status and sets goals
for the future; to coordinate transportation modes; to promote and protect land
use programs required in local, state, and federal law; to coordinate
transportation with the economic development of the state; to supply a broad
framework in which regional, metropolitan, and local transportation needs can
be related; to facilitate the supply of federal and state aid to those areas
which will most benefit the state as a whole; to provide for public involvement
in the transportation planning and development process; to administer programs
within the jurisdiction of this title relating to the safety of the state's
transportation systems; and to coordinate and implement national transportation
policy with the state transportation planning program.

The legislature finds
and declares that placing all elements of transportation in a single department
is fully consistent with and shall in no way impair the use of moneys in the
motor vehicle fund exclusively for ((highway)) transportation
purposes.

Through this chapter, a
unified department of transportation is created. To the jurisdiction of this
department will be transferred the present powers, duties, and functions of the
department of highways, the highway commission, the toll bridge authority, the
aeronautics commission, and the canal commission, and the transportation
related powers, duties, and functions of the planning and community affairs
agency.

Sec. 5. RCW 47.01.071 and 1981 c
59 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The transportation
commission shall have the following functions, powers, and duties:

(1) To propose policies
to be adopted by the legislature designed to assure the development and
maintenance of a comprehensive and balanced statewide transportation system
which will meet the needs of the people of this state for safe and efficient
transportation services. Wherever appropriate the policies shall provide for
the use of integrated, intermodal transportation systems to implement the
social, economic, and environmental policies, goals, and objectives of the
people of the state, and especially to conserve nonrenewable natural resources
including land and energy. To this end the commission shall:

(a) Develop
transportation policies which are based on the policies, goals, and objectives
expressed and inherent in existing state laws;

(b) Inventory the
adopted policies, goals, and objectives of the local and area-wide governmental
bodies of the state and define the role of the state, regional, and local
governments in determining transportation policies, in transportation planning,
and in implementing the state transportation plan;

(c) Propose a
transportation policy for the state, and after notice and public hearings,
submit the proposal to the legislative transportation committee and the senate
and house transportation committees by January 1, 1978, for consideration in
the next legislative session;

(d) Establish a
procedure for review and revision of the state transportation policy and for
submission of proposed changes to the legislature;

(e) To integrate the
statewide transportation plan with the needs of the elderly and handicapped,
and to coordinate federal and state programs directed at assisting local
governments to answer such needs;

(2) To establish the
policy of the department to be followed by the secretary on each of the
following items:

(a) To provide for the
effective coordination of state transportation planning with national
transportation policy, state and local land use policies, and local and
regional transportation plans and programs;

(b) To provide for
public involvement in transportation designed to elicit the public's views both
with respect to adequate transportation services and appropriate means of
minimizing adverse social, economic, environmental, and energy impact of
transportation programs;

(c) To provide for the
administration of grants in aid and other financial assistance to counties and
municipal corporations for transportation purposes;

(d) To provide for the
management, sale, and lease of property or property rights owned by the
department which are not required for transportation purposes;

(3) To direct the
secretary to prepare and submit to the commission a comprehensive and balanced
statewide transportation plan which shall be based on the transportation policy
adopted by the legislature and applicable state and federal laws. After public
notice and hearings, the commission shall adopt the plan and submit it to the
legislative transportation committee and to the house and senate standing
committees on transportation before January 1, 1980, for consideration in the
1980 regular legislative session. The plan shall be reviewed and revised prior
to each regular session of the legislature during an even-numbered year
thereafter. A preliminary plan shall be submitted to such committees by
January 1, 1979.

The plan shall take
into account federal law and regulations relating to the planning,
construction, and operation of transportation facilities;

(4) To propose to the
governor and the legislature prior to the convening of each regular session
held in an odd-numbered year a recommended budget for the operations of the
commission as required by RCW 47.01.061;

(5) To approve and
propose to the governor and to the legislature prior to the convening of each
regular session during an odd-numbered year a recommended budget for the
operation of the department and for carrying out the program of the department
for the ensuing biennium. The proposed budget shall separately state the
appropriations to be made from the motor vehicle fund for ((highway)) transportation
purposes in accordance with constitutional limitations and appropriations and
expenditures to be made from the general fund, or accounts thereof, and other
available sources for other operations and programs of the department;

(6) To review and
authorize all departmental requests for legislation;

(7) To approve the
issuance and sale of all bonds authorized by the legislature for capital
construction of state highways, toll facilities, Columbia Basin county roads
(for which reimbursement to the motor vehicle fund has been provided), urban
arterial projects, and aviation facilities;

(8) To adopt such
rules, regulations, and policy directives as may be necessary to carry out
reasonably and properly those functions expressly vested in the commission by
statute;

(9) To delegate any of
its powers to the secretary of transportation whenever it deems it desirable
for the efficient administration of the department and consistent with the
purposes of this title;

(10) To exercise such
other specific powers and duties as may be vested in the transportation
commission by this or any other provision of law.

Sec. 6. RCW 47.02.080 and 1984 c
7 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

Any funds
required to repay such bonds, or the interest thereon when due, shall be taken
from that portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from the imposition
of excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels and which is, or may be appropriated to
the department for state ((highway)) transportation purposes, and
shall never constitute a charge against any allocations of such funds to
counties, cities, and towns unless and until the amount of the motor vehicle
fund arising from the excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels and available for
state ((highway)) transportation purposes proves insufficient to
meet the requirements for bond retirement or interest on any such bonds.

Sec. 7. RCW 47.08.060 and 1967
ex.s. c 145 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever any moneys
shall be realized by the state of Washington as a result of any agreement
authorized by RCW 47.08.040, the same shall be deposited in the treasury of the
state of Washington to the credit of the motor vehicle fund, and shall be
available for ((highway)) transportation purposes only.

Sec. 8. RCW 47.08.070 and 1984 c
7 s 95 are each amended to read as follows:

When it
appears to the department that any state highway will be benefited or improved
by the construction of any public works project, including any urban public
transportation system, within the state of Washington by any of the departments
of the state of Washington, by the federal government, or by any agency,
instrumentality, or municipal corporation of either the state of Washington or
the United States, the department is authorized to enter into cooperative
agreements with any such state department, with the United States, or with any
agency, instrumentality, or municipal corporation of either the state of
Washington or the United States, wherein the state of Washington, acting
through the department, will participate in the cost of the public works
project in such amount as may be determined by the department to be the value
of the benefits or improvements to the particular state highway derived from
the construction of the public works project. Under any such agreement the
department may contribute to the cost of the public works project by making
direct payment to the particular state department, federal government, or to
any agency, instrumentality, or municipal corporation of either the state or
the United States, or any combination thereof, which may be involved in the
project, from any funds appropriated to the department and available for ((highway))
transportation purposes, or by doing a portion of the project either by
day labor or by contract, or in any other manner as may be deemed advisable and
necessary by the department.

Sec. 9. RCW 47.10.070 and 1984 c
7 s 100 are each amended to read as follows:

Any funds
required to repay such bonds, or the interest thereon when due, subject to the
proviso of this section, shall be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle
fund which results from the imposition of all excise taxes on motor vehicle
fuels and which is, or may be, appropriated to the department for state ((highway))
transportation purposes, and shall never constitute a charge against any
allocations of such funds to counties, cities, and towns unless and until the
amount of the motor vehicle fund arising from the excise taxes on motor vehicle
fuels and available for state ((highway)) transportation purposes
proves insufficient to meet the requirements for bond retirement or the
interest on any bonds: PROVIDED, That money required hereunder to pay interest
on or to retire any bonds issued for Columbia Basin county arterial highways or
farm to market roads shall be repaid by any such county or counties wherein
such highways or roads are constructed in the manner set forth in RCW
47.10.110.

Sec. 10. RCW 47.10.110 and 1984 c
7 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary
shall report separately to the state finance committee all sums expended from
funds resulting from the sale of bonds for Columbia Basin county arterial
highways and farm to market roads in Grant, Franklin, and Adams counties under
the provisions of RCW 47.10.010 through 47.10.140. Those counties shall repay
to the state all the cost of any Columbia Basin highway or road facilities
actually constructed under the provisions of RCW 47.10.010 through 47.10.140
within each of such counties as follows: The state finance committee, at least
one year prior to the date any interest is due and payable on such bonds or
before the maturity date of any such bonds, shall ascertain the percentage of
the motor vehicle funds arising from the excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels,
which is to be transferred to such counties under the provisions of law which
will be necessary to pay all of the interest upon or retire when due all of the
portion of said bonds chargeable to expenditures incurred under the provisions
of RCW 47.10.010 through 47.10.140 in each of said counties. The state finance
committee shall notify the state treasurer of this estimate and the treasurer
shall thereafter, when distributions are made from the motor vehicle fund to
counties, retain such percentage of the total sums credited to such counties as
aforesaid in the motor vehicle fund arising from the excise taxes on motor
vehicle fuels until such fund is fully reimbursed for all expenditures under
RCW 47.10.010 through 47.10.140 in Grant, Adams, and Franklin counties. Any
money so retained shall be available for state ((highway)) transportation
purposes.

Sec. 11. RCW 47.10.210 and 1984 c
7 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

Any funds
required to repay such bonds, or the interest thereon when due shall be taken
from that portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from the imposition
of all excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels and which is, or may be,
appropriated to the department for state ((highway)) transportation
purposes, and shall never constitute a charge against any allocations of such
funds to counties, cities, and towns unless and until the amount of the motor
vehicle fund arising from the excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels and available
for state ((highway)) transportation purposes proves insufficient
to meet the requirements for bond retirement or the interest on any bonds.

Sec. 12. RCW 47.10.340 and 1984 c
7 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

Any funds
required to repay such bonds, or the interest thereon when due, subject to the
proviso of this section, shall be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle
fund which results from the imposition of all excise taxes on motor vehicle
fuels and which is, or may be, appropriated to the department for state ((highway))
transportation purposes. They shall never constitute a charge against
any allocation of such funds to counties, cities, and towns unless and until
the amount of the motor vehicle fund arising from the excise taxes on motor
vehicle fuels and available for state ((highway)) transportation
purposes proves insufficient to meet the requirements for bond retirement or
the interest on any bonds: PROVIDED, That money required hereunder to pay
interest on or to retire any bonds issued for Columbia Basin county arterial
highways or farm to market roads shall be repaid by any such county or counties
wherein such highways or roads are constructed in the manner set forth in RCW
47.10.360.

Sec. 13. RCW 47.10.360 and 1984 c
7 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary shall report to the state finance committee all sums expended from
funds resulting from the sale of bonds for Columbia Basin county arterial
highways and farm to market roads in Grant, Franklin, and Adams counties under
the provisions of RCW 47.10.280 through 47.10.400. Those counties shall repay
to the state all the cost of any Columbia Basin highway or road facilities actually
constructed under the provisions of RCW 47.10.280 through 47.10.400 within each
of those counties as follows: The state finance committee, at least one year
prior to the date any such interest is due and payable on such bonds or before
the maturity date of any such bonds, shall ascertain the percentage of the
motor vehicle funds arising from the excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels, which
is to be transferred to such counties under the provisions of law which will be
necessary to pay all of the interest upon or retire when due all of the portion
of said bonds chargeable to expenditures incurred under the provisions of RCW
47.10.280 through 47.10.400 in each of said counties. The state finance
committee shall notify the state treasurer of this estimate and the treasurer
shall thereafter, when distributions are made from the motor vehicle fund to
counties, retain such percentage of the total sums credited to such counties as
aforesaid in the motor vehicle fund arising from such excise taxes on motor vehicle
fuels until such fund is fully reimbursed for all expenditures under RCW
47.10.280 through 47.10.400 in Grant, Adams, and Franklin counties. Any money
so retained shall be available for state ((highway)) transportation
purposes.

Sec. 14. RCW 47.10.420 and 1961 c
13 s 47.10.420 are each amended to read as follows:

To provide additional
funds for the construction of the "Echo Lake Route," in addition to
bonds authorized to be sold by RCW 47.10.160 and as allocated by RCW 47.10.270,
there shall be issued and sold limited obligation bonds of the state of
Washington in the sum of three million dollars. The issuance, sale and
retirement of said bonds shall be under the general supervision and control of
the state finance committee. The state finance committee shall when notified
by the Washington state highway commission, provide for the issuance of coupon
or registered bonds to be dated, issued and sold from time to time in such
amounts as may be necessary to the orderly progress of construction of this
project: PROVIDED, That if funds are available in the motor vehicle fund in an
amount greater than is necessary to pay current demands, moneys appropriated to
the state highway commission for ((highway)) transportation
purposes may be used to finance this project until such time as bonds are sold,
as provided by law, at which time the motor vehicle fund shall be reimbursed.

Sec. 15. RCW 47.10.470 and 1984 c
7 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

Any funds
required to repay such bonds, or the interest thereon when due shall be taken
from that portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from the imposition
of all excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels and which is, or may be, appropriated
to the department for state ((highway)) transportation purposes,
and shall never constitute a charge against any allocations of such funds to
counties, cities, and towns unless and until the amount of the motor vehicle
fund arising from the excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels and available for
state ((highway)) transportation purposes proves insufficient to
meet the requirements for bond retirement or the interest on any bonds.

Sec. 16. RCW 47.10.716 and 1984 c
7 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:

Any funds
required to repay such bonds, or the interest thereon when due, subject to the
proviso of this section, shall be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle
fund which results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels
and which is, or may be appropriated to the department for state ((highway))
transportation purposes, and shall never constitute a charge against any
allocations of such funds to counties, cities, and towns unless and until the
amount of the motor vehicle fund arising from the excise taxes on motor vehicle
fuels and available for state ((highway)) transportation purposes
proves insufficient to meet the requirements for bond retirement or interest on
any such bonds.

Sec. 17. RCW 47.10.732 and 1984 c
7 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

Any funds
required to repay such bonds, or the interest thereon when due, subject to the
proviso of this section, shall be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle
fund which results from the imposition of all excise taxes on motor vehicle
fuels and which is, or may be, appropriated to the department for state ((highway))
transportation purposes. They shall never constitute a charge against
any allocation of such funds to counties, cities, and towns unless and until
the amount of the motor vehicle fund arising from the excise taxes on motor
vehicle fuels and available for state ((highway)) transportation
purposes proves insufficient to meet the requirements for bond retirement or
the interest on any bonds: PROVIDED, That money required hereunder to pay
interest on or to retire any bonds issued as authorized by RCW 47.10.726
through 47.10.738 shall be repaid by the county or counties wherein the
highways or roads are constructed in the manner set forth in RCW 47.10.734.

Sec. 18. RCW 47.10.734 and 1984 c
7 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary shall report to the state finance committee all sums expended from
funds resulting from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.726 through
47.10.738. Grant, Franklin, and Adams counties shall repay to the state all
the cost of highway or road facilities actually constructed under the
provisions of RCW 47.10.726 through 47.10.738 within each of said counties as
follows: The state finance committee, at least one year prior to the date any
such interest is due and payable on such bonds or before the maturity date of
any such bonds, shall ascertain the percentage of the motor vehicle funds
arising from the excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels, which is to be
transferred to such counties under the provisions of law which will be
necessary to pay all of the interest upon or retire when due all of the portion
of said bonds sold under the provisions of RCW 47.10.726 through 47.10.738 in
each of said counties. The state finance committee shall notify the state
treasurer of this estimate and the treasurer shall thereafter, when
distributions are made from the motor vehicle fund to counties, retain such
percentage of the total sums credited to such counties as aforesaid in the
motor vehicle fund arising from such excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels until
such fund is fully reimbursed for all expenditures under RCW 47.10.726 through
47.10.738 in Grant, Adams, and Franklin counties. Any money so retained shall
be available for state ((highway)) transportation purposes.

Sec. 19. RCW 47.10.757 and 1984 c
7 s 110 are each amended to read as follows:

Any funds
required to repay such bonds, or the interest thereon when due, subject to the
proviso of this section, shall be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle
fund which results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels
and which is or may be appropriated to the department for state ((highway))
transportation purposes, and shall never constitute a charge against any
allocations of any other such funds to the state, counties, cities, and towns
unless and until the amount of the motor vehicle fund arising from the excise
taxes on motor vehicle fuels and available to the state for ((construction
of state highways)) the state transportation system proves
insufficient to meet the requirements for bond retirement or interest on any
such bonds.

Sec. 20. RCW 47.10.767 and 1984 c
7 s 112 are each amended to read as follows:

Any funds
required to repay such bonds, or the interest thereon when due, subject to the
proviso of this section, shall be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle
fund which results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels
and which is, or may be appropriated to the department for state ((highway))
transportation purposes, and shall never constitute a charge against any
allocations of such funds to counties, cities, and towns unless and until the
amount of the motor vehicle fund arising from the excise taxes on motor vehicle
fuels and available for state ((highway)) transportation purposes
proves insufficient to meet the requirements for bond retirement or interest on
any such bonds.

Sec. 21. RCW 47.10.794 and 1979
ex.s. c 180 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Any funds required to
repay the bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.790 or the interest thereon when due
shall be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from
the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is
distributed to the state for expenditure pursuant to RCW 46.68.130 and shall
never constitute a charge against any allocations of such funds to counties,
cities, and towns unless and until the amount of the motor vehicle fund arising
from the excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and available for
state ((highway)) transportation purposes proves insufficient to
meet the requirements for bond retirement or interest on any such bonds.

Sec. 22. RCW 47.10.805 and 1981 c
316 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Any funds required to
repay the bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.801 or the interest thereon when due
shall be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from
the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is distributed
to the state for expenditure pursuant to RCW 46.68.130 and shall never
constitute a charge against any allocations of such funds to counties, cities,
and towns unless the amount of the motor vehicle fund arising from the excise
taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and available for state ((highway))
transportation purposes proves insufficient to meet the requirements for
bond retirement or interest on any such bonds.

Sec. 23. RCW 47.10.823 and 1993 c
432 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Both principal and
interest on the bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 47.10.819 through
47.10.824 shall be payable from the highway bond retirement fund. The state
finance committee may provide that a special account be created in the fund to
facilitate payment of the principal and interest. The state finance committee
shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the state treasurer the
amount required for principal and interest on the bonds in accordance with the
bond proceedings. The state treasurer shall withdraw revenues from the motor
vehicle fund and deposit in the highway bond retirement fund, or a special
account in the fund, such amounts, and at such times, as are required by the
bond proceedings.

Any funds required for
bond retirement or interest on the bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.819 through
47.10.824 shall be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund that
results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels
and which is, or may be appropriated to the department of transportation for
state ((highway)) transportation purposes. Funds required shall
never constitute a charge against any other allocations of motor vehicle fuel
and special fuel tax revenues to the state, counties, cities, and towns unless
the amount arising from excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels
distributed to the state in the motor vehicle fund proves insufficient to meet
the requirements for bond retirement or interest on any such bonds.

Any payments for bond
retirement or interest on the bonds taken from other revenues from the motor
vehicle fuel or special fuel taxes that are distributed to the state, counties,
cities, and towns, shall be repaid from the first revenues from the motor vehicle
fuel or special fuel taxes distributed to the motor vehicle fund not required
for bond retirement or interest on the bonds.

Sec. 24. RCW 47.10.839 and 1995
2nd sp.s. c 15 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Both principal and
interest on the bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 47.10.834 through
47.10.841 are payable from the highway bond retirement fund.

(2) The state finance
committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year certify to the state
treasurer the amount required for principal and interest on the bonds issued
for the purposes specified in RCW 47.10.836 in accordance with the bond
proceedings. The state treasurer shall withdraw revenues from the motor
vehicle fund and deposit into the highway bond retirement fund such amounts,
and at such times, as are required by the bond proceedings.

(3) Any funds required
for bond retirement or interest on the bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.834
through 47.10.841 shall be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund
that results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special
fuels which is, or may be appropriated to the department of transportation for
state ((highway)) transportation purposes. Funds required shall
never constitute a charge against any other allocations of motor vehicle fuel
and special fuel tax revenues to the state, counties, cities, or towns unless
the amount arising from excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels
distributed to the state in the motor vehicle fund proves insufficient to meet
the requirements for bond retirement or interest on any such bonds.

(4) Any payments for
bond retirement or interest on the bonds taken from other revenues from the
motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes that are distributable to the state,
counties, cities, or towns shall be repaid from the first revenues from the
motor vehicle fuel or special fuel taxes distributed to the motor vehicle fund
not required for bond retirement or interest on the bonds.

Sec. 25. RCW 47.10.847 and 1998 c
321 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

Both principal and
interest on the bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 47.10.843 through
47.10.848 shall be payable from the highway bond retirement fund. The state finance
committee may provide that a special account be created in the fund to
facilitate payment of the principal and interest. The state finance committee
shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the state treasurer the
amount required for principal and interest on the bonds in accordance with the
bond proceedings. The state treasurer shall withdraw revenues from the motor
vehicle fund and deposit in the highway bond retirement fund, or a special
account in the fund, such amounts, and at such times, as are required by the
bond proceedings.

Any funds required for
bond retirement or interest on the bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 through
47.10.848 shall be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund that
results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels
and which is, or may be, appropriated to the department of transportation for
state ((highway)) transportation purposes. Funds required shall
never constitute a charge against any other allocations of motor vehicle fuel
and special fuel tax revenues to the state, counties, cities and towns unless
the amount arising from excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels
distributed to the state in the motor vehicle fund proves insufficient to meet
the requirements for bond retirement or interest on any such bonds.

Any payments for bond
retirement or interest on the bonds taken from other revenues from the motor
vehicle fuel or special fuel taxes that are distributable to the state,
counties, cities, and towns, shall be repaid from the first revenues from the
motor vehicle fuel or special fuel taxes distributed to the motor vehicle fund
not required for bond retirement or interest on the bonds.

Sec. 26. RCW 47.24.020 and 2001 c
201 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The jurisdiction,
control, and duty of the state and city or town with respect to such streets is
as follows:

(1) The department has
no authority to change or establish any grade of any such street without
approval of the governing body of such city or town, except with respect to
limited access facilities established by the commission;

(2) The city or town
shall exercise full responsibility for and control over any such street beyond
the curbs and if no curb is installed, beyond that portion of the highway used
for ((highway)) transportation purposes. However, within
incorporated cities and towns the title to a state limited access highway vests
in the state, and, notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the
department shall exercise full jurisdiction, responsibility, and control to and
over such facility as provided in chapter 47.52 RCW;

(3) The department has
authority to prohibit the suspension of signs, banners, or decorations above
the portion of such street between the curbs or portion used for ((highway))
transportation purposes up to a vertical height of twenty feet above the
surface of the roadway;

(4) The city or town
shall at its own expense maintain all underground facilities in such streets,
and has the right to construct such additional underground facilities as may be
necessary in such streets. However, pavement trenching and restoration
performed as part of installation of such facilities must meet or exceed
requirements established by the department;

(5) The city or town
has the right to grant the privilege to open the surface of any such street,
but all damage occasioned thereby shall promptly be repaired either by the city
or town itself or at its direction. Pavement trenching and restoration
performed under a privilege granted by the city under this subsection must meet
or exceed requirements established by the department;

(6) The city or town at
its own expense shall provide street illumination and shall clean all such
streets, including storm sewer inlets and catch basins, and remove all snow,
except that the state shall when necessary plow the snow on the roadway. In
cities and towns having a population of twenty-two thousand five hundred or
less according to the latest determination of population by the office of
financial management, the state, when necessary for public safety, shall
assume, at its expense, responsibility for the stability of the slopes of cuts
and fills and the embankments within the right of way to protect the roadway
itself. When the population of a city or town first exceeds twenty-two
thousand five hundred according to the determination of population by the
office of financial management, the city or town shall have three years from
the date of the determination to plan for additional staffing, budgetary, and
equipment requirements before being required to assume the responsibilities
under this subsection. The state shall install, maintain, and operate all
illuminating facilities on any limited access facility, together with its
interchanges, located within the corporate limits of any city or town, and
shall assume and pay the costs of all such installation, maintenance, and
operation incurred after November 1, 1954;

(7) The department has
the right to use all storm sewers on such highways without cost; and if new
storm sewer facilities are necessary in construction of new streets by the
department, the cost of the facilities shall be borne by the state and/or city
as may be mutually agreed upon between the department and the governing body of
the city or town;

(8) Cities and towns
have exclusive right to grant franchises not in conflict with state laws and
rules, over, beneath, and upon such streets, but the department is authorized
to enforce in an action brought in the name of the state any condition of any
franchise which a city or town has granted on such street. No franchise for
transportation of passengers in motor vehicles may be granted on such streets
without the approval of the department, but the department shall not refuse to
approve such franchise unless another street conveniently located and of
strength of construction to sustain travel of such vehicles is accessible;

(9) Every franchise or
permit granted any person by a city or town for use of any portion of such
street by a public utility must require the grantee or permittee to restore,
repair, and replace any portion of the street damaged or injured by it to
conditions that meet or exceed requirements established by the department;

(10) The city or town
has the right to issue overload or overwidth permits for vehicles to operate on
such streets or roads subject to regulations printed and distributed to the
cities and towns by the department;

(11) Cities and towns
shall regulate and enforce all traffic and parking restrictions on such
streets, but all regulations adopted by a city or town relating to speed,
parking, and traffic control devices on such streets not identical to state law
relating thereto are subject to the approval of the department before becoming
effective. All regulations pertaining to speed, parking, and traffic control
devices relating to such streets heretofore adopted by a city or town not
identical with state laws shall become null and void unless approved by the
department heretofore or within one year after March 21, 1963;

(12) The department
shall erect, control, and maintain at state expense all route markers and
directional signs, except street signs, on such streets;

(13) The department
shall install, operate, maintain, and control at state expense all traffic
control signals, signs, and traffic control devices for the purpose of
regulating both pedestrian and motor vehicular traffic on, entering upon, or
leaving state highways in cities and towns having a population of twenty-two
thousand five hundred or less according to the latest determination of
population by the office of financial management. Such cities and towns may
submit to the department a plan for traffic control signals, signs, and traffic
control devices desired by them, indicating the location, nature of
installation, or type thereof, or a proposed amendment to such an existing plan
or installation, and the department shall consult with the cities or towns
concerning the plan before installing such signals, signs, or devices. Cities
and towns having a population in excess of twenty-two thousand five hundred
according to the latest determination of population by the office of financial
management shall install, maintain, operate, and control such signals, signs,
and devices at their own expense, subject to approval of the department for the
installation and type only. When the population of a city or town first
exceeds twenty-two thousand five hundred according to the determination of
population by the office of financial management, the city or town shall have
three years from the date of the determination to plan for additional staffing,
budgetary, and equipment requirements before being required to assume the
responsibilities under this subsection. For the purpose of this subsection,
striping, lane marking, and channelization are considered traffic control
devices;

(14) All revenue from
parking meters placed on such streets belongs to the city or town;

(15) Rights of way for
such streets shall be acquired by either the city or town or by the state as
shall be mutually agreed upon. Costs of acquiring rights of way may be at the
sole expense of the state or at the expense of the city or town or at the
expense of the state and the city or town as may be mutually agreed upon.
Title to all such rights of way so acquired shall vest in the city or town:
PROVIDED, That no vacation, sale, rental, or any other nontransportation use of
any unused portion of any such street may be made by the city or town without
the prior written approval of the department; and all revenue derived from
sale, vacation, rental, or any nontransportation use of such rights of way
shall be shared by the city or town and the state in the same proportion as the
purchase costs were shared;

(16) If
any city or town fails to perform any of its obligations as set forth in this
section or in any cooperative agreement entered into with the department for
the maintenance of a city or town street forming part of the route of a state
highway, the department may notify the mayor of the city or town to perform the
necessary maintenance within thirty days. If the city or town within the
thirty days fails to perform the maintenance or fails to authorize the
department to perform the maintenance as provided by RCW 47.24.050, the
department may perform the maintenance, the cost of which is to be deducted
from any sums in the motor vehicle fund credited or to be credited to the city
or town.

Sec. 27. RCW 47.56.288 and 1965
ex.s. c 170 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

Any funds required to
pay such deficits shall be from the proceeds of state excise taxes on motor
vehicle fuels and shall be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund
which is or may be appropriated for state ((highway)) transportation
purposes, and shall never constitute a charge against any allocations of such
funds to counties, cities and towns unless and until the amount of the motor
vehicle fund arising from the excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels and available
for state ((highway)) transportation purposes proves insufficient
to meet such deficits.

The proceeds of such
excise taxes are hereby pledged to the payment of any such deficits in the
costs of maintenance and operation of the bridge and in the payment of
principal and interest which may arise on account of the bonds issued under the
provisions of RCW 47.56.282, and the legislature hereby agrees to continue to
impose the same excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels in amounts sufficient to
pay, when due, such deficits.

Sec. 28. RCW 47.56.590 and 1961 c
13 s 47.56.590 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon the completion of
such studies and surveys, the highway commission and the toll bridge authority,
in cooperation with the joint fact-finding committee on highways, streets and
bridges, shall prepare a plan for financing the project. The plan shall
include the cost of the entire project; the portion of such total cost which
can be financed by the issuance of toll bridge authority revenue bonds; the
portion of such total cost and the amount of guarantee funds which should be
contributed or advanced by any political subdivisions to be economically
benefited by construction of the project; and the portion of such total cost
and the amount of guarantee funds which should be contributed from that portion
of the motor vehicle fund available to the department of highways for state ((highway))
transportation purposes. When completed, the financing plan shall be
adopted by resolution of the commission and the authority.

Sec. 29. RCW 47.56.661 and 1961 c
209 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

In the event Pacific
county makes the contribution authorized in subsection (1) of RCW 47.56.658,
such contribution shall be placed in the motor vehicle fund and shall be
available for state ((highway)) transportation purposes.

Sec. 30. RCW 47.56.702 and 1984 c
7 s 282 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may
pledge the proceeds of all excise taxes imposed on motor vehicle fuels now
directed by law to be deposited in the motor vehicle fund and which are
available for appropriation to the department for state ((highway)) transportation
purposes in the sum of one hundred thousand dollars per year for the purpose of
guaranteeing the payment of principal and interest on bonds issued by the
authority as authorized in RCW 47.56.701 or for sinking fund requirements or
reserves established by the authority with respect thereto or for guaranteeing
the payment of principal and interest on any subsequent refunding bond issues.
To the extent of any such pledge the department shall use such moneys to meet
such obligations as they arise but only to the extent that net revenues of the
project are insufficient therefor.

Sec. 31. RCW 47.56.704 and 1984 c
7 s 284 are each amended to read as follows:

Any money
from the motor vehicle fund used by the department for payment of expenses of
location, maintenance, repair, and operation of the bridge and approaches and
highway approach, and principal or interest on any bonds issued pursuant to RCW
47.56.701 or any subsequent refunding bond issue shall be repaid to the motor
vehicle fund to be used for state ((highway)) transportation
purposes from revenues of the project, and tolls shall be continued for any
additional length of time necessary for this purpose.

Sec. 32. RCW 47.60.505 and 1986 c
66 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created
in the motor vehicle fund the Puget Sound capital construction account. All
moneys hereafter deposited in said account shall be used by the department of
transportation for:

(1) Reimbursing the
motor vehicle fund for all transfers therefrom made in accordance with RCW
47.60.620; and

(2) Improving the
Washington state ferry system including, but not limited to, vessel
acquisition, vessel construction, major and minor vessel improvements, terminal
construction and improvements, and reconstruction or replacement of, and
improvements to, the Hood Canal bridge, reimbursement of the motor vehicle fund
for any state funds, other than insurance proceeds, expended therefrom for
reconstruction or replacement of and improvements to the Hood Canal bridge,
pursuant to proper appropriations: PROVIDED, That any funds accruing to the
Puget Sound capital construction account after June 30, 1979, which are not
required to reimburse the motor vehicle fund pursuant to RCW 47.60.620 as such
obligations come due nor are required for capital improvements of the
Washington state ferries pursuant to appropriations therefor shall from time to
time as shall be determined by the department of transportation be transferred
by the state treasurer to the Puget Sound ferry operations account in the motor
vehicle fund.

(3) The department may
pledge any moneys in the Puget Sound capital construction account or to be
deposited in that account to guarantee the payment of principal or interest on
bonds issued to refund the outstanding 1955 Washington state ferry system refunding
bonds and the 1957 ferry and Hood Canal bridge revenue bonds.

The department may
further pledge moneys in the Puget Sound capital construction account to meet
any sinking fund requirements or reserves established by the department with
respect to any bond issues provided for in this section.

To the extent of any
pledge authorized in this section, the department shall use the first moneys
available in the Puget Sound capital construction account to meet such
obligations as they arise, and shall maintain a balance of not less than one
million dollars in the account for this purpose.

(4) The treasurer shall
never transfer any moneys from the Puget Sound capital construction account for
use by the department for state ((highway)) transportation
purposes so long as there is due and unpaid any obligations for payment of
principal, interest, sinking funds, or reserves as required by any pledge of
the Puget Sound capital construction account. Whenever the department has
pledged any moneys in the account for the purposes authorized in this section,
the state agrees to continue to deposit in the Puget Sound capital construction
account the motor vehicle fuel taxes and special fuel taxes as provided in RCW
82.36.020 and 82.38.290 and further agrees that, so long as there exists any
outstanding obligations pursuant to such pledge, to continue to impose such
taxes.

(5) Funds in the Puget
Sound capital construction account of the motor vehicle fund that are not
required by the department for payment of principal or interest on bond issues
or for any of the other purposes authorized in this chapter may be invested by
the department in bonds and obligations of the nature eligible for the
investment of current state funds as provided in RCW 43.84.080.

Sec. 33. RCW 47.60.590 and 1977
ex.s. c 360 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Any funds
required to repay the bonds authorized by RCW 47.60.560 or the interest thereon
when due shall be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund which
results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels
and which is distributed to the state for expenditure pursuant to RCW 46.68.130
and shall never constitute a charge against any allocations of such funds to
counties, cities, and towns unless and until the amount of the motor vehicle
fund arising from the excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and
available for state ((highway)) transportation purposes proves
insufficient to meet the requirements for bond retirement or interest on any
such bonds.

Sec. 34. RCW 47.60.806 and 1995 c
274 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

Bonds issued under the
authority of RCW 47.60.800 through 47.60.808 shall distinctly state that they
are a general obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge the full
faith and credit of the state to the payment of the principal thereof and the
interest thereon, and shall contain an unconditional promise to pay such
principal and interest as the same shall become due. The principal and
interest shall be first payable in the manner provided in RCW 47.60.800 through
47.60.808 from the proceeds of the state excise taxes on motor vehicle and
special fuels imposed by chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW and distributed to the
state pursuant to RCW 46.68.130 and shall never constitute a charge against any
allocations of such funds to counties, cities, and towns unless and until the
amount of the motor vehicle fund arising from the excise taxes on motor vehicle
and special fuels and available for state ((highway)) transportation
purposes proves insufficient to meet the requirements for bond retirement or
interest on any such bonds. Proceeds of such excise taxes are hereby pledged
to the payment of any bonds and the interest thereon issued under the authority
of RCW 47.60.800 through 47.60.808, and the legislature agrees to continue to
impose these excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels in amounts
sufficient to pay, when due, the principal and interest on all bonds issued
under the authority of RCW 47.60.800 through 47.60.808.

Sec. 35. RCW 47.61.090 and 1984 c
7 s 339 are each amended to read as follows:

Funds
required to repay the bonds, or the interest thereon when due, shall be taken
from that portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from the imposition
of excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels and which is, or may be appropriated to
the department for state ((highway)) transportation purposes, and
shall never constitute a charge against any allocations of the funds to
counties, cities, and towns unless and until the amount of the motor vehicle
fund arising from the excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels and available for
state ((highway)) transportation purposes proves insufficient to
meet the requirements for bond retirement or interest on the bonds.

Sec. 36. RCW 82.80.070 and 1991 c
141 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The proceeds
collected pursuant to the exercise of the local option authority of RCW
82.80.010, 82.80.020, 82.80.030, and 82.80.050 (hereafter called "local
option transportation revenues") shall be used for transportation purposes
only, including but not limited to the following: The operation and
preservation of roads, streets, and other transportation improvements; new
construction, reconstruction, and expansion of city streets, county roads, and
state highways and other transportation improvements; development and
implementation of public transportation and high-capacity transit improvements
and programs; and planning, design, and acquisition of right of way and sites
for such transportation purposes. The proceeds collected from excise taxes on
the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel under RCW
82.80.010 shall be used exclusively for "((highway)) transportation
purposes" as that term is construed in Article II, section 40 of the state
Constitution.

(2) The local option transportation
revenues shall be expended for transportation uses consistent with the adopted
transportation and land use plans of the jurisdiction expending the funds and
consistent with any applicable and adopted regional transportation plan for
metropolitan planning areas.

(3) Each local
government with a population greater than eight thousand that levies or expends
local option transportation funds, is also required to develop and adopt a
specific transportation program that contains the following elements:

(a) The program shall
identify the geographic boundaries of the entire area or areas within which
local option transportation revenues will be levied and expended.

(b) The program shall
be based on an adopted transportation plan for the geographic areas covered and
shall identify the proposed operation and construction of transportation
improvements and services in the designated plan area intended to be funded in
whole or in part by local option transportation revenues and shall identify the
annual costs applicable to the program.

(c) The program shall
indicate how the local transportation plan is coordinated with applicable
transportation plans for the region and for adjacent jurisdictions.

(d) The program shall
include at least a six-year funding plan, updated annually, identifying the
specific public and private sources and amounts of revenue necessary to fund
the program. The program shall include a proposed schedule for construction of
projects and expenditure of revenues. The funding plan shall consider the
additional local tax revenue estimated to be generated by new development
within the plan area if all or a portion of the additional revenue is proposed
to be earmarked as future appropriations for transportation improvements in the
program.

(4) Local governments
with a population greater than eight thousand exercising the authority for
local option transportation funds shall periodically review and update their
transportation program to ensure that it is consistent with applicable local and
regional transportation and land use plans and within the means of estimated
public and private revenue available.

(5) In the case of
expenditure for new or expanded transportation facilities, improvements, and
services, priorities in the use of local option transportation revenues shall
be identified in the transportation program and expenditures shall be made
based upon the following criteria, which are stated in descending order of
weight to be attributed:

(a) First, the project
serves a multijurisdictional function;

(b) Second, it is
necessitated by existing or reasonably foreseeable congestion;

(c) Third, it has the
greatest person-carrying capacity;

(d) Fourth, it is
partially funded by other government funds, such as from the state transportation
improvement board, or by private sector contributions, such as those from the
local transportation act, chapter 39.92 RCW; and

(e) Fifth, it meets
such other criteria as the local government determines is appropriate.

(6) It is the intent of
the legislature that as a condition of levying, receiving, and expending local
option transportation revenues, no local government agency use the revenues to
replace, divert, or loan any revenues currently being used for transportation
purposes to nontransportation purposes. The association of Washington cities
and the Washington state association of counties, in consultation with the
legislative transportation committee, shall study the issue of nondiversion and
make recommendations to the legislative transportation committee for language
implementing the intent of this section by December 1, 1990.

(7) Local governments
are encouraged to enter into interlocal agreements to jointly develop and adopt
with other local governments the transportation programs required by this
section for the purpose of accomplishing regional transportation planning and development.

(8) Local governments
may use all or a part of the local option transportation revenues for the
amortization of local government general obligation and revenue bonds issued
for transportation purposes consistent with the requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
37. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 38. This act takes effect if
the proposed amendment to Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution
providing for motor vehicle funds to be used for transportation purposes is
approved and ratified by the voters at the next general election and certified
by the secretary of state. If the proposed amendment is not approved,
ratified, and certified, this act is void in its entirety.

---
END ---