BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.515 and 2001 c
104 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
motorcycle endorsement examination must emphasize maneuvers necessary for
on-street operation, including emergency braking and turning as may be required
to avoid an impending collision. The department may waive all or part of the
examination for persons who satisfactorily complete the voluntary motorcycle
operator training and education program authorized under RCW 46.20.520 or
who satisfactorily complete a private motorcycle skills education course that
has been certified by the department under RCW 46.81A.020.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.81A.020 and 1998
c 245 s 91 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
administer and enforce the law pertaining to the motorcycle skills education
program as set forth in this chapter.

(2) The director may
adopt and enforce reasonable rules that are consistent with this chapter.

(3) The director shall
revise the Washington motorcycle safety program to:

(a) Institute a
motorcycle skills education course for both novice and advanced motorcycle
riders that is a minimum of eight hours and no more than sixteen hours at a
cost of (i) no more than fifty dollars for Washington state residents
under the age of eighteen, and (ii) no more than one hundred dollars for
Washington state residents who are eighteen years of age or older and military
personnel of any age stationed in Washington state;

(b) Encourage the use
of loaned or used motorcycles for use in the motorcycle skills education course
if the instructor approves them;

(c) Require all
instructors to conduct at least three classes in a one-year period to maintain
their teaching eligibility;

(d) Encourage the use
of radio or intercom equipped helmets when, in the opinion of the instructor,
radio or intercom equipped helmets improve the quality of instruction.

(4) The department
may enter into agreements to review and certify that a private motorcycle
skills education course meets educational standards equivalent to those
required of courses conducted under the motorcycle skills education program.
An agreement entered into under this subsection must provide that the
department may conduct periodic audits to ensure that educational standards
continue to meet those required for courses conducted under the motorcycle
skills education program, and that the costs of the review, certification, and
audit process will be borne by the party seeking certification.

(5)
The department shall obtain and compile information from applicants for a
motorcycle endorsement regarding whether they have completed a state approved or
certified motorcycle skills education course.

---
END ---