BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.04.320 and 1961 c
12 s 46.04.320 are each amended to read as follows:

"Motor
vehicle" ((shall)) means every vehicle which is
self-propelled and every vehicle which is propelled by electric power obtained
from overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails. "Motor
vehicle" includes a neighborhood electric vehicle as defined in section 2
of this act and operated pursuant to section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Neighborhood
electric vehicle" means a self-propelled, electrically powered
four-wheeled motor vehicle whose speed attainable in one mile is more than
twenty miles per hour and not more than twenty-five miles per hour and conforms
to federal regulations under Title 49 C.F.R. Part 571.500.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Absent prohibition
by local authorities authorized under this section and except as prohibited
elsewhere in this section, a person may operate a neighborhood electric vehicle
upon a highway of this state having a speed limit of thirty-five miles per hour
or less as long as:

(a) A person does not
operate a neighborhood electric vehicle upon streets and highways which are
parts of the state highway system which are subject to the provisions of Title
47 RCW;

(b) A person does not
operate a neighborhood electric vehicle upon a highway of this state without
first having obtained and having in full force and effect a current and proper
vehicle license and displays vehicle license number plates in compliance with
chapter 46.16 RCW;

(c) A person does not
operate a neighborhood electric vehicle upon a highway of this state without
first obtaining a valid driver's license issued to Washington residents in
compliance with chapter 46.20 RCW;

(d) A person does not
operate a neighborhood electric vehicle subject to registration under chapter
46.16 RCW on a highway of this state unless the person is insured under a motor
vehicle liability policy in compliance with chapter 46.30 RCW;

(e) A person operating
a neighborhood electric vehicle does not cross a roadway with a speed limit in
excess of thirty-five miles per hour, unless the crossing begins and ends on a
roadway with a speed limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less and occurs at
an intersection of approximately ninety degrees, except that the operator of a
neighborhood electric vehicle must not cross an uncontrolled intersection of
streets and highways which are part of the state highway system subject to the
provisions of Title 47 RCW unless that intersection has been authorized by
local authorities provided elsewhere in this section.

(2) Any person who
violates this section commits a traffic infraction.

(3) The provisions of
this section do not prevent local authorities, with respect to streets and
highways under their jurisdiction and within the reasonable exercise of their
police power, from regulating the operation of neighborhood electric vehicles
on streets and highways under their jurisdiction by resolution or ordinance of
the governing body, if the regulation is consistent with the provisions of this
title, except that:

(a) Local authorities
may not authorize the operation of neighborhood electric vehicles on streets
and highways which are part of the state highway system subject to the
provisions of Title 47 RCW;

(b) Local authorities
may not prohibit the operation of neighborhood electric vehicles upon highways
of this state having a speed limit of twenty-five miles per hour or less;

(c) Local authorities
are prohibited from establishing any requirements for the registration and
licensing of neighborhood electric vehicles.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003.

---
END ---