BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.95.420 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 306 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as
provided in (c) of this subsection, before the expiration of the minimum
term, as part of the end of sentence review process under RCW 72.09.340,
72.09.345, and where appropriate, 72.09.370, the department shall conduct, and
the offender shall participate in, an examination of the offender,
incorporating methodologies that are recognized by experts in the prediction of
sexual dangerousness, and including a prediction of the probability that the
offender will engage in sex offenses if released.

(b) The board may
contract for an additional, independent examination, subject to the standards
in this section.

(c) If at the time
the sentence is imposed by the superior court the offender's minimum term has
expired or will expire within one hundred twenty days of the sentencing
hearing, the department shall conduct, within ninety days of the offender's
arrival at a department of corrections facility, and the offender shall participate
in, an examination of the offender, incorporating methodologies that are
recognized by experts in the prediction of sexual dangerousness, and including
a prediction of the probability that the offender will engage in sex offenses
if released.

(2) The board shall
impose the conditions and instructions provided for in RCW 9.94A.720. The
board shall consider the department's recommendations and may impose conditions
in addition to those recommended by the department. The board may impose or
modify conditions of community custody following notice to the offender.

(3)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, no later than ninety days before
expiration of the minimum term, but after the board receives the results from
the end of sentence review process and the recommendations for additional or
modified conditions of community custody from the department, the board shall
conduct a hearing to determine whether it is more likely than not that the
offender will engage in sex offenses if released on conditions to be set by the
board. The board may consider an offender's failure to participate in an
evaluation under subsection (1) of this section in determining whether to
release the offender. The board shall order the offender released, under such
affirmative and other conditions as the board determines appropriate, unless
the board determines by a preponderance of the evidence that, despite such
conditions, it is more likely than not that the offender will commit sex
offenses if released. If the board does not order the offender released, the
board shall establish a new minimum term, not to exceed an additional two
years.

(b) If at the time
the offender's minimum term has expired or will expire within one hundred
twenty days of the offender's arrival at a department of correction's facility,
then no later than one hundred twenty days after the offender's arrival at a
department of corrections facility, but after the board receives the results
from the end of sentence review process and the recommendations for additional
or modified conditions of community custody from the department, the board
shall conduct a hearing to determine whether it is more likely than not that
the offender will engage in sex offenses if released on conditions to be set by
the board. The board may consider an offender's failure to participate in an
evaluation under subsection (1) of this section in determining whether to
release the offender. The board shall order the offender released, under such
affirmative and other conditions as the board determines appropriate, unless
the board determines by a preponderance of the evidence that, despite such
conditions, it is more likely than not that the offender will commit sex
offenses if released. If the board does not order the offender released, the
board shall establish a new minimum term, not to exceed an additional two
years.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.95.011 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 320 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When the court
commits a convicted person to the department of corrections on or after July 1,
1986, for an offense committed before July 1, 1984, the court shall, at the
time of sentencing or revocation of probation, fix the minimum term. The term so
fixed shall not exceed the maximum sentence provided by law for the offense of
which the person is convicted.

The court shall attempt
to set the minimum term reasonably consistent with the purposes, standards, and
sentencing ranges adopted under RCW 9.94A.850, but the court is subject to the
same limitations as those placed on the board under RCW 9.92.090, 9.95.040 (1)
through (4), 9.95.115, 9A.32.040, 9A.44.045, and chapter 69.50 RCW. The
court's minimum term decision is subject to review to the same extent as a
minimum term decision by the parole board before July 1, 1986.

Thereafter, the
expiration of the minimum term set by the court minus any time credits earned
under RCW 9.95.070 and 9.95.110 constitutes the parole eligibility review date,
at which time the board may consider the convicted person for parole under RCW
9.95.100 and 9.95.110 and chapter 72.04A RCW. Nothing in this section affects
the board's authority to reduce or increase the minimum term, once set by the
court, under RCW 9.95.040, 9.95.052, 9.95.055, 9.95.070, 9.95.080, 9.95.100,
9.95.115, 9.95.125, or 9.95.047.

(2)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, not less than ninety days prior to the
expiration of the minimum term of a person sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712, for a
sex offense committed on or after ((July)) September 1, 2001,
less any time credits permitted by statute, the board shall review the person
for conditional release to community custody as provided in RCW 9.95.420. If
the board does not release the person, it shall set a new minimum term not to
exceed an additional two years. The board shall review the person again not
less than ninety days prior to the expiration of the new minimum term.

(b) If
at the time a person sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712 for a sex offense committed
on or after September 1, 2001, arrives at a department of corrections facility,
the offender's minimum term has expired or will expire within one hundred
twenty days of the offender's arrival, then no later than one hundred twenty
days after the offender's arrival at a department of corrections facility, but
after the board receives the results from the end of sentence review process
and the recommendations for additional or modified conditions of community
custody from the department, the board shall review the person for conditional
release to community custody as provided in RCW 9.95.420. If the board does
not release the person, it shall set a new minimum term not to exceed an
additional two years. The board shall review the person again not less than
ninety days prior to the expiration of the new minimum term.

---
END ---