BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

A person subject to
court order under the provisions of this chapter who is thereafter convicted of
a criminal offense remains under the jurisdiction of the department following:
(1) Completion of the criminal sentence; or (2) release from confinement in a
state or local correctional facility, and shall be returned to the custody of
the department.

This
section does not apply to persons subject to a court order under the provisions
of this chapter who are thereafter sentenced to life without the possibility of
release.

--- END ---