BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.09.020 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(2) "Less
restrictive alternative" means court‑ordered treatment in a setting
less restrictive than total confinement which satisfies the conditions set
forth in RCW 71.09.092.

(3) "Likely to
engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not confined in a secure
facility" means that the person more probably than not will engage in such
acts if released unconditionally from detention on the sexually violent predator
petition. Such likelihood must be evidenced by a recent overt act if the
person is not totally confined at the time the petition is filed under RCW
71.09.030.

(4) "Mental
abnormality" means a congenital or acquired condition affecting the
emotional or volitional capacity which predisposes the person to the commission
of criminal sexual acts in a degree constituting such person a menace to the
health and safety of others.

(5)
"Predatory" means acts directed towards: (a) Strangers; (b)
individuals with whom a relationship has been established or promoted for the
primary purpose of victimization; or (c) persons of casual acquaintance with
whom no substantial personal relationship exists.

(6) "Recent overt
act" means any act or threat that has either caused harm of a sexually
violent nature or creates a reasonable apprehension of such harm in the mind of
an objective person who knows of the history and mental condition of the person
engaging in the act.

(7) "Risk
potential activity" or "risk potential facility" means an
activity or facility that provides a higher incidence of risk to the public
from persons conditionally released from the special commitment center. Risk
potential activities and facilities include: Public and private schools, school
bus stops, licensed day care and licensed preschool facilities, public parks,
publicly dedicated trails, sports fields, playgrounds, recreational and
community centers, churches, synagogues, temples, mosques, and public
libraries.

(8)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services or the
secretary's designee.

(9) "Secure
facility" means a residential facility for persons civilly confined under
the provisions of this chapter that includes security measures sufficient to
protect the community. Such facilities include total confinement facilities,
secure community transition facilities, and any residence used as a
court-ordered placement under RCW 71.09.096.

(10) "Secure
community transition facility" means a residential facility for persons
civilly committed and conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative
under this chapter. A secure community transition facility has supervision and
security, and either provides or ensures the provision of sex offender
treatment services. Secure community transition facilities include but are not
limited to the ((facilities)) facility established pursuant to
RCW 71.09.250(1)(a)(i) and any community‑based facilities
established under this chapter and operated by the secretary or under contract
with the secretary.

(11) "Sexually
violent offense" means an act committed on, before, or after July 1, 1990,
that is: (a) An act defined in Title 9A RCW as rape in the first degree, rape
in the second degree by forcible compulsion, rape of a child in the first or
second degree, statutory rape in the first or second degree, indecent liberties
by forcible compulsion, indecent liberties against a child under age fourteen,
incest against a child under age fourteen, or child molestation in the first or
second degree; (b) a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1,
1990, that is comparable to a sexually violent offense as defined in (a) of
this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for a felony offense
that under the laws of this state would be a sexually violent offense as
defined in this subsection; (c) an act of murder in the first or second degree,
assault in the first or second degree, assault of a child in the first or
second degree, kidnapping in the first or second degree, burglary in the first
degree, residential burglary, or unlawful imprisonment, which act, either at
the time of sentencing for the offense or subsequently during civil commitment
proceedings pursuant to this chapter, has been determined beyond a reasonable
doubt to have been sexually motivated, as that term is defined in RCW
9.94A.030; or (d) an act as described in chapter 9A.28 RCW, that is an attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of the felonies
designated in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection.

(12) "Sexually
violent predator" means any person who has been convicted of or charged
with a crime of sexual violence and who suffers from a mental abnormality or
personality disorder which makes the person likely to engage in predatory acts of
sexual violence if not confined in a secure facility.

(13) "Total
confinement facility" means a secure facility that provides
supervision and sex offender treatment services in a total confinement
setting. Total confinement facilities include the special commitment center
and any similar facility designated as a ((secure)) total confinement
facility by the secretary.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.09.250 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The secretary is
authorized to site, construct, occupy, and operate (i) a secure
community transition facility on McNeil Island for persons authorized to
petition for a less restrictive alternative under RCW 71.09.090(1) and who are
conditionally released; and (ii) a special commitment center on
McNeil Island with up to four hundred four beds as a total confinement facility
under this chapter, subject to appropriated funding for those purposes. The
secure community transition facility shall be authorized for the number of beds
needed to ensure compliance with the orders of the superior courts under this
chapter and the federal district court for the western district of Washington.
The total number of beds in the secure community transition facility shall
be limited to twenty-four, consisting of up to fifteen transitional beds ((shall
be limited to fifteen)) and up to nine pretransitional beds. The
residents occupying ((these)) the transitional beds shall be the
only residents eligible for transitional services occurring in Pierce county.
In no event shall more than fifteen residents of the secure community transition
facility be participating in off-island transitional, educational, or
employment activity at the same time in Pierce county. The department shall
provide the Pierce county sheriff, or his or her designee, with a list of the
fifteen residents so designated, along with their photographs and physical
descriptions, and ((it)) the list shall be immediately updated
whenever a residential change occurs. The Pierce county sheriff, or his or her
designee, shall be provided an opportunity to confirm the residential status of
each resident leaving McNeil Island.

(b) For purposes of
this subsection, "transitional beds" means beds only for residents ((in
halfway house status)) who are judged by a qualified expert to be suitable
to leave the island for treatment, education, and employment.

(2)(a) The secretary is
authorized to site, either within the secure community transition facility
established pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section, or within
the special commitment center, up to nine pretransitional beds.

(b) Residents assigned
to pretransitional beds shall not be permitted to leave McNeil Island for
education, employment, treatment, or community activities in Pierce county.

(c) For purposes of
this subsection, "pretransitional beds" means beds for residents
whose progress toward a less secure residential environment and transition into
more complete community involvement is projected to take substantially longer
than a typical resident of the special commitment center.

(3) Notwithstanding RCW
36.70A.103 or any other law, this statute preempts and supersedes local plans,
development regulations, permitting requirements, inspection requirements, and
all other laws as necessary to enable the secretary to site, construct, occupy,
and operate a secure community transition facility on McNeil Island and a total
confinement facility on McNeil Island.

(4) To the greatest
extent possible, until June 30, 2003, persons who were not civilly committed
from the county in which the secure community transition facility established
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is located may not be conditionally
released to a setting in that same county less restrictive than that facility.

(5) As of June 26,
2001, the state shall immediately cease any efforts in effect on such date to
site secure community transition facilities, other than the facility authorized
by subsection (1) of this section, and shall instead site such facilities in
accordance with the provisions of this section.

(6) The department
must:

(a) Identify the
minimum and maximum number of secure community transition facility beds in
addition to the facility established under subsection (1) of this section that
may be necessary for the period of May 2004 through May 2007 and provide notice
of these numbers to all counties by August 31, 2001;

(b) ((In
consultation with the joint select committee established in section 225,
chapter 12, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.,)) Develop and publish policy
guidelines for the siting and operation of secure community transition
facilities ((by October 1, 2001)); and

(c) Provide a status
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2002, on
the development of facilities under the incentive program established in RCW
71.09.255. The report shall include a projection of the anticipated number of
secure community transition facility beds that will become operational between
May 2004 and May 2007. If it appears that an insufficient number of beds will
be operational, the department's report shall recommend a progression of
methods to facilitate siting in counties and cities including, if necessary,
preemption of local land use planning process and other laws.

(7)(a) The total number
of secure community transition facility beds that may be required to be sited
in a county between June 26, 2001, and June 30, 2008, may be no greater than
the total number of persons civilly committed from that county, or detained at
the special commitment center under a pending civil commitment petition from
that county where a finding of probable cause had been made on April 1, 2001.
The total number of secure community transition facility beds required to be
sited in each county between July 1, 2008, and June 30, 2015, may be no greater
than the total number of persons civilly committed from that county or detained
at the special commitment center under a pending civil commitment petition from
that county where a finding of probable cause had been made as of July 1, 2008.

(b) Counties and cities
that provide secure community transition facility beds above the maximum number
that they could be required to site under this subsection are eligible for a
bonus grant under the incentive provisions in RCW 71.09.255. The county where
the special commitment center is located shall receive this bonus grant for the
number of beds in the facility established in subsection (1) of this section in
excess of the maximum number established by this subsection.

(c) No secure community
transition facilities in addition to the one established in subsection (1) of
this section may be required to be sited in the county where the special
commitment center is located until after June 30, 2008, provided however, that
the county and its cities may elect to site additional secure community transition
facilities and shall be eligible under the incentive provisions of RCW
71.09.255 for any additional facilities meeting the requirements of that
section.

(8) In identifying
potential sites within a county for the location of a secure community transition
facility, the department shall work with and assist local governments to
provide for the equitable distribution of such facilities. In coordinating and
deciding upon the siting of secure community transition facilities, great
weight shall be given by the county and cities within the county to:

(a) The number and
location of existing residential facility beds operated by the department of
corrections or the mental health division of the department of social and
health services in each jurisdiction in the county; and

(b) The number of
registered sex offenders classified as level II or level III and the number of
sex offenders registered as homeless residing in each jurisdiction in the
county.

(9)(a) "Equitable
distribution" means siting or locating secure community transition
facilities in a manner that will not cause a disproportionate grouping of
similar facilities either in any one county, or in any one jurisdiction or
community within a county, as relevant; and

(b)
"Jurisdiction" means a city, town, or geographic area of a county in
which ((district)) distinct political or judicial authority may
be exercised.

Sec. 3. RCW 71.09.255 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon receiving the
notification required by RCW 71.09.250, counties must promptly notify the
cities within the county of the maximum number of secure community transition
facility beds that may be required and the projected number of beds to be needed
in that county.

(2) The incentive
grants provided under this section are subject to the following provisions:

(a) Counties and the
cities within the county must notify each other of siting plans to promote the
establishment and equitable distribution of secure community transition
facilities;

(b) Development
regulations, ordinances, plans, laws, and criteria established for siting must
be consistent with statutory requirements and ((rules)) policies
applicable to siting and operating secure community transition facilities;

(c) The minimum size
for any facility is three beds; and

(d) The department must
approve any sites selected.

(3) Any county or city
that makes a commitment to initiate the process to site one or more secure
community transition facilities by February 1, 2002, shall receive a planning
grant as proposed and approved by the department of community, trade, and
economic development.

(4) Any county or city
that has issued all necessary permits by May 1, 2003, for one or more secure
community transition facilities that comply with the requirements of this
section shall receive an incentive grant in the amount of fifty thousand
dollars for each bed sited.

(5) To encourage the
rapid permitting of sites, any county or city that has issued all necessary
permits by January 1, 2003, for one or more secure community transition
facilities that comply with the requirements of this section shall receive a
bonus in the amount of twenty percent of the amount provided under subsection
(4) of this section.

(6) Any county or city
that establishes secure community transition facility beds in excess of the
maximum number that could be required to be sited in that county shall receive
a bonus payment of one hundred thousand dollars for each bed established in
excess of the maximum requirement.

(7) No payment shall be
made under subsection (4), (5), or (6) of this section until all necessary
permits have been issued.

Sec. 4. RCW 71.09.265 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall make reasonable efforts to distribute the impact of the employment,
education, and social services needs of the residents of the secure community
transition facility established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250(1)(a)(i) among
the adjoining counties and not to concentrate the residents' use of resources
in any one community. The department's efforts to distribute the impact is
limited to locations within a reasonable commute.

(2) The department
shall develop policies to ensure that, to the extent possible, placement of
persons eligible in the future for conditional release to a setting less
restrictive than the facility established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250(1)(a)(i)
will be equitably distributed among the counties and within jurisdictions in
the county.

Sec. 5. RCW 71.09.275 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 211 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((By August 1,
2001, the department must provide the appropriate committees of the legislature
with a transportation plan to address the issues of coordinating the movement
of residents of the secure community transition facility established pursuant
to RCW 71.09.250(1) between McNeil Island and the mainland with the movement of
others who must use the same docks or equipment within the funds appropriated
for this purpose.

(2))) If the department does not provide a separate
vessel for transporting residents of the secure community transition facility
established in RCW 71.09.250(1) between McNeil Island and the mainland, the ((plan))
department shall ((include at least the following components)):

(a) ((The)) Separate
residents ((shall be separated)) from minors and vulnerable adults,
except vulnerable adults who have been found to be sexually violent predators.

(b) ((The)) Not
transport residents ((shall not be transported)) during times when
children are normally coming to and from the mainland for school.

(((3))) (2)
The department shall designate a separate waiting area at the points of debarkation,
and residents shall be required to remain in this area while awaiting
transportation.

(((4))) (3)
The department shall provide law enforcement agencies in the counties and
cities in which residents of the secure community transition facility
established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250(1)(a)(i) regularly participate in
employment, education, or social services, or through which these persons are
regularly transported, with a copy of the court's order of conditional release
with respect to these persons.

Sec. 6. RCW 71.09.290 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 214 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary shall
establish policy guidelines for the siting of secure community transition
facilities, other than the secure community transition facility established
pursuant to RCW 71.09.250(1)(a)(i), which shall include at least the
following minimum requirements:

(1) The following
criteria must be considered prior to any real property being listed for
consideration for the location of or use as a secure community transition
facility:

(a) The proximity and
response time criteria established under RCW 71.09.285;

(b) The site or
building is available for lease for the anticipated use period or for purchase;

(c) Security monitoring
services and appropriate back-up systems are available and reliable;

(d) Appropriate mental
health and sex offender treatment providers must be available within a
reasonable commute; and

(e) Appropriate
permitting for a secure community transition facility must be possible under
the zoning code of the local jurisdiction.

(2) For sites which
meet the criteria of subsection (1) of this section, the department shall
analyze and compare the criteria in subsections (3) through (5) of this section
using the method established in RCW 71.09.285.

(3) Public safety and
security criteria shall include at least the following:

(a) Whether limited
visibility between the facility and adjacent properties can be achieved prior
to placement of any person;

(b) The distance from,
and number of, risk potential activities and facilities, as measured using the
((rules)) policies adopted under RCW 71.09.285;

(c) The existence of or
ability to establish barriers between the site and the risk potential
facilities and activities;

(d) Suitability of the
buildings to be used for the secure community transition facility with regard
to existing or feasibly modified features; and

(e) The availability of
electronic monitoring that allows a resident's location to be determined with
specificity.

(4) Site
characteristics criteria shall include at least the following:

(a) Reasonableness of
rental, lease, or sale terms including length and renewability of a lease or
rental agreement;

(b) Traffic and access
patterns associated with the real property;

(c) Feasibility of
complying with zoning requirements within the necessary time frame; and

(d) A contractor or
contractors are available to install, monitor, and repair the necessary
security and alarm systems.

(5) Program
characteristics criteria shall include at least the following:

(a) Reasonable proximity
to available medical, mental health, sex offender, and chemical dependency
treatment providers and facilities;

(b) Suitability of the
location for programming, staffing, and support considerations;

(c) Proximity to
employment, educational, vocational, and other treatment plan components.

(6) For purposes of
this section "available" or "availability" of qualified
treatment providers includes provider qualifications and willingness to provide
services, average commute time, and cost of services.

Sec. 7. RCW 71.09.300 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 216 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) Secure
community transition facilities shall meet the following minimum staffing
requirements:

(((a))) (1)
At any time the census of a facility is six or fewer residents, the facility
shall maintain a minimum staffing ratio of one staff per resident during normal
waking hours and two awake staff per three residents during normal sleeping
hours.

(((b))) (2)
At any time the census of a facility is six or fewer residents, all staff shall
be classified as residential rehabilitation counselor II or have a
classification that indicates ((a)) an equivalent or higher level
of skill, experience, and training.

(((c))) (3)
Before being assigned to a facility, all staff shall have training in sex
offender issues, self-defense, and crisis de-escalation skills in addition to
departmental orientation and, as appropriate, management training. All staff
with resident treatment or care duties must participate in ongoing in-service
training.

(((d))) (4)
All staff must pass a departmental background check and the check is not
subject to the limitations in chapter 9.96A RCW. A person who has been
convicted of a felony, or any sex offense, may not be employed at the secure
community transition facility or be approved as an escort for a resident of the
facility.

(((2) With respect
to the facility established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250(1), the department shall,
no later than December 1, 2001, provide a staffing plan to the appropriate
committees of the legislature that will cover the growth of that facility to
its full capacity.))

Sec. 8. RCW 71.09.325 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 221 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall
adopt a violation reporting policy for persons conditionally released to less
restrictive alternative placements. The policy shall require written
documentation by the department and service providers of all violations of
conditions set by the department, the department of corrections, or the court
and establish criteria for returning a violator to the special commitment
center or a secure community transition facility with a higher degree of
security. Any conditionally released person who commits a serious violation of
conditions shall be returned to the special commitment center, unless arrested
by a law enforcement officer, and the court shall be notified immediately and
shall initiate proceedings under RCW 71.09.098 to revoke or modify the less
restrictive alternative placement. Nothing in this section limits the
authority of the department to return a person to the special commitment center
based on a violation that is not a serious violation as defined in this
section. For the purposes of this section, "serious violation"
includes but is not limited to:

(a) The commission of
any criminal offense;

(b) Any unlawful use or
possession of a controlled substance; and

(c) Any violation of
conditions targeted to address the person's documented pattern of offense that
increases the risk to public safety.

(2) When a person is
conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative under this chapter and
is under the supervision of the department of corrections, notice of any
violation of the person's conditions of release must also be made to the
department of corrections.

(3) Whenever the
secretary contracts with a service provider to operate a secure community
transition facility, the contract shall include a requirement that the service
provider must report to the department ((of social and health services))
any known violation of conditions committed by any resident of the secure
community transition facility.

(4) The secretary shall
document in writing all violations, penalties, actions by the department ((of
social and health services)) to remove persons from a secure community
transition facility, and contract terminations. The secretary shall compile
this information and submit it to the appropriate committees of the legislature
on an annual basis. The secretary shall give great weight to a service
provider's record of violations, penalties, actions by the department ((of
social and health services)) or the department of corrections to remove
persons from a secure community transition facility, and contract terminations
in determining whether to execute, renew, or renegotiate a contract with a
service provider.

Sec. 9. RCW 9.95.011 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 320 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When the court
commits a convicted person to the department of corrections on or after July 1,
1986, for an offense committed before July 1, 1984, the court shall, at the
time of sentencing or revocation of probation, fix the minimum term. The term
so fixed shall not exceed the maximum sentence provided by law for the offense
of which the person is convicted.

The court shall attempt
to set the minimum term reasonably consistent with the purposes, standards, and
sentencing ranges adopted under RCW 9.94A.850, but the court is subject to the
same limitations as those placed on the board under RCW 9.92.090, 9.95.040 (1)
through (4), 9.95.115, 9A.32.040, 9A.44.045, and chapter 69.50 RCW. The
court's minimum term decision is subject to review to the same extent as a
minimum term decision by the parole board before July 1, 1986.

Thereafter, the
expiration of the minimum term set by the court minus any time credits earned
under RCW 9.95.070 and 9.95.110 constitutes the parole eligibility review date,
at which time the board may consider the convicted person for parole under RCW
9.95.100 and 9.95.110 and chapter 72.04A RCW. Nothing in this section affects
the board's authority to reduce or increase the minimum term, once set by the
court, under RCW 9.95.040, 9.95.052, 9.95.055, 9.95.070, 9.95.080, 9.95.100,
9.95.115, 9.95.125, or 9.95.047.

(2) Not less than
ninety days prior to the expiration of the minimum term of a person sentenced
under RCW 9.94A.712, for a sex offense committed on or after ((July)) September
1, 2001, less any time credits permitted by statute, the board shall review the
person for conditional release to community custody as provided in RCW
9.95.420. If the board does not release the person, it shall set a new minimum
term not to exceed an additional two years. The board shall review the person
again not less than ninety days prior to the expiration of the new minimum
term.

Sec. 10. RCW 9.95.017 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 321 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall
cause to be prepared criteria for duration of confinement, release on parole,
and length of parole for persons committed to prison for crimes committed
before July 1, 1984.

The proposed criteria
should take into consideration RCW 9.95.009(2). Before submission to the
governor, the board shall solicit comments and review on their proposed
criteria for parole release. ((These proposed criteria shall be submitted
for consideration by the 1987 legislature.))

(2) Persons committed
to the department of corrections and who are under the authority of the board
for crimes committed on or after ((July)) September 1, 2001, are
subject to the provisions for duration of confinement, release to community
custody, and length of community custody established in RCW 9.94A.712,
9.94A.713, 72.09.335, and 9.95.420 through 9.95.440.

Sec. 11. RCW 9.95.055 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 325 are each amended to read as follows:

The indeterminate
sentence review board is hereby granted authority, in the event of a
declaration by the governor that a war emergency exists, including a general
mobilization, and for the duration thereof only, to reduce downward the minimum
term, as set by the board, of any inmate under the jurisdiction of the board
confined in a state correctional facility, who will be accepted by and inducted
into the armed services: PROVIDED, That a reduction downward shall not be made
under this section for those inmates who: (1) Are confined for (a)
treason, (b) murder in the first degree, or ((carnal knowledge
of a female child under ten years: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That no such inmate
shall be released under this section who is)) (c) rape of a child in the
first degree where the victim is under ten years of age or an equivalent
offense under prior law; (2) are being considered for civil commitment as a
sexually violent predator under chapter 71.09 RCW; or ((was)) (3)
were sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712 for a crime committed on or after ((July))
September 1, 2001.

Sec. 12. RCW 9.95.070 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 327 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every prisoner,
convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984, who has a favorable record
of conduct at ((the penitentiary or the reformatory)) a state
correctional institution, and who performs in a faithful, diligent,
industrious, orderly and peaceable manner the work, duties, and tasks assigned
to him or her to the satisfaction of the superintendent of the ((penitentiary
or reformatory)) institution, and in whose behalf the superintendent
of the ((penitentiary or reformatory)) institution files a report
certifying that his or her conduct and work have been meritorious and
recommending allowance of time credits to him or her, shall upon, but not
until, the adoption of such recommendation by the indeterminate sentence review
board, be allowed time credit reductions from the term of imprisonment fixed by
the board.

(2) Offenders sentenced
under RCW 9.94A.712 for a crime committed on or after ((July)) September
1, 2001, are subject to the earned release provisions for sex offenders
established in RCW 9.94A.728.

Sec. 13. RCW 9.95.110 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 331 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board may
permit an offender convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984, to leave
the buildings and enclosures of a state correctional institution on parole,
after such convicted person has served the period of confinement fixed for him
or her by the board, less time credits for good behavior and diligence in
work: PROVIDED, That in no case shall an inmate be credited with more than
one-third of his or her sentence as fixed by the board.

The board may establish
rules and regulations under which an offender may be allowed to leave the
confines of a state correctional institution on parole, and may return such
person to the confines of the institution from which he or she was paroled, at
its discretion.

(2) The board may
permit an offender convicted of a crime committed on or after ((July)) September
1, 2001, and sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712, to leave a state correctional
institution on community custody according to the provisions of RCW 9.94A.712,
9.94A.713, 72.09.335, and 9.95.420 through 9.95.440. The person may be
returned to the institution following a violation of his or her conditions of
release to community custody pursuant to the hearing provisions of RCW
9.95.435.

Sec. 14. RCW 9.95.120 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 333 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever the board or a
community corrections officer of this state has reason to believe a person
convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984, has breached a condition of
his or her parole or violated the law of any state where he or she may then be
or the rules and regulations of the board, any community corrections officer of
this state may arrest or cause the arrest and detention and suspension of
parole of such convicted person pending a determination by the board whether
the parole of such convicted person shall be revoked. All facts and
circumstances surrounding the violation by such convicted person shall be
reported to the board by the community corrections officer, with
recommendations. The board, after consultation with the secretary of
corrections, shall make all rules and regulations concerning procedural matters,
which shall include the time when state community corrections officers shall
file with the board reports required by this section, procedures pertaining
thereto and the filing of such information as may be necessary to enable the
board to perform its functions under this section. On the basis of the report
by the community corrections officer, or at any time upon its own discretion,
the board may revise or modify the conditions of parole or order the suspension
of parole by the issuance of a written order bearing its seal, which order
shall be sufficient warrant for all peace officers to take into custody any
convicted person who may be on parole and retain such person in their custody
until arrangements can be made by the board for his or her return to a state
correctional institution for convicted felons. Any such revision or
modification of the conditions of parole or the order suspending parole shall
be personally served upon the parolee.

Any parolee arrested
and detained in physical custody by the authority of a state community
corrections officer, or upon the written order of the board, shall not be
released from custody on bail or personal recognizance, except upon approval of
the board and the issuance by the board of an order of reinstatement on parole
on the same or modified conditions of parole.

All chiefs of police,
marshals of cities and towns, sheriffs of counties, and all police, prison, and
peace officers and constables shall execute any such order in the same manner
as any ordinary criminal process.

Whenever a paroled
prisoner is accused of a violation of his or her parole, other than the
commission of, and conviction for, a felony or misdemeanor under the laws of
this state or the laws of any state where he or she may then be, he or she
shall be entitled to a fair and impartial hearing of such charges within thirty
days from the time that he or she is served with charges of the violation of
conditions of parole after his or her arrest and detention. The hearing shall
be held before one or more members of the board at a place or places, within
this state, reasonably near the site of the alleged violation or violations of
parole.

In the event that the
board suspends a parole by reason of an alleged parole violation or in the
event that a parole is suspended pending the disposition of a new criminal
charge, the board shall have the power to nullify the order of suspension and
reinstate the individual to parole under previous conditions or any new
conditions that the board may determine advisable. Before the board shall
nullify an order of suspension and reinstate a parole they shall have
determined that the best interests of society and the individual shall best be
served by such reinstatement rather than a return to a ((penal)) correctional
institution.

Sec. 15. RCW 9.95.435 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 309 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If an offender
released by the board under RCW 9.95.420 violates any condition or requirement
of community custody, the board may transfer the offender to a more restrictive
confinement status to serve up to the remaining portion of the sentence, less
credit for any period actually spent in community custody or in detention
awaiting disposition of an alleged violation and subject to the limitations of
subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Following the
hearing specified in subsection (3) of this section, the board may impose
sanctions such as work release, home detention with electronic monitoring, work
crew, community service, inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew,
educational or counseling sessions, supervision enhanced through electronic
monitoring, or any other sanctions available in the community, or may suspend
or revoke the release to community custody whenever an offender released by the
board under RCW 9.95.420 violates any condition or requirement of community
custody.

(3) If an offender
released by the board under RCW 9.95.420 is accused of violating any condition
or requirement of community custody, he or she is entitled to a hearing before
the board or its designee prior to the imposition of sanctions. The
hearing shall be considered as offender disciplinary proceedings and shall not
be subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall develop hearing procedures
and a structure of graduated sanctions consistent with the hearing procedures
and graduated sanctions developed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.737. The board may
suspend the offender's release to community custody and confine the offender in
a correctional institution owned, operated by, or operated under contract with
the state prior to the hearing unless the offender has been arrested and
confined for a new criminal offense.

(4) The hearing
procedures required under subsection (3) of this section shall be developed by
rule and include the following:

(a) Hearings shall be
conducted by members of the board unless the board enters into an agreement
with the department to use the hearing officers established under RCW
9.94A.737;

(b) The board shall
provide the offender with written notice of the violation, the evidence relied
upon, and the reasons the particular sanction was imposed. The notice shall
include a statement of the rights specified in this subsection, and the
offender's right to file a personal restraint petition under court rules after
the final decision of the board;

(c) The hearing shall
be held unless waived by the offender, and shall be electronically recorded.
For offenders not in total confinement, the hearing shall be held within
fifteen working days, but not less than twenty-four hours after notice of the
violation. For offenders in total confinement, the hearing shall be held
within five working days, but not less than twenty-four hours after notice of
the violation;

(d) The offender shall
have the right to: (i) Be present at the hearing; (ii) have the assistance of
a person qualified to assist the offender in the hearing, appointed by the
hearing examiner if the offender has a language or communications barrier;
(iii) testify or remain silent; (iv) call witnesses and present documentary
evidence; (v) question witnesses who appear and testify; and (vi) be
represented by counsel if revocation of the release to community custody is a
possible sanction for the violation; and

(e) The sanction shall
take effect if affirmed by the hearing examiner.

(5) Within seven
days after the hearing examiner's decision, the offender may appeal the
decision to a panel of three reviewing examiners designated by the chair of the
board or by the chair's designee. The sanction shall be reversed or modified
if a majority of the panel finds that the sanction was not reasonably related
to any of the following: (((i))) (a) The crime of conviction; (((ii)))
(b) the violation committed; (((iii))) (c) the offender's
risk of reoffending; or (((iv))) (d) the safety of the community.

(((5))) (6)
For purposes of this section, no finding of a violation of conditions may be
based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

Sec. 16. RCW 9.95.440 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 310 are each amended to read as follows:

In the event the board
suspends the release status of an offender released under RCW 9.95.420
by reason of an alleged violation of a condition of release, or pending
disposition of a new criminal charge, the board may nullify the suspension
order and reinstate release under previous conditions or any new conditions the
board determines advisable pursuant to RCW 9.94A.713(5). Before the
board may nullify a suspension order and reinstate release, it shall determine
that the best interests of society and the offender shall be served by such
reinstatement rather than return to confinement.

Sec. 17. RCW 18.155.030 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person shall
represent himself or herself as a certified sex offender treatment provider
without first applying for and receiving a certificate pursuant to this
chapter.

(2) Except as
provided under RCW 9.94A.820 and 71.09.350, only a certified sex offender
treatment provider may perform or provide the following services:

(a) Evaluations
conducted for the purposes of and pursuant to RCW 9.94A.670 and 13.40.160;

(b) Treatment of
convicted sex offenders who are sentenced and ordered into treatment pursuant
to chapter 9.94A RCW and adjudicated juvenile sex offenders who are ordered
into treatment pursuant to chapter 13.40 RCW;

(c) ((Except as
provided under subsection (3) of this section,)) Treatment of
sexually violent predators who are conditionally released to a less restrictive
alternative pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW.

(3) A certified sex
offender treatment provider or a treatment provider authorized under RCW
71.09.350 may not perform or provide treatment of sexually violent
predators under subsection (2)(c) of this section if the certified sex offender
treatment provider has been:

(a) Convicted of a sex
offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(b) Convicted in any
other jurisdiction of an offense that under the laws of this state would be
classified as a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or

(c) Suspended or
otherwise restricted from practicing any health care profession by competent
authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction.

Sec. 18. RCW 71.09.270 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 210 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of social
and health services shall coordinate with the secretary of corrections and the
appropriate local or state law enforcement agency or agencies to establish a
twenty-four-hour law enforcement presence on McNeil Island before any person is
admitted to the secure community transition facility established under RCW
71.09.250(1)(a)(i). Law enforcement shall coordinate with the emergency
response team for McNeil Island to provide planning and coordination in the
event of an escape from the special commitment center or the secure community
transition facility.

((In addition, or if
no law enforcement agency will provide a law enforcement presence on the
island, not more than ten correctional employees, as selected by the secretary
of corrections, who are members of the emergency response team for the McNeil
Island correctional facility, shall have the powers and duties of a general
authority peace officer while acting in a law enforcement capacity. If there
is no law enforcement agency to provide the law enforcement presence, those
correctional employees selected as peace officers shall provide a twenty‑four‑hour
presence and shall not have correctional duties at the correctional facility in
addition to the emergency response team while acting in a law enforcement
capacity.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. A new section is added
to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

If no law
enforcement agency will provide a law enforcement presence on the island, not
more than ten correctional employees, as selected by the secretary of
corrections, who are members of the emergency response team for the McNeil
Island correctional facility, shall have the powers and duties of a general
authority peace officer while acting in a law enforcement capacity. If there
is no law enforcement agency to provide the law enforcement presence, those
correctional employees selected as peace officers shall provide a twenty‑four‑hour
presence and shall not have correctional duties at the correctional facility in
addition to the emergency response team while acting in a law enforcement
capacity.

---
END ---