BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.128.120 and 2001
c 319 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Each adult family home
provider and each resident manager shall have the following minimum
qualifications:

(1) Twenty-one years of
age or older;

(2) For those applying
after September 1, 2001, to be licensed as providers, and for resident managers
whose employment begins after September 1, 2001, a United States high
school diploma or general educational development (GED) certificate or any
English or translated government documentation of the following:

(a) Successful
completion of government-approved public or private school education in a
foreign country that includes an annual average of one thousand hours of
instruction over twelve years or no less than twelve thousand hours of
instruction;

(b) A foreign
college, foreign university, or United States community college two-year
diploma;

(c) Admission to, or
completion of coursework at, a foreign university or college for which credit
was granted;

(d) Admission to, or
completion of coursework at, a United States college or university for which
credits were awarded;

(e) Admission to, or
completion of postgraduate coursework at, a United States college or university
for which credits were awarded; or

(f) Successful
passage of the United States board examination for registered nursing, or any
professional medical occupation for which college or university education
preparation was required;

(3) Good moral and
responsible character and reputation;

(4) Literacy in the
English language, however, a person not literate in the English language may
meet the requirements of this subsection by assuring that there is a person on
staff and available who is able to communicate or make provisions for
communicating with the resident in his or her primary language and capable of
understanding and speaking English well enough to be able to respond
appropriately to emergency situations and be able to read and understand
resident care plans;

(5) Management and
administrative ability to carry out the requirements of this chapter;

(6) Satisfactory
completion of department-approved basic training and continuing education
training as specified by the department in rule, based on recommendations of
the community long-term care training and education steering committee and
working in collaboration with providers, consumers, caregivers, advocates,
family members, educators, and other interested parties in the rule-making
process;

(7) Satisfactory
completion of department-approved, or equivalent, special care training before
a provider may provide special care services to a resident;

(8) Not been convicted
of any crime listed in RCW 43.43.830 and 43.43.842;

(9) Registered with the
department of health; and

(10) For those applying
after September 1, 2001, to be licensed as providers, and for resident managers
whose employment begins after September 1, 2001, at least three hundred twenty
hours of successful, direct caregiving experience obtained after age eighteen
to vulnerable adults in a licensed or contracted setting prior to operating or
managing an adult family home.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect May
1, 2002.

---
END ---