BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 26.50.070 and 2000 c
119 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Where an
application under this section alleges that irreparable injury could result
from domestic violence if an order is not issued immediately without prior
notice to the respondent, the court may grant an ex parte temporary order for
protection, pending a full hearing, and grant relief as the court deems proper,
including an order:

(a) Restraining any
party from committing acts of domestic violence;

(b) Restraining any
party from going onto the grounds of or entering the dwelling that the parties
share, from the residence, workplace, or school of the other, or from the day
care or school of a child until further order of the court;

(c) Prohibiting any
party from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified
distance from a specified location;

(d) Restraining any
party from interfering with the other's custody of the minor children or from
removing the children from the jurisdiction of the court;

(e) Restraining any
party from having any contact with the victim of domestic violence or the
victim's children or members of the victim's household; and

(f) Considering the
provisions of RCW 9.41.800.

(2) Irreparable injury
under this section includes but is not limited to situations in which the
respondent has recently threatened petitioner with bodily injury or has engaged
in acts of domestic violence against the petitioner.

(3) The court shall
hold an ex parte hearing in person or by telephone on the day the petition is
filed or on the following judicial day.

(4) An ex parte
temporary order for protection shall be effective for a fixed period not to
exceed fourteen days or twenty-four days if the court has permitted service by
publication under RCW 26.50.085 or by mail under RCW 26.50.123. The ex parte
order may be reissued. A full hearing, as provided in this chapter, shall be
set for not later than fourteen days from the issuance of the temporary order
or not later than twenty-four days if service by publication or by mail is
permitted. Except as provided in RCW 26.50.050, 26.50.085, and 26.50.123, the
respondent shall be personally served with a copy of the ex parte order along
with a copy of the petition and notice of the date set for the hearing. The
ex parte order and notice of hearing must include at a minimum the date and
time of the hearing set by the court to determine if the temporary order should
be made effective for one year or more, and notice that if the respondent fails
to appear or otherwise not respond, an order for protection will be issued
against the respondent under this chapter, for a minimum of one year from the
date of the hearing. The notice must also include a brief statement of the provisions
of the ex parte order and notify the respondent that a copy of the ex parte
order and notice of hearing has been filed with the clerk of the court.

(5) Any order issued
under this section shall contain the date and time of issuance and the expiration
date and shall be entered into a state-wide judicial information system by the
clerk of the court within one judicial day after issuance.

(6) If the court
declines to issue an ex parte temporary order for protection the court shall
state the particular reasons for the court's denial. The court's denial of a
motion for an ex parte order of protection shall be filed with the court.

(7) The
court's order, entered after a hearing under this chapter, need not be served
on a respondent who fails to appear before the court, if the material terms of
the order have not changed from those contained in the temporary order, and it
is shown to the court's satisfaction that the respondent has previously been
personally served with the temporary order.

--- END ---