BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 3.50.075 and 1994 c
10 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

One or more court
commissioners may be appointed by a judge of the municipal court. Each
commissioner holds office at the pleasure of the appointing judge. A
commissioner authorized to hear or dispose of cases must be a lawyer who is
admitted to practice law in the state of Washington or a nonlawyer who has
passed the qualifying examination for lay judges for courts of limited
jurisdiction under RCW 3.34.060.

A
commissioner need not be a resident of the city or of the county in which the
municipal court is created. ((When a court commissioner has not been
appointed and the municipal court is presided over by a part-time appointed
judge, the judge need not be a resident of the city or of the county in which
the municipal court is created.))

--- END ---