BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 3.66.070 and 2001 c
15 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All criminal
actions shall be brought in the district where the alleged violation occurred:
PROVIDED, That (a) the prosecuting attorney may file felony cases in the
district in which the county seat is located, (b) with the consent of the
defendant criminal actions other than those arising out of violations of city
ordinances may be brought in or transferred to the district in which the county
seat is located, (c) if the alleged violation relates to driving, or being in
actual physical control of, a motor vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug and the alleged violation occurred within a
judicial district which has been designated an enhanced enforcement district
under RCW 2.56.110, the charges may be filed in that district or in a district
within the same county which is adjacent to the district in which the alleged
violation occurred, and (d) a district court participating in the program
established by the office of the administrator for the courts pursuant to RCW
2.56.160 shall have jurisdiction to take recognizance, approve bail, and
arraign defendants held within its jurisdiction on warrants issued by any other
court of limited jurisdiction participating in the program.

(2) In the event of an
emergency created by act of nature, civil unrest, technological failure, or
other hazardous condition, temporary venue for court of limited jurisdiction
matters may be had in a court district not impacted by the emergency. Such
emergency venue is appropriate only for the duration of the emergency.

(3) A
criminal action commenced under a local ordinance or state statute is
deemed to be properly heard by the court of original jurisdiction even though
the hearing may take place by video or other electronic means as approved by
the supreme court and the defendant is appearing by an electronic method from a
location outside the court's geographic jurisdiction or boundaries.

--- END ---