BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

In order to provide the
broadest possible public safety protection, the sheriff may produce level III
community notification flyers in languages other than English when requested.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
July 1, 2003.

---
END ---