BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 44.05.100 and 1995 c
88 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon approval of a
redistricting plan by three of the voting members of the commission, but not
later than ((December 15th)) January 1st of the year ending in ((one))
two, the commission shall submit the plan to the legislature.

(2) After submission of
the plan by the commission, the legislature shall have the next thirty days
during any regular or special session to amend the commission's plan. If the
legislature amends the commission's plan the legislature's amendment must be
approved by an affirmative vote in each house of two-thirds of the members
elected or appointed thereto, and may not include more than two percent of the
population of any legislative or congressional district.

(3) The plan approved
by the commission, with any amendment approved by the legislature, shall be
final upon approval of such amendment or after expiration of the time provided
for legislative amendment by subsection (2) of this section whichever occurs
first, and shall constitute the districting law applicable to this state for
legislative and congressional elections, beginning with the next elections held
in the year ending in two. This plan shall be in force until the effective
date of the plan based upon the next succeeding federal decennial census or
until a modified plan takes effect as provided in RCW 44.05.120(6).

(4) If three of the
voting members of the commission fail to approve and submit a plan within the
time limitations provided in subsection (1) of this section, the supreme court
shall adopt a plan by March 1st of the year ending in two. Any such plan
approved by the court is final and constitutes the districting law applicable
to this state for legislative and congressional elections, beginning with the
next election held in the year ending in two. This plan shall be in force
until the effective date of the plan based on the next succeeding federal
decennial census or until a modified plan takes effect as provided in RCW
44.05.120(6).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. This act is remedial and
curative in nature and applies retroactively to any plan or portion of a plan
submitted to the legislature by the redistricting commission established in
2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---