BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 3.70.010 and 1994 c
32 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

There is established in
the state an association, to be known as the Washington state district and
municipal court judges' association, membership in which shall include all duly
elected or appointed and qualified judges of courts of limited jurisdiction,
including but not limited to district judges and municipal court judges. Only
those members that have paid dues, as from time to time may be set by the
association, are members in good standing and eligible to vote on association
business and hold office in the association.

Sec. 2. RCW 3.70.020 and 1994 c
32 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Members, in good
standing under RCW 3.70.010, of the Washington state district and municipal
court judges' association may either amend the present bylaws of the
association, adopt a constitution, or provide for bylaws only, electing
officers as provided therein and doing all things necessary and proper to formally
establish a permanent Washington state district and municipal court judges'
association, including but not limited to determining the amount of dues to
be paid by each member and establishing such other requirements of each member
to be considered a member in good standing of the association. The
association may meet each year at a time established by the association's
governing board. Meetings shall be held in the state of Washington.

Sec. 3. RCW 3.70.030 and 1984 c
258 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:

For
attendance at the annual meetings of the association, beginning in 1962 and
thereafter, a judge of a court of limited jurisdiction shall be entitled to
receive reimbursement for judge's reasonable travel expenses as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060 from the county or city responsible for the operating
costs of the court over which he or she presides while attending
meetings of the association. The per diem and transportation or mileage
allowance authorized by this section shall not be paid to any judge for more
than five days in any one calendar year. The dues set by the association
may be paid from the general funds of the county or city responsible for
payment of the operating costs of the court of limited jurisdiction.

---
END ---