BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.32.010 and 2001 c
253 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided in this chapter, a recreational license issued by the director is
required to hunt for or take wild animals or wild birds, fish for, take, or
harvest fish, shellfish, and seaweed. A recreational fishing or shellfish
license is not required for carp, smelt in a one-day fishing derby sponsored
by a nonprofit community organization, subject to approval of the director,
albacore, and crawfish, and a hunting license is not required for bullfrogs.

(2) A
permit issued by the department is required to park a motor vehicle upon
improved department access facilities.

--- END ---