BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 77.32 RCW to read as follows:

A group fishing permit
allows a group of individuals to fish and harvest shellfish without individual
licenses or the payment of individual license fees. The director must issue a
group fishing permit to a state-operated or nonprofit facility for physically
or mentally disabled persons, mentally ill persons, hospital patients, handicapped
persons, seriously or terminally ill persons, or senior citizens who are in the
care of the facility. The permit is valid only for occasional use during open
season.

The commission must
adopt rules that provide the conditions under which a group fishing permit must
be issued.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 77.32.235 (Group permits--Exemption
from individual license and fee requirement--Conditions) and 1998 c 191 s 20,
1990 c 35 s 4, & 1984 c 33 s 1 are each repealed.

---
END ---