BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 51.08 RCW to read as follows:

"Multiple chemical
sensitivity syndrome" means a chronic condition with symptoms that affect
multiple organ systems and recur reproducibly in an individual in response to
low levels of exposure to multiple unrelated chemicals and improve or resolve
when the triggering chemicals are removed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 51.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Multiple chemical
sensitivity syndrome due to workplace exposure to chemicals is an occupational
disease compensable under this title.

(2) A
worker who has been diagnosed with multiple chemical sensitivity syndrome prior
to experiencing symptoms of a work-related occupational disease due to chemical
exposure does not need to prove that the occupational disease arises naturally
and proximately out of employment. The worker need prove only that
work-related conditions contributed to, aggravated, exacerbated, or accelerated
the preexisting multiple chemical sensitivity syndrome.

---
END ---