BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature affirms
that parents have a paramount right to raise their minor children. The
legislature recognizes that this paramount right must be considered in
conjunction with the minor child's interest in maintaining beneficial significant
relationships with nonparents. Therefore, the legislature intends to establish
internally consistent and rigorous standards that must be met for a nonparent
to obtain visitation with a minor child.

Sec. 2. RCW 26.09.240 and 1996 c
177 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person other than
a parent ((may petition the court for visitation with a child at any time or))
may intervene in a pending dissolution, legal separation, or modification of
parenting plan proceeding. ((A person other than a parent may not petition
for visitation under this section unless the child's parent or parents have
commenced an action under this chapter.))

(2) ((A petition for
visitation with a child by a person other than a parent must be filed in the
county in which the child resides.

(3) A petition for
visitation or)) A motion
to intervene pursuant to this section shall be dismissed unless the ((petitioner
or)) intervenor can demonstrate by clear, cogent, and convincing
evidence that a beneficial significant relationship exists with the
child with whom visitation is sought. If the ((petition or)) motion is
dismissed for failure to establish the existence of a beneficial
significant relationship, the ((petitioner or)) intervenor shall be
ordered to pay reasonable attorney's fees and costs to the parent, parents,
other custodian, or representative of the child who responds to this ((petition
or)) motion.

(((4))) (3)
The court may order visitation between the ((petitioner or)) intervenor
and the child between whom a beneficial significant relationship exists
upon a finding supported by ((the)) clear, cogent, and convincing
evidence that the visitation is in the child's best interests and that
denial of visitation would result in a likelihood of substantial harm to the
child's physical, mental, or emotional well-being.

(((5)(a) Visitation
with a grandparent shall be presumed to be in the child's best interests when a
significant relationship has been shown to exist. This presumption may be
rebutted by a preponderance of evidence showing that visitation would endanger
the child's physical, mental, or emotional health.

(b))) (4) If the court finds that reasonable
visitation by ((a grandparent)) an intervenor would be in the
child's best interest except for hostilities that exist between the ((grandparent))
intervenor and one or both of the parents or person with whom the child
lives, the court may set the matter for mediation under RCW 26.09.015.

(((6))) (5)
The court may consider the following factors when making a determination of the
child's best interests:

(a) The strength of the
relationship between the child and the petitioner;

(b) The relationship
between each of the child's parents or the person with whom the child is
residing and the petitioner;

(c) The nature and
reason for either parent's objection to granting the petitioner visitation;

(d) The effect that
granting visitation will have on the relationship between the child and the
child's parents or the person with whom the child is residing;

(e) The residential
time-sharing arrangements between the parents;

(f) The good faith of
the petitioner;

(g) Any criminal
history or history of physical, emotional, or sexual abuse or neglect by the
petitioner; and

(h) Any other factor
relevant to the child's best interest.

(((7))) (6)
The restrictions of RCW 26.09.191 that apply to parents shall be applied to ((a
petitioner or)) an intervenor who is not a parent. The nature and
extent of visitation, subject to these restrictions, is in the discretion of
the court.

(((8))) (7)
The court may order an investigation and report concerning the proposed
visitation or may appoint a guardian ad litem as provided in RCW 26.09.220.

(((9))) (8)
Visitation granted pursuant to this section shall be incorporated into the
parenting plan for the child.

(((10))) (9)
The court may modify or terminate visitation rights granted pursuant to this
section in any subsequent modification action upon a showing that the
visitation is no longer in the best interest of the child.

Sec. 3. RCW 26.10.160 and 1996 c
303 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A parent not
granted custody of the child is entitled to reasonable visitation rights except
as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2)(a) Visitation with
the child shall be limited if it is found that the parent seeking visitation
has engaged in any of the following conduct: (i) Willful abandonment that
continues for an extended period of time or substantial refusal to perform
parenting functions; (ii) physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of
a child; (iii) a history of acts of domestic violence as defined in RCW
26.50.010(1) or an assault or sexual assault which causes grievous bodily harm
or the fear of such harm; or (iv) the parent has been convicted as an adult of
a sex offense under:

(A) RCW 9A.44.076 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(B) RCW 9A.44.079 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(C) RCW 9A.44.086 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(D) RCW 9A.44.089;

(E) RCW 9A.44.093;

(F) RCW 9A.44.096;

(G) RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or
(2) if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim,
no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(H) Chapter 9.68A RCW;

(I) Any predecessor or
antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (a)(iv)(A) through (H) of this
subsection;

(J) Any statute from
any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to the offenses
listed in (a)(iv)(A) through (H) of this subsection.

This subsection (2)(a)
shall not apply when (c) or (d) of this subsection applies.

(b) The parent's
visitation with the child shall be limited if it is found that the parent
resides with a person who has engaged in any of the following conduct: (i)
Physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of a child; (ii) a history of
acts of domestic violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or an assault or
sexual assault that causes grievous bodily harm or the fear of such harm; or
(iii) the person has been convicted as an adult or as a juvenile has been
adjudicated of a sex offense under:

(A) RCW 9A.44.076 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(B) RCW 9A.44.079 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(C) RCW 9A.44.086 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no rebuttable
presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(D) RCW 9A.44.089;

(E) RCW 9A.44.093;

(F) RCW 9A.44.096;

(G) RCW 9A.64.020 (1)
or (2) if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(H) Chapter 9.68A RCW;

(I) Any predecessor or
antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of this
subsection;

(J) Any statute from
any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to the offenses
listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of this subsection.

This subsection (2)(b)
shall not apply when (c) or (e) of this subsection applies.

(c) If a parent has
been found to be a sexual predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or under an
analogous statute of any other jurisdiction, the court shall restrain the
parent from contact with a child that would otherwise be allowed under this
chapter. If a parent resides with an adult or a juvenile who has been found
to be a sexual predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or under an analogous statute
of any other jurisdiction, the court shall restrain the parent from contact
with the parent's child except contact that occurs outside that person's
presence.

(d) There is a
rebuttable presumption that a parent who has been convicted as an adult of a
sex offense listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of this subsection poses a present
danger to a child. Unless the parent rebuts this presumption, the court shall
restrain the parent from contact with a child that would otherwise be allowed
under this chapter:

(i) RCW 9A.64.020 (1)
or (2), provided that the person convicted was at least five years older than
the other person;

(ii) RCW 9A.44.073;

(iii) RCW 9A.44.076,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(iv) RCW 9A.44.079,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(v) RCW 9A.44.083;

(vi) RCW 9A.44.086,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(vii) RCW 9A.44.100;

(viii) Any predecessor
or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (d)(i) through (vii) of this
subsection;

(ix) Any statute from
any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to the offenses
listed in (d)(i) through (vii) of this subsection.

(e) There is a
rebuttable presumption that a parent who resides with a person who, as an
adult, has been convicted, or as a juvenile has been adjudicated, of the sex
offenses listed in (e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection places a child at risk
of abuse or harm when that parent exercises visitation in the presence of the
convicted or adjudicated person. Unless the parent rebuts the presumption, the
court shall restrain the parent from contact with the parent's child except for
contact that occurs outside of the convicted or adjudicated person's presence:

(i) RCW 9A.64.020 (1)
or (2), provided that the person convicted was at least five years older than
the other person;

(ii) RCW 9A.44.073;

(iii) RCW 9A.44.076,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(iv) RCW 9A.44.079,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(v) RCW 9A.44.083;

(vi) RCW 9A.44.086,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(vii) RCW 9A.44.100;

(viii) Any predecessor
or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (e)(i) through (vii) of this
subsection;

(ix) Any statute from
any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to the offenses
listed in (e)(i) through (vii) of this subsection.

(f) The presumption
established in (d) of this subsection may be rebutted only after a written
finding that:

(i) If the child was
not the victim of the sex offense committed by the parent requesting
visitation, (A) contact between the child and the offending parent is
appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, and (B) the offending parent
has successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and
making progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the
treatment provider believes such contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk
to the child; or

(ii) If the child was
the victim of the sex offense committed by the parent requesting visitation,
(A) contact between the child and the offending parent is appropriate and poses
minimal risk to the child, (B) if the child is in or has been in therapy for
victims of sexual abuse, the child's counselor believes such contact between
the child and the offending parent is in the child's best interest, and (C) the
offending parent has successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is
engaged in and making progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a
court, and the treatment provider believes such contact is appropriate and
poses minimal risk to the child.

(g) The presumption
established in (e) of this subsection may be rebutted only after a written
finding that:

(i) If the child was not
the victim of the sex offense committed by the person who is residing with the
parent requesting visitation, (A) contact between the child and the parent
residing with the convicted or adjudicated person is appropriate and that
parent is able to protect the child in the presence of the convicted or
adjudicated person, and (B) the convicted or adjudicated person has
successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and making
progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the treatment
provider believes such contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the
child; or

(ii) If the child was
the victim of the sex offense committed by the person who is residing with the
parent requesting visitation, (A) contact between the child and the parent in
the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is appropriate and poses
minimal risk to the child, (B) if the child is in or has been in therapy for
victims of sexual abuse, the child's counselor believes such contact between
the child and the parent residing with the convicted or adjudicated person in
the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is in the child's best
interest, and (C) the convicted or adjudicated person has successfully engaged
in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and making progress in such
treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the treatment provider believes
contact between the parent and child in the presence of the convicted or
adjudicated person is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child.

(h) If the court finds
that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the presumption under (f) of
this subsection, the court may allow a parent who has been convicted as an
adult of a sex offense listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of this subsection to have
visitation with the child supervised by a neutral and independent adult and
pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such visitation. The court
shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between the child and the parent
unless the court finds, based on the evidence, that the supervisor is willing
and capable of protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke court
approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the evidence, that the
supervisor has failed to protect the child or is no longer willing or capable
of protecting the child.

(i) If the court finds
that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the presumption under (g) of
this subsection, the court may allow a parent residing with a person who has
been adjudicated as a juvenile of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through (ix)
of this subsection to have visitation with the child in the presence of the
person adjudicated as a juvenile, supervised by a neutral and independent adult
and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such visitation. The court
shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between the child and the parent
unless the court finds, based on the evidence, that the supervisor is willing
and capable of protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke court
approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the evidence, that the
supervisor has failed to protect the child or is no longer willing or capable
of protecting the child.

(j) If the court finds
that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the presumption under (g) of
this subsection, the court may allow a parent residing with a person who, as an
adult, has been convicted of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through (ix) of
this subsection to have visitation with the child in the presence of the
convicted person supervised by a neutral and independent adult and pursuant to
an adequate plan for supervision of such visitation. The court shall not
approve of a supervisor for contact between the child and the parent unless the
court finds, based on the evidence, that the supervisor is willing and capable
of protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke court approval of
the supervisor upon finding, based on the evidence, that the supervisor has
failed to protect the child or is no longer willing or capable of protecting
the child.

(k) A court shall not
order unsupervised contact between the offending parent and a child of the
offending parent who was sexually abused by that parent. A court may order
unsupervised contact between the offending parent and a child who was not
sexually abused by the parent after the presumption under (d) of this
subsection has been rebutted and supervised visitation has occurred for at
least two years with no further arrests or convictions of sex offenses
involving children under chapter 9A.44 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or chapter 9.68A RCW
and (i) the sex offense of the offending parent was not committed against a
child of the offending parent, and (ii) the court finds that unsupervised
contact between the child and the offending parent is appropriate and poses
minimal risk to the child, after consideration of the testimony of a
state-certified therapist, mental health counselor, or social worker with
expertise in treating child sexual abuse victims who has supervised at least
one period of visitation between the parent and the child, and after
consideration of evidence of the offending parent's compliance with community
supervision requirements, if any. If the offending parent was not ordered by a
court to participate in treatment for sex offenders, then the parent shall
obtain a psychosexual evaluation conducted by a state-certified sex offender
treatment provider indicating that the offender has the lowest likelihood of
risk to reoffend before the court grants unsupervised contact between the
parent and a child.

(l) A court may order
unsupervised contact between the parent and a child which may occur in the
presence of a juvenile adjudicated of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through
(ix) of this subsection who resides with the parent after the presumption under
(e) of this subsection has been rebutted and supervised visitation has occurred
for at least two years during which time the adjudicated juvenile has had no
further arrests, adjudications, or convictions of sex offenses involving
children under chapter 9A.44 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or chapter 9.68A RCW, and (i)
the court finds that unsupervised contact between the child and the parent that
may occur in the presence of the adjudicated juvenile is appropriate and poses
minimal risk to the child, after consideration of the testimony of a
state-certified therapist, mental health counselor, or social worker with
expertise in treatment of child sexual abuse victims who has supervised at
least one period of visitation between the parent and the child in the presence
of the adjudicated juvenile, and after consideration of evidence of the
adjudicated juvenile's compliance with community supervision or parole
requirements, if any. If the adjudicated juvenile was not ordered by a court
to participate in treatment for sex offenders, then the adjudicated juvenile
shall obtain a psychosexual evaluation conducted by a state-certified sex
offender treatment provider indicating that the adjudicated juvenile has the lowest
likelihood of risk to reoffend before the court grants unsupervised contact
between the parent and a child which may occur in the presence of the
adjudicated juvenile who is residing with the parent.

(m)(i) The limitations
imposed by the court under (a) or (b) of this subsection shall be reasonably
calculated to protect the child from the physical, sexual, or emotional abuse
or harm that could result if the child has contact with the parent requesting
visitation. If the court expressly finds based on the evidence that
limitations on visitation with the child will not adequately protect the child
from the harm or abuse that could result if the child has contact with the
parent requesting visitation, the court shall restrain the person seeking visitation
from all contact with the child.

(ii) The court shall
not enter an order under (a) of this subsection allowing a parent to have
contact with a child if the parent has been found by clear and convincing
evidence in a civil action or by a preponderance of the evidence in a
dependency action to have sexually abused the child, except upon recommendation
by an evaluator or therapist for the child that the child is ready for contact
with the parent and will not be harmed by the contact. The court shall not enter
an order allowing a parent to have contact with the child in the offender's
presence if the parent resides with a person who has been found by clear and
convincing evidence in a civil action or by a preponderance of the evidence in
a dependency action to have sexually abused a child, unless the court finds
that the parent accepts that the person engaged in the harmful conduct and the
parent is willing to and capable of protecting the child from harm from the
person.

(iii) If the court
limits visitation under (a) or (b) of this subsection to require supervised
contact between the child and the parent, the court shall not approve of a
supervisor for contact between a child and a parent who has engaged in
physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of the child unless the court
finds based upon the evidence that the supervisor accepts that the harmful
conduct occurred and is willing to and capable of protecting the child from
harm. The court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon finding,
based on the evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the child or
is no longer willing to or capable of protecting the child.

(n) If the court
expressly finds based on the evidence that contact between the parent and the
child will not cause physical, sexual, or emotional abuse or harm to the child
and that the probability that the parent's or other person's harmful or abusive
conduct will recur is so remote that it would not be in the child's best
interests to apply the limitations of (a), (b), and (m)(i) and (iii) of this
subsection, or if the court expressly finds that the parent's conduct did not
have an impact on the child, then the court need not apply the limitations of
(a), (b), and (m)(i) and (iii) of this subsection. The weight given to the
existence of a protection order issued under chapter 26.50 RCW as to domestic
violence is within the discretion of the court. This subsection shall not
apply when (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), (l), and (m)(ii) of
this subsection apply.

(3)(a) Any
person may petition the court for visitation rights ((at any time including,
but not limited to, custody proceedings)) if there has been a
substantial change in circumstances relating to either parent or the minor
child that justifies consideration of the petitioner's visitation rights.
((The court may order visitation rights for any person when visitation may
serve the best interest of the child whether or not there has been any change
of circumstances.)) A petition for visitation pursuant to this section
shall be dismissed unless the petitioner can demonstrate by clear, cogent, and
convincing evidence that a beneficial significant relationship exists with the
child with whom visitation is sought. If the petition is dismissed for failure
to establish the existence of a beneficial significant relationship, the
petitioner shall be ordered to pay reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to the
parent, parents, other custodian, or representative of the child who responds
to the petition.

If the petitioner
establishes that a beneficial significant relationship exists, the court may
order visitation between the petitioner and the child upon a finding supported
by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that visitation is in the child's
best interests and that denial of visitation would result in a likelihood of
substantial harm to the child's physical, mental, or emotional well-being.

(b) The court may
consider the following factors when making a determination of the child's best
interests:

(i) The strength of
the relationship between the child and the petitioner;

(ii) The
relationship between each of the child's parents or the person with whom the
child is residing and the petitioner;

(iii) The nature and
reason for either parent's objection to granting the petitioner visitation;

(iv) The effect that
granting visitation will have on the relationship between the child and the
child's parents or the person with whom the child is residing;

(v) The residential
time-sharing arrangements between parents;

(vi) The good faith
of the petitioner;

(vii) Any criminal
history or history of physical, emotional, or sexual abuse or neglect by the
petitioner; and

(viii) Any other
factor relevant to the child's best interest.

(c) The restrictions
of this section that apply to parents shall be applied to a petitioner who is
not a parent. The nature and extent of visitation, subject to these
restrictions, is in the discretion of the court.

(d) The court from
time to time may, after a beneficial significant relationship has been shown
and considering the financial resources of both parties, order a party to pay a
reasonable amount to the other party for the cost of maintaining or defending a
petition.

(4) Visitation
granted pursuant to this section shall be incorporated into the parenting plan
for the child.

(5) The court
may modify an order granting or denying visitation rights whenever modification
would serve the best interests of the child. Modification of a parent's
visitation rights shall be subject to the requirements of subsection (2) of
this section.

(((5))) (6)
For the purposes of this section, a parent's child means that parent's natural
child, adopted child, or stepchild.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 26.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In any proceeding
under this chapter, the matter may be set for mediation of the contested issues
before or concurrent with the setting of the matter for hearing. The purpose
of the mediation proceeding is to reduce acrimony that may exist between the
parties and to develop an agreement assuring the child's close and continuing
contact with persons who can show a beneficial significant relationship with
the child. The mediator will use his or her best efforts to effect a
settlement of the dispute.

(2) Each superior court
may make a mediator available. The mediator may be a member of the
professional staff of a family court or mental health services agency, or may
be any other person or agency designated by the court. In order to provide
mediation services, the court is not required to institute a family court
proceeding.

(3) Mediation
proceedings will be held in private and are confidential. The mediator may not
testify as to any aspect of the mediation proceedings.

(4) The mediator will
assess the needs and interests of the child or children involved in the
controversy and may interview the child or children if the mediator deems such
interview appropriate or necessary.

(5) Any
agreement reached by the parties as a result of mediation must be reported to
the court and to counsel for the parties by the mediator on the day set for
mediation or any time thereafter designated by the court.

---
END ---