BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.46.060 and 1959 c
294 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director,
to the extent necessary in order to prevent curtailment of opportunities for
employment, shall by regulations provide for (((1))) (a) the
employment of learners, of apprentices, and of messengers employed primarily in
delivering letters and messages, under special certificates issued pursuant to
regulations of the director, at such wages lower than the minimum wage
applicable under RCW 49.46.020 and subject to such limitations as to time,
number, proportion, and length of service as the director shall prescribe, and
(((2))) (b) the employment of individuals whose earning capacity
is impaired by age or physical or mental deficiency or injury, under special
certificates issued by the director, at such wages lower than the minimum wage
applicable under RCW 49.46.020 and for such period as shall be fixed in such
certificates.

(2) Any
individual who is the spouse of an employee engaged in the hand harvesting of
fruit may assist the employee in hand harvesting and have the fruit they pick
be considered a part of their spouse's production.

--- END ---