BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of a new motor vehicle that has an average
gas mileage at least twice the national average for new passenger cars, as
determined by the United States environmental protection agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of a new motor vehicle that
has an average gas mileage at least twice the national average for new
passenger cars, as determined by the United States environmental protection
agency.

---
END ---