BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 76.09.020 and 2001 c
102 s 1 and 2001 c 97 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

((For purposes of
this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Adaptive
management" means reliance on scientific methods to test the results of
actions taken so that the management and related policy can be changed promptly
and appropriately.

(2) "Appeals
board" means the forest practices appeals board created by RCW 76.09.210.

(3) "Aquatic
resources" includes water quality, salmon, other species of the vertebrate
classes Cephalaspidomorphi and Osteichthyes identified in the forests and fish
report, the Columbia torrent salamander (Rhyacotriton kezeri), the
Cascade torrent salamander (Rhyacotriton cascadae), the Olympic torrent
salamander (Rhyacotriton olympian), the Dunn's salamander (Plethodon
dunni), the Van Dyke's salamander (Plethodon vandyke), the tailed
frog (Ascaphus truei), and their respective habitats.

(4)
"Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.

(5)
"Contiguous" means land adjoining or touching by common corner or
otherwise. Land having common ownership divided by a road or other right of
way shall be considered contiguous.

(6) "Conversion to
a use other than commercial timber operation" means a bona fide conversion
to an active use which is incompatible with timber growing and as may be
defined by forest practices rules.

(7) "Cultural
resources" means archaeological and historic sites and artifacts and
traditional religious, ceremonial, and social uses and activities of affected
Indian tribes.

(8)
"Department" means the department of natural resources.

(((8))) (9)
"Forest land" means all land which is capable of supporting a
merchantable stand of timber and is not being actively used for a use which is
incompatible with timber growing. Forest land does not include agricultural
land that is or was enrolled in the conservation reserve enhancement program by
contract if such agricultural land was historically used for agricultural
purposes and the landowner intends to continue to use the land for agricultural
purposes in the future.

(((9))) (10)
"Forest landowner" means any person in actual control of forest land,
whether such control is based either on legal or equitable title, or on any
other interest entitling the holder to sell or otherwise dispose of any or all
of the timber on such land in any manner: PROVIDED, That any lessee or other
person in possession of forest land without legal or equitable title to such
land shall be excluded from the definition of "forest landowner"
unless such lessee or other person has the right to sell or otherwise dispose
of any or all of the timber located on such forest land.

(((10))) (11)
"Forest practice" means any activity conducted on or directly
pertaining to forest land and relating to growing, harvesting, or processing
timber, including but not limited to:

(a) Road and trail
construction;

(b) Harvesting, final
and intermediate;

(c) Precommercial
thinning;

(d) Reforestation;

(e) Fertilization;

(f) Prevention and
suppression of diseases and insects;

(g) Salvage of trees;
and

(h) Brush control.

"Forest practice"
shall not include preparatory work such as tree marking, surveying and road
flagging, and removal or harvesting of incidental vegetation from forest lands
such as berries, ferns, greenery, mistletoe, herbs, mushrooms, and other
products which cannot normally be expected to result in damage to forest soils,
timber, or public resources.

(((11))) (12)
"Forest practices rules" means any rules adopted pursuant to RCW
76.09.040.

(((12))) (13)
"Forest trees" does not include hardwood trees cultivated by
agricultural methods in growing cycles shorter than fifteen years if the trees
were planted on land that was not in forest use immediately before the trees
were planted and before the land was prepared for planting the trees.
"Forest trees" includes Christmas trees.

(((13))) (14)
"Forests and fish report" means the forests and fish report to the
board dated April 29, 1999.

(((14))) (15)
"Application" means the application required pursuant to RCW
76.09.050.

(((15))) (16)
"Operator" means any person engaging in forest practices except an
employee with wages as his or her sole compensation.

(((16))) (17)
"Person" means any individual, partnership, private, public, or
municipal corporation, county, the department or other state or local
governmental entity, or association of individuals of whatever nature.

(((17))) (18)
"Public resources" means water, fish and wildlife, cultural
resources, and in addition shall mean capital improvements of the state or
its political subdivisions.

(((18))) (19)
"Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, of a commercial
species, including Christmas trees.

(((19))) (20)
"Timber owner" means any person having all or any part of the legal
interest in timber. Where such timber is subject to a contract of sale,
"timber owner" shall mean the contract purchaser.

(((20))) (21)
"Board" means the forest practices board created in RCW 76.09.030.

(((21))) (22)
"Unconfined avulsing channel migration zone" means the area within
which the active channel of an unconfined avulsing stream is prone to move and
where the movement would result in a potential near-term loss of riparian
forest adjacent to the stream. Sizeable islands with productive timber may
exist within the zone.

(((22)))
(23) "Unconfined avulsing stream" means generally fifth order
or larger waters that experience abrupt shifts in channel location, creating a
complex flood plain characterized by extensive gravel bars, disturbance species
of vegetation of variable age, numerous side channels, wall-based channels,
oxbow lakes, and wetland complexes. Many of these streams have dikes and
levees that may temporarily or permanently restrict channel movement.

--- END ---