BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79.24.580 and 2001 c
227 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After
deduction for management costs as provided in RCW 79.64.040 and payments to
towns under RCW 79.92.110(2), all moneys received by the state from the sale or
lease of state-owned aquatic lands and from the sale of valuable material from
state-owned aquatic lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement
account which is hereby created in the state treasury. Except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section, and after appropriation, these funds
shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for the purchase,
improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public purposes; for providing
and improving access to such lands; and for volunteer cooperative fish and game
projects.

(2) In providing
grants for aquatic lands enhancement projects, the department shall require
grant recipients to incorporate the environmental benefits of the project into
their grant applications, and the department shall utilize the statement of
environmental benefits in its prioritization and selection process. The
department shall also develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures
to be used both for management and performance assessment of the grants. To
the extent possible, the department should coordinate its performance measure
system with other natural resource-related agencies as defined in RCW 43.41.270.
The department shall consult with affected interest groups in implementing this
section.

(3) During the
fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2001, the funds may be appropriated for boating
safety, shellfish management, enforcement, and enhancement and for developing
and implementing plans for population monitoring and restoration of native wild
salmon stock.

(4) The
department of natural resources must identify moneys deposited to the account
that are derived from sales of logs or other wood material from state-owned
aquatic lands in which the sales were conducted for the principal purpose of
deriving revenue from the sale. Moneys derived from sales for the removal of
logs or wood debris constituting a hazard to navigation does not need to be so
identified. The treasurer must, not less than biennially, transfer moneys in
the account identified under this subsection to the American Indian scholarship
endowment fund created by RCW 28B.108.060.

--- END ---