BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 50.29.025 and 2000 c
2 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The contribution rate
for each employer subject to contributions under RCW 50.24.010 shall be
determined under this section.

(1) A fund balance
ratio shall be determined by dividing the balance in the unemployment
compensation fund as of the September 30th immediately preceding the rate year
by the total remuneration paid by all employers subject to contributions during
the second calendar year preceding the rate year and reported to the department
by the following March 31st. The division shall be carried to the fourth
decimal place with the remaining fraction, if any, disregarded. The fund
balance ratio shall be expressed as a percentage.

(2) The interval of the
fund balance ratio, expressed as a percentage, shall determine which tax
schedule in subsection (5) of this section shall be in effect for assigning tax
rates for the rate year. The intervals for determining the effective tax
schedule shall be:

Interval
of the

Fund
Balance Ratio Effective

Expressed
as a Percentage Tax Schedule

2.90
and above AA

2.10 to 2.89 A

1.70 to 2.09 B

1.40 to 1.69 C

1.00
to 1.39 D

0.70
to 0.99 E

Less than 0.70 F

(3) An array shall be
prepared, listing all qualified employers in ascending order of their benefit
ratios. The array shall show for each qualified employer: (a) Identification
number; (b) benefit ratio; (c) taxable payrolls for the four calendar quarters
immediately preceding the computation date and reported to the department by
the cut-off date; (d) a cumulative total of taxable payrolls consisting of the
employer's taxable payroll plus the taxable payrolls of all other employers
preceding him or her in the array; and (e) the percentage equivalent of the
cumulative total of taxable payrolls.

(4) Each employer in
the array shall be assigned to one of twenty rate classes according to the
percentage intervals of cumulative taxable payrolls set forth in subsection (5)
of this section: PROVIDED, That if an employer's taxable payroll falls within
two or more rate classes, the employer and any other employer with the same
benefit ratio shall be assigned to the lowest rate class which includes any
portion of the employer's taxable payroll.

(5) Except as provided
in RCW 50.29.026, the contribution rate for each employer in the array shall be
the rate specified in the following tables for the rate class to which he or
she has been assigned, as determined under subsection (4) of this section,
within the tax schedule which is to be in effect during the rate year:

Percent of

Cumulative Schedules of Contributions
Rates

Taxable Payrolls for Effective Tax Schedule

Rate

From To Class AA A B C D E F

0.00 5.00 1 0.47 0.47 0.57 0.97 1.47 1.87 2.47

5.01 10.00 2 0.47 0.47 0.77 1.17 1.67 2.07 2.67

10.01 15.00 3 0.57 0.57 0.97 1.37 1.77 2.27 2.87

15.01 20.00 4 0.57 0.73 1.11 1.51 1.90 2.40 2.98

20.01 25.00 5 0.72 0.92 1.30 1.70 2.09 2.59 3.08

25.01 30.00 6 0.91 1.11 1.49 1.89 2.29 2.69 3.18

30.01 35.00 7 1.00 1.29 1.69 2.08 2.48 2.88 3.27

35.01 40.00 8 1.19 1.48 1.88 2.27 2.67 3.07 3.47

40.01 45.00 9 1.37 1.67 2.07 2.47 2.87 3.27 3.66

45.01 50.00 10 1.56 1.86 2.26 2.66 3.06 3.46 3.86

50.01 55.00 11 1.84 2.14 2.45 2.85 3.25 3.66 3.95

55.01 60.00 12 2.03 2.33 2.64 3.04 3.44 3.85 4.15

60.01 65.00 13 2.22 2.52 2.83 3.23 3.64 4.04 4.34

65.01 70.00 14 2.40 2.71 3.02 3.43 3.83 4.24 4.54

70.01 75.00 15 2.68 2.90 3.21 3.62 4.02 4.43 4.63

75.01 80.00 16 2.87 3.09 ((3.69)) 3.81 4.22 4.53 4.73

3.42

80.01 85.00 17 3.27 3.47 3.77 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97

85.01 90.00 18 3.67 3.87 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97 5.17

90.01 95.00 19 4.07 4.27 4.57 4.97 5.07 5.17 5.37

95.01 100.00 20 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40

(6) The contribution
rate for each employer not qualified to be in the array shall be as follows:

(a) Employers who do
not meet the definition of "qualified employer" by reason of failure
to pay contributions when due shall be assigned a contribution rate two-tenths
higher than that in rate class 20 for the applicable rate year, except
employers who have an approved agency-deferred payment contract by September 30
of the previous rate year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred
payment contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely manner, the
employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to a contribution rate two-tenths
higher than that in rate class 20 for the applicable rate year; and

(b) For
all other employers not qualified to be in the array, the contribution rate
shall be a rate equal to the average industry rate as determined by the
commissioner; however, the rate may not be less than one percent. Assignment
of employers by the commissioner to industrial classification, for purposes of
this section, shall be in accordance with established classification practices
found in the "Standard Industrial Classification Manual" issued by
the federal office of management and budget to the third digit provided in the
standard industrial classification code, or in the North American industry
classification system code.

--- END ---