BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.24.244 and 1998 c
126 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a
license for microbreweries; fee to be one hundred dollars for production of
less than sixty thousand barrels of malt liquor, including strong beer,
per year.

(2) Any microbrewery
license under this section may also act as a distributor and/or retailer for
beer and strong beer of its own production. Any microbrewery operating
as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection shall comply with the
applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers.

(3) The board may issue
an endorsement to this license allowing for on-premises consumption of beer, including
strong beer, wine, or both of other manufacture if purchased from a
Washington state-licensed distributor. Each endorsement shall cost two hundred
dollars per year, or four hundred dollars per year allowing the sale and
service of both beer and wine.

(4) The
microbrewer obtaining such endorsement must determine, at the time the
endorsement is issued, whether the licensed premises will be operated either as
a tavern with persons under twenty-one years of age not allowed as provided for
in RCW 66.24.330, or as a beer and/or wine restaurant as described in RCW
66.24.320.

Sec. 2. RCW 66.24.250 and 1997 c
321 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a
license for beer distributors to sell beer and strong beer, purchased
from licensed Washington breweries, beer certificate of approval holders (B5),
licensed beer importers, or suppliers of foreign beer located outside the state
of Washington, to licensed beer retailers and other beer distributors and to
export same from the state of Washington; fee six hundred sixty dollars per
year for each distributing unit.

Sec. 3. RCW 66.24.261 and 1997 c
321 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a
license for beer importers that authorizes the licensee to import beer and
strong beer manufactured within the United States by certificate of
approval holders (B5) into the state of Washington. The licensee may also
import beer and strong beer manufactured outside the United States.

(1) Beer and strong
beer so imported may be sold to licensed beer distributors or exported from
the state.

(2) Every person, firm,
or corporation licensed as a beer importer shall establish and maintain a
principal office within the state at which shall be kept proper records of all
beer and strong beer imported into the state under this license.

(3) No beer importer's
license shall be granted to a nonresident of the state nor to a corporation
whose principal place of business is outside the state until such applicant has
established a principal office and agent within the state upon which service
can be made.

(4) As a requirement
for license approval, a beer importer shall enter into a written agreement with
the board to furnish on or before the twentieth day of each month, a report
under oath, detailing the quantity of beer and strong beer sold or
delivered to each licensed beer distributor. Failure to file such reports may
result in the suspension or cancellation of this license.

(5) Beer and strong
beer imported under this license must conform to the provisions of RCW
66.28.120 and have received label approval from the board. The board shall not
certify beer or strong beer labeled with names which may be confused
with other nonalcoholic beverages whether manufactured or produced from a
domestic brewery or imported nor shall it certify beer or strong beer
which fails to meet quality standards established by the board.

(6) The
license fee shall be one hundred sixty dollars per year.

Sec. 4. RCW 66.24.270 and 1997 c
321 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person, firm
or corporation, holding a license to manufacture malt liquors or strong beer
within the state of Washington, shall, on or before the twentieth day of each
month, furnish to the Washington state liquor control board, on a form to be
prescribed by the board, a statement showing the quantity of malt liquors and
strong beer sold for resale during the preceding calendar month to each
beer distributor within the state of Washington.

(2) A United States
brewery or manufacturer of beer or strong beer, located outside the
state of Washington, must hold a certificate of approval (B5) to allow sales
and shipment of the certificate of approval holder's beer or strong beer
to licensed Washington beer distributors or importers. The certificate of
approval shall not be granted unless and until such brewer or manufacturer of
beer or strong beer shall have made a written agreement with the board
to furnish to the board, on or before the twentieth day of each month, a report
under oath, on a form to be prescribed by the board, showing the quantity of
beer and strong beer sold or delivered to each licensed beer distributor
or importer during the preceding month, and shall further have agreed with the
board, that such brewer or manufacturer of beer or strong beer and all
general sales corporations or agencies maintained by them, and all of their
trade representatives, corporations, and agencies, shall and will faithfully
comply with all laws of the state of Washington pertaining to the sale of
intoxicating liquors and all rules and regulations of the Washington state
liquor control board. A violation of the terms of this agreement will cause
the board to take action to suspend or revoke such certificate.

(3) The fee for the
certificate of approval, issued pursuant to the provisions of this title, shall
be one hundred dollars per year, which sum shall accompany the application for
such certificate.

Sec. 5. RCW 66.24.290 and 1999 c
281 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any microbrewer or
domestic brewery or beer distributor licensed under this title may sell and
deliver beer and strong beer to holders of authorized licenses direct,
but to no other person, other than the board; and every such brewery or beer
distributor shall report all sales to the board monthly, pursuant to the
regulations, and shall pay to the board as an added tax for the privilege of
manufacturing and selling the beer and strong beer within the state a
tax of one dollar and thirty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons on sales to
licensees within the state and on sales to licensees within the state of
bottled and canned beer, including strong beer, shall pay a tax computed
in gallons at the rate of one dollar and thirty cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons. Any brewery or beer distributor whose applicable tax payment is not
postmarked by the twentieth day following the month of sale will be assessed a
penalty at the rate of two percent per month or fraction thereof. Beer and
strong beer shall be sold by breweries and distributors in sealed barrels
or packages. The moneys collected under this subsection shall be distributed as
follows: (a) Three-tenths of a percent shall be distributed to border areas
under RCW 66.08.195; and (b) of the remaining moneys: (i) Twenty percent shall
be distributed to counties in the same manner as under RCW 66.08.200; and (ii)
eighty percent shall be distributed to incorporated cities and towns in the
same manner as under RCW 66.08.210.

(2) An additional tax
is imposed on all beer and strong beer subject to tax under subsection
(1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to two dollars per barrel of
thirty-one gallons. All revenues collected during any month from this
additional tax shall be deposited in the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month.

(3)(a) An additional
tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to ninety-six
cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons through June 30, 1995, two dollars and
thirty-nine cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons for the period July 1, 1995,
through June 30, 1997, and four dollars and seventy-eight cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons thereafter.

(b) The additional tax
imposed under this subsection does not apply to the sale of the first sixty thousand
barrels of beer and strong beer each year by breweries that are entitled
to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as existing on July 1,
1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the board by rule
consistent with the purposes of this exemption.

(c) All revenues
collected from the additional tax imposed under this subsection (3) shall be
deposited in the health services account under RCW 43.72.900.

(4) An additional tax
is imposed on all beer and strong beer that is subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section that is in the first sixty thousand barrels of
beer and strong beer by breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of
tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent
date as may be provided by the board by rule consistent with the purposes of
the exemption under subsection (3)(b) of this section. The additional tax is
equal to one dollar and forty-eight and two-tenths cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons. By the twenty-fifth day of the following month, three
percent of the revenues collected from this additional tax shall be distributed
to border areas under RCW 66.08.195 and the remaining moneys shall be
transferred to the state general fund.

(5) The board may make
refunds for all taxes paid on beer and strong beer exported from the
state for use outside the state.

(6) The board may
require filing with the board of a bond to be approved by it, in such amount as
the board may fix, securing the payment of the tax. If any licensee fails to
pay the tax when due, the board may forthwith suspend or cancel his or her
license until all taxes are paid.

(((7) The tax
imposed under this section shall not apply to "strong beer" as
defined in this title.))

Sec. 6. RCW 66.24.320 and 1998 c
126 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a beer
and/or wine restaurant license to sell beer, including strong beer, or
wine, or both, at retail, for consumption on the premises. A patron of the
licensee may remove from the premises, recorked or recapped in its original
container, any portion of wine that was purchased for consumption with a meal.

(1) The annual fee
shall be two hundred dollars for the beer license, two hundred dollars for the
wine license, or four hundred dollars for a combination beer and wine license.

(2) The board may issue
a caterer's endorsement to this license to allow the licensee to remove from
the liquor stocks at the licensed premises, only those types of liquor that are
authorized under the on-premises license privileges for sale and service at
special occasion locations at a specified date and place not currently licensed
by the board. The privilege of selling and serving liquor under the
endorsement is limited to members and guests of a society or organization as
defined in RCW 66.24.375. Cost of the endorsement is three hundred fifty
dollars.

(a) The holder of this
license with catering endorsement shall, if requested by the board, notify the
board or its designee of the date, time, place, and location of any catered
event. Upon request, the licensee shall provide to the board all necessary or
requested information concerning the society or organization that will be
holding the function at which the endorsed license will be utilized.

(b) If attendance at
the function will be limited to members and invited guests of the sponsoring
society or organization, the requirement that the society or organization be
within the definition of RCW 66.24.375 is waived.

Sec. 7. RCW 66.24.330 and 1997 c
321 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a beer
and wine retailer's license to be designated as a tavern license to sell beer,
including strong beer, or wine, or both, at retail, for consumption on the
premises. Such licenses may be issued only to a person operating a tavern that
may be frequented only by persons twenty-one years of age and older.

The annual fee for such
license shall be two hundred dollars for the beer license, two hundred dollars
for the wine license, or four hundred dollars for a combination beer and wine
license. Licensees who have a fee increase of more than one hundred dollars as
a result of this change shall have their fees increased fifty percent of the
amount the first renewal year and the remaining amount beginning with the
second renewal period. New licensees obtaining a license after July 1, 1998,
shall pay the full amount of four hundred dollars.

Sec. 8. RCW 66.24.371 and 1997 c
321 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a
beer and/or wine retailer's license to be designated as a beer and/or wine
specialty shop license to sell beer, strong beer, and/or wine at retail
in bottles, cans, and original containers, not to be consumed upon the premises
where sold, at any store other than the state liquor stores. Licensees
obtaining a written endorsement from the board may also sell malt liquor in
kegs or other containers capable of holding less than five and one-half gallons
of liquid. The annual fee for the beer and/or wine specialty shop license is
one hundred dollars for each store.

(2) Licensees under
this section may provide, free or for a charge, single-serving samples of two
ounces or less to customers for the purpose of sales promotion. Sampling
activities of licensees under this section are subject to RCW 66.28.010 and
66.28.040 and the cost of sampling under this section may not be borne,
directly or indirectly, by any manufacturer, importer, or distributor of
liquor.

(3) The board shall
issue a restricted beer and/or wine specialty shop license, authorizing the
licensee to sell beer and only table wine, if the board finds upon issuance or
renewal of the license that the sale of strong beer or fortified wine
would be against the public interest. In determining the public interest, the
board shall consider at least the following factors:

(a) The likelihood that
the applicant will sell strong beer or fortified wine to persons who are
intoxicated;

(b) Law enforcement
problems in the vicinity of the applicant's establishment that may arise from
persons purchasing strong beer or fortified wine at the establishment;
and

(c) Whether the sale of
strong beer or fortified wine would be detrimental to or inconsistent
with a government-operated or funded alcohol treatment or detoxification
program in the area.

If the board receives
no evidence or objection that the sale of strong beer or fortified wine
would be against the public interest, it shall issue or renew the license
without restriction, as applicable. The burden of establishing that the sale
of strong beer or fortified wine by the licensee would be against the
public interest is on those persons objecting.

(4)
Licensees holding a beer and/or wine specialty shop license must maintain a
minimum three thousand dollar wholesale inventory of beer, strong beer,
and/or wine.

Sec. 9. RCW 66.24.452 and 2001 c
199 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a
beer and wine license to be issued to a private club for sale of beer,
strong beer, and wine for on-premises consumption.

(2) Beer, strong
beer, and wine sold by the licensee may be on tap or by open bottles or
cans.

(3) The fee for the
private club beer and wine license is one hundred eighty dollars per year.

(4) The
board may issue an endorsement to the private club beer and wine license that
allows the holder of a private club beer and wine license to sell for
off-premises consumption wine vinted and bottled in the state of Washington and
carrying a label exclusive to the license holder selling the wine. Spirits,
strong beer, and beer may not be sold for off-premises consumption under
this section. The annual fee for the endorsement under this ((chapter
[section])) section is one hundred twenty dollars.

Sec. 10. RCW 82.08.150 and 1998 c
126 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and
shall be collected a tax upon each retail sale of spirits((, or strong beer))
in the original package at the rate of fifteen percent of the selling price.
The tax imposed in this subsection shall apply to all such sales including sales
by the Washington state liquor stores and agencies, but excluding sales to
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.

(2) There is levied and
shall be collected a tax upon each sale of spirits((, or strong beer))
in the original package at the rate of ten percent of the selling price on
sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies to spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant licensees.

(3) There is levied and
shall be collected an additional tax upon each retail sale of spirits in the
original package at the rate of one dollar and seventy-two cents per liter.
The additional tax imposed in this subsection shall apply to all such sales
including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and including
sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.

(4) An additional tax
is imposed equal to fourteen percent multiplied by the taxes payable under
subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section.

(5) An additional tax
is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits in the original package at the rate
of seven cents per liter. The additional tax imposed in this subsection shall
apply to all such sales including sales by Washington state liquor stores and
agencies, and including sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
All revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under RCW
69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.

(6)(a) An additional
tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in the original package at the rate
of one and seven-tenths percent of the selling price through June 30, 1995, two
and six-tenths percent of the selling price for the period July 1, 1995,
through June 30, 1997, and three and four-tenths of the selling price
thereafter. This additional tax applies to all such sales including sales by
Washington state liquor stores and agencies, but excluding sales to spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant licensees.

(b) An additional tax
is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in the original package at the rate of
one and one-tenth percent of the selling price through June 30, 1995, one and
seven-tenths percent of the selling price for the period July 1, 1995, through
June 30, 1997, and two and three-tenths of the selling price thereafter. This
additional tax applies to all such sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
licensees.

(c) An additional tax
is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits in the original package at the rate
of twenty cents per liter through June 30, 1995, thirty cents per liter for the
period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997, and forty-one cents per liter
thereafter. This additional tax applies to all such sales including sales by
Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and including sales to spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant licensees.

(d) All revenues
collected during any month from additional taxes under this subsection shall be
deposited in the health services account created under RCW 43.72.900 by the
twenty-fifth day of the following month.

(7) The tax imposed in
RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of spirits ((or strong beer)) in
the original package.

(8) The taxes imposed
in this section shall be paid by the buyer to the seller, and each seller shall
collect from the buyer the full amount of the tax payable in respect to each
taxable sale under this section. The taxes required by this section to be
collected by the seller shall be stated separately from the selling price and
for purposes of determining the tax due from the buyer to the seller, it shall
be conclusively presumed that the selling price quoted in any price list does
not include the taxes imposed by this section.

(9) As used in this
section, the terms, "spirits((," "strong beer,))"
and "package" shall have the meaning ascribed to them in chapter
66.04 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---