BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.36.150 and 1987 c
202 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

Jurors shall receive
for each day's attendance, besides mileage at the rate determined under RCW
43.03.060, the following compensation:

(1) Grand jurors may
receive up to ((twenty-five)) fifty-five dollars but in no case
less than ten dollars;

(2) Petit jurors may
receive up to ((twenty-five)) fifty-five dollars but in no case
less than ten dollars;

(3) Coroner's jurors
may receive up to ((twenty-five)) fifty-five dollars but in no
case less than ten dollars;

(4) District court
jurors may receive up to ((twenty-five)) fifty-five dollars but
in no case less than ten dollars:

PROVIDED, That
a person excused from jury service at his or her own request shall be allowed
not more than a per diem and such mileage, if any, as to the court shall seem
just and equitable under all circumstances: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the state
shall fully reimburse the county in which trial is held for all jury fees and
witness fees related to criminal cases which result from incidents occurring
within an adult or juvenile correctional institution: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
the compensation paid jurors shall be determined by the county legislative
authority and shall be uniformly applied within the county.

Sec. 2. RCW 3.50.135 and 1984 c
258 s 126 are each amended to read as follows:

In all civil cases, the
plaintiff or defendant may demand a jury, which shall consist of six citizens
of the state who shall be impaneled and sworn as in cases before district
courts, or the trial may be by a judge of the municipal court: PROVIDED, That
no jury trial may be held on a proceeding involving a traffic infraction. A
party requesting a jury shall pay to the court a fee which shall be the same as
that for a jury in district court. If more than one party requests a jury,
only one jury fee shall be collected by the court. The fee shall be
apportioned among the requesting parties. Each juror may receive up to ((twenty-five))
fifty-five dollars but in no case less than ten dollars for each day in
attendance upon the municipal court, and in addition thereto shall receive
mileage at the rate determined under RCW 43.03.060: PROVIDED, That the
compensation paid jurors shall be determined by the legislative authority of
the city and shall be uniformly applied. Jury trials shall be allowed in all
criminal cases unless waived by the defendant.

Sec. 3. RCW 35.20.090 and 1987 c
202 s 195 are each amended to read as follows:

In all civil cases and
criminal cases where jurisdiction is concurrent with district courts as
provided in RCW 35.20.250, within the jurisdiction of the municipal court, the
plaintiff or defendant may demand a jury, which shall consist of six citizens
of the state who shall be impaneled and sworn as in cases before district
courts, or the trial may be by a judge of the municipal court: PROVIDED, That
no jury trial may be held on a proceeding involving a traffic infraction. A
defendant requesting a jury shall pay to the court a fee which shall be the
same as that for a jury in district court. Where there is more than one
defendant in an action and one or more of them requests a jury, only one jury
fee shall be collected by the court. Each juror may receive up to ((twenty-five))
fifty-five dollars but in no case less than ten dollars for each day in
attendance upon the municipal court, and in addition thereto shall receive
mileage at the rate determined under RCW 43.03.060: PROVIDED, That the
compensation paid jurors shall be determined by the legislative authority of
the city and shall be uniformly applied. Trial by jury shall be allowed in
criminal cases involving violations of city ordinances commencing January 1,
1972, unless such incorporated city affected by this chapter has made provision
therefor prior to January 1, 1972.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 84.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A city may levy an
annual regular property tax of up to two cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value upon the assessed valuation of all taxable property in the city for
purposes of juror compensation.

(2) A county may levy
an annual regular property tax of up to two cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value upon the assessed valuation of all taxable property in the
county for purposes of juror compensation.

(3) The limitations in
RCW 84.52.043 do not apply to the tax levies authorized in this section.

Sec. 5. RCW 84.52.010 and 1995
2nd sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as is permitted
under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be levied or voted in specific amounts.

The rate percent of all
taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing districts
coextensive with the county, shall be determined, calculated and fixed by the
county assessors of the respective counties, within the limitations provided by
law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes levied for
purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be determined, calculated
and fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the
limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the
taxing districts respectively.

When a county assessor
finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is subject to
the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the
limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor shall recompute
and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(1) The full certified
rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district, and city or town
purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not exceeding the
limitations established by law; however any state levy shall take precedence
over all other levies and shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that
required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW
84.52.069, 84.34.230, section 4 of the act, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, and
84.52.105, the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to
the one percent limitation exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of
any property, then these levies shall be reduced as follows:

(a) The levies under
section 4 of this act shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or shall be eliminated;

(b) If the combined
rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent
limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property, then the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that
is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or shall
be eliminated;

(((b))) (c) If
the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one
percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property, then the levies imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any
portion of the levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis
until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair
value of any property or shall be eliminated; and

(((c))) (d) If
the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one
percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property, then the thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of tax
levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or
eliminated.

(2) The certified rates
of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior taxing districts
imposing taxes on such property shall be reduced or eliminated as follows to
bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the provisions of
these limitations:

(a) First, the
certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts authorized
under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated;

(b) Second, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;

(c) Third, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other than fire
protection districts, library districts, the first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts, and the
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for public
hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(d) Fourth, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under RCW
52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and

(e) Fifth, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts under RCW
52.16.130, library districts, metropolitan park districts under their first
fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public hospital
districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

In determining whether
the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is subject to the
limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in
that section, the assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy, as
apportioned to the county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW
84.48.080 without regard to the reduction under RCW 84.55.012.

Sec. 6. RCW 84.52.043 and 1995 c
99 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Within and subject to
the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as amended, the regular ad valorem tax
levies upon real and personal property by the taxing districts hereafter named
shall be as follows:

(1) Levies of the
senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a) The levy by the state shall
not exceed three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value
adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio
fixed by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support
of the common schools; (b) the levy by any county shall not exceed one dollar
and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (c) the levy by any
road district shall not exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value; and (d) the levy by any city or town shall not
exceed three dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value. However any county is hereby authorized to increase its
levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a rate not to exceed two dollars and
forty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for
general county purposes if the total levies for both the county and any road
district within the county do not exceed four dollars and five cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy
reduced as a result of the increased county levy.

(2) The aggregate
levies of junior taxing districts and senior taxing districts, other than the
state, shall not exceed five dollars and ninety cents per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation. The term "junior taxing districts" includes all
taxing districts other than the state, counties, road districts, cities, towns,
port districts, and public utility districts. The limitations provided in this
subsection shall not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing
law by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax
levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution; (c)
levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW 84.34.230;
(d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical services imposed
under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable housing for very
low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; ((and)) (f) the portions
of levies by metropolitan park districts that are protected under RCW 84.52.120;
and (g) levies for juror compensation under section 4 of this act.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.135.060 and 1998
c 321 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After July 1, 1995,
the legislature shall not impose responsibility for new programs or increased
levels of service under existing programs on any political subdivision of the
state unless the subdivision is fully reimbursed by the state for the costs of
the new programs or increases in service levels. Reimbursement by the state
may be made by: (a) A specific appropriation; or (b) increases in state
distributions of revenue to political subdivisions occurring after January 1,
1998.

(2) If by order of any
court, or legislative enactment, the costs of a federal or local government
program are transferred to or from the state, the otherwise applicable state
expenditure limit shall be increased or decreased, as the case may be, by the
dollar amount of the costs of the program.

(3) The legislature, in
consultation with the office of financial management or its successor agency,
shall determine the costs of any new programs or increased levels of service
under existing programs imposed on any political subdivision or transferred to
or from the state.

(4) Money raised by
the city or county under section 4 of this act shall constitute appropriate
reimbursement for any liabilities under subsection (1) of this section
associated with the implementation of chapter . . ., Laws of 2002
(this act).

(5)
Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the costs incurred for voting
devices or machines under RCW 29.04.200.

---
END ---