BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 17.28.100 and 1982 c
217 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

At the same election
there shall be submitted to the voters residing within the district, for their
approval or rejection, a proposition authorizing the mosquito control district,
if formed, to levy at the earliest time permitted by law on all taxable
property located within the mosquito control district a general tax, for one
year, of up to twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value in
excess of any constitutional or statutory limitation for authorized purposes of
the mosquito control district. The proposition shall be expressed on the
ballots in substantially the following form:

"ONE
YEAR . . . . . . CENTS PER

THOUSAND
DOLLARS OF ASSESSED VALUE LEVY

Shall the mosquito
control district, if formed, levy a general tax of
. . . . . . cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value for one year upon all the taxable property within said district in excess
of the constitutional and/or statutory tax limits for authorized purposes of
the district?

YES ................................................. G

NO.................................................... G"

Such proposition to be
effective must be approved by a majority of at least three-fifths of the
persons voting on the proposition to levy such tax in the manner set forth in
Article VII, section 2(a) of the Constitution of this state((, as amended by
Amendment 59 and as thereafter amended)).

Sec. 2. RCW 17.28.252 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 195 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A mosquito control
district shall have the power to levy additional taxes in excess of the
constitutional and/or statutory limitations for any of the authorized purposes
of such district, not in excess of fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value per year for up to four years for general purposes and up to six years
for the construction, modernization, or remodeling of facilities, when
authorized so to do by the electors of such district by a three-fifths majority
of those voting on the proposition in the manner set forth in Article VII,
section 2(a) of the Constitution of this state, ((as amended by Amendment 59
and as thereafter amended)) at such time as may be fixed by the board of
trustees for the district, which special election may be called by the board of
trustees of the district, at which special election the proposition of
authorizing such excess levy or levies shall be submitted in such form
as to enable the voters favoring the proposition to vote "Yes" and
those opposing thereto to vote "No". Nothing herein shall be
construed to prevent holding the foregoing special election at the same time as
that fixed for a general election.

Sec. 3. RCW 35.58.116 and 1967 c
105 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The metropolitan
council may at the same election called to authorize the performance of an
additional function or at a special election called by the council after it has
been authorized to perform any metropolitan function submit a proposition for
the issuance of general obligation bonds for capital purposes as provided in
RCW 35.58.450 or a proposition for the levy of a general tax or taxes
for ((any authorized purpose for one year)) up to four years for
general purposes and up to six years for the construction, modernization, or
remodeling of facilities in such total dollar amount as the metropolitan
council may determine and specify in such proposition. Any such proposition to
be effective must be assented to by ((at least three-fifths of the persons
voting thereon and the number of persons voting on such proposition shall
constitute not less than forty percent of the total number of votes cast within
the metropolitan area at the last preceding state general election)) the
voters of the metropolitan municipal corporation as provided in Article VII,
section 2 (a) and (b) of the state Constitution. Any such proposition
shall only be effective if the performance of the additional function shall be
authorized at such election or shall have been authorized prior thereto.

Sec. 4. RCW 35.61.210 and 1997 c
3 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:

The board of park
commissioners may levy or cause to be levied a general tax on all the property
located in said park district each year not to exceed fifty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value of the property in such park district. In addition,
the board of park commissioners may levy or cause to be levied a general tax on
all property located in said park district each year not to exceed twenty-five
cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation. Although park districts are
authorized to impose two separate regular property tax levies, the levies shall
be considered to be a single levy for purposes of the limitation provided for
in chapter 84.55 RCW.

The board is hereby
authorized to levy a general tax in excess of its regular property tax levy or
levies for up to four years for general purposes and up to six years for the
construction, modernization, or remodeling of facilities, when authorized
so to do at a special election conducted in accordance with and subject to all
the requirements of the Constitution and laws of the state now in force or
hereafter enacted governing the limitation of tax levies. The board is hereby
authorized to call a special election for the purpose of submitting to the
qualified voters of the park district a proposition to levy a tax or taxes
in excess of the seventy-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value
herein specifically authorized. The manner of submitting any such proposition,
of certifying the same, and of giving or publishing notice thereof, shall be as
provided by law for the submission of propositions by cities or towns.

The board shall include
in its general tax levy for each year a sufficient sum to pay the interest on
all outstanding bonds and may include a sufficient amount to create a sinking
fund for the redemption of all outstanding bonds. The levy shall be certified
to the proper county officials for collection the same as other general taxes
and when collected, the general tax shall be placed in a separate fund in the
office of the county treasurer to be known as the "metropolitan park
district fund" and paid out on warrants.

Sec. 5. RCW 36.58.150 and 1984 c
186 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A solid waste
disposal district shall not have the power to levy an annual levy without voter
approval, but it shall have the power to levy a tax or taxes, in excess
of the one percent limitation, upon the property within the district for ((a
one year period)) up to four years for general purposes and up to six
years for the construction, modernization, or remodeling of facilities, to
be used for operating or capital purposes whenever authorized by the electors
of the district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a) of the
state Constitution.

A solid waste disposal
district may issue general obligation bonds for capital purposes only, subject
to the limitations prescribed in RCW 39.36.020(1), and may provide for the
retirement of the bonds by voter-approved bond retirement tax levies pursuant
to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state Constitution and RCW 84.52.056. Such
general obligation bonds shall be issued and sold in accordance with chapter
39.46 RCW.

A solid waste disposal
district may issue revenue bonds to fund its activities. Such revenue bonds
may be in any form, including bearer bonds or registered bonds as provided in
RCW 39.46.030.

(2) Notwithstanding
subsection (1) of this section, such revenue bonds may be issued and sold in
accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

Sec. 6. RCW 36.60.040 and 1983 c
303 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

A county rail district
is not authorized to impose a regular ad valorem property tax levy but may:

(1) Levy an ad valorem
property tax or taxes, in excess of the one percent limitation, upon the
property within the district for ((a one-year period)) up to four
years for general purposes and up to six years for the construction,
modernization, or remodeling of facilities, to be used for operating or
capital purposes whenever authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to
RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

(2) Provide for the
retirement of voter approved general obligation bonds, issued for capital
purposes only, by levying bond retirement ad valorem property tax levies, in
excess of the one percent limitation, whenever authorized by the voters of the
district pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state Constitution and
RCW 84.52.056.

Sec. 7. RCW 36.68.480 and 1984 c
131 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

If the petition or
resolution initiating the formation of the proposed park and recreation service
area proposes that the initial capital or operational costs are to be financed
by regular property tax levies for a six-year period as authorized by RCW
36.68.525, or an annual excess levy or levies, or that proposed capital
costs are to be financed by the issuance of general obligation bonds and bond
retirement levies, a proposition or propositions for such purpose or purposes
shall be submitted to the voters of the proposed service area at the same
election. A proposition or propositions for regular property tax levies for a
six-year period as authorized by RCW 36.68.525, an annual excess levy or
levies, or the issuance of general obligation bonds and bond retirement
levies, may also be submitted to the voters at any general or special election.

Sec. 8. RCW 36.73.060 and 1987 c
327 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A transportation
benefit district may levy an ad valorem property tax in excess of the one
percent limitation upon the property within the district for ((a one-year
period)) up to four years for general purposes and up to six years for
the construction, modernization, or remodeling of facilities, whenever
authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article
VII, section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

(2) A district may
provide for the retirement of voter-approved general obligation bonds, issued
for capital purposes only, by levying bond retirement ad valorem property tax
levies in excess of the one percent limitation whenever authorized by the
voters of the district pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state
Constitution and RCW 84.52.056.

Sec. 9. RCW 36.83.030 and 1983 c
130 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A service district
may levy an ad valorem property tax, in excess of the one percent limitation,
upon the property within the district for ((a one-year period)) up to
four years for general purposes and up to six years for the construction,
modernization, or remodeling of facilities, whenever authorized by the
voters of the district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a)
of the state Constitution.

(2) A service district
may provide for the retirement of voter approved general obligation bonds,
issued for capital purposes only, by levying bond retirement ad valorem
property tax levies, in excess of the one percent limitation, whenever
authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b)
of the state Constitution and RCW 84.52.056.

Sec. 10. RCW 36.100.050 and 1988
ex.s. c 1 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A public facilities
district may levy an ad valorem property tax, in excess of the one percent
limitation, upon the property within the district for ((a one-year period))
up to four years for general purposes and up to six years for the
construction, modernization, or remodeling of facilities, to be used for
operating or capital purposes whenever authorized by the voters of the district
pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a) of the state
Constitution.

(2) A public
facilities district may provide for the retirement of voter-approved general
obligation bonds, issued for capital purposes only, by levying bond retirement
ad valorem property tax levies, in excess of the one percent limitation,
whenever authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to Article VII,
section 2(b) of the state Constitution and RCW 84.52.056.

Sec. 11. RCW 70.44.060 and 2001 c
76 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

All public hospital
districts organized under the provisions of this chapter shall have power:

(1) To make a survey of
existing hospital and other health care facilities within and without such
district.

(2) To construct,
condemn and purchase, purchase, acquire, lease, add to, maintain, operate,
develop and regulate, sell and convey all lands, property, property rights,
equipment, hospital and other health care facilities and systems for the
maintenance of hospitals, buildings, structures, and any and all other
facilities, and to exercise the right of eminent domain to effectuate the
foregoing purposes or for the acquisition and damaging of the same or property
of any kind appurtenant thereto, and such right of eminent domain shall be
exercised and instituted pursuant to a resolution of the commission and
conducted in the same manner and by the same procedure as in or may be provided
by law for the exercise of the power of eminent domain by incorporated cities
and towns of the state of Washington in the acquisition of property rights:
PROVIDED, That no public hospital district shall have the right of eminent
domain and the power of condemnation against any health care facility.

(3) To lease existing
hospital and other health care facilities and equipment and/or other property
used in connection therewith, including ambulances, and to pay such rental
therefor as the commissioners shall deem proper; to provide hospital and other
health care services for residents of said district by facilities located
outside the boundaries of said district, by contract or in any other manner
said commissioners may deem expedient or necessary under the existing
conditions; and said hospital district shall have the power to contract with
other communities, corporations, or individuals for the services provided by
said hospital district; and they may further receive in said hospitals and
other health care facilities and furnish proper and adequate services to all
persons not residents of said district at such reasonable and fair compensation
as may be considered proper: PROVIDED, That it must at all times make adequate
provision for the needs of the district and residents of said district shall
have prior rights to the available hospital and other health care facilities of
said district, at rates set by the district commissioners.

(4) For the purpose
aforesaid, it shall be lawful for any district so organized to take, condemn
and purchase, lease, or acquire, any and all property, and property rights,
including state and county lands, for any of the purposes aforesaid, and any
and all other facilities necessary or convenient, and in connection with the
construction, maintenance, and operation of any such hospitals and other health
care facilities, subject, however, to the applicable limitations provided in
subsection (2) of this section.

(5) To contract
indebtedness or borrow money for corporate purposes on the credit of the
corporation or the revenues of the hospitals thereof, and the revenues of any
other facilities or services that the district is or hereafter may be
authorized by law to provide, and to issue and sell: (a) Revenue bonds,
revenue warrants, or other revenue obligations therefor payable solely out of a
special fund or funds into which the district may pledge such amount of the
revenues of the hospitals thereof, and the revenues of any other facilities or
services that the district is or hereafter may be authorized by law to provide,
to pay the same as the commissioners of the district may determine, such
revenue bonds, warrants, or other obligations to be issued and sold in the same
manner and subject to the same provisions as provided for the issuance of
revenue bonds, warrants, or other obligations by cities or towns under the
Municipal Revenue Bond Act, chapter 35.41 RCW, as may hereafter be amended; (b)
general obligation bonds therefor in the manner and form as provided in RCW
70.44.110 and 70.44.130, as may hereafter be amended; or (c) interest-bearing
warrants to be drawn on a fund pending deposit in such fund of money sufficient
to redeem such warrants and to be issued and paid in such manner and upon such
terms and conditions as the board of commissioners may deem to be in the best
interest of the district; and to assign or sell hospital accounts receivable,
and accounts receivable for the use of other facilities or services that the
district is or hereafter may be authorized by law to provide, for collection
with or without recourse. General obligation bonds shall be issued and sold in
accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW. Revenue bonds, revenue warrants, or other
revenue obligations may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46
RCW.

(6) To raise revenue by
the levy of an annual tax on all taxable property within such public hospital
district not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, and
an additional annual tax on all taxable property within such public hospital
district not to exceed twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value, or such further amount as has been or shall be authorized by a vote of
the people. Although public hospital districts are authorized to impose two
separate regular property tax levies, the levies shall be considered to be a
single levy for purposes of the limitation provided for in chapter 84.55 RCW.
Public hospital districts are authorized to levy such a general tax or taxes
in excess of their regular property taxes when authorized so to do at a special
election conducted in accordance with and subject to all of the requirements of
the Constitution and the laws of the state of Washington now in force or
hereafter enacted governing the limitation of tax levies. The said board of
district commissioners is authorized and empowered to call a special election
for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters of the hospital district
a proposition or propositions to levy taxes in excess of its regular property
taxes. The superintendent shall prepare a proposed budget of the contemplated
financial transactions for the ensuing year and file the same in the records of
the commission on or before the first day of November. Notice of the filing of
said proposed budget and the date and place of hearing on the same shall be published
for at least two consecutive weeks, at least one time each week, in a newspaper
printed and of general circulation in said county. On or before the fifteenth
day of November the commission shall hold a public hearing on said proposed
budget at which any taxpayer may appear and be heard against the whole or any
part of the proposed budget. Upon the conclusion of said hearing, the
commission shall, by resolution, adopt the budget as finally determined and fix
the final amount of expenditures for the ensuing year. Taxes levied by the
commission shall be certified to and collected by the proper county officer of
the county in which such public hospital district is located in the same manner
as is or may be provided by law for the certification and collection of port
district taxes. The commission is authorized, prior to the receipt of taxes
raised by levy, to borrow money or issue warrants of the district in
anticipation of the revenue to be derived by such district from the levy of
taxes for the purpose of such district, and such warrants shall be redeemed
from the first money available from such taxes when collected, and such
warrants shall not exceed the anticipated revenues of one year, and shall bear
interest at a rate or rates as authorized by the commission.

(7) To enter into any
contract with the United States government or any state, municipality, or other
hospital district, or any department of those governing bodies, for carrying
out any of the powers authorized by this chapter.

(8) To sue and be sued
in any court of competent jurisdiction: PROVIDED, That all suits against the
public hospital district shall be brought in the county in which the public
hospital district is located.

(9) To pay actual
necessary travel expenses and living expenses incurred while in travel status
for (a) qualified physicians who are candidates for medical staff positions,
and (b) other qualified persons who are candidates for superintendent or other
managerial and technical positions, when the district finds that hospitals or
other health care facilities owned and operated by it are not adequately
staffed and determines that personal interviews with said candidates to be held
in the district are necessary or desirable for the adequate staffing of said facilities.

(10) To make contracts,
employ superintendents, attorneys, and other technical or professional
assistants and all other employees; to make contracts with private or public
institutions for employee retirement programs; to print and publish information
or literature; and to do all other things necessary to carry out the provisions
of this chapter.

Sec. 12. RCW 70.94.091 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 195 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

An activated authority
shall have the power to levy additional taxes in excess of the constitutional
and/or statutory tax limitations for any of the authorized purposes of such
activated authority, not in excess of twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value ((a year)) for up to four years for general purposes
and up to six years for the construction, modernization, or remodeling of
facilities, when authorized so to do by the electors of such authority by a
three-fifths majority of those voting on the proposition at a special election,
to be held in the year in which the initial levy is made, in the manner
set forth in Article VII, section 2 (a) of the Constitution of this state((,
as amended by Amendment 59 and as thereafter amended)). Nothing herein
shall be construed to prevent holding the foregoing special election at the
same time as that fixed for a general election. The expense of all special
elections held pursuant to this section shall be paid by the authority.

Sec. 13. RCW 84.52.052 and 1996 c
230 s 1615 are each amended to read as follows:

The limitations imposed
by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056, and RCW 84.52.043 shall not prevent the
levy of additional taxes by any taxing district except school districts in
which a larger levy is necessary in order to prevent the impairment of the
obligation of contracts. As used in this section, the term "taxing
district" means any county, metropolitan park district, park and
recreation service area, park and recreation district, water-sewer district,
solid waste disposal district, public facilities district, flood control zone
district, county rail district, service district, public hospital district,
road district, rural county library district, island library district, rural
partial-county library district, intercounty rural library district, fire
protection district, cemetery district, city, town, transportation benefit
district, emergency medical service district with a population density of less
than one thousand per square mile, or cultural arts, stadium, and convention
district.

Any such taxing
district may levy taxes at a rate in excess of the rate specified in RCW
84.52.050 through 84.52.056 and 84.52.043, or 84.55.010 through 84.55.050, when
authorized so to do by the voters of such taxing district in the manner ((set
forth in)) and for the purposes and number of years allowable under
Article VII, section 2(a) of the Constitution of this state ((at a special
or general election to be held in the year in which the levy is made)). Elections
for such taxes shall be held in the year in which the levy is made or, in the
case of propositions authorizing two-year through four-year levies for general
purposes of the taxing district or authorizing two-year through six-year levies
to support the construction, modernization, or remodeling of facilities, in the
year in which the first annual levy is made: PROVIDED, That once additional
tax levies have been authorized for general purposes of a taxing district for a
two-year through four-year period, no further additional tax levies for general
purposes of the district for that period may be authorized.

A special election may
be called and the time therefor fixed by the county legislative authority, or
council, board of commissioners, or other governing body of any such taxing
district, by giving notice thereof by publication in the manner provided by law
for giving notices of general elections, at which special election the
proposition authorizing such excess levy shall be submitted in such form as to
enable the voters favoring the proposition to vote "yes" and those
opposed thereto to vote "no."

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003, if the proposed amendment to Article VII, section 2 of the
state Constitution (SJR --) is validly submitted to and is approved and
ratified by the voters at a general election held in November, 2002. If the
proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void in its
entirety.

---
END ---