BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that fishing gear that is lost or abandoned may continue to catch marine
organisms long after the gear is lost. The purpose of this act is to develop
safe, effective methods to remove derelict fishing gear, eliminate regulatory
barriers to gear removal, and discourage future losses of fishing gear.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) As used in this
section and section 3 of this act, "derelict fishing gear" includes
lost or abandoned fishing nets, fishing lines, crab pots, shrimp pots, and
other commercial and recreational fishing equipment. The term does not include
lost or abandoned vessels.

(2) The department, in
partnership with the Northwest straits commission, the department of natural
resources, and other interested parties, must publish guidelines for the safe
removal and disposal of derelict fishing gear. The guidelines must be completed
by August 31, 2002, and made available to any person interested in derelict
fishing gear removal.

(3) Derelict fishing
gear removal conducted in accordance with the guidelines prepared in subsection
(2) of this section is not subject to permitting under RCW 77.55.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department, in
consultation with the Northwest straits commission, the department of natural
resources, and other interested parties, must create and maintain a data base
of known derelict fishing gear, including the type of gear and its location.

(2) A person who loses
or abandons commercial fishing gear within the waters of the state is
encouraged to report the location of the loss and the type of gear lost to the
department within forty-eight hours of the loss.

(3) The department, in
consultation with fishing industry groups and tribal comanagers, must evaluate
methods to reduce future losses of fishing gear and report the results of this
evaluation to the appropriate legislative committees by January 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 77.55 RCW to read as follows:

The
removal of derelict fishing gear does not require written approval under this
chapter if the gear is removed according to the guidelines described in section
2 of this act.

---
END ---