BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Computer
information agreement" means a contract or agreement that falls within the
scope of the uniform computer information transactions act, whether or not that
act actually applies.

(2) "Party"
means a party to a computer information agreement.

(3) "Uniform
computer information transactions act" means the uniform computer
information transactions act as approved by the national conference of
commissioners on uniform state laws and enacted in any jurisdiction, or any
substantially similar law enacted in any jurisdiction.

(4) "Washington
state party" means a party that is a resident of this state or has its
principal place of business in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A provision in a computer
information agreement that would result in application of the uniform computer
information transactions act to that agreement is voidable by any party. If
the provision is so voided, the agreement will be governed by the laws of this
state if at least one party is a Washington state party. In an action based on
a computer information agreement that does not contain a choice of law
provision, any party may object to the application of the uniform computer
information transactions act to the agreement. If such an objection is made,
the agreement will be governed by the laws of this state if at least one party
is a Washington state party. A provision in a computer information agreement
that specifies that litigation or another dispute resolution process is to
occur in a state other than this state is voidable by any party, and the
dispute resolution process will take place in this state if at least one party
is a Washington state party. The provisions of this chapter reflect the
fundamental policy of Washington state, and may not be varied by agreement of
the parties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 4 RCW.

---
END ---