BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.07.037 and 1996 c
253 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state
((and the council)) may solicit and accept gifts, grants,
conveyances, bequests, and devises, of real or personal property, or both, in
trust or otherwise, and sell, lease, exchange, invest, or expend these
donations or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income from the donations except
as limited by the donor's terms. These receipts and expenditures must be
accounted for in the secretary of state's revolving fund. These expenditures
do not require legislative appropriation and will be managed by the secretary
of state. The secretary of state shall adopt rules to govern and protect
the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds. Soliciting and accepting such
receipts and making such expenditures is not considered a violation of ethical
standards. Such receipts and expenditures must be limited to:

(1) Conducting oral
histories;

(2) Archival
activities; and

(3) International
trade hosting and missions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.07 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary of state
may fund oral history activities through donations as provided in RCW
43.07.037. The activities may include, but not be limited to, conducting
interviews, preparing and indexing transcripts, publishing transcripts and
photographs, and presenting displays and programs. Donations that do not meet
the criteria of the oral history program may not be accepted. The secretary of
state shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.07.130 and 1994 c
211 s 1311 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created within
the state treasury a revolving fund, to be known as the "secretary of
state's revolving fund," which shall be used by the office of the
secretary of state to defray the costs of printing, reprinting, or distributing
printed matter authorized by law to be issued by the office of the secretary of
state, and any other cost of carrying out the functions of the secretary of
state under Title 23B RCW, ((or)) chapters 18.100, 23.86, 23.90, 24.03,
24.06, 24.12, 24.20, 24.24, 24.28, 24.36, 25.15, ((or)) 25.10, or
40.14 RCW, or RCW 43.07.220.

The secretary of state
is hereby authorized to charge a fee for such publications in an amount which
will compensate for the costs of printing, reprinting, and distributing such
printed matter. Fees recovered by the secretary of state under RCW
43.07.120(2), 23B.01.220 (1)(e), (6) and (7), 23B.18.050, 24.03.410, 24.06.455,
or 46.64.040, and such other moneys as are expressly designated for deposit in
the secretary of state's revolving fund shall be placed in the secretary of
state's revolving fund.

Sec. 4. RCW 40.14.020 and 1995 c
326 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

All public records
shall be and remain the property of the state of Washington. They shall be
delivered by outgoing officials and employees to their successors and shall be
preserved, stored, transferred, destroyed or disposed of, and otherwise
managed, only in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. In order to
insure the proper management and safeguarding of public records, the division
of archives and records management is established in the office of the
secretary of state. The state archivist, who shall administer the division and
have reasonable access to all public records, wherever kept, for purposes of
information, surveying, or cataloguing, shall undertake the following
functions, duties, and responsibilities:

(1) To manage the
archives of the state of Washington;

(2) To centralize the
archives of the state of Washington, to make them available for reference and
scholarship, and to insure their proper preservation;

(3) To inspect,
inventory, catalog, and arrange retention and transfer schedules on all record
files of all state departments and other agencies of state government;

(4) To insure the
maintenance and security of all state public records and to establish
safeguards against unauthorized removal or destruction;

(5) To establish and
operate such state record centers as may from time to time be authorized by
appropriation, for the purpose of preserving, servicing, screening and
protecting all state public records which must be preserved temporarily or
permanently, but which need not be retained in office space and equipment;

(6) To adopt rules
under chapter 34.05 RCW:

(a) Setting standards
for the durability and permanence of public records maintained by state and
local agencies;

(b) Governing
procedures for the creation, maintenance, transmission, cataloging, indexing,
storage, or reproduction of photographic, optical, electronic, or other images
of public documents or records in a manner consistent with current standards,
policies, and procedures of the department of information services for the
acquisition of information technology;

(c) Governing the
accuracy and durability of, and facilitating access to, photographic, optical,
electronic, or other images used as public records; or

(d) To carry out any
other provision of this chapter;

(7) To gather and
disseminate to interested agencies information on all phases of records
management and current practices, methods, procedures, techniques, and devices
for efficient and economical management and preservation of records;

(8) To operate a
central microfilming bureau which will microfilm, at cost, records approved for
filming by the head of the office of origin and the archivist; to approve
microfilming projects undertaken by state departments and all other agencies of
state government; and to maintain proper standards for this work;

(9) To maintain
necessary facilities for the review of records approved for destruction and for
their economical disposition by sale or burning; directly to supervise such
destruction of public records as shall be authorized by the terms of this
chapter; (([and]))

(10) To assist and
train state and local agencies in the proper methods of creating, maintaining,
cataloging, indexing, transmitting, storing, and reproducing photographic,
optical, electronic, or other images used as public records;

(11) To solicit,
accept, and expend donations as provided in RCW 43.07.037 for the purpose of
the archive program. These purposes include, but are not limited to,
acquisition, accession, interpretation, and display of archival materials.
Donations that do not meet the criteria of the archive program may not be
accepted.

Sec. 5. RCW 42.17.710 and 1993 c
2 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

During the period
beginning on the thirtieth day before the date a regular legislative session
convenes and continuing thirty days past the date of final adjournment, and
during the period beginning on the date a special legislative session convenes
and continuing through the date that session adjourns, no state official or a
person employed by or acting on behalf of a state official or state legislator
may solicit or accept contributions to a public office fund, to a candidate or
authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt. Persons soliciting or
accepting contributions for the secretary of state's revolving fund, as used
for the limited purposes of RCW 43.07.037, are exempt from this limitation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 42.52 RCW to read as follows:

When
soliciting charitable gifts, grants, or donations solely for the limited
purposes of RCW 43.07.037, members of the office of secretary of state and oral
history advisory committee are exempt from this chapter.

---
END ---