BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 12.40.105 and 1998 c
52 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

If the
losing party fails to pay the judgment within thirty days or within the period
otherwise ordered by the court, the judgment shall be increased by: (1) An
amount sufficient to cover costs of certification of the judgment under RCW
12.40.110; ((and)) (2) the amount specified in RCW 36.18.012(2); and
(3) any other costs incurred by the prevailing party to enforce the judgment in
superior court, including but not limited to reasonable attorney fees,
without regard to the jurisdictional limits on the small claims department.

--- END ---