BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.22.100 and 1965 c
7 s 35.22.100 are each amended to read as follows:

If a
majority of the votes cast at the election upon the adoption of the proposed
charter favor it, certificates of election shall be issued to each officer
elected at that election. Within ten days after the issuance of the
certificates of election, the newly elected officers shall qualify as provided
in the charter, and on the tenth day thereafter at twelve o'clock noon of that
day, the officers so elected and qualified shall enter upon the duties of the
offices to which they were elected and at such time the charter shall be
authenticated, recorded, attested and go into effect. When so authenticated,
recorded and attested, the charter shall become the organic law of the city and
supersede any existing charter and amendments thereto and all special laws inconsistent
therewith. If the vote in favor of adopting a charter receives forty
percent or less of the total vote on the question of charter adoption, no new
election on the question of charter adoption may be held for a period of two
years from the date of the election in which the charter proposal failed.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.22.190 and 1965 c
7 s 35.22.190 are each amended to read as follows:

If a majority of the
voters voting upon the adoption of the proposed new, altered or revised charter
favor it, it shall become the charter of the city and the organic law thereof,
superseding any existing charter. All bodies or offices abolished or dispensed
with by the new, altered or revised charter, together with the emoluments thereof
shall immediately cease to exist, and any new offices created shall be filled
by appointment of the mayor until the next general election subject to such
approval by the city council as may be required by the new, altered or revised
charter. If the vote in favor of adopting, altering, or revising a charter
receives forty percent or less of the total vote on the question of charter
adoption, alteration, or revision, no new election on the question of charter
adoption, alteration, or revision may be held for a period of two years from
the date of the election in which the charter proposal failed.

Sec. 3. RCW 35A.08.110 and 1967
ex.s. c 119 s 35A.08.110 are each amended to read as follows:

If a
majority of the votes cast at the election upon the adoption of the proposed
charter favor it, certificates of election shall be issued to each officer
elected at that election. Within ten days after the issuance of the
certificates of election, the newly elected officers shall qualify as provided
in the charter, and on the tenth day thereafter at twelve o'clock noon of that
day or on the next business day if the tenth day is a Saturday, Sunday or
holiday, the officers so elected and qualified shall enter upon the duties of
the offices to which they were elected and at such time the charter shall be
authenticated, recorded, attested and go into effect, and the city shall
thereafter be classified as a charter code city. When so authenticated,
recorded, and attested, the charter shall become the organic law of the
city and supersede any existing charter and amendments thereto and all special
laws inconsistent therewith. If the vote in favor of adopting a charter
receives forty percent or less of the total vote on the question of charter
adoption, no new election on the question of charter adoption may be held for a
period of two years from the date of the election in which the charter proposal
failed.

Sec. 4. RCW 35A.09.070 and 1967
ex.s. c 119 s 35A.09.070 are each amended to read as follows:

If a
majority of the voters voting upon the adoption of the proposed new, altered,
or revised charter favor it, it shall become the charter of the charter code
city and the organic law thereof, superseding any existing charter; but if any
offices are abolished or dispensed with by the new, altered, or revised
charter, and any new offices created thereby, such charter shall not go into
effect until the election and qualification of such new officers at the next
general municipal election if one is to be held within one hundred and eighty
days, or at a special election to be held for that purpose not less than ninety
days, nor more than one hundred and eighty days after approval of such charter
by the voters. If the vote in favor of adopting, altering, or revising a
charter receives forty percent or less of the total vote on the question of
charter adoption, alteration, or revision, no new election on the question of
charter adoption, alteration, or revision may be held for a period of two years
from the date of the election in which the charter proposal failed.

---
END ---