BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. By this act, the
legislature intends to clarify how the existing elements of RCW 90.03.290 and
90.03.380 relate to one another in order to facilitate consistent
interpretation and implementation of existing law under these sections.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.03.290 and 2001 c
239 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When an application
complying with the provisions of this chapter and with the rules of the
department has been filed,

(a) The same
shall be placed on record with the department, and

(b) It shall be
its duty to investigate the application, and

(c) Determine
what water, if any, is available for appropriation, and

(d) Find and
determine to what beneficial use or uses it can be applied.

(i) If it is
proposed to appropriate water for irrigation purposes, the department shall
investigate, determine and find what lands are capable of irrigation by means
of water found available for appropriation.

(ii) If it is
proposed to appropriate water for the purpose of power development, the
department shall investigate, determine and find whether the proposed
development is likely to prove detrimental to the public interest, having in
mind the highest feasible use of the waters belonging to the public.

(2)(((a))) If
the application does not contain, and the applicant does not promptly furnish
sufficient information on which to base such findings,

(a) The
department may issue a preliminary permit, for a period of not to exceed three
years, requiring the applicant to make such surveys, investigations, studies,
and progress reports, as in the opinion of the department may be necessary.

(b) If the
applicant fails to comply with the conditions of the preliminary permit, it and
the application or applications on which it is based shall be automatically
canceled and the applicant so notified.

(c) If the
holder of a preliminary permit shall, before its expiration, file with the
department a verified report of expenditures made and work done under the
preliminary permit, which, in the opinion of the department, establishes the
good faith, intent, and ability of the applicant to carry on the proposed
development, the preliminary permit may, with the approval of the governor, be
extended, but not to exceed a maximum period of five years from the date of the
issuance of the preliminary permit.

(((b))) (d)
For any application for which a preliminary permit was issued and for which the
availability of water was directly affected by a moratorium on further
diversions from the Columbia river during the years from 1990 to 1998, the
preliminary permit is extended through June 30, 2002.

(i) If such an
application and preliminary permit were canceled during the moratorium, the
application and preliminary permit shall be reinstated until June 30, 2002, if
the application and permit:

(((i))) (A)
Are for providing regional water supplies in more than one urban growth area
designated under chapter 36.70A RCW and in one or more areas near such urban
growth areas, or the application and permit are modified for providing such
supplies, and

(((ii))) (B)
Provide or are modified to provide such regional supplies through the use
of existing intake or diversion structures. The authority to modify such a
canceled application and permit to accomplish the objectives of (((b)(i)))
(d)(i)(A) and (((ii))) (B) of this subsection is hereby
granted.

(3) In determining
whether or not a permit shall issue upon any application, it shall be the duty
of the department to investigate all facts relevant and material to the
application.

(4) The
department shall make and file as part of the record in the matter, written
findings of fact concerning all things investigated, and

(a) If it shall
find that there is water available for appropriation for a beneficial use, and
the appropriation thereof as proposed in the application will not impair
existing rights or be detrimental to the public welfare, it shall issue a
permit stating

(i) The amount
of water to which the applicant shall be entitled and

(ii) The
beneficial use or uses to which it may be applied:

(A) PROVIDED,
That where the water applied for is to be used for irrigation purposes, it
shall become appurtenant only to such land as may be reclaimed thereby to the
full extent of the soil for agricultural purposes.

(b) But where
there is no unappropriated water in the proposed source of supply, or where the
proposed use conflicts with existing rights, or threatens to prove detrimental
to the public interest, having due regard to the highest feasible development
of the use of the waters belonging to the public, it shall be duty of the
department to reject such application and to refuse to issue the permit asked
for.

(((4))) (i)
If the permit is refused because of conflict with existing rights and such
applicant shall acquire same by purchase or condemnation under RCW 90.03.040,
the department may thereupon grant such permit.

(c) Any
application may be approved for a less amount of water than that applied for,
if there exists substantial reason therefor, and in any event shall not be
approved for more water than can be applied to beneficial use for the purposes
named in the application. ((In determining whether or not a permit shall
issue upon any application, it shall be the duty of the department to
investigate all facts relevant and material to the application.))

(5) After the
department approves said application in whole or in part and before any permit
shall be issued thereon to the applicant, such applicant shall pay the fee
provided in RCW 90.03.470:

(6) PROVIDED
FURTHER, That in the event a permit is issued by the department upon any
application, it shall be its duty to notify the director of fish and wildlife
of such issuance.

Sec. 3. RCW 90.03.380 and 2001 c
237 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right to the
use of water which has been applied to a beneficial use in the state shall be
and remain appurtenant to the land or place upon which the same is used:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER,

(a) That the
right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant to any
other land or place of use without loss of priority of right theretofore
established if such change can be made without detriment or injury to existing
rights.

(b) The point of
diversion of water for beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if
such change can be made without detriment or injury to existing rights.

(c) A change in
the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water right to
enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new uses may be
permitted if such change results in no increase in the annual consumptive
quantity of water used under the water right. For purposes of this section,
"annual consumptive quantity" means the estimated or actual annual
amount of water diverted pursuant to the water right, reduced by the estimated
annual amount of return flows, averaged over the two years of greatest use
within the most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water
right.

(2) Before any
transfer of such right to use water or change of the point of diversion of
water or change of purpose of use can be made,

(a) Any person
having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a written application
therefor with the department, and

(b) The
application shall not be granted until notice of the application is published
as provided in RCW 90.03.280.

(i) If an
application for change proposes to transfer water rights from one irrigation
district to another, the department shall, before publication of notice,
receive concurrence from each of the irrigation districts that such transfer or
change will not adversely affect the ability to deliver water to other
landowners or impair the financial integrity of either of the districts.

(3) If it shall
appear that such transfer or such change may be made without injury or
detriment to existing rights, the department shall issue to the applicant a
certificate in duplicate granting the right for such transfer or for such
change of point of diversion or of use.

(a) Pending
applications for new water rights are not entitled to protection from
impairment, injury, or detriment when an application relating to an existing
surface or ground water right is considered.

(b) Applications
relating to existing surface or ground water rights may be processed and
decisions on them rendered independently of processing and rendering decisions
on pending applications for new water rights within the same source of supply
without regard to the date of filing of the pending applications for new water
rights.

(c) Notwithstanding
any other existing authority to process applications, including but not limited
to the authority to process applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on
January 1, 2001, an application relating to an existing surface or ground water
right may be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when

(i) Sufficient
information for a decision on the previously filed application is not available
and

(ii) The applicant
for the previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what
information is not available and informs the applicant that processing of the
next application will begin.

The previously filed
application does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided
by the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall be
processed at that time.

This subsection
(3)(c) does not affect any other existing authority to process applications.

(d) Nothing in this
subsection (3) is intended to stop the processing of applications for new water
rights.

(e) No applicant for
a change, transfer, or amendment of a water right may be required to give up
any part of the applicant's valid water right or claim to a state agency, the
trust water rights program, or to other persons as a condition of processing
the application.

The certificate so
issued shall be filed and be made a record with the department and the
duplicate certificate issued to the applicant may be filed with the county
auditor in like manner and with the same effect as provided in the original
certificate or permit to divert water.

(((2) If an
application for change proposes to transfer water rights from one irrigation
district to another, the department shall, before publication of notice,
receive concurrence from each of the irrigation districts that such transfer or
change will not adversely affect the ability to deliver water to other
landowners or impair the financial integrity of either of the districts.

(3))) (4) A change in place of use by an
individual water user or users of water provided by an irrigation district need
only receive approval for the change from the board of directors of the
district if the use of water continues within the irrigation district, and when
water is provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint
control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received from
the board of joint control if the use of water continues within the area of
jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights.

(((4))) (5)
This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by the state
through the funding of water conservation projects under chapter 90.38 RCW or
RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.

(((5)(a) Pending
applications for new water rights are not entitled to protection from
impairment, injury, or detriment when an application relating to an existing
surface or ground water right is considered.

(b) Applications
relating to existing surface or ground water rights may be processed and
decisions on them rendered independently of processing and rendering decisions
on pending applications for new water rights within the same source of supply
without regard to the date of filing of the pending applications for new water
rights.

(c) Notwithstanding
any other existing authority to process applications, including but not limited
to the authority to process applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on
January 1, 2001, an application relating to an existing surface or ground water
right may be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the previously
filed application is not available and the applicant for the previously filed
application is sent written notice that explains what information is not
available and informs the applicant that processing of the next application
will begin. The previously filed application does not lose its priority date
and if the information is provided by the applicant within sixty days, the
previously filed application shall be processed at that time. This subsection
(5)(c) does not affect any other existing authority to process applications.

(d) Nothing in this
subsection (5) is intended to stop the processing of applications for new water
rights.

(6) No applicant for
a change, transfer, or amendment of a water right may be required to give up
any part of the applicant's valid water right or claim to a state agency, the
trust water rights program, or to other persons as a condition of processing
the application.

(7))) (6) In revising the provisions of this
section and adding provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or disapproval of any
existing administrative policy regarding, or any existing administrative or
judicial interpretation of, the provisions of this section not expressly added
or revised.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---