BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.15.010 and 1990 c
59 s 82 are each amended to read as follows:

A candidate who desires
to have his or her name printed on the ballot for election to an office other
than president of the United States, vice president of the United States, or an
office for which ownership of property is a prerequisite to voting shall
complete and file a declaration and affidavit of candidacy. The secretary of
state shall adopt, by rule, a declaration of candidacy form for the office of
precinct committee officer and a separate standard form for candidates for all
other offices filing under this chapter. Included on the standard form shall
be:

(1) A place for the
candidate to declare that he or she is a registered voter within the
jurisdiction of the office for which he or she is filing, and the address at
which he or she is registered;

(2) A place for the
candidate to indicate the position for which he or she is filing;

(3) A place for the
candidate to indicate a party designation, if applicable;

(4) A place for the
candidate to indicate the amount of the filing fee accompanying the declaration
of candidacy or for the candidate to indicate that he or she is filing a
nominating petition in lieu of the filing fee under RCW 29.15.050;

(5) A place for the
candidate to sign the declaration of candidacy, stating that the information
provided on the form is true and swearing or affirming that he or she will
support the Constitution and laws of the United States and the Constitution and
laws of the state of Washington.

In the case of a
declaration of candidacy filed electronically, submission of the form
constitutes agreement that the information provided with the filing is true,
that he or she will support the Constitutions and laws of the United States and
the state of Washington, and that he or she agrees to electronic payment of the
filing fee established in RCW 29.15.050.

The secretary of state
may require any other information on the form he or she deems appropriate to
facilitate the filing process.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 29.15 RCW to read as follows:

ELECTRONIC FILING. A
candidate may file his or her declaration of candidacy for an office by
electronic means on a system specifically designed and authorized by a filing
officer to accept filings.

(1) Filings that are
received electronically must capture all information specified in RCW 29.15.010
(1) through (4).

(2) Electronic filing
may begin at 9:00 a.m. the fourth Monday in July and continue through 4:00 p.m.
the following Friday.

(3) In case of special
filing periods established in this chapter, electronic filings may be accepted
beginning at 9:00 a.m. on the first day of the special filing period through
4:00 p.m. the last day of the special filing period.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 29.15 RCW to read as follows:

STANDARDS FOR
ELECTRONIC FILING. The secretary of state as chief election officer may adopt
rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, to facilitate electronic filing
and establish which jurisdictions are eligible to accept electronic filing.
The rules must detail the circumstances under which the electronic filing of
documents will be permitted, how the documents will be filed, and how the
secretary of state will return filed documents. Such rules may also impose
additional requirements related to implementation of electronic filing
processes.

Sec. 4. RCW 29.15.030 and 1998 c
22 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Declarations of
candidacy shall be filed with the following filing officers:

(1) The secretary of
state for declarations of candidacy for statewide offices, United States
senate, and United States house of representatives;

(2) The secretary of
state for declarations of candidacy for the state legislature, the court of
appeals, and the superior court when voters from a district comprising more
than one county vote upon the candidates;

(3) The county auditor
for all other offices. For any nonpartisan office, other than judicial offices
and school director in joint districts, where voters from a district comprising
more than one county vote upon the candidates, a declaration of candidacy shall
be filed with the county auditor of the county in which a majority of the registered
voters of the district reside. For school directors in joint school districts,
the declaration of candidacy shall be filed with the county auditor of the
county designated by the state board of education as the county to which the
joint school district is considered as belonging under RCW ((28A.315.380))
28A.323.040.

Each official with whom
declarations of candidacy are filed under this section, within one business day
following the closing of the applicable filing period, shall ((forward))
transmit to the public disclosure commission ((a copy of)) the
information required in RCW 29.15.010 (1) through (4) for each declaration
of candidacy filed in his or her office during such filing period or a
list containing the name of each candidate who files such a declaration in his
office during such filing period together with a precise identification of the
position sought by each such candidate and the date on which each such
declaration was filed. Such official, within three days following his receipt
of any letter withdrawing a person's name as a candidate, shall also forward a
copy of such withdrawal letter to the public disclosure commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The secretary of state
may take the necessary steps to ensure that this act is implemented on its
effective date.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Section captions used in
this act are not part of the law.

---
END ---