BE IT
ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW
29.33.041 and 1990 c 59 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state shall inspect, evaluate, ((and publicly))
test, and hold a public demonstration of all voting systems or
components of voting systems that are submitted for review under RCW
29.33.051. The secretary of state shall determine whether the voting systems
conform with all of the requirements of this title, the applicable rules
adopted in accordance with this title, and with generally accepted safety
requirements. The secretary of state shall post the report of certification
to a publicly available electronic medium and transmit ((a copy of the
report of any)) notification of the examination ((under this
section)), within thirty days after completing the examination, to the
county auditor of each county.

Sec. 2. RCW
29.33.081 and 1990 c 59 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

((If)) Only voting systems or devices or vote
tallying systems ((are to)) that have been approved by the secretary
of state may be used for conducting a primary or election((, only those
that have the approval of the secretary of state or had been approved under
this chapter or chapter 29.34 RCW before March 22, 1982, may be used)).
Any modification, change, or improvement to any voting system or component of a
system ((that)) must be submitted to the secretary of state for
review. After review, the modification may be accepted if it does not
impair ((its)) system accuracy, efficiency, or capacity or extend
((its)) system function((, may be made without)). If,
after review, the secretary of state determines that the modification does
extend system function, the modification must be submitted for
reexamination or reapproval by the secretary of state under RCW 29.33.041.

Sec. 3. RCW
29.33.130 and 1990 c 59 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

The county auditor of a county in which voting systems are used is
responsible for the preparation, maintenance, and operation of those systems,
and must provide proof that the system and its component software, in the
version used, are state certified. The auditor may employ and direct
persons to perform some or all of these functions.

Sec. 4. RCW
29.33.145 and 1998 c 58 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

An agreement to purchase or lease a voting system or a component of
a voting system is subject to that system or component passing an acceptance
test, conducted by the purchaser or lessee, sufficient to demonstrate
that the equipment is the same as that certified by the secretary of state and
that the equipment is operating correctly as delivered to the county.

Sec. 5. RCW
29.33.300 and 1990 c 59 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

No voting device shall be approved by the secretary of state unless
it:

(1) Secures to the voter secrecy in the act of voting;

(2) Permits the voter to vote for any person for any office and
upon any measure that he or she has the right to vote for;

(3) Permits the voter to vote for all the candidates of one party
or in part for the candidates of one or more other parties;

(4) Correctly registers all votes cast for any and all persons and
for or against any and all measures;

(5) Provides that a vote for more than one candidate cannot be cast
by one single operation of the voting device or vote tally system except when
voting for president and vice-president of the United States; and

(6) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this state, has been
tested((, certified, and used in at least one other state or election
jurisdiction)) and approved by the appropriate independent testing
authority approved by the federal elections commission or its statutory
successor.

Sec. 6. RCW
29.33.310 and 1990 c 59 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

The ballot ((on a single voting device)) displayed to a
voter shall not contain the names of candidates for the offices of United
States representative, state senator, state representative, county council, or
county commissioner in more than one district. ((In all general elections,
primaries, and special elections, in each polling place the voting devices
containing ballots for candidates from each congressional, legislative, or county
council or commissioner district shall be grouped together and physically
separated from those devices containing ballots for other districts. Each
voter shall be directed by the precinct election officers to the correct group
of voting devices.))

Sec. 7. RCW
29.33.320 and 1990 c 59 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state shall not approve a vote tallying system
unless it:

(1) Correctly counts votes on ballots on which the proper number of
votes have been marked for any office or issue;

(2) Ignores votes marked for any office or issue where more than
the allowable number of votes have been marked, but correctly counts the
properly voted portions of the ballot;

(3) Accumulates a count of the specific number of ballots tallied
for each precinct, total votes by candidate for each office, and total votes
for and against each issue of the ballot in that precinct;

(4) Accommodates rotation of candidates' names on the ballot under
RCW 29.30.040;

(5) Produces precinct and cumulative totals in printed form; and

(6) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this state, has
been tested((, certified, and used in at least one other state or election
jurisdiction)) and approved by the appropriate independent testing
authority approved by the federal elections commission or its statutory
successor.

Sec. 8. RCW
29.33.330 and 1990 c 59 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

In preparing a voting device for a primary or election, a record
shall be made of the ballot format installed in each device and the precincts
or portion of a precinct for which that device has been prepared. Except where
provided by a rule adopted under RCW 29.04.210, after being prepared for a
primary or election, each device shall be sealed with a uniquely numbered seal
and provided to the inspector of the appropriate polling place.

Sec. 9. RCW
29.33.350 and 1998 c 58 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

At least three days before each state primary or general election,
the office of the secretary of state shall provide for the conduct of tests of
the programming for each vote tallying system to be used at that primary or
general election. The test must verify that the system will correctly count
the vote cast for all candidates and on all measures appearing on the ballot at
that primary or general election. The office of the secretary of state shall
adopt rules specifying the manner of conducting these programming tests. The
test shall verify the capability of the vote tallying system to perform all of
the functions that can reasonably be expected to occur during conduct of that
particular primary or election. If any error is detected, the cause shall be
determined and corrected, and an errorless total shall be produced before the
primary or election.

Such tests shall be observed by at least one representative from
each major political party, if representatives have been appointed by the
respective major political parties and are present at the test, and shall be
open to candidates, the press, and the public. The county auditor and any
political party observers shall certify that the test has been conducted in
accordance with this section. The county auditor shall provide proof that
the version of the voting system and software used are state certified.
Copies of ((this)) these certifications shall be retained
by the secretary of state and the county auditor. All programming materials,
test results, and test ballots shall be securely ((sealed)) stored
until the day of the primary or general election.

Sec. 10. RCW
29.04.200 and 1998 c 245 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Beginning January 1, 1993,)) No voting device
or machine may be used ((in a county with a population of seventy thousand
or more)) to conduct a primary or general or special election in this state
unless it correctly records ((on)) a separate ballot image of the
votes cast by each elector for any person and for or against any measure and
such separate ballot((s)) images are available for audit purposes
after such a primary or election.

(2) ((Beginning January 1, 1993,)) The secretary of
state shall not certify under this title any voting device or machine ((for
use in conducting)) that uses punched holes to record the voter's
choices to conduct a primary or general or special election in this state
((unless the device or machine correctly records on a separate ballot the
votes cast by each elector for any person and for or against any measure and
such separate ballots are available for audit purposes after such a primary or
election)).

(((3) Beginning January 1, 1993, a county with a population of
less than seventy thousand may use a voting machine or device for conducting a
primary or general or special election which does not record on a separate
ballot, available for audit purposes after the primary or election, the votes
cast by each elector for any person and for or against any measure if:

(a) The device was certified under this title before
January 1, 1993, for use in this state;

(b) The device otherwise satisfies the requirements
of this title; and

(c) Not more than twenty percent of the votes cast
during any primary or general or special election conducted after January 1,
1998, in the county are cast using such a machine or device.

(4) The purpose of subsection (3) of this section is
to permit less populous counties to replace voting equipment in stages over
several years. These less populous counties are, nonetheless, encouraged to
secure as expeditiously as possible voting equipment which would satisfy the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section established for more populous
counties.))

Sec. 11. RCW
29.04.200 and 2002 c . . . s 10 (section 10 of this act) are each
amended to read as follows:

(1) No voting device or machine may be used to conduct a primary or
general or special election in this state unless it correctly records a
separate ballot image of the votes cast by each elector for any person and for
or against any measure and such separate ballot images are available for audit
purposes after such a primary or election.

(2) The secretary of state shall not certify under this title any
voting device or machine that uses punched holes to record the voter's choices
to conduct a primary or general or special election in this state.

(3) Beginning January 1, 2007, no voting device or machine that
uses punched holes to record the voter's choices may be used to conduct a
primary or general or special election in this state.

Sec. 12. RCW
29.85.051 and 1991 c 81 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor who knowingly:

(1) Deceives any voter in recording his or her vote by providing
incorrect or misleading recording information or by providing faulty election
equipment or records; ((or))

(2) Records the vote of any voter in a manner other than as designated
by the voter; or

(3) Commits either of the acts under subsection (1) or (2) of
this section by electronic means.

Such a gross misdemeanor is punishable to the same extent as a
gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. A new
section is added to chapter 29.85 RCW to read as follows:

A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW who knowingly:

(1) Tampers with or impedes the use of any form of electronic voting
or vote recording system; or

(2) Tampers with or impedes access to any vote reporting or
election results reporting system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. RCW 29.33.340 (Election
officials--Instruction, compensation, requirements) and 1990 c 59 s 29 &
1977 ex.s. c 361 s 69 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. Section 11
of this act takes effect once Congress passes legislation that provides
specific funding to replace voting systems and vote tallying equipment. If
federal legislation is not approved and funding is not provided by January 1,
2005, section 11 of this act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---