BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that national task forces studying election issues have identified
statewide voter registration systems as important tools for protecting the
integrity of elections, and it is likely that federal funds will be made
available for states that employ statewide voter registration systems.
Therefore, the legislature finds a need for the state of Washington to begin the
process of creating such a system.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 29.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The office of the
secretary of state shall work in conjunction with the county auditors of the
state of Washington to initiate the creation of a statewide voter registration
data base. The secretary of state shall identify a group of voter registration
experts whose responsibility will be to work on a design for the voter
registration data base system. The secretary of state shall report back the
findings of this group to the legislature no later than February 1, 2003.

(2) Among the intended
goals the voter registration data base must be designed to accomplish at a
minimum, are the following:

(a) Identify duplicate
voter registrations;

(b) Identify suspected
duplicate voters;

(c) Screen against the
department of corrections data base to aid in the cancellation of voter
registration of felons;

(d) Provide up-to-date
signatures of voters for the purposes of initiative signature checking;

(e) Provide for a
comparison between the voter registration data base and the department of
licensing change of address data base;

(f) Provide online
access for county auditors with the goal of real time duplicate checking and
update capabilities, if sufficient funds are available;

(g) Provide for the
cancellation of voter registration for persons who have moved to other states
and surrendered their Washington state drivers' licenses;

(h) Ensure that each county
shall maintain legal control of the registration records for that county.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
May 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act expires January
1, 2005.

---
END ---