BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.60.010 and 1992 c
163 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington
state election administration and certification board is established and has
the responsibilities and authorities prescribed by this chapter. The board is
composed of the following members:

(a) The secretary of
state ((or)) and the secretary's designee;

(b) The state director
of elections ((or)) and the director's designee;

(c) Four county
auditors appointed by the Washington state association of county auditors or
their alternates who are county auditors designated by the association to serve
as such alternates, each appointee and alternate to serve at the pleasure of
the association;

(d) One member from
each of the two largest political party caucuses of the house of
representatives designated by and serving at the pleasure of the legislative
leader of the respective caucus;

(e) One member from
each of the two largest political party caucuses of the senate designated by
and serving at the pleasure of the legislative leader of the respective caucus;
and

(f) One representative
from each major political party, as defined by RCW 29.01.090, designated by and
serving at the pleasure of the chair of the party's state central committee.

(2) The board shall
elect a chair from among its number; however, neither the secretary of state
nor the state director of elections nor their designees may serve as the chair
of the board. A majority of the members appointed to the board constitutes a
quorum for conducting the business of the board. Chapter 42.30 RCW, the open
public meetings act, and RCW 42.32.030 regarding minutes of meetings, apply to
the meetings of the board.

(3) Members of the
board shall serve without compensation. The secretary of state shall reimburse
members of the board, other than those who are members of the legislature, for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Members of the
board who are members of the legislature shall be reimbursed as provided in
chapter 44.04 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.60.030 and 2001 c
41 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state
shall:

(1) Establish and
operate, or provide by contract, training and certification programs for state
and county elections administration officials and personnel, including training
on the various types of election law violations and discrimination, and
training ((programs)) curriculum for political party observers and
members of county canvassing boards which conform to the rules for such
programs established under RCW 29.60.020;

(2) Administer tests
for state and county officials and personnel who have received such training
and issue certificates to those who have successfully completed the training
and passed such tests;

(3) Maintain a record
of those individuals who have received such training and certificates; and

(4) Provide the
staffing and support services required by the board created under RCW
29.60.010.

Sec. 3. RCW 29.60.040 and 1992 c
163 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A person having
responsibility for the administration or conduct of elections, other than
precinct election officers, shall, within eighteen months of undertaking those
responsibilities or within eighteen months of July 1, 1993, whichever is later,
receive general training regarding the conduct of elections and specific
training regarding their responsibilities and duties as prescribed by this
title or by rules adopted by the secretary of state under this title. Included
among those persons for whom such training is mandatory are the following:

(1) Secretary of state
elections division personnel;

(2) County elections
administrators under RCW 36.22.220;

(3) County canvassing
board members; and

(4) ((Persons
officially designated by each major political party as elections observers; and

(5))) Any other person or group charged with
election administration responsibilities if the person or group is designated
by rule adopted by the secretary of state as requiring the training.

((The secretary of
state shall reimburse election observers in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060 for travel expenses incurred to receive training required under
subsection (4) of this section.))

Neither this section
nor RCW 29.60.030 may be construed as requiring an elected official to receive
training or a certificate of training as a condition for seeking or holding
elective office or as a condition for carrying out constitutional duties.

Sec. 4. RCW 29.60.070 and 1997 c
284 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The election
review staff of the office of the secretary of state shall conduct a review of
election-related policies, procedures, and practices in an affected county or counties:

(i) If the unofficial
returns of a primary or general election for a position in the state
legislature indicate that a mandatory recount is likely for that position; or

(ii) If unofficial
returns indicate a mandatory recount is likely in a statewide election or an
election for federal office.

Reviews conducted under
(ii) of this subsection shall be performed in as many selected counties as time
and staffing permit. Reviews conducted as a result of mandatory recounts shall
be performed between the time the unofficial returns are complete and the time
the recount is to take place, if possible.

(b) In addition to
conducting reviews under (a) of this subsection, the election review staff
shall also conduct such a review in a county ((periodically,)) at
least once every five years in conjunction with a county primary or special
or general election, at the direction of the secretary of state or at the
request of the county auditor. If any resident of this state believes that an
aspect of a primary or election has been conducted inappropriately in a county,
the resident may file a complaint with the secretary of state. The secretary
shall consider such complaints in scheduling periodic reviews under this
section.

(c) Before an election
review is conducted in a county, the secretary of state shall provide the
county auditor of the affected county and the chair of the state central
committee of each major political party with notice that the review is to be
conducted. When a periodic review is to be conducted in a county at the
direction of the secretary of state under (b) of this subsection, the secretary
shall provide the affected county auditor not less than thirty days' notice.

(2) Reviews shall be
conducted in conformance with rules adopted under RCW 29.60.020. In performing
a review in a county under this chapter, the election review staff shall
evaluate the policies and procedures established for conducting the primary or
election in the county and the practices of those conducting it. As part of
the review, the election review staff shall issue to the county auditor and the
members of the county canvassing board a report of its findings and
recommendations regarding such policies, procedures, and practices. A review
conducted under this chapter shall not include any evaluation, finding, or
recommendation regarding the validity of the outcome of a primary or election
or the validity of any canvass of returns nor does the election review staff
have any jurisdiction to make such an evaluation, finding, or recommendation
under this title.

(3) The county auditor
of the county in which a review is conducted under this section or a member of
the canvassing board of the county may appeal the findings or recommendations
of the election review staff regarding the review by filing an appeal with the
board created under RCW 29.60.010.

Sec. 5. RCW 29.60.080 and 1992 c
163 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The county auditor may
designate any person who has been certified under this chapter, other than the
auditor, to participate in a review conducted in the county under this
chapter. Each county auditor and canvassing board shall cooperate fully during
an election review by making available to the reviewing staff any material
requested by the staff. The reviewing staff shall have full access to ballot
pages, absentee voting materials, any other election material normally kept in
a secure environment after the election, and other requested material. If
ballots are reviewed by the staff, they shall be reviewed in the presence of
the canvassing board or its designees. Ballots shall not leave the custody of
the canvassing board. During the review and after its completion, the review
staff may make appropriate recommendations to the county auditor or canvassing
board, or both, to bring the county into compliance with ((the training
required under this chapter, and)) the laws ((or)) and
administrative rules of the state of Washington, to safeguard election
material, or to preserve the integrity of the elections process.

Sec. 6. RCW 29.60.090 and 1992 c
163 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary of state shall establish within the elections division an election
assistance and clearinghouse program, which shall provide regular communication
between the secretary of state((,)) and local election officials,
((and major and minor political parties)) regarding newly enacted
elections legislation, relevant judicial decisions affecting the administration
of elections, and applicable attorney general opinions, and which shall respond
to inquiries ((from elections administrators, political parties, and others))
regarding election information. This section does not empower the secretary of
state to offer legal advice or opinions, but the secretary may discuss the
construction or interpretation of election law, case law, or legal opinions
from the attorney general or other competent legal authority.

---
END ---