BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.05.380 and 1986 c
148 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
insurance commissioner shall ((promulgate)) adopt rules requiring
insurers who are authorized to write property and casualty insurance in the
state of Washington to record and report their Washington state loss and
expense experiences and other data, as required by RCW 48.05.390. These
rules may not require a report to be submitted by any insurer that has no data
or experience to report.

--- END ---