BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department and
the Washington state patrol shall jointly create and design, and the department
shall issue, a special United We Stand license plate emblem to be displayed in
a manner described by the department for motor vehicles required to display two
motor vehicle license plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87
RCW, upon terms and conditions established by the department. The special
plate emblems will celebrate our nation and its flag. The design ultimately
selected must include the flag of the United States, using a red, white, and
blue color scheme for the design. The slogan "United We Stand" must
be included in the design.

(2) The director may
adopt fees to be charged by the department for emblems issued by the department
under this section.

(3) The
fee for each emblem issued must be in an amount sufficient to offset the costs
of production of emblems and the administration of the program by the
department plus an amount not to exceed a total fee of fifteen dollars per
emblem.

--- END ---