BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.34.230 and 1995 c
318 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to
subsection (2) of this section, for the purpose of acquiring conservation
futures ((as well as)) and other rights and interests in real
property pursuant to RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220, and for the development,
maintenance, and operation of the real property, a county may levy an
amount not to exceed six and one-quarter cents per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation against the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the
county. The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 shall not apply to the tax levy
authorized in this section. Any rights or interests in real property
acquired under this section must be located within the assessing county.

(2) A
county imposing the levy authorized in this section may use no more than
twenty-five percent of these funds for development, maintenance, and operation
of the real property acquired with funds received from the levy authorized in
this section.

--- END ---