BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.46.010 and 1994 c
272 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of any county or city shall identify in the adopted budget the
capital projects and maintenance and operations of parks and recreational
facilities funded in whole or in part from the proceeds of the tax
authorized in this section, and shall indicate that such tax is intended to be
in addition to other funds that may be reasonably available for such capital
projects and maintenance and operations of parks and recreational facilities.

(2) The legislative
authority of any county or any city may impose an excise tax on each sale of
real property in the unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and
in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding
one-quarter of one percent of the selling price. The revenues from this tax
shall be used by any city or county with a population of five thousand or less
and any city or county that does not plan under RCW 36.70A.040 for any capital
purpose identified in a capital improvements plan and local capital
improvements, including those listed in RCW 35.43.040, and for maintenance
and operations of parks and recreational facilities acquired or developed with
revenues from this tax after December 31, 2001. The amount of revenues used
for maintenance or operations of parks and recreational facilities by a county
or city shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the total amount collected from
this tax by that county or city in the preceding calendar year. Revenues from
this tax shall not be used by any county or city to supplant existing funding
for maintenance and operations of parks and recreational facilities.

After April 30, 1992,
revenues generated from the tax imposed under this subsection in counties over
five thousand population and cities over five thousand population that are
required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall be used ((solely))
for financing capital projects specified in a capital facilities plan element
of a comprehensive plan and housing relocation assistance under RCW 59.18.440
and 59.18.450, and for maintenance and operations of parks and recreational
facilities acquired or developed with revenues from this tax after December 31,
2001. The amount of revenues used for maintenance or operations of parks and
recreational facilities by a county or city shall not exceed twenty-five
percent of the total amount collected from this tax by that county or city in
the preceding calendar year. Revenues from this tax shall not be used by any
county or city to supplant existing funding for maintenance and operations of
parks and recreational facilities. However, revenues (a) pledged by such
counties and cities to debt retirement prior to April 30, 1992, may continue to
be used for that purpose until the original debt for which the revenues were
pledged is retired, or (b) committed prior to April 30, 1992, by such counties
or cities to a project may continue to be used for that purpose until the
project is completed.

(3) In lieu of imposing
the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2), the legislative authority of any county
or any city may impose an additional excise tax on each sale of real property
in the unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the corporate
limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding one-half of one
percent of the selling price.

(4) Taxes imposed under
this section shall be collected from persons who are taxable by the state under
chapter 82.45 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the
unincorporated areas of the county or within the corporate limits of the city,
as the case may be.

(5) Taxes imposed under
this section shall comply with all applicable rules, regulations, laws, and
court decisions regarding real estate excise taxes as imposed by the state
under chapter 82.45 RCW.

(6) As used in this
section, "city" means any city or town and "capital
project" means those public works projects of a local government for
planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, replacement,
rehabilitation, or improvement of streets; roads; highways; sidewalks; street
and road lighting systems; traffic signals; bridges; domestic water systems;
storm and sanitary sewer systems; parks; recreational facilities; law
enforcement facilities; fire protection facilities; trails; libraries;
administrative and/or judicial facilities; river and/or waterway flood control
projects by those jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992, have expended
funds derived from the tax authorized by this section for such purposes; and,
until December 31, 1995, housing projects for those jurisdictions that, prior
to June 11, 1992, have expended or committed to expend funds derived from the
tax authorized by this section or the tax authorized by RCW 82.46.035 for such
purposes.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.46.035 and 1992 c
221 s 3 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 33 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of any county or city shall identify in the adopted budget the
capital projects funded in whole or in part from the proceeds of the tax
authorized in this section, and shall indicate that such tax is intended to be
in addition to other funds that may be reasonably available for ((such))
capital projects and maintenance and operations of park facilities.

(2) The legislative
authority of any county or any city that plans under RCW 36.70A.040(1) may
impose an additional excise tax on each sale of real property in the
unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the corporate
limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding one-quarter of one
percent of the selling price. Any county choosing to plan under RCW
36.70A.040(2) and any city within such a county may only adopt an ordinance
imposing the excise tax authorized by this section if the ordinance is first
authorized by a proposition approved by a majority of the voters of the taxing
district voting on the proposition at a general election held within the
district or at a special election within the taxing district called by the
district for the purpose of submitting such proposition to the voters.

(3) Revenues generated
from the tax imposed under subsection (2) of this section shall be used by such
counties and cities ((solely)) for financing capital projects specified
in a capital facilities plan element of a comprehensive plan, and for
maintenance and operations of park facilities acquired or developed with
revenues from the tax imposed under subsection (2) of this section after
December 31, 2001. The amount of revenues used for maintenance or operations
of park facilities by a county or city shall not exceed twenty-five percent of
the total amount collected from this tax by that county or city in the
preceding calendar year. Revenues from this tax shall not be used by any
county or city to supplant existing funding for maintenance and operations of
park facilities. However, revenues (a) pledged by such counties and cities
to debt retirement prior to March 1, 1992, may continue to be used for that
purpose until the original debt for which the revenues were pledged is retired,
or (b) committed prior to March 1, 1992, by such counties or cities to a
project may continue to be used for that purpose until the project is
completed.

(4) Revenues generated
by the tax imposed by this section shall be deposited in a separate account.

(5) As used in this
section, "city" means any city or town and "capital
project" means those public works projects of a local government for
planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, replacement,
rehabilitation, or improvement of streets, roads, highways, sidewalks, street
and road lighting systems, traffic signals, bridges, domestic water systems,
storm and sanitary sewer systems, and planning, construction, reconstruction,
repair, rehabilitation, or improvement of parks.

(6) When the governor
files a notice of noncompliance under RCW 36.70A.340 with the secretary of
state and the appropriate county or city, the county or city's authority to
impose the additional excise tax under this section shall be temporarily
rescinded until the governor files a subsequent notice rescinding the notice of
noncompliance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of any county or any city that has imposed both the excise taxes on
the sale of real property authorized in RCW 82.46.010 and 82.46.035 may impose
an additional excise tax on each sale of real property in the unincorporated
areas of the county for the county tax and in the corporate limits of the city
for the city tax at a rate not exceeding one-eighth of one percent of the
selling price. The legislative authority of any county or any city may only
adopt an ordinance imposing the excise tax authorized by this section if the
ordinance is first authorized by a proposition approved by a majority of the
voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition at a general election
held within the district or at a special election within the taxing district
called by the district for the purpose of submitting such a proposition to the
voters.

(2) Revenues generated
from the tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section must be used by the
counties and cities solely for the maintenance and operation of park and
recreation facilities acquired or developed with revenues from the taxes
imposed under RCW 82.46.010 or 82.46.035 after December 31, 2001. Revenues
from this tax may not be used by any county or city to supplant existing
funding for maintenance and operation of park and recreation facilities.

(3) As used in this
section, "city" means any city or town.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---