BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 10.77.060 and 2000 c
74 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Whenever
there is reason to doubt the competency of a defendant, the court on its own
motion or on the motion of any party shall either appoint or request the
secretary to designate a qualified expert or professional person to examine and
report upon the mental condition of the defendant. The expert or professional
person appointed must be a developmental disabilities professional if the court
is advised by any party that the defendant may be developmentally disabled.
The report of the results of the examination shall be submitted to the court
within fifteen days of the expert or professional person receiving the order of
the court, charging documents, and the relevant discovery materials.
Additional time may be granted by the court upon the request of the examiner.
If clinically necessary and requested by the appointed or designated expert or
professional person, the court may order the defendant committed to a hospital
or other suitably secure public or private mental health facility for a period
of time necessary to complete the examination, but not to exceed fifteen days
from the time of admission to the facility. "Clinically necessary"
for purposes of this section does not include the expert or professional
person's convenience. At the request of the expert or professional person, the
court may appoint or designate additional experts or professional persons to
conduct the examination.

(b) Whenever a
defendant has ((pleaded)) entered into court a plea of not guilty
by reason of insanity, ((or there is reason to doubt his or her competency,))
the court on its own motion or on the motion of any party shall either appoint
or request the secretary to designate ((at least)) one or two
qualified experts or professional persons, one of whom shall be approved by the
prosecuting attorney, to examine and report upon the mental condition of the
defendant. At least one of the experts or professional persons appointed or
designated shall be a developmental disabilities professional if the court
is advised by any party that the defendant may be developmentally disabled.
For purposes of the examination, the court may order the defendant: (i)
Upon agreement of the parties, examined in the jail, detention facility, or out
of custody by one expert or professional person; or (ii) committed to a
hospital or other suitably secure public or private mental health facility for
a period of time necessary to complete the examination by two experts or
professional persons, but not to exceed fifteen days from the time of
admission to the facility. At the request of the expert or professional
person, the court may appoint or designate additional experts or professional
persons to conduct the examination.

(((b))) (c)
Whenever a defendant has informed the court of the possible intent to introduce
evidence of a diminished capacity, the court on its own motion or on the motion
of any party shall either appoint or request the secretary to designate one or
two qualified experts or professional persons, one of whom must be approved by
the prosecuting attorney, to examine and report upon the mental condition of
the defendant. At least one of the experts or professional persons appointed
or designated must be a developmental disabilities professional if the court is
advised by any party that the defendant may be developmentally disabled. For
purposes of the examination, the court may order the defendant: (i) Upon
agreement of the parties, examined in the jail, detention facility, or out of
custody by one expert or professional person; or (ii) committed to a hospital
or other suitably secure public or private mental health facility for a period
of time necessary to complete the examination by two experts or professional
persons, but not to exceed fifteen days from the time of admission to the
facility. At the request of the expert or professional person, the court may
appoint or designate additional experts or professional persons to conduct the
examination.

(d) When a
defendant is ordered to be examined or committed for inpatient
examination under this subsection (1), the court may delay granting bail until
the defendant has been ((evaluated)) examined for competency or
sanity and appears before the court. Following the evaluation, in determining
bail the court shall consider: (i) Recommendations of the expert or
professional persons regarding the defendant's competency, sanity, or
diminished capacity; (ii) whether the defendant has a recent history of one or
more violent acts; (iii) whether the defendant has previously been acquitted by
reason of insanity or found incompetent; (iv) whether it is reasonably likely
the defendant will fail to appear for a future court hearing; and (v) whether
the defendant is a threat to public safety.

(2) The court may
direct that a qualified expert or professional person retained by or appointed
for the defendant be permitted to witness the examination authorized by
subsection (1) of this section, and that the defendant shall have access to all
information obtained by the court appointed experts or professional persons.
The defendant's expert or professional person shall have the right to file his
or her own report following the guidelines of subsection (((3))) (4)
of this section. If the defendant is indigent, the court shall upon the
request of the defendant assist him or her in obtaining an expert or
professional person.

(3) The report of
the examination regarding competency must include the following:

(a) A description of
the nature of the examination;

(b) A diagnosis of
the mental condition of the defendant;

(c) If the defendant
suffers from a mental disease or defect or is developmentally disabled, an
opinion as to the defendant's capacity to understand the nature of the
proceedings and to assist in his or her defense as a result of mental disease
or defect; and

(d) An opinion,
based on the examination, as to whether the defendant should be evaluated by a
county designated mental health professional under chapter 71.05 RCW, and, if
requested by the court, an opinion as to whether the defendant is a substantial
danger to other persons, or presents a substantial likelihood of committing
criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security, unless kept under further
control by the court or other persons or institutions.

(4) The report
of the examination regarding sanity when the defendant has entered into
court a plea of not guilty by reason of insanity pursuant to RCW 10.77.030
shall include the following:

(a) A description of
the nature of the examination;

(b) A diagnosis of the
mental condition of the defendant;

(c) ((If the
defendant suffers from a mental disease or defect, or is developmentally
disabled, an opinion as to competency;

(d) If the defendant
has indicated his or her intention to rely on the defense of insanity pursuant
to RCW 10.77.030,)) An
opinion as to the defendant's ((sanity)) ability at the time of
((the act)) commission of the offense, as a result of mental disease
or defect, to perceive the nature and quality of the act charged and ability to
tell right from wrong with reference to the act charged;

(((e) When directed
by the court, an opinion as to the capacity of the defendant to have a
particular state of mind which is an element of the offense charged;

(f))) (d) An opinion as to whether the
defendant should be evaluated by a county designated mental health professional
under chapter 71.05 RCW, and, if requested by the court, an opinion as
to whether the defendant is a substantial danger to other persons, or presents
a substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety
or security, unless kept under further control by the court or other persons or
institutions.

(((4))) (5)
The report of the examination regarding diminished capacity when a defendant
has informed the court of the possible intent to introduce evidence of a
diminished capacity must include the following:

(a) A description of
the nature of the examination;

(b) A diagnosis of
the mental condition of the defendant;

(c) An opinion as to
the capacity of the defendant to have a particular state of mind which is an
element of the offense charged;

(d) An opinion as to
whether the defendant should be evaluated by a county designated mental health
professional under chapter 71.05 RCW, and, if requested by the court, an
opinion as to whether the defendant is a substantial danger to other persons,
or presents a substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing
public safety or security, unless kept under further control by the court or
other persons or institutions.

(6)
The secretary may execute such agreements as appropriate and necessary to
implement this section.

--- END ---