BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.155.050 and 1993
c 507 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person may
engage in the business of sampling within the state unless licensed to do so by
the board. Samplers may distribute or cause to be distributed free samples
of tobacco products only in adult-only facilities. A sample does not include a
tobacco product that is provided to an adult in connection with: (a) The
purchase, exchange, or redemption for proof of purchase of any tobacco
products, including, but not limited to, a free offer in connection with the
purchase of tobacco products, such as a two-for-one offer, or (b) the
conducting of consumer testing or evaluation of tobacco products with persons
who certify that they are adults. No samples may be distributed or caused to
be distributed on any campus of any institution of higher education in this
state, including public, private, or proprietary institutions. If a firm
contracts with a manufacturer to distribute samples of the manufacturer's
products, that firm is deemed to be the person engaged in the business of
sampling.

(2) The board shall
issue a license to a sampler not otherwise disqualified by RCW 70.155.100 upon
application and payment of the fee.

(3) A sampler's license
expires on the thirtieth day of June of each year and must be renewed annually
upon payment of the appropriate fee.

(4) The board shall
annually determine the fee for a sampler's license and each renewal. However,
the fee for a manufacturer whose employees distribute samples within the state
is five hundred dollars per annum, and the fee for all other samplers must be
not less than fifty dollars per annum.

(5) A sampler's license
entitles the licensee, and employees or agents of the licensee, to distribute
samples at any lawful location in the state during the term of the license. A
person engaged in sampling under the license shall carry the license or a copy
at all times.

(6) For
the purposes of this section, "adult-only facility" means a facility
or restricted area where the operator ensures or has a reasonable basis to
believe that no underage person is present. A facility or restricted area need
not be permanently restricted to adults in order to constitute an adult-only
facility if the operator ensures or has a reasonable basis to believe that no
underage person is present during the event or time period in question. A
reasonable basis for belief can be shown through checking identification as
required under state law, or by checking the identification of any person appearing
to be under the age of twenty-seven.

--- END ---