BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 31.04.102 and 2001 c
81 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

((Within three
business days following receipt of a loan application, a)) (1) For all
loans made by a licensee that are not secured by a lien on real property, the
licensee must make disclosures in compliance with the truth in lending act, 15
U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Sec. 226, and all other applicable
federal laws and regulations.

(2) For all loans
made by a licensee that are secured by a lien on real property, the
licensee shall provide to each borrower within three business days following
receipt of a loan application a written disclosure containing an itemized
estimation and explanation of all fees and costs that the borrower is required
to pay in connection with obtaining a loan from the licensee. A good faith
estimate of a fee or cost shall be provided if the exact amount of the fee or
cost is not available when the disclosure is provided. Disclosure in a form
which complies with the requirements of the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C.
Sec. 1601 and regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Sec. 226, the real estate settlement
procedures act and regulation X, 24 C.F.R. Sec. 3500, and all other applicable
federal laws and regulations, as now or hereafter amended, shall be deemed to
constitute compliance with ((the)) this disclosure requirement((s
of this section when it is provided to the borrower within three days of
receipt of a loan application)). Each licensee shall comply with all other
applicable federal and state laws and regulations.

(3) In
addition, for all loans made by the licensee that are secured by a lien on real
property, the licensee must provide to the borrower an estimate of the annual
percentage rate on the loan and a disclosure of whether or not the loan
contains a prepayment penalty within three days of receipt of a loan
application. The annual percentage rate must be calculated in compliance with
the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Sec.
226. If a licensee provides the borrower with a disclosure in compliance with
the requirements of the truth in lending act within three business days of
receipt of a loan application, then the licensee has complied with this
subsection. If the director determines that the federal government has
required a disclosure that substantially meets the objectives of this
subsection, then the director may make a determination by rule that compliance
with this federal disclosure requirement constitutes compliance with this
subsection.

--- END ---