BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.37.030 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 9 s 261 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby
established a public body corporate and politic, with perpetual corporate
succession, to be known as the Washington health care facilities authority.
The authority shall constitute a political subdivision of the state established
as an instrumentality exercising essential governmental functions. The authority
is a "public body" within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010((, as now
or hereafter amended)). The authority shall consist of the governor who
shall serve as chairman, the lieutenant governor, the insurance commissioner,
the secretary of health, and one member of the public who shall be appointed by
the governor, subject to confirmation by the senate, on the basis of the
member's interest or expertise in health care delivery, for a term expiring on
the fourth anniversary of the date of appointment. In the event that any of
the offices referred to shall be abolished the resulting vacancy on the
authority shall be filled by the officer who shall succeed substantially to the
powers and duties thereof. The members of the authority shall be compensated
in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be entitled to reimbursement, solely
from the funds of the authority, for travel expenses incurred in the discharge
of their duties under this chapter, subject to the provisions of RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060. A majority shall constitute a quorum.

The governor and the
insurance commissioner each may designate an employee of ((the
governor's)) his or her office to act on his or her behalf ((of
the governor)) during the absence of the governor or the insurance
commissioner at one or more of the meetings of the authority. The vote of
the designee shall have the same effect as if cast by the governor or the
insurance commissioner if the designation is in writing and is presented to
the person presiding at the meetings included within the designation.

The
governor may designate a member to preside during the governor's absence.

--- END ---