BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.44.140 and 2001 c
170 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The duty to
register under RCW 9A.44.130 shall end:

(a) For a person
convicted of a class A felony or an offense listed in subsection (5) of this
section, or a person convicted of any sex offense or kidnapping offense who has
one or more prior convictions for a sex offense or kidnapping offense: Such
person may only be relieved of the duty to register under subsection (3) or (4)
of this section.

(b) For a person
convicted of a class B felony, and the person does not have one or more prior
convictions for a sex offense or kidnapping offense and the person's current
offense is not listed in subsection (5) of this section: Fifteen years after
the last date of release from confinement, if any, (including full-time
residential treatment) pursuant to the conviction, or entry of the judgment and
sentence, if the person has spent fifteen consecutive years in the community
without being convicted of any new offenses.

(c) For a person
convicted of a class C felony, a violation of RCW 9.68A.090 or 9A.44.096, or an
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a class C felony, and the person
does not have one or more prior convictions for a sex offense or kidnapping
offense and the person's current offense is not listed in subsection (5) of
this section: Ten years after the last date of release from confinement, if
any, (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to the conviction, or
entry of the judgment and sentence, if the person has spent ten consecutive
years in the community without being convicted of any new offenses.

(2) The provisions of
subsection (1) of this section shall apply equally to a person who has been
found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of a sex offense
or kidnapping offense.

(3)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, any person having a duty to register
under RCW 9A.44.130 may petition the superior court to be relieved of that
duty, if the person has spent ten consecutive years in the community without
being convicted of any new offenses. The petition shall be made to the court
in which the petitioner was convicted of the offense that subjects him or her
to the duty to register, or, in the case of convictions in other states, a
foreign country, or a federal or military court, to the court in Thurston
county. The prosecuting attorney of the county shall be named and served as the
respondent in any such petition. The court shall consider the nature of the
registrable offense committed, and the criminal and relevant noncriminal
behavior of the petitioner both before and after conviction, and may consider
other factors. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the court
may relieve the petitioner of the duty to register only if the petitioner
shows, with clear and convincing evidence, that future registration of the
petitioner will not serve the purposes of RCW 9A.44.130, 10.01.200, 43.43.540,
46.20.187, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330.

(b)(i) The court may
not relieve a person of the duty to register if the person has been determined
to be a sexually violent predator as defined in RCW 71.09.020, or has been
convicted of a sex offense or kidnapping offense that is a class A felony and
that was committed with forcible compulsion on or after June 8, 2000.

(ii) The court may
not relieve a person of the duty to register if the person has been convicted
of one aggravated offense or more than one sexually violent offense, as defined
in subsection (5) of this section, and the offense or offenses were committed
on or after the effective date of this act.

(c) Any person
subject to (b)(((i))) of this subsection or subsection (5) of this
section may petition the court to be exempted from any community notification
requirements that the person may be subject to fifteen years after the later of
the entry of the judgment and sentence or the last date of release from
confinement, including full-time residential treatment, pursuant to the
conviction, if the person has spent the time in the community without being
convicted of any new offense.

(4) An offender having
a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for a sex offense or kidnapping offense
committed when the offender was a juvenile may petition the superior court to
be relieved of that duty. The court shall consider the nature of the
registrable offense committed, and the criminal and relevant noncriminal
behavior of the petitioner both before and after adjudication, and may consider
other factors.

(a) The court may
relieve the petitioner of the duty to register for a sex offense or kidnapping
offense that was committed while the petitioner was fifteen years of age or
older only if the petitioner shows, with clear and convincing evidence, that
future registration of the petitioner will not serve the purposes of RCW
9A.44.130, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 46.20.187, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330.

(b) The court may
relieve the petitioner of the duty to register for a sex offense or kidnapping
offense that was committed while the petitioner was under the age of fifteen if
the petitioner (i) has not been adjudicated of any additional sex offenses or
kidnapping offenses during the twenty-four months following the adjudication
for the offense giving rise to the duty to register, and (ii) proves by a
preponderance of the evidence that future registration of the petitioner will
not serve the purposes of RCW 9A.44.130, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 46.20.187,
70.48.470, and 72.09.330.

This subsection shall
not apply to juveniles prosecuted as adults.

(5)(a) A person who has
been convicted of an aggravated offense, or has been convicted of one or more
prior sexually violent offenses or criminal offenses against a victim who is a
minor, as defined in (b) of this subsection may only be relieved of the duty to
register under subsection (3) ((or (4))) (b) of this section.
This provision shall apply to convictions for crimes committed on or after July
22, 2001.

(b) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the following definitions apply only to the federal
lifetime registration requirements under this subsection:

(i) "Aggravated
offense" means an adult conviction that meets the definition of 18 U.S.C.
Sec. 2241, which is limited to the following:

(A) Any sex offense
involving sexual intercourse or sexual contact where the victim is under twelve
years of age;

(B) RCW 9A.44.040 (rape
in the first degree), RCW 9A.44.073 (rape of a child in the first degree), or RCW
9A.44.083 (child molestation in the first degree);

(C) Any of the
following offenses when committed by forcible compulsion or by the offender
administering, by threat or force or without the knowledge or permission of
that person, a drug, intoxicant, or other similar substance that substantially
impairs the ability of that person to appraise or control conduct: RCW
9A.44.050 (rape in the second degree), RCW 9A.44.100 (indecent liberties), RCW
9A.44.160 (custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree), RCW 9A.64.020
(incest), or RCW 9.68A.040 (sexual exploitation of a minor);

(D) Any of the
following offenses when committed by forcible compulsion or by the offender
administering, by threat or force or without the knowledge or permission of
that person, a drug, intoxicant, or other similar substance that substantially
impairs the ability of that person to appraise or control conduct, if the
victim is twelve years of age or over but under sixteen years of age and the
offender is eighteen years of age or over and is more than forty-eight months
older than the victim: RCW 9A.44.076 (rape of a child in the second degree),
RCW 9A.44.079 (rape of a child in the third degree), RCW 9A.44.086 (child
molestation in the second degree), or RCW 9A.44.089 (child molestation in the
third degree);

(E) A felony with a
finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 where the victim is under
twelve years of age or that is committed by forcible compulsion or by the
offender administering, by threat or force or without the knowledge or
permission of that person, a drug, intoxicant, or other similar substance that
substantially impairs the ability of that person to appraise or control
conduct;

(F) An offense that is,
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, an attempt or solicitation to commit such an offense;
or

(G) An offense defined
by federal law or the laws of another state that is equivalent to the offenses
listed in (b)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection.

(ii) "Sexually
violent offense" means an adult conviction that meets the definition of 42
U.S.C. Sec. 14071(a)(1)(A), which is limited to the following:

(A) An aggravated
offense;

(B) An offense that is
not an aggravated offense but meets the definition of 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2242,
which is limited to RCW 9A.44.050(1) (b) through (f) (rape in the second
degree) and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) through (f) (indecent liberties);

(C) A felony with a
finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 where the victim is incapable
of appraising the nature of the conduct or physically incapable of declining
participation in, or communicating unwillingness to engage in, the conduct;

(D) An offense that is,
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, an attempt or solicitation to commit such an offense;
or

(E) An offense defined
by federal law or the laws of another state that is equivalent to the offenses
listed in (b)(ii)(A) through (D) of this subsection.

(iii) "Criminal
offense against a victim who is a minor" means, in addition to any
aggravated offense or sexually violent offense where the victim was under eighteen
years of age, an adult conviction for the following offenses where the victim
is under eighteen years of age:

(A) RCW 9A.44.060 (rape
in the third degree), RCW 9A.44.076 (rape of a child in the second degree), RCW
9A.44.079 (rape of a child in the third degree), RCW 9A.44.086 (child
molestation in the second degree), RCW 9A.44.089 (child molestation in the
third degree), RCW 9A.44.093 (sexual misconduct with a minor in the first
degree), RCW 9A.44.096 (sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree),
RCW 9A.44.160 (custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree), RCW 9A.64.020
(incest), RCW 9.68A.040 (sexual exploitation of a minor), RCW 9.68A.090
(communication with a minor for immoral purposes), or RCW 9.68A.100
(patronizing a juvenile prostitute);

(B) RCW 9A.40.020
(kidnapping in the first degree), RCW 9A.40.030 (kidnapping in the second
degree), or RCW 9A.40.040 (unlawful imprisonment), where the victim is a minor
and the offender is not the minor's parent;

(C) A felony with a
finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 where the victim is a minor;

(D) An offense that is,
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, an attempt or solicitation to commit such an offense;
or

(E) An offense defined
by federal law or the laws of another state that is equivalent to the offenses
listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (D) of this subsection.

(6) Unless relieved of
the duty to register pursuant to this section, a violation of RCW 9A.44.130 is
an ongoing offense for purposes of the statute of limitations under RCW
9A.04.080.

(7) Nothing in RCW
9.94A.637 relating to discharge of an offender shall be construed as operating
to relieve the offender of his or her duty to register pursuant to RCW
9A.44.130.

(8) For purposes of
determining whether a person has been convicted of more than one sex offense,
failure to register as a sex offender or kidnapping offender is not a sex or
kidnapping offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. RCW 9A.44.140(3)(b)(ii)
expires July 1, 2012.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---