BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.63.110 and 2001 c
289 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person found to
have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a monetary penalty. No
penalty may exceed two hundred and fifty dollars for each offense unless
authorized by this chapter or title.

(2) The supreme court
shall prescribe by rule a schedule of monetary penalties for designated traffic
infractions. This rule shall also specify the conditions under which local
courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic
infractions. The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust
this schedule every two years for inflation.

(3) There shall be a
penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of traffic
infraction except where the infraction relates to parking as defined by local
law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty
imposed pursuant to this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary
penalty not to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of
traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law, ordinance,
regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a municipal, police, or
district court, shall impose the monetary penalty set by the local legislative
body.

(4) Monetary penalties
provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are civil in nature and penalties which
may be assessed for violations of chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight,
and load of motor vehicles are not subject to the limitation on the amount of monetary
penalties which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.

(5) Whenever a monetary
penalty is imposed by a court under this chapter it is immediately payable. If
((the person is unable to pay at that time the court may, in its discretion,
grant an extension of the period in which the penalty may be paid. If the
penalty is not paid on or before the time established for payment)) a
person is not able to pay a monetary penalty in full, the court shall enter
into a payment plan with the person. "Payment plan," as used in this
section, means a plan that requires a person to pay an initial payment of not
less than five percent of the total owed, followed by reasonable payments in an
amount established by the court. The initial payment amount required by the
court may be no greater than thirty dollars, but the person may voluntarily pay
a higher amount. No required payment may exceed ten percent of the original
amount owed; however, the person may voluntarily pay any amount at any time in
addition to these payments.

(a) If a payment
required to be made under the payment plan is delinquent by thirty days,
the court shall notify the department of the failure to pay the penalty, and
the department shall suspend the person's driver's license or driving privilege
until the penalty has been paid ((and)), including the penalty
provided in subsection (3) of this section ((has been paid)).

(b) If a person has
not entered into a payment plan with the court and has not paid the penalty in
full on or before the time established for payment, the court shall notify the
department of the delinquency, and the department shall suspend the person's
driver's license or driving privilege until the penalty has been paid,
including the penalty provided in subsection (3) of this section, or until the
person has entered into a payment plan under this section and has paid the
initial payment.

(c) If a community
service program for offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court shall
offer to convert all or part of the monetary penalties due under this
subsection (5) to community service if the person is unable to make reasonable
time payments.

(6) In addition to any
other penalties imposed under this section and not subject to the limitation of
subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have committed a traffic
infraction shall be assessed a fee of five dollars per infraction. Under no
circumstances shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall
be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical
services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040.

(7)(a) In addition to
any other penalties imposed under this section and not subject to the
limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have committed
a traffic infraction other than of RCW 46.61.527 shall be assessed an
additional penalty of ten dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend
the additional penalty unless the court finds the offender to be indigent. If
a community service program for offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the
court shall allow offenders to offset all or a part of the penalty due under
this subsection (7) by participation in the community service program.

(b) Revenue from the
additional penalty must be remitted under chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62,
10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted under this subsection to the state
treasurer must be deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250. The balance of the
revenue received by the county or city treasurer under this subsection must be
deposited into the county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the
city or county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any
liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.64.025 and 1999 c
86 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever any
person violates his or her written promise to appear in court, ((or))
fails to appear for a scheduled court hearing, or fails to comply with the
terms of a citation, the court in which the defendant failed to appear or
comply shall promptly give notice of such fact to the department of
licensing. Whenever thereafter the case in which the defendant failed to
appear or comply is adjudicated, the court hearing the case shall
promptly file with the department a certificate showing that the case has been
adjudicated.

(2)
Where compliance with the terms of a misdemeanor citation is limited to the
payment of a monetary penalty, and a person is not able to pay the monetary penalty
in full, the court shall enter into a payment plan with the person.
"Payment plan," as used in this section, means a plan that requires a
person to pay an initial payment of not less than five percent of the total
owed, followed by reasonable payments in an amount established by the court.
No required payment may exceed ten percent of the original amount owed. The
person may voluntarily pay any amount at any time in addition to these
payments. If a person has entered into a payment plan under this subsection,
the court shall not notify the department of licensing that the person has
failed to comply with the terms of a citation as it applies to payment of the
monetary penalty unless a payment required to be made under the payment plan is
delinquent by thirty days.

---
END ---