BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.190 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 313 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A sentence that
includes a term or terms of confinement totaling more than ((one year)) nine
months shall be served in a facility or institution operated, or utilized under
contract, by the state. Except as provided in subsection (3) or (5) of this
section, a sentence of not more than ((one year)) nine months of
confinement shall be served in a facility operated, licensed, or utilized under
contract, by the county, or if home detention or work crew has been ordered by
the court, in the residence of either the offender or a member of the
offender's immediate family.

(2) If a county uses a
state partial confinement facility for the partial confinement of a person
sentenced to confinement for not more than ((one year)) nine months,
the county shall reimburse the state for the use of the facility as provided in
this subsection. The office of financial management shall set the rate of
reimbursement based upon the average per diem cost per offender in the
facility. The office of financial management shall determine to what extent,
if any, reimbursement shall be reduced or eliminated because of funds provided
by the legislature to the department for the purpose of covering the cost of
county use of state partial confinement facilities. The office of financial
management shall reestablish reimbursement rates each even-numbered year.

(3) A person who is
sentenced for a felony to a term of not more than ((one year)) nine
months, and who is committed or returned to incarceration in a state
facility on another felony conviction, either under the indeterminate
sentencing laws, chapter 9.95 RCW, or under this chapter shall serve all terms
of confinement, including a sentence of not more than ((one year)) nine
months, in a facility or institution operated, or utilized under contract,
by the state, consistent with the provisions of RCW 9.94A.589.

(4) Notwithstanding any
other provision of this section, a sentence imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.660
which has a standard sentence range of over ((one year)) nine months,
regardless of length, shall be served in a facility or institution operated, or
utilized under contract, by the state.

(5) Sentences imposed
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.712 shall be served in a facility or institution
operated, or utilized under contract, by the state.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.48.400 and 1987 c
462 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Persons
sentenced to felony terms or a combination of terms of more than ((three
hundred sixty-five days)) nine months of incarceration shall be
committed to state institutions under the authority of the department of
corrections. Persons serving sentences of ((three hundred sixty-five
consecutive days)) nine months or less may be sentenced to a jail as
defined in RCW 70.48.020. All persons convicted of felonies or misdemeanors
and sentenced to jail shall be the financial responsibility of the city or
county.

---
END ---