BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

TRANSPORTATION INVESTMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature recognizes
that a good transportation system is critical in keeping Washington state's
economy strong and its businesses competitive. The legislature further
recognizes that badly needed investments in our state's transportation
infrastructure will create jobs and help to ensure Washington's long-term
economic success.

(2) The transportation
investment act of 2002 is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set
forth in this act, the several amounts hereinafter specified, or as much
thereof as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated from the several accounts and funds hereinafter named to the
designated state agencies and offices for employee compensation and other
expenses, for capital projects, and for other specified purposes, including the
payment of any final judgments arising out of such activities, for the period
ending June 30, 2003.

(3) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout
the act.

(a) "Fiscal year
2002" or "FY 2002" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002.

(b) "Fiscal year
2003" or "FY 2003" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003.

(c) "FTE"
means full-time equivalent.

(d) "Lapse"
or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated
status.

(e) "Provided
solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified
purpose.

OPERATING‑-GENERAL GOVERNMENT
AGENCIES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 100,000

OPERATING‑-TRANSPORTATION
AGENCIES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
PLANNING. $3,000,000 of the
motor vehicle fund‑-state is appropriated to the department of
transportation and is provided solely for the expenses associated with the
regional transportation investment district planning committee responsibilities
established in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6140.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. TRANSPORTATION
EFFICIENCIES. $1,225,100 of the
motor vehicle fund‑-state is appropriated to the department of transportation
and provided solely for the department to implement the state's
responsibilities as outlined in chapter 5, Laws of 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
203. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION‑-PROGRAM
V

Project 2001-03
Total Recommended Future Biennia

(projected
cost)

Transit $19,890,000 $430,110,000

Paratransit $3,600,000 $71,400,000

Rural Mobility Grants $3,600,000 $71,400,000

Vanpool Expansion $1,910,000 $37,890,000

Commute Trip Reduction $6,000,000 $94,000,000

Park and Rides $4,000,000 $76,000,000

Appropriation:

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State........ $ 36,000,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 3,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State........ $ 0

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State........ $ 743,800,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 37,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 819,800,000

The appropriations
provided in this section are provided solely for the following purposes and are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department
shall work cooperatively with the agency council on coordinated transportation
and the Washington state transit association to establish grant application
procedures and selection criteria for paratransit and rural mobility projects.

(2) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation in this section is provided solely for park
and ride expansion.

(3) Transit funds in
this section shall be distributed to transit systems as follows:

(a) 50% of funds shall
be distributed based on service area population to C-Tran, Community Transit,
Everett Transit, King County Metro Transit, Pierce Transit, and Spokane Transit
Authority;

(b) 30% of funds shall
be distributed based on service area population to: Ben Franklin Transit,
Cowlitz Transit Authority, Intercity Transit, Kitsap Transit, Whatcom
Transportation Authority, and Yakima Transit; and

(c) 20% of funds shall
be distributed based on service area population to: Clallam Transit System,
Garfield County, Grant Transit Authority, Grays Harbor Transportation
Authority, Island Transit, Jefferson Transit Authority, Link Transit, Mason
County Transportation Authority, Pacific Transit, Pullman Transit, Skagit
Transit, Twin Transit, and Valley Transit.

(4) Commute trip
reduction funds shall be allocated as follows: $4,000,000 shall be distributed
to local governments in the form of grants; $2,000,000 shall be distributed as
grants to public agencies, nonprofit organizations, developers, and property
managers and as tax credits to employers' business and occupation tax, as provided
in Senate Bill No. 6008. If Senate Bill No. 6008 is not enacted by the
legislature by January 1, 2003, the $2,000,000 shall be distributed to local
governments in the form of grants.

(5) In a county with a
population over one hundred fifty thousand where a public transportation
benefit area and a city both operate a public transportation system, funds may
not be released until the transit systems develop an interlocal agreement to
serve paratransit and special needs transit.

(6) The department
shall consider the following factors when making decisions regarding the
appropriations provided for park and ride lots in this section: Park and ride
lots shall be distributed across the state, including islands, to meet multiple
service needs and shall be used for multimodal purposes, including ferries and
rail.

(7) The department
shall use up to $500,000 of this appropriation to clear, expand, grade, and
surface parking lots in the San Juan Islands as follows: The parking lot on
Lopez Island; Lot C at Friday Harbor; and the parking lot on Orcas Island.

(8) The department
shall use up to $1,500,000 of this appropriation, in cooperation with Island
County, to develop park and ride facilities on Whidbey Island.

CAPITAL‑-HIGHWAY IMPROVEMENTS AND
PRESERVATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I--MAJOR
PROJECTS

(1) SR 018, Maple
Valley to I-90 Additional Lanes - (20020011)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 2,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 47,517,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,017,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$2,500,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(2) SR 090, Snoqualmie
Pass East, Reconstruct and Add New Lanes - (20020025)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 15,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 85,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 100,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$15,000,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(3) SR 099, Alaskan Way
Viaduct Replacement - (20020020)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 70,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)....... ............ $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 380,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 450,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$70,000,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(4) SR 167, Tacoma to
Edgewood New Freeway Construction, Preliminary Engineering and Right of Way -
(20020031)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 50,600,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 293,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 343,600,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$50,600,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(5) SR 395, Spokane -
Hawthorne to Wandermere - (20020042)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 58,799,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 147,820,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 206,619,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$58,799,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(6) SR 405, Tukwila to
Lynnwood Additional Lanes - (20020015)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 270,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,500,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,770,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$270,000,000 is
provided for preconstruction.

(7) SR 509, Federal Way
to Sea Tac South Access/Corridor Completion - (20020016)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 122,130,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 377,870,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$122,130,000 is
provided for preconstruction.

(8) SR 520, Seattle to
Bellevue - Translake - (20020021)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 38,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 62,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 100,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$38,000,000 is provided
for preconstruction; and is intended to complete the environmental impact
statement to the record of decision.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM
I--MOBILITY AND ECONOMIC INITIATIVE IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS

(1) SR 003, Silverdale
- Waaga Way Interchange Ramp - (20020022)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$5,000,000 is provided
for construction.

(2) SR 004, Svensen's
Curve - (20020061)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 720,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,280,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$720,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(3) SR 005, Chehalis to
Maytown Additional Lanes and Flood Control - (20020027)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 14,600,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 70,615,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 85,215,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$14,600,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(4) SR 005, Chehalis
Western Trail Overcrossing - (20020057)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 527,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,213,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,740,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$527,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(5) SR 005,
I-5/Interstate Bridge - Replacement - (20020081)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL........ ........................... $ 1,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$1,000,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(6) SR 005, I-5/SR 502
Interchange - (20020053)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 10,100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 12,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,100,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$10,100,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(7) SR 005, Lynnwood -
196th Street Interchange - (20020034)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 2,800,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 22,200,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and limitations
and section 804 of this act:

$2,800,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(8) SR 005, Mount
Vernon - 2nd Street Bridge Replacement - (20020033)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 10,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$10,000,000 is provided
for construction.

(9) SR 005, Smokey
Point - 172nd Street NE (SR 531) Widening - (20020035)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 13,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$2,000,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(10) SR 005, Vancouver
- Salmon Creek to I-205 Additional Lanes - (20020002)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 35,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 35,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$35,000,000 is provided
for construction.

(11) SR 005, Vancouver,
134th Interchange - (20020062)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 2,400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 37,600,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 40,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$2,400,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(12) SR 009, Clearview
- 212th Street SE and 176th Street SE Additional Lanes - (20020036)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,900,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 15,100,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$1,900,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(13) SR 009, Corridor
Improvements - (20020063)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 10,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 40,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$10,000,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(14) SR 012, Tri-Cities
to Wallula Additional Lanes - (20020044)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 3,350,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 21,650,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$3,350,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(15) SR 012, Walla
Walla to Wallula Pre-planning Study - (20020083)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 3,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$3,000,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(16) SR 014,
Camas-Washougal Vicinity New Interchange - (20020003)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 800,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 20,200,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$800,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(17) SR 014, Maryhill
Vicinity Truck-Climbing Lane - (20020008)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 125,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,120,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,245,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$125,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(18) SR 020, Burlington
Vicinity - Fredonia to I-5 Additional Lanes - (20020056)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 45,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$5,000,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(19) SR 031, Metaline
Falls - Pend Oreille to Canadian Border All-weather Road - (20020028)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 15,540,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,540,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$540,000 is provided
for preconstruction; and

$15,000,000 is provided
for construction.

(20) SR 090, Columbia
Basin Vicinity - Truck Climbing Lanes - (20020026)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 15,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$15,000,000 is provided
for construction.

(21) SR 090, Moses Lake
Vicinity Bridge Replacement - (20020007)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)................ ... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,700,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$300,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(22) SR 090, Spokane -
Argonne to Sullivan Road - (20020064)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 35,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 35,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$35,000,000 is provided
for construction.

(23) SR 096, SR
96/Seattle Hill Road to SR 9 - (20020072)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 11,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$11,000,000 is provided
for construction.

(24) SR 099, Shoreline
Aurora Ave North Corridor - (20020065)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 10,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$10,000,000 is provided
for construction.

(25) SR 101,
Blyn/Gardiner Vicinity - Truck/Passing Lanes - (20020058)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 3,030,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,030,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$120,000 is provided
for preconstruction; and

$2,910,000 is provided
for construction.

(26) West Olympia
Access Study - (2002094)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$500,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(27) SR 161, Puyallup
to Fife Additional Lanes - (20020030)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 980,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 44,020,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 45,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$980,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(28) SR 167, Corridor
Study - (20020085)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 8,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$8,000,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(29) SR 205, I-205/SR
14 to 83rd St - Widening - (20020054)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 41,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 46,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$5,000,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(30) SR 205, Vancouver
- Mill Plain Exit (112th Connector) - (20020090)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 10,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$2,000,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(31) SR 240, Tri-Cities
Additional Lanes - (20020001)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 40,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 45,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$5,000,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(32) SR 241, North
Sunnyside Reconstruction - (20020051)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 470,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,410,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,880,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$470,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(33) SR 270, Pullman to
Idaho State Line Additional Lanes - (20020048)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 3,661,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 21,339,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$3,661,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(34) SR 304, Bremerton
SR 3 to Bremerton Ferry Terminal Additional Lanes - (20020023)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 11,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$11,000,000 is provided
for construction.

(35) SR 504, Toll Road
Study - Mount Saint Helens - (20020086)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 350,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 350,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$350,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(36) SR 519, South
Seattle Intermodal Access, Interchange Improvements and Additional Lanes - (20020017)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 39,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 40,100,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$1,100,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(37) SR 520, Redmond -
W Lake Sammamish Parkway to SR 202 Additional Lanes - (20020018)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 4,800,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 65,200,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 70,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$4,800,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(38) SR 522,
Woodinville - Paradise Lake Road to Snohomish River - (20020038)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 24,095,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 15,905,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 40,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$295,000 is provided
for preconstruction; and

$23,800,000 is provided
for construction.

(39) SR 524, Lynnwood -
24th Avenue SW to SR 527 Additional Lanes - (20020039)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 16,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$150,000 is provided
for preconstruction; and

$15,850,000 is provided
for construction.

(40) SR 531, SR
531/43rd Ave NE to 67th Ave NE - (20020075)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 6,890,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,890,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$6,890,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(41) SR 539, Bellingham
- Laurel to SR 9 via Badger Road - (20020046)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 10,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 52,650,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 63,150,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$10,500,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(42) SR 542, SR
542/Orleans to Britton Rd - Widening - (20020076)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 4,724,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,724,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and limitations
and section 804 of this act:

$1,700,000 is provided
for preconstruction; and

$3,024,000 is provided
for construction.

(43) SR 542, Sunset
Drive Street Improvements - (20020089) Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 2,800,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,800,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$2,800,000 is provided
for construction.

(44) SR 543, Blaine -
I-5 to Canadian Border Additional Lanes for Freight - (20020047)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 17,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$600,000 is provided
for preconstruction; and

$16,400,000 is provided
for construction.

(45) SR 605, Toll Road
- King County Bypass Study - (20020084)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 350,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 350,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$350,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

The appropriation in
this subsection is provided solely for the middle Washington corridor study.
The department of transportation, in consultation with local officials and
residents of the area, shall conduct a study to determine the feasibility of
creating a new north-south corridor as an alternative to state route 5 and
state route 405, which would run from approximately the Canadian border in the
northern portion of the state to approximately Lewis county in the southern
portion of the state. The department shall report to the legislature, no later
than December 31, 2002, on the feasibility of financing and constructing such a
corridor.

(46) SR 900, Issaquah -
SE 78th Street to Issaquah Additional Lanes - (20020019)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 13,400,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,600,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$1,200,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
303. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM
I--HOV PROJECTS

(1) SR 005, Everett -
SR 526 to US 2 HOV Lanes - (20020055)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 8,300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 221,700,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 230,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$8,300,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(2) SR 005, Pierce
County Line to Tukwila HOV - (20020009)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 3,191,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 66,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 69,191,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$3,191,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(3) SR 005, SR 16 -
Tacoma/Pierce County HOV (Narrows Bridge) - (20020029)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 110,314,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 246,686,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 357,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$7,740,000 is provided
for preconstruction; and

$102,574,000 is
provided for construction.

(4) SR 167, Auburn -
15th Street SW to 15th Street NW HOV - (20020012)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 20,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 17,240,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 37,240,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$50,000 is provided for
preconstruction; and

$19,950,000 is provided
for construction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
304. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM
I--SAFETY IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS

(1) SR 012, Yakima
Vicinity - Old Naches Hwy Interchange - (20020049)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 640,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 34,400,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 35,040,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$640,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(2) SR 007, SR 7/SR 507
to SR 512 - Safety - (20020077)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 9,504,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,504,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$9,504,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(3) SR 500, Vancouver -
New Interchanges and Additional Lanes - (20020004)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 24,300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 24,300,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$1,300,000 is provided
for preconstruction; and

$23,000,000 is provided
for construction.

(4) Safety Improvement
Projects - (20020902)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 28,001,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,077,160

TOTAL.................................... $ 33,078,160

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

The department shall
develop a list of projects that reflect 125% of the funds appropriated in this
subsection and submit the list to the office of financial management. The list
shall include the following projects:

(a) US 101/Corriea Road
Vicinity to Zaccardo Road;

(b) SR 104/Jct SR 19
Intersection Safety;

(c) SR 112/Hoko-Ozette
Road - Safety;

(d) SR 161/SR 167
Eastbound Ramp - Safety;

(e) SR 22/I-82 to
McDonald Road;

(f) SR 201 Deception
Pass and Canoe Pass Bridges;

(g) SR 160, SR 160/SR
16 to Long Lake Vicinity; and

(h) SR 161, 128th to
176th - Safety.

Expenditures may not
occur until approved by the office of financial management and may only occur
for those projects on the list.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
305. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM
I--ENVIRONMENTAL RETROFIT IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS

(1) SR 005, I-5/SR 520
Interchange Vicinity - (20020070)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 386,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,220,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,606,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

$386,000 is provided
for preconstruction.

(2) SR 106, Skobob
Creek - (20020010)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,250,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,250,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation
is provided solely for reconstruction of a bridge at Skobob Creek on highway
106 in Mason county and shall be matched by funds provided by the Hood Canal
salmon enhancement group. The project is subject to review and approval by the
department, but the Hood Canal salmon enhancement group shall manage the
project.

(3) Noise Wall Projects
- (20020095)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 9,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

The department shall
develop a list of projects that reflect 125% of the funds appropriated in this
subsection and submit the list to the office of financial management.
Expenditures may not occur until approved by the office of financial management
and may only occur for those projects on the list.

(4) Environmental
Retrofit Projects B (20020903)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 10,320,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 1,077,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,397,000

The appropriation
provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and section 804 of this act:

The department shall
develop a list of projects that reflect 125% of the funds appropriated in this
subsection and submit the list to the office of financial management.
Expenditures may not occur until approved by the office of financial management
and may only occur for those projects on the list.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
306. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-PRESERVATION‑-PROGRAM
P

SR 101, Purdy Creek
Bridge Replacement - (20020091)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 6,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,000,000

(1) The appropriation
provided in this section is provided solely for a by-pass or replacement of
Purdy Creek Bridge on SR 101, which may include up to 1,100 feet of elevated
roadway.

(2) The appropriation
provided in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations
and section 804 of this act:

$2,400,000 is provided
for preconstruction; and

$3,600,000 is provided
for construction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
307. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM
Z--LOCAL PROJECTS

SR 000, I-5 to SR 7
Cross Base Highway - (20020067)

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

The appropriation
provided in this section is subject to section 804 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
308. The motor vehicle
account--state appropriations for projects contained in sections 301 through
307 of this act, include $156,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The secretary of transportation may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

CAPITAL‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE
FERRIES CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM W

Four Replacement
Auto/Passenger Ferries - Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 4,128,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 317,761,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 321,889,000

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely for the department to initiate the process for
the procurement of four new auto passenger ferries to replace the steel
electric ferries. The department shall use the modified request for proposals
design and build partnership process contained in RCW 47.60.810 through
47.60.822. The appropriation referenced in this subsection constitutes
legislative authority to proceed with the procurement process under RCW
47.60.814.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM W

Anacortes Multimodal
Terminal - Design

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 518,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 118,402,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 118,920,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
403. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM W

Mukilteo Multimodal
Terminal - Design

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,810,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 105,943,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 107,753,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
404. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM W

Edmonds Multimodal
Terminal - Design

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 2,200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
405. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM W

Passenger-Only Vessel
and Terminal Projects - Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State........ $ 5,716,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 45,541,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 51,257,000

The appropriation in
this section is provided for the acquisition of passenger-only vessels and the
costs associated with the design and construction of passenger-only terminal
facilities necessary to begin passenger-only ferry service on the Seattle/Kingston
route by September 2003 and the Seattle/Southworth route by September 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
406. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM W

Catch-up Preservation
for Terminals and Vessels

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 11,690,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 88,548,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 100,238,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
407. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM W

Seattle Pier 48
Acquisition/Relocation - Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 7,075,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,860,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,935,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
408. The motor vehicle--state
appropriations for projects contained in sections 401 through 407 of this act,
include $4,128,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The secretary of transportation may authorize the use of current
revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.

CAPITAL--RAIL CONSTRUCTION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
501. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-RAIL‑-PROGRAM Y‑-CAPITAL

Passenger Rail Capital
Improvements - Design, Right of Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State........ $ 18,487,000

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-Federal...... $ 42,056,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 791,451,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 851,994,000

The appropriation in
this section is provided for programs including, but not limited to the
Vancouver rail project, high-speed upgrades in King, Snohomish, and Whatcom
counties, and capacity improvements between Seattle and Everett.

$9,200,000 from the multimodal
transportation account‑-state is provided solely for capacity
improvements between Seattle and Everett; however, should federal funding for
this project be granted, the department shall use any portion of the $9,200,000
not needed for state match purposes for other passenger rail high speed track
improvements.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
502. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-RAIL‑-PROGRAM Y‑-CAPITAL

Freight Rail Assistance
Program - Design, Right of Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State........ $ 9,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 85,140,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 94,640,000

The appropriation in
this section is provided for the design, right of way, and construction costs
for the freight rail assistance program including but not limited to the
following projects: Grays Harbor County saw mill spur; lumber spur to tribal
sawmill in Yakima County; Yakima County improvements; Cascade and Columbia
River upgrade; various 286,000 pound upgrade projects; and City of Yelm
railroad.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
503. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-RAIL‑-PROGRAM Y‑-CAPITAL

Washington Fruit
Express - Design, Right of Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State........ $ 700,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,600,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,300,000

The appropriation in
this section is provided for the construction of truck to rail loading docks in
Skagit County.

CAPITAL‑-LOCAL
PROGRAMS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
601. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM
Z‑-CAPITAL

School Safety
Enhancements

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 14,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,000,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The department shall
only obligate funds or enter into contracts for projects to the extent a motor
vehicle account appropriation is provided in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
602. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM
Z‑-CAPITAL

Main Street Pavement
Program

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 23,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,000,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The department
shall only obligate funds or enter into contracts for projects to the extent a
motor vehicle account appropriation is provided in this section.

(2) The department
shall develop a main street paving program. The program shall utilize a
pavement maintenance system with a goal of maintaining streets between PCR
ratings of 60 and 100, or an equivalent measure, in cities under 10,000 in
total population.

(3) It is the intent of
the legislature that the main street paving program remain an ongoing program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
603. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION--LOCAL PROGRAMS--PROGRAM
Z‑-CAPITAL

Community Economic
Revitalization (CERB) - Rural Economic Vitality

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 28,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 30,000,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The department
shall only obligate funds or enter into contract for projects to the extent a
motor vehicle account appropriation is provided in this section.

(2) The appropriation
in this section is provided solely for grants for transportation capital
investments that benefit economic development in rural areas. Grant program
criteria shall be the same as the 1999-2000 rural economic vitality program
except, grants must not be made to cities with a population of more than
10,000.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
604. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT
BOARD‑-CAPITAL

County Corridor
Congestion Relief

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 50,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 55,000,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The board shall
only obligate funds or enter into contracts for projects to the extent a motor
vehicle account appropriation is provided in this section.

(2) The board shall
consult with the highways and local programs service center at the department
of transportation and the Washington state association of counties to create a
county corridor congestion relief program. For the purposes of this program, a
corridor is an existing or proposed set of county designated arterial roadways
that provides continuous primary connectivity between major transportation
facilities or destinations. Eligible projects include roadway widening,
channelization, signalization, HOV lanes, and intelligent transportation
systems.

(3) It is the intent of
the legislature that the county corridor program remain an ongoing program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
605. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENT BOARD‑-CAPITAL

City Corridor
Congestion Relief

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 50,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 55,000,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The board shall
only obligate funds or enter into contracts for projects to the extent a motor
vehicle account appropriation is provided in this section.

(2) The board shall
consult with the highways and local programs service center at the department
of transportation to create a city corridor congestion relief program. The
program shall provide funding for congested urban corridors, as defined and
selected by the transportation improvement board in consultation with the
association of Washington cities. Eligible projects include roadway widening,
channelization, signalization, HOV lanes, and intelligent transportation
systems. The agency shall require an appropriate matching component for city
corridor grants. Cities shall use motor fuel tax revenue distributed to cities
and towns in RCW 46.68.090 to meet the agency match criteria.

(3) It is the intent of
the legislature that the city corridor program remains an ongoing program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
606. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM
Z‑-CAPITAL

Freight Mobility
Strategic Investment Board

Appropriation:

Freight Mobility
Account‑-State............. $ 8,400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 107,600,000

TOTAL............................... $ 116,000,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department and
freight mobility strategic investment board shall only obligate funds or enter
into contract for projects to the extent a freight mobility account‑-state
appropriation is provided in this section.

(2) The freight
mobility account‑-state appropriation in this section is provided for the
following local freight projects as identified by the freight mobility
strategic investment board:

East Marginal Way Ramps

Lincoln Ave. Grade
Separation

41st St/Riverfront Parkway
(Phase 2)

South Spokane St. Viaduct

Shaw Rd. Extension

SR 397 Ainsworth Ave. Grade
Crossing

D St. Grade Separation

North Canyon Rd.
Exten./BNSF Overcrossing

Columbia Center Blvd.
Railroad Crossing

Colville Alternate Truck
Route

SR 125/SR 12 Interconnect
(Myra Rd. Exten.)

Edison St. Railroad
Crossing

Washington St. Railroad
Crossing

E. Marine View Drive
Widening

Port of Kennewick Road
(Exten. of Piert Rd.)

S 228th Street Extension
& Grade Separation

City of Yakima Grade
Separated Rail Crossing

Duwamish Intelligent
Transportation Systems (ITS)

Lander Street Overcrossing

Grain Terminal Track
Improvements

Park Road BNSF Grade
Separation Project

(3) The freight
mobility account‑-state appropriation of $8,400,000 includes $8,400,000
in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation.

(4) Funds from the
appropriation in this section may only be expended with authorization from the
freight mobility strategic investment board.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
701. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES
DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE FUND AND TRANSPORTATION FUND
REVENUE

Highway Bond Retirement
Account Appropriation........ $........................................... 8,195,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 1,750,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,945,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
702. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE
EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 340,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
703. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation

for revenue
distribution to the cities.......... $ 5,843,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation

for distribution to the
counties................ $ 5,843,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,686,000

The distributions in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation to cities is to be distributed consistent
with RCW 46.68.110 (4) and (5). Deductions shall not be made for supervision,
studies, or the city hardship assistance program.

(2) The distribution to
counties shall be distributed in a manner consistent with RCW 46.68.122.
Deductions shall not be made for supervision, studies, or the city hardship
assistance program.

(3) The amounts
provided in this section may not be used to supplant any existing local
government funding for transportation projects or programs. Any local
government in violation of this requirement shall immediately forfeit its
eligibility for future distributions provided under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
704. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation

for transfer to the
freight mobility

account......................................... $ 8,400,000

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
801. (1) Agencies shall
expedite the expenditure of appropriations in order to: (a) Make
transportation improvements and rehabilitate transportation infrastructure
resources; (b) accelerate transportation related environmental rehabilitation
and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural
environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition and
construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional employment
opportunities associated with transportation capital expenditures.

(2) In order to meet
the goals of this section, to the extent feasible, agencies are directed to
accelerate expenditures and may use contracted design and construction services
wherever necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
802. To the extent
practicable, all state, county, city, local, or municipal projects paid for in
whole or in part with funds appropriated in this act shall consider pavement
life-cycle costs in determining pavement types.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
803. The amounts shown under
the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and
"Total" in this act are for informational purposes only and do not
constitute legislative approval of these amounts. The amounts shown under the
heading "Future Biennia" are advisory only and reflect the current
best available estimates of project costs and may include but are not limited
to the following funding sources: State, local, regional, federal, or private
funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
804. The governor, through the
office of financial management, may authorize a transfer of appropriation
authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the amount
required for the completion of such project to another capital project for
which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to
expand or limit the scope of the project beyond that intended by the
legislature in making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only
between capital appropriations to a specific department or agency and only
between capital projects that are funded from the same fund or account. No
transfers may occur between projects to local government agencies except where
the grants are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such
transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes which govern
the grants.

For purposes of this
section, the governor may find that an amount is in excess of the amount required
for the completion of a project only if: (1) The project defined in the notes
to the budget document is substantially complete and there are funds remaining;
(2) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty
that the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be
completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in this
act; or (3) the secretary of transportation determines that the allocation for
the preconstruction phase of the project is in excess of the amount necessary
to reach the construction or request for proposal phase.

For the purposes of
this section, the legislature intends that each project be defined as proposed
to the legislature in the governor's budget document, unless it clearly appears
from the legislative history that the legislature intended to define the scope
of a project in a different way.

A report of any
transfer effected under this section, except emergency projects or any transfer
under $250,000, shall be filed with the legislative transportation committees
of the senate and the house of representatives by the office of financial
management at least thirty days before the date the transfer is effected. The
office of financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers
within thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
805. Upon completion of the
Vancouver high-occupancy vehicle lanes pilot project that began on October 28,
2001, and concludes October 28, 2002, the department of transportation may only
proceed with future high-occupancy vehicle lane projects in counties with a
population of 300,000 or more that border the state of Oregon, when vehicle
spaces at park and ride lots within the county are two and one-half times the
capacity in existence on January 1, 2002, or if the Interstate 5 bridge over
the Columbia River is retrofitted to include four southbound general purpose
lanes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
806. All of the projects for
which money is appropriated in sections 301 through 307 of this act are
eligible for the permit processes enumerated under chapter 47.06C RCW and
developed by the transportation permit efficiency and accountability
committee. To the extent practicable, work on these projects shall utilize the
processes enumerated under chapter 47.06C RCW and developed by the
transportation permit efficiency and accountability committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
807. Unless otherwise
specified, the appropriations for highway capacity expansion in sections 301
through 307 of this act are provided solely for general purpose highway lanes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
808.

Motor Vehicle Account‑‑State
Appropriation..... $ 47,392

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
department of agriculture shall make an adhesive label explaining that
Washington state gas taxes are for highway purposes only. The label must be in
a large, easily readable font and shall read "Washington state gas taxes
are used exclusively for highway purposes." The label should be chemical
and weather resistant and shall be placed in a conspicuous location at motor fuel
retailers as defined in RCW 19.120.010, by December 31, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
809. A new section is added
to chapter 47.05 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not
apply to the 2001-03 transportation budget appropriating new transportation
revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
810. A new section is added
to chapter 47.08 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not
apply to the 2001-03 transportation budget appropriating new transportation
revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
811. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
812. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, only if Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2969 becomes law.

INDEX APPROXIMATE
PAGE #

DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY,
TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

PRESERVATION--PROGRAM
P........................................ 25

DEPARTMENT
OF REVENUE........................................... 2

DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION

IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM
I--ENVIRONMENTAL RETROFIT IMPROVEMENT.... 24

IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM
I--HOV PROJECTS.......................... 21

IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM
I--MOBILITY AND ECONOMIC INITIATIVES...... 7

IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM
I--SAFETY IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS........... 22

IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM
Z--LOCAL PROJECTS........................ 25

LOCAL
PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z--CAPITAL..................... 30, 31, 33

PROGRAM
I MAJOR PROJECTS........................................ 4

PUBLIC
TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM V................................ 2

RAIL--PROGRAM
Y--CAPITAL................................... 28, 29

WASHINGTON
STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM W............ 26‑28

REGIONAL
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING................................ 2

STATE
TREASURER

BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST................................... 34

STATE
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION................................ 34

TRANSFERS...................................................... 35

TRANSPORTATION
EFFICIENCIES..................................... 2

TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENT BOARD............................... 31

CAPITAL........................................................ 31

---
END ---