BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. INTENT. The legislature finds
that the needs of the state transportation system have grown beyond the
capacity of traditional state and local tax and fee revenues. It is necessary
and desirable to expedite selected local and regional transportation facilities
by using direct user fee support in the form of tolls or other charges. It is
therefore the intent of the legislature to establish a reimbursable bonding
mechanism that allows for secure and cost-effective public toll financing of
transportation facilities that preserves and protects the fuel tax bonding
capacity. Therefore, this act provides for reimbursable bond financing based
on tolls for the development, construction, and operation of the Tacoma Narrows
bridge public-private initiative project.

Furthermore, it is the
intent of the legislature that reimbursable toll facility bonds will enjoy the
support of the full faith and credit of the state. Tolls will be charged in
amounts sufficient to repay the state treasury for all financing costs, operations
of the facility, and other costs incidental to the project. These funds will
be held by the state treasurer in a nonappropriated account outside the state
treasury. Indebtedness repaid with the proceeds of tolls will be excluded from
the statutory debt limit as provided in RCW 39.42.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

BONDS‑-AUTHORIZED,
USE OF PROCEEDS. (1) For the purposes of providing funds for the planning,
design, construction, and other necessary costs for the Tacoma Narrows bridge
project, the state finance committee may issue general obligation bonds of the
state of Washington in the sum of nine hundred million dollars or as much
thereof as may be required to finance the Tacoma Narrows bridge public-private
initiative project and all costs incidental thereto. Proceeds of the sale of
bonds authorized in this section must be expended only for the purposes
enumerated in this chapter, for payment of the expense incurred in the issuance
and sale of any such bonds, and to repay the motor vehicle fund, except for
funds previously expended from a legislative appropriation, for any sums
advanced to pay the cost of surveys, location, design, development, right-of-way,
and other activities related to the financing and construction of the bridge
and its approaches.

(2) Bonds authorized in
this section do not constitute indebtedness for the purposes set forth in RCW
39.42.060. Bonds authorized in this section may be sold at a price the state
finance committee determines. The proceeds of the sale of bonds issued for the
purposes of this section must be deposited in the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account. These proceeds must be used exclusively for the purposes specified in
this section and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale
of the bonds issued for the purposes of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

BONDS‑-PAYMENT OF
PRINCIPAL AND INTEREST. (1) The nondebt-limit reimbursable bond retirement
account must be used for the payment of the principal and interest on the bonds
authorized in section 2 of this act.

(2)(a) The state
finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the
state treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet the bond
retirement and interest requirements on the bonds authorized in section 2 of
this act.

(b) On or before the
date on which any interest or principal and interest is due, the state
treasurer shall transfer from the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account for
deposit into the nondebt-limit reimbursable bond retirement account, the amount
computed in (a) of this subsection for bonds issued for the purposes of section
2 of this act.

(3) If the Tacoma
Narrows toll bridge account has insufficient revenues to pay the principal and
interest computed in subsection (2)(a) of this section, then the nondebt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account must be used for the payment of principal
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 2 of this act. The treasurer
shall first use funds from the excise taxes collected on the sale,
distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel and then use funds from any
additional means provided by the legislature for the nondebt-limit reimbursable
bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

BONDS‑-REQUIREMENTS.
(1) Bonds issued under section 2 of this act must state that they are a general
obligation of the state of Washington, must pledge the full faith and credit of
the state to the payment of the principal and interest, and must contain an
unconditional promise to pay the principal and interest as it becomes due.

(2) The owner and
holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the owner and holder of any of
the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding require the transfer
and payment of funds as directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

BONDS‑-ADDITIONAL
MEANS OF PAYMENT. The legislature may provide additional means for raising
moneys for the payment of the principal and interest on the bonds authorized in
section 2 of this act, and sections 3 and 4 of this act do not provide an
exclusive method for their payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

PROCEDURES AFTER TOLLS
REMOVED. The department may liquidate and close toll facility trust and other
facility accounts established outside the state treasury under chapter 47.56
RCW after the removal of tolls from the facility for which the accounts were
established. Any balance remaining in the accounts must thereupon be
transferred to the motor vehicle fund. In addition, the department may, after
removal of tolls from a particular facility or facilities, require that all moneys
transferred to the place of payment named in the bonds, for the purpose of
paying principal or interest or for redemption of the bonds not then expended
for such purpose, be returned to the state treasurer for deposit in the motor
vehicle fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

TACOMA NARROWS TOLL
BRIDGE ACCOUNT CREATED. A special account to be known as the Tacoma Narrows
toll bridge account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.

(1) Deposits to the
account must include:

(a) All proceeds of
bonds issued for construction of the Tacoma Narrows public-private initiative
project, including any capitalized interest;

(b) All of the toll
charges and other revenues received from the operation of the Tacoma Narrows
bridge as a toll facility, to be deposited at least monthly; and

(c) Any interest that
may be earned from the deposit or investment of those revenues.

(2) Proceeds of bonds
shall be used consistent with section 2 of this act, including the
reimbursement of expenses and fees incurred under agreements entered into under
RCW 47.46.040 as required by those agreements.

(3) Toll charges, other
revenues, and interest must be used to pay any required costs of financing,
operation, maintenance, and management and necessary repairs of the facility.

(4) The state treasurer
may establish subaccounts for the purpose of segregating toll charges, bond
sale proceeds, and other revenues.

(5) Only the secretary
of the department or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 8. RCW 39.46.070 and 1983 c
167 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

BONDS‑-PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF ISSUANCE AND SALE. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, the proceeds of any bonds issued by the state or a local
government may be used to pay incidental costs and costs related to the sale
and issuance of the bonds. Such costs include payments for fiscal and legal
expenses, obtaining bond ratings, printing, engraving, advertising,
establishing and funding reserve accounts and other accounts, an amount for
working capital, capitalized interest for up to six months after completion
of construction, necessary and related engineering, architectural,
planning, and inspection costs, and other similar activities or purposes.

(2) In
addition to the costs enumerated in subsection (1) of this section, costs
authorized under this section include capitalized interest for up to
seventy-two months from the date of issuance for bonds issued by the state for
the construction of a public toll bridge under chapter 47.46 RCW.

Sec. 9. RCW 47.56.245 and 1984 c
7 s 267 are each amended to read as follows:

TOLL CHARGES RETAINED
UNTIL COSTS PAID. The department shall retain toll charges on all existing and
future facilities until all costs of investigation, financing, acquisition of
property, and construction advanced from the motor vehicle fund, except for funds
previously expended from a legislative appropriation, and obligations
incurred under RCW 47.56.250 and chapter 16, Laws of 1945 have been fully paid.

With respect to every
facility completed after March 19, 1953, costs of maintenance((, management,))
and operation shall be paid periodically out of the revenues of the facility in
which such costs were incurred.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. CAPTIONS. Captions used
in this act do not constitute any part of the law.

---
END ---