BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By September 1,
2003, each school district board of directors shall adopt a policy that
addresses the following issues:

(a) Procedures for
providing notice of threats of violence or harm to the student or school
employee that is the subject of the threat;

(b) A definition of
"threats of violence or harm"; and

(c) Whether or not any
such threat of violence or harm made by a student may be grounds for immediate
suspension or expulsion of the student.

(2) The school safety
center advisory committee shall develop a model policy that includes the issues
listed in subsection (1) of this section by January 1, 2003. The model policy
shall be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's web site. The
school districts, in drafting their own policies, shall review the model policy
designed by the school safety center advisory committee.

(3) School districts,
school district boards of directors, school officials, and school employees
providing notice in good faith as required and consistent with the board's policies
adopted under this section are immune from any liability arising out of such
notification.

(4) A
person who intentionally and in bad faith or maliciously, knowingly makes a
false notification of a threat under this section is guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

--- END ---