BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.63.070 and 2000 c
110 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person who
receives a notice of traffic infraction shall respond to such notice as
provided in this section within fifteen days of the date of the notice.

(2) If the person determined
to have committed the infraction does not contest the determination the person
shall respond by completing the appropriate portion of the notice of infraction
and submitting it, either by mail or in person, to the court specified on the
notice. A check or money order in the amount of the penalty prescribed for the
infraction must be submitted with the response. When a response which does not
contest the determination is received, an appropriate order shall be entered in
the court's records, and a record of the response and order shall be furnished
to the department in accordance with RCW 46.20.270.

(3) If the person
determined to have committed the infraction wishes to contest the determination
the person shall respond by completing the portion of the notice of infraction
requesting a hearing and submitting it, either by mail or in person, to the
court specified on the notice. The court shall notify the person in writing of
the time, place, and date of the hearing, and that date shall not be sooner
than seven days from the date of the notice, except by agreement.

(4) If the person
determined to have committed the infraction does not contest the determination
but wishes to explain mitigating circumstances surrounding the infraction the
person shall respond by completing the portion of the notice of infraction
requesting a hearing for that purpose and submitting it, either by mail or in
person, to the court specified on the notice. The court shall notify the
person in writing of the time, place, and date of the hearing.

(5)(a) In hearings
conducted pursuant to subsections (3) and (4) of this section, with the
exception of infractions occurring during the operation of a commercial motor
vehicle, the court may defer findings, or in a hearing to explain
mitigating circumstances may defer entry of its order, for up to one year and
impose conditions upon the defendant the court deems appropriate. Upon
deferring findings, the court may assess costs as the court deems appropriate
for administrative processing. If at the end of the deferral period the
defendant has met all conditions and has not been determined to have committed
another traffic infraction, the court may dismiss the infraction.

(b) A person may not
receive more than one deferral within a seven-year period for traffic
infractions for moving violations and more than one deferral within a
seven-year period for traffic infractions for nonmoving violations.

(6) If any person
issued a notice of traffic infraction:

(a) Fails to respond to
the notice of traffic infraction as provided in subsection (2) of this section;
or

(b) Fails to appear at
a hearing requested pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of this section;

the court shall enter an
appropriate order assessing the monetary penalty prescribed for the traffic
infraction and any other penalty authorized by this chapter and shall notify
the department in accordance with RCW 46.20.270, of the failure to respond to
the notice of infraction or to appear at a requested hearing.

Sec. 2. RCW 10.05.010 and 1998 c
208 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In a court of limited
jurisdiction a person charged with a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor may
petition the court to be considered for a deferred prosecution program. The
petition shall be filed with the court at least seven days before the date set
for trial but, upon a written motion and affidavit establishing good cause for
the delay and failure to comply with this section, the court may waive this
requirement subject to the defendant's reimbursement to the court of the
witness fees and expenses due for subpoenaed witnesses who have appeared on the
date set for trial.

A person charged with a
traffic infraction, misdemeanor, or gross misdemeanor under Title 46 RCW shall
not be eligible for a deferred prosecution program unless the court makes
specific findings pursuant to RCW 10.05.020. Such person shall not be eligible
for a deferred prosecution program more than once. Separate offenses committed
more than seven days apart may not be consolidated in a single program. Under
no circumstance is a person charged with an offense under Title 46 RCW eligible
for a deferred prosecution program if the offense occurred while operating a
commercial motor vehicle.

Sec. 3. RCW 10.05.015 and 1985 c
352 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

At the time of
arraignment a person charged with a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504,
other than a charge in conjunction with the operation of a commercial motor
vehicle, may be given a statement by the court that explains the
availability, operation, and effects of the deferred prosecution program.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.52.130 and 2001 c
309 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A certified abstract of
the driving record shall be furnished only to the individual named in the
abstract, an employer or prospective employer or an agent acting on behalf of
an employer or prospective employer, the insurance carrier that has insurance
in effect covering the employer or a prospective employer, the insurance
carrier that has insurance in effect covering the named individual, the
insurance carrier to which the named individual has applied, an alcohol/drug
assessment or treatment agency approved by the department of social and health
services, to which the named individual has applied or been assigned for
evaluation or treatment, or city and county prosecuting attorneys. City
attorneys and county prosecuting attorneys may provide the driving record to
alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies approved by the department of
social and health services to which the named individual has applied or been
assigned for evaluation or treatment. The director, upon proper request, shall
furnish a certified abstract covering the period of not more than the last
three years to insurance companies. Upon proper request, the director shall
furnish a certified abstract covering a period of not more than the last five
years to state approved alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies, except
that the certified abstract shall also include records of alcohol-related
offenses as defined in RCW 46.01.260(2) covering a period of not more than the
last ten years. Upon proper request, a certified abstract of the full driving
record maintained by the department shall be furnished to a city or county
prosecuting attorney, to the individual named in the abstract or to an employer
or prospective employer or an agent acting on behalf of an employer or
prospective employer of the named individual. The abstract, whenever possible,
shall include an enumeration of motor vehicle accidents in which the person was
driving; the total number of vehicles involved; whether the vehicles were
legally parked or moving; whether the vehicles were occupied at the time of the
accident; whether the accident resulted in any fatality; any reported
convictions, forfeitures of bail, or findings that an infraction was committed
based upon a violation of any motor vehicle law; and the status of the person's
driving privilege in this state. The enumeration shall include any reports of
failure to appear in response to a traffic citation or failure to respond to a
notice of infraction served upon the named individual by an arresting officer.
Certified abstracts furnished to prosecutors and alcohol/drug assessment or
treatment agencies shall also indicate whether a recorded violation is an
alcohol-related offense as defined in RCW 46.01.260(2) that was originally
charged as one of the alcohol-related offenses designated in RCW
46.01.260(2)(b)(i).

The abstract provided
to the insurance company shall exclude any information, except that related to
the commission of misdemeanors or felonies by the individual, pertaining to law
enforcement officers or fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030, or any
officer of the Washington state patrol, while driving official vehicles in the
performance of occupational duty. The abstract provided to the insurance
company shall include convictions for RCW 46.61.5249 and 46.61.525 except that
the abstract shall report them only as negligent driving without reference to
whether they are for first or second degree negligent driving. The abstract
provided to the insurance company shall exclude any deferred prosecution under
RCW 10.05.060, except that if a person is removed from a deferred prosecution
under RCW 10.05.090, the abstract shall show the deferred prosecution as well
as the removal.

The director shall
collect for each abstract the sum of four dollars and fifty cents which shall
be deposited in the highway safety fund.

Any insurance company
or its agent receiving the certified abstract shall use it exclusively for its
own underwriting purposes and shall not divulge any of the information
contained in it to a third party. No policy of insurance may be canceled,
nonrenewed, denied, or have the rate increased on the basis of such information
unless the policyholder was determined to be at fault. ((No insurance
company or its agent for underwriting purposes relating to the operation of
commercial motor vehicles may use any information contained in the abstract
relative to any person's operation of motor vehicles while not engaged in such
employment, nor may any insurance company or its agent for underwriting
purposes relating to the operation of noncommercial motor vehicles use any
information contained in the abstract relative to any person's operation of
commercial motor vehicles.))

Any employer or
prospective employer or an agent acting on behalf of an employer or prospective
employer receiving the certified abstract shall use it exclusively for his or
her own purpose to determine whether the licensee should be permitted to
operate a commercial vehicle or school bus upon the public highways of this
state and shall not divulge any information contained in it to a third party.

Any alcohol/drug
assessment or treatment agency approved by the department of social and health
services receiving the certified abstract shall use it exclusively for the
purpose of assisting its employees in making a determination as to what level
of treatment, if any, is appropriate. The agency, or any of its employees,
shall not divulge any information contained in the abstract to a third party.

Release of a certified
abstract of the driving record of an employee or prospective employee requires
a statement signed by: (1) The employee or prospective employee that
authorizes the release of the record, and (2) the employer attesting that the
information is necessary to determine whether the licensee should be employed
to operate a commercial vehicle or school bus upon the public highways of this
state. If the employer or prospective employer authorizes an agent to obtain
this information on their behalf, this must be noted in the statement.

Any negligent violation
of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Any intentional
violation of this section is a class C felony.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. RCW 48.30.310 (Commercial motor vehicle
employment driving record not to be considered, when) and 1977 ex.s. c 356 s 3
are each repealed.

---
END ---