BE IT
ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW
77.32.350 and 2000 c 107 s 270 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to a small game hunting license, a supplemental permit
or stamp is required to hunt for western Washington pheasant or migratory
birds.

(1) A western Washington pheasant permit is required to hunt for
pheasant in western Washington. Western Washington pheasant permits must
contain numbered spaces for recording the location and date of harvest of each
western Washington pheasant.

(2) The permit shall be available as a season option, a youth full
season option, or a three-day option. The fee for this permit is:

(a) For the resident and nonresident full season option, thirty-six
dollars;

(b) For the youth full season option, eighteen dollars;

(c) For the three-day option, twenty dollars.

(3) ((A migratory bird stamp affixed to a hunting license
designated by rule of the commission is required for all persons sixteen years
of age or older to hunt migratory birds. The fee for the stamp for hunters is
six dollars for residents and nonresidents. The fee for the stamp for
collectors is six dollars.

(4) The migratory bird stamp shall be validated by
the signature of the licensee written across the face of the stamp)) A migratory bird validation is required for all persons sixteen
years of age or older to hunt migratory birds. The fee for the validation for
hunters is ten dollars for residents and nonresidents. The fee for the stamp
for collectors is ten dollars.

(4) The migratory bird license must be validated at the time of
signature of the licensee.

Sec. 2. RCW
77.12.670 and 1998 c 191 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The migratory bird stamp to be produced by the department shall
use the design as provided by the migratory waterfowl art committee.

(2) All revenue derived from the sale of ((the)) migratory
bird license validations or stamps by the department to any person hunting
waterfowl or to any stamp collector shall be deposited in the state wildlife
fund and shall be used only for that portion of the cost of printing and
production of the stamps for migratory waterfowl hunters as determined by
subsection (4) of this section, and for those migratory waterfowl projects specified
by the director of the department for the acquisition and development of
migratory waterfowl habitat in the state and for the enhancement, protection,
and propagation of migratory waterfowl in the state. Migratory bird license
validation and stamp funds may not be used on lands controlled by private
hunting clubs or on lands that charge a fee for public access. Migratory bird
license validation and stamp funds may be used for migratory waterfowl projects
on private land where public hunting is provided by written permission or on
areas established by the department as waterfowl hunting closures.

(3) All revenue derived from the sale of the license validation
and stamp by the department to persons hunting solely nonwaterfowl
migratory birds shall be deposited in the state wildlife fund and shall be used
only for that portion of the cost of printing and production of the stamps for
nonwaterfowl migratory bird hunters as determined by subsection (4) of this
section, and for those nonwaterfowl migratory bird projects specified by the
director for the acquisition and development of nonwaterfowl migratory bird
habitat in the state and for the enhancement, protection, and propagation of
nonwaterfowl migratory birds in the state.

(4) With regard to the revenue from license validation and
stamp sales that is not the result of sales to stamp collectors, the department
shall determine the proportion of migratory waterfowl hunters and solely
nonwaterfowl migratory bird hunters by using the yearly migratory bird hunter
harvest information program survey results or, in the event that these results
are not available, other similar survey results. A two-year average of the
most recent survey results shall be used to determine the proportion of the
revenue attributed to migratory waterfowl hunters and the proportion attributed
to solely nonwaterfowl migratory bird hunters for each fiscal year. For fiscal
year 1998-99 and for fiscal year 1999-2000, ninety-six percent of the stamp
revenue shall be attributed to migratory waterfowl hunters and four percent of
the stamp revenue shall be attributed to solely nonwaterfowl migratory game
hunters.

(5) Acquisition shall include but not be limited to the acceptance
of gifts of real estate or any interest therein or the rental, lease, or
purchase of real estate or any interest therein. If the department acquires
any fee interest, leasehold, or rental interest in real property under this
section, it shall allow the general public reasonable access to that property
and shall, if appropriate, ((insure)) ensure that the deed or
other instrument creating the interest allows such access to the general
public. If the department obtains a covenant in real property in its favor or
an easement or any other interest in real property under this section, it shall
exercise its best efforts to ((insure)) ensure that the deed or
other instrument creating the interest grants to the general public in the form
of a covenant running with the land reasonable access to the property. The
private landowner from whom the department obtains such a covenant or easement
shall retain the right of granting access to the lands by written permission,
but may not charge a fee for access.

(6) The department may produce migratory bird stamps
in any given year in excess of those necessary for sale in that year. The
excess stamps may be sold to the migratory waterfowl art committee for sale to
the public.

--- END ---