BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.81A.010 and 1988
c 227 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Motorcycle
skills education program" means a motorcycle rider skills training program
to be administered by the department.

(2)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(3)
"Director" means the director of licensing.

(4)
"Motorcycle" means a motorcycle licensed under chapter 46.16 RCW, and
does not include motorized bicycles, mopeds, scooters, off-road motorcycles, ((motorized
tricycles, side-car equipped motorcycles,)) or four-wheel all-terrain
vehicles.

--- END ---