BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 80.28.068 and 1999 c
62 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
request by an electrical or gas company, the commission may approve rates,
charges, services, and/or physical facilities at a discount for low-income
senior customers and low-income customers. The attorney general may also
file a request for such a discount program if the company does not have an
existing program approved under this section. Expenses and lost revenues
as a result of these discounts shall be included in the company's cost of
service and recovered in rates to other customers by means of a charge set
forth in a separate schedule to the company's tariffs. The filing of a request
under this section shall not constitute a general rate increase filing as
defined in WAC 480-09-310, nor shall it preclude any general complaint filing
as provided for in this title.

--- END ---