BE IT
ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that children in the state face many preventable exposures to
environmental hazards in their schools, homes, and communities. In certain
cases children are at greater risk than adults for exposure to and possible
illness from environmental hazards. This is due in part to their behaviors but
also to their decreased ability to detoxify certain substances due to the
immaturity of their body organs and immune systems.

The legislature further finds that higher rates of poverty place children
of ethnic and minority communities at disproportionate risk for environmental
exposures due to inadequate housing, poor nutrition, and limited access to
health care. Solutions to complex environmental health problems require the
ongoing communication, collaboration, and cooperation of affected communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. As used in
this act, "environmental hazard" means one or a group of toxic
chemical, biological, or physical agents in the environment, resulting from
human activities or natural processes, that may impact the health of exposed
children, including such pollutants as lead, pesticides, air pollutants,
contaminated drinking water, polluted waters, toxic waste, polychlorinated
biphenyls, secondhand tobacco smoke, and industrial and home chemicals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) The
children's environmental health and protection advisory council is created.

(2) Membership of the advisory council shall consist of fifteen
members. The president of the senate shall appoint one member of the majority
party and one member of the minority party. The speaker of the house of
representatives shall appoint one member from each party. The other members
shall include: The secretary of the department of health or designee; the
secretary of the department of ecology or designee; the secretary of the
department of agriculture or designee; the superintendent of public instruction
or designee; the secretary of the department of social and health services or
designee; the secretary of the department of labor and industries or designee;
one member of the state board of health; one tribal representative, appointed
by the governor; one licensed pediatric health care provider with expertise in
the field of children's environmental health, appointed by the governor; one
parent or guardian whose child has been clinically diagnosed with exposure to
an environmental health hazard, appointed by the governor; and an expert in the
field of environmental toxicology, appointed by the governor.

(3) Members of the advisory council shall serve without
compensation.

(4) The board of health shall provide staff support and
administrative assistance to the advisory council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The
advisory council shall:

(1) Meet at least four times a year;

(2) Review and comment on existing laws, rules, regulations, and
standards to ensure that they adequately protect the health of children from
environmental hazards;

(3) Work collaboratively with state agencies and others without
duplicating current work in this area; and

(4) Report to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2003,
and December 1, 2004, with recommendations on changes in regulation that would
reduce children's exposure to environmental hazards and recommendations for
collaborative approaches to public education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The state
board of health may solicit, accept, and spend gifts, grants, bequests,
devises, and other funds from public and private sources to fund the activities
of the children's environmental health and protection advisory council created
under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act
expires June 30, 2005.

--- END ---