BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.36.010 and 1993 c
408 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) A jury is a body of
persons temporarily selected from the qualified inhabitants of a particular
district, and invested with power‑-

(a) To present or
indict a person for a public offense.

(b) To try a question
of fact.

(2) "Court"
when used without further qualification means any superior court or court of
limited jurisdiction in the state of Washington.

(3) "Judge"
means every judicial officer authorized to hold or preside over a court. For
purposes of this chapter "judge" does not include court commissioners
or referees.

(4) "Juror"
means any person summoned for service on a petit jury, grand jury, or jury of
inquest as defined in this chapter.

(5) "Grand
jury" means those twelve persons impaneled by a superior court to hear,
examine, and investigate evidence concerning criminal activity and corruption.

(6) "Petit
jury" means a body of persons twelve or less in number in the superior
court and six in number in courts of limited jurisdiction, drawn by lot from
the jurors in attendance upon the court at a particular session, and sworn to
try and determine a question of fact.

(7) "Jury of
inquest" means a body of persons six or fewer in number, but not fewer
than four persons, summoned before the coroner or other ministerial officer, to
inquire of particular facts.

(8) "Jury source
list" means the list of all registered voters for any county((, merged
with a list of licensed drivers and identicard holders who reside in the county)).
The list shall specify each person's name and residence address and conform to
the methodology and standards set pursuant to the provisions of RCW 2.36.054 or
by supreme court rule. The list shall be filed with the superior court by the
county auditor.

(9) "Master jury
list" means the list of prospective jurors from which jurors summoned to
serve will be randomly selected. The master jury list shall be either randomly
selected from the jury source list or may be an exact duplicate of the jury
source list.

(10) "Jury
term" means a period of time of one or more days, not exceeding one month,
during which summoned jurors must be available to report for juror service.

(11) "Juror
service" means the period of time a juror is required to be present at the
court facility. This period of time may not extend beyond the end of the jury
term, and may not exceed two weeks, except to complete a trial to which the
juror was assigned during the two-week period.

(12) "Jury
panel" means those persons randomly selected for jury service for a
particular jury term.

Sec. 2. RCW 2.36.054 and 1993 c
408 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless otherwise
specified by rule of the supreme court, the jury source list and master jury
list for each county shall be created as provided by this section.

(1) ((The superior
court of each county, after consultation with the county clerk and county
auditor of that jurisdiction, shall annually notify the department of
information services not later than March 1 of each year of its election to use
either a jury source list that is merged by the county or a jury source list
that is merged by the department of information services.)) The department
of information services shall annually furnish at no charge to the superior
court of each county a ((separate)) list of the registered voters
residing in that county as supplied annually by the secretary of state ((and
a separate list of driver's license and identicard holders residing in that
county as supplied annually by the department of licensing, or a merged list of
all such persons residing in that county, in accordance with the annual
notification required by this subsection)). The list((s)) provided
by the department of information services shall be in an electronic format
mutually agreed upon by the superior court requesting it and the department of
information services. The ((annual merger of the list of registered voters
residing in each county with the list of licensed drivers and identicard
holders residing in each county to form)) formation of a jury source
list for each county shall be in accordance with the standards and methodology
established in this chapter or by superseding court rule ((whether the
merger is accomplished by the department of information services or by a county)).

(2) Persons on the
lists of registered voters ((and driver's license and identicard holders))
shall be identified by a minimum of last name, first name, middle initial where
available, date of birth, gender, and county of residence. ((Identifying
information shall be used when merging the lists to ensure to the extent
reasonably possible that persons are only listed once on the merged list.
Conflicts in addresses are to be resolved by using the most recent record by
date of last vote in a general election, date of driver's license or identicard
address change or date of voter registration.

(3) The department
of information services shall provide counties that elect to receive a jury
source list merged by department of information services with a list of names
which are possible duplicates that cannot be resolved based on the identifying
information required under subsection (2) of this section. If a possible
duplication cannot subsequently be resolved satisfactorily through reasonable
efforts by the county receiving the merged list, the possible duplicate name
shall be stricken from the jury source list until the next annual jury source
list is prepared.))

Sec. 3. RCW 2.36.055 and 1993 c
408 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The superior court at
least annually shall cause a jury source list to be compiled from a list of all
registered voters ((and a list of licensed drivers and identicard holders))
residing in the county.

The superior court upon
receipt of the jury source list shall compile a master jury list. The master
jury list shall be certified by the superior court and filed with the county
clerk. All previous jury source lists and master jury lists shall be
superseded. In the event that, for any reason, a county's jury source list is
not timely created and available for use at least annually, the most recent
previously compiled jury source list for that county shall be used by the
courts of that county on an emergency basis only for the shortest period of
time until a current jury source list is created and available for use.

Upon receipt of
amendments to the list of registered voters ((and licensed drivers and
identicard holders)) residing in the county the superior court may update
the jury source list and master jury list as maintained by the county clerk
accordingly.

Sec. 4. RCW 2.36.065 and 1993 c
408 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the duty of
the judges of the superior court to ensure continued random selection of the
master jury list and jury panels((, which shall be done without regard to
whether a person's name originally appeared on the list of registered voters,
or on the list of licensed drivers and identicard holders, or both)). The
judges shall review the process from time to time and shall cause to be kept on
file with the county clerk a description of the jury selection process. Any
person who desires may inspect this description in ((said)) the
county clerk's office.

Nothing in this chapter
shall be construed as requiring uniform equipment or method throughout the
state, so long as fair and random selection of the master jury list and jury
panels is achieved.

Sec. 5. RCW 2.36.070 and 1988 c
188 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

A person shall be
competent to serve as a juror in the state of Washington unless that person:

(1) Is less than
eighteen years of age;

(2) Is not a citizen of
the United States;

(3) Is not a resident
of the county in which he or she has been summoned to serve;

(4) Is not a
registered voter of the county in which he or she has been summoned to serve;

(5) Is not able
to communicate in the English language; or

(((5))) (6)
Has been convicted of a felony and has not had his or her civil rights
restored.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 2.36.057 (Expanded jury source
list--Court rules) and 1993 c 408 s 1; and

(2) RCW 2.36.0571 (Jury source list--Master
jury list--Adoption of rules for implementation of methodology and standards by
agencies) and 1993 c 408 s 2.

---
END ---