BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.40.030 and 2001 c
187 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

All property shall be
valued at one hundred percent of its true and fair value in money and assessed
on the same basis unless specifically provided otherwise by law.

Taxable leasehold
estates shall be valued at such price as they would bring at a fair, voluntary
sale for cash without any deductions for any indebtedness owed including
rentals to be paid.

The true and fair value
of real property for taxation purposes (including property upon which there is
a coal or other mine, or stone or other quarry) shall be based upon the
following criteria:

(1) Any sales of the
property being appraised or similar properties with respect to sales made
within the past five years. The appraisal shall be consistent with the
comprehensive land use plan, development regulations under chapter 36.70A RCW,
zoning, and any other governmental policies or practices in effect at the time
of appraisal that affect the use of property, as well as physical and
environmental influences. An assessment may not be determined by a method that
assumes a land usage not permitted, for that property being appraised, under
existing zoning or land use planning ordinances or statutes. The appraisal
shall also take into account: (a) In the use of sales by real estate contract
as similar sales, the extent, if any, to which the stated selling price has
been increased by reason of the down payment, interest rate, or other financing
terms; and (b) the extent to which the sale of a similar property actually
represents the general effective market demand for property of such type, in
the geographical area in which such property is located. Sales involving deed
releases or similar seller-developer financing arrangements shall not be used
as sales of similar property.

(2) In addition to
sales as defined in subsection (1) of this section, consideration may be given
to cost, cost less depreciation, reconstruction cost less depreciation, or
capitalization of income that would be derived from prudent use of the
property. In the case of property of a complex nature, or being used under
terms of a franchise from a public agency, or operating as a public utility, or
property not having a record of sale within five years and not having a
significant number of sales of similar property in the general area, the provisions
of this subsection shall be the dominant factors in valuation. When provisions
of this subsection are relied upon for establishing values the property owner
shall be advised upon request of the factors used in arriving at such value.

(3) In valuing any
tract or parcel of real property, the true and fair value of the land,
exclusive of structures thereon shall be determined; also the true and fair
value of structures thereon, but the valuation shall not exceed the true and
fair value of the total property as it exists. In valuing agricultural land,
growing crops shall be excluded.

(4) In
valuing any tract or parcel of real property, the assessed value shall be
reduced by amounts expended on mitigation fees, impact fees, or system
improvement charges during the assessment year. The department of revenue may
adopt rules necessary to implement this subsection (4).

--- END ---