BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.36.250 and 1987 c
330 s 747 are each amended to read as follows:

If the department or
its delegate determines at any time for any part of the public highway system
that the unsafe conditions of the roadway require particular tires, tire
chains, or traction equipment in addition to or beyond the ordinary pneumatic
rubber tires, the department may establish the following recommendations or
requirements with respect to the use of such equipment for all persons using such
public highway:

(1) ((Dangerous road
conditions, chains or other approved traction devices recommended)) Traction
advisory - oversize vehicles prohibited.

(2) ((Dangerous road
conditions, chains or other approved traction devices required)) Traction
advisory - oversize vehicles prohibited. Vehicles over 10,000 GVW - chains
required.

(3) ((Dangerous road
conditions, chains required)) Traction advisory - oversize vehicles
prohibited. All vehicles - chains required, except all wheel drive.

Any equipment that may
be required by this section shall be approved by the state patrol as authorized
under RCW 46.37.420.

The department shall
place and maintain signs and other traffic control devices on the public
highways that indicate the tire, tire chain, or traction equipment
recommendation or requirement determined under this section. Such signs or
traffic control devices shall in no event prohibit the use of studded tires
from November 1st to April 1st, but when the department determines that chains
are required and that no other traction equipment will suffice, the requirement
is applicable to all types of tires including studded tires. The ((signs or
traffic control devices)) Washington state patrol or the department
may specify different recommendations or requirements for four wheel drive
vehicles in gear.

Failure to
obey a requirement indicated ((by a sign or other traffic control device
placed or maintained)) under this section is a ((misdemeanor)) traffic
infraction under chapter 46.63 RCW subject to a penalty of five hundred dollars
including all statutory assessments.

--- END ---