BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 59.22.010 and 1995 c
399 s 154 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds:

(a) That manufactured
housing and mobile home parks provide a source of low-cost housing to the low
income, elderly, poor, and ((infirmed)) infirm, without
which they could not afford private housing; but rising costs of mobile home
park development and operation, as well as turnover in ownership, ((has))
have resulted in mobile home park living becoming unaffordable to the
low income, elderly, poor, and ((infirmed)) infirm,
resulting in increased numbers of homeless persons, and persons who must look
to public housing and public programs, increasing the burden on the state to
meet the housing needs of its residents;

(b) That taking
legal action against a landlord or tenant for violations of this chapter can be
a costly and lengthy process, and that many people cannot afford to pursue this
process;

(c) That state
government can play a vital role in addressing the problems confronted by
mobile home park residents by providing assistance which makes it possible for
mobile home park residents to acquire the mobile home parks in which they
reside and convert them to resident ownership and by providing assistance
which makes it possible for manufactured/mobile home tenants and landlords to
resolve disputes in a less costly manner; and

(((c))) (d)
That to accomplish ((this)) these purposes, information
and technical support shall be made available through the department.

(2) Therefore, it is
the intent of the legislature((,)):

(a) In order to
maintain low-cost housing in mobile home parks to benefit the low income,
elderly, poor, and ((infirmed)) infirm, to encourage and
facilitate the conversion of mobile home parks to resident ownership, to
protect low-income mobile home park residents from both physical and economic
displacement, to obtain a high level of private financing for mobile home park
conversions, and to help establish acceptance for resident-owned mobile home
parks in the private market; and

(b) In order to
provide a less costly and lengthy way for manufactured/mobile home tenants to
resolve disputes, to authorize the office of manufactured housing to establish
a program to resolve disputed violations of this chapter through mediation and
arbitration.

Sec. 2. RCW 59.22.020 and 1995 c
399 s 155 are each amended to read as follows:

The following
definitions shall apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise:

(1) "Account"
means the mobile home affairs account created under RCW 59.22.070.

(2)
"Affordable" means that, where feasible, low-income residents should
not pay more than thirty percent of their monthly income for housing costs.

(3) "Conversion
costs" includes the cost of acquiring the mobile home park, the costs of
planning and processing the conversion, the costs of any needed repairs or
rehabilitation, and any expenditures required by a government agency or lender
for the project.

(4)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(5) "Fee"
means the mobile home title transfer fee imposed under RCW 59.22.080.

(6) "Fund" or
"park purchase account" means the mobile home park purchase account
created pursuant to RCW 59.22.030.

(7) "Housing
costs" means the total cost of owning, occupying, and maintaining a mobile
home and a lot or space in a mobile home park.

(8) "Individual
interest in a mobile home park" means any interest which is fee ownership
or a lesser interest which entitles the holder to occupy a lot or space in a
mobile home park for a period of not less than either fifteen years or the life
of the holder. Individual interests in a mobile home park include, but are not
limited to, the following:

(a) Ownership of a lot
or space in a mobile home park or subdivision;

(b) A membership or
shares in a stock cooperative, or a limited equity housing cooperative; or

(c) Membership in a
nonprofit mutual benefit corporation which owns, operates, or owns and operates
the mobile home park.

(9) "Low-income
resident" means an individual or household who resided in the mobile home
park prior to application for a loan pursuant to this chapter and with an
annual income at or below eighty percent of the median income for the county of
standard metropolitan statistical area of residence. Net worth shall be
considered in the calculation of income with the exception of the resident's
mobile/manufactured home which is used as their primary residence.

(10) "Low-income
spaces" means those spaces in a mobile home park operated by a resident
organization which are occupied by low-income residents.

(11) "Mobile home
park" means a mobile home park, as defined in RCW 59.20.030(((4))) (6),
or a manufactured home park subdivision as defined by RCW 59.20.030(((6)))
(8) created by the conversion to resident ownership of a mobile home
park.

(12) "Resident
organization" means a group of mobile home park residents who have formed
a nonprofit corporation, cooperative corporation, or other entity or
organization for the purpose of acquiring the mobile home park in which they
reside and converting the mobile home park to resident ownership. The
membership of a resident organization shall include at least two-thirds of the
households residing in the mobile home park at the time of application for
assistance from the department.

(13) "Resident
ownership" means, depending on the context, either the ownership, by a
resident organization, as defined in this section, of an interest in a mobile
home park which entitles the resident organization to control the operations of
the mobile home park for a term of no less than fifteen years, or the ownership
of individual interests in a mobile home park, or both.

(14)
"Landlord" shall have the same meaning as it does in RCW 59.20.030.

(15) "Manufactured
housing" means residences constructed on one or more chassis for
transportation, and which bear an insignia issued by a state or federal
regulatory agency indication compliance with all applicable construction
standards of the United States department of housing and urban development.

(16) "Mobile
home" shall have the same meaning as it does in RCW 46.04.302.

(17) "Mobile home
lot" shall have the same meaning as it does in RCW 59.20.030.

(18) "Tenant"
means a person who rents a mobile home lot for a term of one month or longer
and owns the mobile home on the lot.

(19)
"Office" means the office of manufactured housing.

Sec. 3. RCW 59.22.050 and 1991 c
327 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to provide
general assistance to mobile home resident organizations, park owners, and
landlords and tenants, the department shall establish an office of ((mobile
home affairs)) manufactured housing which will serve as the
coordinating office within state government for matters relating to mobile
homes or manufactured housing.

This office will
provide an ombudsman service to mobile home park owners and mobile home tenants
with respect to problems and disputes between park owners and park residents
and to provide technical assistance to resident organizations or persons in the
process of forming a resident organization pursuant to chapter 59.22 RCW. The
office will keep records of its activities in this area.

(2) The office shall
establish a program to resolve disputed violations of this chapter through
mediation and arbitration as provided in section 5 of this act. The office may
develop rules to implement the mediation and arbitration program provided in
this act. The office shall disseminate information and promote the program to
manufactured/mobile home tenants and landlords.

(3) The office
shall perform all the consumer complaint and related functions of the state
administrative agency that are required for purposes of complying with the regulations
established by the federal department of housing and urban development for
manufactured housing, including the preparation and submission of the state
administrative plan.

(((3))) (4)
The office shall administer the mobile home relocation assistance program
established in chapter 59.21 RCW, including verifying the eligibility of
tenants for relocation assistance.

Sec. 4. RCW 59.20.200 and 1984 c
58 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

If at any time during
the tenancy the landlord fails to carry out the duties required by RCW
59.20.130 or any other provision in this chapter that results in substantial
endangerment or impairment of the health or safety of a tenant, the tenant
may, in addition to pursuit of remedies otherwise provided the tenant by law,
deliver written notice to the landlord, which notice shall specify the property
involved, the name of the owner, if known, and the nature of the defective
condition. For the purposes of this chapter, a reasonable time for the
landlord to commence remedial action after receipt of such notice by the tenant
shall be, except where circumstances are beyond the landlord's control;

(1) Not more than
twenty-four hours, where the defective condition is imminently hazardous to
life;

(2) Not more than
forty-eight hours, where the landlord fails to provide water or heat;

(3) Subject to the
provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, not more than seven days
in the case of a repair under RCW 59.20.130(3);

(4) Not more than
thirty days in all other cases.

In each instance the
burden shall be on the landlord to see that remedial work under this section is
completed with reasonable promptness.

Where circumstances
beyond the landlord's control, including the availability of financing, prevent
the landlord from complying with the time limitations set forth in this
section, the landlord shall endeavor to remedy the defective condition with all
reasonable speed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 59.22 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall work with representatives of tenants in manufactured/mobile home parks,
representatives of manufactured/mobile home park landlords, the administrator
for the courts, the Washington state association of counties, the association
of Washington cities, and other interested parties to develop a program for
resolving disputed violations of chapter 59.20 RCW. The department and
interested parties shall develop an agreed-upon program consistent with this
section by June 30, 2003. If the department and interested parties cannot
agree on a program by then, the department shall develop the program by
December 31, 2003.

(2) The program shall
provide mediation and arbitration services consistent with chapter 59.20 RCW at
no cost to the disputants of an alleged violation of chapter 59.20 RCW.

(3) The program shall
provide for expedient investigations of those violations of chapter 59.20 RCW
that result in substantial endangerment or impairment of the health or safety
of a tenant.

(4) The program shall
first provide the option for mediation services to the disputants to resolve an
alleged violation of chapter 59.20 RCW. To ensure disputes are resolved
efficiently, the program shall require mandatory, binding arbitration in the
event either of the disputing parties chooses not to participate in mediation
or the parties cannot resolve their dispute with the assistance of a mediator.
The arbitrator's decision shall set a deadline for compliance with the decision
and a hearing for determining compliance subsequent to the deadline. If a
tenant prevails in arbitration and the arbitrator finds that a landlord has
willfully failed to comply with the arbitration decision by the deadline, the
tenant may file the arbitrator's decision and a lien against the title of the
manufactured/mobile home park for the amount of any monetary amount awarded in
the decision with the clerk of the superior court.

(5) Tenants and
landlords disputing a violation of chapter 59.20 RCW may participate in the
program established in this section. Tenants have the right to require a
landlord to participate in the program.

(6) Notwithstanding
subsection (5) of this section, tenants participating in the program have the
right at any time to bring their complaint directly to superior court,
bypassing the program, consistent with chapter 59.20 RCW.

(7) The department
shall provide a status report on the mediation and arbitration program created
under this section by December 1, 2004, and a final report by December 1, 2005,
to the legislature. The reports shall include at a minimum the number of disputants
participating in the program, how disputes were resolved, the time it took to
resolve disputes, the revenues generated by fees imposed under section 7 of
this act, and the costs expended to administer the program.

(8) This section does
not limit the right of landlords or tenants to take legal action against
another party as provided in chapter 59.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 59.22 RCW to read as follows:

The manufactured/mobile
home mediation and arbitration account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All fees collected under section 7 of this act must be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
administrative costs associated with the mediation and arbitration program
created in section 5 of this act. Only the director or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 59.22 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each owner of a
manufactured/mobile home park shall register with the office and provide
information on the ownership, location, and number of lots in the
manufactured/mobile home park. Each owner of a manufactured/mobile home park
either registered or determined by the office to be an owner of a
manufactured/mobile home park shall pay to the office an annual fee to fund the
administrative costs of the mediation and arbitration program established by
section 5 of this act. The fee shall be determined annually by the office, and
may not exceed ten dollars for each lot within a park. The office shall send
notice of the amount of the fee and a date payment is due to all
manufactured/mobile home park owners known to the office. The owner may
collect the cost of the fee from the tenants consistent with the per lot fee
determined by the office. If an owner does not pay the fee within thirty days
of the due date indicated in the notice, the owner's tenants may pay the fee
directly to the office, and may file a lien against the title of the
manufactured/mobile home park for the amount of the fee with the clerk of the
superior court of the county in which the manufactured/mobile home park is
located. The lien may be filed regardless of whether the landlord has already
collected the cost of the fee from the tenants.

(2) All fees collected
by the office under subsection (1) of this section must be deposited into the
manufactured/mobile home mediation and arbitration account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The sum of forty-nine
thousand nine hundred dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to
the manufactured/mobile home mediation and arbitration account under section 6
of this act for the administration costs of the mediation and arbitration
program under section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 59.22 RCW to read as follows:

Any time
the director determines that expenditures to implement the mediation and
arbitration program under section 5 of this act exceed revenues from the fees
collected under section 7 of this act, the director may suspend administration
of the mediation and arbitration program under section 5 of this act by the
office. Administration of the mediation and arbitration program remains
suspended until the director determines that sufficient revenues have been
generated by the fees collected under section 7 of this act to administer the
program.

---
END ---