BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.19.050 and 2001 c
251 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any
other authority provided by law, the secretary has the following authority:

(a) To adopt rules, in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to implement this chapter;

(b) To set all
registration and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and to collect
and deposit all such fees in the health professions account established under
RCW 43.70.320;

(c) To establish forms
and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(d) To hire clerical,
administrative, and investigative staff as needed to implement this chapter;

(e) To issue a
registration to any applicant who has met the requirements for registration;
and

(f) To develop a
dictionary of recognized professions and occupations providing counseling
services to the public included under this chapter.

(2) The uniform
disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of
registrations and the discipline of registrants under this chapter. The
secretary shall be the disciplining authority under this chapter. The absence
of educational or training requirements for counselors registered under this
chapter or the counselor's use of nontraditional nonabusive therapeutic
techniques shall not, in and of itself, give the secretary authority to
unilaterally determine the training and competence or to define or restrict the
scope of practice of such individuals.

(3) A treatment
recommendation by a counselor registered under this chapter constitutes
unprofessional conduct under RCW 18.130.180 unless the counselor has personally
met with the person who is the subject of the recommendation.

(4) The
department shall publish and disseminate information in order to educate the
public about the responsibilities of counselors and the rights and
responsibilities of clients established under this chapter. Solely for the
purposes of administering this education requirement, the secretary shall
assess an additional fee for each application and renewal, equal to five
percent of the fee. The revenue collected from the assessment fee may be
appropriated by the legislature for the department's use in educating consumers
pursuant to this section. The authority to charge the assessment fee shall
terminate on June 30, 1994.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 18.205 RCW to read as follows:

A
treatment recommendation by a chemical dependency professional certified under
this chapter constitutes unprofessional conduct under the uniform disciplinary
act unless the chemical dependency professional has personally met with the
person who is the subject of the recommendation.

---
END ---