BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purpose of this act
is to implement the recommendations of the joint legislative task force created
by chapter 335, Laws of 2001. The legislature recognizes the need to improve
communications among mobile/manufactured homeowners, regulatory agencies, and
other interested parties, to streamline the complex regulatory environment and
inflexible enforcement system, and to promote problem-solving at an early
stage. To assist in achieving these goals, the legislature:

(1) Encourages the
relevant agencies to conduct a pilot project that tests an interagency
coordinated system for processing permits for alterations or repairs of mobile
and manufactured homes; and

(2) Recognizes the task
force's work in reviewing agency rules related to alteration permit
requirements and supports the task force's recommendations to the agency
regarding those rules. The legislature finds that assisting consumers to
understand when an alteration of a mobile or manufactured home is subject to a
permit, and when it is not, will improve compliance with the agency rules and
further the code's safety goals.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.22.434 and 2001 c
335 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director or the
director's authorized representative may conduct such inspections,
investigations, and audits as may be necessary to adopt or enforce manufactured
and mobile home, commercial coach, conversion vending units, medical units,
recreational vehicle, park trailer, factory built housing, and factory built
commercial structure rules adopted under the authority of this chapter or to
carry out the director's duties under this chapter.

(2) For purposes of
enforcement of this chapter, persons duly designated by the director upon
presenting appropriate credentials to the owner, operator, or agent in charge
may:

(a) At reasonable times
and without advance notice enter any factory, warehouse, or establishment in
which manufactured and mobile homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending
units, medical units, recreational vehicles, park trailers, factory built
housing, and factory built commercial structures are manufactured, stored, or
held for sale;

(b) At reasonable
times, within reasonable limits, and in a reasonable manner inspect any
factory, warehouse, or establishment as required to comply with the standards
adopted by the secretary of housing and urban development under the national
manufactured home construction and safety standards act of 1974. Each
inspection shall be commenced and completed with reasonable promptness; and

(c) As requested by an
owner of a conversion vending unit or medical unit, inspect an alteration.

(3) For purposes of
determining compliance with this chapter's permitting requirements for
alterations of mobile and manufactured homes, the department may audit the
records of a contractor as defined in chapter 18.27 RCW or RCW 18.106.020(1) or
an electrical contractor as defined in RCW 19.28.006 when the department has
reason to believe that a violation of the permitting requirements has
occurred. The department shall adopt rules implementing the auditing
procedures. Information obtained from a contractor through an audit authorized
by this subsection is confidential and not open to public inspection under
chapter 42.17 RCW.

(4)(a) The
department shall set a schedule of fees by rule which will cover the costs
incurred by the department in the administration of RCW 43.22.335 through
43.22.490.

(b) Subject to (a)
of this subsection, and for the purposes of implementing the pilot project
approved by the mobile/manufactured home alteration task force, the department
may adopt by rule a temporary statewide fee schedule that decreases fees for
mobile/manufactured home alteration permits and increases fees for
factory-built housing and commercial structures plan review and inspection
services. Under the temporary fee schedule, the department may waive
mobile/manufactured home alteration permit fees for indigent permit
applicants. The department may increase fees for factory-built housing and
commercial structures plan review and inspection services in excess of the
fiscal growth factor under chapter 43.135 RCW, if the increases are necessary
to fund the cost of administering RCW 43.22.335 through 43.22.490. In no
instance shall any fee that applies to the factory-built housing and commercial
plan review and inspection services be increased in excess of forty percent.

(5) This section
expires April 1, 2004.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.22.434 and 2001 c
335 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director or the
director's authorized representative may conduct such inspections,
investigations, and audits as may be necessary to adopt or enforce manufactured
and mobile home, commercial coach, conversion vending units, medical units,
recreational vehicle, park trailer, factory built housing, and factory built
commercial structure rules adopted under the authority of this chapter or to
carry out the director's duties under this chapter.

(2) For purposes of
enforcement of this chapter, persons duly designated by the director upon
presenting appropriate credentials to the owner, operator, or agent in charge
may:

(a) At reasonable times
and without advance notice enter any factory, warehouse, or establishment in
which manufactured and mobile homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending
units, medical units, recreational vehicles, park trailers, factory built
housing, and factory built commercial structures are manufactured, stored, or
held for sale;

(b) At reasonable
times, within reasonable limits, and in a reasonable manner inspect any
factory, warehouse, or establishment as required to comply with the standards
adopted by the secretary of housing and urban development under the national manufactured
home construction and safety standards act of 1974. Each inspection shall be
commenced and completed with reasonable promptness; and

(c) As requested by an
owner of a conversion vending unit or medical unit, inspect an alteration.

(3) For purposes of
determining compliance with this chapter's permitting requirements for
alterations of mobile and manufactured homes, the department may audit the
records of a contractor as defined in chapter 18.27 RCW or RCW 18.106.020(1) or
an electrical contractor as defined in RCW 19.28.006 when the department has
reason to believe that a violation of the permitting requirements has
occurred. The department shall adopt rules implementing the auditing
procedures. Information obtained from a contractor through an audit authorized
by this subsection is confidential and not open to public inspection under
chapter 42.17 RCW.

(4)(a) The
department shall set a schedule of fees by rule which will cover the costs
incurred by the department in the administration of RCW 43.22.335 through
43.22.490.

(b) Effective April
1, 2004, the department must adopt a new fee schedule that is the same as the
fee schedule that was in effect immediately prior to the temporary fee schedule
authorized in section 2(4)(b), chapter . . ., Laws of 2002 (section 2 of
this act). However, the new fee schedule must be adjusted by the fiscal growth
factors not applied during the period that the temporary fee schedule was in
effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 43.22 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) In addition to
or in lieu of any other penalty applicable under this chapter, and except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, the department may assess a civil penalty
of not more than one thousand dollars against a contractor, firm, partnership,
or corporation, that fails to obtain a permit before altering a mobile or
manufactured home as required under this chapter or rules adopted under this
chapter. Each day on which a violation occurs constitutes a separate
violation. However, the cumulative penalty for the same occurrence may not
exceed five thousand dollars.

(b) The department must
adopt a schedule of civil penalties giving due consideration to the
appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the gravity of the violation and
the history of previous violations. Penalties for subsequent violations, not
constituting the same occurrence, committed within two years of a prior
violation by the same party or entity, or by an individual who was a principal
or officer of the same entity, must be double the amount of the penalty for the
prior violation or one thousand dollars, whichever is greater.

(2)(a) The department
may issue a notice of correction before issuing a civil penalty assessment.
The notice must include:

(i) A description of
the violation;

(ii) A statement of
what is required to correct the violation;

(iii) The date by which
the department requires correction to be achieved; and

(iv) Notice of the
individual or department office that must be contacted to obtain a permit or
other compliance information.

(b) A notice of
correction is not a formal enforcement action, is not subject to appeal, and is
a public record.

(c) If the department
issues a notice of correction, it shall not issue a civil penalty for the
violation identified in the notice of correction unless the responsible person
fails to comply with the notice.

(3)(a) The department
must issue written notices of civil penalties imposed under this section, with
the reasons for the penalty, by certified mail to the last known address of the
party named in the notice.

(b) If a party desires to
contest a notice of civil penalty issued under this section, the party must
file a notice of appeal with the department within twenty days of the
department's mailing of the notice of civil penalty. An administrative law
judge of the office of administrative hearings will hear and determine the
appeal. Appeal proceedings must be conducted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
An appeal of the administrative law judge's determination or order shall be to
the superior court. The superior court's decision is subject only to
discretionary review under the rules of appellate procedure.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 43.22 RCW to read as follows:

(1) With respect to
mobile and manufactured homes that are installed in accordance with the
standards adopted under RCW 43.22.440:

(a) The department
shall adopt rules that:

(i) Specify exemptions
from a requirement for a permit to alter a mobile or manufactured home;

(ii) Authorize the
granting of variances from the rules adopted under this section for alterations
that use materials, designs, or methods of construction different from those
required under the rules adopted under this chapter; and

(iii) Require the seller
of a mobile or manufactured home to deliver to the buyer prior to the sale:
(A) A completed property transfer disclosure statement in accordance with
chapter 64.06 RCW, unless the seller is exempt or the buyer waives his or her
rights under chapter 64.06 RCW; and (B) the variance, if any, granted under the
rules adopted under this section.

(b) The department may
adopt a rule that allows parties to enter into a conditional sale of an altered
mobile or manufactured home. However, a conditional sales agreement may be
executed only if, prior to execution, the parties have complied with the
department's requirements related to permit approval and a variance granted
under the rules, if any, and with property transfer disclosure statement
requirements.

(2) This
chapter does not prohibit the sale of an altered mobile or manufactured home,
installed in accordance with the standards adopted under RCW 43.22.440, unless
the alteration makes the home unsafe so that its use may constitute a hazard to
life, safety, or health.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.22.340 and 1999 c
22 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
adopt specific rules for conversion vending units and medical units. The rules
for conversion vending units and medical units shall be established to protect
the occupants from fire; to address other life safety issues; and to ensure
that the design and construction are capable of supporting any concentrated
load of five hundred pounds or more.

(2) The director of labor
and industries shall adopt rules governing safety of body and frame design, and
the installation of plumbing, heating, and electrical equipment in mobile
homes, commercial coaches, recreational vehicles, and/or park trailers:
PROVIDED, That the director shall not prescribe or enforce rules governing the
body and frame design of recreational vehicles and park trailers until after
the American National Standards Institute shall have published standards and
specifications upon this subject. The rules shall be reasonably consistent
with recognized and accepted principles of safety for body and frame design and
plumbing, heating, and electrical installations, in order to protect the health
and safety of the people of this state from dangers inherent in the use of
substandard and unsafe body and frame design, construction, plumbing, heating,
electrical, and other equipment and shall correlate with and, so far as
practicable, conform to the then current standards and specifications of the
American National Standards Institute standards A119.1 for mobile homes and
commercial coaches, A119.2 for recreational vehicles, and A119.5 for park
trailers.

(3) Except as
provided in section 5 of this act, it shall be unlawful for any person to
lease, sell or offer for sale, within this state, any mobile homes, commercial
coaches, conversion vending units, medical units, recreational vehicles, and/or
park trailers manufactured after January 1, 1968, containing plumbing, heating,
electrical, or other equipment, and after July 1, 1970, body and frame
design or construction, unless such equipment, design, or
construction meets the requirements of the rules provided for in this
section.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.22.432 and 2001 c
335 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may
adopt all standards and regulations adopted by the secretary under the national
manufactured home construction and safety standards act of 1974 (800 Stat. 700;
42 U.S.C. Secs. 5401-5426) for manufactured home construction and safety
standards. If any deletions or amendments to the federal standards or
regulations are thereafter made and notice thereof is given to the department,
the standards or regulations shall be considered automatically adopted by the
state under this chapter after the expiration of thirty days from publication
in the federal register of a final order describing the deletions or amendments
unless within that thirty day period the department objects to the deletion or
amendment. In case of objection, the department shall proceed under the rule
making procedure of chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) The department
shall adopt rules with respect to manufactured homes ((installed in
accordance with the standards adopted under RCW 43.22.440 that:

(a) Specify exemptions
from a requirement for a permit to alter a manufactured home;

(b) Authorize the
granting of variances from the rules adopted under this section for alterations
that use materials, designs, or methods of construction different from those
required under the rules adopted under this section; and

(c) Require the
seller of a manufactured home to deliver to the buyer prior to the sale a
completed property transfer disclosure statement that includes all the criteria
specified in RCW 64.06.020 and a copy of a variance, if any, granted under the
rules adopted under this section. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed
to prohibit the sale of a manufactured home that was altered unless the
alteration makes the home unsafe so that its use may constitute a hazard to
life, safety, or health)) that
require the prior written approval of the department before changes or
alterations may be made to a manufactured home that differ from the
construction standards provided for in this section.

(3)
Except as provided in section 5 of this act, it is unlawful for any person to
lease, sell, or offer for sale, within this state, a manufactured home unless
the home meets the requirements of the rules provided for in this section.

Sec. 8. RCW 64.06.005 and 1994 c
200 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter applies
only to residential real property. For purposes of this chapter, residential
real property means:

(1) Real property
consisting of, or improved by, one to four dwelling units;

(2) A residential
condominium as defined in RCW 64.34.020(9), unless the sale is subject to the
public offering statement requirement in the Washington condominium act,
chapter 64.34 RCW; ((or))

(3) A residential
timeshare, as defined in RCW 64.36.010(11), unless subject to written
disclosure under the Washington timeshare act, chapter 64.36 RCW; or

(4) A mobile or
manufactured home, as defined in RCW 43.22.335 or 46.04.302, that is personal
property.

Sec. 9. RCW 43.22.335 and 2001 c
335 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
RCW 43.22.340 through ((43.22.420)) 43.22.434, 43.22.442, and
43.22.495.

(1) "Conversion
vendor units" means a motor vehicle or recreational vehicle that has been
converted or built for the purpose of being used for commercial sales at
temporary locations. The units must be less than eight feet six inches wide in
the set-up position and the inside working area must be less than forty feet in
length.

(2) "Indigent"
means a person receiving an annual income, after taxes, of one hundred
twenty-five percent or less of the current federally established poverty level.

(3)
"Manufactured home" means a single-family dwelling required to be
built in accordance with regulations adopted under the national manufactured
housing construction and safety standards act of 1974 (42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq.).

(((3))) (4)
"Medical unit" means a self-propelled unit used to provide medical
examinations, treatments, and medical and dental services or procedures, not
including emergency response vehicles.

(((4))) (5)
"Mobile home" means a factory-built dwelling built before June 15,
1976, to standards other than the national manufactured housing construction
and safety standards act of 1974 (42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq.), and acceptable under
applicable state codes in effect at the time of construction or introduction of
the home into this state.

(((5))) (6)
"Park trailer" means a park trailer as defined in the American
national standards institute A119.5 standard for park trailers.

(((6))) (7)
"Recreational vehicle" means a vehicular-type unit primarily designed
for recreational camping or travel use that has its own motive power or is
mounted on or towed by another vehicle. The units include travel trailers,
fifth-wheel trailers, folding camping trailers, truck campers, and motor homes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) Sections 1, 2, and 4
through 9 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

(2)
Section 3 of this act takes effect April 1, 2004.

---
END ---