BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.225.010 and 1998
c 244 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All parents in this
state of any child ((eight)) six years of age and under eighteen
years of age shall cause such child to attend the public school of the district
in which the child resides and such child shall have the responsibility to and
therefore shall attend for the full time when such school may be in session
unless:

(a) The child is
attending an approved private school for the same time or is enrolled in an
extension program as provided in RCW 28A.195.010(4);

(b) The child is
receiving home-based instruction as provided in subsection (4) of this section;

(c) The child is
attending an education center as provided in chapter 28A.205 RCW;

(d) The school district
superintendent of the district in which the child resides shall have excused
such child from attendance because the child is physically or mentally unable
to attend school, is attending a residential school operated by the department
of social and health services, is incarcerated in an adult correctional
facility, or has been temporarily excused upon the request of his or her
parents for purposes agreed upon by the school authorities and the parent:
PROVIDED, That such excused absences shall not be permitted if deemed to cause
a serious adverse effect upon the student's educational progress: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That students excused for such temporary absences may be claimed as
full time equivalent students to the extent they would otherwise have been so
claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 and shall not
affect school district compliance with the provisions of RCW 28A.150.220; or

(e) The child is
sixteen years of age or older and:

(i) The child is
regularly and lawfully employed and either the parent agrees that the child
should not be required to attend school or the child is emancipated in
accordance with chapter 13.64 RCW;

(ii) The child has
already met graduation requirements in accordance with state board of education
rules and regulations; or

(iii) The child has
received a certificate of educational competence under rules and regulations
established by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.190.

(2) A parent for the
purpose of this chapter means a parent, guardian, or person having legal
custody of a child.

(3) An approved private
school for the purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be one
approved under regulations established by the state board of education pursuant
to RCW 28A.305.130.

(4) For the purposes of
this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW, instruction shall be home-based if it
consists of planned and supervised instructional and related educational
activities, including a curriculum and instruction in the basic skills of
occupational education, science, mathematics, language, social studies,
history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the development of an
appreciation of art and music, provided for a number of hours equivalent to the
total annual program hours per grade level established for approved private
schools under RCW 28A.195.010 and 28A.195.040 and if such activities are:

(a) Provided by a
parent who is instructing his or her child only and are supervised by a
certificated person. A certificated person for purposes of this chapter and
chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be a person certified under chapter 28A.410 RCW. For
purposes of this section, "supervised by a certificated person"
means: The planning by the certificated person and the parent of objectives
consistent with this subsection; a minimum each month of an average of one
contact hour per week with the child being supervised by the certificated
person; and evaluation of such child's progress by the certificated person.
The number of children supervised by the certificated person shall not exceed
thirty for purposes of this subsection; or

(b) Provided by a
parent who is instructing his or her child only and who has either earned
forty-five college level quarter credit hours or its equivalent in semester
hours or has completed a course in home-based instruction at a postsecondary
institution or a vocational-technical institute; or

(c) Provided by a
parent who is deemed sufficiently qualified to provide home-based instruction
by the superintendent of the local school district in which the child resides.

(5) The legislature
recognizes that home-based instruction is less structured and more experiential
than the instruction normally provided in a classroom setting. Therefore, the
provisions of subsection (4) of this section relating to the nature and
quantity of instructional and related educational activities shall be liberally
construed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 28A.225.015 (Attendance mandatory--Six
or seven year olds--Unexcused absences--Petition) and 1999 c 319 s 6 are each
repealed.

---
END ---