BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.58.320 and 1993 c
240 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A
metropolitan municipal corporation shall have power to acquire by purchase and
condemnation all lands and property rights, both within and without the
metropolitan area, ((which are necessary for its purposes)) as long
as the property is within the legally established service area boundaries of
the metropolitan municipal corporation, which are necessary for its purposes,
subject to the provisions set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
Such right of eminent domain shall be exercised by the metropolitan council in
the same manner and by the same procedure as is or may be provided by law for
cities, except insofar as such laws may be inconsistent with the provisions of
this chapter.

(2) A metropolitan
municipal corporation shall not condemn lands for an essential public facility,
provided for in RCW 36.70A.200, at a location outside its legally established
service area boundaries without a finding by the legislative authority of the
city and county in which the land is located that the location of the essential
public facility is consistent with that city's or county's comprehensive plan.

(3) The
provisions of subsection (2) of this section are to be applied retroactively.

--- END ---