BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the predatory and aggressive marketing of credit cards to children and
young adults creates serious financial and law enforcement problems.
Inappropriate granting of credit to young people with little or no employment
or credit history burdens them with debt and clouds their financial futures.
In addition, law enforcement problems are increased because of credit card use
by minors to buy alcohol, tobacco products (including bidis), and to access
internet gambling, and internet pornography.

The legislature further
finds that other, more age-appropriate access to credit is available to young
people, through student loans, parentally cosigned credit, stored-value cards,
and various types of ATM cards with capped dollar amounts.

The legislature intends
to curtail aggressive marketing of credit cards to young people, and to prevent
the inappropriate granting of credit, by prohibiting certain marketing
practices.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. For the purposes of this
chapter:

(1) "Credit
card" means a card or device issued under an agreement by which the issuer
gives to a cardholder residing in this state the privilege of obtaining credit
from the issuer or other persons in purchasing or leasing property or services,
obtaining loans, or otherwise.

(2) "Credit card
issuer" means a financial institution, a lender other than a financial
institution, or a merchant that receives applications and issues credit cards
to individuals.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A credit card issuer may
not issue a credit card to a person who is a resident of this state and who is
under twenty-one years of age at the time of application unless:

(1) A written
application is obtained in which an applicant indicates a list of all approved
but unused credit available to the applicant, by amount and source, and a
statement by the applicant indicating the applicant's age; and

(2) The applicant
qualifies for credit under reasonable and prudent standards used in the
industry for extensions of similar credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Credit card issuers may
not offer gifts in exchange for the completion of a credit card application as
part of a marketing program conducted on any campus of a college or university
located in this state. This section does not preclude a credit card issuer
from on‑campus marketing or from providing educational information
regarding personal financial management.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 2 through 4 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---