BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Public school
license plates" mean license plates that display a red apple symbol and an
education-related motto.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department, in
consultation with the superintendent of public instruction, shall design a statewide
public school license plate with a red apple symbol and an education-related
motto. Public school license plates issued under this chapter must be
displayed on the department's officially designated mountain background design.

(2) The department shall
provide to the superintendent of public instruction, either the public school
or Washington apple education foundation designation information supplied by
the public school license plate applicant.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.16.290 and 1997 c
291 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In any case of a valid
sale or transfer of the ownership of any vehicle, the right to the certificates
properly transferable therewith, except as provided in RCW 46.16.280, and to
the vehicle license plates passes to the purchaser or transferee. It is
unlawful for the holder of such certificates, except as provided in RCW
46.16.280, or vehicle license plates to fail, neglect, or refuse to endorse the
certificates and deliver the vehicle license plates to the purchaser or
transferee. If the sale or transfer is of a vehicle licensed by the state or
any county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision
entitled to exemption as provided by law, or, if the vehicle is licensed with
personalized plates, amateur radio operator plates, medal of honor plates,
disabled person plates, disabled veteran plates, prisoner of war plates, public
school license plates, or other special license plates issued under RCW
46.16.301 as it existed before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of
1997, the vehicle license plates therefor shall be retained and may be
displayed upon a vehicle obtained in replacement of the vehicle so sold or
transferred.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c
291 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may
establish a fee of no more than forty dollars for each type of special
license plates issued under RCW 46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing
before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, ((in an amount
calculated)) to offset the cost of production of the special license plates
and the administration of this program. ((Until December 31, 1997, the fee
shall not exceed thirty-five dollars, but effective with vehicle registrations
due or to become due on January 1, 1998, the department may adjust the fee to
no more than forty dollars.)) This fee is in addition to all other fees
required to register and license the vehicle for which the plates have been
requested. All such additional special license plate fees collected by the
department shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the motor
vehicle fund.

(2) ((Until December
31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application, registration, and renewal registration of a motor vehicle, the
holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection expenses
incurred by it. The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production,
shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(3) Effective with
vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 1998,)) In addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the
holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of
each fee collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the
custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The
state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate collegiate license
plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(((4) Effective with
annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 1999,)) (3) In
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay a fee
of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted
to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(((5))) (4)
In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a special baseball stadium
license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The
remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds
issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW
82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary preconstruction costs, while the
taxes are being collected under RCW 82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer
shall credit the funds to the state general fund.

(((6) Effective with
annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 1999,)) (5) In
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a special baseball stadium license plate
shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not
to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds
shall be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
state general fund.

(6) Effective with
vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 2003, in addition to
all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and registration of a
motor vehicle, the holder of a public school license plate shall pay an initial
fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying
detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the public
school license plate account established under section 5 of this act. The
superintendent of public instruction shall remit the proceeds, less its
administrative expenses, to the appropriate public school district or the
Washington apple education foundation, as designated by the public school
license plate applicant.

(7) Effective with
annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 2004, in addition to all
fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle
registration, the holder of a public school license plate shall, upon
application, pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an
amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection
for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to
the public school license plate account established under section 5 of this act.
The superintendent of public instruction shall remit the proceeds, less its
administrative expenses, to the appropriate public school district or the
Washington apple education foundation, as designated by the public school
license plate holder.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 46.68 RCW to read as follows:

The public
school license plate account is established in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts, except as provided in RCW 46.16.313 (6) and (7), from
public school license plates must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for educational scholarships provided through
the Washington apple education foundation, for distribution to Washington state
public school districts and to fund public school license plate-related
administrative and distribution costs, as authorized by the superintendent of
public instruction. The account is not subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, and no appropriation is required for expenditures.

---
END ---