BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.04.035 and 1957 c
208 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of RCW
41.04.035 and 41.04.036 "United Fund" means the organization
conducting the single, annual, consolidated effort to secure funds for
distribution to agencies engaged in charitable and public health, welfare and
service purposes, which is commonly known as the United Fund((, or the
organization which serves in place of the United Fund organizations in
communities where an organization known as the United Fund is not organized))
or the Washington state combined fund drive.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.04.036 and 1983
1st ex.s. c 28 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any official of the
state or of any of its political subdivisions authorized to disburse funds in
payment of salaries or wages of public officers or employees is authorized,
upon written request of the officer or employee, to deduct from the salary or
wages of the officer or employee the amount of money designated by the officer
or employee for payment to the United Fund or the Washington state combined
fund drive.

The moneys so deducted
shall be paid over promptly to the United Fund or the Washington state
combined fund drive designated by the officer or employee. Subject to any
((regulations prescribed)) rules adopted by the office of
financial management, the official authorized to disburse the funds in payment
of salaries or wages may prescribe any procedures necessary to carry out RCW
41.04.035 and 41.04.036.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

The Washington state
combined fund drive account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
All receipts from the combined fund drive must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the beneficiaries of the
Washington state combined fund drive. Only the director of the department of personnel
or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, and an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

The director of the
department of personnel is authorized to adopt rules, after consultation with
state agencies, institutions of higher education, and employee organizations,
for the operation of the Washington state combined fund drive.

Sec. 5. RCW 41.04.230 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 6 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

Any official of the
state authorized to disburse funds in payment of salaries and wages of public
officers or employees is authorized, upon written request of the officer or
employee, to deduct from the salaries or wages of the officers or employees,
the amount or amounts of subscription payments, premiums, contributions, or
continuation thereof, for payment of the following:

(1) Credit union
deductions: PROVIDED, That twenty-five or more employees of a single state
agency or a total of one hundred or more state employees of several agencies
have authorized such a deduction for payment to the same credit union. An
agency may, in its own discretion, establish a minimum participation
requirement of fewer than twenty-five employees.

(2) Parking fee
deductions: PROVIDED, That payment is made for parking facilities furnished by
the agency or by the department of general administration.

(3) U.S. savings bond
deductions: PROVIDED, That a person within the particular agency shall be
appointed to act as trustee. The trustee will receive all contributions;
purchase and deliver all bond certificates; and keep such records and furnish
such bond or security as will render full accountability for all bond
contributions.

(4) Board, lodging or
uniform deductions when such board, lodging and uniforms are furnished by the
state, or deductions for academic tuitions or fees or scholarship contributions
payable to the employing institution.

(5) Dues and other fees
deductions: PROVIDED, That the deduction is for payment of membership dues to
any professional organization formed primarily for public employees or college
and university professors: AND PROVIDED, FURTHER, That twenty-five or more
employees of a single state agency, or a total of one hundred or more state
employees of several agencies have authorized such a deduction for payment to
the same professional organization.

(6) Labor or employee
organization dues may be deducted in the event that a payroll deduction is not
provided under a collective bargaining agreement under the provisions of RCW
41.06.150: PROVIDED, That twenty-five or more officers or employees of a
single agency, or a total of one hundred or more officers or employees of
several agencies have authorized such a deduction for payment to the same labor
or employee organization: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That labor or employee organizations
with five hundred or more members in state government may have payroll
deduction for employee benefit programs.

(7) Insurance
contributions to the authority for payment of premiums under contracts
authorized by the state health care authority. However, enrollment or
assignment by the state health care authority to participate in a health care
benefit plan, as required by RCW 41.05.065(5), shall authorize a payroll
deduction of premium contributions without a written consent under the terms
and conditions established by the public employees' benefits board.

(8) Deductions to a
bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association if (a) the bank, savings
bank, or savings and loan association is authorized to do business in this
state; and (b) twenty-five or more employees of a single agency, or fewer, if a
lesser number is established by such agency, or a total of one hundred or more
state employees of several agencies have authorized a deduction for payment to
the same bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association.

Deductions from
salaries and wages of public officers and employees other than those enumerated
in this section or by other law, may be authorized by the director of financial
management for purposes clearly related to state employment or goals and
objectives of the agency and for plans authorized by the state health care
authority.

(9) Contributions to
the Washington state combined fund drive.

The authority to make
deductions from the salaries and wages of public officers and employees as
provided for in this section shall be in addition to such other authority as
may be provided by law: PROVIDED, That the state or any department, division,
or separate agency of the state shall not be liable to any insurance carrier or
contractor for the failure to make or transmit any such deduction.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2001
c 201 s 4 and 2001 c 184 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Money in the
treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state
treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same
extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2) All income received
from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set aside in an account
in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.

(3) The investment
income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on
behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected
state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial
institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a) Monthly, the
state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the investment income
account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The
college savings program account, the Washington advanced college tuition
payment program account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian
scholarship endowment fund, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve
account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the game
farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium
and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the
self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the
children's trust fund. However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(c) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the advanced environmental
mitigation revolving account, the city and county advance right-of-way
revolving fund, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high
occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(5) In
conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust
accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative
directive of this section.

---
END ---