BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.04.005 and 1999 c
65 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in RCW
41.04.005, 41.16.220, and 41.20.050 "veteran" includes every person,
who at the time he or she seeks the benefits of RCW 41.04.005, 41.04.010,
41.16.220, 41.20.050, 41.40.170, 73.04.110, or 73.08.080 has received an
honorable discharge or received a discharge for physical reasons with an
honorable record and who meets at least one of the following criteria:

(a) The person has
served between World War I and World War II or during any period of war, as
defined in subsection (2) of this section, as either:

(i) A member in any
branch of the armed forces of the United States;

(ii) A member of the
women's air forces service pilots;

(iii) A U.S. documented
merchant mariner with service aboard an oceangoing vessel operated by the war
shipping administration, the office of defense transportation, or their agents,
from December 7, 1941, to December 31, 1946; or

(iv) A civil service
crewmember with service aboard a U.S. army transport service or U.S. naval
transportation service vessel in oceangoing service from December 7, 1941, to
December 31, 1946; or

(b) The person has
received the armed forces expeditionary medal, or marine corps and navy
expeditionary medal, for opposed action on foreign soil, for service:

(i) In any branch of
the armed forces of the United States; or

(ii) As a member of the
women's air forces service pilots.

(2) A "period of
war" includes:

(a) World War I;

(b) World War II;

(c) The Korean
conflict;

(d) The Vietnam era((,
which was)) means:

(i) The period
beginning on February 28, 1961, and ending on May 7, 1975, in the case of a
veteran who served in the Republic of Vietnam during that period;

(ii) The period
beginning August 5, 1964, and ending on May 7, 1975;

(e) The Persian Gulf
War, which was the period beginning August 2, 1990, and ending on the date
prescribed by presidential proclamation or law;

(f) The period
beginning on the date of any future declaration of war by the congress and
ending on the date prescribed by presidential proclamation or concurrent
resolution of the congress; and

(g) The following armed
conflicts, if the participant was awarded the respective campaign badge or
medal: The crisis in Lebanon; the invasion of Grenada; Panama, Operation Just
Cause; Somalia, Operation Restore Hope; Haiti, Operation Uphold Democracy; and
Bosnia, Operation Joint Endeavor.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.40.170 and 1991 c
35 s 78 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member who has
served or shall serve on active federal service in the military or naval forces
of the United States and who left or shall leave an employer to enter such
service shall be deemed to be on military leave of absence if he or she has
resumed or shall resume employment as an employee within one year from
termination thereof.

(2) If he or she has
applied or shall apply for reinstatement of employment, within one year from
termination of the military service, and is refused employment for reasons
beyond his or her control, he or she shall, upon resumption of service within
ten years have such service credited to him or her.

(3) In any event, after
completing twenty-five years of creditable service, any member may have service
in the armed forces credited to him or her as a member whether or not he or she
left the employ of an employer to enter the armed service: PROVIDED, That in
no instance, described in this section, shall military service in excess of
five years be credited: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each instance the member
must restore all withdrawn accumulated contributions, which restoration must be
completed within five years of membership service following the first
resumption of employment or complete twenty-five years of creditable service:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section will not apply to any individual, not a
veteran within the meaning of RCW 41.04.005((, as now or hereafter amended:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in no instance, described in this section, shall
military service be credited to any member who is receiving full military
retirement benefits pursuant to Title 10 United States Code)).

Sec. 3. RCW 43.43.260 and 2001 c
329 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon retirement from
service as provided in RCW 43.43.250, a member shall be granted a retirement
allowance which shall consist of:

(1) A prior service
allowance which shall be equal to two percent of the member's average final
salary multiplied by the number of years of prior service rendered by the
member.

(2) A current service
allowance which shall be equal to two percent of the member's average final
salary multiplied by the number of years of service rendered while a member of
the retirement system.

(3)(a) Any member
commissioned prior to January 1, 2003, with twenty-five years service in the
Washington state patrol may have the member's service in the armed forces
credited as a member whether or not the individual left the employ of the
Washington state patrol to enter such armed forces: PROVIDED, That in no
instance shall military service in excess of five years be credited: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each instance, a member must restore all withdrawn
accumulated contributions, which restoration must be completed on the date of
the member's retirement, or as provided under RCW 43.43.130, whichever occurs
first: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section shall not apply to any
individual, not a veteran within the meaning of RCW 41.06.150((, as now or
hereafter amended: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in no instance shall military
service be credited to any member who is receiving full military retirement
benefits pursuant to Title 10 United States Code, as now or hereafter amended)).

(b) A member who leaves
the Washington state patrol to enter the armed forces of the United States
shall be entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of
military service. This subsection shall be administered in a manner consistent
with the requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and reemployment
rights act.

(i) The member
qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(A) Within ninety days
of the member's honorable discharge from the United States armed forces, the
member applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member
immediately prior to the member entering the United States armed forces; and

(B) The member makes
the employee contributions required under RCW 41.45.0631 and 41.45.067 within
five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever comes
sooner; or

(C) Prior to retirement
and not within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge or five years of
resumption of service the member pays the amount required under RCW
41.50.165(2).

(ii) Upon receipt of
member contributions under (b)(i)(B) of this subsection, the department shall
establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its
contribution required under RCW 41.45.060 for the period of military service,
plus interest as determined by the department.

(iii) The contributions
required under (b)(i)(B) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation
the member would have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated
with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year
prior to when the member went on military leave.

(4) In no event shall
the total retirement benefits from subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this
section, of any member exceed seventy-five percent of the member's average
final salary.

(5) Beginning July 1,
2001, and every year thereafter, the department shall determine the following
information for each retired member or beneficiary whose retirement allowance
has been in effect for at least one year:

(a) The original dollar
amount of the retirement allowance;

(b) The index for the
calendar year prior to the effective date of the retirement allowance, to be
known as "index A";

(c) The index for the
calendar year prior to the date of determination, to be known as "index
B"; and

(d) The ratio obtained
when index B is divided by index A.

The value of the ratio
obtained shall be the annual adjustment to the original retirement allowance
and shall be applied beginning with the July payment. In no event, however,
shall the annual adjustment:

(i) Produce a retirement
allowance which is lower than the original retirement allowance;

(ii) Exceed three
percent in the initial annual adjustment; or

(iii) Differ from the
previous year's annual adjustment by more than three percent.

For the purposes of
this section, "index" means, for any calendar year, that year's
average consumer price index for the Seattle-Tacoma-Bremerton Washington area
for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau
of labor statistics, United States department of labor.

The
provisions of this section shall apply to all members presently retired and to
all members who shall retire in the future.

---
END ---