BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The department of
retirement systems is authorized to adopt rules to permit the transfer from
plan 2 to plan 3 of the public employees' retirement system for:

(1) Seasonal career
employees. Members of plan 2 who have been employed by an employer on a
seasonal career basis for four consecutive seasons of employment with an
employer prior to June 1, 2003, are eligible to transfer to plan 3 and receive
the additional transfer payment applicable for their employer under RCW 41.40.795
if they apply to transfer to plan 3 in any month that service credit is earned
between March 1, 2002, and March 1, 2003;

(2)
Employees on military leave of absence. A member of plan 2 who is on a
military leave of absence during the transfer window applicable for their
employer under RCW 41.40.795 or during February 2003 is eligible to transfer to
plan 3 and receive the additional transfer payment if they elect during a
six-month period following the end of their leave to transfer and purchase service
credit for their military leave for at least one month during their transfer
window and for the month of February 2003 according to the terms of RCW
41.40.710.

---
END ---