BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.26.520 and 2000 c
247 s 1105 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member who is on
a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer shall continue to
receive service credit as provided for under the provisions of RCW 41.26.410
through 41.26.550.

(2) A member who
receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized leave of absence
to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and whose employer is
reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation paid to the member
during the period of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of
absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is
authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the member
retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of leave. The
basic salary reported for a member who establishes service credit under this
subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to the highest paid job
class covered by the collective bargaining agreement.

(3) Except as specified
in subsection (((6))) (7) of this section, a member shall be
eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit during a member's
entire working career for those periods when a member is on an unpaid leave of
absence authorized by an employer. Such credit may be obtained only if the
member makes the employer, member, and state contributions plus interest as
determined by the department for the period of the authorized leave of absence
within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever
comes sooner.

(4) A law
enforcement member may be authorized by an employer to work part time and to go
on a part-time leave of absence. During a part-time leave of absence a member
is prohibited from any other employment with their employer. A member is
eligible to receive credit for any portion of service credit not earned during
a month of part-time leave of absence if the member makes the employer, member,
and state contributions, plus interest, as determined by the department for the
period of the authorized leave within five years of resumption of full-time
service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner. Any service credit
purchased for a part-time leave of absence is included in the two-year maximum
provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(5) If a member
fails to meet the time limitations of subsection (3) or (4) of this
section, the member may receive a maximum of two years of service credit during
a member's working career for those periods when a member is on unpaid leave of
absence authorized by an employer. This may be done by paying the amount
required under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior to retirement.

(((5))) (6)
For the purpose of subsection (3) or (4) of this section the
contribution shall not include the contribution for the unfunded supplemental
present value as required by RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067. The
contributions required shall be based on the average of the member's basic
salary at both the time the authorized leave of absence was granted and the
time the member resumed employment.

(((6))) (7)
A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the armed forces of the
United States shall be entitled to retirement system service credit for up to
five years of military service. This subsection shall be administered in a
manner consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services
employment and reemployment rights act.

(a) The member
qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(i) Within ninety days
of the member's honorable discharge from the United States armed forces, the
member applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member
immediately prior to the member entering the United States armed forces; and

(ii) The member makes
the employee contributions required under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and
41.45.067 within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement,
whichever comes sooner; or

(iii) Prior to
retirement and not within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge or
five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount required under
RCW 41.50.165(2).

(b) Upon receipt of
member contributions under (a)(ii) of this subsection, the department shall
establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer and the state
for their respective contributions required under RCW 41.26.450 for the period
of military service, plus interest as determined by the department.

(c) The contributions
required under (a)(ii) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation
the member would have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated
with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year
prior to when the member went on military leave.

(((7)))
(8) A member receiving benefits under Title 51 RCW who is not receiving
benefits under this chapter shall be deemed to be on unpaid, authorized leave
of absence.

--- END ---