BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Active members of
the Washington state patrol retirement system who have previously established
service credit in the public employees' retirement system plan 2 while employed
in the state patrol as a commercial vehicle enforcement officer, and who became
a commissioned officer after July 1, 2000, and prior to June 30, 2001, have the
following options:

(a) Remain a member of
the public employees' retirement system; or

(b) Transfer service
credit earned under the retirement system as a commercial vehicle enforcement
officer to the Washington state patrol retirement system by making an
irrevocable choice filed in writing with the department of retirement systems
within one year of the department's announcement of the ability to make such a
transfer.

(2)(a) Any commissioned
officer choosing to transfer under this section shall have transferred from the
retirement system to the Washington state patrol retirement system:

(i) All the employee's
applicable accumulated contributions plus interest, and an equal amount of
employer contributions attributed to such employee; and

(ii) All applicable
months of service as a commercial vehicle enforcement officer credited to the
employee under this chapter as though that service was rendered as a member of
the Washington state patrol retirement system.

(b) For the applicable
period of service, the employee shall pay: (i) The difference between the
contributions the employee paid to the retirement system, and the contributions
which would have been paid by the employee had the employee been a member of
the Washington state patrol retirement system, plus interest as determined by
the director. This payment shall be made no later than December 31, 2010, or
the date of retirement, whichever comes first;

(ii) The difference
between the employer contributions paid to the public employees' retirement
system, and the employer contributions which would have been payable to the
Washington state patrol retirement system; and

(iii) An amount
sufficient to ensure that the funding status of the Washington state patrol
retirement system will not change due to this transfer.

(c) If the payment
required by this subsection is not paid in full by the deadline, the
transferred service credit shall not be used to determine eligibility for
benefits nor to calculate benefits under the Washington state patrol retirement
system. In such case, the additional employee and employer contributions
transferred under this subsection, and any payments made under this subsection,
shall be refunded to the employee, and the employer shall be entitled to a
credit for the payments made under (a) of this subsection.

(d) An
individual who transfers service credit and contributions under this subsection
is permanently excluded from the public employees' retirement system for all
service as a commercial vehicle enforcement officer.

--- END ---