BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.26.162 and 1991
sp.s. c 12 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) An ex
spouse of a law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
retiree shall qualify as surviving spouse under RCW 41.26.160 if the ex spouse:

(((a))) (i)
Has been provided benefits under any currently effective court decree of
dissolution or legal separation or in any court order or court-approved
property settlement agreement incident to any court decree of dissolution or
legal separation entered after the member's retirement and prior to December
31, 1979; and

(((b))) (ii)
Was married to the retiree for at least thirty years, including at least twenty
years prior to the member's retirement or separation from service if a vested
member.

(((2))) (b)
If two or more persons are eligible for a surviving spouse benefit under this
subsection, benefits shall be divided between the surviving spouses based on
the percentage of total service credit the member accrued during each marriage.

(((3))) (c)
This ((section)) subsection shall apply retroactively.

(2)(a) An ex spouse
of a law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1
retiree who:

(i) Divorced the
member after being married to the member for at least thirty years, including
at least twenty years prior to the member's retirement or separation from
service if a vested member;

(ii) Entered into a
court order or court-approved property settlement agreement incident to the
divorce that awarded a portion of the member's benefits to the ex spouse;

shall continue to
receive that portion of the member's benefit after the member's death as if the
member was still alive.

(b) This subsection
shall apply retroactively, however no payments shall be made to an ex spouse of
a deceased member qualifying under this subsection for any period prior to the
effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.26 RCW under subchapter heading "plan 1" to read as
follows:

(1) No later than July
1, 2003, the department shall adopt rules to allow a member who meets the
criteria set forth in subsection (2) of this section to choose an actuarially
equivalent benefit that pays the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon
death, such portion of the member's reduced retirement allowance as the
department by rule designates shall be continued throughout the life of a
spouse ineligible for survivor benefits under RCW 41.26.160 or 41.26.161.

(2) To choose an
actuarially equivalent benefit according to subsection (1) of this section, a
member shall:

(a) Have the retirement
allowance payable to the retiree not subject to periodic payments pursuant to a
property division obligation as provided for in RCW 41.50.670;

(b) Have no qualified
ex spouse under RCW 41.26.162(1); and

(c) Choose an
actuarially reduced benefit during a one-year period beginning one year after
the date of marriage to the survivor benefit-ineligible spouse.

(3) A member who
married a spouse ineligible for survivor benefits under RCW 41.26.160 or
41.26.161 prior to the effective date of the rules adopted under this section
and satisfies the conditions of subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section has
one year to designate their spouse as a survivor beneficiary following the
adoption of the rules.

(4) No benefit provided
to a child survivor beneficiary under RCW 41.26.160 or 41.26.161 is affected or
reduced by the member's selection of the actuarially reduced spousal survivor
benefit provided by this section.

(5)(a) Any member who
chose to receive a reduced retirement allowance under subsection (1) of this
section is entitled to receive a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance
with (b) of this subsection if:

(i) The retiree's
survivor spouse designated in subsection (1) of this section predeceases the
retiree; and

(ii) The retiree
provides to the department proper proof of the designated beneficiary's death.

(b) The retirement
allowance payable to the retiree from the beginning of the month following the
date of the beneficiaries death shall be increased by the following:

(i) One hundred percent
multiplied by the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection converted to a percent;

(ii) Subtract one from
the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and survivor option factor.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.50.670 and 1998 c
341 s 513 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this
chapter regarding mandatory assignment of benefits to enforce a spousal
maintenance obligation shall abridge the right of an obligee to direct payments
of retirement benefits to satisfy a property division obligation ordered
pursuant to a court decree of dissolution or legal separation or any court
order or court-approved property settlement agreement incident to any court
decree of dissolution or legal separation as provided in RCW 2.10.180,
2.12.090, 41.04.310, 41.04.320, 41.04.330, 41.26.053, 41.26.162,
41.32.052, 41.35.100, 41.34.070(((3))) (4), 41.40.052, 43.43.310,
or 26.09.138, as those statutes existed before July 1, 1987, and as those
statutes exist on and after July 28, 1991. The department shall pay benefits
under this chapter in a lump sum or as a portion of periodic retirement
payments as expressly provided by the dissolution order. A dissolution order
may not order the department to pay a periodic retirement payment or lump sum
unless that payment is specifically authorized under the provisions of chapter
2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.35, 41.34, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW, as applicable.

(2) The department
shall pay directly to an obligee the amount of periodic retirement payments or
lump sum payment, as appropriate, specified in the dissolution order if the
dissolution order filed with the department pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section includes a provision that states in the following form:

If
. . . . . . (the obligor) receives periodic retirement
payments as defined in RCW 41.50.500, the department of retirement systems
shall pay to . . . . . . (the obligee)
. . . . . . dollars from such payments or
. . . percent of such payments. If the obligor's debt is expressed
as a percentage of his or her periodic retirement payment and the obligee does
not have a survivorship interest in the obligor's benefit, the amount received
by the obligee shall be the percentage of the periodic retirement payment that
the obligor would have received had he or she selected a standard allowance.

If
. . . . . . (the obligor) requests or has requested a
withdrawal of accumulated contributions as defined in RCW 41.50.500, or becomes
eligible for a lump sum death benefit, the department of retirement systems
shall pay to . . . . . . (the obligee) . . . . . .
dollars plus interest at the rate paid by the department of retirement systems
on member contributions. Such interest to accrue from the date of this order's
entry with the court of record.

(3) This section does
not require a member to select a standard allowance upon retirement nor does it
require the department to recalculate the amount of a retiree's periodic
retirement payment based on a change in survivor option.

(4) A court order under
this section may not order the department to pay more than seventy-five percent
of an obligor's periodic retirement payment to an obligee.

(5) Persons whose court
decrees were entered between July 1, 1987, and July 28, 1991, shall also be
entitled to receive direct payments of retirement benefits to satisfy
court-ordered property divisions if the dissolution orders comply or are
modified to comply with this section and RCW 41.50.680 through 41.50.720 and,
as applicable, RCW 2.10.180, 2.12.090, 41.26.053, 41.32.052, 41.35.100,
41.34.070, 41.40.052, 43.43.310, and 26.09.138.

(6) The obligee must
file a copy of the dissolution order with the department within ninety days of
that order's entry with the court of record.

(7) A division of
benefits pursuant to a dissolution order under this section shall be based upon
the obligor's gross benefit prior to any deductions. If the department is
required to withhold a portion of the member's benefit pursuant to 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 3402 and the sum of that amount plus the amount owed to the obligee
exceeds the total benefit, the department shall satisfy the withholding
requirements under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3402 and then pay the remainder to the
obligee. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to amounts withheld
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3402(i).

Sec. 4. RCW 41.50.700 and 1991 c
365 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except under
subsection (3) of this section, the department's obligation to provide
direct payment of a property division obligation to an obligee under RCW
41.50.670 shall cease upon the death of the obligee or upon the death of the
obligor, whichever comes first. However, if an obligor dies and is eligible
for a lump sum death benefit, the department shall be obligated to provide
direct payment to the obligee of all or a portion of the withdrawal of
accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order that complies with RCW
41.50.670.

(2) The direct payment
of a property division obligation to an obligee under RCW 41.50.670 shall be
paid as a deduction from the member's periodic retirement payment. An obligee
may not direct the department to withhold any funds from such payment.

(3) The
department's obligation to provide direct payment continues for the life of an
ex spouse from a preretirement divorce meeting the criteria of RCW
41.26.162(2).

Sec. 5. RCW 41.26.460 and 2000 c
186 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon retirement for
service as prescribed in RCW 41.26.430 or disability retirement under RCW
41.26.470, a member shall elect to have the retirement allowance paid pursuant
to the following options, calculated so as to be actuarially equivalent to each
other.

(a) Standard
allowance. A member electing this option shall receive a retirement allowance
payable throughout such member's life. However, if the retiree dies before the
total of the retirement allowance paid to such retiree equals the amount of
such retiree's accumulated contributions at the time of retirement, then the
balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust,
or organization as the retiree shall have nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department; or if there be no such designated
person or persons still living at the time of the retiree's death, then to the
surviving spouse; or if there be neither such designated person or persons
still living at the time of death nor a surviving spouse, then to the retiree's
legal representative.

(b) The department
shall adopt rules that allow a member to select a retirement option that pays
the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such portion of the
member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule designates
shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to a designated person.
Such person shall be nominated by the member by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department at the time of retirement. The options
adopted by the department shall include, but are not limited to, a joint and
one hundred percent survivor option and a joint and fifty percent survivor
option.

(2)(a) A member, if
married, must provide the written consent of his or her spouse to the option
selected under this section, except as provided in (b) of this subsection. If
a member is married and both the member and member's spouse do not give written
consent to an option under this section, the department will pay the member a
joint and fifty percent survivor benefit and record the member's spouse as the
beneficiary. Such benefit shall be calculated to be actuarially equivalent to
the benefit options available under subsection (1) of this section unless
spousal consent is not required as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) If a copy of a
dissolution order designating a survivor beneficiary under RCW 41.50.790 has
been filed with the department at least thirty days prior to a member's
retirement:

(i) The department
shall honor the designation as if made by the member under subsection (1) of
this section; and

(ii) The spousal
consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(3)(a) Any member who
retired before January 1, 1996, and who elected to receive a reduced retirement
allowance under subsection (1)(b) or (2) of this section is entitled to receive
a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of this subsection, if
they meet the following conditions:

(i) The retiree's designated
beneficiary predeceases or has predeceased the retiree; and

(ii) The retiree
provides to the department proper proof of the designated beneficiary's death.

(b) The retirement
allowance payable to the retiree, as of July 1, 1998, or the date of the designated
beneficiary's death, whichever comes last, shall be increased by the percentage
derived in (c) of this subsection.

(c) The percentage
increase shall be derived by the following:

(i) One hundred percent
multiplied by the result of (c)(ii) of this subsection converted to a percent;

(ii) Subtract one from
the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and survivor option factor;

(iii) The joint and
survivor option factor shall be from the table in effect as of July 1, 1998.

(d) The adjustment
under (b) of this subsection shall accrue from the beginning of the month
following the date of the designated beneficiary's death or from July 1, 1998,
whichever comes last.

(4) No later than July
1, 2001, the department shall adopt rules that allow a member additional
actuarially equivalent survivor benefit options, and shall include, but are not
limited to:

(a)(i) A retired member
who retired without designating a survivor beneficiary shall have the
opportunity to designate their spouse from a postretirement marriage as a
survivor during a one-year period beginning one year after the date of the
postretirement marriage provided the retirement allowance payable to the
retiree is not subject to periodic payments pursuant to a property division
obligation as provided for in RCW 41.50.670.

(ii) A member who
entered into a postretirement marriage prior to the effective date of the rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection and satisfies the conditions of (a)(i) of
this subsection shall have one year to designate their spouse as a survivor
beneficiary following the adoption of the rules.

(b) A retired member
who elected to receive a reduced retirement allowance under this section and
designated a nonspouse as survivor beneficiary shall have the opportunity to
remove the survivor designation and have their future benefit adjusted.

(c) The department may
make an additional charge, if necessary, to ensure that the benefits provided
under this subsection remain actuarially equivalent.

(5) No later than
July 1, 2003, the department shall adopt rules to permit:

(a) A court-approved
property settlement incident to a court decree of dissolution made before
retirement to provide that benefits payable to a member who meets the length of
service requirements of RCW 41.26.530(1) and the member's divorcing spouse be
divided into two separate benefits payable over the life of each spouse.

The member shall
have available the benefit options of subsection (1) of this section upon
retirement, and if remarried at the time of retirement remains subject to the
spousal consent requirements of subsection (2) of this section. Any reductions
of the member's benefit subsequent to the division into two separate benefits
shall be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.

The nonmember ex
spouse shall be eligible to commence receiving their separate benefit upon
reaching the ages provided in RCW 41.26.430 and after filing a written
application with the department.

(b) A court-approved
property settlement incident to a court decree of dissolution made after
retirement may only divide the benefit into two separate benefits payable over
the life of each spouse if the nonmember ex spouse was selected as a survivor
beneficiary at retirement.

The retired member
may later choose the survivor benefit options available in subsection (4) of
this section. Any actuarial reductions subsequent to the division into two
separate benefits shall be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.

Both the retired member
and the nonmember divorced spouse shall be eligible to commence receiving their
separate benefits upon filing a copy of the dissolution order with the
department in accordance with RCW 41.50.670.

(c) The department
may make an additional charge or adjustment if necessary to ensure that the
separate benefits provided under this subsection are actuarially equivalent to
the benefits payable prior to the decree of dissolution.

Sec. 6. RCW 41.32.530 and 2000 c
186 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon an application
for retirement for service under RCW 41.32.480 or retirement for disability
under RCW 41.32.550, approved by the department, every member shall receive the
maximum retirement allowance available to him or her throughout life unless
prior to the time the first installment thereof becomes due he or she has
elected, by executing the proper application therefor, to receive the actuarial
equivalent of his or her retirement allowance in reduced payments throughout
his or her life with the following options:

(a) Standard
allowance. If he or she dies before he or she has received the present value
of his or her accumulated contributions at the time of his or her retirement in
annuity payments, the unpaid balance shall be paid to his or her estate or to
such person, trust, or organization as he or she shall have nominated by
written designation executed and filed with the department.

(b) The department
shall adopt rules that allow a member to select a retirement option that pays
the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such portion of the
member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule designates
shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to a person who has an
insurable interest in the member's life. Such person shall be nominated by the
member by written designation duly executed and filed with the department at
the time of retirement. The options adopted by the department shall include,
but are not limited to, a joint and one hundred percent survivor option and a
joint and fifty percent survivor option.

(c) Such other benefits
shall be paid to a member receiving a retirement allowance under RCW 41.32.497
as the member may designate for himself, herself, or others equal to the
actuarial value of his or her retirement annuity at the time of his
retirement: PROVIDED, That the board of trustees shall limit withdrawals of
accumulated contributions to such sums as will not reduce the member's
retirement allowance below one hundred and twenty dollars per month.

(d) A member whose
retirement allowance is calculated under RCW 41.32.498 may also elect to
receive a retirement allowance based on options available under this subsection
that includes the benefit provided under RCW 41.32.770. This retirement
allowance option shall also be calculated so as to be actuarially equivalent to
the maximum retirement allowance and to the options available under this
subsection.

(2)(a) A member, if married,
must provide the written consent of his or her spouse to the option selected
under this section, except as provided in (b) of this subsection. If a member
is married and both the member and the member's spouse do not give written
consent to an option under this section, the department will pay the member a
joint and fifty percent survivor benefit and record the member's spouse as the
beneficiary. Such benefit shall be calculated to be actuarially equivalent to
the benefit options available under subsection (1) of this section unless
spousal consent is not required as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) If a copy of a
dissolution order designating a survivor beneficiary under RCW 41.50.790 has
been filed with the department at least thirty days prior to a member's
retirement:

(i) The department
shall honor the designation as if made by the member under subsection (1) of
this section; and

(ii) The spousal
consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(3)(a) Any member who
retired before January 1, 1996, and who elected to receive a reduced retirement
allowance under subsection (1)(b) or (2) of this section is entitled to receive
a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of this subsection, if
they meet the following conditions:

(i) The retiree's
designated beneficiary predeceases or has predeceased the retiree; and

(ii) The retiree
provides to the department proper proof of the designated beneficiary's death.

(b) The retirement
allowance payable to the retiree, as of July 1, 1998, or the date of the
designated beneficiary's death, whichever comes last, shall be increased by the
percentage derived in (c) of this subsection.

(c) The percentage
increase shall be derived by the following:

(i) One hundred percent
multiplied by the result of (c)(ii) of this subsection converted to a percent;

(ii) Subtract one from
the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and survivor option factor;

(iii) The joint and
survivor option factor shall be from the table in effect as of July 1, 1998.

(d) The adjustment
under (b) of this subsection shall accrue from the beginning of the month
following the date of the designated beneficiary's death or from July 1, 1998,
whichever comes last.

(4) No later than July
1, 2001, the department shall adopt rules that allow a member additional
actuarially equivalent survivor benefit options, and shall include, but are not
limited to:

(a)(i) A retired member
who retired without designating a survivor beneficiary shall have the
opportunity to designate their spouse from a postretirement marriage as a
survivor during a one-year period beginning one year after the date of the
postretirement marriage provided the retirement allowance payable to the
retiree is not subject to periodic payments pursuant to a property division
obligation as provided for in RCW 41.50.670.

(ii) A member who
entered into a postretirement marriage prior to the effective date of the rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection and satisfies the conditions of (a)(i) of
this subsection shall have one year to designate their spouse as a survivor
beneficiary following the adoption of the rules.

(b) A retired member
who elected to receive a reduced retirement allowance under this section and
designated a nonspouse as survivor beneficiary shall have the opportunity to
remove the survivor designation and have their future benefit adjusted.

(c) The department may
make an additional charge, if necessary, to ensure that the benefits provided
under this subsection remain actuarially equivalent.

(5) No later than
July 1, 2003, the department shall adopt rules to permit:

(a) A court-approved
property settlement incident to a court decree of dissolution made before
retirement to provide that benefits payable to a member who meets the length of
service requirements of RCW 41.32.470 and the member's divorcing spouse be
divided into two separate benefits payable over the life of each spouse.

The member shall
have available the benefit options of subsection (1) of this section upon
retirement, and if remarried at the time of retirement remains subject to the
spousal consent requirements of subsection (2) of this section. Any reductions
of the member's benefit subsequent to the division into two separate benefits
shall be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.

The nonmember ex
spouse shall be eligible to commence receiving their separate benefit upon
reaching the age provided in RCW 41.32.480(2) and after filing a written
application with the department.

(b) A court-approved
property settlement incident to a court decree of dissolution made after
retirement may only divide the benefit into two separate benefits payable over
the life of each spouse if the nonmember ex spouse was selected as a survivor
beneficiary at retirement.

The retired member
may later choose the survivor benefit options available in subsection (4) of
this section. Any actuarial reductions subsequent to the division into two
separate benefits shall be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.

Both the retired
member and the nonmember divorced spouse shall be eligible to commence
receiving their separate benefits upon filing a copy of the dissolution order
with the department in accordance with RCW 41.50.670.

(c) The separate
single life benefits of the member and the nonmember ex spouse are not (i)
subject to the minimum benefit provisions of RCW 41.32.4851, or (ii) the
minimum benefit annual increase amount eligibility provisions of RCW 41.32.489
(2)(b) and (3)(a).

(d) The
department may make an additional charge or adjustment if necessary to ensure
that the separate benefits provided under this subsection are actuarially
equivalent to the benefits payable prior to the decree of dissolution.

Sec. 7. RCW 41.32.785 and 2000 c
186 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon retirement for
service as prescribed in RCW 41.32.765 or retirement for disability under RCW
41.32.790, a member shall elect to have the retirement allowance paid pursuant
to the following options, calculated so as to be actuarially equivalent to each
other.

(a) Standard
allowance. A member electing this option shall receive a retirement allowance
payable throughout such member's life. However, if the retiree dies before the
total of the retirement allowance paid to such retiree equals the amount of
such retiree's accumulated contributions at the time of retirement, then the
balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust,
or organization as the retiree shall have nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department; or if there be no such designated
person or persons still living at the time of the retiree's death, then to the
surviving spouse; or if there be neither such designated person or persons
still living at the time of death nor a surviving spouse, then to the retiree's
legal representative.

(b) The department
shall adopt rules that allow a member to select a retirement option that pays
the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such portion of the
member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule designates
shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to a designated person.
Such person shall be nominated by the member by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department at the time of retirement. The options
adopted by the department shall include, but are not limited to, a joint and
one hundred percent survivor option and a joint and fifty percent survivor
option.

(2)(a) A member, if
married, must provide the written consent of his or her spouse to the option
selected under this section, except as provided in (b) of this subsection. If
a member is married and both the member and member's spouse do not give written
consent to an option under this section, the department will pay the member a
joint and fifty percent survivor benefit and record the member's spouse as the
beneficiary. Such benefit shall be calculated to be actuarially equivalent to
the benefit options available under subsection (1) of this section unless
spousal consent is not required as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) If a copy of a
dissolution order designating a survivor beneficiary under RCW 41.50.790 has
been filed with the department at least thirty days prior to a member's
retirement:

(i) The department
shall honor the designation as if made by the member under subsection (1) of
this section; and

(ii) The spousal
consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(3)(a) Any member who
retired before January 1, 1996, and who elected to receive a reduced retirement
allowance under subsection (1)(b) or (2) of this section is entitled to receive
a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of this subsection, if
they meet the following conditions:

(i) The retiree's
designated beneficiary predeceases or has predeceased the retiree; and

(ii) The retiree
provides to the department proper proof of the designated beneficiary's death.

(b) The retirement
allowance payable to the retiree, as of July 1, 1998, or the date of the
designated beneficiary's death, whichever comes last, shall be increased by the
percentage derived in (c) of this subsection.

(c) The percentage
increase shall be derived by the following:

(i) One hundred percent
multiplied by the result of (c)(ii) of this subsection converted to a percent;

(ii) Subtract one from
the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and survivor option factor;

(iii) The joint and
survivor option factor shall be from the table in effect as of July 1, 1998.

(d) The adjustment
under (b) of this subsection shall accrue from the beginning of the month
following the date of the designated beneficiary's death or from July 1, 1998,
whichever comes last.

(4) No later than July 1,
2001, the department shall adopt rules that allow a member additional
actuarially equivalent survivor benefit options, and shall include, but are not
limited to:

(a)(i) A retired member
who retired without designating a survivor beneficiary shall have the
opportunity to designate their spouse from a postretirement marriage as a
survivor during a one-year period beginning one year after the date of the
postretirement marriage provided the retirement allowance payable to the
retiree is not subject to periodic payments pursuant to a property division
obligation as provided for in RCW 41.50.670.

(ii) A member who
entered into a postretirement marriage prior to the effective date of the rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection and satisfies the conditions of (a)(i) of
this subsection shall have one year to designate their spouse as a survivor
beneficiary following the adoption of the rules.

(b) A retired member
who elected to receive a reduced retirement allowance under this section and
designated a nonspouse as survivor beneficiary shall have the opportunity to
remove the survivor designation and have their future benefit adjusted.

(c) The department may
make an additional charge, if necessary, to ensure that the benefits provided
under this subsection remain actuarially equivalent.

(5) No later than
July 1, 2003, the department shall adopt rules to permit:

(a) A court-approved
property settlement incident to a court decree of dissolution made before
retirement to provide that benefits payable to a member who meets the length of
service requirements of RCW 41.32.815 and the member's divorcing spouse be
divided into two separate benefits payable over the life of each spouse.

The member shall
have available the benefit options of subsection (1) of this section upon
retirement, and if remarried at the time of retirement remains subject to the
spousal consent requirements of subsection (2) of this section. Any reductions
of the member's benefit subsequent to the division into two separate benefits
shall be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.

The nonmember ex
spouse shall be eligible to commence receiving their separate benefit upon
reaching the age provided in RCW 41.32.765(1) and after filing a written
application with the department.

(b) A court-approved
property settlement incident to a court decree of dissolution made after
retirement may only divide the benefit into two separate benefits payable over
the life of each spouse if the nonmember ex spouse was selected as a survivor
beneficiary at retirement.

The retired member
may later choose the survivor benefit options available in subsection (4) of
this section. Any actuarial reductions subsequent to the division into two
separate benefits shall be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.

Both the retired
member and the nonmember divorced spouse shall be eligible to commence
receiving their separate benefits upon filing a copy of the dissolution order
with the department in accordance with RCW 41.50.670.

(c) The department
may make an additional charge or adjustment if necessary to ensure that the
separate benefits provided under this subsection are actuarially equivalent to
the benefits payable prior to the decree of dissolution.

Sec. 8. RCW 41.32.851 and 2000 c
186 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon retirement for
service as prescribed in RCW 41.32.875 or retirement for disability under RCW
41.32.880, a member shall elect to have the retirement allowance paid pursuant
to one of the following options, calculated so as to be actuarially equivalent
to each other.

(a) Standard
allowance. A member electing this option shall receive a retirement allowance
payable throughout such member's life. Upon the death of the retired member,
all benefits shall cease.

(b) The department
shall adopt rules that allow a member to select a retirement option that pays
the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such portion of the
member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule designates
shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to such person or persons as
the retiree shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed
with the department at the time of retirement. The options adopted by the
department shall include, but are not limited to, a joint and one hundred
percent survivor option and joint and fifty percent survivor option.

(2) ((A member, if
married, must provide the written consent of his or her spouse to the option
selected under this section. If a member is married and both the member and
the member's spouse do not give written consent to an option under this
section, the department shall pay a joint and fifty percent survivor benefit
calculated to be actuarially equivalent to the benefit options available under
subsection (1) of this section)) (a) A member, if married, must provide
the written consent of his or her spouse to the option selected under this
section, except as provided in (b) of this subsection. If a member is married
and both the member and the member's spouse do not give written consent to an
option under this section, the department shall pay a joint and fifty-percent
survivor benefit calculated to be actuarially equivalent to the benefit options
available under subsection (1) of this section unless spousal consent is not
required as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) If a copy of a
dissolution order designating a survivor beneficiary under RCW 41.50.790 has
been filed with the department at least thirty days prior to a member's
retirement:

(i) The department
shall honor the designation as if made by the member under subsection (1) of
this section; and

(ii) The spousal
consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(3) No later than July
1, 2001, the department shall adopt rules that allow a member additional actuarially
equivalent survivor benefit options, and shall include, but are not limited to:

(a)(i) A retired member
who retired without designating a survivor beneficiary shall have the
opportunity to designate their spouse from a postretirement marriage as a
survivor during a one-year period beginning one year after the date of the
postretirement marriage provided the retirement allowance payable to the
retiree is not subject to periodic payments pursuant to a property division
obligation as provided for in RCW 41.50.670.

(ii) A member who
entered into a postretirement marriage prior to the effective date of the rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection and satisfies the conditions of (a)(i) of
this subsection shall have one year to designate their spouse as a survivor
beneficiary following the adoption of the rules.

(b) A retired member
who elected to receive a reduced retirement allowance under this section and
designated a nonspouse as survivor beneficiary shall have the opportunity to
remove the survivor designation and have their future benefit adjusted.

(c) The department may
make an additional charge, if necessary, to ensure that the benefits provided
under this subsection remain actuarially equivalent.

(4) No later than
July 1, 2003, the department shall adopt rules to permit:

(a) A court-approved
property settlement incident to a court decree of dissolution made before
retirement to provide that benefits payable to a member who meets the length of
service requirements of RCW 41.32.875(1) and the member's divorcing spouse be
divided into two separate benefits payable over the life of each spouse.

The member shall
have available the benefit options of subsection (1) of this section upon
retirement, and if remarried at the time of retirement remains subject to the
spousal consent requirements of subsection (2) of this section. Any reductions
of the member's benefit subsequent to the division into two separate benefits
shall be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.

The nonmember ex
spouse shall be eligible to commence receiving their separate benefit upon
reaching the age provided in RCW 41.32.875(1) and after filing a written
application with the department.

(b) A court-approved
property settlement incident to a court decree of dissolution made after
retirement may only divide the benefit into two separate benefits payable over
the life of each spouse if the nonmember ex spouse was selected as a survivor
beneficiary at retirement.

The retired member
may later choose the survivor benefit options available in subsection (3) of
this section. Any actuarial reductions subsequent to the division into two
separate benefits shall be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.

Both the retired
member and the nonmember divorced spouse shall be eligible to commence
receiving their separate benefits upon filing a copy of the dissolution order
with the department in accordance with RCW 41.50.670.

(c) Any benefit
distributed pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW after the date of the dissolution
order creating separate benefits for a member and nonmember ex spouse shall be
paid solely to the member.

(d) The department
may make an additional charge or adjustment if necessary to ensure that the
separate benefits provided under this subsection are actuarially equivalent to
the benefits payable prior to the decree of dissolution.

Sec. 9. RCW 41.35.220 and 2000 c
186 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon retirement for
service as prescribed in RCW 41.35.420 or 41.35.680 or retirement for
disability under RCW 41.35.440 or 41.35.690, a member shall elect to have the
retirement allowance paid pursuant to one of the following options, calculated
so as to be actuarially equivalent to each other.

(a) Standard
allowance. A member electing this option shall receive a retirement allowance
payable throughout such member's life. ((However,))

(i) For members of
plan 2, if the retiree dies before the total of the retirement allowance
paid to such retiree equals the amount of such retiree's accumulated
contributions at the time of retirement, then the balance shall be paid to the
member's estate, or such person or persons, trust, or organization as the
retiree shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed
with the department; or if there be no such designated person or persons still
living at the time of the retiree's death, then to the surviving spouse; or if
there be neither such designated person or persons still living at the time of
death nor a surviving spouse, then to the retiree's legal representative.

(ii) For members of
plan 3, upon the death of the retired member, the member's benefits shall
cease.

(b) The department
shall adopt rules that allow a member to select a retirement option that pays
the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such portion of the
member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule designates
shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to a person nominated by the
member by written designation duly executed and filed with the department at
the time of retirement. The options adopted by the department shall include,
but are not limited to, a joint and one hundred percent survivor option and a
joint and fifty percent survivor option.

(2)(a) A member, if
married, must provide the written consent of his or her spouse to the option
selected under this section, except as provided in (b) of this subsection. If
a member is married and both the member and the member's spouse do not give
written consent to an option under this section, the department shall pay a
joint and fifty percent survivor benefit calculated to be actuarially equivalent
to the benefit options available under subsection (1) of this section unless
spousal consent is not required as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) If a copy of a
dissolution order designating a survivor beneficiary under RCW 41.50.790 has
been filed with the department at least thirty days prior to a member's
retirement:

(i) The department
shall honor the designation as if made by the member under subsection (1) of
this section; and

(ii) The spousal
consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(3) No later than July
1, 2001, the department shall adopt rules that allow a member additional
actuarially equivalent survivor benefit options, and shall include, but are not
limited to:

(a)(i) A retired member
who retired without designating a survivor beneficiary shall have the
opportunity to designate their spouse from a postretirement marriage as a
survivor during a one-year period beginning one year after the date of the
postretirement marriage provided the retirement allowance payable to the
retiree is not subject to periodic payments pursuant to a property division
obligation as provided for in RCW 41.50.670.

(ii) A member who
entered into a postretirement marriage prior to the effective date of the rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection and satisfies the conditions of (a)(i) of
this subsection shall have one year to designate their spouse as a survivor
beneficiary following the adoption of the rules.

(b) A retired member
who elected to receive a reduced retirement allowance under this section and
designated a nonspouse as survivor beneficiary shall have the opportunity to
remove the survivor designation and have their future benefit adjusted.

(c) The department may
make an additional charge, if necessary, to ensure that the benefits provided
under this subsection remain actuarially equivalent.

(4) No later than
July 1, 2003, the department shall adopt rules to permit:

(a) A court-approved
property settlement incident to a court decree of dissolution made before
retirement to provide that benefits payable to a member of plan 2 who meets the
length of service requirements of RCW 41.35.420, or a member of plan 3 who
meets the length of service requirements of RCW 41.35.680(1), and the member's
divorcing spouse be divided into two separate benefits payable over the life of
each spouse.

The member shall
have available the benefit options of subsection (1) of this section upon
retirement, and if remarried at the time of retirement remains subject to the
spousal consent requirements of subsection (2) of this section. Any reductions
of the member's benefit subsequent to the division into two separate benefits
shall be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.

The nonmember ex
spouse shall be eligible to commence receiving their separate benefit upon
reaching the ages provided in RCW 41.35.420(1) for members of plan 2, or RCW
41.35.680(1) for members of plan 3, and after filing a written application with
the department.

(b) A court-approved
property settlement incident to a court decree of dissolution made after
retirement may only divide the benefit into two separate benefits payable over
the life of each spouse if the nonmember ex spouse was selected as a survivor
beneficiary at retirement.

The retired member
may later choose the survivor benefit options available in subsection (3) of
this section. Any actuarial reductions subsequent to the division into two
separate benefits shall be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.

Both the retired
member and the nonmember divorced spouse shall be eligible to commence
receiving their separate benefits upon filing a copy of the dissolution order
with the department in accordance with RCW 41.50.670.

(c) Any benefit
distributed pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW after the date of the dissolution
order creating separate benefits for a member and nonmember ex spouse shall be
paid solely to the member.

(d) The department
may make an additional charge or adjustment if necessary to ensure that the
separate benefits provided under this subsection are actuarially equivalent to
the benefits payable prior to the decree of dissolution.

Sec. 10. RCW 41.40.188 and 2000 c
186 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon retirement for
service as prescribed in RCW 41.40.180 or retirement for disability under RCW
41.40.210 or 41.40.230, a member shall elect to have the retirement allowance
paid pursuant to one of the following options calculated so as to be
actuarially equivalent to each other.

(a) Standard allowance.
A member electing this option shall receive a retirement allowance payable
throughout such member's life. However, if the retiree dies before the total
of the retirement allowance paid to such retiree equals the amount of such
retiree's accumulated contributions at the time of retirement, then the balance
shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust, or
organization as the retiree shall have nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department; or if there be no such designated
person or persons still living at the time of the retiree's death, then to the
surviving spouse; or if there be neither such designated person or persons
still living at the time of death nor a surviving spouse, then to the retiree's
legal representative.

(b) The department
shall adopt rules that allow a member to select a retirement option that pays
the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such portion of the
member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule designates shall
be continued throughout the life of and paid to a person nominated by the
member by written designation duly executed and filed with the department at
the time of retirement. The options adopted by the department shall include,
but are not limited to, a joint and one hundred percent survivor option and a
joint and fifty percent survivor option.

(c) A member may elect
to include the benefit provided under RCW 41.40.640 along with the retirement
options available under this section. This retirement allowance option shall
be calculated so as to be actuarially equivalent to the options offered under
this subsection.

(2)(a) A member, if
married, must provide the written consent of his or her spouse to the option
selected under this section, except as provided in (b) of this subsection. If
a member is married and both the member and the member's spouse do not give
written consent to an option under this section, the department shall pay a
joint and fifty percent survivor benefit calculated to be actuarially equivalent
to the benefit options available under subsection (1) of this section unless
spousal consent is not required as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) If a copy of a
dissolution order designating a survivor beneficiary under RCW 41.50.790 has been
filed with the department at least thirty days prior to a member's retirement:

(i) The department
shall honor the designation as if made by the member under subsection (1) of
this section; and

(ii) The spousal
consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(3)(a) Any member who
retired before January 1, 1996, and who elected to receive a reduced retirement
allowance under subsection (1)(b) or (2) of this section is entitled to receive
a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of this subsection, if
they meet the following conditions:

(i) The retiree's
designated beneficiary predeceases or has predeceased the retiree; and

(ii) The retiree
provides to the department proper proof of the designated beneficiary's death.

(b) The retirement
allowance payable to the retiree, as of July 1, 1998, or the date of the
designated beneficiary's death, whichever comes last, shall be increased by the
percentage derived in (c) of this subsection.

(c) The percentage
increase shall be derived by the following:

(i) One hundred percent
multiplied by the result of (c)(ii) of this subsection converted to a percent;

(ii) Subtract one from
the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and survivor option factor;

(iii) The joint and
survivor option factor shall be from the table in effect as of July 1, 1998.

(d) The adjustment
under (b) of this subsection shall accrue from the beginning of the month
following the date of the designated beneficiary's death or from July 1, 1998,
whichever comes last.

(4) No later than July
1, 2001, the department shall adopt rules that allow a member additional
actuarially equivalent survivor benefit options, and shall include, but are not
limited to:

(a)(i) A retired member
who retired without designating a survivor beneficiary shall have the
opportunity to designate their spouse from a postretirement marriage as a
survivor during a one-year period beginning one year after the date of the
postretirement marriage provided the retirement allowance payable to the
retiree is not subject to periodic payments pursuant to a property division
obligation as provided for in RCW 41.50.670.

(ii) A member who
entered into a postretirement marriage prior to the effective date of the rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection and satisfies the conditions of (a)(i) of
this subsection shall have one year to designate their spouse as a survivor
beneficiary following the adoption of the rules.

(b) A retired member
who elected to receive a reduced retirement allowance under this section and designated
a nonspouse as survivor beneficiary shall have the opportunity to remove the
survivor designation and have their future benefit adjusted.

(c) The department may
make an additional charge, if necessary, to ensure that the benefits provided
under this subsection remain actuarially equivalent.

(5) No later than
July 1, 2003, the department shall adopt rules to permit:

(a) A court-approved
property settlement incident to a court decree of dissolution made before
retirement to provide that benefits payable to a member who meets the length of
service requirements of RCW 41.40.180(1) and the member's divorcing spouse be
divided into two separate benefits payable over the life of each spouse.

The member shall
have available the benefit options of subsection (1) of this section upon
retirement, and if remarried at the time of retirement remains subject to the
spousal consent requirements of subsection (2) of this section. Any reductions
of the member's benefit subsequent to the division into two separate benefits
shall be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.

The nonmember ex
spouse shall be eligible to commence receiving their separate benefit upon
reaching the age provided in RCW 41.40.180(1) and after filing a written
application with the department.

(b) A court-approved
property settlement incident to a court decree of dissolution made after
retirement may only divide the benefit into two separate benefits payable over
the life of each spouse if the nonmember ex spouse was selected as a survivor
beneficiary at retirement.

The retired member
may later choose the survivor benefit options available in subsection (4) of
this section. Any actuarial reductions subsequent to the division into two
separate benefits shall be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.

Both the retired
member and the nonmember divorced spouse shall be eligible to commence
receiving their separate benefits upon filing a copy of the dissolution order
with the department in accordance with RCW 41.50.670.

(c) The separate
single life benefits of the member and the nonmember ex spouse are not (i)
subject to the minimum benefit provisions of RCW 41.40.1984, or (ii) the
minimum benefit annual increase amount eligibility provisions of RCW 41.40.197
(2)(b) and (3)(a).

(d) The
department may make an additional charge or adjustment if necessary to ensure
that the separate benefits provided under this subsection are actuarially
equivalent to the benefits payable prior to the decree of dissolution.

Sec. 11. RCW 41.40.660 and 2000 c
186 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon retirement for
service as prescribed in RCW 41.40.630 or retirement for disability under RCW
41.40.670, a member shall elect to have the retirement allowance paid pursuant
to one of the following options, calculated so as to be actuarially equivalent
to each other.

(a) Standard
allowance. A member electing this option shall receive a retirement allowance
payable throughout such member's life. However, if the retiree dies before the
total of the retirement allowance paid to such retiree equals the amount of
such retiree's accumulated contributions at the time of retirement, then the
balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust,
or organization as the retiree shall have nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department; or if there be no such designated
person or persons still living at the time of the retiree's death, then to the
surviving spouse; or if there be neither such designated person or persons
still living at the time of death nor a surviving spouse, then to the retiree's
legal representative.

(b) The department
shall adopt rules that allow a member to select a retirement option that pays
the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such portion of the
member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule designates
shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to a person nominated by the
member by written designation duly executed and filed with the department at
the time of retirement. The options adopted by the department shall include,
but are not limited to, a joint and one hundred percent survivor option and a
joint and fifty percent survivor option.

(2)(a) A member, if
married, must provide the written consent of his or her spouse to the option
selected under this section, except as provided in (b) of this subsection. If
a member is married and both the member and the member's spouse do not give
written consent to an option under this section, the department shall pay a
joint and fifty percent survivor benefit calculated to be actuarially
equivalent to the benefit options available under subsection (1) of this
section unless spousal consent is not required as provided in (b) of this
subsection.

(b) If a copy of a
dissolution order designating a survivor beneficiary under RCW 41.50.790 has
been filed with the department at least thirty days prior to a member's
retirement:

(i) The department
shall honor the designation as if made by the member under subsection (1) of
this section; and

(ii) The spousal
consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(3)(a) Any member who
retired before January 1, 1996, and who elected to receive a reduced retirement
allowance under subsection (1)(b) or (2) of this section is entitled to receive
a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of this subsection, if
they meet the following conditions:

(i) The retiree's
designated beneficiary predeceases or has predeceased the retiree; and

(ii) The retiree
provides to the department proper proof of the designated beneficiary's death.

(b) The retirement
allowance payable to the retiree, as of July 1, 1998, or the date of the
designated beneficiary's death, whichever comes last, shall be increased by the
percentage derived in (c) of this subsection.

(c) The percentage
increase shall be derived by the following:

(i) One hundred percent
multiplied by the result of (c)(ii) of this subsection converted to a percent;

(ii) Subtract one from
the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and survivor option factor;

(iii) The joint and
survivor option factor shall be from the table in effect as of July 1, 1998.

(d) The adjustment
under (b) of this subsection shall accrue from the beginning of the month
following the date of the designated beneficiary's death or from July 1, 1998,
whichever comes last.

(4) No later than July
1, 2001, the department shall adopt rules that allow a member additional
actuarially equivalent survivor benefit options, and shall include, but are not
limited to:

(a)(i) A retired member
who retired without designating a survivor beneficiary shall have the
opportunity to designate their spouse from a postretirement marriage as a
survivor during a one-year period beginning one year after the date of the
postretirement marriage provided the retirement allowance payable to the retiree
is not subject to periodic payments pursuant to a property division obligation
as provided for in RCW 41.50.670.

(ii) A member who
entered into a postretirement marriage prior to the effective date of the rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection and satisfies the conditions of (a)(i) of
this subsection shall have one year to designate their spouse as a survivor
beneficiary following the adoption of the rules.

(b) A retired member
who elected to receive a reduced retirement allowance under this section and
designated a nonspouse as survivor beneficiary shall have the opportunity to
remove the survivor designation and have their future benefit adjusted.

(c) The department may
make an additional charge, if necessary, to ensure that the benefits provided
under this subsection remain actuarially equivalent.

(5) No later than
July 1, 2003, the department shall adopt rules to permit:

(a) A court-approved
property settlement incident to a court decree of dissolution made before
retirement to provide that benefits payable to a member who meets the length of
service requirements of RCW 41.40.720 and the member's divorcing spouse be
divided into two separate benefits payable over the life of each spouse.

The member shall
have available the benefit options of subsection (1) of this section upon
retirement, and if remarried at the time of retirement remains subject to the
spousal consent requirements of subsection (2) of this section. Any reductions
of the member's benefit subsequent to the division into two separate benefits
shall be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.

The nonmember ex
spouse shall be eligible to commence receiving their separate benefit upon
reaching the age provided in RCW 41.40.630(1) and after filing a written
application with the department.

(b) A court-approved
property settlement incident to a court decree of dissolution made after
retirement may only divide the benefit into two separate benefits payable over
the life of each spouse if the nonmember ex spouse was selected as a survivor
beneficiary at retirement.

The retired member
may later choose the survivor benefit options available in subsection (4) of
this section. Any actuarial reductions subsequent to the division into two
separate benefits shall be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.

Both the retired
member and the nonmember divorced spouse shall be eligible to commence
receiving their separate benefits upon filing a copy of the dissolution order
with the department in accordance with RCW 41.50.670.

(c) Any benefit
distributed pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW after the date of the dissolution
order creating separate benefits for a member and nonmember ex spouse shall be
paid solely to the member.

(d) The department
may make an additional charge or adjustment if necessary to ensure that the
separate benefits provided under this subsection are actuarially equivalent to
the benefits payable prior to the decree of dissolution.

Sec. 12. RCW 41.40.845 and 2000 c
247 s 314 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon retirement for
service as prescribed in RCW 41.40.820 or retirement for disability under RCW 41.40.825,
a member shall elect to have the retirement allowance paid pursuant to one of
the following options, calculated so as to be actuarially equivalent to each
other.

(a) Standard
allowance. A member electing this option shall receive a retirement allowance
payable throughout such member's life. ((However, if the retiree dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to such retiree equals the
amount of such retiree's accumulated contributions at the time of retirement,
then the balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the retiree shall have nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department; or if there be no such
designated person or persons still living at the time of the retiree's death,
then to the surviving spouse; or if there be neither such designated person or
persons still living at the time of death nor a surviving spouse, then to the
retiree's legal representative.)) Upon the death of the member, the
member's benefits shall cease.

(b) The department
shall adopt rules that allow a member to select a retirement option that pays
the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such portion of the
member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule designates
shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to a person nominated by the
member by written designation duly executed and filed with the department at
the time of retirement. The options adopted by the department shall include,
but are not limited to, a joint and one hundred percent survivor option and a
joint and fifty percent survivor option.

(2)(a) A member, if
married, must provide the written consent of his or her spouse to the option
selected under this section, except as provided in (b) of this subsection. If
a member is married and both the member and the member's spouse do not give written
consent to an option under this section, the department shall pay a joint and
fifty percent survivor benefit calculated to be actuarially equivalent to the
benefit options available under subsection (1) of this section unless spousal
consent is not required as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) If a copy of a
dissolution order designating a survivor beneficiary under RCW 41.50.790 has
been filed with the department at least thirty days prior to a member's
retirement:

(i) The department
shall honor the designation as if made by the member under subsection (1) of
this section; and

(ii) The spousal
consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(3) The department
shall adopt rules that allow a member additional actuarially equivalent survivor
benefit options, and shall include, but are not limited to:

(a)(i) A retired
member who retired without designating a survivor beneficiary shall have the
opportunity to designate their spouse from a postretirement marriage as a
survivor during a one-year period beginning one year after the date of the
postretirement marriage provided the retirement allowance payable to the
retiree is not subject to periodic payments pursuant to a property division
obligation as provided for in RCW 41.50.670.

(ii) A member who
entered into a postretirement marriage prior to the effective date of the rules
adopted under this section and satisfies the conditions of (a)(i) of this
subsection shall have one year to designate their spouse as a survivor
beneficiary following the adoption of the rules.

(b) A retired member
who elected to receive a reduced retirement allowance under this section and
designated a nonspouse as survivor beneficiary shall have the opportunity to
remove the survivor designation and have their future benefit adjusted.

(c) The department
may make an additional charge, if necessary, to ensure that the benefits
provided under this subsection remain actuarially equivalent.

(4) No later than
July 1, 2002, the department shall adopt rules that allow a member additional
actuarially equivalent survivor benefit options, and shall include, but are not
limited to:

(a)(i) A retired
member who retired without designating a survivor beneficiary shall have the
opportunity to designate their spouse from a postretirement marriage as a
survivor during a one-year period beginning one year after the date of the
postretirement marriage provided the retirement allowance payable to the
retiree is not subject to periodic payments pursuant to a property division
obligation as provided for in RCW 41.50.670.

(ii) A member who
entered into a postretirement marriage prior to the effective date of the rules
adopted under this section and satisfies the conditions of (a)(i) of this
subsection shall have one year to designate their spouse as a survivor
beneficiary following the adoption of the rules.

(b) A retired member
who elected to receive a reduced retirement allowance under this section and
designated a nonspouse as survivor beneficiary shall have the opportunity to
remove the survivor designation and have their future benefit adjusted.

(c) The department
may make an additional charge, if necessary, to ensure that the benefits
provided under this subsection remain actuarially equivalent.

(5) No later than
July 1, 2003, the department shall adopt rules to permit:

(a) A court-approved
property settlement incident to a court decree of dissolution made before
retirement to provide that benefits payable to a member who meets the length of
service requirements of RCW 41.40.820(1) and the member's divorcing spouse be
divided into two separate benefits payable over the life of each spouse.

The member shall
have available the benefit options of subsection (1) of this section upon
retirement, and if remarried at the time of retirement remains subject to the
spousal consent requirements of subsection (2) of this section. Any reductions
of the member's benefit subsequent to the division into two separate benefits
shall be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.

The nonmember ex
spouse shall be eligible to commence receiving their separate benefit upon
reaching the age provided in RCW 41.40.820(1) and after filing a written
application with the department.

(b) A court-approved
property settlement incident to a court decree of dissolution made after
retirement may only divide the benefit into two separate benefits payable over
the life of each spouse if the nonmember ex spouse was selected as a survivor
beneficiary at retirement.

The retired member
may later choose the survivor benefit options available in subsection (4) of
this section. Any actuarial reductions subsequent to the division into two
separate benefits shall be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.

Both the retired
member and the nonmember divorced spouse shall be eligible to commence
receiving their separate benefits upon filing a copy of the dissolution order
with the department in accordance with RCW 41.50.670.

(c) The department
may make an additional charge or adjustment if necessary to ensure that the
separate benefits provided under this subsection are actuarially equivalent to
the benefits payable prior to the decree of dissolution.

Sec. 13. RCW 43.43.270 and 2001 c
329 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

For members
commissioned prior to January 1, 2003:

(1) The normal form of
retirement allowance shall be an allowance which shall continue as long as the
member lives.

(2) If a member should
die while in service the member's lawful spouse shall be paid an allowance
which shall be equal to fifty percent of the average final salary of the
member. If the member should die after retirement the member's lawful spouse
shall be paid an allowance which shall be equal to the retirement allowance then
payable to the member or fifty percent of the final average salary used in
computing the member's retirement allowance, whichever is less. The allowance
paid to the lawful spouse shall continue as long as the spouse lives:
PROVIDED, That if a surviving spouse who is receiving benefits under this
subsection marries another member of this retirement system who subsequently
predeceases such spouse, the spouse shall then be entitled to receive the
higher of the two survivors' allowances for which eligibility requirements were
met, but a surviving spouse shall not receive more than one survivor's
allowance from this system at the same time under this subsection. To be
eligible for an allowance the lawful surviving spouse of a retired member shall
have been married to the member prior to the member's retirement and
continuously thereafter until the date of the member's death or shall have been
married to the retired member at least two years prior to the member's death. The
allowance paid to the lawful spouse may be divided with an ex spouse of the
member by a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) incident to a
divorce occurring after July 1, 2002. The dissolution order must specifically
divide both the member's benefit and any spousal survivor benefit, and must
fully comply with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700.

(3) If a member should
die, either while in service or after retirement, the member's surviving
unmarried children under the age of eighteen years shall be provided for in the
following manner:

(a) If there is a
surviving spouse, each child shall be entitled to a benefit equal to five
percent of the final average salary of the member or retired member. The
combined benefits to the surviving spouse and all children shall not exceed
sixty percent of the final average salary of the member or retired member; and

(b) If there is no
surviving spouse or the spouse should die, the child or children shall be
entitled to a benefit equal to thirty percent of the final average salary of
the member or retired member for one child and an additional ten percent for
each additional child. The combined benefits to the children under this
subsection shall not exceed sixty percent of the final average salary of the
member or retired member. Payments under this subsection shall be prorated
equally among the children, if more than one.

(4) If a member should
die in the line of duty while employed by the Washington state patrol, the
member's surviving children under the age of twenty years and eleven months if attending
any high school, college, university, or vocational or other educational
institution accredited or approved by the state of Washington shall be provided
for in the following manner:

(a) If there is a
surviving spouse, each child shall be entitled to a benefit equal to five
percent of the final average salary of the member. The combined benefits to
the surviving spouse and all children shall not exceed sixty percent of the
final average salary of the member;

(b) If there is no
surviving spouse or the spouse should die, the unmarried child or children
shall be entitled to receive a benefit equal to thirty percent of the final
average salary of the member or retired member for one child and an additional
ten percent for each additional child. The combined benefits to the children
under this subsection shall not exceed sixty percent of the final average
salary. Payments under this subsection shall be prorated equally among the
children, if more than one; and

(c) If a beneficiary
under this subsection reaches the age of twenty-one years during the middle of
a term of enrollment the benefit shall continue until the end of that term.

(5) The provisions of
this section shall apply to members who have been retired on disability as
provided in RCW 43.43.040 if the officer was a member of the Washington state
patrol retirement system at the time of such disability retirement.

Sec. 14. RCW 43.43.271 and 2001 c
329 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member commissioned
on or after January 1, 2003, upon retirement for service as prescribed in RCW
43.43.250 or disability retirement under RCW 43.43.040, shall elect to have the
retirement allowance paid pursuant to the following options, calculated so as
to be actuarially equivalent to each other.

(a) Standard
allowance. A member electing this option shall receive a retirement allowance
payable throughout the member's life. However, if the retiree dies before the
total of the retirement allowance paid to the retiree equals the amount of the
retiree's accumulated contributions at the time of retirement, then the balance
shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust, or
organization as the retiree shall have nominated by written designation duly executed
and filed with the department; or if there be no such designated person or
persons still living at the time of the retiree's death, then to the surviving
spouse; or if there be neither such designated person or persons still living
at the time of death nor a surviving spouse, then to the retiree's legal
representative.

(b) The department
shall adopt rules that allow a member to select a retirement option that pays
the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such portion of the
member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule designates
shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to a designated person.
Such person shall be nominated by the member by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department at the time of retirement. The options
adopted by the department shall include, but are not limited to, a joint and
one hundred percent survivor option and a joint and fifty percent survivor
option.

(2)(a) A member, if
married, must provide the written consent of his or her spouse to the option
selected under this section, except as provided in (b) of this subsection. If
a member is married and both the member and member's spouse do not give written
consent to an option under this section, the department will pay the member a
joint and fifty percent survivor benefit and record the member's spouse as the
beneficiary. This benefit shall be calculated to be actuarially equivalent to
the benefit options available under subsection (1) of this section unless spousal
consent is not required as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) If a copy of a
dissolution order designating a survivor beneficiary under RCW 41.50.790 has
been filed with the department at least thirty days prior to a member's
retirement:

(i) The department
shall honor the designation as if made by the member under subsection (1) of
this section; and

(ii) The spousal
consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(3) No later than
January 1, 2003, the department shall adopt rules that allow a member
additional actuarially equivalent survivor benefit options, and shall include,
but are not limited to:

(a)(i) A retired member
who retired without designating a survivor beneficiary shall have the
opportunity to designate their spouse from a postretirement marriage as a
survivor during a one-year period beginning one year after the date of the
postretirement marriage provided the retirement allowance payable to the
retiree is not subject to periodic payments pursuant to a property division
obligation as provided for in RCW 41.50.670.

(ii) A member who
entered into a postretirement marriage prior to the effective date of the rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection and satisfies the conditions of (a)(i) of
this subsection shall have one year to designate their spouse as a survivor
beneficiary following the adoption of the rules.

(b) A retired member
who elected to receive a reduced retirement allowance under this section and
designated a nonspouse as survivor beneficiary shall have the opportunity to
remove the survivor designation and have their future benefit adjusted.

(c) The department may
make an additional charge, if necessary, to ensure that the benefits provided
under this subsection remain actuarially equivalent.

(4) No later than
July 1, 2003, the department shall adopt rules to permit:

(a) A court-approved
property settlement incident to a court decree of dissolution made before
retirement to provide that benefits payable to a member who has completed at
least five years of service and the member's divorcing spouse be divided into
two separate benefits payable over the life of each spouse.

The member shall have
available the benefit options of subsection (1) of this section upon
retirement, and if remarried at the time of retirement remains subject to the
spousal consent requirements of subsection (2) of this section. Any reductions
of the member's benefit subsequent to the division into two separate benefits
shall be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.

The nonmember ex
spouse shall be eligible to commence receiving their separate benefit upon
reaching the ages provided in RCW 43.43.250(2) and after filing a written
application with the department.

(b) A court-approved
property settlement incident to a court decree of dissolution made after
retirement may only divide the benefit into two separate benefits payable over
the life of each spouse if the nonmember ex spouse was selected as a survivor
beneficiary at retirement.

The retired member
may later choose the survivor benefit options available in subsection (3) of
this section. Any actuarial reductions subsequent to the division into two separate
benefits shall be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.

Both the retired
member and the nonmember divorced spouse shall be eligible to commence
receiving their separate benefits upon filing a copy of the dissolution order
with the department in accordance with RCW 41.50.670.

(c) The
department may make an additional charge or adjustment if necessary to ensure
that the separate benefits provided under this subsection are actuarially
equivalent to the benefits payable prior to the decree of dissolution.

---
END ---