BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.32 RCW under subchapter heading "provisions applicable to
plan 1, plan 2, and plan 3" to read as follows:

Upon attainment of age
seventy and one‑half, an employed member may, subject to this section,
apply for the retirement benefit the member is otherwise eligible to receive.
The retirement benefit begins to accrue on the first day of the calendar month
following the month that a member applies for a retirement benefit and has attained
age seventy and one-half. The benefit is calculated in accordance with the
rules of the member's plan, except that the member may continue to be
employed. Upon retirement the retiree may no longer make contributions, nor
receive service credit, for future periods of employment while receiving his or
her retirement allowance.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.32.263 and 1991 c
35 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

A member of the
retirement system who is a member of the state legislature or a state official
eligible for the combined pension and annuity provided by RCW 41.32.497((,))
or 41.32.498((, as now or hereafter amended shall have)) has the
option at the beginning of each term of office to either end membership and
apply to the department to begin receipt of their allowance, or to resume
membership and contribution to the plan.

A member of the
state legislature or a state official who resumes membership shall have
deductions taken from his or her salary in the amount of seven and one-half
percent of earnable compensation and that service credit shall be established
with the retirement system while such deductions are reported to the retirement
system, unless he or she has by reason of his or her employment become a
contributing member of another public retirement system in the state of
Washington. Such elected official who has retired or otherwise terminated his
or her public school service may then elect to terminate his or her membership
in the retirement system and receive retirement benefits while continuing to
serve as an elected official. A member of the retirement system who had
previous service as an elected or appointed official, for which he or she did
not contribute to the retirement system, may receive credit for such
legislative service unless he or she has received credit for that service in
another state retirement system, upon making contributions in such amounts as shall
be determined by the ((board of trustees)) director.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.32.010 and 1997 c
254 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1)(a)
"Accumulated contributions" for plan 1 members, means the sum of all
regular annuity contributions and, except for the purpose of withdrawal at the
time of retirement, any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2) with regular
interest thereon.

(b) "Accumulated
contributions" for plan 2 members, means the sum of all contributions
standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the regular
interest thereon.

(2) "Actuarial equivalent"
means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of such mortality
tables and regulations as shall be adopted by the director and regular
interest.

(3) "Annuity"
means the moneys payable per year during life by reason of accumulated
contributions of a member.

(4) "Member
reserve" means the fund in which all of the accumulated contributions of
members are held.

(5)(a)
"Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter.

(b)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means any person in
receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter
resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.

(6)
"Contract" means any agreement for service and compensation between a
member and an employer.

(7) "Creditable
service" means membership service plus prior service for which credit is
allowable. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(8)
"Dependent" means receiving one‑half or more of support from a
member.

(9) "Disability
allowance" means monthly payments during disability. This subsection shall
apply only to plan 1 members.

(10)(a) "Earnable
compensation" for plan 1 members, means:

(i) All salaries and
wages paid by an employer to an employee member of the retirement system for
personal services rendered during a fiscal year. In all cases where
compensation includes maintenance the employer shall fix the value of that part
of the compensation not paid in money.

(ii) "Earnable
compensation" for plan 1 members also includes the following actual or
imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(A) Retroactive
payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a
position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement
in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or
wages which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered earnable compensation and the individual shall receive the
equivalent service credit.

(B) If a leave of
absence, without pay, is taken by a member for the purpose of serving as a
member of the state legislature, and such member has served in the legislature
five or more years, the salary which would have been received for the position
from which the leave of absence was taken shall be considered as compensation
earnable if the employee's contribution thereon is paid by the employee. In
addition, where a member has been a member of the state legislature for five or
more years, earnable compensation for the member's two highest compensated
consecutive years of service shall include a sum not to exceed thirty‑six
hundred dollars for each of such two consecutive years, regardless of whether
or not legislative service was rendered during those two years.

(iii) For members
employed less than full time under written contract with a school district, or
community college district, in an instructional position, for which the member
receives service credit of less than one year in all of the years used to
determine the earnable compensation used for computing benefits due under RCW
41.32.497, 41.32.498, and 41.32.520, the member may elect to have earnable
compensation defined as provided in RCW 41.32.345. For the purposes of this
subsection, the term "instructional position" means a position in
which more than seventy‑five percent of the member's time is spent as a
classroom instructor (including office hours), a librarian, or a counselor.
Earnable compensation shall be so defined only for the purpose of the
calculation of retirement benefits and only as necessary to insure that members
who receive fractional service credit under RCW 41.32.270 receive benefits
proportional to those received by members who have received full‑time
service credit.

(iv) "Earnable
compensation" does not include:

(A) Remuneration for
unused sick leave authorized under RCW 41.04.340, 28A.400.210, or 28A.310.490;

(B) Remuneration for
unused annual leave in excess of thirty days as authorized by RCW 43.01.044 and
43.01.041.

(b) "Earnable
compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means salaries or wages
earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services, including
overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under
provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the
United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude lump sum payments for
deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated
annual leave, or any form of severance pay.

"Earnable
compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes the following
actual or imputed payments which, except in the case of (b)(ii)(B) of this
subsection, are not paid for personal services:

(i) Retroactive
payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a
position or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement
in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or
wages which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered earnable compensation, to the extent provided above, and the
individual shall receive the equivalent service credit.

(ii) In any year in
which a member serves in the legislature the member shall have the option of
having such member's earnable compensation be the greater of:

(A) The earnable compensation
the member would have received had such member not served in the legislature;
or

(B) Such member's
actual earnable compensation received for teaching and legislative service
combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement system required
because compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater
than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be paid by
the member for both member and employer contributions.

(11)
"Employer" means the state of Washington, the school district, or any
agency of the state of Washington by which the member is paid.

(12) "Fiscal
year" means a year which begins July 1st and ends June 30th of the
following year.

(13) "Former state
fund" means the state retirement fund in operation for teachers under
chapter 187, Laws of 1923, as amended.

(14) "Local
fund" means any of the local retirement funds for teachers operated in any
school district in accordance with the provisions of chapter 163, Laws of 1917
as amended.

(15) "Member"
means any teacher included in the membership of the retirement system. Also,
any other employee of the public schools who, on July 1, 1947, had not elected
to be exempt from membership and who, prior to that date, had by an authorized
payroll deduction, contributed to the member reserve.

(16) "Membership
service" means service rendered subsequent to the first day of eligibility
of a person to membership in the retirement system: PROVIDED, That where a
member is employed by two or more employers the individual shall receive no
more than one service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple
service is rendered. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to
plan 1 members.

(17)
"Pension" means the moneys payable per year during life from the
pension reserve.

(18) "Pension
reserve" is a fund in which shall be accumulated an actuarial reserve
adequate to meet present and future pension liabilities of the system and from
which all pension obligations are to be paid.

(19) "Prior service"
means service rendered prior to the first date of eligibility to membership in
the retirement system for which credit is allowable. The provisions of this
subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(20) "Prior
service contributions" means contributions made by a member to secure
credit for prior service. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only
to plan 1 members.

(21) "Public
school" means any institution or activity operated by the state of
Washington or any instrumentality or political subdivision thereof employing
teachers, except the University of Washington and Washington State University.

(22) "Regular
contributions" means the amounts required to be deducted from the
compensation of a member and credited to the member's individual account in the
member reserve. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(23) "Regular
interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(24)(a)
"Retirement allowance" for plan 1 members, means monthly payments
based on the sum of annuity and pension, or any optional benefits payable in
lieu thereof.

(b) "Retirement
allowance" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means monthly payments to a
retiree or beneficiary as provided in this chapter.

(25) "Retirement
system" means the Washington state teachers' retirement system.

(26)(a)
"Service" for plan 1 members means the time during which a member has
been employed by an employer for compensation.

(i) If a member is
employed by two or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one
service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service is
rendered.

(ii) As authorized by
RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of sick leave may be creditable as
service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW
41.32.470.

(iii) As authorized in
RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers
teachers in public schools may be applied solely for the purpose of determining
eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(b) "Service"
for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means periods of employment by a member for one
or more employers for which earnable compensation is earned subject to the
following conditions:

(i) A member employed
in an eligible position or as a substitute shall receive one service credit
month for each month of September through August of the following year if he or
she earns earnable compensation for eight hundred ten or more hours during that
period and is employed during nine of those months, except that a member may
not receive credit for any period prior to the member's employment in an
eligible position except as provided in RCW 41.32.812 and 41.50.132;

(ii) If a member is
employed either in an eligible position or as a substitute teacher for nine
months of the twelve month period between September through August of the
following year but earns earnable compensation for less than eight hundred ten
hours but for at least six hundred thirty hours, he or she will receive one‑half
of a service credit month for each month of the twelve month period;

(iii) All other members
in an eligible position or as a substitute teacher shall receive service credit
as follows:

(A) A service credit
month is earned in those calendar months where earnable compensation is earned
for ninety or more hours;

(B) A half-service
credit month is earned in those calendar months where earnable compensation is
earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours; and

(C) A quarter-service
credit month is earned in those calendar months where earnable compensation is
earned for less than seventy hours.

(iv) Any person who is
a member of the teachers' retirement system and who is elected or appointed to
a state elective position may continue to be a member of the retirement system
and continue to receive a service credit month for each of the months in a
state elective position by making the required member contributions. At the
beginning of each term of office a person who is a member of the teachers'
retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 and who is elected or appointed to a state
elective position has the option either to resume membership or to end
membership in the retirement system and if otherwise eligible begin their
retirement allowance.

(v) When an individual
is employed by two or more employers the individual shall only receive one
month's service credit during any calendar month in which multiple service for
ninety or more hours is rendered.

(vi) As authorized by
RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of sick leave may be creditable as
service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW
41.32.470. For purposes of plan 2 and plan 3 "forty-five days" as
used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months. Use of less
than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under this
subsection as follows:

(A) Less than eleven
days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B) Eleven or more days
but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service credit month;

(C) Twenty-two days
equals one service credit month;

(D) More than
twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days equals one and one-quarter
service credit month;

(E) Thirty-three or
more days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-half service credit
month.

(vii) As authorized in
RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers
teachers in public schools may be applied solely for the purpose of determining
eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(viii) The department
shall adopt rules implementing this subsection.

(27) "Service
credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is
equal to one when divided by twelve.

(28) "Service
credit month" means a full service credit month or an accumulation of
partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(29)
"Teacher" means any person qualified to teach who is engaged by a
public school in an instructional, administrative, or supervisory capacity.
The term includes state, educational service district, and school district
superintendents and their assistants and all employees certificated by the
superintendent of public instruction; and in addition thereto any full time
school doctor who is employed by a public school and renders service of an
instructional or educational nature.

(30) "Average
final compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means the member's
average earnable compensation of the highest consecutive sixty service credit
months prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods
constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of
average final compensation except under RCW 41.32.810(2).

(31)
"Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service
rendered to an employer while a member.

(32)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(33)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(34) "State
elective position" means any position held by any person elected or
appointed to state‑wide office or elected or appointed as a member of the
legislature.

(35) "State
actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW
44.44.010(2).

(36) "Substitute
teacher" means:

(a) A teacher who is
hired by an employer to work as a temporary teacher, except for teachers who
are annual contract employees of an employer and are guaranteed a minimum
number of hours; or

(b) Teachers who either
(i) work in ineligible positions for more than one employer or (ii) work in an
ineligible position or positions together with an eligible position.

(37)(a) "Eligible
position" for plan 2 members from June 7, 1990, through September 1, 1991,
means a position which normally requires two or more uninterrupted months of
creditable service during September through August of the following year.

(b) "Eligible
position" for plan 2 and plan 3 on and after September 1, 1991, means a
position that, as defined by the employer, normally requires five or more
months of at least seventy hours of earnable compensation during September
through August of the following year.

(c) For purposes of
this chapter an employer shall not define "position" in such a manner
that an employee's monthly work for that employer is divided into more than one
position.

(d) The elected
position of the superintendent of public instruction is an eligible position.

(38) "Plan 1"
means the teachers' retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and
funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system
prior to October 1, 1977.

(39) "Plan 2"
means the teachers' retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and
funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system on
and after October 1, 1977, and prior to July 1, 1996.

(40) "Plan 3"
means the teachers' retirement system, plan 3 providing the benefits and
funding provisions covering persons who first become members of the system on
and after July 1, 1996, or who transfer under RCW 41.32.817.

(41) "Index"
means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index,
Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all
items compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of
labor.

(42) "Index
A" means the index for the year prior to the determination of a
postretirement adjustment.

(43) "Index
B" means the index for the year prior to index A.

(44) "Index
year" means the earliest calendar year in which the index is more than
sixty percent of index A.

(45) "Adjustment
ratio" means the value of index A divided by index B.

(46) "Annual
increase" means, initially, fifty-nine cents per month per year of service
which amount shall be increased each July 1st by three percent, rounded to the
nearest cent.

(47) "Member
account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan 3 means the
sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member in the defined
contribution portion of plan 3.

(48) "Separation
from service or employment" occurs when a person has terminated all
employment with an employer.

(49) "Employed"
or "employee" means a person who is providing services for
compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the employer's
direction and control over the performance of work. The department shall adopt
rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 41.35 RCW under subchapter heading "provisions applicable to
plan 2 and plan 3" to read as follows:

Upon attainment of age
seventy and one‑half, an employed member may, subject to this section,
apply for the retirement benefit the member is otherwise eligible to receive.
The retirement benefit begins to accrue on the first day of the calendar month
following the month that a member applies for a retirement benefit and has
attained age seventy and one-half. The benefit is calculated in accordance
with the rules of the member's plan, except that the member may continue to be
employed. Upon retirement the retiree may no longer make contributions, nor
receive service credit, for future periods of employment while receiving his or
her retirement allowance.

Sec. 5. RCW 41.35.030 and 1998 c
341 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Membership in the
retirement system shall consist of all regularly compensated classified
employees and appointive and elective officials of employers, as defined in
this chapter, with the following exceptions:

(1) Persons in
ineligible positions;

(2)(a) Persons holding
elective offices or persons appointed directly by the governor: PROVIDED, That
such persons shall have the option of applying for membership during such
periods of employment: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That any persons holding or who
have held elective offices or persons appointed by the governor who are members
in the retirement system and who have, prior to becoming such members,
previously held an elective office, and did not at the start of ((such
initial or successive terms)) their prior term of office exercise
their option to become members, may apply for membership to be effective during
((such)) each term or terms of office, and shall be allowed to
establish the service credit applicable to ((such)) each term or
terms of office upon payment of the employee contributions therefor by the
employee with interest as determined by the director and employer contributions
therefor by the employer or employee with interest as determined by the
director: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That all contributions with interest submitted
by the employee under this subsection shall be placed in the employee's
individual account in the employee's savings fund and be treated as any other
contribution made by the employee, with the exception that any contributions
submitted by the employee in payment of the employer's obligation, together
with the interest the director may apply to the employer's contribution, shall
not be considered part of the member's annuity for any purpose except
withdrawal of contributions;

(b) A member holding
elective office who has elected to apply for membership pursuant to (a) of this
subsection and who later wishes to be eligible for a retirement allowance shall
have the option of ending his or her membership in the retirement system. A
member wishing to end his or her membership under this subsection must file on
a form supplied by the department a statement indicating that the member agrees
to irrevocably abandon any claim for service for future periods served as an
elected official. A member who receives more than fifteen thousand dollars per
year in compensation for his or her elective service, adjusted annually for
inflation by the director, is not eligible for the option provided by this
subsection (2)(b);

(c) A member holding
state elective office or directly appointed by the governor who wishes to be
eligible for a retirement allowance has the option of ending his or her
membership in the system. A member wishing to end his or her membership under
this subsection must file on a form supplied by the department a statement
indicating that the member agrees to irrevocably abandon any claim for service
for the duration of their current term of elected or appointed office;

(3) Retirement system
retirees: PROVIDED, That following reemployment in an eligible position, a
retiree may elect to prospectively become a member of the retirement system if
otherwise eligible;

(4) Persons enrolled in
state-approved apprenticeship programs, authorized under chapter 49.04 RCW, and
who are employed by employers to earn hours to complete such apprenticeship
programs, if the employee is a member of a union-sponsored retirement plan and
is making contributions to such a retirement plan or if the employee is a
member of a Taft-Hartley retirement plan;

(5) Persons rendering
professional services to an employer on a fee, retainer, or contract basis or
when the income from these services is less than fifty percent of the gross
income received from the person's practice of a profession;

(6) Employees who (a)
are not citizens of the United States, (b) do not reside in the United States,
and (c) perform duties outside of the United States;

(7) Employees who (a)
are not citizens of the United States, (b) are not covered by chapter 41.48
RCW, (c) are not excluded from membership under this chapter or chapter 41.04
RCW, (d) are residents of this state, and (e) make an irrevocable election to be
excluded from membership, in writing, which is submitted to the director within
thirty days after employment in an eligible position;

(8) Employees who are
citizens of the United States and who reside and perform duties for an employer
outside of the United States: PROVIDED, That unless otherwise excluded under
this chapter or chapter 41.04 RCW, the employee may apply for membership (a)
within thirty days after employment in an eligible position and membership
service credit shall be granted from the first day of membership service, and
(b) after this thirty-day period, but membership service credit shall be
granted only if payment is made for the noncredited membership service under
RCW 41.50.165(2), otherwise service shall be from the date of application.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 41.40 RCW under subchapter heading "provisions applicable to
plan 1, plan 2, and plan 3" to read as follows:

Upon attainment of age
seventy and one‑half, an employed member may, subject to this section,
apply for the retirement benefit the member is otherwise eligible to receive.
The retirement benefit begins to accrue on the first day of the calendar month
following the month that a member applies for a retirement benefit and has
attained age seventy and one-half. The benefit is calculated in accordance
with the rules of the member's plan, except that the member may continue to be
employed. Upon retirement the retiree may no longer make contributions, nor
receive service credit, for future periods of employment while receiving his or
her retirement allowance.

Sec. 7. RCW 41.40.023 and 2001 c
37 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Membership in the
retirement system shall consist of all regularly compensated employees and
appointive and elective officials of employers, as defined in this chapter,
with the following exceptions:

(1) Persons in
ineligible positions;

(2) Employees of the
legislature except the officers thereof elected by the members of the senate
and the house and legislative committees, unless membership of such employees
be authorized by the said committee;

(3)(a) Persons holding
elective offices or persons appointed directly by the governor: PROVIDED, That
such persons shall have the option of applying for membership during such
periods of employment: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That any persons holding or who
have held elective offices or persons appointed by the governor who are members
in the retirement system and who have, prior to becoming such members,
previously held an elective office, and did not at the start of ((such
initial or successive terms)) their prior term of office exercise
their option to become members, may apply for membership to be effective during
((such)) each term or terms of office, and shall be allowed to
establish the service credit applicable to ((such)) each term or
terms of office upon payment of the employee contributions therefor by the
employee with interest as determined by the director and employer contributions
therefor by the employer or employee with interest as determined by the
director: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That all contributions with interest submitted
by the employee under this subsection shall be placed in the employee's
individual account in the employee's savings fund and be treated as any other
contribution made by the employee, with the exception that any contributions
submitted by the employee in payment of the employer's obligation, together
with the interest the director may apply to the employer's contribution, shall
not be considered part of the member's annuity for any purpose except
withdrawal of contributions;

(b) A member holding
elective office who has elected to apply for membership pursuant to (a) of this
subsection and who later wishes to be eligible for a retirement allowance shall
have the option of ending his or her membership in the retirement system. A
member wishing to end his or her membership under this subsection must file, on
a form supplied by the department, a statement indicating that the member
agrees to irrevocably abandon any claim for service for future periods served
as an elected official. A member who receives more than fifteen thousand
dollars per year in compensation for his or her elective service, adjusted
annually for inflation by the director, is not eligible for the option provided
by this subsection (3)(b);

(c) A member holding
state elective office or directly appointed by the governor who wishes to be
eligible for a retirement allowance has the option of ending his or her
membership in the system. A member wishing to end his or her membership under
this subsection must file on a form supplied by the department a statement
indicating that the member agrees to irrevocably abandon any claim for service
for the duration of their current term of elected or appointed office;

(4) Employees holding
membership in, or receiving pension benefits under, any retirement plan
operated wholly or in part by an agency of the state or political subdivision
thereof, or who are by reason of their current employment contributing to or
otherwise establishing the right to receive benefits from any such retirement
plan except as follows:

(a) In any case where
the retirement system has in existence an agreement with another retirement
system in connection with exchange of service credit or an agreement whereby
members can retain service credit in more than one system, such an employee
shall be allowed membership rights should the agreement so provide;

(b) An employee shall
be allowed membership if otherwise eligible while receiving survivor's
benefits;

(c) An employee shall
not either before or after June 7, 1984, be excluded from membership or denied
service credit pursuant to this subsection solely on account of: (i)
Membership in the plan created under chapter 2.14 RCW; or (ii) enrollment under
the relief and compensation provisions or the pension provisions of the
volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension fund under chapter 41.24 RCW;

(d) Except as provided
in RCW 41.40.109, on or after July 25, 1999, an employee shall not be excluded
from membership or denied service credit pursuant to this subsection solely on
account of participation in a defined contribution pension plan qualified under
section 401 of the internal revenue code;

(e) Employees who have
been reported in the retirement system prior to July 25, 1999, and who
participated during the same period of time in a defined contribution pension
plan qualified under section 401 of the internal revenue code and operated
wholly or in part by the employer, shall not be excluded from previous
retirement system membership and service credit on account of such
participation;

(5) Patient and inmate
help in state charitable, penal, and correctional institutions;

(6) "Members"
of a state veterans' home or state soldiers' home;

(7) Persons employed by
an institution of higher learning or community college, primarily as an
incident to and in furtherance of their education or training, or the education
or training of a spouse;

(8) Employees of an
institution of higher learning or community college during the period of
service necessary to establish eligibility for membership in the retirement
plans operated by such institutions;

(9) Persons rendering
professional services to an employer on a fee, retainer, or contract basis or
when the income from these services is less than fifty percent of the gross
income received from the person's practice of a profession;

(10) Persons appointed
after April 1, 1963, by the liquor control board as agency vendors;

(11) Employees of a
labor guild, association, or organization: PROVIDED, That elective officials
and employees of a labor guild, association, or organization which qualifies as
an employer within this chapter shall have the option of applying for
membership;

(12) Retirement system
retirees: PROVIDED, That following reemployment in an eligible position, a
retiree may elect to prospectively become a member of the retirement system if
otherwise eligible;

(13) Persons employed
by or appointed or elected as an official of a first class city that has its
own retirement system: PROVIDED, That any member elected or appointed to an
elective office on or after April 1, 1971, shall have the option of continuing
as a member of this system in lieu of becoming a member of the city system. A
member who elects to continue as a member of this system shall pay the
appropriate member contributions and the city shall pay the employer
contributions at the rates prescribed by this chapter. The city shall also
transfer to this system all of such member's accumulated contributions together
with such further amounts as necessary to equal all employee and employer
contributions which would have been paid into this system on account of such
service with the city and thereupon the member shall be granted credit for all
such service. Any city that becomes an employer as defined in RCW 41.40.010(4)
as the result of an individual's election under this subsection shall not be
required to have all employees covered for retirement under the provisions of
this chapter. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a city of the first
class with its own retirement system from: (a) Transferring all of its current
employees to the retirement system established under this chapter, or (b)
allowing newly hired employees the option of continuing coverage under the
retirement system established by this chapter.

Notwithstanding any
other provision of this chapter, persons transferring from employment with a
first class city of over four hundred thousand population that has its own
retirement system to employment with the state department of agriculture may
elect to remain within the retirement system of such city and the state shall
pay the employer contributions for such persons at like rates as prescribed for
employers of other members of such system;

(14) Employees who (a)
are not citizens of the United States, (b) do not reside in the United States,
and (c) perform duties outside of the United States;

(15) Employees who (a)
are not citizens of the United States, (b) are not covered by chapter 41.48
RCW, (c) are not excluded from membership under this chapter or chapter 41.04
RCW, (d) are residents of this state, and (e) make an irrevocable election to
be excluded from membership, in writing, which is submitted to the director
within thirty days after employment in an eligible position;

(16) Employees who are
citizens of the United States and who reside and perform duties for an employer
outside of the United States: PROVIDED, That unless otherwise excluded under
this chapter or chapter 41.04 RCW, the employee may apply for membership (a)
within thirty days after employment in an eligible position and membership
service credit shall be granted from the first day of membership service, and
(b) after this thirty-day period, but membership service credit shall be
granted only if payment is made for the noncredited membership service under
RCW 41.50.165(2), otherwise service shall be from the date of application;

(17) The city manager
or chief administrative officer of a city or town, other than a retiree, who
serves at the pleasure of an appointing authority: PROVIDED, That such persons
shall have the option of applying for membership within thirty days from date
of their appointment to such positions. Persons serving in such positions as
of April 4, 1986, shall continue to be members in the retirement system unless
they notify the director in writing prior to December 31, 1986, of their desire
to withdraw from membership in the retirement system. A member who withdraws
from membership in the system under this section shall receive a refund of the
member's accumulated contributions.

Persons serving in such
positions who have not opted for membership within the specified thirty days,
may do so by paying the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2) for the period
from the date of their appointment to the date of acceptance into membership;

(18) Persons serving
as: (a) The chief administrative officer of a public utility district as
defined in RCW 54.16.100; (b) the chief administrative officer of a port
district formed under chapter 53.04 RCW; or (c) the chief administrative
officer of a county who serves at the pleasure of an appointing authority:
PROVIDED, That such persons shall have the option of applying for membership
within thirty days from the date of their appointment to such positions.
Persons serving in such positions as of July 25, 1999, shall continue to be
members in the retirement system unless they notify the director in writing
prior to December 31, 1999, of their desire to withdraw from membership in the
retirement system. A member who withdraws from membership in the system under
this section shall receive a refund of the member's accumulated contributions
upon termination of employment or as otherwise consistent with the plan's tax
qualification status as defined in internal revenue code section 401.

Persons serving in such
positions who have not opted for membership within the specified thirty days,
may do so at a later date by paying the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2)
for the period from the date of their appointment to the date of acceptance
into membership;

(19) Persons enrolled
in state-approved apprenticeship programs, authorized under chapter 49.04 RCW,
and who are employed by local governments to earn hours to complete such
apprenticeship programs, if the employee is a member of a union-sponsored
retirement plan and is making contributions to such a retirement plan or if the
employee is a member of a Taft-Hartley retirement plan;

(20)
Beginning on July 22, 2001, persons employed exclusively as trainers or
trainees in resident apprentice training programs operated by housing
authorities authorized under chapter 35.82 RCW, (a) if the trainer or trainee
is a member of a union-sponsored retirement plan and is making contributions to
such a retirement plan or (b) if the employee is a member of a Taft-Hartley
retirement plan.

---
END ---