BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

Sec. 101. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 101
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 28,313,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((28,497,000))

27,687,000

Department of Retirement
Systems Expense Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 45,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((56,855,000))

56,045,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $25,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for allocation to
Project Citizen, a program of the national conference of state legislatures to
promote student civic involvement.

(2) $15,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided
for the legislature to continue the services of expert counsel on legal and
policy issues relating to services for persons with developmental disabilities.

Sec. 102. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 102
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SENATE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 22,863,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((23,999,000))

23,375,000

Department of Retirement
Systems Expense Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 45,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((46,907,000))

46,283,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $25,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for allocation to
Project Citizen, a program of the national conference of state legislatures to
promote student civic involvement.

(2) $15,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided
for the legislature to continue the services of expert counsel on legal and
policy issues relating to services for persons with developmental disabilities.

Sec. 103. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 103
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT
AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((2,436,000))

2,191,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,938,000))

1,968,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((4,374,000))

4,159,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($150,000))
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and (($75,000)) $275,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the joint
legislative audit and review committee to conduct program evaluations and
data analysis of the developmental disabilities program. These studies shall
include an evaluation of the ((client)) outcomes of clients in
the high school transition program ((operated by the department of social
and health services division of developmental disabilities. The study shall
identify the different approaches that have been used in providing transition
services and whether some approaches are more or less successful in helping
young adults with developmental disabilities achieve greater levels of
independence. The study shall evaluate how transition programs reduce the
level of support provided to clients as they achieve greater levels of
independence,)) and whether the program helps clients achieve greater
levels of independence and reduces the level of support services provided to
clients as they achieve greater levels of independence. An analysis of service
utilization and eligibility determination for clients receiving services from
the developmental disabilities program shall be conducted in cooperation with
interim studies by legislative fiscal and policy staff. Preliminary study
results shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature
by December 1, 2002. The final report shall be submitted no later than June
30, 2003.

(2) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the joint legislative audit and review committee to conduct a capacity
planning study of the capital facilities of the state school for the deaf. The
committee's study shall be carried out in conjunction with the study of
educational service delivery models conducted by the state institute for public
policy. The study shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by September 30, 2002.

(3) (($35,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely for))
The joint legislative audit and review committee ((to)) shall
conduct a review of water conservancy boards. The review shall include an
assessment of the operating costs of existing boards; the sources of funding
for board operations; sources of in-kind support for board operations;
assessment of the value of water rights subject to change or transfer
decisions; the range of costs of processing water right transfer applications
by the boards as well as by the department of ecology for applications filed
directly with the department; the costs to the department of training,
assistance, and review of board recommendations on applications; board
membership and board recordkeeping; and public participation procedures for
both the water conservancy boards and the department of ecology. The committee
shall submit its review by ((January 1, 2003)) December 1, 2004,
to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature.

(4) $40,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely for a
follow-up review to report number 98-3, the performance audit of the department
of corrections. The follow-up study shall include but not be limited to a review
of:

(a) Community
supervision activities performed by the department;

(b) The implementation
of risk-based classification and community placement models;

(c) The early
implementation of the offender accountability act; and

(d) The cost impacts of
the risk-based models and the offender accountability act.

The committee shall
consult with the Washington state institute for public policy regarding data
and findings from the institute's current studies on these issues. A report of
the follow-up study shall be submitted to the relevant policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 21, 2001. Upon the completion of the
follow-up review, the committee shall make a determination whether an
additional phase of study is needed. If further study is indicated, the
committee shall submit to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature its plan and cost estimate for such study by March 29, 2002.

(5) $140,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided for a
study of children's mental health in Washington. The study shall include but
not be limited to:

(a) A review of plans
and services for children, including those for early periodic screening,
diagnosis, and treatment;

(b) A review of the
implementation of the plans;

(c) A review of the
availability and reliability of fiscal, program, and outcome data relating to
mental health services provided to children; and

(d) A survey of mental
health services for children among the state's regional support networks.

The committee shall
make recommendations, as appropriate, for the improvement of services and
system performance, including the need for performance and client outcome
measures. The committee may contract for consulting services in conducting the
study. The committee shall submit a report to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature by July 1, 2002.

(6) Within the amounts
provided in this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee
shall conduct a study of the Washington management service. The study shall
include findings regarding (a) growth in the number of positions in the
Washington management service, (b) growth in salary levels and structure since
the Washington management service's inception, and (c) other compensation
practices used within the Washington management service. The department of
personnel shall cooperate with the committee in conducting the study and
provide information as requested by the committee. The committee shall provide
a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 31, 2001.

(7) Within the amounts
provided in this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee
shall review all aspects of the mental health prevalence study completed in
accordance with section 204 of this act, including but not limited to the
contractor selection process, if any; the study design and workplan; the
implementation of the study; and the draft and final reports.

(8) The committee shall
study and report on pipeline safety as provided in section 149 of this act.

Sec. 104. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 104
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION
AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,329,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,462,000))

1,418,000

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 203,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((2,994,000))

2,950,000

Sec. 105. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 105
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE
ACTUARY

Department of Retirement
Systems Expense Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((1,923,000))

2,054,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The joint
committee on pension policy, in collaboration with various interested parties,
shall study issues of pension governance and recommend legislation for
consideration in the 2002 legislative session.

Sec. 106. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 106
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE
SYSTEMS COMMITTEE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 6,421,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((7,043,000))

6,861,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((13,464,000))

13,282,000

Sec. 107. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 107
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 3,909,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((4,038,000))

3,923,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((7,947,000))

7,832,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $41,000
of the general fund fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $43,000 of the general
fund fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided solely for the uniform
legislation commission.

Sec. 108. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 109
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPREME COURT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((5,423,000))

5,500,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((5,510,000))

5,495,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((10,933,000))

10,995,000

Sec. 109. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 110
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LAW LIBRARY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,982,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,983,000))

1,924,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((3,965,000))

3,906,000

Sec. 110. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 111
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((12,746,000))

12,894,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((12,878,000))

12,749,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((25,624,000))

25,643,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $505,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $606,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for lease increases associated with the division I facility. ((Within
the funds provided in this subsection, the court of appeals shall conduct a
space planning study exploring options dealing with remodeling existing space
to accommodate needs and evaluating the cost and benefits of moving to another
location.))

(2) $168,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $159,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for providing compensation adjustments to nonjudicial staff of the court
of appeals. Within the funds provided in this subsection, the court of appeals
shall determine the specific positions to receive compensation adjustments
based on recruitment and retention difficulties, new duties or responsibilities
assigned, and salary inversion or compression within the court of appeals.

Sec. 111. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 112
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL
CONDUCT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 955,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((969,000))

940,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,924,000))

1,895,000

Sec. 112. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 113
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE
COURTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((14,247,000))

14,900,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((14,386,000))

15,388,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((29,634,000))

27,251,000

Judicial Information
Systems Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 27,758,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((86,025,000))

85,297,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in
the judicial information systems account appropriation shall be used for the
operations and maintenance of technology systems that improve services provided
by the supreme court, the court of appeals, the office of public defense, and
the administrator for the courts.

(2) No moneys
appropriated in this section may be expended by the administrator for the
courts for payments in excess of fifty percent of the employer contribution on
behalf of superior court judges for insurance and health care plans and federal
social security and medicare and medical aid benefits. As required by Article
IV, section 13 of the state Constitution and 1996 Attorney General's Opinion
No. 2, it is the intent of the legislature that the costs of these employer
contributions shall be shared equally between the state and county or counties
in which the judges serve. The administrator for the courts shall continue to
implement procedures for the collection and disbursement of these employer
contributions. During each fiscal year in the 2001-03 biennium, the office of
the administrator for the courts shall send written notice to the office of
community development in the department of community, trade, and economic
development when each county pays its fifty percent share for the year.

(3) $223,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
gender and justice commission.

(4) $308,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the minority
and justice commission.

(5) $278,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $285,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $263,000 of
the public safety and education account appropriation are provided solely for
the workload associated with tax warrants and other state cases filed in
Thurston county.

(6) $750,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $750,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for court-appointed special advocates in dependency matters. The
administrator for the courts, after consulting with the association of juvenile
court administrators and the association of court-appointed special
advocate/guardian ad litem programs, shall distribute the funds to volunteer
court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad litem programs. The distribution
of funding shall be based on the number of children who need volunteer
court-appointed special advocate representation and shall be equally accessible
to all volunteer court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad litem programs.
The administrator for the courts shall not retain more than six percent of
total funding to cover administrative or any other agency costs.

(7) $750,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for judicial program enhancements. Within the funding provided in this
subsection, the administrator for the courts, in consultation with the supreme
court, shall determine the program or programs to receive an enhancement.
Among the programs that may be funded from the amount provided in this
subsection are unified family courts.

(8) (($1,618,000 of
the public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for increases for juror pay. The office of the administrator for the
courts may contract with local governments to provide additional juror pay.
The contract shall provide that the local government is responsible for the
first ten dollars of juror compensation for each day or partial day of jury
service, and the state shall reimburse the local government for any additional
compensation, excluding the first day, up to a maximum of fifteen dollars per
day.)) $1,800,000 of the judicial information systems account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for improvements and enhancements to the
judicial information systems. This funding shall only be expended after the
office of the administrator for the courts certifies to the office of financial
management that there will be at least a $1,000,000 ending fund balance in the
judicial information systems account at the end of the 2001-03 biennium.

Sec. 113. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 114
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 600,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 400,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((12,626,000))

12,247,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((13,226,000))

13,247,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($233,000))
$204,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is
provided solely to increase the reimbursement for private attorneys providing
constitutionally mandated indigent defense in nondeath penalty cases.

(2) $51,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of chapter 303, Laws of 1999 (court funding).

(3) Amounts provided
from the public safety and education account appropriation in this section
include funding for investigative services in death penalty personal restraint
petitions.

(4) The ((entire))
general fund‑-state appropriations ((is)) are
provided solely for the continuation of a dependency and termination legal
representation funding pilot program.

(a) The goal of the
pilot program shall be to enhance the quality of legal representation in
dependency and termination hearings, thereby reducing the number of
continuances requested by contract attorneys, including those based on the
unavailability of defense counsel. To meet the goal, the pilot shall include
the following components:

(i) A maximum caseload
requirement of 90 dependency and termination cases per full-time attorney;

(ii) Implementation of
enhanced defense attorney practice standards, including but not limited to
those related to reasonable case preparation and the delivery of adequate
client advice, as developed by Washington state public defense attorneys and
included in the office of public defense December 1999 report Costs of
Defense and Children's Representation in Dependency and Termination Hearings;

(iii) Use of investigative
and expert services in appropriate cases; and

(iv) Effective
implementation of indigency screening of all dependency and termination
parents, guardians, and legal custodians represented by appointed counsel.

(b) The pilot program
shall be established in one eastern and one western Washington juvenile court.

(c) The director shall
contract for an independent evaluation of the pilot program benefits and
costs. A final evaluation shall be submitted to the governor and the fiscal
committees of the legislature no later than February 1, 2002.

(d) The chair of the
office of public defense advisory committee shall appoint an implementation
committee to:

(i) Develop criteria
for a statewide program to improve dependency and termination defense;

(ii) Examine caseload
impacts to the courts resulting from improved defense practices; and

(iii) Identify methods
for the efficient use of expert services and means by which parents may
effectively access services.

If sufficient funds are
available, the office of public defense shall contract with the Washington
state institute for public policy to research how reducing dependency and
termination case delays affects foster care and to identify factors that are
reducing the number of family reunifications that occur in dependency and
termination cases.

(5) $50,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the evaluation required in chapter 92, Laws of 2000 (DNA testing).

(6) $235,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the office of public defense to contract with an existing public
defender association to establish a capital defense assistance center.

Sec. 114. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 115
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 4,537,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((4,524,000))

4,247,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 219,000

Water Quality Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,908,000))

3,726,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((13,188,000))

12,729,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($3,908,000))
$3,726,000 of the water quality account appropriation and $219,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the Puget
Sound water quality action team to implement the Puget Sound work plan and
agency action items PSAT-01 through PSAT-05.

(2) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and $100,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are)) is
provided solely for the salmon recovery office to support the efforts of the
independent science panel.

Sec. 115. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 117
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE
COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,910,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,903,000))

1,831,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((3,813,000))

3,741,000

Sec. 116. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 118
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((10,513,000))

10,175,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((8,707,000))

6,351,000

Archives and Records
Management Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((7,295,000))

7,796,000

Archives and Records
Management Account‑-Private/

Local Appropriation........................ $ ((3,860,000))

4,572,000

Department of Personnel
Service Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((719,000))

701,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((31,094,000))

29,595,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($2,296,000))
$1,796,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of
primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory
recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed only for those odd-year
election costs that the secretary of state validates as eligible for
reimbursement.

(2) (($2,193,000))
$2,143,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and (($2,712,000)) $2,578,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the verification of
initiative and referendum petitions, maintenance of related voter registration
records, and the publication and distribution of the voters and candidates
pamphlet.

(3) $125,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($125,000))
$118,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for legal advertising of state measures under RCW
29.27.072.

(4)(a) $1,944,004 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,986,772
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce
gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and other
events of statewide significance during the 2001-2003 biennium. An eligible
nonprofit organization must be formed solely for the purpose of, and be
experienced in, providing gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state
government deliberations and other events of statewide significance and must
have received a determination of tax-exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of
the federal internal revenue code. The funding level for each year of the
contract shall be based on the amount provided in this subsection and adjusted
to reflect the implicit price deflator for the previous year. The nonprofit
organization shall be required to raise contributions or commitments to make
contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the
state contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or
partial payment once all criteria in (a) and (b) of this subsection have been
satisfactorily documented.

(b) The legislature
finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to ensure
continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For that
purpose, the secretary of state shall enter into a four-year contract with the
nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage through June 30,
2006.

(c) The nonprofit
organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial
statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success
of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d) No portion of any
amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or
indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i) Attempting to
influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the
state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision
of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of
any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;

(ii) Making
contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii) Providing any:
(A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a
public officer or employee.

(5)(a) $149,316 of the
archives and records management‑-state appropriation and $597,266 of the
archives and records management‑-private/local appropriation are provided
solely for the construction of an eastern regional archives. The amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse if:

(i) The financing
contract for the construction of an eastern regional archives building is not
authorized in the capital budget for the 2001-03 fiscal biennium; or

(ii) Substitute House
Bill No. 1926 (increasing the surcharge on county auditor recording fees) is
not enacted by July 31, 2001.

(b) $613,879 of the
archives and records management‑-state appropriation and $463,102 of the
archives and records management‑-private/local appropriation are provided
solely for the design and establishment of an electronic data archive,
including the acquisition of hardware and software. The amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse if:

(i) The financing
contract for acquisition of technology hardware and software for the electronic
data archive is not authorized in the capital budget for the 2001-03 fiscal
biennium; or

(ii) Substitute House
Bill No. 1926 (increasing the surcharge on county auditor recording fees) is
not enacted by June 30, 2001.

(6) If the financing
contract for expansion of the state records center is not authorized in the
capital budget for fiscal biennium 2001-03, then $641,000 of the archives and
records management account‑-state appropriation shall lapse.

(7) (($867,000))
$1,635,000 of the archives and records management account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for operation of the central microfilming
bureau under RCW 40.14.020(8).

Sec. 117. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 120
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON
ASIAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 233,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((233,000))

201,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((466,000))

434,000

Sec. 118. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 121
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER

State Treasurer's Service
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((12,870,000))

12,676,000

Sec. 119. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 123
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE AUDITOR

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((1,078,000))

778,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,324,000))

1,024,000

State Auditing Services
Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((13,540,000))

13,347,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((15,942,000))

15,149,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Audits of school
districts by the division of municipal corporations shall include findings
regarding the accuracy of: (a) Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience
and education of the district's certified instructional staff, as reported to the
superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.

(2) (($910,000))
$778,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and (($910,000)) $1,024,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for staff and related
costs to verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for
state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state funded
public school programs; establish the specific amount of state funding
adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is not firmly
established in the course of regular public school audits; and to assist the
state special education safety net committee when requested.

Sec. 120. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 125
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 4,811,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((4,806,000))

4,009,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,868,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 840,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,789,000))

1,739,000

Tobacco Prevention and
Control Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 277,000

New Motor Vehicle
Arbitration Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,163,000

Legal Services Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((147,306,000))

146,633,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((163,020,000))

162,340,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The attorney
general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and
actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The
report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days
after the end of each fiscal year.

(2) The attorney
general and the office of financial management shall modify the attorney
general billing system to meet the needs of user agencies for greater
predictability, timeliness, and explanation of how legal services are being
used by the agency. The attorney general shall provide the following
information each month to agencies receiving legal services: (a) The full-time
equivalent attorney services provided for the month; (b) the full-time
equivalent investigator services provided for the month; (c) the full-time
equivalent paralegal services provided for the month; and (d) direct legal
costs, such as filing and docket fees, charged to the agency for the month.

(3) Prior to entering
into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state, that exceeds five
million dollars, the attorney general shall notify the director of financial
management and the chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the
house of representatives committee on appropriations.

(4)(a) $87,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided
solely for the office of the attorney general to prepare a report by October 1,
2002, to the standing committees of the legislature having jurisdiction over
water resources regarding federal and Indian reserved water rights. The
objectives of the report shall be to:

(i) Examine and
characterize the types of water rights issues involved;

(ii) Examine the
approaches of other states to such issues and their results;

(iii) Examine
methods for addressing such issues including, but not limited to,
administrative, judicial, or other methods, or any combinations thereof; and

(iv) Examine
implementation and funding requirements.

(b) Following
receipt of the report, the standing committees of the legislature having
jurisdiction over water resources shall seek and consider the recommendations
of the relevant departments and agencies of the United States, the federally
recognized Indian tribes with water-related interests in the state, and water
users in the state and shall develop recommendations.

Sec. 121. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 126
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST
COUNCIL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 631,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((619,000))

600,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,250,000))

1,231,000

Sec. 122. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 127
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY,
TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((71,083,500))

70,908,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((70,873,500))

61,591,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 173,342,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 7,980,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((10,300,000))

10,014,000

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,911,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 1,500,000

Film and Video Promotion
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 25,000

Building Code Council
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,061,000))

1,226,000

Administrative Contingency
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,777,000

Low-Income Weatherization
Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,292,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((6,081,000))

7,459,000

Manufactured Home
Installation Training Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 256,000

Community Economic
Development Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 113,000

Washington Housing Trust
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((5,597,000))

7,585,000

Public Facility
Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 550,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((354,242,000))

349,529,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) It is the intent of
the legislature that the department of community, trade, and economic
development receive separate programmatic allotments for the office of
community development and the office of trade and economic development. Any
appropriation made to the department of community, trade, and economic
development for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties of either office
shall be credited to the appropriate office.

(2) $3,085,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($3,085,000))
$2,992,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington technology
center. For work essential to the mission of the Washington technology center
and conducted in partnership with universities, the center shall not pay any
increased indirect rate nor increases in other indirect charges above the
absolute amount paid during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium.

(3) $61,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $62,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action
item OCD-01.

(4) $10,403,445 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely for the drug
control and system improvement formula grant program, to be distributed in
state fiscal year 2002 as follows:

(a) $3,603,250 to local
units of government to continue multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;

(b) $620,000 to the department
to continue the drug prosecution assistance program in support of
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;

(c) $1,363,000 to the
Washington state patrol for coordination, investigative, and supervisory
support to the multijurisdictional narcotics task forces and for
methamphetamine education and response;

(d) $200,000 to the
department for grants to support tribal law enforcement needs;

(e) $991,000 to the
department of social and health services, division of alcohol and substance
abuse, for drug courts in eastern and western Washington;

(f) $302,551 to the
department for training and technical assistance of public defenders
representing clients with special needs;

(g) $88,000 to the
department to continue a substance abuse treatment in jails program, to test
the effect of treatment on future criminal behavior;

(h) $697,075 to the
department to continue domestic violence legal advocacy;

(i) $903,000 to the
department of social and health services, juvenile rehabilitation
administration, to continue youth violence prevention and intervention
projects;

(j) $60,000 to the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to complete the state and
local components of the national incident-based reporting system;

(k) $60,000 to the
department for community-based advocacy services to victims of violent crime,
other than sexual assault and domestic violence;

(l) $91,000 to the
department to continue the governor's council on substance abuse;

(m) $99,000 to the
department to continue evaluation of Byrne formula grant programs;

(n) $500,469 to the
office of financial management for criminal history records improvement; and

(o) $825,100 to the
department for required grant administration, monitoring, and reporting on
Byrne formula grant programs.

These amounts represent
the maximum Byrne grant expenditure authority for each program. No program may
expend Byrne grant funds in excess of the amounts provided in this subsection.
If moneys in excess of those appropriated in this subsection become available,
whether from prior or current fiscal year Byrne grant distributions, the
department shall hold these moneys in reserve and may not expend them without
specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried forward and applied to
the pool of moneys available for appropriation for programs and projects in the
succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget request for the succeeding year,
the department shall estimate and request authority to spend any funds
remaining in reserve as a result of this subsection.

(5) $470,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $470,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for rural economic development activities including $200,000 for the
Washington manufacturing service, and $100,000 for business retention and
expansion.

(6) $1,250,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,250,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for grants to operate, repair, and staff shelters for homeless families
with children.

(7) $2,500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,500,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for grants to operate transitional housing for homeless families with
children. The grants may also be used to make partial payments for rental
assistance.

(8) $1,250,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,250,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for consolidated emergency assistance to homeless families with
children.

(9) $205,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $205,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for grants to Washington Columbia river gorge counties to implement
their responsibilities under the national scenic area management plan. Of this
amount, $390,000 is provided for Skamania county and $20,000 is provided for
Clark county.

(10) $698,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $698,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $1,101,000 of
the administrative contingency account appropriation are provided solely for
contracting with associate development organizations to maintain existing programs.

(11) $600,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for sexual
assault prevention and treatment programs.

(12) $680,000 of the
Washington housing trust account appropriation is provided solely to conduct a
pilot project designed to lower infrastructure costs for residential
development.

(13) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided to
the department solely for providing technical assistance to developers of
housing for farmworkers.

(14) $370,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, (($371,000))
$352,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003, and $25,000 of the film and video promotion account appropriation are
provided solely for the film office to bring film and video production to
Washington state.

(15) $22,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
$23,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are)) is provided solely as a matching grant to support the
Washington state senior games. State funding shall be matched with at least an
equal amount of private or local governmental funds.

(16) $500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $500,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for grants to food banks and food distribution centers to increase their
ability to accept, store, and deliver perishable food.

(17) $230,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $230,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and the entire
community economic development account appropriation are provided solely for
support of the developmental disabilities endowment governing board and startup
costs of the endowment program. Startup costs are a loan from the state
general fund and will be repaid from funds within the program as determined by
the governing board. The governing board may use state appropriations to
implement a sliding-scale fee waiver for families earning below 150 percent of
the state median family income. The director of the department, or the
director of the subsequent department of community development, may implement
fees to support the program as provided under RCW 43.330.152.

(18) $880,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
community-based legal advocates to assist sexual assault victims with both
civil and criminal justice issues. If Senate Bill No. 5309 is not enacted by
June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $65,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $65,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for a contract with a food distribution program for communities in the
southwestern portion of the state and for workers impacted by timber and salmon
fishing closures and reductions. The department may not charge administrative
overhead or expenses to the funds provided in this subsection.

(20) $120,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $120,000
of the ((general fund‑‑state)) Washington housing trust
account appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely as one-time
pass-through funding to currently licensed overnight youth shelters. If
Substitute House Bill No. 2060 (low-income housing) is not enacted by June 30,
2002, the fiscal year 2003 appropriation shall be made from the state general
fund.

(21) $1,868,000 of
the Washington housing trust account appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is
provided solely for emergency shelter assistance. If Substitute House Bill No.
2060 (low-income housing) is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the fiscal year 2003
appropriation shall be made from the state general fund.

(22) Repayments
of outstanding loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600, the mortgage and rental
assistance program, shall be remitted to the department, including any current
revolving account balances. The department shall contract with a lender or
contract collection agent to act as a collection agent of the state. The
lender or contract collection agent shall collect payments on outstanding loans,
and deposit them into an interest-bearing account. The funds collected shall
be remitted to the department quarterly. Interest earned in the account may be
retained by the lender or contract collection agent, and shall be considered a
fee for processing payments on behalf of the state. Repayments of loans
granted under this chapter shall be made to the lender or contract collection
agent as long as the loan is outstanding, notwithstanding the repeal of the
chapter.

(((22))) (23)
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are))
is provided solely for the community connections program in Walla Walla.

(((23))) (24)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $100,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided to the office of community development solely for the
purposes of providing assistance to industrial workers who have been displaced
by energy cost-related industrial plant closures in rural counties. For
purposes of this subsection, "rural county" is as defined in RCW
82.14.370(5). The office of community development shall distribute the amount
in this subsection to community agencies that assist the displaced industrial
workers in meeting basic needs including, but not limited to, emergency medical
and dental services, family and mental health counseling, food, energy costs,
mortgage, and rental costs. The department shall not retain more than two
percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administrative costs.

(((24))) (25)
$91,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$91,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for services related to the foreign representative contract for
Japan.

(((25))) (26)
$81,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$81,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for business finance and loan programs.

(((26))) (27)
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is
provided solely for the quick sites initiative program.

(((27))) (28)
$120,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $120,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for operating a business information hotline.

(((28))) (29)
$29,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $29,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
are provided solely for travel expenses associated with the office of trade and
economic development's provision of outreach and technical assistance services
to businesses and local economic development associations.

(((29))) (30)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for information technology enhancements designed to
improve the delivery of agency services to customers.

(31) $15,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided for
the energy division to include the following information in the biennial energy
report to be transmitted to the governor and the legislature by December 1,
2002: (a) Identification of methods for the creation of new electricity
capacity in advance of any critical need; (b) identification and analysis of
incentives and disincentives for building new generation and transmission
capacity; (c) identification of methods to encourage demand management options
and technologies; (d) an estimate of current and future contributions to global
climate change attributable to state government; (e) identification and
analysis of specific strategies and options to reduce or offset contributions
to global climate change attributable to state government's energy consumption,
including reducing the state's consumption of electricity through pursuit of
cost-effective energy conservation and efficiency opportunities and increasing
the proportion of electricity state government purchases through an electric
utility from clean energy resources; and (f) the results of efforts by the
department of general administration and other state agencies to aggregate
purchasing of clean technologies.

(32) $300,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided to
reimburse nonprofit associations engaged in the production and performance of
musical, dance, artistic, dramatic, or literary works for the benefit of the
general public for back leasehold excise taxes assessed by the department of
revenue.

(33) $10,512,393 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely for the drug
control and system improvement formula grant program, to be distributed in
state fiscal year 2003 as follows:

(a) $3,551,972 to
local units of government to continue multijurisdictional narcotics task
forces;

(b) $611,177 to the
department to continue the drug prosecution assistance program in support of
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;

(c) $1,343,603 to
the Washington state patrol for coordination, investigative, and supervisory
support to the multijurisdictional narcotics task forces and for
methamphetamine education and response;

(d) $197,154 to the
department for grants to support tribal law enforcement needs;

(e) $976,897 to the
department of social and health services, division of alcohol and substance
abuse, for drug courts in eastern and western Washington;

(f) $298,246 to the
department for training and technical assistance of public defenders
representing clients with special needs;

(g) $687,155 to the
department to continue domestic violence legal advocacy;

(h) $890,150 to the
department of social and health services, juvenile rehabilitation
administration, to continue youth violence prevention and intervention
projects;

(i) $89,705 to the
department to continue the governor's council on substance abuse;

(j) $97,591 to the
department to continue evaluation of Byrne formula grant programs;

(k) $895,386 to the
office of financial management for criminal history records improvement;

(l) $60,000 to the
department for community-based advocacy services to victims of violent crime,
other than sexual assault and domestic violence; and

(m) $813,358 to the
department for required grant administration, monitoring, and reporting on
Byrne formula grant programs.

These amounts
represent the maximum Byrne grant expenditure authority for each program. No
program may expend Byrne grant funds in excess of the amounts provided in this
subsection. If moneys in excess of those appropriated in this subsection
become available, whether from prior or current fiscal year Byrne grant
distributions, the department shall hold these moneys in reserve and may not
expend them without specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried
forward and applied to the pool of moneys available for appropriation for
programs and projects in the succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget
request for the succeeding year, the department shall estimate and request
authority to spend any funds remaining in reserve as a result of this
subsection.

(34) $35,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
for the department to contract with a statewide trade association exclusively
representing mobile home park owners to deliver training courses to mobile home
park managers as part of a certification process included in Senate Bill No.
5694 (certification program for mobile home park managers). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(35) $165,000 of the
building code council account appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided
solely for the state building code council pursuant to Senate Bill No. 5352
(building code council fee increase). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(36) $129,000 of the
mobile home park relocation account appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is
provided solely for the department to administer the mobile home relocation
assistance program as provided by Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5354
(mobile home relocation assistance fee). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2002, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(37) The department
shall implement efficiencies and savings consistent with its mission, goals,
and objectives to reduce operating costs. The department should give strong
consideration to the best practice proposals put forth by the office of
financial management and the department of information services. Such action,
to the extent possible, should maintain client services and state revenues.
Actions may also include hiring freezes, employee furloughs both voluntary and
mandatory, restricted travel and training, and reduced equipment and personal
service contracts. The department, with approval from the office of financial
management, may use fiscal year 2002 savings to offset the fiscal year 2003
reductions. Reductions shall not be made to funding for public broadcast
grants.

(38) $40,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
to implement the state task force on funding for community-based services to
victims of crime as provided in Senate Bill No. 6763. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 123. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 128
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE
FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 512,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((514,000))

499,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,026,000))

1,011,000

Sec. 124. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 129
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 12,456,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((12,024,000))

11,615,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 23,657,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement

Account‑‑State
Appropriation............... $ ((229,000))

224,000

State Auditing Services
Revolving

Account‑‑State
Appropriation............... $ 25,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((48,391,000))

47,977,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
office of financial management shall review policies and procedures regarding
purchasing of information technology upgrades by state agencies. Information technology
upgrades include replacement workstations, network equipment, operating systems
and application software. The review shall document existing policies and
procedures, and shall compare alternative upgrade policies that reduce the
overall cost to state government for maintaining adequate information
technology to meet the existing business needs of state agencies. Findings and
recommendations from this review shall be reported to appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2001.

Sec. 125. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 130
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE
HEARINGS

Administrative Hearings
Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((21,938,000))

22,394,000

Sec. 126. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 131
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL

Department of Personnel
Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((17,297,000))

17,035,000

Higher Education Personnel
Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,636,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((18,933,000))

18,671,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
department of personnel may charge agencies through the data processing
revolving account up to $561,000 in fiscal year 2002 to study the development
of a new personnel and payroll system. Funding to cover these expenses shall
be realized from agency FICA savings associated with the pretax benefits
contributions plans. Funding is subject to section 902 of this act.

Sec. 127. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 132
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY

Lottery Administrative
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((22,130,000))

21,795,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
128. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

STATE GAMBLING
COMMISSION. (1) The state gambling commission is directed to reduce its
fiscal year 2003 expenditures from the gambling revolving account by the amount
of $450,000.

(2) The state gambling
commission is authorized to increase existing fees in excess of the fiscal
growth factor established by Initiative Measure No. 601, if necessary, to meet
the actual costs of conducting business.

Sec. 129. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 133
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC
AFFAIRS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 226,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((234,000))

210,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((460,000))

436,000

Sec. 130. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 134
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON
AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 211,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((209,000))

207,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((420,000))

418,000

Sec. 131. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 135
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PERSONNEL APPEALS BOARD

Department of Personnel
Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,679,000))

1,705,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $26,000
of the department of personnel services account appropriation is provided
solely for paying accrued annual and sick leave to a retired board member.

Sec. 132. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 136
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-OPERATIONS

Dependent Care
Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 378,000

Department of Retirement
Systems Expense Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((49,562,000))

49,584,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((49,940,000))

49,962,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,000,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for support of the information systems project known as the electronic
document image management system.

(2) $120,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for locating inactive members entitled to retirement benefits.

(3) $117,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for modifications to the retirement information systems to accommodate
tracking of postretirement employment on an hourly basis.

(4) $440,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5143
(Washington state patrol retirement systems plan 2).

(5) $6,420,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of public employees' retirement system
plan 3 (chapter 247, Laws of 2000).

(6) $101,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5144 (LEOFF survivor benefit). If
the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2001, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(7) $744,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6166
(LEOFF restructuring). If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2001, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $225,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for monitoring and actuarial services for the state retirement systems.

(9) $285,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5264
(employer unfair practices). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $96,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6376 (PERS plan 3 transfer
payment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $9,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6377 (TRS plan 1 extended
school year). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $12,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6378 (LEOFF plan 2 part-time
leave of absence). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $122,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6379 (transferring service
credit to WSPRS). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $651,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided solely
for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6380 (survivor benefits).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(15) $53,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6381 (PERS plan 1 terminated
vested). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 133. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 137
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD

State Investment Board
Expense Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((12,876,000))

13,461,000

Sec. 134. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 138
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 72,820,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((72,387,000))

78,088,000

Timber Tax Distribution
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,131,000

Waste
Education/Recycling/Litter Control‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 101,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 67,000

Oil Spill Administration
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 14,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((150,520,000))

156,221,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

$269,000 of the general
fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $49,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to establish and provide staff support to a committee on taxation to
study the elasticity, equity, and adequacy of the state's tax system.

(1) The committee shall
consist of eleven members. The department shall appoint six academic scholars
from the fields of economics, taxation, business administration, public
administration, public policy, and other relevant disciplines as determined by
the department, after consulting with the majority and minority leaders in the
senate, the co-speakers in the house of representatives, the chair of the ways
and means committee in the senate, and the co-chairs of the finance committee in
the house of representatives. The governor and the chairs of the majority and
minority caucuses in each house of the legislature shall each appoint one
member to the committee. These appointments may be legislative members. The
members of the committee shall either elect a voting chair from among their
membership or a nonvoting chair who is not a member of the committee. Members
of the committee shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(2) The purpose of the
study is to determine how well the current tax system functions and how it
might be changed to better serve the citizens of the state in the twenty-first
century. In reviewing options for changes to the tax system, the committee
shall develop multiple alternatives to the existing tax system. To the extent
possible, the alternatives shall be designed to increase the harmony between
the tax system of this state and the surrounding states, encourage commerce and
business creation, and encourage home ownership. In developing alternatives,
the committee shall examine and consider the effects of tax incentives,
including exemptions, deferrals, and credits. The alternatives shall range
from incremental improvements in the current tax structure to complete
replacement of the tax structure. In conducting the study, the committee shall
examine the tax structures of other states and review previous studies
regarding tax reform in this state. In developing alternatives, the committee
shall be guided by administrative simplicity, economic neutrality, fairness,
stability, and transparency. Most of the alternatives presented by the
committee to the legislature shall be revenue neutral and contain no income
tax.

(3) The department
shall create an advisory group to include, but not be limited to,
representatives of business, state agencies, local governments, labor,
taxpayers, and other advocacy groups. The group shall provide advice and
assistance to the committee.

(4) The committee shall
present a final report of its findings and alternatives to the ways and means
committee in the senate and the finance committee in the house of
representatives by November 30, 2002.

(5) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
to implement Senate Bill No. 6821 (local government finance). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(6) $6,260,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided
solely for the department's initiative to increase tax collection, tax
discovery, and compliance.

(7) $90,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
for the department to conduct a study of tax incentives.

(a) The tax
incentives covered by the study shall include the following:

(i) The rural county
distressed areas sales tax deferral and exemption under chapter 82.60 RCW;

(ii) The rural
county business and occupation tax credit for computer software development in
RCW 82.04.4456;

(iii) The business
and occupation tax jobs credit under chapter 82.62 RCW;

(iv) The business
and occupation tax credit for international services under RCW 82.04.44525;

(v) The business and
occupation tax credit for help-desk services in rural counties under RCW
82.04.4457;

(vi) The high
technology business and occupation tax credit under RCW 82.04.4452;

(vii) The high
technology sales tax deferral/exemption in chapter 82.63 RCW; and

(viii) The
manufacturing, research and development, and testing operations sales and use
tax exemptions under RCW 82.08.02565 and 82.12.02565.

(b) Taxpayer
participation in the study is voluntary. Taxpayer information used in the
study is confidential under the provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW. Additionally,
the identity of any study participants may not be disclosed.

(c) The purpose of
the study is to allow the legislature to evaluate the success of tax incentives
in terms of job creation, product development, and other factors that are
considered a return on investment of public funds. The study shall include
information such as the amount of the incentive taken, the annual number of net
new jobs as a result of the incentive, current employment, number of new
products developed, the types and amounts of other taxes paid, whether the
business expanded or is located in a certain area as a result of the incentive,
and other information determined by the department to be relevant to the study.

(d) The department
shall report to the appropriate legislative committees of the senate and house
of representatives by November 30, 2002.

Sec. 135. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 139
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((1,193,000))

1,162,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,038,000))

1,017,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((2,231,000))

2,179,000

Sec. 136. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 142
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 549,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((630,000))

674,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,930,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((444,000))

223,000

State Capitol Vehicle
Parking Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 154,000

General Administration
Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((41,419,000))

39,560,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((45,126,000))

43,090,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department
shall conduct a review of the ultimate purchasing system to evaluate the
following: (a) The degree to which program objectives and assumptions were
achieved; (b) the degree to which planned schedule of phases, tasks, and
activities were accomplished; (c) an assessment of estimated and actual costs
of each phase; (d) an assessment of project cost recovery/cost avoidance,
return on investment, and measurable outcomes as each relate to the agency's
business functions and other agencies' business functions; and (e) the degree
to which integration with the agency and state information technology
infrastructure was achieved. The department will receive written input from
participating pilot agencies that describes measurable organizational benefits
and cost avoidance opportunities derived from use of the ultimate purchasing
system. The performance review shall be submitted to the office of financial
management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees by July 1, 2002.

(2) $60,000 of the
general administration services account appropriation is provided solely for
costs associated with the development of the information technology
architecture to link the risk management information system and the tort
division's case management system, and the reconciliation of defense cost
reimbursement information.

(3) $44,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
for the department to implement the waste management and recycling provisions
of Senate Bill No. 6480 (encouraging recycling and waste reduction). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 137. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 143
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
INFORMATION SERVICES

Data Processing Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,706,000))

3,610,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Fifteen independent
private, nonprofit colleges, located in Washington state, have requested
connection to the K-20 educational telecommunications network. These K-20
connections shall be provided to the private schools on a full cost
reimbursement basis, net of the value of services and information provided by
the private institutions, based on criteria approved by the K-20 board.

(2) Some private K-12
schools have requested limited "pilot connections" to the K-20
network to test the technical and economic feasibility of one or more
connection models. These K-20 connections shall be provided to the private
K-12 schools on a full cost reimbursement basis, net of the value of services
and information provided by the private K-12 schools based on criteria approved
by the K-20 board.

(3) In the 2001-03
biennium, the department shall incorporate statewide elements for a common
technology infrastructure into the state strategic information technology plan
that state agencies shall then use in establishing individual agency business
applications.

(4) The department
shall implement the $10,800,000 service rate reduction it proposed on August
14, 2000.

Sec. 138. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 144
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 622,000

Insurance Commissioners
Regulatory Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((29,053,000))

29,928,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((29,675,000))

30,550,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $693,000
of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account appropriation is provided
solely for moving and renovation costs associated with the colocation of the
agency's Olympia-area facilities. Expenditures from this amount shall be
subject to the approval of the department of general administration.

Sec. 139. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 147
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION

Horse Racing Commission
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((4,504,000))

4,436,000

Sec. 140. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 148
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,483,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,484,000))

1,439,000

Liquor Control Board
Construction and Maintenance

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((8,114,000))

8,054,000

Liquor Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((142,148,000))

127,600,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((153,229,000))

138,576,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,573,000 of the
liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely for the agency
information technology upgrade. This amount provided in this subsection is
conditioned upon satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this act.

(2) $4,803,000 of the
liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely for the costs
associated with the development and implementation of a merchandising business
system. Expenditures of any funds for this system are conditioned upon the
approval of the merchandising business system's feasibility study by the
information services board. The amount provided in this subsection is also
conditioned upon satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this act.

Sec. 141. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 149
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UTILITIES AND
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Public Service Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((27,108,000))

26,702,000

Pipeline Safety Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,305,000

Pipeline Safety Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 822,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((31,235,000))

30,829,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,011,000 of the
pipeline safety account‑-state appropriation and $822,000 of the pipeline
safety account‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5182 (pipeline safety). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(2) $294,000 of the
pipeline safety account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for an
interagency agreement with the joint legislative audit and review committee for
a report on hazardous liquid and gas pipeline safety programs. The committee
shall review staff use, inspection activity, fee methodology, and costs of the
hazardous liquid and gas pipeline safety programs and report to the appropriate
legislative committees by July 1, 2003. The report shall include a comparison
of interstate and intrastate programs, including but not limited to the number
and complexity of regular and specialized inspections, mapping requirements for
each program, and allocation of administrative costs to each program. If
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5182 (pipeline safety) is not enacted by June 30,
2001, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

Sec. 142. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 151
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 9,165,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((8,979,000))

8,530,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 22,509,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 234,000

Enhanced 911 Account‑-State
Appropriation...... $ ((16,544,000))

20,269,000

Disaster Response Account‑-State
Appropriation. $ ((582,000))

1,906,000

Disaster Response Account‑-Federal
Appropriation $ ((3,392,000))

6,510,000

Worker and Community Right
to Know Fund‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 283,000

Nisqually Earthquake
Account‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((37,884,000))

29,027,000

Nisqually Earthquake
Account‑‑Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ ((157,795,000))

49,641,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((257,367,000))

148,074,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($582,000))
$1,906,000 of the disaster response account‑-state appropriation
is provided solely for the state share of response and recovery costs
associated with federal emergency management agency (FEMA) disasters approved
in the 1999-01 biennium budget. The military department may, upon approval of
the director of financial management, use portions of the disaster response account‑-state
appropriation to offset costs of new disasters occurring before June 30, 2003.
The military department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing disaster
costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b) incremental changes from
the previous estimate; (c) actual expenditures; (d) estimates of total
remaining costs to be paid; and (d) estimates of future payments by biennium.
This information shall be displayed by individual disaster, by fund, and by
type of assistance. The military department shall also submit a report
quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing information on the disaster response account, including:
(a) The amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund balance at
the end of the 2001-03 biennium based on current revenue and expenditure
patterns.

(2) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided solely
for implementation of the conditional scholarship program pursuant to chapter
28B.103 RCW.

(3) $60,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $60,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5256 (emergency management
compact). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $35,000 of the
general fund‑‑state fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $35,000 of
the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided
solely for the north county emergency medical service.

(5) (($1,374,000))
$2,145,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account‑-state
appropriation and (($3,861,000)) $4,174,000 of the Nisqually
earthquake account‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
military department's costs associated with coordinating the state's response
to the February 28, 2001, earthquake.

(6) (($1,347,000))
$678,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account‑-state appropriation
and (($5,359,000)) $3,420,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for mitigation costs associated with the
earthquake for state and local agencies. Of the amount from the Nisqually
earthquake account‑-state appropriation, (($898,000)) $217,000
is provided for the state matching share for state agencies and (($449,000))
$462,000 is provided for one-half of the local matching share for local
entities. The amount provided for the local matching share constitutes a
revenue distribution for purposes of RCW 43.135.060(1).

(7) (($35,163,000))
$8,970,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account‑-state
appropriation and (($148,575,000)) $42,047,000 of the Nisqually
earthquake account‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for public
assistance costs associated with the earthquake for state and local agencies.
Of the amount from the Nisqually earthquake account‑-state appropriation,
(($20,801,000)) $3,924,000 is provided for the state matching
share for state agencies and (($14,362,000)) $5,046,000 is
provided for one-half of the local matching share for local entities. The
amount provided for the local matching share constitutes a revenue distribution
for purposes of RCW 43.135.060(1). ((Upon approval of the director of
financial management, the military department may use portions of the Nisqually
earthquake account‑-state appropriations to cover other response and
recovery costs associated with the Nisqually earthquake that are not eligible
for federal emergency management agency reimbursement. The military department
is to submit a quarterly report detailing the costs authorized under this
subsection to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees.))

(8) $17,234,000 of
the Nisqually earthquake account‑-state appropriation is provided solely
to cover other response and recovery costs associated with the Nisqually
earthquake that are not eligible for federal emergency management agency
reimbursement. Prior to expending funds provided in this subsection, the
military department shall obtain prior approval of the director of financial
management. Prior to approving any single project of over $1,000,000, the
office of financial management shall notify the fiscal committees of the
legislature. The military department is to submit a quarterly report detailing
the costs authorized under this subsection to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees.

(9) $2,818,000 of
the enhanced 911 account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6034 or House
Bill No. 2595 (enhanced 911 excise tax). If neither bill is enacted by June
30, 2002, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 143. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 152
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT
RELATIONS COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((2,154,000))

2,225,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((2,164,000))

2,339,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((4,318,000))

4,564,000

The appropriations
in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $71,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $214,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the purpose of implementing requirements associated with Initiative
Measure No. 775 (home care workers).

(2) $47,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
to implement House Bill No. 2403 and House Bill No. 2540 (higher education
collective bargaining). If House Bill No. 2403 is not enacted by June 30,
2002, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 144. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 153
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE GROWTH PLANNING HEARINGS
BOARD

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,497,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,506,000))

1,431,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((3,003,000))

2,928,000

Sec. 145. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 154
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND
TRADE CENTER

State Convention and Trade
Center Operating

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((37,848,000))

37,269,000

State Convention and Trade
Center Account‑-State

Appropriation............ ................. $ 29,886,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION............. $ ((67,734,000))

67,155,000

(End
of part)

PART
II

HUMAN SERVICES

Sec. 201. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 201
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
HEALTH SERVICES. (1)
Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services
shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment
modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this
act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications
permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for
other than that purpose, except as expressly provided in subsection (3) of this
section.

(2) The department of
social and health services shall not initiate any services that will require
expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this
act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW
43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long
as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the
program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department
receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the
office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees.
As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes
block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on
specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3)(a) The
appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act
shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However,
after May 1, 2002, unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department
may transfer general fund‑-state appropriations for fiscal year 2002
among programs after approval by the director of financial management.
However, the department shall not transfer state moneys that are provided
solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in subsection
(3)(b) of this section.

(b) To the extent
that transfers under subsection (3)(a) of this section are insufficient to fund
actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 2002 caseload forecasts and
utilization assumptions in the medical assistance, long-term care, foster care,
adoption support, and child support programs, the department may transfer state
moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose after approval by the
director of financial management.

(c) The director of
financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives in writing prior to approving any allotment
modifications.

(4) In the event the
department receives additional unrestricted federal funds or achieves savings
in excess of that anticipated in this act, the department shall use up to
$5,000,000 of such funds to initiate a pilot project providing integrated
support services to homeless individuals needing mental health services,
alcohol or substance abuse treatment, medical care, or who demonstrate
community safety concerns. Before such a pilot project is initiated, the
department shall notify the fiscal committees of the legislature of the plans
for such a pilot project including the source of funds to be used.

Sec. 202. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 202
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((225,789,000))

225,104,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((239,013,000))

230,601,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((372,408,000))

369,895,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 400,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((987,000))

957,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((5,702,000))

5,588,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((844,299,000))

832,545,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,237,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation, (($2,288,000))
$2,271,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state
appropriation, and (($1,590,000)) $1,584,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for the category of services titled
"intensive family preservation services."

(2) (($685,000))
$644,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year ((2002)) 2003
appropriation and (($701,000)) $654,000 of the general fund‑-((state
fiscal year 2003)) federal appropriation are provided to contract
for ((the operation of one)) facility and nonfacility-based
pediatric interim care ((facility)) services. ((The facility
shall provide residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of
age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers. The
facility shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive, or foster
parents. The facility shall provide at least three months of consultation and
support to parents accepting placement of children from the facility. The
facility may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents for infants
served by the facility. The department shall not require case management as a
condition of the contract.

(3) $524,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $536,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided for up to
three nonfacility-based programs for the training, consultation, support, and
recruitment of biological, foster, and adoptive parents of children through age
three in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers, except
that each program may serve up to three medically fragile
nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs,
preference shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing pediatric
interim care program.

(4))) (3) $1,260,000 of the fiscal year 2002
general fund‑-state appropriation, $1,248,000 of the fiscal year 2003
general fund‑-state appropriation, and (($4,196,000)) $4,082,000
of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation are
provided solely for the family policy council and community public health and
safety networks. The funding level for the family policy council and community
public health and safety networks represents a 25 percent reduction below the
funding level for the 1999-2001 biennium. Funding levels shall be reduced 25
percent for both the family policy council and network grants. Reductions to
network grants shall be allocated so as to maintain current funding levels, to
the greatest extent possible, for projects with the strongest evidence of
positive outcomes and for networks with substantial compliance with contracts
for network grants.

(((5))) (4)
$2,215,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation,
$4,394,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation, and
$5,604,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for reducing the average caseload level per case-carrying social worker.
Average caseload reductions are intended to increase the amount of time social
workers spend in direct contact with the children, families, and foster parents
involved with their open cases. The department shall use some of the funds
provided in several local offices to increase staff that support case-carrying
social workers in ways that will allow social workers to increase direct
contact time with children, families, and foster parents. To achieve the goal
of reaching an average caseload ratio of 1:24 by the end of fiscal year 2003,
the department shall develop a plan for redeploying 30 FTEs to case-carrying
social worker and support positions from other areas in the children and family
services budget. The FTE redeployment plan shall be submitted to the fiscal committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2001.

(((6))) (5)
$1,000,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$1,000,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for increasing foster parent respite care services that improve
the retention of foster parents and increase the stability of foster
placements. The department shall report quarterly to the appropriate
committees of the legislature progress against appropriate baseline measures
for foster parent retention and stability of foster placements.

(((7))) (6)
$1,050,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely
for increasing kinship care placements for children who otherwise would likely
be placed in foster care. These funds shall be used for extraordinary costs
incurred by relatives at the time of placement, or for extraordinary costs
incurred by relatives after placement if such costs would likely cause a
disruption in the kinship care placement. $50,000 of the funds provided shall
be contracted to the Washington institute for public policy to conduct a study
of kinship care placements. The study shall examine the prevalence and needs
of families who are raising related children and shall compare services and
policies of Washington state with other states that have a higher rate of
kinship care placements in lieu of foster care placements. The study shall
identify possible changes in services and policies that are likely to increase
appropriate kinship care placements.

(((8))) (7)
$3,386,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation, (($7,671,000))
$4,679,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state
appropriation, and (($20,819,000)) $19,709,000 of the general
fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for increases in the cost
per case for foster care and adoption support. $16,000,000 of the general fund‑-federal
amount shall remain unalloted until the office of financial management approves
a plan submitted by the department to achieve a higher rate of federal earnings
in the foster care program. That plan shall also be submitted to the fiscal
committees of the legislature and shall indicate projected federal revenue
compared to actual fiscal year 2001 levels. Within the amounts provided for foster
care, the department shall increase the basic rate for foster care to an
average of $420 per month on July 1, 2001((, and to an average of $440 per
month on July 1, 2002)). The department shall use the remaining funds
provided in this subsection to pay for increases in the cost per case for
foster care and adoption support. The department shall seek to control rate
increases and reimbursement decisions for foster care and adoption support
cases such that the cost per case for family foster care, group care, receiving
homes, and adoption support does not exceed the amount assumed in the projected
caseload expenditures plus the amounts provided in this subsection.

(((9))) (8)
$1,767,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
(($2,461,000)) $1,767,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and (($1,485,000)) $1,241,000
of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for rate
and capacity increases for child placing agencies. Child placing agencies
shall increase their capacity by 15 percent in fiscal year 2002 ((and 30
percent in fiscal year 2003)).

(((10))) (9)
The department shall provide secure crisis residential facilities across the
state in a manner that: (a) Retains geographic provision of these services;
and (b) retains beds in high use areas.

(((11))) (10)
$125,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and $125,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for a foster parent retention program.
This program is directed at foster parents caring for children who act out
sexually, as described in House Bill No. 1525 (foster parent retention
program).

Sec. 203. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 203
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-JUVENILE REHABILITATION
PROGRAM

(((1) COMMUNITY
SERVICES))

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((36,625,000))

83,151,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((38,125,000))

79,199,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((14,609,000))

14,031,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((380,000))

1,110,000

Juvenile Accountability
Incentive

Account‑-Federal Appropriation.............. $ ((9,361,000))

10,461,000

Public Safety and Education

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((6,196,000))

5,999,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((21,972,000))

36,838,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((127,268,000))

230,789,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(((a))) (1)
$686,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice assistance
account for costs to the criminal justice system associated with the
implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The
amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county
adult court costs associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of
1997 and shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.

(((b))) (2)
$5,980,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county impacts associated with the
implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed to
counties as prescribed in the current consolidated juvenile services (CJS)
formula.

(((c))) (3)
$1,161,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
$1,162,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
and $5,190,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation are provided solely to implement community juvenile accountability
grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds
provided in this subsection may be used solely for community juvenile
accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of
programs funded by the grants.

(((d))) (4)
$2,515,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs
for locally committed offenders. The juvenile rehabilitation administration
shall award these moneys on a competitive basis to counties that submitted a
plan for the provision of services approved by the division of alcohol and
substance abuse. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop
criteria for evaluation of plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding
and shall assist counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.

(((e))) (5)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for juvenile rehabilitation administration to contract
with the institute for public policy for responsibilities assigned in chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions).

(((f))) (6)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for a contract for expanded services of the teamchild
project.

(((g))) (7)
$423,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
(($924,000)) $754,100 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, (($174,000)) $152,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation, (($196,000)) $172,000
of the public safety and education assistance account appropriation, and (($690,000))
$604,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation are provided solely to increase payment rates for contracted
service providers.

(((h))) (8)
$16,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$16,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for the implementation of chapter 167, Laws of 1999 (firearms
on school property). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to
provide funding for county impacts associated with the implementation of
chapter 167, Laws of 1999, and shall be distributed to counties as prescribed
in the current consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.

(((i))) (9)
$3,441,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $3,441,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court
administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in need of
services, and at-risk youth petitions. The department shall not retain any
portion of these funds to cover administrative or any other departmental
costs. The department, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators,
shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula shall
neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition processing costs
nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per-petition processing
costs.

(((j))) (10)
$6,000,000 of the public safety and education account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court
administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in need of
services, and at-risk youth petitions. ((To the extent that distributions
made under (i) and (j) of this subsection and pursuant to section 801 of this
act exceed actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services,
and at-risk youth petitions, the department, in consultation with the
respective juvenile court administrator and the county, may approve expenditure
of funds provided in this subsection on other costs of the civil or criminal
justice system. When this occurs, the department shall notify the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees.)) The
department shall not retain any portion of these funds to cover administrative
or any other departmental costs. The department, in conjunction with the
juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution
formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher than average
per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than
average per-petition processing costs.

(((k))) (11)
The distributions made under (((i))) (9) and (((j))) (10)
of this subsection and distributions from the county criminal justice
assistance account made pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute
appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of
service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

(((l))) (12)
Each quarter during the 2001-03 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the
number of petitions processed and the total actual costs of processing the
petitions in each of the following categories: Truancy, children in need of
services, and at-risk youth. Counties shall submit the reports to the
department no later than 45 days after the end of the quarter. The department
shall forward this information to the chair and ranking minority member of the
house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means
committee no later than 60 days after a quarter ends. These reports are deemed
informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(((m))) (13)
$1,692,000 of the juvenile accountability incentive account‑-federal
appropriation is provided solely for the continued implementation of a pilot
program to provide for postrelease planning and treatment of juvenile offenders
with co-occurring disorders.

(((n))) (14)
$22,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is
provided solely for the evaluation of the juvenile offender co-occurring
disorder pilot program implemented pursuant to (m) of this subsection.

(((o))) (15)
$900,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $900,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for the continued implementation of the juvenile
violence prevention grant program established in section 204, chapter 309, Laws
of 1999.

(((p))) (16)
$33,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$29,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1070 (juvenile
offender basic training). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((q))) (17)
$21,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$42,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5468 (chemical
dependency). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(((r))) (18)
The juvenile rehabilitation administration, in consultation with the juvenile
court administrators, may agree on a formula to allow the transfer of funds
among amounts appropriated for consolidated juvenile services, community
juvenile accountability act grants, the chemically dependent disposition
alternative, and the special sex offender disposition alternative.

(((2) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 46,773,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 48,735,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 14,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 740,000

Violence Reduction and
Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 15,280,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 111,542,000

The appropriations
in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:)) (19) $40,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($84,000)) $68,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to increase payment rates for contracted service providers.

(((3) PROGRAM
SUPPORT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,738,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,765,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation... ......... $ 307,000

Juvenile Accountability
Incentive Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,100,000

Violence Reduction and
Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 421,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 5,331,000))

(20) $728,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
for providing additional research-based services to the juvenile parole
population. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall consult with the
institute for public policy in deciding which interventions to provide to the
parole population.

(21) $9,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6473 or Substitute House Bill
No. 2468 (DNA database). If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2002, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22) The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall continue to allot and expend funds provided
in this section by the category and budget unit structure submitted to the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.

Sec. 204. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 204
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY
SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((191,089,000))

195,266,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((194,884,000))

182,055,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((339,077,000))

358,657,000

General Fund‑-Local
Appropriation.............. $ ((4,363,000))

21,133,000

Health Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,450,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((731,863,000))

759,561,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Regional support
networks shall use portions of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
implementation of working agreements with the vocational rehabilitation program
which will maximize the use of federal funding for vocational programs.

(b) From the general
fund‑-state appropriations in this subsection, the secretary of social
and health services shall assure that regional support networks reimburse the
aging and adult services program for the general fund‑-state cost of
medicaid personal care services that enrolled regional support network
consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(c) $388,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, (($1,927,000))
$2,829,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and (($2,349,000)) $3,157,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and operation of community
residential and support services for persons whose treatment needs constitute
substantial barriers to community placement and who no longer require active
psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of care, no longer meet
the criteria for inpatient involuntary commitment, and who are clinically ready
for discharge from a state psychiatric hospital. In the event that enough
patients are not transitioned or diverted from the state hospitals to close at
least two hospital wards by July 2002, and ((two)) four
additional wards by April 2003, a proportional share of these funds shall be
transferred to the appropriations in subsection (2) of this section to support
continued care of the patients in the state hospitals. Primary responsibility
and accountability for provision of appropriate community support for persons
placed with these funds shall reside with the mental health program and the
regional support networks, with partnership and active support from the alcohol
and substance abuse and from the aging and adult services programs. The
department shall negotiate performance-based incentive contracts ((with
those regional support networks which have the most viable plans for providing
appropriate community support services for significant numbers of persons from
their area who would otherwise be served in the state hospitals)) to
provide appropriate community support services for individuals leaving the
state hospitals under this subsection. The department shall first seek to
contract with regional support networks before offering a contract to any other
party. The funds appropriated in this subsection shall not be considered
"available resources" as defined in RCW 71.24.025 and are not subject
to the standard allocation formula applied in accordance with RCW
71.24.035(13)(a).

(d) At least $1,000,000
of the federal block grant funding appropriated in this subsection shall be
used for (i) initial development, training, and operation of the community
support teams which will work with long-term state hospital residents prior and
subsequent to their return to the community; and (ii) development of support
strategies which will reduce the unnecessary and excessive use of state and
local hospitals for short-term crisis stabilization services. Such strategies
may include training and technical assistance to community long-term care and
substance abuse providers; the development of diversion beds and stabilization
support teams; examination of state hospital policies regarding admissions; and
the development of new contractual standards to assure that the statutory
requirement that 85 percent of short-term detentions be managed locally is
being fulfilled. The department shall report to the fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature on the results of these efforts by November 1,
2001, and again by November 1, 2002.

(e) The department is
authorized to implement a new formula for allocating available resources among
the regional support networks. The distribution formula shall use the number
of persons eligible for the state medical programs funded under chapter 74.09
RCW as the measure of the requirement for the number of acutely mentally ill,
chronically mentally ill, severely emotionally disturbed children, and
seriously disturbed in accordance with RCW 71.24.035(13)(a). The new formula
shall be phased in over a period of no less than six years. Furthermore, the
department shall increase the medicaid capitation rates which a regional
support network would otherwise receive under the formula by an amount
sufficient to assure that total funding allocated to the regional support
network in fiscal year 2002 increases by up to ((2.1)) 3.5
percent over the amount actually paid to that regional support network in
fiscal year 2001, and by up to an additional ((2.3)) 5.0 percent
in fiscal year 2003, if total funding to the regional support network would
otherwise increase by less than those percentages under the new formula, and
provided that the nonfederal share of the higher medicaid payment rate is
provided by the regional support network from local funds.

(f) Within funds
appropriated in this subsection, the department shall contract with the Clark
county regional support network for development and operation of a project
demonstrating collaborative methods for providing intensive mental health
services in the school setting for severely emotionally disturbed children who
are medicaid eligible. Project services are to be delivered by teachers and
teaching assistants who qualify as, or who are under the supervision of, mental
health professionals meeting the requirements of chapter 275-57 WAC. The
department shall increase medicaid payments to the regional support network by
the amount necessary to cover the necessary and allowable costs of the
demonstration, not to exceed the upper payment limit specified for the regional
support network in the department's medicaid waiver agreement with the federal
government after meeting all other medicaid spending requirements assumed in
this subsection. The regional support network shall provide the department
with (i) periodic reports on project service levels, methods, and outcomes; and
(ii) an intergovernmental transfer equal to the state share of the increased
medicaid payment provided for operation of this project.

(g) The health services
account appropriation is provided solely for implementation of strategies which
the department and the affected regional support networks conclude will best
assure continued availability of community-based inpatient psychiatric services
in all areas of the state. Such strategies may include, but are not limited
to, emergency contracts for continued operation of inpatient facilities
otherwise at risk of closure because of demonstrated uncompensated care;
start-up grants for development of evaluation and treatment facilities; and
increases in the rate paid for inpatient psychiatric services for medically
indigent and/or general assistance for the unemployed patients. The funds
provided in this subsection must be: (i) Prioritized for use in those areas of
the state which are at greatest risk of lacking sufficient inpatient
psychiatric treatment capacity, rather than being distributed on a formula
basis; (ii) prioritized for use by those hospitals which do not receive
low-income disproportionate share hospital payments as of the date of
application for funding; and (iii) matched on a one-quarter local,
three-quarters state basis by funding from the regional support network or
networks in the area in which the funds are expended. Payments from the amount
provided in this subsection shall not be made to any provider that has not
agreed that, except for prospective rate increases, the payment shall offset,
on a dollar-for-dollar basis, any liability that may be established against, or
any settlement that may be agreed to by the state, regarding the rate of state
reimbursement for inpatient psychiatric care. The funds provided in this
subsection shall not be considered "available resources" as defined
in RCW 71.24.025 and are not subject to the distribution formula established
pursuant to RCW 71.24.035.

(h) The department
shall assure that no regional support network uses more than 8.0 percent of the
state and federal funds received from appropriations in this subsection for
regional support network administration.

(i) The department
shall assure that each regional support network increases spending on direct
client services in fiscal years 2002 and 2003 by at least the same percentage
as the total state, federal, and local funds allocated to the regional support
network in those years exceeds the amounts allocated to it in fiscal year 2001.

(j) The department
shall reduce state funding otherwise payable to a regional support network in
fiscal years 2002 and 2003 by the full amount by which the regional support
network's reserves and fund balances as of December 31, 2001, exceed the
required risk reserve for that regional support network. The required reserve
amount shall be calculated by applying the risk reserve percentage specified in
the department's contract with the regional support network to the total state
and federal revenues for which the regional support network would otherwise be
eligible in accordance with this subsection. As used in this subsection,
"reserves" does not include capital project reserves established in
accordance with state accounting and reporting standards before January 1,
2002.

(k) The department
shall maintain the same relative allocation of budgeted, nonforensic state
hospital beds among the regional support networks as was in effect during
fiscal year 2002 until at least thirty days after adjournment of the first
regular legislative session following submission of a report on the appropriate
allocation of these beds. In preparing the report, the department shall: (i)
Utilize the most current and reliable applicable academic research, and shall
consult with academic and other national experts on mental health inpatient
care; (ii) estimate the relative need for short-term and long-term inpatient
psychiatric care in each of the state's regions, based upon the factors that
the experts identify as the best predictors of need, including geographic
proximity to the hospitals; and (iii) identify options for changing the current
distribution of state hospital beds among the regional support networks. The
report shall be prepared in consultation with representatives of people with
mental illness and the regional support networks, and shall be submitted to
appropriate committees of the legislature. This subsection does not prohibit
the replacement of current state hospital beds with community alternatives as
provided elsewhere in this section.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((85,836,000))

84,075,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((83,001,000))

80,887,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((139,098,000))

140,131,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((29,289,000))

29,920,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((337,224,000))

335,013,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state mental
hospitals may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and
supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is
cost-effective to do so.

(b) The mental health
program at Western state hospital shall continue to use labor provided by the
Tacoma prerelease program of the department of corrections.

(c) The department
shall seek to reduce the census of the two state psychiatric hospitals by ((120))
178 beds by April 2003 by arranging and providing community residential,
mental health, and other support services for long-term state hospital patients
whose treatment needs constitute substantial barriers to community placement
and who no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital
level of care, no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment, and who are clinically ready for discharge from a state psychiatric
hospital. No such patient is to move from the hospital until a team of
community professionals has become familiar with the person and their treatment
plan; assessed their strengths, preferences, and needs; arranged a safe,
clinically-appropriate, and stable place for them to live; assured that other
needed medical, behavioral, and social services are in place; and is contracted
to monitor the person's progress on an ongoing basis. The department and the
regional support networks shall endeavor to assure that hospital patients are
able to return to their area of origin, and that placements are not
concentrated in proximity to the hospitals.

(d) For each month
subsequent to the month in which a state hospital bed has been closed in
accordance with (c) of this subsection, the mental health program shall
transfer to the medical assistance program state funds equal to the state share
of the monthly per capita expenditure amount estimated for categorically
needy-disabled persons in the most recent forecast of medical assistance
expenditures.

(e) The department
shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1,
2001, and by November 1, 2002, on its plans for and progress toward achieving
the objectives set forth in (c) of this subsection.

(3) CIVIL COMMITMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((20,037,000))

18,267,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((22,441,000))

19,120,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((42,478,000))

37,387,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) (($2,062,000))
$1,587,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and (($3,698,000)) $2,646,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for operational costs
associated with a less restrictive step-down placement facility on McNeil
Island.

(b) (($1,000,000))
$300,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and (($1,000,000)) $300,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for mitigation funding
for jurisdictions affected by the placement of less restrictive alternative
facilities for persons conditionally released from the special commitment
center facility being constructed on McNeil Island. Of this amount, up to
$45,000 per year is provided for the city of Lakewood for police protection
reimbursement at Western State Hospital and adjacent areas, up to $45,000 per
year is provided for training police personnel on chapter 12, Laws of 2001, 2nd
sp. sess. (3ESSB 6151), up to $125,000 per year is provided for Pierce county
for reimbursement of additional costs, and the remaining amounts are for other
documented costs by jurisdictions directly impacted by the placement of the
secure community transition facility on McNeil Island. Pursuant to chapter 12,
Laws of 2001, 2nd sp. sess (3ESSB 6151), the department shall continue to work
with local jurisdictions towards reaching agreement for mitigation costs.

(c) By October 1, 2001,
the department shall report to the office of financial management and the
fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate detailing
information on plans for increasing the efficiency of staffing patterns at the
new civil commitment center facility being constructed on McNeil Island.

(d) $600,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6594 (secure community
transition facilities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 444,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((443,000))

57,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((2,082,000))

1,802,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((2,969,000))

2,303,000

(5) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((3,104,000))

2,979,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((3,231,000))

2,986,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............................. $.................................. ((5,796,000))

5,371,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((12,131,000))

11,336,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $113,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $125,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $164,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
institute for public policy to evaluate the impacts of chapter 214, Laws of
1999 (mentally ill offenders), chapter 217, Laws of 2000 (atypical
anti-psychotic medications), chapter 297, Laws of 1998 (commitment of mentally
ill persons), and chapter 334, Laws of 2001 (mental health performance audit).

(b) $168,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $243,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $411,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
development and implementation of a uniform outcome-oriented performance
measurement system to be used in evaluating and managing the community mental
health service delivery system consistent with the recommendations contained in
the joint legislative audit and review committee's audit of the public mental
health system. Once implemented, the use of performance measures will allow
comparison of measurement results to established standards and benchmarks among
regional support networks, service providers, and against other states. The
department shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on the development and implementation of the use of performance
measures by October 2002.

(c) (($125,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
$125,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2003, and $250,000 of the general fund‑‑federal appropriation are
provided solely for a study of the prevalence of mental illness among the
state's regional support networks. The study)) From funds appropriated
in this subsection, the department shall examine how reasonable estimates
of the prevalence of mental illness relate to the incidence of persons enrolled
in medical assistance programs in each regional support network area. In
conducting this study, the department shall consult with the joint legislative
audit and review committee, regional support networks, community mental health
providers, and mental health consumer representatives. The department shall
submit a final report on its findings to the fiscal, health care, and human
services committees of the legislature by November 1, 2003.

Sec. 205. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 205
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((231,693,000))

233,705,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((242,347,000))

257,896,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((396,151,000))

402,748,000

Health Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((741,000))

903,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((870,932,000))

895,252,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The legislature
finds that comprehensive reform of the developmental disabilities program is
required. Recent audits and litigation indicate a need to improve the quality
of program data, strengthen program and fiscal management, and clarify the
criteria and determination of eligibility for services. Additional resources
are also needed to expand access to community services. The appropriations in
this section are intended to address the most urgent needs while strengthening
program and fiscal accountability. The department shall provide monthly
progress reports to the appropriate committees of the legislature on actions
taken in three areas: The implementation of expanded services, the development
and implementation of a new home and community based medicaid waiver, and
improvements in program and fiscal management.

(b) $13,705,000 of
the fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation and $2,096,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for expanded
access to community services. These amounts are intended to provide family
support for an additional 3,000 families, expanded residential services for an
additional 175 clients by the end of the biennium, and an additional 267
clients transitioning from high school to work. New funding for family support
and high school transition along with a portion of existing funding for these
programs shall be provided as supplemental security income (SSI) state
supplemental payments. The legislature finds that providing cash assistance to
individuals and families needing these supports promotes self-determination and
independence. It is the intent of the legislature that the department shall
comply with federal requirements to maintain aggregate funding for SSI state
supplemental payments while promoting self-determination and independence for
persons with developmental disabilities in families with low and moderate
incomes. This funding is also provided to increase the number of case workers
supporting clients receiving community services. These amounts and the
specified expansion of community services are intended to be the fiscal
component of the negotiated settlement in the pending litigation on
developmental disabilities services, ARC v. Quasim.

(c) The health
services account appropriation and $753,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for health care benefits for home care
workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty level who
are employed through state contracts for twenty hours per week or more.
Premium payments for individual provider home care workers shall be made only
to the subsidized basic health plan. Home care agencies may obtain coverage
either through the basic health plan or through an alternative plan with
substantially equivalent benefits.

(((b))) (d)
$902,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
$3,372,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
and $4,056,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for community services for residents of residential habilitation centers
(RHCs) who are able to be adequately cared for in community settings and who
choose to live in those community settings. The department shall ensure that
the average cost per day for all program services other than start-up costs
shall not exceed $280. If the number and timing of residents choosing to move
into community settings is not sufficient to achieve the RHC cottage
consolidation plan assumed in the appropriations in subsection (2) of this
section, the department shall transfer sufficient appropriations from this
subsection to subsection (2) of this section to cover the added costs incurred
in the RHCs. The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature, within 45 days following each fiscal year quarter, the number of
residents moving into community settings and the actual expenditures for all
community services to support those residents.

(((c) $1,440,000))
(e) $1,153,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, (($3,041,000)) $3,054,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and (($4,311,000)) $4,031,000
of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
expanded community services for persons with developmental disabilities who
also have community protection issues or are diverted or discharged from state
psychiatric hospitals. The department shall ensure that the average cost per
day for all program services other than start-up costs shall not exceed $275.
The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature,
within 45 days following each fiscal year quarter, the number of persons served
with these additional community services, where they were residing, what kinds
of services they were receiving prior to placement, and the actual expenditures
for all community services to support these clients.

(((d) $1,005,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $2,262,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and
$2,588,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for increasing case/resource management resources to improve oversight and
quality of care for persons enrolled in the medicaid home and community
services waiver for persons with developmental disabilities.)) (f)
The department shall not increase total enrollment in home and community based
waivers for persons with developmental disabilities except for ((increases))
changes assumed in additional funding provided in subsections (b) ((and
(c))), (d), and (e) of this section. Prior to submitting to the
health care financing authority any additional home and community based waiver
request for persons with developmental disabilities, the department shall
submit a summary of the waiver request to the appropriate committees of the
legislature. The summary shall include eligibility criteria, program description,
enrollment projections and limits, and budget and cost effectiveness
projections that distinguish the requested waiver from other existing or
proposed waivers.

(((e))) (g)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for employment, or other day activities and training
programs, for young adults with developmental disabilities who complete their
high school curriculum in 2001 or 2002. These services are intended to assist
with the transition to work and more independent living. Funding shall be used
to the greatest extent possible for vocational rehabilitation services matched
with federal funding. In recent years, the state general fund appropriation
for employment and day programs has been underspent. These surpluses, built
into the carry forward level budget, shall be redeployed for high school
transition services.

(((f))) (h)
$369,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$369,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for continuation of the autism pilot project started in 1999.

(((g))) (i)
$4,049,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
$1,734,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
and $5,369,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely to increase compensation by an average of fifty cents per hour for
low-wage workers providing state-funded services to persons with developmental
disabilities. These funds, along with funding provided for vendor rate
increases, are sufficient to raise wages an average of fifty cents and cover
the employer share of unemployment and social security taxes on the amount of
the wage increase. In consultation with the statewide associations
representing such agencies, the department shall establish a mechanism for
testing the extent to which funds have been used for this purpose, and report
the results to the fiscal committees of the legislature by February 1, 2002.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((71,977,000))

69,375,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((69,303,000))

68,203,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((145,641,000))

145,672,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((10,230,000))

11,230,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((297,151,000))

294,480,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
Pursuant to RCW 71A.12.160, if residential habilitation center capacity is not
being used for permanent residents, the department ((may)) shall
make residential habilitation center vacancies available for respite care and
any other services needed to care for clients who are not currently being
served in a residential habilitation center and whose needs require staffing
levels similar to current residential habilitation center residents. Providing
respite care shall not impede the department's ability to consolidate cottages,
and maintain expenditures within allotments, as assumed in the
appropriations in this subsection.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((2,601,000))

1,711,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((2,623,000))

2,237,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((2,413,000))

2,742,000

Telecommunications
Devices for the Hearing and

Speech Impaired
Account Appropriation...... $ 1,767,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((7,637,000))

8,457,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $500,000 of the
fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation and $300,000 of the
general fund‑‑federal appropriation are provided solely for
improved fiscal management of the home and community-based waiver and other
community services.

(b) (($50,000
of the fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation and $50,000 of
the fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation are)) $100,000
of the telecommunications devices for the hearing and speech impaired account
appropriation is provided solely for increasing the contract amount for the
southeast Washington deaf and hard of hearing services center due to increased
workload.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 11,995,000

Sec. 206. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 206
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-AGING AND ADULT SERVICES
PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((518,911,000))

506,139,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((537,907,000))

511,575,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((1,078,417,000))

1,051,847,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((4,324,000))

11,803,000

Health Services Account‑-State

Appropriation....... ...................... $ 4,523,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((2,144,082,000))

2,085,887,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The entire health
services account appropriation, $1,210,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,423,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $6,794,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for health care benefits for home care
workers who are employed through state contracts for at least twenty hours per
week. Premium payments for individual provider home care workers shall be made
only to the subsidized basic health plan, and only for persons with incomes
below 200 percent of the federal poverty level. Home care agencies may obtain
coverage either through the basic health plan or through an alternative plan
with substantially equivalent benefits.

(2) $1,706,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,706,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, plus the
associated vendor rate increase for each year, are provided solely for
operation of the volunteer chore services program.

(3) For purposes of
implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted average nursing facility payment
rate shall be no more than $128.79 for fiscal year 2002, and no more than (($134.45))
$132.58 for fiscal year 2003. For all facilities, the therapy care,
support services, and operations component rates established in accordance with
chapter 74.46 RCW shall be adjusted for economic trends and conditions by 2.1
percent effective July 1, 2001, and by an additional ((2.3)) 1.5
percent effective July 1, 2002. For case-mix facilities, direct care component
rates established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW shall also be adjusted
for economic trends and conditions by 2.1 percent effective July 1, 2001, and
by an additional 2.3 percent effective July 1, 2002. Additionally, to
facilitate the transition to a fully case-mix based direct care payment system,
the median price per case-mix unit for each of the applicable direct care peer
groups shall be increased on a one-time basis by 2.64 percent effective July 1,
2002.

(4) In accordance with
Substitute House Bill No. 2242 (nursing home rates), the department shall issue
certificates of capital authorization which result in up to $10 million of
increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2003; in
up to $27 million of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in
fiscal year 2004; and in up to $27 million of increased asset value completed
and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2005.

(5) Adult day health
services shall not be considered a duplication of services for persons
receiving care in long-term care settings licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36,
or 70.128 RCW.

(6) Within funds
appropriated in this section and in section 204 of this act, the aging and
adult services program shall coordinate with and actively support the efforts
of the mental health program and of the regional support networks to provide
stable community living arrangements for persons with dementia and traumatic
brain injuries who have been long-term residents of the state psychiatric
hospitals. The aging and adult services program shall report to the health
care and fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1, 2001, and by
November 1, 2002, on the actions it has taken to achieve this objective.

(7) Within funds
appropriated in this section and in section 204 of this act, the aging and
adult services program shall devise and implement strategies in partnership
with the mental health program and the regional support networks to reduce the
use of state and local psychiatric hospitals for the short-term stabilization
of persons with dementia and traumatic brain injuries. Such strategies may
include training and technical assistance to help long-term care providers
avoid and manage behaviors which might otherwise result in psychiatric
hospitalizations; monitoring long-term care facilities to assure residents are
receiving appropriate mental health care and are not being inappropriately
medicated or hospitalized; the development of diversion beds and stabilization
support teams; and the establishment of systems to track the use of psychiatric
hospitals by long-term care providers. The aging and adult services program
shall report to the health care and fiscal committees of the legislature by November
1, 2001, and by November 1, 2002, on the actions it has taken to achieve this
objective.

(8) In accordance with
Substitute House Bill No. 1341, the department may implement ((two)) a
medicaid waiver program((s)) for persons who do not qualify for such
services as categorically needy, subject to federal approval and the following
conditions and limitations:

(a) ((One)) The
waiver program shall include coverage of ((home-based services, and the
second shall include coverage of)) care in community residential
facilities. ((Enrollment in the waiver covering home-based services shall
not exceed 150 persons by the end of fiscal year 2002, nor 200 persons by the
end of fiscal year 2003.)) Enrollment in the waiver ((covering
community residential services)) shall not exceed ((500)) 50
persons by the end of fiscal year 2002, nor ((900)) 600 persons
by the end of fiscal year 2003.

(b) For each month of
waiver service delivered to a person who was not covered by medicaid prior to
their enrollment in the waiver, the aging and adult services program shall
transfer to the medical assistance program state and federal funds equal to the
monthly per capita expenditure amount, net of drug rebates, estimated for
medically needy-aged persons in the most recent forecast of medical assistance
expenditures.

(c) The department
shall identify the number of medically needy nursing home residents, and
enrollment and expenditures on ((each of)) the ((two)) medically
needy waiver((s)), on monthly management reports.

(d) The department
shall track and report to health care and fiscal committees of the legislature
by November 15, 2002, on the types of long-term care support a sample of waiver
participants were receiving prior to their enrollment in the waiver, how those
services were being paid for, and an assessment of their adequacy.

(9) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for payments to any nursing facility licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW
which meets all of the following criteria: (a) The nursing home entered into
an arm's length agreement for a facility lease prior to January 1, 1980; (b)
the lessee purchased the leased nursing home after January 1, 1980; and (c) the
lessor defaulted on its loan or mortgage for the assets of the home after
January 1, 1991, and prior to January 1, 1992. Payments provided pursuant to
this subsection shall not be subject to the settlement, audit, or rate-setting
requirements contained in chapter 74.46 RCW.

(10) $364,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $364,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $740,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for payment
of exceptional care rates so that persons with Alzheimer's disease and related
dementias who might otherwise require nursing home or state hospital care can
instead be served in boarding home-licensed facilities which specialize in the
care of such conditions.

(11) From funds
appropriated in this section, the department shall increase compensation for
individual and for agency home care providers. Payments to individual home
care providers are to be increased from $7.18 per hour to $7.68 per hour on
July 1, 2001. Payments to agency providers are to be increased to $13.30 per
hour on July 1, 2001, and to $13.44 per hour on July 1, 2002. All but 18 cents
per hour of the July 1, 2001, increase to agency providers is to be used to
increase wages for direct care workers. The appropriations in this section
also include the funds needed for the employer share of unemployment and social
security taxes on the amount of the wage increase required by this subsection.

(12) $2,507,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $2,595,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $5,100,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
prospective rate increases intended to increase compensation by an average of
fifty cents per hour for low-wage workers in agencies which contract with the
state to provide community residential services for persons with functional
disabilities. In consultation with the statewide associations representing
such agencies, the department shall establish a mechanism for testing the
extent to which funds have been used for this purpose, and report the results
to the fiscal committees of the legislature by February 1, 2002. The amounts
in this subsection also include the funds needed for the employer share of
unemployment and social security taxes on the amount of the wage increase.

(13) $1,082,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,082,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $2,204,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
prospective rate increases intended to increase compensation for low-wage
workers in nursing homes which contract with the state. For fiscal year 2002,
the department shall add forty-five cents per patient day to the direct care
rate which would otherwise be paid to each nursing facility in accordance with
chapter 74.46 RCW. For fiscal year 2003, the department shall increase the
median price per case-mix unit for each of the applicable peer groups by
six-tenths of one percent in order to distribute the available funds. In
consultation with the statewide associations representing nursing facilities,
the department shall establish a mechanism for testing the extent to which
funds have been used for this purpose, and report the results to the fiscal
committees of the legislature by February 1, 2002.

Sec. 207. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 207
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((436,440,000))

442,984,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((424,870,000))

409,911,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((1,356,351,000))

1,359,505,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((31,788,000))

33,880,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION ................. $ ((2,249,449,000))

2,246,280,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($282,081,000))
$281,035,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, (($278,277,000)) $292,231,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, $1,254,197,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation, and (($29,352,000)) $31,444,000 of the general
fund‑-local appropriation are provided solely for the WorkFirst program
and child support operations. WorkFirst expenditures include TANF grants,
diversion services, subsidized child care, employment and training, other
WorkFirst related services, allocated field services operating costs, and
allocated economic services program administrative costs. Within the amounts
provided in this subsection, the department shall:

(a) Continue to
implement WorkFirst program improvements that are designed to achieve progress
against outcome measures specified in RCW 74.08A.410. Valid outcome measures
of job retention and wage progression shall be developed and reported quarterly
to appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature for families who
leave assistance, measured after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months. An
increased attention to job retention and wage progression is necessary to
emphasize the legislature's goal that the WorkFirst program succeed in helping
recipients gain long-term economic independence and not cycle on and off public
assistance. The wage progression measure shall report the median percentage
increase in quarterly earnings and hourly wage after 12 months, 24 months, and
36 months. The wage progression report shall also report the percent with
earnings above one hundred percent and two hundred percent of the federal
poverty level. The report shall compare former WorkFirst participants with
similar workers who did not participate in WorkFirst. The department shall
also report the percentage of families who have returned to temporary
assistance for needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months.

(b) Develop
informational materials that educate families about the difference between cash
assistance and work support benefits. These materials must explain, among
other facts, that the benefits are designed to support their employment, that
there are no time limits on the receipt of work support benefits, and that
immigration or residency status will not be affected by the receipt of
benefits. These materials shall be posted in all community service offices and
distributed to families. Materials must be available in multiple languages.
When a family leaves the temporary assistance for needy families program,
receives cash diversion assistance, or withdraws a temporary assistance for
needy families application, the department of social and health services shall
educate them about the difference between cash assistance and work support
benefits and offer them the opportunity to begin or to continue receiving work
support benefits, so long as they are eligible. The department shall provide
this information through in-person interviews, over the telephone, and/or
through the mail. Work support benefits include food stamps, medicaid for all
family members, medicaid or state children's health insurance program for
children, and child care assistance. The department shall report annually to
the legislature the number of families who have had exit interviews, been
reached successfully by phone, and been sent mail. The report shall also
include the percentage of families who elect to continue each of the benefits
and the percentage found ineligible by each substantive reason code. A
substantive reason code shall not be "other." The report shall
identify barriers to informing families about work support benefits and
describe existing and future actions to overcome such barriers.

(c) From the amounts
provided in this subsection, provide $50,000 from the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $50,000 from the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 to the Washington institute for public
policy for continuation of the WorkFirst evaluation database.

(d) Submit a report by
December 1, 2001, to the fiscal committees of the legislature containing a
spending plan for the WorkFirst program. The plan shall identify how spending
levels in the 2001-2003 biennium will be adjusted by June 30, 2003, to be
sustainable within available federal grant levels and the carryforward level of
state funds.

(e) Reduce funding
contracted to the department of employment security in order to maintain
funding for drug and alcohol treatment services designed to help TANF parents
enter the job market and keep their jobs.

(2) (($48,341,000))
$54,623,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and (($48,341,000)) $51,268,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for cash assistance and
other services to recipients in the general assistance‑-unemployable
program. Within these amounts, the department may expend funds for services
that assist recipients to reduce their dependence on public assistance,
provided that expenditures for these services and cash assistance do not exceed
the funds provided.

(3) $5,632,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($5,632,000))
$1,132,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for the food assistance program for legal
immigrants. The level of benefits shall be equivalent to the benefits provided
by the federal food stamp program.

(4) $48,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided
solely to implement chapter 111, Laws of 2001 (veterans/Philippines).

(5) The department
shall apply the provisions of RCW 74.04.005(10) to simplify resource
eligibility policy, make such policy consistent with other federal public
assistance programs, and achieve the budgetary savings assumed in this section.

Sec. 208. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 208
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE
ABUSE PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((38,047,000))

35,851,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((38,938,000))

37,622,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((91,695,000))

91,563,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 723,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((13,733,000))

13,321,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((52,510,000))

51,764,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((235,646,000))

230,844,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($1,610,000))
$810,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and $1,622,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for expansion of 35 drug and alcohol treatment
beds for persons committed under RCW 70.96A.140. Patients meeting the
commitment criteria of RCW 70.96A.140 but who voluntarily agree to treatment in
lieu of commitment shall also be eligible for treatment in these additional
treatment beds. The department shall develop specific placement criteria for
these expanded treatment beds to ensure that this new treatment capacity is
prioritized for persons incapacitated as a result of chemical dependency and
who are also high utilizers of hospital services. These additional treatment
beds shall be located in the eastern part of the state.

(2) (($2,800,000))
$1,400,000 of the public safety and education account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for expansion of treatment for persons gravely
disabled by abuse and addiction to alcohol and other drugs including
methamphetamine.

(3) $1,083,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for adult and juvenile drug courts that have a net loss of federal grant
funding in state fiscal year 2002 and state fiscal year 2003. This
appropriation is intended to cover approximately one-half of lost federal
funding. It is the intent of the legislature to provide state assistance to
counties to cover a part of lost federal funding for drug courts for a maximum
of three years.

(4) $1,993,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation and $951,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for drug and
alcohol treatment for SSI clients. The department shall continue research and
post-program evaluation of these clients to further determine the
post-treatment utilization of medical services and the service effectiveness of
consolidation.

(5) $500,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation for fiscal year
2003 is provided solely for the department to provide treatment for
pathological gambling or training for the treatment of pathological gambling
under Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6560 (shared game lottery). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 209. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 209
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((1,028,885,000))

1,072,650,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,130,904,000))

1,132,694,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((3,637,511,000))

3,619,014,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((276,147,000))

211,272,000

Emergency Medical Services
and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account‑-State
Appropriation......... $ 9,200,000

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ ((1,043,310,000))

1,108,727,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((7,125,957,000))

7,153,557,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department
shall increase its efforts to restrain the growth of health care costs. The
appropriations in this section anticipate that the department implements a
combination of cost containment and utilization strategies sufficient to reduce
general fund‑-state costs by approximately 3 percent below the level
projected for the 2001-03 biennium in the March 2001 forecast. The department
shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2001, on
its specific plans and semiannual targets for accomplishing these savings. The
department shall report again to the fiscal committees by March 1, 2002, and by
September 1, 2002, on actual performance relative to the semiannual targets.
If satisfactory progress is not being made to achieve the targeted savings, the
reports shall include recommendations for additional or alternative measures to
control costs.

(2) The department shall
continue to extend medicaid eligibility to children through age 18 residing in
households with incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty level.

(3) In determining
financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the department is
authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds
or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.

(4) $502,000 of the
health services account appropriation, $400,000 of the general fund‑-private/local
appropriation, and $1,676,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation
are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1058
(breast and cervical cancer treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2001, or if private funding is not contributed equivalent to the general fund‑-private/local
appropriation, the funds appropriated in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $620,000 of the
health services account appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,380,000 of the
health services account appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $2,000,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of a "ticket to work" medicaid buy-in program for
working persons with disabilities, operated in accordance with the following
conditions:

(a) To be eligible, a
working person with a disability must have total income which is less than 450
percent of poverty;

(b) Participants shall
participate in the cost of the program by paying (i) a monthly enrollment fee
equal to fifty percent of any unearned income in excess of the medicaid
medically needy standard; and (ii) a monthly premium equal to 5 percent of all
unearned income, plus 5 percent of all earned income after disregarding the
first sixty-five dollars of monthly earnings, and half the remainder;

(c) The department
shall establish more restrictive eligibility standards than specified in this
subsection to the extent necessary to operate the program within appropriated
funds;

(d) The department may
require point-of-service copayments as appropriate, except that copayments
shall not be so high as to discourage appropriate service utilization,
particularly of prescription drugs needed for the treatment of psychiatric
conditions; and

(e) The department
shall establish systems for tracking and reporting enrollment and expenditures
in this program, and the prior medical assistance eligibility status of new
program enrollees. The department shall additionally survey the prior and
current employment status and approximate hours worked of program enrollees, and
report the results to the fiscal and health care committees of the legislature
by January 15, 2003.

(6) From funds
appropriated in this section, the department shall design, implement, and
evaluate pilot projects to assist individuals with at least three different
diseases to improve their health, while reducing total medical expenditures.
The projects shall involve (a) identifying persons who are seriously or
chronically ill due to a combination of medical, social, and functional
problems; and (b) working with the individuals and their care providers to
improve adherence to state-of-the-art treatment regimens. The department shall
report to the health care and the fiscal committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2002, on the particular disease states, intervention protocols, and
delivery mechanisms it proposes to test.

(7) Sufficient funds
are appropriated in this section for the department to continue full-scope
dental coverage, vision coverage, and podiatry services for medicaid-eligible
adults.

(8) The legislature
reaffirms that it is in the state's interest for Harborview medical center to
remain an economically viable component of the state's health care system.

(9) $80,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $80,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $160,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
newborn referral program to provide access and outreach to reduce infant
mortality.

(10) $30,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $31,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $62,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation
of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6020 (dental sealants). If Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6020 is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(11) In accordance with
RCW 74.46.625, (($376,318,000)) $528,171,000 of the health
services account appropriation ((for fiscal year 2002, $144,896,000 of the
health services account appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $542,089,000))
and $526,014,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by rural
public hospital districts. The payments shall be conditioned upon (a) a
contractual commitment by the association of public hospital districts and
participating rural public hospital districts to make an intergovernmental
transfer to the state treasurer, for deposit into the health services account,
equal to at least 98 percent of the supplemental payments; and (b) a
contractual commitment by the participating districts to not allow expenditures
covered by the supplemental payments to be used for medicaid nursing home
rate-setting. The participating districts shall retain no more than a total of
$20,000,000 for the 2001-03 biennium.

(12) (($38,690,000))
$39,121,000 of the health services account appropriation for fiscal year
2002, (($40,189,000)) $40,337,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and (($80,241,000)) $79,628,000
of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
additional disproportionate share and medicare upper payment limit payments to
public hospital districts.

(((a))) The
payments shall be conditioned upon a contractual commitment by the
participating public hospital districts to make an intergovernmental transfer
to the health services account equal to at least 91 percent of the additional
payments. At least 28 percent of the amounts retained by the participating
hospital districts shall be allocated to the state's teaching hospitals.

(((b) An additional
4.5 percent of the additional payments may be retained by the participating
public hospital districts contingent upon the receipt of $446,500,000 in newly
identified proshare reimbursement from the federal government over the 2001-03
biennium. If the actual amount received is less than $446,500,000, the amount
retained pursuant to this subsection (12)(b) shall be prorated accordingly.
The state teaching hospitals shall receive a distribution of the amount
retained by the participating hospital districts in this subsection (12)(b) as
allocated in (a) of this subsection.))

(13) $412,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $862,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and
$730,000 of the general fund‑‑federal appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1162 (small rural
hospitals). If Substitute House Bill No. 1162 is not enacted by June 30, 2001,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) The department may
continue to use any federal money available to continue to provide medicaid
matching funds for funds contributed by local governments for purposes of
conducting eligibility outreach to children and underserved groups. The
department shall ensure cooperation with the anticipated audit of the school
districts' matchable expenditures for this program and advise the appropriate
legislative fiscal committees of the findings.

(15) The department
shall coordinate with the health care authority to actively assist children and
immigrant adults not eligible for medicaid to enroll in the basic health plan.

Sec. 210. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 210
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((11,309,000))

11,135,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((9,780,000))

9,385,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((83,738,000))

82,235,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 360,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((105,187,000))

103,115,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The division
of vocational rehabilitation shall negotiate cooperative interagency agreements
with state and local organizations to improve and expand employment
opportunities for people with severe disabilities.

(2) The department
shall actively assist participants in the employment support services program
to obtain other employment or training opportunities over the course of fiscal
year 2003.

Sec. 211. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 211
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((30,444,000))

30,419,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((29,369,000))

22,419,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((50,562,000))

47,135,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 810,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((111,185,000))

100,783,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) By November 1,
2001, the secretary shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on
the actions the secretary has taken, or proposes to take, within current
funding levels to resolve the organizational problems identified in the
department's February 2001 report to the legislature on current systems for
billing third-party payers for services delivered by the state psychiatric
hospitals. The secretary is authorized to transfer funds from this section to
the mental health program to the extent necessary to achieve the organizational
improvements recommended in that report.

(2) By November 1,
2001, the department shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature
with the least costly plan for assuring that billing and accounting technologies
in the state psychiatric hospitals adequately and efficiently comply with
standards set by third-party payers. The plan shall be developed with
participation by and oversight from the office of financial management, the
department's information systems services division, and the department of
information services.

(3) The department
shall reconstitute the payment integrity program to place greater emphasis upon
the prevention of future billing errors, ensure billing and administrative
errors are treated in a manner distinct from allegations of fraud and abuse,
and shall rename the program. In keeping with this revised focus, the
department shall also increase to one thousand dollars the cumulative total of
apparent billing errors allowed before a provider is contacted for repayment.

(4) By September 1,
2001, the department shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature
results from the payment review program. The report shall include actual costs
recovered and estimated costs avoided for fiscal year 2001 and the costs
incurred by the department to administer the program. The report shall
document criteria and methodology used for determining avoided costs. In
addition, the department shall seek input from health care providers and consumer
organizations on modifications to the program. The department shall provide
annual updates to the report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
September 1st of each year for the preceding fiscal year.

(5) The department
shall implement reductions in administrative expenditures assumed in these
appropriations that achieve ongoing savings, reduce duplicative and redundant
work processes, and, where possible, eliminate entire administrative functions
and offices. The department may transfer amounts among sections and programs
to achieve these savings provided that reductions in direct services to clients
and recipients of the department shall not be counted as administrative
reductions. The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature a spending plan to achieve these reductions by July 1, 2002, and
shall report actual achieved administrative savings and projected saving for
the remainder of the biennium by December 1, 2002.

Sec. 212. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 213
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH
CARE AUTHORITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 6,655,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((6,654,000))

3,000,000

State Health Care Authority
Administrative

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((20,091,000))

20,032,000

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ ((499,148,000))

538,828,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((3,611,000))

4,240,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $ 45,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((536,159,000))

569,800,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,551,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $6,550,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for health care services provided through local community clinics.

(2) Within funds
appropriated in this section and sections 205 and 206 of this 2001 act, the
health care authority shall continue to provide an enhanced basic health plan
subsidy option for foster parents licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers
in state-funded home care programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster
parents and home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the
federal poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at a
cost of ten dollars per covered worker per month.

(3) The health care
authority shall require organizations and individuals which are paid to deliver
basic health plan services and which choose to sponsor enrollment in the
subsidized basic health plan to pay the following: (i) A minimum of fifteen
dollars per enrollee per month for persons below 100 percent of the federal
poverty level; and (ii) a minimum of twenty dollars per enrollee per month for
persons whose family income is 100 percent to 125 percent of the federal
poverty level.

(4) The health care
authority shall solicit information from the United States office of personnel
management, health plans, and other relevant sources, regarding the cost of
implementation of mental health parity by the federal employees health benefits
program in 2001. A progress report shall be provided to the senate and house
of representatives fiscal committees by July 1, 2002, and a final report shall
be provided to the legislature by November 15, 2002, on the study findings.

(5) The
administrator shall take at least the following actions to assure that persons
participating in the basic health plan are eligible for the level of assistance
they receive: (a) Require submission of income tax returns and recent pay
history from all applicants; (b) check employment security payroll records at least
once every twelve months on all enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income
as indicated by payroll records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based
to document their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d)
require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot be
obtained to document their current income at least once every six months; and
(e) pursue repayment and civil penalties from persons who have received
excessive subsidies, as provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).

(6) $20,000,000 of
the health services account appropriation is provided solely for enrollment in
the subsidized basic health plan of persons who, solely by reason of their
immigration status, are not eligible for medicaid coverage of their nonemergent
medical care needs.

(7) $3,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided
solely to increase the number of persons not eligible for medicaid receiving
dental care from nonprofit community clinics.

(8) The health care
authority shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the
costs, benefits, and feasibility of implementing a system no later than January
1, 2004, under which the state's contribution to the cost of employee medical
coverage would be graduated according to employee salary. Under the graduated
system, employees in higher salary ranges would pay a larger share of the cost
of their medical coverage, while those paid lower salaries would pay a smaller
percentage of their premium. The report shall be prepared in consultation with
the department of personnel and the state-supported colleges and universities,
and shall be submitted to the fiscal committees no later than December 1, 2002.

(9) In consultation
with the department of personnel and with the state-supported colleges and
universities, the health care authority shall report to the fiscal committees
of the legislature by October 1, 2002, a plan for expanding the availability
and use of flexible spending account plans under which employees may set aside
pretax earnings to cover their out-of-pocket medical costs. The authority is
authorized to proceed with implementation of such a plan to the extent it can
be accomplished within existing state funding levels.

(10) $685,000 of the
health services account appropriation, $629,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation, and the medical aid account appropriation are provided solely
for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6368 (prescription drug
utilization and education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, these
amounts shall lapse.

Sec. 213. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 214
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,688,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((2,700,000))

2,619,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,544,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 100,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((7,032,000))

6,951,000

Sec. 214. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 215
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL
INSURANCE APPEALS

Worker and Community
Right-to-Know Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 20,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ ((14,692,000))

14,785,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... ((14,694,000))

14,788,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((29,406,000))

29,593,000

Sec. 215. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 216
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE
TRAINING COMMISSION

Municipal Criminal Justice
Assistance Account‑-

Local Appropriation........................ $ 460,000

Death Investigations
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 148,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((18,439,000))

18,005,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((19,047,000))

18,613,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $124,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to allow
the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to increase the
technical and training support provided to the local criminal justice agencies
on the new incident-based reporting system and the national incident-based
reporting system.

(2) $136,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to allow
the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys to enhance the training
provided to criminal justice personnel.

(3) (($22,000)) $19,000
of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to
increase payment rates for the criminal justice training commission's
contracted food service provider.

(4) (($31,000)) $27,000
of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to
increase payment rates for the criminal justice training commission's contract
with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

(5) $65,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
regionalized training programs for school district and local law enforcement
officials on school safety issues.

(6) (($233,000 of
the public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
training and equipping local law enforcement officers to respond to
methamphetamine crime.

(7) $374,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of House Bill No. 1062 (certification of peace officers). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(8))) $450,000 of the public safety and education
account appropriation is provided solely for grants to be distributed by the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs for electronic mapping of
school facilities.

Sec. 216. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 217
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((7,738,000))

5,577,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((7,682,000))

5,517,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,250,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((19,862,000))

19,311,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ ((6,950,000))

3,331,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ ((4,200,000))

2,100,000

Asbestos Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 688,000

Electrical License Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 28,412,000

Farm Labor Revolving
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 28,000

Worker and Community
Right-to-Know Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,281,000

Public Works Administration
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,856,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ ((179,186,000))

184,219,000

Accident Account‑-Federal
Appropriation........ $ 11,568,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... ((176,715,000))

178,666,000

Medical Aid Account‑-Federal
Appropriation..... $ 2,438,000

Plumbing Certificate
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,015,000

Pressure Systems Safety
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,274,000))

2,525,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((455,143,000))

451,782,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Pursuant to RCW
7.68.015, the department shall operate the crime victims compensation program
within the public safety and education account funds appropriated in this
section and funds available in the crime victims compensation trust account.
In the event that cost containment measures are necessary, the department may
(a) institute copayments for services; (b) develop preferred provider
contracts; or (c) other cost containment measures. Cost containment measures
shall not include holding invoices received in one fiscal period for payment
from appropriations in subsequent fiscal periods. No more than $5,248,000 of
the public safety and education account appropriation shall be expended for
department administration of the crime victims compensation program.

(2) (($1,438,000 of
the accident account‑-state appropriation and $1,438,000 of the medical
aid account‑-state appropriation are provided for the one-time cost of
implementing a recent state supreme court ruling regarding the calculation of
workers' compensation benefits. This decision significantly increases the
complexity of calculating benefits and therefore increases the administrative
and legal costs of the workers' compensation program. The department shall
develop and report to appropriate committees of the legislature proposed
statutory language that provides greater certainty and simplicity in the
calculation of benefits. The report shall be submitted by October 1, 2001.

(3))) It is the intent of the legislature that
elevator inspection fees shall fully cover the cost of the elevator inspection
program. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2001-03 fiscal biennium the
department may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor, if the
increases are necessary to fully fund the cost of the elevator inspection
program.

(3) $300,000 of the
medical aid account‑-state appropriation is provided for a second center
of occupational health and education to be located on the east side of the
state. These centers train physicians on best practices for occupational
medicine and work with labor and business to improve the quality and outcomes
of medical care provided to injured workers.

Sec. 217. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 218
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE INDETERMINATE SENTENCE
REVIEW BOARD

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 999,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((999,000))

969,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,998,000))

1,968,000

Sec. 218. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 219
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS
AFFAIRS

(1) HEADQUARTERS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,529,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,533,000))

1,484,000

Charitable, Educational,
Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((3,069,000))

3,020,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,619,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((2,643,000))

2,580,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 155,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 1,663,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((7,080,000))

7,017,000

(3) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((6,832,000))

5,765,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((4,600,000))

5,516,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((28,699,000))

27,437,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((25,614,000))

22,828,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((65,745,000))

61,546,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following terms and conditions: (($3,664,000))
$2,886,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation and (($7,377,000))
$5,639,000 of the general fund‑-local appropriation are provided
solely for the department to acquire, establish, and operate a nursing facility
dedicated to serving men and women from Washington who have served in the
nation's armed forces.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
219. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE HOME CARE QUALITY
AUTHORITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)..... $ 152,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided for
start-up costs of the home care quality authority, a new state agency
established by the enactment of Initiative Measure No. 775.

Sec. 220. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 220
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((65,308,000))

57,337,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((66,941,000))

57,805,000

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ ((24,186,000))

33,520,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((276,840,000))

296,992,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((81,526,000))

82,912,000

Hospital Commission Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,718,000))

2,305,000

Health Professions Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((38,456,000))

39,855,000

Emergency Medical Services
and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account‑-State
Appropriation......... $ 14,858,000

Safe Drinking Water Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,701,000))

2,689,000

Drinking Water Assistance
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ ((13,400,000))

13,376,000

Waterworks Operator
Certification‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 622,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 182,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((3,328,000))

3,304,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 257,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $ 45,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,817,000))

2,809,000

Medical Test Site Licensure
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,369,000))

1,801,000

Youth Tobacco Prevention
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,797,000

Tobacco Prevention and
Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((34,992,000))

43,737,000

Worker and Community
Right-To-Know Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 48,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((631,161,000))

656,251,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department or
any successor agency is authorized to raise existing fees charged to the
drinking water operator certification, newborn screening, radioactive
materials, x-ray compliance, drinking water plan review, midwifery, hearing and
speech, veterinarians, psychologists, pharmacists, hospitals, podiatrists, ((and))
home health and home care, transient accommodations licensing, adult
residential rehabilitation facilities licensing, state institution licensing,
medical test site licensing, alcoholism treatment facilities licensing, and
food handlers programs, in excess of the fiscal growth factor established
by Initiative Measure No. 601, if necessary, to meet the actual costs of
conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section.

(2) $339,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and $339,000)),
$157,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003, and the salmon recovery account appropriation are provided solely
for technical assistance to local governments and special districts on water
conservation and reuse.

(3) $1,675,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $1,676,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided solely
for the implementation of the Puget Sound water work plan and agency action
items, DOH-01, DOH-02, DOH-03, and DOH-04.

(4) The department of
health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state
general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The
department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does
not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted
federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act
or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal
amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any
moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects
or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(5) (($5,779,000))
$19,778,000 of the health services account‑-state appropriation ((for
fiscal year 2002 and $4,665,000 of the health services account‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are)) is provided solely for ((purchase
and distribution of the pneumococcal conjugate vaccine as part of)) the
state's program of universal access to essential childhood vaccines. The
department shall utilize all available federal funding before expenditure of
these funds.

(6) $85,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $65,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1365 (infant and
child products). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) (($58,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $25,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1590
(breastfeeding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8))) From funds appropriated in this section, the
state board of health shall convene a broadly-based task force to review the
available information on the potential risks and benefits to public and
personal health and safety, and to individual privacy, of emerging technologies
involving human deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA). The board may reimburse task
force members for travel expenses according to RCW 43.03.220. The task force
shall consider information provided to it by interested persons on: (a) The
incidence of discriminatory actions based upon genetic information; (b)
strategies to safeguard civil rights and privacy related to genetic
information; (c) remedies to compensate individuals for inappropriate use of
their genetic information; and (d) incentives for further research and
development on the use of DNA to promote public health, safety, and welfare.
The task force shall report on its findings and any recommendations to appropriate
committees of the legislature by October 1, 2002.

(((9))) (8)
$533,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and (($1,067,000)) $847,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for performance-based
contracts with local jurisdictions to assure the safety of drinking water
provided by small "group B" water systems.

(9) By October 1,
2002, the department shall adopt rules and establish mechanisms under which the
state's contribution to the cost of care for recipients of HIV early
intervention services whose incomes are above 125 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be adjusted on a sliding-scale basis. The rules shall
provide for the percentage of costs for which the state is responsible to
decrease according to the recipient's income, and shall further provide for an
annual limit on out-of-pocket expenditures for recipients at each income range.

(10) By December 1,
2002, the department shall report to appropriate committees of the legislature
with a feasibility analysis of implementing an electronic filing system for
death certificates. The study shall be conducted in consultation and
cooperation with local and state registrars, funeral directors, and physicians,
and shall include an analysis of applying an additional fee to death
certificates to cover the cost of developing and operating the electronic
system.

(11) The community
and worker right to know appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
Senate Bill No. 6356 (children's environmental health protection advisory
committee). If Senate Bill No. 6356 is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the
community and worker right-to-know account appropriation in this section shall
lapse.

Sec. 221. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 221
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

The appropriations
to the department of corrections in this act shall be expended for the programs
and in the amounts specified herein. However, after May 1, 2002, after
approval by the director of financial management and unless specifically
prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund‑-state
appropriations for fiscal year 2002 between programs. The director of
financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives in writing prior to approving any
deviations from appropriation levels.

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((36,156,000))

36,786,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((36,365,000))

36,212,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,576,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement

Account Appropriation...................... $ 3,254,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((77,351,000))

77,828,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$4,623,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
$4,623,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
and $3,254,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation are provided solely for the replacement of the department's
offender-based tracking system. This amount is conditioned on the department
satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this act. The department shall
prepare an assessment of the fiscal impact of any changes to the replacement
project. The assessment shall:

(a) Include a description
of any changes to the replacement project;

(b) Provide the
estimated costs for each component in the 2001-03 and subsequent biennia;

(c) Include a schedule
that provides the time estimated to complete changes to each component of the
replacement project; and

(d) Be provided to the
office of financial management, the department of information services, the
information services board, and the staff of the fiscal committees of the
senate and the house of representatives no later than November 1, 2002.

(2) CORRECTIONAL
OPERATIONS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((397,231,000))

404,390,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((407,078,000))

412,717,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((12,096,000))

9,142,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((1,614,000))

1,582,000

Public Health Services
Account Appropriation... $ 1,453,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((819,472,000))

829,284,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department may
expend funds generated by contractual agreements entered into for mitigation of
severe overcrowding in local jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual
costs shall be deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not
exceed revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as recovery of
costs.

(b) The department
shall provide funding for the pet partnership program at the Washington
corrections center for women at a level at least equal to that provided in the
1995-97 biennium.

(c) The department of
corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the least possible
impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff, and correctional
industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff
means employees responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.

(d) $553,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($1,171,000))
$956,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely to increase payment rates for contracted education
providers, contracted chemical dependency providers, and contracted work
release facilities.

(e) During the 2001-03
biennium, when contracts are established or renewed for offender pay phone and
other telephone services provided to inmates, the department shall select the
contractor or contractors primarily based on the following factors: (i) The
lowest rate charged to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone
call; and (ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department to
provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient revenues for
the activities funded from the institutional welfare betterment account as of
January 1, 2000.

(f) For the acquisition
of properties and facilities, the department of corrections is authorized to
enter into financial contracts, paid for from operating resources, for the
purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. This
authority applies to the following: Lease-develop with the option to purchase
or lease-purchase approximately 50 work release beds in facilities throughout
the state for $3,500,000.

(g) $22,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $76,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6151 (high
risk sex offenders in the civil commitment and criminal justice systems). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(h) The department may
acquire a ferry for no more than $1,000,000 from Washington state ferries.
Funds expended for this purpose will be recovered from the sale of marine
assets.

(i) $31,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6473 or Substitute House
Bill No. 2468 (DNA database). If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2002, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(j) $53,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6490 (motor
vehicle theft). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(k) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
for the initial implementation of a medical algorithm practice program within
the department's facilities. The program shall be designed to achieve clinical
efficacy and costs efficiency in the utilization of psychiatric drugs.

(3) COMMUNITY
SUPERVISION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((61,427,000))

68,097,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((62,934,000))

70,542,000

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((1,125,000))

870,000

Public Safety and Education

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((15,841,000))

15,358,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((141,327,000))

154,867,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of
corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the least possible
impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff, and correctional
industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff
means employees responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.

(b) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the department of corrections to contract with the institute for
public policy for responsibilities assigned in chapter 196, Laws of 1999
(offender accountability act) and sections 7 through 12 of chapter 197, Laws of
1999 (drug offender sentencing).

(c) $16,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($34,000))
$28,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely to increase payment rates for contracted chemical
dependency providers.

(d) $30,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $30,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5118 (interstate
compact for adult offender supervision). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2001, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) CORRECTIONAL
INDUSTRIES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 631,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 629,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,260,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$110,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $110,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for transfer to the jail industries board. The board
shall use the amounts provided only for administrative expenses, equipment
purchases, and technical assistance associated with advising cities and
counties in developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and
efficient offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY
PAYMENTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 18,568,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 18,569,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 37,137,000

Sec. 222. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 222
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES
FOR THE BLIND

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((1,693,000))

1,652,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,628,000))

1,588,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((11,140,000))

12,643,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 80,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((14,541,000))

15,963,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $50,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $50,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely to increase state assistance for a comprehensive program of
training and support services for persons who are both deaf and blind.

Sec. 223. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 223
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES
COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 936,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((857,000))

832,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,793,000))

1,768,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

$78,000 of the general
fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely for the
sentencing guidelines commission to conduct a comprehensive review and
evaluation of state sentencing policy. The review and evaluation shall include
an analysis of whether current sentencing ranges and standards, as well as
existing mandatory minimum sentences, existing sentence enhancements, and
special sentencing alternatives, are consistent with the purposes of the
sentencing reform act as set out in RCW 9.94A.010, including the intent of the
legislature to emphasize confinement for the violent offender and alternatives
to confinement for the nonviolent offender. The review and evaluation shall
also examine whether current sentencing ranges and standards are consistent
with existing corrections capacity.

The review and
evaluation shall consider studies on the cost-effectiveness of sentencing
alternatives, as well as the fiscal impact of sentencing policies on state and
local government. In conducting the review and evaluation, the commission
shall consult with the superior court judges' association, the Washington
association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington defenders' association,
the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, organizations representing crime
victims, and other organizations and individuals with expertise and interest in
sentencing policy.

Not later than December
1, 2001, the commission shall present to the appropriate standing committees of
the legislature the report of its comprehensive review and evaluation, together
with any recommendations for revisions and modifications to state sentencing
policy, including sentencing ranges and standards, mandatory minimum sentences,
and sentence enhancements. If implementation of the recommendations of the
commission would result in exceeding the capacity of correctional facilities,
the commission shall at the same time present to the legislature a list of
revised standard sentence ranges which are consistent with currently authorized
rated and operational corrections capacity, and consistent with the purposes of
the sentencing reform act.

Sec. 224. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 224
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY
DEPARTMENT

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 180,628,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 30,119,000

Unemployment Compensation
Administration Account‑-

Federal Appropriation...................... $ ((181,677,000))

194,167,000

Administrative Contingency
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 13,914,000

Employment Service
Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 20,001,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((426,339,000))

438,829,000

(End
of part)

PART
III

NATURAL RESOURCES

Sec. 301. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 301
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER
GORGE COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 398,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ ((391,000))

379,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation........... $ 749,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ ((1,538,000))

1,526,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $40,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $40,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely to implement the scenic area management plan for Klickitat
county. If Klickitat county adopts an ordinance to implement the scenic area
management plan in accordance with the national scenic area act, P.L. 99-663,
then the amounts provided in this subsection shall be provided as a grant to
Klickitat county to implement its responsibilities under the act.

Sec. 302. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 302
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((46,633,000))

39,373,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((44,481,000))

34,163,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 56,805,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 4,351,000

Special Grass Seed Burning
Research Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 14,000

Reclamation Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,810,000))

1,935,000

Flood Control Assistance
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 4,098,000

State Emergency Water
Projects Revolving Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 878,000

Waste
Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((13,537,000))

13,850,000

State Drought Preparedness
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((5,325,000))

2,575,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 250,000

State and Local
Improvements Revolving Account

(Water Supply
Facilities)‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 587,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((12,481,000))

22,375,000

Wood Stove Education and
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 353,000

Worker and Community
Right-to-Know Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((3,288,000))

3,235,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((68,931,000))

69,496,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 350,000

Local Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((4,751,000))

4,674,000

Water Quality Permit
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((23,827,000))

23,848,000

Underground Storage Tank
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,682,000

Environmental Excellence
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 504,000

Biosolids Permit Account‑-State
Appropriation... $........................................... ((589,000))

764,000

Hazardous Waste Assistance
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((4,308,000))

4,254,000

Air Pollution Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,066,000))

1,366,000

Oil Spill Prevention
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((7,921,000))

7,758,000

Air Operating Permit Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,608,000))

3,554,000

Freshwater Aquatic Weeds
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,898,000

Oil Spill Response Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,078,000

Metals Mining Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 5,000

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((467,000))

564,000

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

Federal Appropriation...................... $ ((2,316,000))

2,802,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((324,942,000))

316,439,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,874,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $3,874,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, $394,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation, $2,070,000 of the oil spill
prevention account‑-state appropriation, and $3,686,000 of the water
quality permit account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items DOE-01,
DOE-02, DOE-03, DOE-05, DOE-06, DOE‑07, DOE-08, and DOE-09.

(2) $500,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation is provided for an assessment of the
financial assurance requirements of hazardous waste management facilities. By
September 30, 2002, the department shall provide to the governor and
appropriate committees of the legislature a report that: (a) Evaluates current
statutes and regulations governing hazardous waste management facilities; (b)
analyzes and makes recommendations for improving financial assurance regulatory
control; and (c) makes recommendations for funding financial assurance
regulatory control of hazardous waste management facilities.

(3) (($250,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $250,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, $564,000)) $814,000
of the state drought preparedness account‑‑state appropriation, ((and))
$549,000 of the water quality account‑-state appropriation, and
$250,000 of the salmon recovery account‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for enhanced streamflow monitoring in critical salmon recovery
basins. $640,000 of this amount is provided solely to implement the Puget
Sound work plan and agency action item DOE-01.

(4) $1,000,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation in this section is provided solely
for the department to work in cooperation with local jurisdictions to address
emerging storm water management requirements. This work shall include
developing a storm water manual for eastern Washington, technical assistance to
local jurisdictions, and increased implementation of the department's existing
storm water program. $200,000 of this amount is provided solely for
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item DOE-06.

(5) $383,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $383,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for water conservation plan review, technical assistance, and project
review for water conservation and reuse projects. By December 1, 2003, the
department in cooperation with the department of health shall report to the
governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the activities and
achievements related to water conservation and reuse during the past two
biennia. The report shall include an overview of technical assistance
provided, reuse project development activities, and water conservation
achievements.

(6) $3,424,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation is provided solely for
methamphetamine lab clean up activities.

(7) $800,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation is provided solely to implement the
department's persistent, bioaccumulative toxic chemical strategy. $54,000 of
this amount shall be allocated to the department of health to assist with this
effort.

(8) Up to $11,365,000
of the state toxics control account appropriation is provided for the
remediation of contaminated sites. Of this amount, up to $2,000,000 may be
used to pay existing site remediation liabilities owed to the federal
environmental protection agency for clean-up work that has been completed. The
department shall carefully monitor actual revenue collections into the state
toxics control account, and is authorized to limit actual expenditures of the
appropriation provided in this section consistent with available revenue.

(9) $200,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation is provided to assess the
effectiveness of the state's current toxic pollution prevention and dangerous
waste programs and policies. The department shall work with affected
stakeholder groups and the public to evaluate the performance of existing
programs, and identify feasible methods of reducing the generation of these
wastes. The department shall report its findings to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by September 30, 2002.

(10) $1,200,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation is provided solely for the
department, in conjunction with affected local governments, to address emergent
areawide soil contamination problems. The department's efforts will include
public involvement processes and completing assessments of the geographical
extent of toxic contamination including highly contaminated areas.

(11) $170,000 of the
oil spill prevention account appropriation is provided solely for
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan action item UW-02 through a
contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to develop an
educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels,
ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(12) $1,500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $3,000,000 of
the water quality account appropriation are provided solely to implement
chapter 237, Laws of 2001 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1832, water
resources management) and to support the processing of applications for changes
and transfers of existing water rights.

(13) (($4,500,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $4,500,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are)) $9,000,000
of the water quality account‑-state appropriation is provided solely
for grants to local governments to conduct watershed planning and technical
assistance. At least $7,000,000 shall be distributed as grants.

(14) $3,114,000 of the
water quality account appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1832 (water resources management). Of this amount:
(a) $2,100,000 is provided for grants to local governments for targeted
watershed assessments consistent with Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1832;
and (b) the remainder of the funding is provided solely for development of a
state environmental policy act template to streamline environmental review,
creation of a blue ribbon panel to develop long-term watershed planning
implementation funding options, and technical assistance.

(((18))) (15)
$200,000 of the water quality account appropriation is provided solely to
provide coordination and assistance to groups established for the purpose of
protecting, enhancing, and restoring the biological, chemical, and physical
processes of watersheds. These groups may include those involved in coordinated
resource management, regional fisheries enhancement groups, conservation
districts, watershed councils, and private nonprofit organizations incorporated
under Title 24 RCW.

(((19))) (16)
$325,000 of the state drought preparedness account‑-state appropriation
is provided solely for an environmental impact statement of the Pine Hollow
reservoir project to be conducted in conjunction with the local irrigation
district.

(((20) $1,700,000))
(17) $1,352,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2002 and $280,000 of the oil spill prevention account appropriation
are provided solely for oil spill prevention measures in Puget Sound. Of these
amounts:

(a) The general fund
appropriation is provided solely for the department of ecology to provide for
charter safety tug services((. Safety tug services shall include: (i))),
including the placement of a dedicated tug at Neah Bay for not less than
200 days in fiscal year 2002((; and (ii) other safety tug services that may
be released by the department at the request of the United States coast guard
captain of the port for Puget Sound to the areas or incidents that the
department deems to be of highest concern)). By January 10, 2002, the
department shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
regarding the number of dispatches, response time and distance, and other
factors pertaining to the safety tug services. The general fund‑-state
appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item DOE-09;

(b) $100,000 of the oil
spill prevention account appropriation is provided solely for the department to
conduct a vessel transponder feasibility study for Washington waters and
undertake a trial vessel tracking program using transponders. In conducting
the feasibility study and trial program, the department of ecology shall
consult with state pilotage authorities, the maritime industry and the United
States coast guard; and

(c) $180,000 of the oil
spill prevention account appropriation is provided solely to acquire vessel
incident reporting information.

The governor shall
request the federal government to provide ongoing resources to station a
dedicated rescue tug at Neah Bay.

(((21))) (18)
$600,000 of the water quality account‑‑state appropriation is
provided solely for setting instream flows in six basins not currently planning
under the watershed planning act.

(19) The departments
of fish and wildlife, natural resources, and ecology shall jointly evaluate the
feasibility of aligning regional operations and boundaries. The evaluation
shall consider, but not be limited to the following elements: Colocation of
regional and other field offices, administrative efficiencies, geographic boundaries
that conform to water resource inventory areas, and the level of
decision-making authorized for regional and field operations. Jointly, the
departments shall provide a report to the legislature and the office of
financial management by November 1, 2002, on the evaluation. The report shall
include recommendations for changes to regional operations alignment and
consolidation.

(20) $200,000 of the
water quality account appropriation is provided solely for activities
associated with development of the Willapa River total maximum daily load
(TMDL). The activities shall include but are not limited to: (a) A contract
with Pacific county to complete the oxygen/bacteria and temperature model for
the TMDL, conduct a technical analysis of local options for waste load
allocations, and develop the first draft of the waste load allocation plan; and
(b) a contract for facilitation services for a public process for the TMDL,
assist in reaching consensus between parties involved in the technical work,
help ensure that there is an accurate public record, and provide a forum for
the waste load allocation.

(21) $175,000 of the
biosolids permit account is provided solely to develop a statewide septage
strategy. The department shall work with affected stakeholders to address
septage permit requirements, changes to existing rules, clarification of state
and local responsibilities, and fee structure changes that are necessary to
support the program in future biennia. The department shall report its
findings to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June
30, 2003.

(22) $364,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
for the department to contract with the governor's water policy advisor through
fiscal year 2003 and the following activities:

(a)(i) A joint task
force is created to study judicial and administrative alternatives for
resolving water disputes. The task force is organized and led by the office of
the attorney general. In addition to the office of the attorney general,
members of the task force include:

(A) Representatives
of the legislature, including one member from each caucus appointed by the
president of the senate and the speaker of the house;

(B) Representatives
of the superior courts of Washington state appointed by the president of the
superior court judges association, and shall include two judicial officers of
the superior court from eastern Washington and two judicial officers of the
superior court from western Washington;

(C) A representative
of the Washington state court of appeals appointed by the chief justice of the
state supreme court;

(D) A representative
of the environmental hearings office; and

(E) A representative
of the department of ecology.

(ii) The objectives
of the task force are to:

(A) Examine and
characterize the types of water disputes to be resolved;

(B) Examine the
approach of other states to water dispute resolution;

(C) Recommend one or
more methods to resolve water disputes, including, but not limited to, an
administrative resolution process; a judicial resolution process such as water
court; or any combination thereof; and

(D) Recommend an
implementation plan that will address:

(I) A specific
administrative structure for each method used to resolve water disputes;

(II) The cost to
implement the plan; and

(III) The changes to
statutes and administrative rules necessary to implement the plan.

(iii) The office of
the attorney general shall work with the staff of the standing committees of
the legislature with jurisdiction over water resources to research and compile
information relevant to the mission of the task force by December 31, 2002.

(iv) The task force
shall submit its report to the appropriate committees of the legislature no
later than December 30, 2003.

(b) The department
of ecology and the attorney general's office will conduct a study to identify
possible ways to streamline the water right general adjudication procedures.
By December 1, 2002, the agencies will report on their findings and
recommendations to the legislature.

(c)(i) The
legislature finds that it is in the public interest to investigate the
feasibility of conducting negotiations with other states and Canada regarding
use of water bodies they share with the state of Washington.

(ii) The governor,
or the governor's designee, shall consult with the states that share water
bodies with the state of Washington, with Canada, and with other states that
have conducted similar negotiations, regarding issues and strategies in those
negotiations and shall report to the standing committees of the legislature
having jurisdiction over water resources by January 1, 2003.

(iii) In conducting
the consultations under this subsection (c), the governor shall give priority
consideration to the interstate issues affecting the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie
aquifer.

(d) By October 1,
2002, the department of ecology shall provide to the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature, a plan, schedule, and budget for improving the
administration of water right records held by the department of ecology. The
department of ecology shall work with the department of revenue and with county
auditors in developing recommendations for improving the administration of
water rights ownership information and integrating this information with real
property ownership records. The department of ecology shall evaluate the need
for grants to counties to assist with recording and information management
needs related to water rights ownership and title.

(23) $690,000 of the
water quality account appropriation is provided solely for development of
regional water initiatives. Of this amount, $450,000 is provided for the
Columbia River regional initiative, and $240,000 is provided for the Central
Puget Sound regional initiative.

(24) For applicants
that meet eligibility requirements, the department of ecology shall consider
individual stormdrain treatment systems to be classified as
"activity" projects and eligible for grant funding provided under
section 319 the federal Clean Water Act. These projects shall be prioritized
for funding along with other grant proposals. Receipt of funding shall be
based on this prioritization.

Sec. 303. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 303
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((32,298,000))

32,198,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((32,866,000))

29,802,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,690,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 60,000

Winter Recreation Program
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((787,000))

1,087,000

Off Road Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 274,000

Snowmobile Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $ ((4,682,000))

4,612,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 337,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((48,000))

47,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 200,000

Water Trail Program Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 24,000

Parks Renewal and
Stewardship Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((26,420,000))

26,409,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((100,486,000))

97,740,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Fees approved by
the state parks and recreation commission in the 2001-03 biennium
are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.

(2) The state parks and
recreation commission, in collaboration with the office of financial management
and legislative staff, shall develop a cost-effective and readily accessible
approach for reporting revenues and expenditures at each state park. The reporting
system shall be complete and operational by December 1, 2001.

(3) ((The
appropriation in this section from the off-road vehicle account‑‑state
is provided under RCW 46.09.170(1)(c) and is provided solely to bring off-road
vehicle recreation facilities into compliance with the requirements,
guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with disabilities act.

(4))) $79,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $79,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $8,000 of the winter recreation program
account‑‑state appropriation are provided solely for a grant for
the operation of the Northwest avalanche center.

(((5))) (4)
$432,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account appropriation is provided
for the operation of the Silver Lake visitor center. If a long-term management
agreement is not reached with the U.S. forest service by September 30, 2001,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((6))) (5)
$189,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action
item P+RC-02.

Sec. 304. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 304
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((393,000))

143,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((395,000))

194,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 8,358,000

Firearms Range Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ 13,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 500,000

Recreation Resources
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,584,000

Recreation Resources
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 481,000

NOVA Program Account‑-State
Appropriation...... $ 611,000

Water Quality Account‑‑State
Appropriation..... $ 700,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 500,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 200,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((14,235,000))

14,284,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($250,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
$250,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2003)) $500,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation,
$500,000 of the water quality account appropriation, and $500,000 of the state
toxics control account appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter
298, Laws of 2001, Substitute Senate Bill No. 5637 (watershed health monitoring
and assessment) and for the development of a comprehensive salmon recovery and
watershed health monitoring strategy and action plan. The strategy and action
plan shall address the monitoring recommendations of the independent science
panel in its report, Recommendations for Monitoring Salmonid Recovery in
Washington State (December 2000), and of the joint legislative audit and
review committee in its report Investing in the Environment: Environmental
Quality Grant and Loan Programs Performance Audit (January 2001). The
action plan shall include an assessment of state agency operations related to
monitoring, evaluation, and adaptive management of salmon recovery and
watershed health; any operational or statutory changes necessary to implement
the strategy and action plan; and funding recommendations.

(2) $8,000,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
the forest and fish agreement rules. These funds will be passed through to the
department of natural resources and the department of fish and wildlife.

(3) By August 1, 2001,
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall complete the public lands
inventory project and submit the project report to the joint legislative audit
and review committee for review.

(4) $200,000 of the
aquatic lands enhancement account‑‑state appropriation is provided
solely to develop and implement a conservation initiative for Maury Island.
The interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall contract with the
Cascade Land Conservancy to develop and implement the initiative and to provide
the following services: (a) Land and resource appraisal; (b) development of a plan
of finance for acquisition of land or interests in land; and (c) conduct
negotiations among purchasers and willing sellers.

(5) $49,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
to the interagency committee for outdoor recreation to convene and facilitate a
biodiversity conservation committee to develop recommendations for a state
biodiversity program. Up to $45,000 of this appropriation may be granted, on a
competitive basis, to conduct a review of biodiversity programs and develop
recommendations. The grant agreement must be conditioned to require that at
least an amount of funding equal to the state grant be applied to the project
from nonstate sources. The grantee must provide a final report describing its
review and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate standing
committees of the senate and house of representatives by October 1, 2003.

Sec. 305. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 305
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL
HEARINGS OFFICE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 846,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ ((847,000))

822,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION...................... $ ((1,693,000))

1,668,000

Sec. 306. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 306
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CONSERVATION
COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((2,207,000))

2,141,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((2,196,000))

2,131,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((3,739,000))

2,098,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((8,142,000))

6,370,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $500,000 of the
water quality account‑‑state appropriation is provided solely for
the agriculture, fish, and water negotiations to develop best management practices
that will protect and recover salmon. The commission shall make grants to
allow interest groups to participate in the negotiations.

(2) (($1,601,000 of
the water quality account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
completion of limiting factors analysis for watersheds affected by listings of
salmon and bull trout under the federal endangered species act.

(3))) $247,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $247,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the implementation
of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item CC-01.

(((4))) (3)
By March 1, 2002, the conservation reserve enhancement program contract with
the federal farm service agency shall be proposed for amendment to allow
funding of flexible riparian buffer standards consistent with: (a) The
recommendations of the state's agriculture/fish/water negotiation process; or
(b) ordinances adopted through municipal regulations in compliance with the
state growth management act requirement to protect critical areas. These
ordinances shall be scientifically defensible and include programs for
monitoring and adaptive management.

Sec. 307. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 307
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((51,600,000))

47,691,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((50,762,000))

42,403,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((37,366,000))

37,591,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 24,365,000

Off Road Vehicle Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 475,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((6,094,000))

5,037,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((586,000))

570,000

Recreational Fisheries
Enhancement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((3,032,000))

3,332,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 1,612,000

Warm Water Game Fish
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,567,000))

2,518,000

Eastern Washington Pheasant
Enhancement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 750,000

Wildlife Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ ((48,518,000))

49,622,000

Wildlife Account‑-Federal
Appropriation........ $ 38,182,000

Wildlife Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 15,133,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,941,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,591,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 350,000

((Water Quality
Account--State Appropriation... $ 1,000,000))

Environmental Excellence
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 15,000

Regional Fisheries Salmonid
Recovery Account‑-

Federal Appropriation...................... $ 1,750,000

Oil Spill Administration
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 963,000

Oyster Reserve Land Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 135,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((295,175,000))

284,026,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,682,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($1,682,000))
$1,395,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work
plan and agency action items DFW-01 through DFW-07.

(2) $200,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $200,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the department to update the salmon and steelhead stock inventory.

(3) (($550,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $550,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for salmonid smolt production monitoring.

(4))) $250,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $250,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the department to
implement a hatchery endangered species act response. The response shall
include emergency hatchery responses, production, and retrofitting of
hatcheries for salmon recovery.

(((5))) (4)
$600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for local salmon recovery technical assistance.

(((6) $1,625,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,625,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely to fund grants to lead entities established under chapter 77.85
RCW. The department, in consultation with the lead entity advisory group and
individual lead entities, shall establish an application process and evaluation
criteria to allocate funds to up to 26 lead entities to provide core activities
identified in chapter 77.85 RCW. Grants to individual lead entities may range
from $37,500 to $150,000 per year.

(7) $125,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $125,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are)) (5) $250,000 of the salmon recovery account
appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the lower Skykomish River
habitat conservation group for the purpose of developing a salmon recovery
plan, in coordination with the lead entity established under chapter 77.85 RCW
for that area. The salmon recovery plan must be consistent with the regional
recovery plans of the Puget Sound shared strategy and criteria developed by the
department for the regional salmon recovery planning program.

(((8) $1,000,000 of
the water quality‑-state appropriation is provided solely to fund grants
to lead entities established under chapter 77.85 RCW or watershed planning
units established under chapter 90.82 RCW that agree to coordinate the
development of comprehensive local and regional salmon recovery plans. The
department shall establish a model for local and regional plans as well as
eligibility and evaluation criteria for distribution of funds to lead entities
and watershed planning units. No annual grant shall exceed $125,000 per year.

(9))) (6) $91,000 of the warm water game fish
account appropriation is provided solely for warm water fish culture at the Rod
Meseberg warm water fish production facility.

(((10) $300,000))
(7) $200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and (($300,000)) $200,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely to fund ((four)) three
cooperative compliance programs, ((two)) both in Western ((Washington))
and ((two in)) Eastern Washington. The cooperative compliance program
shall conduct fish screen, fish way, and fish passage barrier assessments and
correction plans for landowners seeking cooperative compliance agreements with
the department.

(((11) $1,300,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002)) (8)
$1,300,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation and $5,000,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for economic
adjustment assistance to fishermen pursuant to the 1999 Pacific salmon treaty
agreement.

(((12) $2,000,000 of
the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided for cooperative
volunteer projects.

(13))) (9) $810,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $790,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $250,000 of the wildlife account‑-state
appropriation are provided solely for enforcement and biological staff to
respond and take appropriate action to public complaints regarding bear and
cougar.

(((14) The
department shall evaluate the fish program to determine if activities are
aligned with agency objectives and if specific activities support the agency's
strategic plan.

(15))) (10) $75,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely to the department to
execute an interagency agreement with the joint legislative audit and review
committee to complete an independent organizational and operational review of
the fish management division of the fish program. This review shall include:

(a) Identifying
those actual functions carried out by the fish management division, including
all expenditures by fund source linked to those functions, and the agency's
rationale for its current staffing and expenditure levels;

(b) Distinguishing
those specific division activities and expenditures that are mandated by court
decisions, federal laws or treaties, federal contracts, state laws, and fish
and wildlife commission directives, as apart from department discretionary
policies;

(c) Reviewing the
extent to which division activities and related program expenditures contribute
to meeting legislative intent, agency goals, and programmatic objectives; and

(d) Evaluating how
performance in meeting intent, goals, and objectives through program activities
is measured, reported, and improved.

The committee shall
provide a status report on this review to the appropriate legislative policy
and fiscal committees by November 1, 2002, and a final report by December 1,
2003.

(11) The
department shall implement a lands program manager consolidation program. The
consolidation program shall target the department's south central region. The
savings from this consolidation shall be used by the department for additional
maintenance on agency lands within the south central region.

(((16))) (12)
The department shall implement a survey of all agency lands to evaluate whether
agency lands support the agency's strategic plan and goals. The department
shall submit a report to the governor and legislature by September 1, 2002,
identifying those lands not conforming with the agency's strategic plan and
which should be divested.

(((17))) (13)
$388,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and $388,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely to implement the forests and fish
agreement and includes funding to continue statewide coordination and
implementation of the forests and fish rules, integration of portions of the
hydraulic code into the forest practices rules to provide permit streamlining,
and sharing the responsibility of developing and implementing the required
forests and fish agreement monitoring and adaptive management program.

(((18))) (14)
$194,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and $195,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for staff to represent the state's fish and
wildlife interests in hydroelectric project relicensing processes by the
federal energy regulatory commission.

(((19))) (15)
$156,000 of the wildlife account‑-state appropriation is provided solely
for a youth fishing coordinator to develop partnerships with local communities,
and to identify, develop, fund, and promote youth fishing events and
opportunities. Event coordination and promotion services shall be contracted
to a private consultant.

(((20))) (16)
$135,000 of the oyster reserve land account appropriation is provided solely to
implement chapter 273, Laws of 2001, Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
1658 (state oyster reserve lands).

(((21))) (17)
$43,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$42,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for staffing and operation of the Tennant Lake interpretive
center.

(((22))) (18)
$32,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$33,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely to support the activities of the aquatic nuisance species
coordination committee to foster state, federal, tribal, and private
cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues. The committee shall strive to
prevent the introduction of nonnative aquatic species and to minimize the
spread of species that are introduced.

(((23))) (19)
$25,000 of the wildlife account‑‑state appropriation is provided
solely for the WildWatchCam program to provide internet transmission of live
views of wildlife.

(((24))) (20)
$8,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and $7,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for the payment of the department's share of
approved lake management district assessments. By December 15, 2001, the
department shall provide the legislature a summary of its activities related to
lake management districts as well as recommendations for establishing equitable
lake management district assessments.

(21) The department
shall emphasize enforcement of laws related to protection of fish habitat and
the illegal harvest of salmon and steelhead. Within the amount provided for
the agency, the department shall provide support to the department of health to
enforce state shellfish harvest laws.

(22) The departments
of fish and wildlife, natural resources, and ecology shall jointly evaluate the
feasibility of aligning regional operations and boundaries. The evaluation
shall consider, but not be limited to the following elements: Colocation of
regional and other field offices, administrative efficiencies, geographic boundaries
that conform to water resource inventory areas, and the level of
decision-making authorized for regional and field operations. Jointly, the
departments shall provide a report to the legislature and the office of
financial management by November 1, 2002, on the evaluation. The report shall
include recommendations for changes to regional operations alignment and
consolidation.

(23) The fish and
wildlife commission shall evaluate the adequacy, structure, and amount of fees
for hunting and fishing licenses and make recommendations for revision of the
fee structure and schedule as appropriate. The evaluation shall consider, but
is not limited to: Assessment of the fish and wildlife resource management
needs, fees in adjacent states and countries, and efficiencies made possible
through automation. The commission shall report to the legislature and the
office of financial management by November 1, 2002.

(24) The department
shall establish a hydraulic project approval program technical review task force.
The task force shall be composed of a balanced representation of both hydraulic
project proponents and conservation interests. The task force shall conduct a
thorough evaluation of the hydraulic project approval program and make
recommendations to the legislature by November 30, 2002, based upon its
evaluation. The task force recommendations shall include a potential fee
structure and schedule for hydraulic project approval permits.

Sec. 308. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 308
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((36,709,000))

36,490,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((36,266,000))

28,863,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((3,440,000))

10,936,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((1,865,000))

2,252,000

Forest Development Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((52,511,000))

50,053,000

Off Road Vehicle Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,684,000))

3,627,000

Surveys and Maps Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,689,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((4,458,000))

3,854,000

Resources Management Cost
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((85,979,000))

79,134,000

Surface Mining Reclamation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,549,000))

2,416,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 625,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 2,900,000

Aquatic Land Dredged
Material Disposal Site

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 1,056,000

Natural Resource
Conservation Areas Stewardship

Account Appropriation...................... $ ((34,000))

209,000

State Toxics Account‑-State
Appropriation...... $ 1,865,000

Air Pollution Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 629,000

Metals Mining Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 64,000

Agricultural College Trust
Management Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,790,000

Derelict Vessel Removal
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 89,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((237,248,000))

229,541,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $18,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $18,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $998,000 of
the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items DNR-01,
DNR-02, and DNR-04.

(2)(a) $625,000 of the
salmon recovery account appropriation, $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,250,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $2,900,000 of the water quality account‑-state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 4, Laws of 1999
sp. sess. (forest practices and salmon recovery).

(b) $250,000 of the
salmon recovery account appropriation is provided solely for and shall be
expended to develop a small forest landowner data base in ten counties.
$150,000 of the amount in this subsection shall be used to purchase the data.
$100,000 of the amount in this subsection shall purchase contracted analysis of
the data.

(3) $2,000,000 of the
forest development account appropriation is provided solely for road
decommissioning, maintenance, and repair in the Lake Whatcom watershed.

(4) $543,000 of the
forest fire protection assessment account appropriation, $22,000 of the forest
development account appropriation, and $76,000 of the resource management cost
account appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 279, Laws of
2001, Substitute House Bill No. 2104, (modifying forest fire protection
assessments).

(5) $895,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and $895,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003)) shall
be transferred to the agricultural college trust management account and are
provided solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State
University's agricultural college trust lands.

(((7))) (6)
$4,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and $4,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely to compensate the forest board trust for a
portion of the lease to the Crescent television improvement district consistent
with RCW 79.12.055.

(((8) The
appropriation from the off-road vehicle account‑‑state is provided
under RCW 46.09.170(1)(a)(ii) and is provided solely for projects that bring
off-road vehicle recreation facilities into compliance with the requirements,
guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with disabilities act
and do not compromise or impair sensitive natural resources.

(9))) (7) $828,000 of the surface mine
reclamation account appropriation is provided to implement Engrossed House Bill
No. 1845 (surface mining fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((10))) (8)
$800,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation and $200,000 of
the resources management cost account appropriation are provided solely to
improve asset management on state-owned aquatic lands. The department shall
streamline the use authorization process for businesses operating on
state-owned aquatic lands and issue decisions on 325 pending lease applications
by June 30, ((2002)) 2003. The department, in consultation with
the attorney general, shall develop a strategic program to resolve claims
related to contaminated sediments on state-owned aquatic lands.

(((11))) (9)
$246,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation is provided to
the department for continuing control of spruce budworm.

(((12))) (10)
$100,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account is provided solely for the
development and initial implementation of a statewide management plan for
marine reserves.

(((13))) (11)
$7,657,859 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and (($7,657,859)) $4,153,859 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for emergency fire
suppression.

(((14))) (12)
$7,216,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $6,584,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for fire protection activities and to implement
provisions of the 1997 tridata fire program review.

(((15) $275,000))
(13) $100,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for
fiscal year 2002, $275,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation
for fiscal year 2003, ((and)) $550,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement
account‑-state appropriation, and $209,000 of the natural resources
conservation areas stewardship account‑-state appropriation are
provided solely to the department for planning, management, and stewardship of
natural area preserves and natural resources conservation areas.

(((16))) (14)
$187,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002((,))
and $188,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003((, and $375,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account‑-state
appropriation)) are provided solely to the department for maintenance and
stewardship of public lands.

(((17))) (15)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
and $400,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation are
provided solely for spartina control.

(16) Fees approved
by the board of natural resources for filing and recording surveys are
authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055 for 2002.

(17) The entire
state toxics control account appropriation is provided solely for the
department to meet its settlement obligation with the U.S. Environmental
Protection Agency for the clean-up of the Thea Foss Waterway.

(18) The departments
of fish and wildlife, natural resources, and ecology shall jointly evaluate the
feasibility of aligning regional operations and boundaries. The evaluation
shall consider, but not be limited to the following elements: Colocation of
regional and other field offices, administrative efficiencies, geographic
boundaries that conform to water resource inventory areas, and the level of
decision-making authorized for regional and field operations. Jointly, the
departments shall provide a report to the legislature and the office of
financial management by November 1, 2002, on the evaluation. The report shall
include recommendations for changes to regional operations alignment and
consolidation.

(19) In managing
natural resources conservation areas and recreation sites in the San Juan
Islands, the department shall implement cost-recovery methodologies that will
recover at least 30 percent of the expenditures for managing these lands.

(20) $8,384,000 of
the resource management cost account appropriation is provided solely for the
purposes of RCW 79.64.020 and is contingent upon the establishment, management,
and protection of the following marine reserves: Tidelands and bedlands
adjacent to Cherry Point in Whatcom county; tidelands and bedlands surrounding
Maury Island in King county; tidelands, bedlands, harbor areas, and waterways
adjacent to the Puyallup River delta, within Commencement Bay in Pierce county;
tidelands and bedlands surrounding Cypress Island in Skagit county; and
tidelands and bedlands within Fidalgo Bay in Skagit county.

(21) In order to
diversify the investments of a trust on which a state institution depends, by
June 30, 2003, the department shall offer for sale, consistent with the
provisions of chapter 79.01 RCW, at least 10 percent of the value of the
agricultural school trust lands. All proceeds from the sales shall be
deposited in the agricultural permanent fund as established in RCW 43.79.130,
except the department's costs of transactions, including, but not limited to
the costs of land and asset appraisal, survey, and auction, shall be deducted
from the sale proceeds, but shall not be greater than 5 percent of the value of
the assets sold.

(22) $250,000 of the
resource management cost account‑-state appropriation and $250,000 of the
forest development account‑-state appropriation are deposited in the
contract harvesting revolving account‑-nonappropriated to implement
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6257 (contract harvesting). If Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6257 is not enacted the deposit in this subsection shall not occur.

Sec. 309. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 309
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((8,165,000))

7,815,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((8,024,000))

7,434,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((4,636,000))

7,441,000

General fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 1,110,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,304,000))

2,272,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,672,000))

2,882,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((26,911,000))

28,954,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $36,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $37,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency
action item DOA-01.

(2) (($832,000))
$1,077,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation and
$298,000 of the agricultural local account are provided solely to establish a
program to monitor pesticides in surface water, sample and analyze surface
waters for pesticide residues, evaluate pesticide exposure on salmon
species listed under the provisions of the endangered species act, and
implement actions needed to protect salmonids.

(3) $1,480,000 of the
aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided solely to initiate
a ((four-year)) plan to eradicate infestations of spartina in Puget
Sound, Hood Canal, and Grays Harbor and begin the reduction in spartina
infestations in Willapa Bay.

(4) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $150,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely to the small
farm and direct marketing program to support small farms in complying with
federal, state, and local regulations, facilitating access to food processing
centers, and assisting with grant funding requests.

(5) (($350,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $350,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,)) $700,000
of the general fund‑-federal appropriation and $700,000 of the
general fund‑-private/local appropriation are provided solely to
implement chapter 324, Laws of 2001 (Substitute House Bill No. 1891, marketing
of agriculture). Of these amounts, $40,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation is provided solely to match funds provided by the red raspberry
commission to address unfair trade practices by other countries that result in
sales in Washington that are below the cost of production in Washington.

(6) $450,000 of the
state toxics control account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
deposit in the agricultural local nonappropriated account for the plant pest
account to reimburse county horticultural pest and disease boards for the costs
of pest control activities, including tree removal, conducted under their
existing authorities in chapters 15.08 and 15.09 RCW.

(7) The
district manager for district two as defined in WAC 16-458-075 shall transfer
four hundred fifty thousand dollars from the fruit and vegetable district fund
to the plant pest account within the agricultural local fund. The amount
transferred must be derived from fees collected for state inspections of tree
fruits and shall be used solely to reimburse county horticultural pest and
disease boards in district two for the cost of pest control activities,
including tree removal, conducted under their existing authority in chapters
15.08 and 15.09 RCW. The transfer of funds shall occur by July 1, 2001. On
June 30, 2003, any unexpended portion of the four hundred fifty thousand
dollars shall be returned to the fruit and vegetable district fund.

(End
of part)

PART
IV

TRANSPORTATION

Sec. 401. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 401
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((5,389,000))

5,366,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((5,377,000))

5,300,000

Architects' License Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((707,000))

684,000

Cemetery Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ ((214,000))

200,000

Professional Engineers'
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,032,000))

3,103,000

Real Estate Commission‑-State
Appropriation.... $ ((6,777,000))

6,841,000

Master License Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ ((8,409,000))

8,285,000

Uniform Commercial Code
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,104,000))

2,902,000

Real Estate Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((301,000))

276,000

Funeral Directors and
Embalmers Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((490,000))

459,000

Washington Real Estate
Research Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((316,000))

307,000

Data Processing Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 23,000

Derelict Vessel Removal
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 86,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((34,139,000))

33,832,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: In
accordance with RCW 43.24.086, it is the policy of the state of Washington that
the cost of each professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. For each
licensing program covered by RCW 43.24.086, the department shall set fees at
levels sufficient to fully cover the cost of administering the licensing
program, including any costs associated with policy enhancements funded in the
2001-03 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2001-03 fiscal
biennium, the department may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth
factor if the increases are necessary to fully fund the costs of the licensing
programs.

Sec. 402. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 402
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PATROL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((21,890,000))

21,567,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((8,066,000))

7,933,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 4,178,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 369,000

Death Investigations
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,899,000))

4,024,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((16,070,000))

14,652,000

County Criminal Justice
Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,490,000))

2,870,000

Municipal Criminal Justice
Assistance Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((987,000))

1,367,000

Fire Service Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 125,000

Fire Service Training
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,328,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 461,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((277,000))

271,000

Fingerprint Identification
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,684,000))

5,316,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((68,824,000))

69,461,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $354,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
additional law enforcement and security coverage on the west capitol campus.

(2) When a program
within the agency is supported by more than one fund and one of the funds is
the state general fund, the agency shall charge its expenditures in such a
manner as to ensure that each fund is charged in proportion to its support of
the program. The agency may adopt guidelines for the implementation of this
subsection. The guidelines may account for federal matching requirements,
budget provisos, or other requirements to spend other moneys in a particular
manner.

(3) $100,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5896 (DNA testing of evidence).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(4) $1,419,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for combating the proliferation of methamphetamine labs. The amounts in
this subsection are provided solely for the following activities: (a) The
establishment of a regional methamphetamine enforcement, training, and
education program; (b) additional members for the statewide methamphetamine
incident response team; and (c) two forensic scientists with the necessary
equipment to perform lab analysis in the crime laboratory division.

(((6)
Beginning in fiscal year 2003, the funding provided in this subsection assumes
a transfer of $12,634,000 of state patrol expenditures from the omnibus
operating budget to the transportation budget. If new transportation revenue
is not enacted before this time, the omnibus budget will restore this funding
in the 2002 legislative session.))

(End
of part)

PART
V

EDUCATION

Sec. 501. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 501
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION

(1) STATE AGENCY
OPERATIONS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((12,357,000))

12,302,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((12,266,000))

11,951,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((23,668,000))

53,760,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((48,291,000))

78,013,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $11,385,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($11,394,000))
$11,052,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the office of
the superintendent of public instruction. Of this amount, a maximum of
$350,000 is provided in each fiscal year for upgrading information systems
including the general apportionment and student information systems.

(b) (($541,000))
$486,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and (($441,000)) $481,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the operation and
expenses of the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities. Of the general fund‑-state appropriation ((for fiscal
year 2002)), $100,000 is provided solely for certificate of mastery
development and validation.

(c) $431,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($431,000))
$418,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the Washington
professional educator standards board.

(2) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((17,274,000))

17,280,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((19,407,000))

3,948,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((213,016,000))

85,395,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((249,697,000))

106,623,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are provided solely for the statewide programs specified in
this subsection and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY

(i) A maximum of
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
a maximum of $150,000 of the fiscal year 2003 appropriation are)) is
provided for alcohol and drug prevention programs pursuant to RCW 66.08.180.

(ii) A maximum
$2,621,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
((and a maximum of $2,621,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2003 are)) is provided for a corps of nurses located
at educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of public
instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care
to students, health education, and training for school staff.

(iii) A maximum of
$100,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 ((and a maximum of $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2003 are)) is provided to create a school safety
center subject to the following conditions and limitations.

(A) The safety center
shall: Disseminate successful models of school safety plans and cooperative
efforts; provide assistance to schools to establish a comprehensive safe school
plan; select models of cooperative efforts that have been proven successful;
act as an information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state; coordinate
activities relating to school safety; review and approve manuals and curricula
used for school safety models and training; and develop and maintain a school
safety information web site.

(B) The school safety
center shall be established in the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. The superintendent of public instruction shall participate in a
school safety center advisory committee that includes representatives of
educators, classified staff, principals, superintendents, administrators, the
American society for industrial security, the state criminal justice training
commission, and others deemed appropriate and approved by the school safety
center advisory committee. Members of the committee shall be chosen by the
groups they represent. In addition, the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs shall appoint representatives of law enforcement to participate
on the school safety center advisory committee. The advisory committee shall
select a chair.

(C) The school safety
center advisory committee shall develop a training program, using the best
practices in school safety, for all school safety personnel.

(iv) A maximum of
$113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
a maximum of $103,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are)) is provided for a school safety training program provided
by the criminal justice training commission subject to the following conditions
and limitations:

(A) The criminal
justice training commission with assistance of the school safety center
advisory committee established in section 2(b)(iii) of this section shall
develop manuals and curricula for a training program for all school safety
personnel.

(B) The Washington
state criminal justice training commission, in collaboration with the advisory
committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school
administrators and school safety personnel, including school safety personnel
hired after the effective date of this section.

(v) A maximum of
$250,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 ((and a maximum of $250,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are)) is provided for training in
school districts regarding the prevention of bullying and harassment. The
superintendent of public instruction shall use the funds to develop a model
bullying and harassment prevention policy and training materials for school and
educational service districts. The information may be disseminated in a
variety of ways, including workshops and other staff development activities
such as videotape or broadcasts.

(vi) A maximum of
$6,042,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 ((and a maximum of $6,028,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are)) is provided for a safety
allocation to districts subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(A) The funds shall be
allocated at a maximum rate of $6.36 per year per full-time equivalent K-12
student enrolled in each school district in the prior school year.

(B) Districts shall
expend funds allocated under this section to develop and implement strategies
identified in a comprehensive safe school plan pursuant to House Bill No. 1818
(student safety) or Senate Bill No. 5543 (student safety). If neither bill is
enacted by June 30, 2001, expenditures of the safety allocation shall be
subject to (i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection (a)(vi)(B).

(i) School districts
shall use the funds for school safety purposes and are encouraged to prioritize
the use of funds allocated under this section for the development, by September
1, 2002, of school-based comprehensive safe school plans that include prevention,
intervention, all-hazards/crisis response, and post crisis recovery
components. When developing comprehensive safe school plans, school districts
are encouraged to use model school safety plans as developed by the school
safety center. Implementation of comprehensive safe school plans may include,
but is not limited to, employing or contracting for building security monitors
in schools during school hours and school events; research-based early
prevention and intervention programs; training for school staff, including
security personnel; equipment; school safety hotlines; before, during, and
after-school student and staff safety; minor building renovations related to
student and staff safety and security; and other purposes identified in the
comprehensive safe school plan.

(ii) Each school may
conduct an evaluation of its comprehensive safe school plan and conduct
reviews, drills, or simulated practices in coordination with local fire, law
enforcement, and medical emergency management agencies.

(iii) By September 1,
2002, school districts shall provide the superintendent of public instruction
information regarding the purposes for which the safety allocation funding was
used and the status of the comprehensive safe school plans for the schools in
the school district.

(vii) A maximum of
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002((,
a maximum of $200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003,)) and $400,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation
transferred from the department of health are provided for a program that
provides grants to school districts for media campaigns promoting sexual
abstinence and addressing the importance of delaying sexual activity,
pregnancy, and childbearing until individuals are ready to nurture and support
their children. Grants to the school districts shall be for projects that are
substantially designed and produced by students. The grants shall require a
local private sector match equal to one-half of the state grant, which may
include in-kind contribution of technical or other assistance from consultants
or firms involved in public relations, advertising, broadcasting, and graphics
or video production or other related fields.

(viii) A maximum of
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
a maximum of $150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are)) is provided for a nonviolence and leadership
training program provided by the institute for community leadership. The
program shall provide the following:

(A) Statewide
nonviolence leadership coaches training program for certification of
educational employees and community members in nonviolence leadership
workshops;

(B) Statewide
leadership nonviolence student exchanges, training, and speaking opportunities
for student workshop participants; and

(C) A request for
proposal process, with up to 80 percent funding, for nonviolence leadership
workshops serving at least 12 school districts with direct programming in 36
elementary, middle, and high schools throughout Washington state.

(ix) A maximum of
$1,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
((and a maximum of $1,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2003 are)) is provided for school district petitions
to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and
28A.225.035. Allocation of this money to school districts shall be based on
the number of petitions filed.

(b) TECHNOLOGY

(i) A maximum of
$2,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of (($2,000,000)) $1,940,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for K-20 telecommunications
network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and
avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and
video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to
purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network. A maximum
of $650,000 of this amount may be expended for state-level administration and
staff training on the K-20 network.

(ii) A maximum of
$617,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
a maximum of $1,112,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are)) is provided for the Washington state
leadership assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional partnership
coordinated at the Pacific Science Center.

(iii) $92,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
for a study of technology in the public schools subject to the following
conditions and limitations:

(A) The
superintendent shall convene a technology in education task force to develop
recommendations about the use of technology and recommendations about funding
technology in the schools after conducting a study. The study shall focus on
the application of technology in grades three through twelve. The study shall
be completed not later than November 1, 2002, and the recommendations shall be
submitted to the education and fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and the senate. The study shall include but not be limited to:

(1) The technology
currently available in schools and school districts. Technology includes but
is not limited to computers, local area networks, and access to electronic
media on the internet;

(2) Methods school
districts are using currently to fund technology and recommendations for the
future;

(3) Plans to update
the technology including any replacement schedules;

(4) Training in the
use of technology;

(5) Integration of
technology into the curriculum;

(6) The different
uses of technology in upper elementary grades, middle school, and high school;
and

(7) Applications of
technology in schools in other states and how that technology is funded.

(B) The technology
in education task force shall consist of the following voting members or their
designees: One member from each major caucus of the senate, appointed by the
president of the senate; one member from each major caucus of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; the
superintendent of public instruction; the chair of the information services
board; one representative of the community and technical colleges, appointed by
the state board for community and technical colleges; one educational service
district superintendent, one school district superintendent, one principal, and
one teacher, each appointed by the superintendent of public instruction; two
representatives appointed by the higher education coordinating board; and three
representatives of the computer or digital technology industry and three
members of the general public, each appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction. The superintendent of public instruction, or designee, shall
chair the task force.

(c) GRANTS AND
ALLOCATIONS

(i) A maximum of
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
a maximum of (($1,975,000)) $1,916,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for Senate Bill No. 5695
(alternative certification routes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2001, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. The stipend
allocation per teacher candidate and mentor pair shall not exceed $28,318. The
professional educator standards board shall report to the education committees
of the legislature by December 15, 2002, on the districts applying for
partnership grants, the districts receiving partnership grants, and the number
of interns per route enrolled in each district.

(ii) A maximum of
$31,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
a maximum of $31,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are)) is provided for operation of the Cispus
environmental learning center.

(iii) A maximum of
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
a maximum of $150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are)) is provided for the Washington civil liberties
education program.

(iv) A maximum of
$2,150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
((and a maximum of $2,150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2003 are)) is provided for complex need grants. The
maximum grants for eligible districts are specified in LEAP Document 30C as
developed on April 27, 1997, at 03:00 hours.

(v) A maximum of
$1,377,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
((and a maximum of $1,377,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2003 are)) is provided for educational centers,
including state support activities. (($100,000)) $50,000 of this
amount for fiscal year 2002 is provided to help stabilize funding
through distribution among existing education centers that are currently funded
by the state at an amount less than (($100,000 a biennium)) $50,000 a
fiscal year.

(vi) A maximum of
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
a maximum of $50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are)) is provided for an organization in southwest
Washington that received funding from the Spokane educational center in the
1995-97 biennium and provides educational services to students who have dropped
out of school.

(vii) A maximum of
$1,262,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
((and a maximum of $1,262,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2003 are)) is provided for in-service training and
educational programs conducted by the Pacific Science Center.

(viii) A maximum of
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
a maximum of $100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are)) is provided to support vocational student leadership
organizations.

(ix) $9,900,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for the Washington Reads
project to enhance high quality reading instruction and school programs.

(x) A maximum of
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
a maximum of $150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are)) is provided for the World War II oral history
project.

(xi) (($30,700,000))
$13,942,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided
for school renovation grants for school districts with urgent school renovation
needs, special education-related renovations, and technology related
renovations.

(xii) (($1,952,000))
$4,962,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided
for LINKS technology challenge grants to integrate educational reform with
state technology systems and development of technology products that enhance
professional development and classroom instruction.

(xiii) (($423,000))
$536,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided
for the advanced placement fee program to increase opportunities for low-income
students and under-represented populations to participate in advanced placement
courses and to increase the capacity of schools to provide advanced placement
courses to students.

(xiv) $12,318,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for comprehensive
school reform demonstration projects to provide grants to low-income schools
for improving student achievement through adoption and implementation of
research-based curricula and instructional programs.

(xv) (($4,228,000))
$2,612,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided
for teacher quality enhancement through provision of consortia grants to school
districts and higher education institutions to improve teacher preparation and
professional development.

Sec. 502. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 502
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((3,760,826,000))

3,786,124,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((3,751,350,000))

3,714,432,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((7,512,176,000))

7,500,556,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) Allocations for
certificated staff salaries for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years shall be
determined using formula‑generated staff units calculated pursuant to
this subsection. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in (d) through
(f) of this subsection shall be reduced for vocational full-time equivalent
enrollments. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6
shall be the greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under
(d) and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be as
follows:

(a) On the basis of
each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent enrollments, excluding full-time
equivalent enrollment otherwise recognized for certificated staff unit
allocations under (c) through (f) of this subsection:

(i) Four certificated
administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades
K-12;

(ii) 49 certificated
instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades
K-3;

(iii) Forty‑six
certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent
students in grades 4-12; and

(iv) An additional 4.2
certificated instructional staff units for grades K-3 and an additional 7.2
certificated instructional staff units for grade 4. Any funds allocated for
the additional certificated units provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be
considered as basic education funding;

(v) For class size
reduction and expanded learning opportunities under the better schools program,
an additional 2.2 certificated instructional staff units for grades K-4 per
thousand full-time equivalent students. Funds allocated for these additional
certificated units shall not be considered as basic education funding. The
allocation may be used for reducing class sizes in grades K-4 or to provide
additional classroom contact hours for kindergarten, before-and-after-school
programs, weekend school programs, summer school programs, and intercession
opportunities to assist elementary school students in meeting the essential
academic learning requirements and student assessment performance standards.
For purposes of this subsection, additional classroom contact hours provided by
teachers beyond the normal school day under a supplemental contract shall be
converted to a certificated full-time equivalent by dividing the classroom
contact hours by 900.

(A) Funds provided
under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) and (v) in excess of the amount required to
maintain the statutory minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b)
shall be allocated only if the district documents an actual ratio equal to or
greater than 55.4 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades K-4. For any school district documenting a lower
certificated instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on the
district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff ratio achieved in
that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio established under RCW
28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;

(B) Districts at or
above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per one thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate up to 1.3 of the 55.4 funding
ratio to employ additional classified instructional assistants assigned to
basic education classrooms in grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a
district's staff ratio under this section, funds used by the district to employ
additional classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual certificated
instructional staff ratio. Additional classified instructional assistants, for
the purposes of this subsection, shall be determined using the 1989-90 school
year as the base year;

(C) Any district
maintaining a ratio equal to or greater than 55.4 certificated instructional
staff per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may use
allocations generated under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) and (v) in excess of
that required to maintain the minimum ratio established under RCW
28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ additional basic education certificated
instructional staff or classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6.
Funds allocated under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) and (v) shall only be expended
to reduce class size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated
instructional funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants;

(b) For school
districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time equivalent students whose
full-time equivalent student enrollment count in a given month exceeds the
first of the month full-time equivalent enrollment count by 5 percent, an
additional state allocation of 110 percent of the share that such increased
enrollment would have generated had such additional full-time equivalent
students been included in the normal enrollment count for that particular
month;

(c)(i) On the basis of
full-time equivalent enrollment in:

(A) Vocational
education programs approved by the superintendent of public instruction, a
maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative staff units for each 19.5 full-time equivalent vocational
students; and

(B) Skills center
programs meeting the standards for skills center funding established in January
1999 by the superintendent of public instruction, 0.92 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative units for each
16.67 full-time equivalent vocational students; ((and))

(ii) Vocational
full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as
the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be
adjusted for reported vocational enrollments on the same monthly basis as those
adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and

(iii) Indirect cost
charges by a school district to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed
15 percent of the combined basic education and vocational enhancement
allocations of state funds;

(d) For districts enrolling
not more than twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which have
been judged to be remote and necessary by the state board of education and
enroll not more than twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent
students in grades K-8:

(i) For those enrolling
no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and
0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than
five students, plus one‑twentieth of a certificated instructional staff
unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii) For those
enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not
more than five students, plus one‑tenth of a certificated instructional
staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(e) For specified
enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty‑five but not more
than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8,
and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than
twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8
and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the state board of
education:

(i) For enrollment of
up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative
staff units; and

(ii) For enrollment of
up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8,
0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative staff units;

(f) For districts
operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three
hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades
9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools:

(i) For remote and
necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty‑five
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one‑half
certificated instructional staff units and one‑quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;

(ii) For all other
small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff
units and one‑half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the
first sixty average annual full time equivalent students, and additional staff
units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and
0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty‑three
and one‑half average annual full time equivalent students.

Units calculated under
(f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced by certificated staff units at the
rate of forty‑six certificated instructional staff units and four
certificated administrative staff units per thousand vocational full-time
equivalent students((.));

(g) For each nonhigh
school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average
full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students,
operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half
of a certificated instructional staff unit; and

(h) For each nonhigh
school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average
full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students,
operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one‑half
of a certificated instructional staff unit.

(3) Allocations for
classified salaries for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years shall be
calculated using formula‑generated classified staff units determined as
follows:

(a) For enrollments
generating certificated staff unit allocations under subsection (2)(d) through
(h) of this section, one classified staff unit for each three certificated
staff units allocated under such subsections;

(b) For all other
enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational full-time equivalent
enrollments, one classified staff unit for each sixty average annual full-time
equivalent students; and

(c) For each nonhigh
school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time
equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional
one‑half of a classified staff unit.

(4) Fringe benefit
allocations shall be calculated at a rate of ((11.27)) 10.76
percent in the 2001-02 school year and ((11.27)) 9.57 percent in
the 2002-03 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of ((12.92)) 12.73
percent in the 2001-02 school year and ((12.92)) 12.36 percent in
the 2002-03 school year for classified salary allocations provided under
subsection (3) of this section.

(5) Insurance benefit
allocations shall be calculated at the maintenance rate specified in section
504(3) of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows:

(a) The number of
certificated staff units determined in subsection (2) of this section; and

(b) The number of classified
staff units determined in subsection (3) of this section multiplied by 1.152.
This factor is intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of
distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may
be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.

(6)(a) For
nonemployee-related costs associated with each certificated staff unit
allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d) through (h) of this section,
there shall be provided a maximum of $8,519 per certificated staff unit in the
2001-02 school year and a maximum of (($8,715)) $8,604 per
certificated staff unit in the 2002-03 school year.

(b) For
nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated staff
unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this section, there shall be
provided a maximum of $20,920 per certificated staff unit in the 2001-02 school
year and a maximum of (($21,401)) $21,129 per certificated staff
unit in the 2002-03 school year.

(c) For
nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated staff
unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this section, there shall be
provided a maximum of $16,233 per certificated staff unit in the 2001-02 school
year and a maximum of (($16,606)) $16,395 per certificated staff
unit in the 2002-03 school year.

(7) Allocations for
substitute costs for classroom teachers shall be distributed at a maintenance
rate of $494.34 for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years per allocated
classroom teachers exclusive of salary increase amounts provided in section 504
of this act. Solely for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom
teachers shall be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio between
the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and the number of
actual basic education certificated instructional staff reported statewide for
the prior school year.

(8) Any school district
board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by
submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any
portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The
superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if
it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be
for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant
to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(9) The superintendent
may distribute a maximum of (($6,510,000)) $5,939,000 outside the
basic education formula during fiscal years 2002 and 2003 as follows:

(a) For fire protection
for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter
established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW, a maximum of $480,000 may be
expended in fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of (($491,000)) $485,000
may be expended in fiscal year 2003;

(b) For summer
vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of $2,098,000 may be expended
((each)) for the 2001-02 fiscal year and a maximum of
$2,035,000 for the 2003 fiscal year;

(c) A maximum of (($343,000))
$341,000 may be expended for school district emergencies; and

(d) A maximum of
$500,000 ((per fiscal year)) may be expended in fiscal year 2002
for programs providing skills training for secondary students who are enrolled
in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of
public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500
per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.

(10) For purposes of
RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time equivalent student in state basic
education appropriations provided under this act, including appropriations for
salary and benefits increases, is 2.5 percent from the 2000-01 school year to
the 2001-02 school year, and ((3.3)) 0.5 percent from the 2000-01
school year to the 2002-03 school year.

(11) If two or more
school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional basic
education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this
section, the following shall apply:

(a) For three school
years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff
units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units
received by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and

(b) For the fourth
through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the
basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school
year prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section shall
be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

Sec. 503. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 503
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION. (1) The following
calculations determine the salaries used in the general fund allocations for
certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff
units under section 502 of this act:

(a) For school year
2001-02, salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units
shall be determined for each district by multiplying the district's
certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 12E for the
appropriate year, by the district's average staff mix factor for basic
education and special education certificated instructional staff in that school
year, computed using LEAP Document 1S; ((and))

(b) For school year
2002-03, salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units shall be
determined for each district by multiplying the district's certificated
instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 12E for the appropriate
year, by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated instructional
staff in that school year, computed using LEAP Document 1S; and

(c) Salary
allocations for certificated administrative staff units and classified staff
units for each district shall be based on the district's certificated
administrative and classified salary allocation amounts shown on LEAP Document
12E for the appropriate year.

(2) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Basic
education certificated instructional staff" is defined as provided in RCW
28A.150.100 and "special education certificated staff" means staff
assigned to the state-supported special education program pursuant to chapter
28A.155 RCW in positions requiring a certificate;

(b) "LEAP Document
1S" means the computerized tabulation establishing staff mix factors for
certificated instructional staff according to education and years of
experience, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee on March 25, 1999, at 16:55 hours; and

(c) "LEAP Document
12E" means the computerized tabulation of 2001-02 and 2002-03 school year
salary allocations for certificated administrative staff and classified staff
and derived and total base salaries for certificated instructional staff as
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on
((March 13, 2001, at 16:32 hours)) February 14, 2002, at 10:30 hours.

(3) Incremental fringe
benefit factors shall be applied to salary adjustments at a rate of ((10.63))
10.12 percent for school year((s)) 2001-02 and 8.93 percent
for school year 2002-03 for certificated staff and ((9.42)) for
classified staff 9.23 percent for school year((s)) 2001-02 and 8.86
percent for the 2002-03 ((for classified staff)) school year.

(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW
28A.150.410, the following state‑wide salary allocation schedules for
certificated instructional staff are established for basic education salary
allocations:

K-12 Salary Schedule
for Certificated Instructional Staff

2001-02
School Year

Years of

Service BA
BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90

0 27,467 28,209 28,977 29,746 32,219

1 27,836 28,588 29,366 30,171 32,668

2 28,464 29,231 30,025 30,900 33,414

3 29,401 30,192 31,009 31,931 34,490

4 30,063 30,896 31,727 32,689 35,290

5 30,750 31,595 32,443 33,468 36,085

6 31,147 31,974 32,850 33,928 36,531

7 32,164 33,010 33,909 35,055 37,724

8 33,195 34,088 35,008 36,248 38,954

9 35,205 36,169 37,455 40,223

10 37,344 38,724 41,529

11 40,029 42,895

12 41,293 44,298

13 45,736

14 47,181

15 48,408

16 or more 49,376

Years of MA+90

Service BA+135 MA MA+45 or
PHD

0 33,811 32,931 35,403 36,996

1 34,252 33,297 35,793 37,377

2 35,030 33,995 36,509 38,124

3 36,177 35,027 37,585 39,273

4 37,007 35,755 38,355 40,072

5 37,853 36,503 39,121 40,889

6 38,308 36,904 39,508 41,285

7 39,569 38,031 40,700 42,546

8 40,867 39,225 41,930 43,843

9 42,201 40,430 43,200 45,177

10 43,572 41,700 44,505 46,549

11 44,979 43,005 45,872 47,956

12 46,446 44,362 47,275 49,422

13 47,947 45,766 48,712 50,923

14 49,505 47,212 50,251 52,481

15 50,792 48,439 51,557 53,846

16 or more 51,808 49,407 52,589 54,923

K-12 Allocation Salary
Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2002-03
School Year

Years of

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90

((0 28,318 29,083 29,875 30,668 33,217

1 28,699 29,473 30,276 31,106 33,680

2 29,345 30,137 30,955 31,857 34,449

3 30,312 31,127 31,970 32,920 35,559

4 30,994 31,854 32,710 33,702 36,383

5 31,703 32,574 33,448 34,505 37,203

6 32,112 32,964 33,868 34,979 37,663

7 33,160 34,033 34,959 36,141 38,893

8 34,223 35,145 36,092 37,372 40,161

9 36,295 37,289 38,616 41,470

10 38,501 39,923 42,815

11 41,269 44,225

12 42,572 45,671

13 47,153

14 48,642

15 49,907

16 or more 50,906

Years of MA+90

Service BA+135 MA MA+45 or
PHD

0 34,859 33,951 36,500 38,142

1 35,313 34,328 36,902 38,535

2 36,116 35,048 37,640 39,305

3 37,298 36,112 38,750 40,490

4 38,153 36,863 39,544 41,314

5 39,026 37,634 40,333 42,156

6 39,495 38,047 40,732 42,564

7 40,795 39,210 41,961 43,864

8 42,133 40,440 43,229 45,201

9 43,509 41,683 44,538 46,577

10 44,922 42,992 45,884 47,991

11 46,373 44,337 47,293 49,442

12 47,885 45,736 48,739 50,953

13 49,432 47,184 50,221 52,501

14 51,039 48,675 51,808 54,107

15 52,366 49,940 53,155 55,514

16 or more 53,413 50,938 54,218 56,624))

0 27,989 28,745 29,528 30,312 32,831

1 28,365 29,131 29,924 30,745 33,289

2 29,004 29,786 30,596 31,487 34,049

3 29,960 30,766 31,599 32,538 35,146

4 30,634 31,483 32,330 33,311 35,961

5 31,334 32,196 33,060 34,104 36,771

6 31,739 32,581 33,475 34,572 37,226

7 32,775 33,638 34,553 35,721 38,441

8 33,826 34,736 35,673 36,937 39,694

9 35,874 36,856 38,167 40,988

10 38,054 39,459 42,318

11 40,789 43,711

12 42,078 45,140

13 46,605

14 48,077

15 49,328

16 or more 50,314

Years of MA+90

Service BA+135 MA MA+45 or
PHD

0 34,454 33,557 36,076 37,699

1 34,903 33,929 36,473 38,087

2 35,696 34,641 37,203 38,849

3 36,864 35,693 38,299 40,019

4 37,710 36,435 39,084 40,834

5 38,573 37,197 39,864 41,666

6 39,037 37,605 40,259 42,069

7 40,321 38,754 41,474 43,354

8 41,643 39,970 42,727 44,676

9 43,003 41,199 44,021 46,036

10 44,400 42,492 45,351 47,433

11 45,834 43,822 46,744 48,867

12 47,328 45,205 48,173 50,361

13 48,858 46,636 49,638 51,891

14 50,446 48,109 51,206 53,479

15 51,758 49,359 52,537 54,869

16 or more 52,792 50,346 53,588 55,967

(b) As used in this
subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer to the number of
credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate degree.

(c) For credits earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree, any credits in
excess of forty‑five credits may be counted after the masters degree.
Thus, as used in this subsection, the column headings "MA+(N)" refer
to the total of:

(i) Credits earned
since receiving the masters degree; and

(ii) Any credits in
excess of forty‑five credits that were earned after the baccalaureate
degree but before the masters degree.

(5) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "BA"
means a baccalaureate degree.

(b) "MA"
means a masters degree.

(c) "PHD"
means a doctorate degree.

(d) "Years of
service" shall be calculated under the same rules adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction.

(e) "Credits"
means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-service credits computed
in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and 28A.415.023.

(6) No more than ninety
college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate
degree may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state salary
allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in this act, or any
replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a) The employee has a
masters degree; or

(b) The credits were
used in generating state salary allocations before January 1, 1992.

(7) The certificated
instructional staff base salary specified for each district in LEAP Document
12E and the salary schedule((s)) in subsection (4)(a) of this section for
the 2001-02 school year includes three learning improvement days
originally added in the 1999-00 school year. A school district is eligible for
the learning improvement day funds for school year((s)) 2001-02 ((and
2002-03)), only if three learning improvement days have been added to the
180-day contract year. If fewer than three days are added, the additional
learning improvement allocation shall be adjusted accordingly. The additional
days shall be for activities related to improving student learning consistent
with education reform implementation, and shall not be considered part of
basic education. The length of a learning improvement day shall not be
less than the length of a full day under the base contract. The superintendent
of public instruction shall ensure that school districts adhere to the intent
and purposes of this subsection.

(8) The salary
allocation schedules established in this section are for allocation purposes
only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2).

Sec. 504. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 504
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((124,130,000))

124,903,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((274,529,000))

254,219,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation (FY 2003)... $ 191,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((398,659,000))

379,313,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($318,024,000))
A total of $328,952,000 is provided for a cost of living adjustment for
state formula staff units of 3.7 percent effective September 1, 2001, and ((another
salary adjustment)) 3.6 percent effective on September 1, 2002((,
in a percentage amount to be determined by the 2002 legislature consistent with
the provisions of chapter 4, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 732))).
The appropriations include associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at
rates of ((10.63)) 10.12 percent for school year((s))
2001-02 and 8.93 percent for school year 2002-03 for certificated staff
and ((9.42)) 9.23 percent for school year((s)) 2001-02 and
8.86 for school year 2002-03 for classified staff.

(a) The appropriations
in this section include the increased portion of salaries and incremental
fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this
act, in accordance with chapter 4, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 732).
Salary adjustments for state employees in the office of superintendent of
public instruction and the education reform program are provided in part VII of
this act. Increases for general apportionment (basic education) are based on
the salary allocation schedules and methodology in section 502 of this act.
Increases for special education result from increases in each district's basic
education allocation per student. Increases for educational service districts
and institutional education programs are determined by the superintendent of
public instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries and
benefits in section 502 of this act.

(b) The appropriations
in this section provide cost-of-living and incremental fringe benefit
allocations based on formula adjustments as follows:

School
Year

2001-02 2002-03

Pupil Transportation (per
weighted pupil mile) $ 0.77 $ ((1.44))

1.54

Highly Capable (per formula
student) $((8.75)) $((16.35))

8.71 16.53

Transitional Bilingual
Education (per eligible

bilingual student) $((22.73)) $((42.48))

22.63
44.29

Learning Assistance (per
entitlement unit) $((11.23)) $((20.99))

11.19
22.13

Substitute Teacher
(allocation per teacher,

section 502(7)) $
18.29 $ ((34.18))

36.75

(2) This act
appropriates general fund‑-state funds and other funds for the
purpose of providing the annual salary cost-of-living increase required by
section 2, chapter 4, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 732) for teachers
and other school district employees in the state-funded salary base. For
employees not included in the state-funded salary base, the annual salary
cost-of-living increase may be provided by school districts from the federal
funds appropriated in this act and local revenues, including the adjusted levy
base as provided in RCW 84.52.053 and section 502 of this act, and state
discretionary funds provided under this act.

(3) (($80,635,000))
$50,361,000 is provided for adjustments to insurance benefit
allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is $427.73
per month for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years. The appropriations in this
section provide for a rate increase to $455.27 per month for the 2001-02 ((school
year)) and (($493.59 per month for the)) 2002-03 school years
at the following rates:

School
Year

2001-02 2002-03

Pupil Transportation (per
weighted pupil mile) $ 0.25 $((0.60))

0.25

Highly Capable (per formula
student) $ 1.74 $((4.18))

1.70

Transitional Bilingual
Education (per eligible

bilingual student) $
4.46 $((10.66))

4.46

Learning Assistance (per
entitlement unit) $ 3.51 $((8.38))

3.51

(4) The rates specified
in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.

Sec. 505. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 505
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((193,198,000))

192,402,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((194,293,000))

193,293,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((387,491,000))

385,695,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) A maximum of
$767,000 of this fiscal year 2002 appropriation and a maximum of (($785,000))
$752,000 of the fiscal year 2003 appropriation may be expended for
regional transportation coordinators and related activities. The
transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted by school
districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest extent practical,
reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.

(3) (($15,000)) $5,000
of the fiscal year 2002 appropriation and (($20,000)) $5,000 of
the fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided solely for the transportation
of students enrolled in "choice" programs. Transportation shall be
limited to low-income students who are transferring to "choice"
programs solely for educational reasons.

(4) Allocations for
transportation of students shall be based on reimbursement rates of (($37.11))
$37.07 per weighted mile in the 2001-02 school year and (($37.38))
$37.12 per weighted mile in the 2002-03 school year exclusive of salary
and benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of this act. Allocations for
transportation of students transported more than one radius mile shall be based
on weighted miles as determined by superintendent of public instruction
multiplied by the per mile reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to
the formulas adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations
for transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based on
the number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five living
within one radius mile of their assigned school multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rate for the school year multiplied by 1.29.

Sec. 506. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 507
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((419,264,000))

420,165,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((420,644,000))

408,693,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((256,092,000))

256,407,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,096,000,000))

1,085,265,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding for special
education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW
28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure that special education students as
a class receive their full share of the general apportionment allocation accruing
through sections 502 and 504 of this act. To the extent a school district
cannot provide an appropriate education for special education students under
chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation funded in
this section.

(2)(a) Effective with
the 2001-02 school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall change
the S-275 personnel reporting system and all related accounting requirements to
ensure that:

(i) Special education
students are basic education students first;

(ii) As a class,
special education students are entitled to the full basic education allocation;
and

(iii) Special education
students are basic education students for the entire school day.

(b) Effective with the
2001-02 school year, the S-275 and accounting changes shall supercede any prior
excess cost methodologies and shall be required of all school districts.

(3) Each ((general
fund‑-state)) fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior
fiscal year adjustments.

(4) The superintendent
of public instruction shall distribute state funds to school districts based on
two categories: The optional birth through age two program for special
education eligible developmentally delayed infants and toddlers, and the
mandatory special education program for special education eligible students
ages three to twenty-one. A "special education eligible student" means
a student receiving specially designed instruction in accordance with a
properly formulated individualized education program.

(5)(a) For the 2001-02
and 2002-03 school years, the superintendent shall ((distribute state funds))
make allocations to each district based on the sum of:

(i) A district's annual
average headcount enrollment of developmentally delayed infants and toddlers
ages birth through two, multiplied by the district's average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and

(ii) A district's
annual average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment multiplied by
the funded enrollment percent determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this
section, multiplied by the district's average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.

(b) For purposes of
this subsection, "average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student" for a district shall be based on the staffing ratios
required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not include enhancements, secondary
vocational education, or small schools.

(6) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Annual
average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment" means the
resident enrollment including students enrolled through choice (RCW
28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts (RCW 28A.225.210) and
excluding students residing in another district enrolled as part of an
interdistrict cooperative program (RCW 28A.225.250).

(b) "Enrollment
percent" means the district's resident special education annual average
enrollment, excluding the birth through age two enrollment, as a percent of the
district's annual average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment.

(i) For the
2001-02 ((and the 2002-03)) school year((s)), each district's
funded enrollment percent shall be the lesser of the district's actual
enrollment percent ((for the school year for which the allocation is being
determined)) or 12.7 percent ((for the 2001-02 school year or 13.0
percent for the 2002-03 school year)).

(ii) For the 2002-03
school year, each district's general fund‑‑state funded special
education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment
percent or 12.7 percent. Increases in enrollment percent from 12.7 percent to
13.0 percent shall be funded from the general fund‑‑federal
appropriation.

(7) At the request of
any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost
services for special education students of the districts are provided by the
cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be ((12.7 percent for the
2001-02 school year and 13.0 percent for the 2002-03 school year)) calculated
in accordance with subsection (6)(b) of this section, and shall be
calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units. For
purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than
individual district units.

(8) Safety net
funding shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee subject to
the following conditions and limitations:

(a) A maximum of
(($12,000,000)) $8,500,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation and a maximum of $3,500,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and a maximum of $10,623,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003)) are provided
as safety net funding for districts with demonstrated needs for state special
education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (5) of this
section. ((Safety net funding shall be awarded by the state safety net
oversight committee.

(a))) (b) The safety net oversight committee
shall first consider the needs of districts adversely affected by the 1995
change in the special education funding formula. Awards shall be based on the
lesser of the amount required to maintain the 1994-95 state special education
excess cost allocation to the school district in aggregate or on a dollar per
funded student basis.

(((b))) (c)
The committee shall then consider unmet needs for districts that can
convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for special education
exceed all available revenues from state funding formulas. In the determination
of need, the committee shall also consider additional available revenues from
federal and local sources. Differences in program costs attributable to
district philosophy, service delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a
legitimate basis for safety net awards.

(((c))) (d)
The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net eligibility may
not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate for the district plus one
percent.

(((d))) (e)
Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of potential medicaid
eligible students billed as calculated by the superintendent in accordance with
chapter 318, Laws of 1999.

(((e))) (f)
Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or exceptions related
to special education funding.

(((f))) (g)
The superintendent may expend up to $120,000 ((per year)) of the amounts
provided in this subsection (8) to provide staff assistance to the
committee in analyzing applications for safety net funds received by the
committee.

(9) To the extent
necessary, $2,058,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 and $10,815,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided for safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for state
special education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (5) of this
section. If safety net awards exceed the amount appropriated in this
subsection (9), the superintendent shall expend all available federal
discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. Safety net funds shall be
awarded by the state safety net oversight committee subject to the following
conditions and limitations:

(a) The committee
shall consider unmet needs for districts that can convincingly demonstrate that
all legitimate expenditures for special education exceed all available revenues
from state funding formulas. In the determination of need, the committee shall
also consider additional available revenues from federal and local sources.
Differences in program costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for safety
net awards.

(b) The committee
shall then consider the extraordinary high cost needs of one or more individual
special education students. Differences in costs attributable to district
philosophy, service delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a
legitimate basis for safety net awards.

(c) The maximum
allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net eligibility may not exceed
the federal restricted indirect cost rate for the district plus one percent.

(d) Safety net
awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of potential medicaid eligible
students billed as calculated by the superintendent in accordance with chapter
318, Laws of 1999.

(e) Safety net
awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or exceptions related to special
education funding.

(f) The
superintendent may expend up to $120,000 of the amount provided from the
general fund‑-federal appropriation in this subsection (9) to provide
staff assistance to the committee in analyzing applications for safety net
funds received by the committee.

(((9))) (10)
The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules and procedures as
are necessary to administer the special education funding and safety net award
process. Prior to revising any standards, procedures, or rules, the
superintendent shall consult with the office of financial management and the
fiscal committees of the legislature.

(((10))) (11)
The safety net oversight committee appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction shall consist of:

(a) One staff from the
office of superintendent of public instruction;

(b) Staff of the office
of the state auditor;

(c) Staff of the office
of the financial management; and

(d) One or more
representatives from school districts or educational service districts
knowledgeable of special education programs and funding.

(((11))) (12)
To the extent necessary, (($5,500,000)) in fiscal year 2002,
$2,250,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation shall be
expended for safety net funding to meet the extraordinary needs of one or more
individual special education students. If safety net awards to meet the
extraordinary needs exceed (($5,500,000)) $2,250,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation, the superintendent shall expend all
available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. General
fund‑-state funds shall not be expended for this purpose.

(((12))) (13)
A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund‑-state
appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time
equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and medical center. This
amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation
and the special education program.

(((13))) (14)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for
projects to provide special education students with appropriate job and
independent living skills, including work experience where possible, to
facilitate their successful transition out of the public school system. The
funds provided by this subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.

(((14))) (15)
The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to
school districts at 85 percent for the 2001-02 school year. For the
2002-03 school year, the superintendent shall allocate the federal funds as
specified in this section and shall adjust federal flow-through funds
accordingly. In addition to other purposes, school districts may use
increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special
education services from educational service districts, and for staff
development activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(((15))) (16)
A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation may be
expended by the superintendent for projects related to use of inclusion
strategies by school districts for provision of special education services.
The superintendent shall prepare an information database on laws, best
practices, examples of programs, and recommended resources. The information
may be disseminated in a variety of ways, including workshops and other staff
development activities.

(((16))) (17)
A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10
percent of general fund‑-state funds allocated under this program;
however, carry over funds shall be expended in the special education program.

(18) The
superintendent of public instruction shall implement the recommendations of the
joint legislative audit and review committee study on special education (report
01-11) only to the extent that funds have been specifically provided therefor.

Sec. 507. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 508
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRAFFIC SAFETY EDUCATION
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((3,595,000))

3,765,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((2,588,000))

2,726,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((6,183,000))

6,491,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations
include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in each
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) A maximum of
$253,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund appropriation and a maximum of (($254,000))
$246,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund appropriation may be
expended for regional traffic safety education coordinators.

(3) Allocations to
provide tuition assistance for students eligible for free and reduced price
lunch who complete the program shall be a maximum of $203.97 per eligible
student in the 2001-02 school year and $197.85 in the 2002-03
school year((s)).

Sec. 508. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 509
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE
DISTRICTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((4,768,000))

4,757,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((4,768,000))

4,561,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((9,536,000))

9,318,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The educational
service districts shall continue to furnish financial services required by the
superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).

(2) $250,000 of the
general fund appropriation for fiscal year ((2000)) 2002 and (($250,000))
$243,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year ((2001))
2003 are provided solely for student teaching centers as provided in RCW
28A.415.100.

(3) A maximum of
$250,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund appropriation and a maximum of (($250,000))
$243,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund appropriation are provided
for centers for the improvement of teaching pursuant to RCW 28A.415.010.

Sec. 509. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 510
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((136,315,000))

140,932,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((148,329,000))

152,744,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((284,644,000))

293,676,000

Sec. 510. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 511
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((19,133,000))

19,073,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((19,115,000))

18,553,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 8,548,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((46,796,000))

46,174,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund‑-state
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) State funding
provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a
220‑day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall
monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs
to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.

(3) State funding for
each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual
average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each
category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97
biennium.

(4) The funded staffing
ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of
corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99
biennium.

(5) $141,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $139,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related
support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not
sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff
to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions are
included: Residential programs under the department of social and health
services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under
the department of corrections, and programs for juveniles under the juvenile
rehabilitation administration.

(6) Ten percent of the
funds allocated for each institution may be carried over from one year to the
next.

Sec. 511. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 512
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY
CAPABLE STUDENTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((6,443,000))

6,470,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((6,397,000))

6,194,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((12,840,000))

12,664,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) Allocations for
school district programs for highly capable students shall be distributed at a
maximum rate of (($328.10)) $327.22 per funded student for the
2001-02 school year and (($328.05)) $310.75 per funded student
for the 2002-03 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded students shall be a
maximum of two percent of each district's full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment.

(3) $175,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 appropriation and (($175,000)) $170,000 of the
fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided for the centrum program at Fort
Worden state park.

(4) $93,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 appropriation and (($93,000)) $90,000 of the
fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided for the Washington imagination
network and future problem-solving programs.

Sec. 512. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 513
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR MISCELLANEOUS PURPOSES UNDER THE ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY
SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT AND THE NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((288,166,000))

201,737,000

Sec. 513. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 514
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002) ... $ ((35,882,000))

35,880,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((36,363,000))

23,123,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((3,000,000))

60,571,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((75,245,000))

119,574,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $322,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($322,000))
$312,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for the academic achievement and accountability
commission.

(2) $11,209,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, (($10,872,000))
$8,872,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and (($3,000,000)) $5,000,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided for development and implementation of the Washington
assessments of student learning. Up to $689,000 of the appropriation may be
expended for data analysis and data management of test results.

(3) $1,095,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 general fund‑‑state appropriation ((and
$1,095,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund‑‑state
appropriation are)) is provided solely for training of
paraprofessional classroom assistants and certificated staff who work with
classroom assistants as provided in RCW 28A.415.310.

(4) $4,695,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
$4,695,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are)) is provided solely for mentor teacher assistance,
including state support activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and 28A.415.260, and
for a mentor academy. Up to $200,000 of the amount in this subsection may be
used ((each fiscal year)) to operate a mentor academy to help districts
provide effective training for peer mentors. Funds for the teacher assistance
program shall be allocated to school districts based on the number of first
year beginning teachers.

(a) A teacher
assistance program is a program that provides to a first year beginning teacher
peer mentor services that include but are not limited to:

(i) An orientation
process and individualized assistance to help beginning teachers who have been
hired prior to the start of the school year prepare for the start of a school
year;

(ii) The assignment of
a peer mentor whose responsibilities to the beginning teacher include but are
not limited to constructive feedback, the modeling of instructional strategies,
and frequent meetings and other forms of contact;

(iii) The provision by
peer mentors of strategies, training, and guidance in critical areas such as
classroom management, student discipline, curriculum management, instructional
skill, assessment, communication skills, and professional conduct. A district
may provide these components through a variety of means including one-on-one
contact and workshops offered by peer mentors to groups, including cohort
groups, of beginning teachers;

(iv) The provision of
release time, substitutes, mentor training in observation techniques, and other
measures for both peer mentors and beginning teachers, to allow each an
adequate amount of time to observe the other and to provide the classroom
experience that each needs to work together effectively;

(v) Assistance in the
incorporation of the essential academic learning requirements into
instructional plans and in the development of complex teaching strategies,
including strategies to raise the achievement of students with diverse learning
styles and backgrounds; and

(vi) Guidance and
assistance in the development and implementation of a professional growth
plan. The plan shall include a professional self-evaluation component and one
or more informal performance assessments. A peer mentor may not be involved in
any evaluation under RCW 28A.405.100 of a beginning teacher whom the peer
mentor has assisted through this program.

(b) In addition to the
services provided in (a) of this subsection, an eligible peer mentor program
shall include but is not limited to the following components:

(i) Strong
collaboration among the peer mentor, the beginning teacher's principal, and the
beginning teacher;

(ii) Stipends for peer
mentors and, at the option of a district, for beginning teachers. The stipends
shall not be deemed compensation for the purposes of salary lid compliance
under RCW 28A.400.200 and are not subject to the continuing contract provisions
of Title 28A RCW; and

(iii) To the extent
that resources are available for this purpose and that assistance to beginning
teachers is not adversely impacted, the program may serve second year and more
experienced teachers who request the assistance of peer mentors.

(5) $2,025,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($2,025,000))
$1,964,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for improving technology infrastructure,
monitoring and reporting on school district technology development, promoting
standards for school district technology, promoting statewide coordination and
planning for technology development, and providing regional educational
technology support centers, including state support activities, under chapter
28A.650 RCW. The superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate a
process to facilitate the evaluation and provision of online curriculum courses
to school districts which includes the following: Creation of a general
listing of the types of available online curriculum courses; a survey conducted
by each regional educational technology support center of school districts in
its region regarding the types of online curriculum courses desired by school
districts; a process to evaluate and recommend to school districts the best
online courses in terms of curriculum, student performance, and cost; and assistance
to school districts in procuring and providing the courses to students.

(6) $3,600,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($3,600,000))
$2,700,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for grants to school districts to provide a
continuum of care for children and families to help children become ready to
learn. Grant proposals from school districts shall contain local plans
designed collaboratively with community service providers. If a continuum of
care program exists in the area in which the school district is located, the
local plan shall provide for coordination with existing programs to the
greatest extent possible. Grant funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW
70.190.040.

(7) $2,500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,500,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for the meals for kids program under RCW 28A.235.145 through
28A.235.155.

(8) $1,409,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
$1,409,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are)) is provided solely for the leadership internship program
for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.

(9) $1,828,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
$1,828,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
are)) is provided solely for the mathematics helping corps subject
to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) In order to
increase the availability and quality of technical mathematics assistance
statewide, the superintendent of public instruction shall employ mathematics
school improvement specialists to provide assistance to schools and districts.
The specialists shall be hired by and work under the direction of a statewide
school improvement coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall
serve on a rotating basis from one to three years and shall not be permanent
employees of the superintendent of public instruction.

(b) The school
improvement specialists shall provide the following:

(i) Assistance to
schools to disaggregate student performance data and develop improvement plans
based on those data;

(ii) Consultation with
schools and districts concerning their performance on the Washington assessment
of student learning and other assessments emphasizing the performance on the
mathematics assessments;

(iii) Consultation
concerning curricula that aligns with the essential academic learning requirements
emphasizing the academic learning requirements for mathematics, the Washington
assessment of student learning, and meets the needs of diverse learners;

(iv) Assistance in the
identification and implementation of research-based instructional practices in
mathematics;

(v) Staff training that
emphasizes effective instructional strategies and classroom-based assessment
for mathematics;

(vi) Assistance in
developing and implementing family and community involvement programs
emphasizing mathematics; and

(vii) Other assistance
to schools and school districts intended to improve student mathematics
learning.

(10) A maximum of
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of (($500,000)) $485,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for summer accountability
institutes offered by the superintendent of public instruction and the academic
achievement and accountability commission. The institutes shall provide school
district staff with training in the analysis of student assessment data,
information regarding successful district and school teaching models, research
on curriculum and instruction, and planning tools for districts to improve
instruction in reading, mathematics, language arts, and guidance and
counseling.

(11) $3,930,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($3,829,000))
$3,714,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(a) Grants shall be
allocated to schools and school districts to implement proven, research-based
mentoring and tutoring programs in reading for low-performing students in grades
K-6. If the grant is made to a school district, the principals of schools
enrolling targeted students shall be consulted concerning design and
implementation of the program.

(b) The programs may be
implemented before, after, or during the regular school day, or on Saturdays,
summer, intercessions, or other vacation periods.

(c) Two or more schools
may combine their Washington reading corps programs.

(d) A program is
eligible for a grant if it meets the following conditions:

(i) The program employs
methods of teaching and student learning based on reliable reading/literacy
research and effective practices;

(ii) The program design
is comprehensive and includes instruction, on-going student assessment,
professional development, parental/community involvement, and program
management aligned with the school's reading curriculum;

(iii) It provides
quality professional development and training for teachers, staff, and
volunteer mentors and tutors;

(iv) It has measurable
goals for student reading aligned with the essential academic learning
requirements; and

(v) It contains an
evaluation component to determine the effectiveness of the program.

(e) Funding priority
shall be given to low-performing schools.

(f) Beginning and
end-of-program testing data shall be available to determine the effectiveness
of funded programs and practices. Common evaluative criteria across programs,
such as grade-level improvements shall be available for each reading corps
program. The superintendent of public instruction shall provide program
evaluations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.
Administrative and evaluation costs may be assessed from the annual
appropriation for the program.

(g) Grants provided
under this section may be used by schools and school districts for expenditures
from September 2001 through August 31, 2003.

(12) (($377,000))
$375,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and (($701,000)) $655,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for salary bonuses for
teachers who attain certification by the national board for professional
teaching standards.

(((b))) (a)
In the 2002-03 school year, teachers who have attained certification by the
national board in the 2000-01 school year or the 2001-02 school year or the
2002-03 school year shall receive an annual bonus not to exceed $3,500.

(((c))) (b)
The annual bonus shall be paid in a lump sum amount and shall not be included
in the definition of "earnable compensation" under RCW 41.32.010(10).

(((d))) (c)
It is the intent of the legislature that teachers achieving certification by
the national board of professional teaching standards will receive no more than
three annual bonus payments for attaining certification by the national board.

(13) $625,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and $625,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are)) is
provided for a principal support program. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction may contract with an independent organization to administer
the program. The program shall include: (a) Development of an individualized
professional growth plan for a new principal or principal candidate; and (b)
participation of a mentor principal who works over a period of between one and
three years with the new principal or principal candidate to help him or her
build the skills identified as critical to the success of the professional
growth plan.

(14) $71,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $71,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for the second grade reading test. The funds shall be expended
for assessment training for new second grade teachers and replacement of
assessment materials.

(15) $384,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and $384,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are)) is
provided for the superintendent to assist schools in implementing high academic
standards, aligning curriculum with these standards, and training teachers to
use assessments to improve student learning. Funds may also be used to
increase community and parental awareness of education reform.

(16) $130,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($130,000))
$126,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided for the development and posting of web-based instructional
tools, assessment data, and other information that assists schools and teachers
implementing higher academic standards.

(17) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($1,800,000))
$1,746,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction for focused assistance. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall conduct educational audits of low-performing schools and
enter into performance agreements between school districts and the office to
implement the recommendations of the audit and the community. Of the amounts
provided, $219,000 of the fiscal year 2002 appropriation and (($207,000))
$201,000 of the fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction for the administrative
duties arising under this subsection. Each educational audit shall include
recommendations for best practices and ways to address identified needs and
shall be presented to the community in a public meeting to seek input on ways
to implement the audit and its recommendations.

(18) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for grants to school districts to adopt or revise district-wide and
school-level plans to achieve performance improvement goals established under
RCW 28A.655.030, and to post a summary of the improvement plans on district
websites using a common format provided by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction.

(19) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for recognition plaques for schools that successfully met the fourth grade
reading improvement goal established under RCW 28A.655.050.

Sec. 514. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 515
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((43,044,000))

42,767,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((45,171,000))

44,407,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation (FY 2003)... $........................................... 20,280,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((88,215,000))

107,454,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) The superintendent
shall distribute a maximum of (($687.19)) $684.36 per eligible
bilingual student in the 2001-02 school year and (($687.19)) $668.58
in the 2002-03 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
provided in section 504 of this act.

(3) The superintendent
may withhold up to $295,000 in school year 2001-02 and up to $268,000 in school
year 2002-03, and adjust the per eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this
section accordingly, for the central provision of assessments as provided in
section 2(1) and (2) of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2025.

(4) $70,000 of the
amounts appropriated in this section are provided solely to develop a system
for the tracking of current and former transitional bilingual program students.

(5) Sufficient funding
is provided to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2025
(schools/bilingual instruction).

Sec. 515. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 516
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((70,593,000))

71,342,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((68,817,000))

64,400,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation (FY 2003)... $........................................... 130,631,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((139,410,000))

266,373,000

The general fund‑-state
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1) Each general fund‑-state
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) Funding for school
district learning assistance programs shall be allocated at maximum rates of (($408.38))
$407.39 per funded unit for the 2001-02 school year and (($409.41))
$403.06 per funded unit for the 2002-03 school year exclusive of salary
and benefit adjustments provided under section 504 of this act.

(3) For purposes of
this section, "test results" refers to the district results from the
norm-referenced test administered in the specified grade level. The
norm-referenced test results used for the third and sixth grade calculations
shall be consistent with the third and sixth grade tests required under RCW
28A.230.190 and 28A.230.193.

(4) A school district's
general fund‑-state funded units for the 2001-02 ((and 2002-03))
school year((s)) shall be the sum of the following:

(a) The district's
full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-6, multiplied by the 5-year average
4th grade lowest quartile test results as adjusted for funding purposes in the
school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.92. As the 3rd grade test
becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average on a 1-year lag;
and

(b) The district's
full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 7-9, multiplied by the 5-year average
8th grade lowest quartile test results as adjusted for funding purposes in the
school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.92. As the 6th grade test
becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average for these grades
on a 1-year lag; and

(c) The district's
full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 10-11 multiplied by the 5-year
average 11th grade lowest quartile test results, multiplied by 0.92. As the
9th grade test becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average
for these grades on a 1-year lag; and

(d) If, in the prior
school year, the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in
grades K-12 eligible for free and reduced price lunch exceeded the state
average, subtract the state average percentage of students eligible for free
and reduced price lunch from the district's percentage and multiply the result
by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the
current school year multiplied by 22.3 percent.

(5)(a) A school
district's general fund‑-state funded units for the 2002‑03 school
year shall be the sum of the following:

(i) The district's
full‑time equivalent enrollment in grades K‑6, multiplied by the 5‑year
average 4th grade lowest quartile test results as adjusted for funding purposes
in the school years prior to 1999‑2000, multiplied by 0.82. As the 3rd
grade test becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5‑year average
on a 1‑year lag;

(ii) The district's
full‑time equivalent enrollment in grades 7‑9, multiplied by the 5‑year
average 8th grade lowest quartile test results as adjusted for funding purposes
in the school years prior to 1999‑2000, multiplied by 0.82. As the 6th
grade test becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5‑year average
for these grades on a 1‑year lag; and

(iii) The district's
full‑time equivalent enrollment in grades 10‑11 multiplied by the 5‑year
average 11th grade lowest quartile test results, multiplied by 0.82. As the
9th grade test becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5‑year
average for these grades on a 1‑year lag; and

(iv) If, in the
prior school year, the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in
grades K‑12 eligible for free and reduced price lunch exceeded the state
average, subtract the state average percentage of students eligible for free
and reduced price lunch from the district's percentage and multiply the result
by the district's K‑12 annual average full‑time equivalent
enrollment for the current school year multiplied by 22.3 percent.

(b) In addition to
amounts allocated under (a) of this subsection, the superintendent shall
provide additional amounts as follows:

(i) For school
districts receiving less than a 3.0 percent increase in federal Title I Part A
(basic program) funds, the multiplier in (a)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this
subsection shall be .92;

(ii) For school
districts not eligible for additional funds under (b)(i) of this subsection,
and whose effective increase in federal Title I Part A (basic program) funds is
less than 3.0 percent after taking into account the change in the multiplier
from .92 to .82, an additional amount to provide a 3.0 percent increase.

(6) School
districts may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of general
fund‑-state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover
funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program.

Sec. 516. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 517
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-LOCAL ENHANCEMENT FUNDS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((19,515,000))

19,663,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((17,516,000))

3,541,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((37,031,000))

23,204,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) Funds are provided
for local education program enhancements to meet educational needs as
identified by the school district, including alternative education programs.

(3) Allocations for the
2001-02 school year shall be at a maximum annual rate of $18.48 per full-time
equivalent student ((and $18.48 per full-time equivalent student for the
2002-03 school year)). Allocations shall be made on the monthly
apportionment payment schedule provided in RCW 28A.510.250 and shall be based
on school district annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in grades
kindergarten through twelve: PROVIDED, That for school districts enrolling not
more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, and for
small school plants within any school district designated as remote and
necessary schools, the allocations shall be as follows:

(a) Enrollment of not
more than sixty average annual full-time equivalent students in grades
kindergarten through six shall generate funding based on sixty full-time
equivalent students;

(b) Enrollment of not
more than twenty average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven
and eight shall generate funding based on twenty full-time equivalent students;
and

(c) Enrollment of not
more than sixty average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine
through twelve shall generate funding based on sixty full-time equivalent
students.

(4) Funding provided
pursuant to this section does not fall within the definition of basic education
for purposes of Article IX of the state Constitution and the state's funding
duty thereunder.

(5) The superintendent
shall not allocate up to one-fourth of a district's funds under this section
if:

(a) The district is not
maximizing federal matching funds for medical services provided through special
education programs, pursuant to RCW 74.09.5241 through 74.09.5256 (Title XIX
funding); or

(b) The district is not
in compliance in filing truancy petitions as required under chapter 312, Laws
of 1995 and RCW 28A.225.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
517. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑‑STATE FLEXIBLE EDUCATION
FUNDS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 34,436,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) State flexible
education funds for the 2002‑03 school year shall be allocated at a
maximum rate of $36.00 per full‑time equivalent student in grades K‑12.
For the purpose of this section, "FTE student" refers to the annual
average full‑time equivalent enrollment of the school district in grades
kindergarten through twelve for the prior school year. The funds shall be
distributed to school districts at ten percent per month for the months of
September through June.

(2) Funds are provided
for local education program enhancements to improve student learning as
identified by each school district, including the following programs:
Alternative education programs; paraprofessional training; mentor/beginning
teacher assistance; principal assessment and mentorships; superintendent and
principal internships; mathematics helping corps; anti-bullying/harassment
training; nonviolence leadership training; nursing support; school safety and
school safety training; school safety center; Teen Aware; truancy; LASER
science program; Cispus; contracting with educational centers; Pacific Science
Center programs; civil liberties education; World War II oral history project;
and extended day skills center.

(3) Funds provided
under this section shall not be used for salary increases or additional
compensation for existing teaching duties.

(4) Funding provided
under this section does not fall within the definition of basic education for
purposes of Article IX of the state Constitution.

Sec. 518. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 519
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION‑-FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT
PROGRAM

Student Achievement Fund‑-State

Appropriation (FY 2002).................... $ ((184,232,000))

180,837,000

Student Achievement Fund‑-State

Appropriation (FY 2003).................... $ ((209,068,000))

210,312,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((393,300,000))

391,149,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
is allocated for the following uses as specified in chapter 28A.505 RCW as
amended by chapter 3, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 728):

(a) To reduce class
size by hiring certificated elementary classroom teachers in grades K-4 and
paying nonemployee-related costs associated with those new teachers;

(b) To make selected
reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such as small high school writing
classes;

(c) To provide extended
learning opportunities to improve student academic achievement in grades K-12,
including, but not limited to, extended school year, extended school day,
before-and-after-school programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school
programs, summer school, and all-day kindergarten;

(d) To provide
additional professional development for educators including additional paid
time for curriculum and lesson redesign and alignment, training to ensure that
instruction is aligned with state standards and student needs, reimbursement
for higher education costs related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge,
and mentoring programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The
funding shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and extend day
teaching contracts;

(e) To provide early
assistance for children who need prekindergarten support in order to be
successful in school; or

(f) To provide
improvements or additions to school building facilities which are directly
related to the class size reductions and extended learning opportunities under
(a) through (c) of this subsection.

(2) Funding for school
district student achievement programs shall be allocated at a maximum rate of
(($193.92)) $190.19 per FTE student for the 2001-02 school year
and (($220.59)) $219.84 per FTE student for the 2002-03 school
year. For the purposes of this section and in accordance with ((RCW 84.52.‑‑‑
(section 5 of Initiative Measure No. 728))) RCW 84.52.068, FTE
student refers to the annual average full-time equivalent enrollment of the
school district in grades kindergarten through twelve for the prior school
year.

(3) The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall distribute ten percent of the annual
allocation to districts each month for the months of September through June.

Sec. 519. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 521
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

Education Savings Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((36,720,000))

36,656,000

Education Construction
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 154,500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((191,220,000))

191,156,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($18,000,000))
$17,936,000 in fiscal year 2002 and $18,720,000 in fiscal year 2003 of
the education savings account appropriation shall be deposited in the common
school construction account.

(2)
$154,500,000 of the education construction account appropriation shall be
deposited in the common school construction account.

(End
of part)

PART
VI

HIGHER EDUCATION

Sec. 601. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 601
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The appropriations in
sections 603 through 609 of this act are subject to the following conditions
and limitations:

(1)
"Institutions" means the institutions of higher education receiving
appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act.

(2)(a) The salary
increases provided or referenced in this subsection shall be the only allowable
salary increases provided at institutions of higher education, excluding
increases associated with normally occurring promotions and increases related
to faculty and professional staff retention, and excluding increases associated
with employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 28B.16.015 and 28B.50.874(1).

(b) Each institution of
higher education shall provide to each classified staff employee as defined by
the office of financial management, except for classified staff at the
technical colleges, a salary increase of 3.7 percent on July 1, 2001. The
technical colleges shall provide to classified employees under chapter 41.56
RCW an average salary increase of 3.7 percent on July 1, 2001. Funds are also
provided for salary increases for ((all classified employees on July 1,
2002, in a percentage amount to be determined by the 2002 legislature and, in
the case of)) technical college classified staff, consistent with the
provisions of Initiative 732.

(c) Each institution of
higher education, except for the community and technical colleges, shall
provide to state-funded instructional and research faculty, exempt professional
staff, academic administrators, academic librarians, counselors, teaching and
research assistants as classified by the office of financial management, and
all other state-funded nonclassified staff, including those employees under RCW
28B.16.015, an average salary increase of 3.7 percent on July 1, 2001. ((Funds
are also provided for salary increases for these employee groups on July 1,
2002, in a percentage amount to be determined by the 2002 legislature.))
Each institution may provide the same average increases to similar positions
that are not state-funded.

(d) The community and
technical colleges shall provide to academic employees, exempt professional
staff, and academic administrators an average salary increase of 3.7 percent on
July 1, 2001. Funds are also provided for salary increases for ((these
groups on July 1, 2002, in a percentage amount to be determined by the 2002
legislature and, in the case of)) community college academic employees and
technical college employees, consistent with the provisions of Initiative 732.

(e) For employees under
the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the provisions of RCW
28B.16.015 and 28B.50.874(1), distribution of the salary increases will be in
accordance with the applicable collective bargaining agreement. However, an
increase shall not be provided to any classified employee whose salary is above
the approved salary range maximum for the class to which the employee's
position is allocated.

(f) Each institution of
higher education receiving appropriations under sections 604 through 609 of
this act may provide additional salary increases to instructional and research
faculty, exempt professional staff, academic administrators, academic
librarians, counselors, teaching and research assistants, as classified by the
office of financial management, and all other nonclassified staff, but not
including employees under RCW 28B.16.015. Any salary increase granted under
the authority of this subsection (2)(f) or accomplished with local, nonstate
funds under the collective bargaining provisions of either (i) Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6440 or Substitute House Bill No. 2403, or (ii) Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6403 or Substitute House Bill No. 2540, shall not be
included in an institution's salary base. It is the intent of the legislature
that general fund‑-state support for an institution shall not increase
during the current or any future biennium as a result of any salary increases
authorized under this subsection (2)(f) or under rights granted to award
additional compensation with local, nonstate funds under the collective
bargaining provisions of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6440, Substitute House Bill
No. 2403, Substitute Senate Bill No. 6403, or Substitute House Bill No. 2540.

(g) To collect
consistent data for use by the legislature, the office of financial management,
and other state agencies for policy and planning purposes, institutions of
higher education shall report personnel data to be used in the department of
personnel's human resource data warehouse in compliance with uniform reporting
procedures established by the department of personnel.

(h) Specific salary
increases authorized in sections 603 through 609 of this act are in addition to
any salary increase provided in this subsection.

(3) The tuition fees,
as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW, charged to full-time resident students
at the state's institutions of higher education for the 2001-02 and 2002-03
academic years, other than the summer term, may be adjusted by the governing
boards of the state universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State
College, and the state board for community and technical colleges as provided
in this subsection.

(a) For the 2001-02
academic year, the governing boards and the state board may implement an
increase no greater than six and seven-tenths percent over tuition fees charged
to full-time students for the 2000-01 academic year.

(b)(i) For the
2002-03 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities may
implement an increase no greater than fourteen percent over tuition fees
charged to full-time students for the 2001-02 academic year, except as provided
in (d) and (g) of this subsection.

(ii) For the 2002-03
academic year, the governing boards of the regional universities and The
Evergreen State College may implement an increase no greater than ten percent
over tuition fees charged to full-time students for the 2001-02 academic year,
except as provided in (d) and (g) of this subsection.

(iii) For the
2002-03 academic year, the ((governing boards and the)) state board may
implement an increase no greater than ((six and one-tenth)) seven
percent over the tuition fees charged to full-time students for the 2001-02
academic year except as provided in (g) of this subsection.

(c) For the 2001-02
academic year, the governing boards may implement an increase for law and
graduate business programs no greater than twelve percent over tuition fees
charged to law and graduate business students for the 2000-01 academic year,
except as provided in (e) of this subsection.

(d) For the 2002-03
academic year, ((the governing boards may implement an increase for law and
graduate business programs no greater than twelve percent over tuition fees
charged to law and graduate business students for the 2001-02 academic year,
except as provided in (f) of this subsection)) tuition fees for all
graduate, law, and professional programs may exceed the limits specified in (b)
of this subsection. Tuition increases adopted under this subsection need not
apply uniformly across student categories as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW and
may vary by discipline and degree.

(e) For the 2001-02
academic year, the governing boards of the University of Washington may
implement an increase for graduate business programs no greater than 15 percent
over tuition fees charged to graduate business students for the 2000-01
academic year.

(f) ((For the
2002-03 academic year, the governing boards of the University of Washington may
implement an increase for graduate business programs no greater than 20 percent
over tuition fees charged to graduate business students for the 2001-02
academic year.

(g))) For the 2001-02 and the 2002-03 academic
years, the state board for community and technical colleges may increase fees
differentially based on student credit hour load, but the percentage increase
for students taking fifteen or fewer credits shall not exceed the limits in
subsection (3)(a) and (b)(iii) of this section.

(g) For the 2002-03
academic year, governing boards and the state board for community and technical
colleges may charge full-time tuition of students who register for 9 credit
hours a term even if the increases exceed limits specified in (b) of this
subsection.

(h) For the 2001-03
biennium, the governing boards and the state board may adjust full-time
operating fees for factors that may include time of day and day of week, as
well as delivery method and campus, to encourage full use of the state's
educational facilities and resources.

(i) The tuition
increases adopted under (a), (((b), (g))) (f), and (h) of this
subsection need not apply uniformly across student categories as defined in
chapter 28B.15 RCW so long as the increase for each student category does not
exceed the percentages specified in this subsection.

(4) The tuition
fees, as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW, charged to full-time nonresident
students at the state's institutions of higher education for the 2001-02 and
the 2002-03 academic years, other than summer term, may be adjusted by
governing boards of the state universities, regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the state board for community and technical
colleges.

(5) In addition
to waivers granted under the authority of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards
and the state board may waive all or a portion of the operating fees for any
student. State general fund appropriations shall not be provided to replace
tuition and fee revenue foregone as a result of waivers granted under this
subsection.

(((5))) (6)
Pursuant to RCW ((43.15.055)) 43.135.055, institutions of higher
education receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act
are authorized to increase summer term tuition in excess of the fiscal growth
factor during the 2001-03 biennium. Tuition levels increased pursuant to this
subsection shall not exceed the per credit hour rate calculated from the
academic year tuition levels adopted under this act.

(((6))) (7)
Community colleges may increase services and activities fee charges in excess
of the fiscal growth factor up to the maximum level authorized by the state
board for community and technical colleges.

(((7))) (8)
Each institution receiving appropriations under sections 604 through 609 of
this act shall submit a biennial plan to achieve measurable and specific
improvements each academic year as part of a continuing effort to make
meaningful and substantial progress towards the achievement of long-term
performance goals. The plans, to be prepared at the direction of the higher
education coordinating board, shall be submitted by August 15, 2001. The
higher education coordinating board shall set biennial performance targets for
each institution and shall review actual achievements annually. Institutions
shall track their actual performance on the statewide measures as well as
faculty productivity, the goals and targets for which may be unique to each
institution. A report on progress towards statewide and institution-specific
goals, with recommendations for the ensuing biennium, shall be submitted to the
fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature by November 15, 2003.

(((8))) (9)
The state board for community and technical colleges shall develop a biennial
plan to achieve measurable and specific improvements each academic year as part
of a continuing effort to make meaningful and substantial progress to achieve
long-term performance goals. The board shall set biennial performance targets
for each college or district, where appropriate, and shall review actual
achievements annually. Colleges shall track their actual performance on the
statewide measures. A report on progress towards the statewide goals, with
recommendations for the ensuing biennium, shall be submitted to the fiscal and
higher education committees of the legislature by November 15, 2003.

Sec. 602. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 602
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The appropriations in
sections 603 through 609 of this act provide state general fund support for
full-time equivalent student enrollments at each institution of higher
education. Listed below are the annual full-time equivalent student
enrollments by institutions assumed in this act. In consideration of
reduced general fund support for the 2002-03 academic year, institutions may
serve fewer full-time equivalent student enrollments than assumed in this act.

2001-2002 2002-2003

Annual Annual

Average Average

University of Washington

Main campus 32,321 32,427

Bothell branch 1,169 1,235

Tacoma branch 1,330 1,484

Washington State University

Main campus 17,332 17,332

Spokane branch 551 593

Tri-Cities branch 616 616

Vancouver branch 1,071 1,153

Central Washington
University 7,470 7,470

Eastern Washington
University 7,933 8,017

The Evergreen State College 3,754 3,837

Western Washington
University 10,976 11,126

State Board for Community
and

Technical Colleges 125,082 ((126,902))

127,902

When allocating newly
budgeted enrollments, each institution of higher education shall give priority
to high demand fields, including but not limited to technology, health
professions, and education. At the end of each fiscal year, each institution
of higher education and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall submit a report to the higher education coordinating board detailing how
newly budgeted enrollments have been allocated.

Sec. 603. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 603
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((514,399,000))

514,141,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((543,731,000))

520,469,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 11,404,000

Education Savings Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,500,000

College Faculty Awards
Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,500,000

Administrative
Contingency Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,600,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,074,034,000))

1,056,614,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The technical
colleges may increase tuition and fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor to
conform with the percentage increase in community college operating fees.

(2) $2,475,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $5,025,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to increase salaries and related benefits for part-time faculty. The
board shall report by December 1 of each fiscal year to the office of financial
management and legislative fiscal and higher education committees on (a) the
distribution of state funds; (b) wage adjustments for part-time faculty; and
(c) progress to achieve the long-term performance targets for each district,
with respect to use of part-time faculty, pursuant to the faculty mix study
conducted under section 603, chapter 309, Laws of 1999.

(3) $1,155,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($2,345,000))
$1,155,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for faculty salary increments and associated
benefits and may be used in combination with salary and benefit savings from
faculty turnover to provide faculty salary increments and associated benefits.
To the extent general salary increase funding is used to pay faculty
increments, the general salary increase shall be reduced by the same amount.

(4) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
for a program to fund the start-up of new community and technical college
programs in rural counties as defined under RCW 43.160.020(12) and in
communities impacted by business closures and job reductions. Successful
proposals must respond to local economic development strategies and must
include a plan to continue programs developed with this funding.

(5) $326,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $640,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for allocation to twelve college districts identified in (a) through (l)
of this subsection to prepare students for transfer to the state technology
institute at the Tacoma branch campus of the University of Washington. The
appropriations in this section are intended to supplement, not supplant,
general enrollment allocations by the board to the districts under (a) through
(l) of this subsection:

(a) Bates Technical
College;

(b) Bellevue Community
College;

(c) Centralia Community
College;

(d) Clover Park
Community College;

(e) Grays Harbor
Community College;

(f) Green River
Community College;

(g) Highline Community
College;

(h) Tacoma Community
College;

(i) Olympic Community
College;

(j) Pierce District;

(k) Seattle District;
and

(l) South Puget Sound
Community College.

(6) $28,761,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($28,761,000))
$32,161,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 and the entire administrative contingency account appropriation
are provided solely as special funds for training and related support services,
including financial aid, as specified in chapter 226, Laws of 1993 (employment
and training for unemployed workers).

(a) Funding is provided
to support up to 7,200 full-time equivalent students in ((each)) fiscal
year 2002 and up to 8,200 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2003.

(b) In directing these
resources during the 2001-03 biennium, the state board for community and
technical colleges shall give considerable attention to the permanent
dislocation of workers from industries facing rapidly rising energy costs, such
as direct service industries.

(7) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for tuition support for students enrolled in work-based learning
programs.

(8) $567,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $568,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for administration and customized training contracts through the job
skills program.

(9) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are solely for
higher education student child care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.

(10) $212,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $212,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
for allocation to Olympic college. The college shall contract with accredited
baccalaureate institution(s) to bring a program of upper-division courses to
Bremerton. Funds provided are sufficient to support at least 30 additional
annual full-time equivalent students. The state board for community and
technical colleges shall report to the office of financial management and the
fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature on the implementation
of this subsection by December 1st of each fiscal year.

(11) The entire
education savings account appropriation is provided solely to support the
development of a multicollege student-centered online service center for
distance learners, including self-service internet applications and staff
support 24 hours per day. Moneys may be allocated by the office of financial
management upon certification that sufficient cash is available beyond the
appropriations made for the 2001-03 biennium for the purposes of common school
construction.

(12) $7,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 and the entire
college faculty awards trust account appropriation are provided solely for the
purposes of the settlement costs of Mader v. State litigation regarding
retirement contributions on behalf of part-time faculty.

Sec. 604. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 604
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((345,974,000))

345,904,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((361,114,000))

323,185,000

Death Investigations
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((259,000))

258,000

University of Washington
Building Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 1,103,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ ((5,891,000))

5,881,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... ((5,945,000))

5,937,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((720,286,000))

682,268,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university may
reallocate 10 percent of newly budgeted enrollments to campuses other than as
specified by the legislature in section 602 of this act in order to focus on
high demand areas. The university shall report the details of these reallocations
to the office of financial management and the fiscal and higher education
committees of the legislature for monitoring purposes by the 10th day of the
academic quarter that follows the reallocation actions. The report shall
provide details of undergraduate and graduate enrollments at the main campus
and each of the branch campuses.

(2) $2,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to create a state resource for technology education in the form of an
institute located at the University of Washington, Tacoma. It is the intent of
the legislature that at least ninety-nine of the full-time equivalent
enrollments allocated to the university's Tacoma branch campus for the 2002-03
academic year may be used to establish the technology institute. The
university will expand undergraduate and graduate degree programs meeting
regional technology needs including, but not limited to, computing and software
systems. As a condition of these appropriations:

(a) The university will
work with the state board for community and technical colleges, or individual
colleges where necessary, to establish articulation agreements in addition to
the existing associate of arts and associate of science transfer degrees. Such
agreements shall improve the transferability of students and in particular,
students with substantial applied information technology credits.

(b) The university will
establish performance measures for recruiting, retaining and graduating
students, including nontraditional students, and report back to the governor
and legislature by September 2002 as to its progress and future steps.

(3) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $150,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for research faculty clusters in the advanced technology initiative
program.

(4) The department of
environmental health shall report to the legislature the historical, current,
and anticipated use of funds provided from the accident and medical aid
accounts. The report shall be submitted prior to the convening of the 2002
legislative session.

(5) (($259,000))
$258,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is provided
solely for the forensic pathologist fellowship program.

(6) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $150,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action
item UW-01.

(7) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely
for the Olympic natural resource center.

(8) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriations are provided solely for the school of
medicine to conduct a survey designed to evaluate characteristics, factors and
probable causes for the high incidence of multiple sclerosis cases in
Washington state.

(9) $1,103,000 of the
University of Washington building account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the repair and reconstruction of the Urban Horticulture
Center (Merrill Hall).

Sec. 605. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 605
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((201,416,000))

201,362,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((209,939,000))

190,460,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((411,355,000))

391,822,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university may
reallocate 10 percent of newly budgeted enrollments to campuses other than
specified by the legislature in section 602 of this act in order to focus on
high demand areas. The university will report the details of these
reallocations to the office of financial management and the fiscal and higher
education committees of the legislature for monitoring purposes by the 10th day
of the academic quarter that follows the reallocation actions. The report will
provide details of undergraduate and graduate enrollments at the main campus
and each of the branch campuses.

(2) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $150,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for research faculty clusters in the advanced technology initiative
program.

(3) $165,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $166,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action
item WSU-01.

(4) Cooperative
extension service programs may receive less state support during fiscal year
2003 but such reductions shall not be made out-of-proportion to the change in
state general fund appropriations to the entire university reflected in this
section.

Sec. 606. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 606
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((45,532,000))

45,517,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((47,382,000))

43,318,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((92,914,000))

88,835,000

Sec. 607. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 607
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((44,164,000))

44,147,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((44,976,000))

41,295,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((89,140,000))

85,442,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $700,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided
solely for the development and implementation of the university's enrollment
stabilization recovery and growth plan. The university shall report back to
the fiscal committees of the legislature, the office of financial management,
and the higher education coordinating board at the end of each fiscal year with
details of its actions and progress.

Sec. 608. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 608
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((25,334,000))

25,351,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((26,260,000))

23,916,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((51,594,000))

49,267,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the institute for public policy to complete studies of services described
in section 202(1), chapter 1, Laws of 2000 2nd sp. sess.

(2) $11,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $54,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the institute for public policy to conduct an outcome evaluation
pursuant to Substitute Senate Bill No. 5416 (drug-affected infants). The
institute shall provide a report to the fiscal, health, and human services
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2003. If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this subsection shall be used to
evaluate outcomes across state health and social service pilot projects and
other national models involving women who have given birth to a drug-affected
infant, comparing gains in positive birth outcomes for resources invested, in
which case the institute's findings and recommendations will be provided by
November 15, 2002.

(3) $11,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $33,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the institute for public policy to evaluate partnership grant
programs for alternative teacher certification pursuant to Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5695. An interim report shall be provided to the
fiscal and education committees of the legislature by December 1, 2002, and a
final report by December 1, 2004.

(4) $60,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the institute for public policy to examine options for revising the state's
funding formula for the learning assistance program to enhance accountability
for school performance in meeting education reform goals. The institute shall
submit its report to the appropriate legislative fiscal and policy committees
by June 30, 2002.

(5) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the institute for public policy to study the prevalence and needs of
families who are raising related children. The study shall compare services
and policies of Washington state with other states that have a high rate of
kinship care placements in lieu of foster care placements. The study shall
identify possible changes in services and policies that are likely to increase
appropriate kinship care placements. A report shall be provided to the fiscal
and human services committees of the legislature by June 1, 2002.

(6) $35,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $15,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the institute for public policy to examine various educational
delivery models for providing services and education for students through the
Washington state school for the deaf. The institute's report, in conjunction
with the capacity planning study from the joint legislative audit and review
committee, shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
September 30, 2002.

(7) $30,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the institute for public policy to examine the structure, policies, and
recent experience in states where welfare recipients may attend college
full-time as their required TANF work activity. The institute will provide
findings and recommend how Washington could consider adding this feature in a
targeted, cost-neutral manner that would complement the present-day WorkFirst efforts
and caseload. The institute shall provide a report to the human services,
higher education, and fiscal committees of the legislature by November 15,
2001.

(8) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the institute for public policy to research and evaluate strategies
for constraining the growth in state health expenditures. Specific research
topics, approaches, and timelines shall be identified in consultation with the
fiscal committees of the legislature.

(9) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the institute for public policy to conduct a comprehensive review of the
costs and benefits of existing juvenile crime prevention and intervention
programs. This evaluation shall also consider what changes could result in
more cost-effective and efficient funding for juvenile crime prevention and
intervention programs presently supported with state funds. The institute for
public policy shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate
legislative fiscal and policy committees by October 1, 2002.

(10) $35,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
for the institute for public policy, in consultation with the office of
financial management, to review options regarding the elimination or
distribution of current functions of the state library to other entities or
retaining the state library as an independent agency. The institute shall also
develop an implementation plan for closure of the state library for the
legislature and office of financial management to consider. The plan shall
include necessary steps to be taken and estimated time for accomplishing them.
The state library shall assist the institute in providing information necessary
to formulate the plan. The institute shall submit the plan to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by November 15, 2003.

(11) $15,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $71,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the institute for public policy to review and evaluate the mission
of the branch campuses of the state's higher education research universities
under Substitute Senate Bill No. 6626. If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2002, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $11,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $29,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the institute for public policy to conduct research on at-risk youth
programs. The institute for public policy shall conduct the necessary research
in order to recommend to the legislature the criteria, processes, and
institutional arrangements under which proven best practices could be
identified, the reductions in the state justice system caseloads estimated, and
the unit cost and total cost savings estimated for the intervention and
prevention programs focused on youth at high risk for involvement with the
juvenile and adult justice systems. The development of criteria, processes,
and institutional arrangements for the limited purposes of this study shall not
be construed to define best practices for all programs. The institute for
public policy shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate
committees of legislature by December 15, 2002.

Sec. 609. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 609
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((59,755,000))

59,732,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((62,881,000))

57,508,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((122,636,000))

117,240,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $753,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$1,032,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
are provided solely for the operations of the North Snohomish, Island, Skagit
(NSIS) higher education consortium.

Sec. 610. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 610
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD‑-POLICY COORDINATION AND
ADMINISTRATION

General Fund‑-State Appropriation
(FY 2002).... $ 2,345,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((2,408,000))

2,288,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 636,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((5,389,000))

5,269,000

The appropriations in
this section are provided to carry out the policy coordination, planning,
studies and administrative functions of the board and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(1) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $150,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to continue the teacher training pilot program pursuant to chapter 177,
Laws of 1999.

(2) $105,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $245,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to continue a demonstration project to improve rural access to
post-secondary education by bringing distance learning technologies into
Jefferson county.

Sec. 611. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 611
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD‑-FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((123,645,000))

123,525,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((136,205,000))

136,998,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 7,511,000

Advanced College Tuition
Payment Program Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 3,604,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((270,965,000))

271,638,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $534,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $529,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the displaced homemakers program.

(2) $234,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $240,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the western interstate commission for higher education.

(3) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the health professional conditional scholarship and loan program
under chapter 28B.115 RCW. This amount shall be deposited to the health
professional loan repayment and scholarship trust fund to carry out the
purposes of the program.

(4) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriations is provided solely to continue a
demonstration project that enables classified public K-12 employees to become
future teachers, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Within available
funds, the board may renew and offer conditional scholarships of up to $4,000
per year for full or part-time studies that may be forgiven in exchange for
teaching service in Washington's public K-12 schools. In selecting loan
recipients, the board shall take into account the applicant's demonstrated
academic ability and commitment to serve as a teacher within the state of
Washington.

(b) Loans shall be forgiven
at the rate of one year of loan for two years of teaching service. Recipients
who teach in geographic or subject-matter shortage areas, as specified by the
office of the superintendent for public instruction, may have their loans
forgiven at the rate of one year of loan for one year of teaching service;

(c) Recipients who fail
to fulfill the required teaching service shall be required to repay the
conditional loan with interest. The board shall define the terms for
repayment, including applicable interest rates, fees and deferments, and may
adopt other rules as necessary to implement this demonstration project.

(d) The board may
deposit this appropriation and all collections into the student loan account
authorized in RCW 28B.102.060.

(e) The board will
provide the legislature and governor with findings about the impact of this
demonstration project on persons entering the teaching profession in shortage
areas by no later than January of 2002.

(5) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for higher education student child care matching grants under chapter
28B.135 RCW.

(6) $25,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $25,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the benefit of students who participate in college assistance
migrant programs (CAMP) operating in Washington state. To ensure timely state
aid, the board may establish a date after which no additional grants would be
available for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 academic years. The board shall disperse
grants in equal amounts to eligible post-secondary institutions so that state
money in all cases supplements federal CAMP awards.

(7) $120,156,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($133,965,000))
$134,879,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for student financial aid, including all
administrative costs. Of these amounts:

(a) $90,566,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($102,667,000))
$106,447,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for the state need grant program. After April 1
of each fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual appropriation for the
state need grant program may be transferred to the state work study program;

(b) $16,340,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $17,360,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the state work study program. Four percent of the appropriations
in this subsection (b) may be spent to administer state work study. After
April 1 of each fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual appropriation for
the state work study program may be transferred to the state need grant
program;

(c) $2,920,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,920,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for educational opportunity grants. The board may deposit sufficient
funds from its appropriation into the state education trust fund as established
in RCW 28B.10.821 to provide a one-year renewal of the grant for each new
recipient of the educational opportunity grant award. For the purpose of
establishing eligibility for the equal opportunity grant program for placebound
students under RCW 28B.101.020, Thurston county lies within the branch campus
service area of the Tacoma branch campus of the University of Washington;

(d) A maximum of 2.1
percent of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
((2.1)) 1.8 percent of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2003 may be expended for financial aid administration((,
excluding the 4 percent state work study program administrative allowance
provision));

(e) $1,241,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,428,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to implement the Washington scholars program. Any Washington scholars
program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred by the
board to the Washington award for vocational excellence;

(f) $588,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $589,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to implement Washington award for vocational excellence program. Any
Washington award for vocational program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each
year may be transferred by the board to the Washington scholars program;

(g) $251,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $251,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for community scholarship matching grants of $2,000 each. Of the
amounts provided, no more than $5,200 each year is for the administration of
the community scholarship matching grant program. To be eligible for the
matching grant, a nonprofit community organization organized under section
501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code must demonstrate that it has raised
$2,000 in new moneys for college scholarships after the effective date of this
act. An organization may receive more than one $2,000 matching grant and
preference shall be given to organizations affiliated with the citizens'
scholarship foundation; and

(h) $8,250,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($8,750,000))
$6,300,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for the Washington promise scholarship program
subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(i) Within available
funds and subject to state need grant service requirements pursuant to
Substitute House Bill No. 2807 (promise scholarships) as amended by the Senate,
the higher education coordinating board shall award scholarships for use at
accredited institutions of higher education in the state of Washington to as
many students as possible from among those qualifying under (iv) and (v)
of this subsection. Each qualifying student will receive two consecutive
annual installments, the value of each not to exceed the full-time annual
resident tuition rates charged by community colleges.

(ii) Of the amounts
provided, no more than $260,000 ((each year is)) in fiscal year 2002
and no more than $250,000 in fiscal year 2003 are for administration of the
Washington promise scholarship program.

(iii) Other than funds
provided for program administration, the higher education coordinating board
shall deposit all money received for the program in the Washington promise
scholarship account, a nonappropriated fund in the custody of the state
treasurer. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds
appropriated by the legislature for these scholarships, private contributions,
and receipts from refunds of tuition and fees.

(iv) Scholarships in ((the
2001-03 biennium)) fiscal year 2002 shall be awarded to students who
graduate from high school or its equivalent whose family income does not exceed
one hundred thirty-five percent of the state's median family income, adjusted
for family size, if they meet any of the following academic criteria:

(A) Students graduating
from public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW must be
in the top fifteen percent of their graduating class, or must equal or exceed a
cumulative scholastic assessment test score of 1200 on their first attempt;

(B) Students
participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200 RCW must
equal or exceed a cumulative scholastic assessment test score of 1200 on their
first attempt.

(v) Scholarships in
fiscal year 2003 shall be awarded to students who graduate from high school or
its equivalent whose family income does not exceed one hundred percent of the
state's median family income, adjusted for family size, if they meet any of the
following academic criteria:

(A) Students
graduating from public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195
RCW must be in the top ten percent of their graduating class, or must equal or
exceed a cumulative scholastic assessment test score of 1200 on their first
attempt;

(B) Students
participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200 RCW must
equal or exceed a cumulative scholastic assessment test score of 1200 on their
first attempt.

(vi) For
students eligible under (((iv) of)) this subsection, the superintendent
of public instruction shall provide the higher education coordinating board
with the names, addresses, and unique numeric identifiers of eligible
students ((in the top fifteen percent or)) including those who
meet the scholastic aptitude test score requirement, as appropriate in each of
the respective high school senior or home based instruction classes in
Washington state. This shall be provided no later than October 1 of each year.

(((vi))) (vii)
Scholarships awarded under this section may only be used at accredited
institutions of higher education in the state of Washington for college-related
expenses, including but not limited to, tuition, room and board, books,
materials, and transportation. The Washington promise scholarship award shall
not supplant other scholarship awards, financial aid, or tax programs related
to postsecondary education. Scholarships may not be transferred or refunded to
students.

(((vii))) (viii)
The higher education coordinating board shall evaluate the impact and
effectiveness of the Washington promise scholarship program. The evaluation
shall include, but not be limited to: (A) An analysis of other financial
assistance promise scholarship recipients are receiving through other federal,
state, and institutional programs, including grants, work study, tuition
waivers, tax credits, and loan programs; (B) an analysis of whether the
implementation of the promise scholarship program has had an impact on student
indebtedness; and (C) an evaluation of what types of students are successfully
completing high school but do not have the financial ability to attend college
because they cannot obtain financial aid or the financial aid is insufficient.
The board shall report its findings to the governor and the legislature by
December 1, 2002.

(((viii))) (ix)
The higher education coordinating board may adopt rules as necessary to
implement this program.

(x) Moneys
appropriated for fiscal year 2003 in this subsection (h) may be used as
necessary to meet state need grant service requirements pursuant to Substitute
House Bill No. 2807 (promise scholarships) as amended by the Senate.

Sec. 612. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 612
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND
EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,762,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,720,000))

1,633,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 44,987,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((48,469,000))

48,382,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $500,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
are provided solely for the operations and development of the inland northwest
technology education center (INTEC) as a regional resource and model for the
rapid deployment of skilled workers trained in the latest technologies for
Washington. The board shall serve as an advisor to and fiscal agent for INTEC,
and will report back to the governor and legislature by September 2002 as to
the progress and future steps for INTEC as this new public-private partnership
evolves.

Sec. 613. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 613
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE
RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((1,500,000))

1,499,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,500,000))

1,452,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((3,000,000))

2,951,000

Sec. 614. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 614
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE LIBRARY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 8,791,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((8,786,000))

8,522,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 6,976,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((24,553,000))

24,289,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: At least
$2,700,000 shall be expended for a contract with the Seattle public library for
library services for the Washington book and braille library.

Sec. 615. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 615
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS
COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,873,000

General Fund‑-State Appropriation
(FY 2003).... $ ((2,874,000))

2,788,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,000,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 3,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((6,747,000))

6,664,000

Sec. 616. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 616
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,899,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((3,129,000))

3,035,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((6,028,000))

5,934,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $90,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $285,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for activities related to the Lewis and Clark Bicentennial.

Sec. 617. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 617
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,674,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,535,000))

1,489,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((3,209,000))

3,163,000

Sec. 618. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 618
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE
BLIND

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 4,520,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((4,591,000))

4,499,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((1,173,000))

1,254,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION ................. $ ((10,284,000))

10,273,000

Sec. 619. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 619
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE
DEAF

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 7,395,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((7,439,000))

7,464,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 232,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((15,066,000))

15,091,000

(End
of part)

PART
VII

SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 701. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 701
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT
TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 629,097,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((567,290,000))

565,290,000

State Building Construction
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((11,351,000))

7,999,000

Debt-Limit Reimbursable
Bond Retire Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ 2,591,000

State Taxable Building
Construction Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 496,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,210,329,000))

1,205,473,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
general fund appropriations are for deposit into the debt-limit general fund
bond retirement account. The appropriation for fiscal year 2002 shall be
deposited in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account by June 30,
2002.

Sec. 702. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 702
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL
OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES

State Convention and Trade
Center Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ ((39,950,000))

29,249,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ ((5,590,000))

5,096,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... ((5,590,000))

5,096,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((51,130,000))

39,441,000

Sec. 703. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 703
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL
OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 24,542,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 26,706,000

Capitol Historic District
Construction

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 454,000

Higher Education
Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((815,000))

499,000

State Higher Education
Construction Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ ((348,000))

50,000

State Vehicle Parking
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((35,000))

100,000

Education Construction
Account‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 19,500,000

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable
Bond Retirement Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ 128,043,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((180,943,000))

199,894,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
general fund appropriation is for deposit into the nondebt-limit general fund
bond retirement account.

Sec. 704. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 704
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE
EXPENSES

General Fund‑-State Appropriation
(FY 2002).... $ 567,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 568,000

Higher Education
Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 77,000

State Higher Education
Construction Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ 42,000

State Building Construction
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,488,000

State Vehicle Parking
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((5,000))

10,000

Education Construction
Account‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 325,000

Capitol Historic District
Construction

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 130,000

State Taxable Building
Construction Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 50,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((2,877,000))

3,257,000

Sec. 705. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 706
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL. The sum of ((three million dollars)) $39,487,000,
or so much thereof as may be available on June 30, 2001, from the total amount
of unspent fiscal year 2001 fire contingency funding in the disaster response
account and the moneys appropriated to the disaster response account in section
707 of this act, is appropriated for the purpose of making allocations to the
military department for fire mobilizations costs or to the department of
natural resources for fire suppression costs. Of this amount, $27,513,000
shall be provided to the department of natural resources, $135,000 shall be
provided to the state parks and recreation commission, and $60,000 shall be
provided to the department of fish and wildlife, for costs of fire suppression
during the 2001 fire season.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
706. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

REVOLVING FUND
REDUCTIONS. (1) The 2001-2003 supplemental appropriations in this act
reflect reduced appropriations from the specified funds and accounts in the
following amounts:

Administrative Hearings
Revolving Account........ $ 330,000

Legal Services
Revolving Account................ $ 1,543,000

Data Processing
Revolving Account............... $ 246,000

Department of Personnel
Service Account......... $ 262,000

Department of
Retirement Systems Expense

Account.................................. $ 768,000

General Administration
Services Account......... $ 620,000

Auditing Services
Revolving Account............. $ 183,000

Archives & Records
Management Account........... $ 81,000

(2) The director of
financial management shall reduce allotments from general fund‑-state
appropriations in this act for the 2001-2003 biennium by $1,654,000, which is
forty-one percent of the amounts specified in subsection (1) of this section
and reflects the proportionate share of the general fund--state savings from
the appropriations reductions. The amount of the allotment reduction shall be
placed in reserve status.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
707. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

EQUIPMENT PURCHASE
REDUCTION. The director of
financial management shall reduce allotments from general fund‑-state
appropriations in this act for the 2001-2003 biennium by $2,300,000 to reflect
a freeze on state agency equipment purchases for the remainder of the 2001-03
biennium. The amount of the allotment reduction shall be placed in reserve
status.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
708. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

EMPLOYEE TRAVEL
REDUCTION. The director of
financial management shall reduce allotments from general fund‑-state
appropriations in this act for the 2001-2003 biennium by $3,000,000 to reflect
the elimination of nonessential travel by state employees and officials. The
amount of the allotment reduction shall be placed in reserve status.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
709. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

CONTINGENCY POOL. (1) With the prior approval of the office of
financial management, agencies may reduce allotments for fiscal year 2002 to
reflect all or a portion of, and not to exceed, the administrative, travel, and
equipment reductions and efficiency savings enacted in this 2002 supplemental
appropriations act as an alternative to allotment reductions for fiscal year
2003.

(2) The sum of one
million five hundred thousand dollars from the general fund‑-state for
fiscal year 2003 is appropriated to the governor for providing assistance to
state agencies that are unable to effectively absorb the administrative,
travel, and equipment reductions and efficiency savings enacted in this 2002
supplemental appropriations act. Allocations to state agencies from this
appropriation shall be reported to the legislative fiscal committees by the
office of financial management within five days of the allocation.

Sec. 710. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 713
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-DIGITAL GOVERNMENT
REVOLVING ACCOUNT

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,050,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((2,050,000))

1,050,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION........................ $ ((4,100,000))

3,100,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriations in this section are provided solely for deposit in the digital
government revolving account.

Sec. 711. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 716
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE GOVERNOR‑-COMPENSATION‑-INSURANCE
BENEFITS

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 7,218,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((19,947,000))

14,803,000

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((8,692,000))

7,374,000

General Fund‑‑Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((456,000))

331,000

Salary and Insurance
Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation....... ...................... $ ((19,468,000))

15,969,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((55,781,000))

45,695,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The monthly
employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees'
benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed
$457.29 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2002, and (($497.69)) $482.38
for fiscal year 2003.

(b) Within the rates in
(a) of this subsection, $2.02 per eligible employee shall be included in the
employer funding rate for fiscal year 2002, and $4.10 per eligible employee
shall be included in the employer funding rate for fiscal year 2003, solely to
increase life insurance coverage in accordance with a court approved settlement
in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston county superior court
cause no. 94-2-02560-8).

(c) In order to achieve
the level of funding provided for health benefits, the public employees'
benefits board shall require any or all of the following: Employee premium
copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of
managed competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.

(d) The health care
authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical
plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals,
subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior
uniform medical plan claims payments, into the public employees' and retirees'
insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not
be used for administrative expenditures.

(2) To facilitate the
transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the state treasurer is
directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or account to
the special fund salary and insurance contribution increase revolving fund in
accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management.

(3) The health care
authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board,
shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or
disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for
parts A and B of medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2002,
through December 31, 2002, the subsidy shall be $85.84. Starting January 1,
2003, the subsidy shall be (($102.55)) $92.74 per month.

(4) Technical colleges,
school districts, and educational service districts shall remit to the health
care authority for deposit into the public employees' and retirees' insurance
account established in RCW 41.05.120 the following amounts:

(a) For each full-time
employee, $32.41 per month beginning September 1, 2001, and (($37.48)) $36.36
beginning September 1, 2002;

(b) For each part-time
employee who, at the time of the remittance, is employed in an eligible
position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or 41.40.010 and is eligible for employer
fringe benefit contributions for basic benefits, $32.41 each month beginning
September 1, 2001, and (($37.48)) $36.36 beginning September 1,
2002, prorated by the proportion of employer fringe benefit contributions for a
full-time employee that the part-time employee receives.

The remittance
requirements specified in this subsection shall not apply to employees of a
technical college, school district, or educational service district who
purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

(5) The salary and
insurance increase revolving account appropriation includes amounts sufficient
to fund health benefits for ferry workers at the premium levels specified in
subsection (1) of this section, consistent with the 2001-2003 transportation
appropriations act.

Sec. 712. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 717
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT
OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-CONTRIBUTIONS TO
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS. The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis beginning July
1, 2001, consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the
judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis
consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.

(1) There is
appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system:

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((15,552,000))

15,437,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((16,668,000))

16,208,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriations include reductions to reflect savings resulting from the
implementation of state pension contribution rates effective ((July 1, 2001,
as provided in Senate Bill No. 6167 or House Bill No. 2236)) April 1,
2002, as provided in House Bill No. 2782.

(2) There is
appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 6,000,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 6,000,000

(3) There is
appropriated for contributions to the judges retirement system:

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 250,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 250,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((44,720,000))

44,145,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
713. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-PENSION SAVINGS. The office of financial management shall reduce
allotments from the appropriations for agencies of the state by $1,208,000 from
the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2002 appropriations, $4,929,000 from
the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2003 appropriations, $1,606,000 from
the general fund‑-federal 2001-03 appropriations, $148,000 from the
general fund‑-private/local 2001-03 appropriations, and $4,326,000 from
other funds 2001-03 appropriations to reflect savings from pension contribution
rate reductions, effective April 1, 2002, as provided in House Bill No. 2782.

Sec. 714. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 719
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

SALARY COST OF LIVING
ADJUSTMENT

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 41,712,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((73,358,000))

44,469,000

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((37,955,000))

25,629,000

General Fund‑‑Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((2,325,000))

1,876,000

Salary and Insurance
Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((92,156,000))

68,224,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((247,506,000))

181,910,000

The appropriations in
this section shall be expended solely for the purposes designated in this
section and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) In addition to the
purposes set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, appropriations
in this section are provided solely for a 3.7 percent salary increase effective
July 1, 2001, for all classified employees, except the certificated employees
of the state schools for the deaf and blind, and including those employees in
the Washington management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction
of the personnel resources board. ((Funds are also provided for salary
increases for classified employees on July 1, 2002, in a percentage amount to
be determined by the 2002 legislature.))

(2) The appropriations
in this section are sufficient to fund a 3.7 percent salary increase effective
July 1, 2001, for general government, legislative, and judicial employees
exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission
on salaries for elected officials. ((Funds are also provided for salary
increases for these employees on July 1, 2002, in a percentage amount to be
determined by the 2002 legislature.))

(3) The salary and
insurance increase revolving account appropriation in this section includes
funds sufficient to fund a 3.7 percent salary increase effective July 1, 2001,
for ferry workers consistent with the 2001-03 transportation appropriations
act. ((Funds are also provided for salary increases for ferry workers on
July 1, 2002, in a percentage amount to be determined by the 2002 legislature.))

(4)(a) No salary
increase may be paid under this section to any person whose salary has been
Y-rated pursuant to rules adopted by the personnel resources board.

(b) The average salary
increases paid under this section to agency officials whose maximum salaries
are established by the committee on agency official salaries shall not exceed
the average increases provided by subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 715. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 720
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY
REVOLVING ACCOUNT

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 11,264,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((11,264,000))

2,364,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION........................ $ ((22,528,000))

13,628,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations
in this section are for appropriation to the education technology revolving
account for the purpose of covering operational and transport costs incurred by
the K-20 educational network program in providing telecommunication services to
network participants.

(2) Use of these moneys
to connect public libraries are limited to public libraries which have in place
a policy of internet safety applied to publicly available computers with
internet access via the K-20 educational network that protects against access
to visual depictions that are (a) obscene under chapter 9.68 RCW; or (b) sexual
exploitation of children under chapter 9.68A RCW.

Sec. 716. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 722
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-COMPENSATION ACTIONS OF
PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((9,179,000))

9,183,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((18,359,000))

18,369,000

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 10,392,000

Salary and Insurance
Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,735,000))

2,809,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((40,665,000))

40,753,000

The appropriations in
this section shall be expended solely for the purposes designated in this
section and are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding
is provided to implement the salary increase recommendations of the Washington
personnel resources board for the priority classes identified through item 8B
pursuant to RCW 41.06.152. The salary increases shall be effective January 1,
2002.

Sec. 717. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 723
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

INCENTIVE SAVINGS‑‑FY 2002. The sum of one hundred million dollars or so
much thereof as may be available on June 30, 2002, from the total amount of
unspent fiscal year 2002 state general fund appropriations is appropriated for
the purposes of RCW 43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.

(1) Of the total appropriated
amount, one-half of that portion that is attributable to incentive savings, not
to exceed twenty-five million dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive
account for the purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness
of agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.

(2) Of the total
appropriated amount, any amount attributable to unspent general fund‑-state
appropriations in the state need grant program, the state work study program,
the Washington scholars program, and the Washington award for vocational
excellence program is appropriated to the state financial aid account if
Substitute House Bill No. 2914 (state financial aid account) is enacted by June
30, 2002.

(3) The
remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five million dollars, is
appropriated to the education savings account.

(((3))) (4)
For purposes of this section, the total amount of unspent state general fund
appropriations does not include the appropriations made in this section,
amounts included in allotment reductions in sections 706, 707, or 708 of this
act, or any amounts included in across-the-board allotment reductions under
RCW 43.88.110.

Sec. 718. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 724
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

INCENTIVE SAVINGS‑-FY 2003. The sum of one hundred million dollars or so
much thereof as may be available on June 30, 2003, from the total amount of
unspent fiscal year 2003 state general fund appropriations is appropriated for
the purposes of RCW 43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.

(1) Of the total
appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that is attributable to incentive
savings, not to exceed twenty-five million dollars, is appropriated to the
savings incentive account for the purpose of improving the quality, efficiency,
and effectiveness of agency services, and credited to the agency that generated
the savings.

(2) Of the total
appropriated amount, any amount attributable to unspent general fund‑-state
appropriations in the state need grant program, the state work study program,
the Washington scholars program, and the Washington award for vocational
excellence program is appropriated to the state financial aid account if
Substitute House Bill No. 2914 (state financial aid account) is enacted by June
30, 2002.

(3) The
remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five million dollars, is
appropriated to the education savings account.

(((3))) (4)
For purposes of this section, the total amount of unspent state general fund
appropriations does not include the appropriations made in this section,
amounts included in allotment reductions in sections 706, 707, or 708 of this
act, or any amounts included in across-the-board allotment reductions under
RCW 43.88.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
719. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL
JUSTICE COSTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 394,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
director of financial management shall distribute the appropriation to the
following counties in the amounts designated for extraordinary criminal justice
costs:

Franklin........................................ $ 312,000

Stevens......................................... $ 82,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
720. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT‑-COUNTY ASSISTANCE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 2,670,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,670,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
director of community, trade, and economic development shall distribute the
appropriation in this section to the following counties in the amounts
designated:

Asotin County.................................. $ 217,000

Columbia County................................ $ 573,000

Ferry County................................... $ 398,000

Garfield County................................ $ 583,000

Lincoln County................................. $ 151,000

Pend Oreille County............................ $ 143,000

Skamania County................................ $ 88,000

Wahkiakum County............................... $ 517,000

TOTAL.......................................... $ 2,670,000

Sec. 721. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 727
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT‑-COUNTY CORPORATION
ASSISTANCE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 24,410,534

((General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)... $........................................... 25,137,970

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 49,548,504))

The appropriation((s))
in this section ((are)) is subject to the following conditions
and limitations:

(1)(a) The department
shall withhold distributions under subsection (2) of this section to any county
that has not paid its fifty percent share of the employer contribution on
behalf of superior court judges for insurance and health care plans and federal
social security and medicare and medical aid benefits for the fiscal year. As
required by Article IV, section 13 of the state Constitution and 1996 Attorney
General's Opinion No. 2, it is the intent of the legislature that the costs of
these employer contributions shall be shared equally between the state and
county or counties in which the judges serve.

(b) After receiving
written notification from the office of the administrator for the courts that a
county has paid its fifty percent share as required under (a) of this
subsection, the department shall distribute the amount designated for the
fiscal year under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The director of
community, trade, and economic development shall distribute the appropriations
to the following counties in the amounts designated:

((2001-03))

County FY 2002 ((FY 2003 Biennium))

Adams 290,303 ((295,993
586,296))

Asotin 422,074 ((434,598
856,672))

Benton 966,480 ((999,163
1,965,643))

Chelan 637,688 ((651,982
1,289,670))

Clallam 444,419 ((454,391
898,810))

Clark 641,571 ((678,997
1,320,568))

Columbia 561,888 ((572,901
1,134,789))

Cowlitz 771,879 ((795,808
1,567,687))

Douglas 505,585 ((528,184
1,033,769))

Ferry 389,909 ((397,551
787,460))

Franklin 442,624 ((464,018
906,642))

Garfield 571,303 ((582,501
1,153,804))

Grant 579,631 ((604,072
1,183,703))

Grays Harbor 540,315 ((550,905
1,091,220))

Island 483,589 ((503,205
986,794))

Jefferson 239,914 ((249,924
489,838))

King 2,661,862 ((2,720,716
5,382,578))

Kitsap 469,992 ((480,178
950,170))

Kittitas 366,971 ((383,027
749,998))

Klickitat 204,726 ((217,555
422,281))

Lewis 583,702 ((598,004
1,181,706))

Lincoln 290,754 ((302,151
592,905))

Mason 905,060 ((930,959
1,836,019))

Okanogan 548,848 ((560,332
1,109,180))

Pacific 344,047 ((350,790
694,837))

Pend Oreille 280,342 ((285,837
566,179))

Pierce 1,246,530 ((1,284,087
2,530,617))

San Juan 85,712 ((91,859
177,571))

Skagit 911,491 ((944,914
1,856,405))

Skamania 172,840 ((176,228
349,068))

Snohomish 1,017,209 ((1,058,571
2,075,780))

Spokane 804,124 ((823,359
1,627,483))

Stevens 811,482 ((835,598
1,647,080))

Thurston 1,031,888 ((1,061,579
2,093,467))

Wahkiakum 507,528 ((517,476
1,025,004))

Walla Walla 241,341 ((247,105
488,446))

Whatcom 408,025 ((429,069
837,094))

Whitman 134,870 ((138,191
273,061))

Yakima 1,892,018 ((1,936,192
3,828,210))

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS 24,410,534 ((25,137,970
49,548,504))

Sec. 722. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 728
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT‑-MUNICIPAL CORPORATION
ASSISTANCE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 45,884,610

((General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)... $........................................... 47,251,839

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 93,136,449))

The appropriation((s))
in this section ((are)) is subject to the following conditions
and limitations:

(1) The director of
community, trade, and economic development shall distribute the appropriation
to the following cities and municipalities in the amounts designated:

((2001-03))

City FY 2002 ((FY 2003 Biennium))

Aberdeen 119,986 ((123,562 243,548))

Airway Heights 111,259 ((114,575 225,834))

Albion 66,339 ((68,316 134,655))

Algona 32,672 ((33,646 66,318))

Almira 12,519 ((12,892 25,411))

Anacortes 70,930 ((73,044 143,974))

Arlington 42,344 ((43,606 85,950))

Asotin 57,623 ((59,340 116,963))

Auburn 192,405 ((198,139 390,544))

Bainbridge Island 293,851 ((302,608 596,459))

Battle Ground 118,303 ((121,828 240,131))

Beaux Arts 1,784 ((1,837 3,621))

Bellevue 524,203 ((539,824 1,064,027))

Bellingham 369,121 ((380,121 749,242))

Benton City 111,380 ((114,699 226,079))

Bingen 6,602 ((6,799 13,401))

Black Diamond 254,698 ((262,288 516,986))

Blaine 20,853 ((21,474 42,327))

Bonney Lake 158,738 ((163,468 322,206))

Bothell 137,270 ((141,361 278,631))

Bremerton 214,020 ((220,398 434,418))

Brewster 11,250 ((11,585 22,835))

Bridgeport 188,216 ((193,825 382,041))

Brier 532,011 ((547,865 1,079,876))

Buckley 68,227 ((70,260 138,487))

Bucoda 52,876 ((54,452 107,328))

Burien 284,265 ((292,736 577,001))

Burlington 27,407 ((28,224 55,631))

Camas 53,654 ((55,253 108,907))

Carbonado 56,785 ((58,477 115,262))

Carnation 9,593 ((9,879 19,472))

Cashmere 120,801 ((124,401 245,202))

Castle Rock 29,980 ((30,873 60,853))

Cathlamet 6,265 ((6,452 12,717))

Centralia 101,426 ((104,448 205,874))

Chehalis 34,601 ((35,632 70,233))

Chelan 19,515 ((20,097 39,612))

Cheney 314,316 ((323,683 637,999))

Chewelah 66,731 ((68,720 135,451))

Clarkston 83,910 ((86,411 170,321))

Cle Elum 8,692 ((8,951 17,643))

Clyde Hill 136,778 ((140,854 277,632))

Colfax 74,672 ((76,897 151,569))

College Place 526,480 ((542,169 1,068,649))

Colton 27,473 ((28,292 55,765))

Colville 23,389 ((24,086 47,475))

Conconully 13,675 ((14,083 27,758))

Concrete 27,006 ((27,811 54,817))

Connell 164,950 ((169,866 334,816))

Cosmopolis 15,395 ((15,854 31,249))

Coulee City 2,804 ((2,888 5,692))

Coulee Dam 61,408 ((63,238 124,646))

Coupeville 7,708 ((7,938 15,646))

Covington 690,851 ((711,438 1,402,289))

Creston 12,905 ((13,290 26,195))

Cusick 9,341 ((9,619 18,960))

Darrington 59,838 ((61,621 121,459))

Davenport 66,350 ((68,327 134,677))

Dayton 92,685 ((95,447 188,132))

Deer Park 16,059 ((16,538 32,597))

Des Moines 1,482,120 ((1,526,287 3,008,407))

Dupont 8,109 ((8,351 16,460))

Duvall 66,128 ((68,099 134,227))

East Wenatchee 30,678 ((31,592 62,270))

Eatonville 8,848 ((9,112 17,960))

Edgewood 901,766 ((928,639 1,830,405))

Edmonds 456,336 ((469,935 926,271))

Electric City 87,243 ((89,843 177,086))

Ellensburg 81,982 ((84,425 166,407))

Elma 84,676 ((87,199 171,875))

Elmer City 29,811 ((30,699 60,510))

Endicott 28,758 ((29,615 58,373))

Entiat 58,244 ((59,980 118,224))

Enumclaw 53,013 ((54,593 107,606))

Ephrata 59,987 ((61,775 121,762))

Everett 495,428 ((510,192 1,005,620))

Everson 67,517 ((69,529 137,046))

Fairfield 18,540 ((19,092 37,632))

Farmington 12,072 ((12,432 24,504))

Federal Way 470,179 ((484,190 954,369))

Ferndale 74,669 ((76,894 151,563))

Fife 25,411 ((26,168 51,579))

Fircrest 386,146 ((397,653 783,799))

Forks 110,712 ((114,011 224,723))

Friday Harbor 9,791 ((10,083 19,874))

Garfield 45,263 ((46,612 91,875))

George 19,319 ((19,895 39,214))

Gig Harbor 31,615 ((32,557 64,172))

Gold Bar 134,531 ((138,540 273,071))

Goldendale 49,519 ((50,995 100,514))

Grand Coulee 5,805 ((5,978 11,783))

Grandview 256,347 ((263,986 520,333))

Granger 173,094 ((178,252 351,346))

Granite Falls 10,946 ((11,272 22,218))

Hamilton 17,437 ((17,957 35,394))

Harrah 46,947 ((48,346 95,293))

Harrington 18,107 ((18,647 36,754))

Hartline 11,392 ((11,731 23,123))

Hatton 12,176 ((12,539 24,715))

Hoquiam 374,903 ((386,075 760,978))

Hunts Point 2,432 ((2,504 4,936))

Ilwaco 13,150 ((13,542 26,692))

Index 4,181 ((4,306 8,487))

Ione 17,566 ((18,089 35,655))

Issaquah 50,002 ((51,492 101,494))

Kahlotus 20,210 ((20,812 41,022))

Kalama 7,892 ((8,127 16,019))

Kelso 68,904 ((70,957 139,861))

Kenmore 1,099,395 ((1,132,157 2,231,552))

Kennewick 293,534 ((302,281 595,815))

Kent 360,624 ((371,371 731,995))

Kettle Falls 64,422 ((66,342 130,764))

Kirkland 221,429 ((228,028 449,457))

Kittitas 72,698 ((74,864 147,562))

Krupp 4,445 ((4,577 9,022))

La Center 34,415 ((35,441 69,856))

La Conner 3,817 ((3,931 7,748))

La Crosse 20,141 ((20,741 40,882))

Lacey 143,243 ((147,512 290,755))

Lake Forest Park 897,932 ((924,690 1,822,622))

Lake Stevens 142,295 ((146,535 288,830))

Lakewood 2,955,109 ((3,043,171 5,998,280))

Lamont 7,492 ((7,715 15,207))

Langley 5,303 ((5,461 10,764))

Latah 11,962 ((12,318 24,280))

Leavenworth 12,189 ((12,552 24,741))

Lind 2,217 ((2,283 4,500))

Long Beach 10,269 ((10,575 20,844))

Longview 249,836 ((257,281 507,117))

Lyman 16,741 ((17,240 33,981))

Lynden 42,717 ((43,990 86,707))

Lynnwood 163,579 ((168,454 332,033))

Mabton 142,491 ((146,737 289,228))

Malden 21,588 ((22,231 43,819))

Mansfield 26,744 ((27,541 54,285))

Maple Valley 359,478 ((370,190 729,668))

Marcus 14,126 ((14,547 28,673))

Marysville 102,028 ((105,068 207,096))

Mattawa 100,064 ((103,046 203,110))

McCleary 105,807 ((108,960 214,767))

Medical Lake 114,323 ((117,730 232,053))

Medina 14,355 ((14,783 29,138))

Mercer Island 383,527 ((394,956 778,483))

Mesa 16,835 ((17,337 34,172))

Metaline 14,150 ((14,572 28,722))

Metaline Falls 7,718 ((7,948 15,666))

Mill Creek 174,495 ((179,695 354,190))

Millwood 22,619 ((23,293 45,912))

Milton 28,030 ((28,865 56,895))

Monroe 56,517 ((58,201 114,718))

Montesano 60,229 ((62,024 122,253))

Morton 5,891 ((6,067 11,958))

Moses Lake 105,670 ((108,819 214,489))

Mossyrock 16,545 ((17,038 33,583))

Mount Vernon 130,780 ((134,677 265,457))

Mountlake Terrace 711,188 ((732,381 1,443,569))

Moxee 40,448 ((41,653 82,101))

Mukilteo 274,482 ((282,662 557,144))

Naches 7,632 ((7,859 15,491))

Napavine 96,030 ((98,892 194,922))

Nespelem 17,614 ((18,139 35,753))

Newcastle 290,801 ((299,467 590,268))

Newport 13,223 ((13,617 26,840))

Nooksack 58,178 ((59,912 118,090))

Normandy Park 489,113 ((503,689 992,802))

North Bend 20,754 ((21,372 42,126))

North Bonneville 30,574 ((31,485 62,059))

Northport 23,489 ((24,189 47,678))

Oak Harbor 278,157 ((286,446 564,603))

Oakesdale 31,060 ((31,986 63,046))

Oakville 43,411 ((44,705 88,116))

Ocean Shores 64,837 ((66,769 131,606))

Odessa 4,721 ((4,862 9,583))

Okanogan 12,323 ((12,690 25,013))

Olympia 198,476 ((204,391 402,867))

Omak 26,117 ((26,895 53,012))

Oroville 12,506 ((12,879 25,385))

Orting 191,211 ((196,909 388,120))

Othello 26,808 ((27,607 54,415))

Pacific 69,124 ((71,184 140,308))

Palouse 55,067 ((56,708 111,775))

Pasco 131,298 ((135,211 266,509))

Pateros 28,021 ((28,856 56,877))

Pe Ell 54,800 ((56,433 111,233))

Pomeroy 52,485 ((54,049 106,534))

Port Angeles 124,595 ((128,308 252,903))

Port Orchard 41,797 ((43,043 84,840))

Port Townsend 47,126 ((48,530 95,656))

Poulsbo 31,812 ((32,760 64,572))

Prescott 12,349 ((12,717 25,066))

Prosser 24,137 ((24,856 48,993))

Pullman 584,659 ((602,082 1,186,741))

Puyallup 151,732 ((156,254 307,986))

Quincy 20,244 ((20,847 41,091))

Rainier 111,521 ((114,844 226,365))

Raymond 85,311 ((87,853 173,164))

Reardan 38,184 ((39,322 77,506))

Redmond 215,259 ((221,674 436,933))

Renton 235,053 ((242,058 477,111))

Republic 25,085 ((25,833 50,918))

Richland 441,733 ((454,897 896,630))

Ridgefield 55,637 ((57,295 112,932))

Ritzville 8,498 ((8,751 17,249))

Riverside 27,204 ((28,015 55,219))

Rock Island 36,527 ((37,616 74,143))

Rockford 18,965 ((19,530 38,495))

Rosalia 36,719 ((37,813 74,532))

Roslyn 64,571 ((66,495 131,066))

Roy 1,709 ((1,760 3,469))

Royal City 66,657 ((68,643 135,300))

Ruston 50,309 ((51,808 102,117))

Sammamish 2,361,433 ((2,431,804 4,793,237))

Seatac 132,183 ((136,122 268,305))

Seattle 3,189,346 ((3,284,389 6,473,735))

Sedro-Woolley 54,896 ((56,532 111,428))

Selah 80,704 ((83,109 163,813))

Sequim 21,867 ((22,519 44,386))

Shelton 58,160 ((59,893 118,053))

Shoreline 1,485,138 ((1,529,395 3,014,533))

Skykomish 1,417 ((1,459 2,876))

Snohomish 40,722 ((41,936 82,658))

Snoqualmie 9,587 ((9,873 19,460))

Soap Lake 102,783 ((105,846 208,629))

South Bend 75,826 ((78,086 153,912))

South Cle Elum 46,847 ((48,243 95,090))

South Prairie 18,788 ((19,348 38,136))

Spangle 1,397 ((1,439 2,836))

Spokane 1,116,419 ((1,149,688 2,266,107))

Sprague 22,930 ((23,613 46,543))

Springdale 11,080 ((11,410 22,490))

St. John 4,245 ((4,372 8,617))

Stanwood 21,141 ((21,771 42,912))

Starbuck 8,949 ((9,216 18,165))

Steilacoom 285,807 ((294,324 580,131))

Stevenson 11,673 ((12,021 23,694))

Sultan 63,199 ((65,082 128,281))

Sumas 7,885 ((8,120 16,005))

Sumner 41,931 ((43,181 85,112))

Sunnyside 70,805 ((72,915 143,720))

Tacoma 1,384,646 ((1,425,908 2,810,554))

Tekoa 49,373 ((50,844 100,217))

Tenino 68,820 ((70,871 139,691))

Tieton 74,506 ((76,726 151,232))

Toledo 8,084 ((8,325 16,409))

Tonasket 5,500 ((5,664 11,164))

Toppenish 443,488 ((456,704 900,192))

Tukwila 75,320 ((77,565 152,885))

Tumwater 61,848 ((63,691 125,539))

Twisp 4,793 ((4,936 9,729))

Union Gap 27,129 ((27,937 55,066))

Uniontown 19,805 ((20,395 40,200))

University Place 1,889,912 ((1,946,231 3,836,143))

Vader 40,643 ((41,854 82,497))

Vancouver 1,177,584 ((1,212,676 2,390,260))

Waitsburg 81,097 ((83,514 164,611))

Walla Walla 318,679 ((328,176 646,855))

Wapato 230,783 ((237,660 468,443))

Warden 105,612 ((108,759 214,371))

Washougal 177,022 ((182,297 359,319))

Washtucna 20,654 ((21,269 41,923))

Waterville 72,880 ((75,052 147,932))

Waverly 10,256 ((10,562 20,818))

Wenatchee 147,602 ((152,001 299,603))

West Richland 489,752 ((504,347 994,099))

Westport 13,715 ((14,124 27,839))

White Salmon 53,746 ((55,348 109,094))

Wilbur 23,614 ((24,318 47,932))

Wilkeson 18,762 ((19,321 38,083))

Wilson Creek 18,403 ((18,951 37,354))

Winlock 35,212 ((36,261 71,473))

Winthrop 1,756 ((1,808 3,564))

Woodinville 56,052 ((57,722 113,774))

Woodland 17,960 ((18,495 36,455))

Woodway 12,513 ((12,886 25,399))

Yacolt 36,636 ((37,728 74,364))

Yakima 487,766 ((502,301 990,067))

Yarrow Point 32,121 ((33,078 65,199))

Yelm 15,677 ((16,144 31,821))

Zillah 100,818 ((103,822 204,640))

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS 45,545,942 ((46,903,217 92,449,159))

(2) $338,668 for fiscal
year 2002 ((and $348,622 for fiscal year 2003)) from this appropriation
((are)) is provided solely to address the contingencies listed in
this subsection. The department shall distribute the moneys no later than
March 31, 2002, ((and March 31, 2003,)) for the respective
appropriations. Moneys shall be distributed for the following purposes, ranked
in order of priority:

(a) To correct for data
errors in the determination of distributions in subsection (1) of this section;

(b) To distribute to
newly qualifying jurisdictions as if the jurisdiction had been in existence
prior to November 1999;

(c) To allocate under
emergency situations as determined by the director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development in consultation with the association
of Washington cities; and

(d) After April 1((st
of each year in the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2003)), 2001,
any moneys remaining from the amounts provided in this subsection shall be
prorated and distributed to cities and towns on the basis of the amounts
distributed for emergency considerations in November 2000 as provided in
section 729, chapter 1, Laws of 2000, 2nd sp. sess.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
723. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT‑-MUNICIPAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 10,000,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
director of community, trade, and economic development shall distribute the
appropriation in this section to the following cities in the amounts
designated:

Airway Heights 12,931

Albion 68,268

Almira
2,037

Asotin 27,843

Benton City 43,938

Black Diamond 52,162

Bridgeport 193,690

Brier 367,466

Bucoda 42,771

Carbonado 42,120

Cashmere 36,894

Cheney 54,768

Chewelah 3,260

Clyde Hill 2,839

Colfax 2,730

College Place 392,814

Colton 15,258

Conconully 10,878

Concrete 3,161

Connell 77,897

Coulee Dam 15,696

Covington 334,679

Creston 5,355

Cusick 763

Darrington 15,996

Davenport 12,578

Dayton 3,884

Des Moines 458,379

Edgewood 777,964

Electric City 76,077

Elma 5,256

Elmer City 30,678

Endicott 29,594

Entiat 29,090

Everson 13,236

Fairfield 3,428

Farmington 7,979

Fircrest 142,274

Forks 13,876

Garfield 35,262

George 6,431

Gold Bar 82,284

Grandview 43,904

Granger 80,501

Hamilton 11,481

Harrah 45,179

Harrington 2,338

Hartline 9,253

Hatton 12,530

Hoquiam 55,397

Index 285

Ione 4,990

Kahlotus 16,442

Kenmore 376,892

Kettle Falls 10,695

Kittitas 47,259

Krupp 2,485

Lacrosse 7,427

Lake Forest Park 388,751

Lake Stevens 12,881

Lakewood 1,010,717

Lamont 6,978

Latah 7,324

Lyman 9,802

Mabton 146,635

Malden 22,216

Mansfield 22,795

Maple Valley 47,234

Marcus 9,917

Mattawa 48,285

Mc Cleary 41,768

Medical Lake 27,213

Mesa 4,764

Metaline 6,190

Metaline Falls 2,612

Mossyrock 1,857

Mountlake Terrace 90,138

Moxee 6,241

Napavine 55,518

Nespelem 18,126

Newcastle 4,588

Nooksack 36,311

Normandy Park 234,167

North Bonneville 5,159

Northport 19,723

Oakesdale 8,429

Oakville 19,540

Orting 34,214

Palouse 20,832

Pateros 1,826

Pe Ell 56,394

Pomeroy 7,193

Prescott 3,317

Pullman 60,729

Rainier 76,222

Raymond 699

Reardan 23,951

Republic 3,165

Riverside 20,167

Rock Island 16,335

Rockford 4,587

Rosalia 18,345

Roslyn 32,273

Royal City 34,339

Ruston 22,320

Sammamish 923,524

Shoreline 184,815

Soap Lake 54,397

South Bend 15,220

South Cle Elum 30,796

South Prairie 4,803

Sprague 3,741

Springdale
2,123

Starbuck
7,559

Steilacoom 54,538

Tekoa 13,636

Tenino 19,274

Tieton 34,553

Toppenish
178,775

Uniontown
8,284

University Place
874,883

Vader 35,373

Waitsburg 43,463

Wapato
100,243

Warden 27,392

Washtucna 21,254

Waterville 36,186

Waverly
9,865

West Richland
239,092

White Salmon
3,054

Wilbur
1,541

Wilkeson
2,051

Wilson Creek
9,530

Yacolt 10,440

Zillah 15,264

TOTAL $10,000,000

Sec. 724. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 730
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LIABILITY ACCOUNT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 12,000,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ ((6,392,000))

19,392,000

((State Surplus Assets
Reserve Fund‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 25,000,000))

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 31,392,000

The appropriations in
this section are provided solely for deposit in the liability account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
725. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS. The following sums, or so much thereof as may
be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund, unless otherwise
indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations for
sundry claims. These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved
by the director of general administration, except as otherwise provided, as
follows:

(1) Reimbursement of
criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of self-defense, pursuant to RCW
9A.16.110:

(a) Eythor Westman,
claim number SCJ 02-01........... $ 7,000

(b) Stacey Julian,
claim number SCJ 02-02............. $ 59,136

(c) Christopher Denney,
claim number SCJ 02-03........ $ 11,598

(d) Onofre Vasquez,
claim number SCJ 02-04........... $ 200

(e) William Voorhees,
claim number SCJ 02-05......... $ 3,694

(f) Glenn Rowlison,
claim number SCJ 02-06........... $ 14,395

(g) Frankie Doerr,
claim number SCJ 02-07............. $ 9,100

(h) Ralph Howard, claim
number SCJ 00-09............. $ 99,497

(i) Johnny Adams, claim
number SCJ 01-17............. $ 11,916

(j) Shane Mathus, claim
number SCJ 02-08............. $ 13,043

(k) Timothy Farnum,
claim number SCJ 02-09........... $ 21,822

(l) Rebecca Williams,
claim number SCJ 02-10......... $ 2,241

(m) Stewart Bailey,
claim number SCJ 02-11........... $ 4,186

(n) Aaron Knaack, claim
number SCJ 02-13............. $ 4,330

(o) Jacob Clark, claim
number SCJ 02-14.............. $ 11,613

(2) Payment from the
state wildlife account for damage to crops by wildlife, pursuant to RCW
77.36.050:

(a) Ronald Palmer,
claim number SCG 02-01............. $ 1,522

(b) Keith Morris, claim
number SCG 02-02............. $ 1,315

(c) Edgar
Roush, claim number SCG 02-03.............. $ 1,459

(End
of part)

PART
VIII

OTHER TRANSFERS AND
APPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 801. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 801
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation
for fire insurance

premium distributions...................... $ ((6,528,600))

7,526,700

General Fund Appropriation
for public utility

district excise tax
distributions.......... $ ((36,427,306))

34,754,723

General Fund Appropriation
for prosecuting

attorney distributions..................... $ ((3,090,000))

3,110,000

General Fund Appropriation
for boating safety/

education and law
enforcement

distributions.............................. $ 3,780,000

General Fund Appropriation
for other tax

distributions.............................. $ ((39,566))

1,951,556

Death Investigations
Account Appropriation for

distribution to
counties for publicly

funded autopsies.... ...................... $ 1,621,537

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account Appropriation

for harbor improvement
revenue

distribution............................... $ 147,500

Timber Tax Distribution
Account Appropriation for

distribution to
"timber" counties.......... $ ((68,562,000))

57,405,032

County Criminal Justice
Assistance

Appropriation.............................. $ 49,835,213

Municipal Criminal Justice
Assistance

Appropriation.............................. $ 19,988,097

Liquor Excise Tax Account
Appropriation for

liquor excise tax
distribution............. $ 28,659,331

Liquor Revolving Account
Appropriation for

liquor profits
distribution................ $ 55,344,817

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((274,023,967))

264,124,506

The total expenditures
from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not
exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated
purposes.

Sec. 802. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 805
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

For transfers in
this section to the state general fund, pursuant to RCW 43.135.035(5), the
state expenditure limit shall be increased by the amount of the transfer. The
increase shall occur in the fiscal year in which the transfer occurs.

Public Facilities
Construction Loan and

Grant Revolving
Account: For transfer

to the digital
government revolving account

on or before December
31, 2001............. $ 1,418,456

Financial Services
Regulation Fund: To be

transferred from the
financial services

regulation fund to the
digital government

revolving account
during the period

between July 1, 2001,
and December 31,

2001....................................... $ 2,000,000

Local Toxics Control
Account: For transfer

to the state toxics
control account.

Transferred funds will
be utilized

for methamphetamine lab
cleanup, to

address areawide soil
contamination

problems, and clean up
contaminated

sites as part of the
clean sites

initiative................................. $ 6,000,000

State Toxics Control
Account: For transfer

to the water quality
account for water

quality related
projects funded in the

capital budget............................. $ 9,000,000

General Fund: For transfer
to the flood

control assistance
account.................. $ 4,000,000

Water Quality Account: For
transfer to the

water pollution control
account. Transfers

shall be made at
intervals coinciding with

deposits of federal
capitalization grant

money into the
account. The amounts

transferred shall not
exceed the match

required for each
federal deposit.......... $ 12,564,487

Health Services
Account: For transfer

to the water quality
account............... $ 6,447,500

State Treasurer's Service
Account: For

transfer to the general
fund on or

before June 30, 2003,
an amount in excess

of the cash
requirements of the state

treasurer's service
account. Pursuant to

RCW 43.135.035(5), the
state expenditure

limit shall be
increased by $4,000,000 in

fiscal year 2002 and
by $8,587,000 in fiscal

year 2003 to reflect
this transfer......... $ ((8,000,000))

12,587,000

Public Works Assistance
Account: For

transfer to the
drinking water

assistance account......................... $ 7,700,000

Tobacco Settlement
Account: For transfer

to the health services
account, in an

amount not to exceed
the actual balance

of the tobacco
settlement account.......... $ ((310,000,000))

265,000,000

General Fund: For transfer
to the water quality

account.................................... $ ((60,325,000))

60,821,172

Health Services Account:
For

transfer to the state
general fund

by June 30, 2002.
Pursuant to RCW

43.135.035(5), the
state expenditure

limit shall be
increased in fiscal

year 2002 to reflect
this transfer......... $ 130,000,000

Health Services Account:
For

transfer to the state
general fund

((by)) on
June ((30)) 28, 2003. Pursuant

to RCW 43.135.035(5),
the state expenditure

limit shall be
increased in fiscal

year 2003 to reflect
this transfer......... $ 20,000,000

((State Surplus Assets
Reserve Fund: For

transfer to the
multimodal transportation

account by June 30,
2002................... $ 70,000,000))

Multimodal Transportation
Account: For

transfer to the state
general fund

by June 30, 2002.
Pursuant to RCW

43.135.035(5), the
state expenditure

limit shall be
increased in fiscal

year 2002 to reflect
this transfer......... $ 70,000,000

Health Service Account:
For transfer

to the violence
reduction and drug

enforcement account........................ $ 6,497,500

Gambling Revolving
Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund, $2,000,000

for fiscal year 2002
and $450,000 for

fiscal year 2003....................... ... $ 2,450,000

Horticultural Districts
Account: For transfer

to the fruit and
vegetable inspection

account.................................... $ 11,075,000

Agricultural Local
Account: For

transfer to the
fruit and vegetable

inspection account......................... $ 605,000

Nisqually Earthquake
Account: For transfer to

the disaster
response account for fire

suppression and
mobilization costs......... $ 32,698,000

Enhanced 911 Account:
For transfer to

the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 6,000,000

Clarke-McNary Fund: For
transfer to the

state general fund
for fiscal year 2002.... $ 4,000,000

State Investment Board
Expense Account: For

transfer to the
state general fund for

fiscal year 2003........................... $ 194,000

State Drought
Preparedness Account: For

transfer to the
state general fund for

fiscal year 2002........................... $ 3,000,000

Financial Services
Regulation Fund: For

transfer to the
state general fund,

$2,250,000 for
fiscal year 2002 and

$357,000 for fiscal
year 2003.............. $ 2,607,000

Off-Road Vehicle (ORV)
Account: For

transfer to the
state general fund

for fiscal year 2003....................... $ 57,000

Snowmobile Account: For
transfer

to the state general
fund for

fiscal year 2003........................... $ 70,000

Insurance Commissioner's
Regulatory Account:

For transfer to the
state general fund

for fiscal year 2003....................... $ 366,000

Worker and Community
Right to Know Account:

For transfer to the
state general fund

for fiscal year 2003....................... $ 53,000

Industrial Insurance
Premium Refund Account:

For transfer to the
state general fund

for fiscal year 2002....................... $ 1,000,000

Liquor Control Board
Construction and

Maintenance
Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 1,067,000

Horse Racing Commission
Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 68,000

State Convention and
Trade Center Operations

Account: For
transfer to the state

general fund for
fiscal year 2003.......... $ 579,000

Lottery Administrative
Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 335,000

Waste Reduction,
Recycling, and Litter Control

Account: For
transfer to the state general

fund for fiscal year
2003.................. $ 187,000

Air Operating Permit
Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 54,000

Hazardous Waste
Assistance Account: For

transfer to the
state general fund

for fiscal year 2003....................... $ 54,000

Local Toxics Control
Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund, $4,000,000

for fiscal year 2002
and $77,000 for

fiscal year 2003........................... $ 4,077,000

State Toxics Control
Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 770,000

Water Quality Account:
For transfer

to the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 40,000

Emergency Medical
Services and Trauma Care

System Trust
Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2002.................................. $ 6,000,000

Wildlife Account: For
transfer to the state

general fund for
fiscal year 2003.......... $ 723,000

Warm Water Game Fish
Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 49,000

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 197,000

State Parks Renewal and
Stewardship Account:

For transfer to the
state general fund

for fiscal year 2003....................... $ 378,000

Public Service Revolving
Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 406,000

Local Leasehold Excise
Tax Account: For transfer

of interest to the
state general fund by

June 1, 2002, for
fiscal year 2002......... $ 1,000,000

Water Quality Permit
Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 362,000

Oil Spill Prevention
Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 163,000

Insurance Commissioner's
Regulatory Account:

For transfer to the
state general fund

for fiscal year 2003....................... $ 366,000

Health Services
Account: For transfer to the

tobacco prevention
and control account..... $ 21,980,000

Anti-Trust Revolving
Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund for fiscal year

2003....................................... $ 67,000

(End
of part)

PART
IX

MISCELLANEOUS

Sec. 901. RCW 9.46.100 and 1991
sp.s. c 16 s 917 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created
the gambling revolving fund which shall consist of all moneys receivable for
licensing, penalties, forfeitures, and all other moneys, income, or revenue
received by the commission. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the
fund. All moneys received by the commission or any employee thereof, except
for change funds and an amount of petty cash as fixed by rule or regulation of
the commission, shall be deposited each day in a depository approved by the
state treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be credited to the
gambling revolving fund. Disbursements from the revolving fund shall be on
authorization of the commission or a duly authorized representative thereof.
In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control the gambling
revolving fund shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no
appropriation shall be required to permit expenditures and payment of
obligations from such fund. All expenses relative to commission business,
including but not limited to salaries and expenses of the director and other
commission employees shall be paid from the gambling revolving fund.

((The state
treasurer shall transfer to the general fund one million dollars from the
gambling revolving fund for the 1991‑93 fiscal biennium.)) During
the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the gambling
revolving fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the fund and reductions made by the 2002 supplemental
appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 902. RCW 28B.50.837 and 1993
c 87 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington
community and technical college exceptional faculty awards program is
established. The program shall be administered by the college board. The
college faculty awards trust fund hereby created shall be administered by the
state treasurer.

(2) Funds appropriated
by the legislature for the community and technical college exceptional faculty
awards program shall be deposited in the college faculty awards trust fund. At
the request of the college board, the treasurer shall release the state
matching funds to the local endowment fund of the college or its foundation.
No appropriation is necessary for the expenditure of moneys from the fund. During
the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate funds from the
college faculty awards trust fund for the purposes of the settlement costs of
the Mader v. State litigation regarding retirement contributions on
behalf of part-time faculty.

Sec. 903. RCW 38.52.106 and 2001 c
5 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The Nisqually
earthquake account is created in the state treasury. Moneys may be placed in
the account from tax revenues, budget transfers or appropriations, federal
appropriations, gifts, or any other lawful source. Moneys in the account may
be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the account shall be used only to
support state and local government disaster response and recovery efforts associated
with the Nisqually earthquake. During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer moneys from the Nisqually earthquake account to the
disaster response account for fire suppression and mobilization costs.

Sec. 904. RCW 38.52.540 and 2001 c
128 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The enhanced 911
account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the state enhanced
911 excise tax imposed by RCW 82.14B.030 shall be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account shall be used only to support the statewide coordination
and management of the enhanced 911 system and to help supplement, within
available funds, the operational costs of the system. Funds shall not be
distributed to any county that has not imposed the maximum county enhanced 911
taxes allowed under RCW 82.14B.030 (1) and (2). The state enhanced 911
coordinator, with the advice and assistance of the enhanced 911 advisory
committee, is authorized to enter into statewide agreements to improve the
efficiency of enhanced 911 services for all counties and shall specify by rule
the additional purposes for which moneys, if available, may be expended from
this account. During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the enhanced 911 account to the state general fund such amounts
as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 905. RCW 41.06.150 and 1999 c
297 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall adopt
rules, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this chapter, as now or
hereafter amended, and with the best standards of personnel administration,
regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:

(1) The reduction,
dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an employee;

(2) Certification of
names for vacancies, including departmental promotions, with the number of
names equal to six more names than there are vacancies to be filled, such names
representing applicants rated highest on eligibility lists: PROVIDED, That
when other applicants have scores equal to the lowest score among the names
certified, their names shall also be certified;

(3) Examinations for
all positions in the competitive and noncompetitive service;

(4) Appointments;

(5) Training and career
development;

(6) Probationary
periods of six to twelve months and rejections of probationary employees,
depending on the job requirements of the class, except that entry level state
park rangers shall serve a probationary period of twelve months;

(7) Transfers;

(8) Sick leaves and
vacations;

(9) Hours of work;

(10) Layoffs when
necessary and subsequent reemployment, both according to seniority;

(11) Determination of
appropriate bargaining units within any agency: PROVIDED, That in making such
determination the board shall consider the duties, skills, and working
conditions of the employees, the history of collective bargaining by the
employees and their bargaining representatives, the extent of organization
among the employees, and the desires of the employees;

(12) Certification and
decertification of exclusive bargaining representatives: PROVIDED, That after
certification of an exclusive bargaining representative and upon the
representative's request, the director shall hold an election among employees
in a bargaining unit to determine by a majority whether to require as a
condition of employment membership in the certified exclusive bargaining
representative on or after the thirtieth day following the beginning of
employment or the date of such election, whichever is the later, and the
failure of an employee to comply with such a condition of employment
constitutes cause for dismissal: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no more often than
once in each twelve-month period after expiration of twelve months following
the date of the original election in a bargaining unit and upon petition of
thirty percent of the members of a bargaining unit the director shall hold an
election to determine whether a majority wish to rescind such condition of
employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That for purposes of this clause, membership in
the certified exclusive bargaining representative is satisfied by the payment
of monthly or other periodic dues and does not require payment of initiation,
reinstatement, or any other fees or fines and includes full and complete
membership rights: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in order to safeguard the right
of nonassociation of public employees, based on bona fide religious tenets or
teachings of a church or religious body of which such public employee is a
member, such public employee shall pay to the union, for purposes within the
program of the union as designated by such employee that would be in harmony
with his or her individual conscience, an amount of money equivalent to regular
union dues minus any included monthly premiums for union-sponsored insurance
programs, and such employee shall not be a member of the union but is entitled
to all the representation rights of a union member;

(13) Agreements between
agencies and certified exclusive bargaining representatives providing for
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on all personnel matters over
which the appointing authority of the appropriate bargaining unit of such
agency may lawfully exercise discretion;

(14) Written agreements
may contain provisions for payroll deductions of employee organization dues
upon authorization by the employee member and for the cancellation of such
payroll deduction by the filing of a proper prior notice by the employee with
the appointing authority and the employee organization: PROVIDED, That nothing
contained herein permits or grants to any employee the right to strike or
refuse to perform his or her official duties;

(15) Adoption and
revision of a comprehensive classification plan for all positions in the
classified service, based on investigation and analysis of the duties and
responsibilities of each such position.

(a) The board shall not
adopt job classification revisions or class studies unless implementation of
the proposed revision or study will result in net cost savings, increased
efficiencies, or improved management of personnel or services, and the proposed
revision or study has been approved by the director of financial management in
accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.

(b) Beginning July 1,
1995, through June 30, 1997, in addition to the requirements of (a) of this
subsection:

(i) The board may
approve the implementation of salary increases resulting from adjustments to
the classification plan during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium only if:

(A) The implementation
will not result in additional net costs and the proposed implementation has
been approved by the director of financial management in accordance with
chapter 43.88 RCW;

(B) The implementation
will take effect on July 1, 1996, and the total net cost of all such actions
approved by the board for implementation during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium
does not exceed the amounts specified by the legislature specifically for this
purpose; or

(C) The implementation
is a result of emergent conditions. Emergent conditions are defined as
emergency situations requiring the establishment of positions necessary for the
preservation of the public health, safety, or general welfare, which do not
exceed $250,000 of the moneys identified in section 718(2), chapter 18, Laws of
1995 2nd sp. sess.

(ii) The board shall
approve only those salary increases resulting from adjustments to the
classification plan if they are due to documented recruitment and retention
difficulties, salary compression or inversion, increased duties and
responsibilities, or inequities. For these purposes, inequities are defined as
similar work assigned to different job classes with a salary disparity greater
than 7.5 percent.

(iii) Adjustments made
to the higher education hospital special pay plan are exempt from (b)(i)
through (ii) of this subsection.

(c) Reclassifications,
class studies, and salary adjustments to be implemented during the 1997-99 and
subsequent fiscal biennia are governed by (a) of this subsection and RCW
41.06.152;

(16) Allocation and
reallocation of positions within the classification plan;

(17) Adoption and
revision of a state salary schedule to reflect the prevailing rates in
Washington state private industries and other governmental units but the rates
in the salary schedules or plans shall be increased if necessary to attain
comparable worth under an implementation plan under RCW 41.06.155 and that, for
institutions of higher education and related boards, shall be competitive for
positions of a similar nature in the state or the locality in which an
institution of higher education or related board is located, such adoption and revision
subject to approval by the director of financial management in accordance with
the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW;

(18) Increment
increases within the series of steps for each pay grade based on length of
service for all employees whose standards of performance are such as to permit
them to retain job status in the classified service;

(19) Optional lump sum
relocation compensation approved by the agency director, whenever it is
reasonably necessary that a person make a domiciliary move in accepting a
transfer or other employment with the state. An agency must provide lump sum
compensation within existing resources. If the person receiving the relocation
payment terminates or causes termination with the state, for reasons other than
layoff, disability separation, or other good cause as determined by an agency
director, within one year of the date of the employment, the state is entitled
to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation from the person;

(20) Providing for
veteran's preference as required by existing statutes, with recognition of
preference in regard to layoffs and subsequent reemployment for veterans and
their surviving spouses by giving such eligible veterans and their surviving
spouses additional credit in computing their seniority by adding to their
unbroken state service, as defined by the board, the veteran's service in the
military not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section,
"veteran" means any person who has one or more years of active
military service in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who
has less than one year's service and is discharged with a disability incurred
in the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the government and
who, upon termination of such service has received an honorable discharge, a
discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record, or a release from
active military service with evidence of service other than that for which an
undesirable, bad conduct, or dishonorable discharge shall be given: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That the surviving spouse of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of
this section regardless of the veteran's length of active military service:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That for the purposes of this section "veteran"
does not include any person who has voluntarily retired with twenty or more
years of active military service and whose military retirement pay is in excess
of five hundred dollars per month;

(21) Permitting agency
heads to delegate the authority to appoint, reduce, dismiss, suspend, or demote
employees within their agencies if such agency heads do not have specific
statutory authority to so delegate: PROVIDED, That the board may not authorize
such delegation to any position lower than the head of a major subdivision of
the agency;

(22) Assuring persons
who are or have been employed in classified positions before July 1, 1993, will
be eligible for employment, reemployment, transfer, and promotion in respect to
classified positions covered by this chapter;

(23) Affirmative action
in appointment, promotion, transfer, recruitment, training, and career
development; development and implementation of affirmative action goals and
timetables; and monitoring of progress against those goals and timetables.

The board shall consult
with the human rights commission in the development of rules pertaining to
affirmative action. The department of personnel shall transmit a report
annually to the human rights commission which states the progress each state
agency has made in meeting affirmative action goals and timetables.

Notwithstanding this
section and rules of the board adopted under this section, agencies may place
employees on temporary unpaid leave during the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium for
the purpose of implementing appropriations reductions enacted in the 2002
supplemental appropriations act. Mandatory unpaid leave must be approved by
the agency director, and must be, to the greatest extent possible, mutually
agreeable to the employee and employer. Employees taking mandatory temporary
unpaid leave will not lose seniority, leave accrual, or health insurance
benefits.

Sec. 906. RCW 43.10.220 and 1999 c
309 s 916 are each amended to read as follows:

The attorney general is
authorized to expend from the antitrust revolving fund, created by RCW
43.10.210 through 43.10.220, such funds as are necessary for the payment of
costs, expenses and charges incurred in the preparation, institution and
maintenance of antitrust actions under the state and federal antitrust acts.
During the ((1999-01)) 2001-03 fiscal biennium, the attorney
general may expend ((up to one million three hundred thousand dollars))
from the antitrust revolving fund for the purposes of ((implementing a case
management data processing system for the centralized management of cases and
workload, including antitrust and other complex litigation)) the
consumer protection activities of the office.

Sec. 907. RCW 43.30.360 and 1986 c
100 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

The department and
Washington State University may each receive funds from the federal government
in connection with cooperative work with the United States department of
agriculture, authorized by sections 4 and 5 of the Clarke-McNary act of
congress, approved June 7, 1924, providing for the procurement, protection, and
distribution of forestry seed and plants for the purpose of establishing
windbreaks, shelter belts, and farm wood lots and to assist the owners of farms
in establishing, improving, and renewing wood lots, shelter belts, and
windbreaks; and are authorized to disburse such funds as needed. During the
2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the Clarke-McNary
fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance
of the Clarke-McNary fund.

Sec. 908. RCW 43.33A.160 and 1991
sp.s. c 13 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state
investment board shall be funded from the earnings of the funds managed by the
state investment board, proportional to the value of the assets of each fund,
subject to legislative appropriation.

(2) There is
established in the state treasury a state investment board expense account from
which shall be paid the operating expenses of the state investment board.
Prior to November 1 of each even-numbered year, the state investment board
shall determine and certify to the state treasurer and the office of financial
management the value of the various funds managed by the investment board in
order to determine the proportional liability of the funds for the operating
expenses of the state investment board. Pursuant to appropriation, the state
treasurer is authorized to transfer such moneys from the various funds managed
by the investment board to the state investment board expense account as are
necessary to pay the operating expenses of the investment board. During the
2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the state
investment board expense account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the appropriations reductions made by the 2002 supplemental
appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 909. RCW 43.72.900 and 2002 c
2 s 2 (Initiative Measure No. 773) are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The health services
account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Subject to the transfers described in subsection (3)
of this section, moneys in the account may be expended only for maintaining and
expanding health services access for low-income residents, maintaining and
expanding the public health system, maintaining and improving the capacity of
the health care system, containing health care costs, and the regulation,
planning, and administering of the health care system.

(2) Funds deposited
into the health services account under RCW 82.24.028 and 82.26.028 shall be
used solely as follows:

(a) Five million
dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002, and five million
dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2003, shall be appropriated
by the legislature for programs that effectively improve the health of
low-income persons, including efforts to reduce diseases and illnesses that
harm low-income persons. The department of health shall submit a report to the
legislature on March 1, 2002, evaluating the cost-effectiveness of programs that
improve the health of low-income persons and address diseases and illnesses
that disproportionately affect low-income persons, and making recommendations
to the legislature on which of these programs could most effectively utilize
the funds appropriated under this subsection.

(b) Ten percent of the
funds deposited into the health services account under RCW 82.24.028 and
82.26.028 remaining after the appropriation under (a) of this subsection shall
be transferred no less frequently than annually by the treasurer to the tobacco
prevention and control account established by RCW 43.79.480. The funds
transferred shall be used exclusively for implementation of the Washington
state tobacco prevention and control plan and shall be used only to supplement,
and not supplant, funds in the tobacco prevention and control account as of
January 1, 2001, however, these funds may be used to replace funds appropriated
by the legislature for further implementation of the Washington state tobacco
prevention and control plan for the biennium beginning July 1, 2001. For each
state fiscal year beginning on and after July 1, 2002, the legislature shall
appropriate no less than twenty-six million two hundred forty thousand dollars
from the tobacco prevention and control account for implementation of the
Washington state tobacco prevention and control plan.

(c) Because of its
demonstrated effectiveness in improving the health of low-income persons and
addressing illnesses and diseases that harm low-income persons, the remainder
of the funds deposited into the health services account under RCW 82.24.028 and
82.26.028 shall be appropriated solely for Washington basic health plan
enrollment as provided in chapter 70.47 RCW. Funds appropriated pursuant to
this subsection (2)(c) must supplement, and not supplant, the level of state
funding needed to support enrollment of a minimum of one hundred twenty-five
thousand persons for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002, and every fiscal
year thereafter. The health care authority may enroll up to twenty thousand
additional persons in the basic health plan during the biennium beginning July
1, 2001, above the base level of one hundred twenty-five thousand enrollees.
The health care authority may enroll up to fifty thousand additional persons in
the basic health plan during the biennium beginning July 1, 2003, above the
base level of one hundred twenty-five thousand enrollees. For each biennium
beginning on and after July 1, 2005, the health care authority may enroll up to
at least one hundred seventy-five thousand enrollees. Funds appropriated under
this subsection may be used to support outreach and enrollment activities only
to the extent necessary to achieve the enrollment goals described in this
section.

(3) Prior to
expenditure for the purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, funds
deposited into the health services account under RCW 82.24.028 and 82.26.028
shall first be transferred to the following accounts to ensure the continued
availability of previously dedicated revenues for certain existing programs:

(a) To the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520, two million two
hundred forty-nine thousand five hundred dollars for the state fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2001, four million two hundred forty-eight thousand dollars
for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002, seven million seven hundred
eighty-nine thousand dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2003, six
million nine hundred thirty-two thousand dollars for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2005, and six million nine hundred thirty-two thousand dollars for each
biennium thereafter, as required by RCW 82.24.020(2);

(b) To the health
services account under this section, nine million seventy-seven thousand
dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2001, seventeen million one
hundred eighty-eight thousand dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July
1, 2002, thirty-one million seven hundred fifty-five thousand dollars for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2003, twenty-eight million six hundred twenty-two
thousand dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2005, and twenty-eight
million six hundred twenty-two thousand dollars for each biennium thereafter,
as required by RCW 82.24.020(3); and

(c) To the water
quality account under RCW 70.146.030, two million two hundred three thousand
five hundred dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2001, four
million two hundred forty-four thousand dollars for the state fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2002, eight million one hundred eighty-two thousand dollars
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2003, seven million eight hundred
eighty-five thousand dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2005, and seven
million eight hundred eighty-five thousand dollars for each biennium thereafter,
as required by RCW 82.24.027(2)(a).

During the 2001-2003
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the health services account
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 910. RCW 43.83B.430 and 1999
c 379 s 921 are each amended to read as follows:

The state drought
preparedness account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from
appropriated funds designated for the account and funds transferred from the
state emergency water projects revolving account must be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for drought preparedness. During
the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the state
drought preparedness account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect
the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 911. RCW 43.88.030 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of
financial management shall provide all agencies with a complete set of
instructions for submitting biennial budget requests to the director at least
three months before agency budget documents are due into the office of financial
management. The director shall provide agencies and committees that are
required under RCW 44.40.070 to develop comprehensive six-year program and
financial plans with a complete set of instructions for submitting these
program and financial plans at the same time that instructions for submitting
other budget requests are provided. The budget document or documents shall
consist of the governor's budget message which shall be explanatory of the
budget and shall contain an outline of the proposed financial policies of the
state for the ensuing fiscal period, as well as an outline of the proposed
six-year financial policies where applicable, and shall describe in connection
therewith the important features of the budget. The message shall set forth
the reasons for salient changes from the previous fiscal period in expenditure
and revenue items and shall explain any major changes in financial policy.
Attached to the budget message shall be such supporting schedules, exhibits and
other explanatory material in respect to both current operations and capital
improvements as the governor shall deem to be useful to the legislature. The
budget document or documents shall set forth a proposal for expenditures in the
ensuing fiscal period, or six-year period where applicable, based upon the
estimated revenues and caseloads as approved by the economic and revenue
forecast council and caseload forecast council or upon the estimated revenues
and caseloads of the office of financial management for those funds, accounts,
sources, and programs for which the forecast councils do not prepare an
official forecast, including those revenues anticipated to support the six-year
programs and financial plans under RCW 44.40.070. In estimating revenues to
support financial plans under RCW 44.40.070, the office of financial management
shall rely on information and advice from the transportation revenue forecast
council. Revenues shall be estimated for such fiscal period from the source
and at the rates existing by law at the time of submission of the budget
document, including the supplemental budgets submitted in the even-numbered
years of a biennium. However, the estimated revenues and caseloads for use in
the governor's budget document may be adjusted to reflect budgetary revenue
transfers and revenue and caseload estimates dependent upon budgetary
assumptions of enrollments, workloads, and caseloads. All adjustments to the
approved estimated revenues and caseloads must be set forth in the budget
document. The governor may additionally submit, as an appendix to each
supplemental, biennial, or six-year agency budget or to the budget document or
documents, a proposal for expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period from
revenue sources derived from proposed changes in existing statutes.

Supplemental and
biennial documents shall reflect a six-year expenditure plan consistent with
estimated revenues from existing sources and at existing rates for those
agencies required to submit six-year program and financial plans under RCW
44.40.070. Any additional revenue resulting from proposed changes to existing
statutes shall be separately identified within the document as well as related
expenditures for the six-year period.

The budget document or
documents shall also contain:

(a) Revenues classified
by fund and source for the immediately past fiscal period, those received or
anticipated for the current fiscal period, those anticipated for the ensuing
biennium, and those anticipated for the ensuing six-year period to support the
six-year programs and financial plans required under RCW 44.40.070;

(b) The undesignated
fund balance or deficit, by fund;

(c) Such additional
information dealing with expenditures, revenues, workload, performance, and
personnel as the legislature may direct by law or concurrent resolution;

(d) Such additional
information dealing with revenues and expenditures as the governor shall deem
pertinent and useful to the legislature;

(e) Tabulations showing
expenditures classified by fund, function, ((activity,)) and agency;

(f) A delineation of
each agency's activities, including those activities funded from nonbudgeted,
nonappropriated sources, including funds maintained outside the state treasury;

(g) Identification of
all proposed direct expenditures to implement the Puget Sound water quality
plan under chapter 90.71 RCW, shown by agency and in total; and

(h) Tabulations showing
each postretirement adjustment by retirement system established after fiscal
year 1991, to include, but not be limited to, estimated total payments made to
the end of the previous biennial period, estimated payments for the present
biennium, and estimated payments for the ensuing biennium.

(2) The budget document
or documents shall include detailed estimates of all anticipated revenues
applicable to proposed operating or capital expenditures and shall also include
all proposed operating or capital expenditures. The total of beginning
undesignated fund balance and estimated revenues less working capital and other
reserves shall equal or exceed the total of proposed applicable expenditures.
The budget document or documents shall further include:

(a) Interest,
amortization and redemption charges on the state debt;

(b) Payments of all
reliefs, judgments, and claims;

(c) Other statutory
expenditures;

(d) Expenditures
incident to the operation for each agency;

(e) Revenues derived
from agency operations;

(f) Expenditures and
revenues shall be given in comparative form showing those incurred or received
for the immediately past fiscal period and those anticipated for the current
biennium and next ensuing biennium, as well as those required to support the six-year
programs and financial plans required under RCW 44.40.070;

(g) A showing and
explanation of amounts of general fund and other funds obligations for debt
service and any transfers of moneys that otherwise would have been available
for appropriation;

(h) Common school
expenditures on a fiscal-year basis;

(i) A showing, by
agency, of the value and purpose of financing contracts for the lease/purchase
or acquisition of personal or real property for the current and ensuing fiscal
periods; and

(j) A showing and
explanation of anticipated amounts of general fund and other funds required to
amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability of the retirement system
specified under chapter 41.45 RCW, and the contributions to meet such
amortization, stated in total dollars and as a level percentage of total
compensation.

(3) A separate capital
budget document or schedule shall be submitted that will contain the following:

(a) A statement setting
forth a long-range facilities plan for the state that identifies and includes
the highest priority needs within affordable spending levels;

(b) A capital program
consisting of proposed capital projects for the next biennium and the two
biennia succeeding the next biennium consistent with the long-range facilities plan.
Insomuch as is practical, and recognizing emergent needs, the capital program
shall reflect the priorities, projects, and spending levels proposed in
previously submitted capital budget documents in order to provide a reliable
long-range planning tool for the legislature and state agencies;

(c) A capital plan
consisting of proposed capital spending for at least four biennia succeeding
the next biennium;

(d) A strategic plan
for reducing backlogs of maintenance and repair projects. The plan shall include
a prioritized list of specific facility deficiencies and capital projects to
address the deficiencies for each agency, cost estimates for each project, a
schedule for completing projects over a reasonable period of time, and
identification of normal maintenance activities to reduce future backlogs;

(e) A statement of the
reason or purpose for a project;

(f) Verification that a
project is consistent with the provisions set forth in chapter 36.70A RCW;

(g) A statement about
the proposed site, size, and estimated life of the project, if applicable;

(h) Estimated total
project cost;

(i) For major projects
valued over five million dollars, estimated costs for the following project
components: Acquisition, consultant services, construction, equipment, project
management, and other costs included as part of the project. Project component
costs shall be displayed in a standard format defined by the office of
financial management to allow comparisons between projects;

(j) Estimated total
project cost for each phase of the project as defined by the office of
financial management;

(k) Estimated ensuing
biennium costs;

(l) Estimated costs
beyond the ensuing biennium;

(m) Estimated
construction start and completion dates;

(n) Source and type of
funds proposed;

(o) Estimated ongoing
operating budget costs or savings resulting from the project, including
staffing and maintenance costs;

(p) For any capital
appropriation requested for a state agency for the acquisition of land or the
capital improvement of land in which the primary purpose of the acquisition or
improvement is recreation or wildlife habitat conservation, the capital budget
document, or an omnibus list of recreation and habitat acquisitions provided
with the governor's budget document, shall identify the projected costs of
operation and maintenance for at least the two biennia succeeding the next
biennium. Omnibus lists of habitat and recreation land acquisitions shall
include individual project cost estimates for operation and maintenance as well
as a total for all state projects included in the list. The document shall
identify the source of funds from which the operation and maintenance costs are
proposed to be funded;

(q) Such other
information bearing upon capital projects as the governor deems to be useful;

(r) Standard terms,
including a standard and uniform definition of normal maintenance, for all
capital projects;

(s) Such other
information as the legislature may direct by law or concurrent resolution.

For purposes of this
subsection (3), the term "capital project" shall be defined
subsequent to the analysis, findings, and recommendations of a joint committee
comprised of representatives from the house capital appropriations committee,
senate ways and means committee, legislative transportation committee,
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, and office of
financial management.

(4) No
change affecting the comparability of agency or program information relating to
expenditures, revenues, workload, performance and personnel shall be made in
the format of any budget document or report presented to the legislature under
this section or RCW 43.88.160(1) relative to the format of the budget document
or report which was presented to the previous regular session of the
legislature during an odd-numbered year without prior legislative concurrence.
Prior legislative concurrence shall consist of (a) a favorable majority vote on
the proposal by the standing committees on ways and means of both houses if the
legislature is in session or (b) a favorable majority vote on the proposal by
members of the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee if
the legislature is not in session.

Sec. 912. RCW 43.320.110 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 7 s 911 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created a
local fund known as the "financial services regulation fund" which
shall consist of all moneys received by the divisions of the department of
financial institutions, except for the division of securities which shall
deposit thirteen percent of all moneys received, and which shall be used for
the purchase of supplies and necessary equipment; the payment of salaries,
wages, and utilities; the establishment of reserves; and other incidental costs
required for the proper regulation of individuals and entities subject to
regulation by the department. The state treasurer shall be the custodian of
the fund. Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the
director of financial institutions or the director's designee. In order to maintain
an effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit
expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.

Between July 1, 2001,
and December 31, 2001, the legislature may transfer up to two million dollars
from the financial services regulation fund to the ((state general fund))
digital government revolving account. During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer from the financial services regulation fund to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund
and appropriations reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act
for administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 913. RCW 46.09.110 and 1986 c
206 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The moneys collected by
the department under this chapter shall be distributed from time to time but at
least once a year in the following manner:

The department shall
retain enough money to cover expenses incurred in the administration of this
chapter: PROVIDED, That such retention shall never exceed eighteen percent of
fees collected.

The remaining moneys
shall be distributed by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation in
accordance with RCW 46.09.170(1)(d). During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer from the ORV account to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the appropriations reductions made by the 2002
supplemental appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 914. RCW 46.10.075 and 1991
sp.s. c 13 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created a
snowmobile account within the state treasury. Snowmobile registration fees,
monetary civil penalties from snowmobile dealers, and snowmobile fuel tax
moneys collected under this chapter and in excess of the amounts fixed for the
administration of the registration and fuel tax provisions of this chapter shall
be deposited in the snowmobile account and shall be appropriated only to the
state parks and recreation commission for the administration and coordination
of this chapter. During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the snowmobile account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the appropriations reductions made by the 2002 supplemental
appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 915. RCW 48.02.190 and 1987 c
505 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this
section:

(a)
"Organization" means every insurer, as defined in RCW 48.01.050,
having a certificate of authority to do business in this state and every health
care service contractor registered to do business in this state. "Class
one" organizations shall consist of all insurers as defined in RCW
48.01.050. "Class two" organizations shall consist of all
organizations registered under provisions of chapter 48.44 RCW.

(b)
"Receipts" means (i) net direct premiums consisting of direct gross
premiums, as defined in RCW 48.18.170, paid for insurance written or renewed
upon risks or property resident, situated, or to be performed in this state,
less return premiums and premiums on policies not taken, dividends paid or
credited to policyholders on direct business, and premiums received from
policies or contracts issued in connection with qualified plans as defined in
RCW 48.14.021, and (ii) prepayments to health care service contractors as set
forth in RCW 48.44.010(3) less experience rating credits, dividends,
prepayments returned to subscribers, and payments for contracts not taken.

(2) The annual cost of
operating the office of insurance commissioner shall be determined by
legislative appropriation. A pro rata share of the cost shall be charged to
all organizations. Each class of organization shall contribute sufficient in
fees to the insurance commissioner's regulatory account to pay the reasonable
costs, including overhead, of regulating that class of organization.

(3) Fees charged shall
be calculated separately for each class of organization. The fee charged each
organization shall be that portion of the cost of operating the insurance
commissioner's office, for that class of organization, for the ensuing fiscal
year that is represented by the organization's portion of the receipts
collected or received by all organizations within that class on business in
this state during the previous calendar year: PROVIDED, That the fee shall not
exceed one-eighth of one percent of receipts: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
minimum fee shall be one thousand dollars.

(4) The commissioner
shall annually, on or before June 1, calculate and bill each organization for
the amount of its fee. Fees shall be due and payable no later than June 15 of
each year: PROVIDED, That if the necessary financial records are not available
or if the amount of the legislative appropriation is not determined in time to
carry out such calculations and bill such fees within the time specified, the
commissioner may use the fee factors for the prior year as the basis for the
fees and, if necessary, the commissioner may impose supplemental fees to fully
and properly charge the organizations. The penalties for failure to pay fees
when due shall be the same as the penalties for failure to pay taxes pursuant
to RCW 48.14.060. The fees required by this section are in addition to all
other taxes and fees now imposed or that may be subsequently imposed.

(5) All moneys
collected shall be deposited in the insurance commissioner's regulatory account
in the state treasury which is hereby created.

(6) Unexpended funds in
the insurance commissioner's regulatory account at the close of a fiscal year
shall be carried forward in the insurance commissioner's regulatory account to
the succeeding fiscal year and shall be used to reduce future fees. During
the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the insurance
commissioner's regulatory account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect excess fund balance in the account.

Sec. 916. RCW 49.70.170 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 7 s 913 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The worker and
community right to know fund is hereby established in the custody of the state
treasurer. The department shall deposit all moneys received under this chapter
in the fund. Moneys in the fund may be spent only for the purposes of this chapter
following legislative appropriation. Disbursements from the fund shall be on
authorization of the director or the director's designee. During the 2001-2003
fiscal biennium, moneys in the fund may also be used by the military department
for the purpose of assisting the state emergency response commission and
coordinating local emergency planning activities. During the 2001-2003
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the worker and community
right to know fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the
appropriations reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for
administrative efficiencies and savings. The fund is subject to the
allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW.

(2) The department
shall assess each employer who reported ten thousand four hundred or more
worker hours in the prior calendar year an annual fee to provide for the
implementation of this chapter. The department shall promulgate rules
establishing a fee schedule for all employers who reported ten thousand four
hundred or more worker hours in the prior calendar year and are engaged in
business operations having a standard industrial classification, as designated
in the standard industrial classification manual prepared by the federal office
of management and budget, within major group numbers 01 through 08 (agriculture
and forestry industries), numbers 10 through 14 (mining industries), numbers 15
through 17 (construction industries), numbers 20 through 39 (manufacturing
industries), numbers 41, 42, and 44 through 49 (transportation, communications,
electric, gas, and sanitary services), number 75 (automotive repair, services,
and garages), number 76 (miscellaneous repair services), number 80 (health
services), and number 82 (educational services). The department shall
establish the annual fee for each employer who reported ten thousand four
hundred or more worker hours in the prior calendar year in industries
identified by this section, provided that fees assessed shall not be more than
two dollars and fifty cents per full time equivalent employee. The annual fee
shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars. The fees shall be collected solely
from employers whose industries have been identified by rule under this
chapter. The department shall promulgate rules allowing employers who do not
have hazardous substances at their workplace to request an exemption from the
assessment and shall establish penalties for fraudulent exemption requests.
All fees collected by the department pursuant to this section shall be
collected in a cost-efficient manner and shall be deposited in the fund.

(3) Records required by
this chapter shall at all times be open to the inspection of the director, or
his designee including, the traveling auditors, agents or assistants of the
department provided for in RCW 51.16.070 and 51.48.040. The information
obtained from employer records under the provisions of this section shall be
subject to the same confidentiality requirements as set forth in RCW 51.16.070.

(4) An employer may
appeal the assessment of the fee or penalties pursuant to the procedures set
forth in Title 51 RCW and accompanying rules except that the employer shall not
have the right of appeal to superior court as provided in Title 51 RCW. The
employer from whom the fee or penalty is demanded or enforced, may however,
within thirty days of the board of industrial insurance appeal's final order,
pay the fee or penalty under written protest setting forth all the grounds upon
which such fee or penalty is claimed to be unlawful, excessive or otherwise
improper and thereafter bring an action in superior court against the
department to recover such fee or penalty or any portion of the fee or penalty
which was paid under protest.

(5) Repayment shall be
made to the general fund of any moneys appropriated by law in order to
implement this chapter.

Sec. 917. RCW 50.16.010 and 1993 c
483 s 7 and 1993 c 226 s 10 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

There shall be maintained
as special funds, separate and apart from all public moneys or funds of this
state an unemployment compensation fund, an administrative contingency fund,
and a federal interest payment fund, which shall be administered by the
commissioner exclusively for the purposes of this title, and to which RCW
43.01.050 shall not be applicable.

The unemployment
compensation fund shall consist of

(1) all contributions
and payments in lieu of contributions collected pursuant to the provisions of
this title,

(2) any property or
securities acquired through the use of moneys belonging to the fund,

(3) all earnings of
such property or securities,

(4) any moneys received
from the federal unemployment account in the unemployment trust fund in
accordance with Title XII of the social security act, as amended,

(5) all money recovered
on official bonds for losses sustained by the fund,

(6) all money credited
to this state's account in the unemployment trust fund pursuant to section 903
of the social security act, as amended,

(7) all money received
from the federal government as reimbursement pursuant to section 204 of the
federal-state extended compensation act of 1970 (84 Stat. 708‑712; 26
U.S.C. Sec. 3304), and

(8) all moneys received
for the fund from any other source.

All moneys in the
unemployment compensation fund shall be commingled and undivided.

The administrative
contingency fund shall consist of all interest on delinquent contributions
collected pursuant to this title, all fines and penalties collected pursuant to
the provisions of this title, all sums recovered on official bonds for losses
sustained by the fund, and revenue received under RCW 50.24.014: PROVIDED,
That all fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties collected or assessed by a
district court because of the violation of a state law shall be remitted as
provided in chapter 3.62 RCW as now exists or is later amended.

Moneys available in the
administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special account
created under RCW 50.24.014, shall be expended upon the direction of the
commissioner, with the approval of the governor, whenever it appears to him or
her that such expenditure is necessary for:

(a) The proper
administration of this title and no federal funds are available for the
specific purpose to which such expenditure is to be made, provided, the moneys
are not substituted for appropriations from federal funds which, in the absence
of such moneys, would be made available.

(b) The proper
administration of this title for which purpose appropriations from federal
funds have been requested but not yet received, provided, the administrative
contingency fund will be reimbursed upon receipt of the requested federal
appropriation.

(c) The proper
administration of this title for which compliance and audit issues have been
identified that establish federal claims requiring the expenditure of state
resources in resolution. Claims must be resolved in the following priority:
First priority is to provide services to eligible participants within the state;
second priority is to provide substitute services or program support; and last
priority is the direct payment of funds to the federal government.

(d) During the
2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the cost of worker retraining programs at community
and technical colleges as appropriated by the legislature.

Money in the special
account created under RCW 50.24.014 may only be expended, after appropriation,
for the purposes specified in RCW 50.62.010, 50.62.020, 50.62.030, 50.04.070,
50.04.072, 50.16.010, 50.29.025, 50.24.014, 50.44.053, and 50.22.010.

Sec. 918. RCW 50.20.190 and 2001 c
146 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An individual who
is paid any amount as benefits under this title to which he or she is not
entitled shall, unless otherwise relieved pursuant to this section, be liable
for repayment of the amount overpaid. The department shall issue an
overpayment assessment setting forth the reasons for and the amount of the
overpayment. The amount assessed, to the extent not collected, may be deducted
from any future benefits payable to the individual: PROVIDED, That in the
absence of a back pay award, a settlement affecting the allowance of benefits,
fraud, misrepresentation, or willful nondisclosure, every determination of
liability shall be mailed or personally served not later than two years after
the close of or final payment made on the individual's applicable benefit year
for which the purported overpayment was made, whichever is later, unless the
merits of the claim are subjected to administrative or judicial review in which
event the period for serving the determination of liability shall be extended
to allow service of the determination of liability during the six-month period
following the final decision affecting the claim.

(2) The commissioner
may waive an overpayment if the commissioner finds that the overpayment was not
the result of fraud, misrepresentation, willful nondisclosure, or fault
attributable to the individual and that the recovery thereof would be against
equity and good conscience: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the overpayment so waived
shall be charged against the individual's applicable entitlement for the
eligibility period containing the weeks to which the overpayment was attributed
as though such benefits had been properly paid.

(3) Any assessment
herein provided shall constitute a determination of liability from which an
appeal may be had in the same manner and to the same extent as provided for
appeals relating to determinations in respect to claims for benefits:
PROVIDED, That an appeal from any determination covering overpayment only shall
be deemed to be an appeal from the determination which was the basis for
establishing the overpayment unless the merits involved in the issue set forth
in such determination have already been heard and passed upon by the appeal
tribunal. If no such appeal is taken to the appeal tribunal by the individual
within thirty days of the delivery of the notice of determination of liability,
or within thirty days of the mailing of the notice of determination, whichever
is the earlier, the determination of liability shall be deemed conclusive and
final. Whenever any such notice of determination of liability becomes
conclusive and final, the commissioner, upon giving at least twenty days notice
by certified mail return receipt requested to the individual's last known
address of the intended action, may file with the superior court clerk of any
county within the state a warrant in the amount of the notice of determination
of liability plus a filing fee under RCW 36.18.012(10). The clerk of the
county where the warrant is filed shall immediately designate a superior court
cause number for the warrant, and the clerk shall cause to be entered in the
judgment docket under the superior court cause number assigned to the warrant,
the name of the person(s) mentioned in the warrant, the amount of the notice of
determination of liability, and the date when the warrant was filed. The
amount of the warrant as docketed shall become a lien upon the title to, and
any interest in, all real and personal property of the person(s) against whom
the warrant is issued, the same as a judgment in a civil case duly docketed in
the office of such clerk. A warrant so docketed shall be sufficient to support
the issuance of writs of execution and writs of garnishment in favor of the
state in the manner provided by law for a civil judgment. A copy of the
warrant shall be mailed to the person(s) mentioned in the warrant by certified
mail to the person's last known address within five days of its filing with the
clerk.

(4) On request of any
agency which administers an employment security law of another state, the
United States, or a foreign government and which has found in accordance with
the provisions of such law that a claimant is liable to repay benefits received
under such law, the commissioner may collect the amount of such benefits from
the claimant to be refunded to the agency. In any case in which under this
section a claimant is liable to repay any amount to the agency of another state,
the United States, or a foreign government, such amounts may be collected
without interest by civil action in the name of the commissioner acting as
agent for such agency if the other state, the United States, or the foreign
government extends such collection rights to the employment security department
of the state of Washington, and provided that the court costs be paid by the
governmental agency benefiting from such collection.

(5) Any employer who is
a party to a back pay award or settlement due to loss of wages shall, within
thirty days of the award or settlement, report to the department the amount of
the award or settlement, the name and social security number of the recipient
of the award or settlement, and the period for which it is awarded. When an
individual has been awarded or receives back pay, for benefit purposes the
amount of the back pay shall constitute wages paid in the period for which it
was awarded. For contribution purposes, the back pay award or settlement shall
constitute wages paid in the period in which it was actually paid. The
following requirements shall also apply:

(a) The employer shall
reduce the amount of the back pay award or settlement by an amount determined
by the department based upon the amount of unemployment benefits received by
the recipient of the award or settlement during the period for which the back
pay award or settlement was awarded;

(b) The employer shall
pay to the unemployment compensation fund, in a manner specified by the
commissioner, an amount equal to the amount of such reduction;

(c) The employer shall
also pay to the department any taxes due for unemployment insurance purposes on
the entire amount of the back pay award or settlement notwithstanding any
reduction made pursuant to (a) of this subsection;

(d) If the employer
fails to reduce the amount of the back pay award or settlement as required in
(a) of this subsection, the department shall issue an overpayment assessment
against the recipient of the award or settlement in the amount that the back
pay award or settlement should have been reduced; and

(e) If the employer
fails to pay to the department an amount equal to the reduction as required in
(b) of this subsection, the department shall issue an assessment of liability
against the employer which shall be collected pursuant to the procedures for
collection of assessments provided herein and in RCW 50.24.110.

(6) When an individual
fails to repay an overpayment assessment that is due and fails to arrange for
satisfactory repayment terms, the commissioner shall impose an interest penalty
of one percent per month of the outstanding balance. Interest shall accrue
immediately on overpayments assessed pursuant to RCW 50.20.070 and shall be
imposed when the assessment becomes final. For any other overpayment, interest
shall accrue when the individual has missed two or more of their monthly
payments either partially or in full. The interest penalty shall be used to
fund detection and recovery of overpayment and collection activities and, during
the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the cost of worker retraining programs at
community and technical colleges as appropriated by the legislature.

Sec. 919. RCW 51.44.170 and 1997 c
327 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The industrial
insurance premium refund account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All industrial insurance refunds earned by state agencies or
institutions of higher education under the state fund retrospective rating
program shall be deposited into the account. The account is subject to the
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
for expenditures from the account. Only the executive head of the agency or
institution of higher education, or designee, may authorize expenditures from
the account. No agency or institution of higher education may make an
expenditure from the account for an amount greater than the refund earned by
the agency. If the agency or institution of higher education has staff dedicated
to workers' compensation claims management, expenditures from the account must
be used to pay for that staff, but additional expenditure from the account may
be used for any program within an agency or institution of higher education
that promotes or provides incentives for employee workplace safety and health
and early, appropriate return-to-work for injured employees. During the
2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the industrial
insurance premium refund account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for
administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 920. RCW 66.08.235 and 1997 c
75 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The liquor control
board construction and maintenance account is created within the state
treasury. The liquor control board shall deposit into this account a portion
of the board's markup, as authorized by chapter 66.16 RCW, placed upon liquor
as determined by the board. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. The liquor control board shall use deposits to this account to
fund construction and maintenance of a centralized distribution center for
liquor products intended for sale through the board's liquor store and vendor
system. During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the liquor control board construction and maintenance account to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the appropriations reductions made by the
2002 supplemental appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and
savings.

Sec. 921. RCW 67.16.100 and 1998 c
345 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All sums paid to
the commission under this chapter, including those sums collected for license
fees and excluding those sums collected under RCW 67.16.102 and 67.16.105(3),
shall be disposed of by the commission as follows: One hundred percent thereof
shall be retained by the commission in the horse racing commission fund
for the payment of the salaries of its members, secretary, clerical, office,
and other help and all expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this
chapter. No salary, wages, expenses, or compensation of any kind shall be paid
by the state in connection with the work of the commission.

(2) Any moneys
collected or paid to the commission under the terms of this chapter and not
expended at the close of the fiscal biennium shall be paid to the state
treasurer and be placed in the fair fund created in RCW 15.76.115. The
commission may, with the approval of the office of financial management, retain
any sum required for working capital. During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer from the horse racing commission fund to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the reductions made by the 2002
supplemental appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 922. RCW 67.40.025 and 1988
ex.s. c 1 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

All operating revenues
received by the corporation formed under RCW 67.40.020 shall be deposited in
the state convention and trade center operations account, hereby created in the
state treasury. Moneys in the account, including unanticipated revenues under
RCW 43.79.270, may be spent only after appropriation by statute, and may be
used only for operation and promotion of the center. During the 2001-2003
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the state convention and
trade center operations account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the appropriations reductions made by the 2002 supplemental
appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and savings.

Subject to approval by
the office of financial management under RCW 43.88.260, the corporation may
expend moneys for operational purposes in excess of the balance in the account,
to the extent the corporation receives or will receive additional operating
revenues.

As used in this
section, "operating revenues" does not include any moneys required to
be deposited in the state convention and trade center account.

Sec. 923. RCW 67.70.260 and 1985 c
375 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created
the lottery administrative account in the state treasury. The account shall be
managed, controlled, and maintained by the director. The legislature may
appropriate from the account for the payment of costs incurred in the operation
and administration of the lottery. During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer from the lottery administrative account to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the appropriations reductions made
by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and
savings.

Sec. 924. RCW 69.50.520 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 7 s 920 and 2001 c 168 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:

The violence reduction
and drug enforcement account is created in the state treasury. All designated
receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8), 66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(i)(1),
82.08.150(5), 82.24.020(2), 82.64.020, and section 420, chapter 271, Laws of
1989 shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be
used only for funding services and programs under chapter 271, Laws of 1989 and
chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess., including state incarceration costs. Funds
from the account may also be appropriated to reimburse local governments for
costs associated with implementing criminal justice legislation including
chapter 338, Laws of 1997. During the 2001-2003 biennium, funds from the
account may also be used for costs associated with providing grants to local
governments in accordance with chapter 338, Laws of 1997, the replacement of
the department of corrections' offender-based tracking system, maintenance and
operating costs of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
jail reporting system, civil indigent legal representation, and for
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces. After July 1, 2003, at least seven
and one-half percent of expenditures from the account shall be used for
providing grants to community networks under chapter 70.190 RCW by the family
policy council.

Sec. 925. RCW 70.93.180 and 1998 c
257 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
created an account within the state treasury to be known as the "waste
reduction, recycling, and litter control account". Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the waste reduction,
recycling, and litter control account shall be used as follows:

(a) Fifty percent to
the department of ecology, for use by the departments of ecology, natural
resources, revenue, transportation, and corrections, and the parks and
recreation commission, for use in litter collection programs, to be distributed
under RCW 70.93.220. The amount to the department of ecology shall also be
used for a central coordination function for litter control efforts statewide,
for the biennial litter survey under RCW 70.93.200(8), and for statewide public
awareness programs under RCW 70.93.200(7). The amount to the department shall
also be used to defray the costs of administering the funding, coordination,
and oversight of local government programs for waste reduction, litter control,
and recycling, so that local governments can apply one hundred percent of their
funding to achieving program goals. The amount to the department of revenue
shall be used to enforce compliance with the litter tax imposed in chapter
82.19 RCW;

(b) Twenty percent to
the department for local government funding programs for waste reduction,
litter control, and recycling activities by cities and counties under RCW
70.93.250, to be administered by the department of ecology; and

(c) Thirty percent to
the department of ecology for waste reduction and recycling efforts.

(2) All taxes imposed
in RCW 82.19.010 and fines and bail forfeitures collected or received pursuant
to this chapter shall be deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and
litter control account and used for the programs under subsection (1) of this
section.

(3) Not less than five
percent and no more than ten percent of the amount appropriated into the waste
reduction, recycling, and litter control account every biennium shall be
reserved for capital needs, including the purchase of vehicles for transporting
crews and for collecting litter and solid waste. Capital funds shall be
distributed among state agencies and local governments according to the same
criteria provided in RCW 70.93.220 for the remainder of the funds, so that the
most effective waste reduction, litter control, and recycling programs receive
the most funding. The intent of this subsection is to provide funds for the
purchase of equipment that will enable the department to account for the
greatest return on investment in terms of reaching a zero litter goal.

(4) During the 2001-2003
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the waste reduction,
recycling, and litter control account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the appropriations reductions made by the 2002 supplemental
appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 926. RCW 70.94.015 and 1998 c
321 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The air pollution
control account is established in the state treasury. All receipts collected
by or on behalf of the department from RCW 70.94.151(2), and receipts from
nonpermit program sources under RCW 70.94.152(1) and 70.94.154(7), and all
receipts from RCW 70.94.650((,)) and 70.94.660((,
82.44.020(2), and 82.50.405)) shall be deposited into the account. Moneys
in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used only to develop and implement the provisions of chapters
70.94 and 70.120 RCW.

(2) The amounts
collected and allocated in accordance with this section shall be expended upon
appropriation except as otherwise provided in this section and in accordance
with the following limitations:

Portions of moneys
received by the department of ecology from the air pollution control account
shall be distributed by the department to local authorities based on:

(a) The level and
extent of air quality problems within such authority's jurisdiction;

(b) The costs
associated with implementing air pollution regulatory programs by such
authority; and

(c) The amount of
funding available to such authority from other sources, whether state, federal,
or local, that could be used to implement such programs.

(3) The air operating
permit account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts
collected by or on behalf of the department from permit program sources under
RCW 70.94.152(1), 70.94.161, 70.94.162, and 70.94.154(7) shall be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
activities described in RCW 70.94.152(1), 70.94.161, 70.94.162, and
70.94.154(7). Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. During
the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the air
operating permit account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the
appropriations reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for
administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 927. RCW 70.95E.080 and 1991
sp.s. c 13 s 75 are each amended to read as follows:

The hazardous waste
assistance account is hereby created in the state treasury. The following
moneys shall be deposited into the hazardous waste assistance account:

(1) Those revenues
which are raised by the fees imposed under RCW 70.95E.020 and 70.95E.030;

(2) Penalties and
surcharges collected under chapter 70.95C RCW and this chapter; and

(3) Any other moneys
appropriated or transferred to the account by the legislature. Moneys in the
hazardous waste assistance account may be spent only for the purposes of this
chapter following legislative appropriation. During the 2001-2003 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the hazardous waste assistance
account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the appropriations
reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for administrative
efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 928. RCW 70.105D.070 and 2001
c 27 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state toxics
control account and the local toxics control account are hereby created in the
state treasury.

(2) The following
moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics control account: (a) Those
revenues which are raised by the tax imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are
attributable to that portion of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths
of one percent; (b) the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter
or chapter 70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this
chapter; and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out the
purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the following
activities:

(i) The state's
responsibility for hazardous waste planning, management, regulation,
enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter
70.105 RCW;

(ii) The state's
responsibility for solid waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement,
technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;

(iii) The hazardous
waste cleanup program required under this chapter;

(iv) State matching
funds required under the federal cleanup law;

(v) Financial
assistance for local programs in accordance with chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;

(vi) State government
programs for the safe reduction, recycling, or disposal of hazardous wastes
from households, small businesses, and agriculture;

(vii) Hazardous
materials emergency response training;

(viii) Water and
environmental health protection and monitoring programs;

(ix) Programs
authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;

(x) A public
participation program, including regional citizen advisory committees;

(xi) Public funding to
assist potentially liable persons to pay for the costs of remedial action in
compliance with cleanup standards under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the
amount and terms of such funding are established under a settlement agreement
under RCW 70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than
would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of unfair economic
hardship; and

(xii) Development and
demonstration of alternative management technologies designed to carry out the
top two hazardous waste management priorities of RCW 70.105.150.

(3) The following
moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics control account: Those
revenues which are raised by the tax imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are
attributable to that portion of the rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths
of one percent.

(a) Moneys deposited in
the local toxics control account shall be used by the department for grants or
loans to local governments for the following purposes in descending order of
priority: (i) Remedial actions; (ii) hazardous waste plans and programs under
chapter 70.105 RCW; (iii) solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95,
70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW; (iv) funds for a program to assist in the
assessment and cleanup of sites of methamphetamine production, but not to be
used for the initial containment of such sites, consistent with the
responsibilities and intent of RCW 69.50.511; and (v) cleanup and disposal of
hazardous substances from abandoned or derelict vessels that pose a threat to
human health or the environment. For purposes of this subsection (3)(a)(v),
"abandoned or derelict vessels" means vessels that have little or no
value and either have no identified owner or have an identified owner lacking
financial resources to clean up and dispose of the vessel. Funds for plans and
programs shall be allocated consistent with the priorities and matching
requirements established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW.
During the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be used
for the following activities: Conducting a study of whether dioxins occur in
fertilizers, soil amendments, and soils; reviewing applications for
registration of fertilizers; and conducting a study of plant uptake of metals.

(b) Funds may also be
appropriated to the department of health to implement programs to reduce
testing requirements under the federal safe drinking water act for public water
systems. The department of health shall reimburse the account from fees
assessed under RCW 70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.

(4) Except for unanticipated
receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, moneys in the state and local
toxics control accounts may be spent only after appropriation by statute.

(5) One percent of the
moneys deposited into the state and local toxics control accounts shall be
allocated only for public participation grants to persons who may be adversely
affected by a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to
not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these
grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations in the
investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases of hazardous
substances and to implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management
priorities. However, during the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, funding may not be
granted to entities engaged in lobbying activities, and applicants may not be
awarded grants if their cumulative grant awards under this section exceed two
hundred thousand dollars. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants
may be renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from
either account which are not expended at the close of any biennium shall revert
to the state toxics control account.

(6) No moneys deposited
into either the state or local toxics control account may be used for solid
waste incinerator feasibility studies, construction, maintenance, or operation.

(7) The department
shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and performance.

(8) During the
2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the state toxics
control account and the local toxics control account to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the accounts and
appropriations reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for
administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 929. RCW 70.146.030 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 7 s 922 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The water quality
account is hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be
used only in a manner consistent with this chapter. Moneys deposited in the
account shall be administered by the department of ecology and shall be subject
to legislative appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include tax
receipts as provided in RCW 82.24.027, 82.26.025, and 82.32.390, principal and
interest from the repayment of any loans granted pursuant to this chapter, and
any other moneys appropriated to the account by the legislature.

(2) The department may
use or permit the use of any moneys in the account to make grants or loans to
public bodies, including grants to public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any
case where federal, local, or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing
basis, for water pollution control facilities and activities, or for purposes
of assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in water pollution
control facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments made by a public
body to a service provider under a service agreement entered into pursuant to
RCW 70.150.060, within the purposes of this chapter and for related
administrative expenses. For the period July 1, 2001, to June 30, 2003, moneys
in the account may be used to process applications received by the department
that seek to make changes to or transfer existing water rights and for
grants to public bodies for watershed planning under chapter 90.82 RCW. No
more than three percent of the moneys deposited in the account may be used by
the department to pay for the administration of the grant and loan program
authorized by this chapter.

(3) Beginning with the
biennium ending June 30, 1997, the department shall present a biennial progress
report on the use of moneys from the account to the chairs of the senate committee
on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on
appropriations. The first report is due June 30, 1996, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31 of the odd-numbered year. The report
shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description, and amount of
the grant, loan, or both.

(4) ((During the
fiscal biennium ending June 30, 1997, moneys in the account may be transferred
by the legislature to the water right permit processing account.)) During
the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the water
quality account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the fund and appropriations reductions made by the 2002
supplemental appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 930. RCW 70.168.040 and 1997
c 331 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
emergency medical services and trauma care system trust account is hereby
created in the state treasury. Moneys shall be transferred to the emergency
medical services and trauma care system trust account from the public safety
education account or other sources as appropriated, and as collected under RCW
46.63.110(6) and 46.12.042. Disbursements shall be made by the department
subject to legislative appropriation. Expenditures may be made only for the
purposes of the state trauma care system under this chapter, including
emergency medical services, trauma care services, rehabilitative services, and
the planning and development of related services under this chapter and for
reimbursement by the department of social and health services for trauma care
services provided by designated trauma centers. During the 2001-2003 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the emergency medical services and
trauma care system trust account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 931. RCW 77.12.170 and 2001 c
253 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is
established in the state treasury the state wildlife fund which consists of
moneys received from:

(a) Rentals or
concessions of the department;

(b) The sale of real or
personal property held for department purposes;

(c) The sale of
licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by chapter 77.32 RCW and RCW
77.65.490, except annual resident adult saltwater and all shellfish licenses,
which shall be deposited into the state general fund;

(d) Fees for
informational materials published by the department;

(e) Fees for
personalized vehicle license plates as provided in chapter 46.16 RCW;

(f) Articles or
wildlife sold by the director under this title;

(g) Compensation for
damage to department property or wildlife losses or contributions, gifts, or
grants received under RCW 77.12.320 or 77.32.380;

(h) Excise tax on
anadromous game fish collected under chapter 82.27 RCW;

(i) The sale of
personal property seized by the department for fish, shellfish, or wildlife
violations; and

(j) The department's
share of revenues from auctions and raffles authorized by the commission.

(2) State and county
officers receiving any moneys listed in subsection (1) of this section shall
deposit them in the state treasury to be credited to the state wildlife fund.

During the 2001-2003
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the state wildlife fund to
the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
fund and appropriations reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations
act for administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 932. RCW 77.44.050 and 1999 c
235 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The warm water game
fish account is hereby created in the state wildlife fund. Moneys in the
account are subject to legislative appropriation and shall be used for the
purpose of funding the warm water game fish enhancement program, including the
development of warm water pond and lake habitat, culture of warm water game
fish, improvement of warm water fish habitat, management of warm water fish
populations, and other practical activities that will improve the fishing for
warm water fish. Funds for warm water game fish as provided in RCW 77.32.440
shall not serve as replacement funding for department-operated warm water fish
projects existing on December 31, 1994, except that an amount not to exceed
ninety-one thousand dollars may be used for warm water fish culture at the Rod
Meseberg warm water fish production facility during the biennium ending June
30, 2001. During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the warm water game fish account to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account and appropriations
reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for administrative
efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 933. RCW 79.24.580 and 2001 c
227 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

After deduction for
management costs as provided in RCW 79.64.040 and payments to towns under RCW
79.92.110(2), all moneys received by the state from the sale or lease of
state-owned aquatic lands and from the sale of valuable material from
state-owned aquatic lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement
account which is hereby created in the state treasury. After appropriation,
these funds shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for
the purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public purposes;
for providing and improving access to such lands; and for volunteer cooperative
fish and game projects.

In providing grants for
aquatic lands enhancement projects, the department shall require grant
recipients to incorporate the environmental benefits of the project into their
grant applications, and the department shall utilize the statement of
environmental benefits in its prioritization and selection process. The
department shall also develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures
to be used both for management and performance assessment of the grants. To
the extent possible, the department should coordinate its performance measure
system with other natural resource-related agencies as defined in RCW 43.41.270.
The department shall consult with affected interest groups in implementing this
section.

During the fiscal
biennium ending June 30, ((2001)) 2003, the funds may be
appropriated for boating safety((,)) and shellfish management,
enforcement, and enhancement ((and for developing and implementing plans for
population monitoring and restoration of native wild salmon stock)). During
the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the aquatic
lands enhancement account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the
excess fund balance of the account and appropriations reductions made by the
2002 supplemental appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and
savings.

Sec. 934. RCW 79A.05.215 and 1995
c 211 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The state parks renewal
and stewardship account is created in the state treasury. Except as otherwise
provided in this chapter, all receipts from user fees, concessions, leases, and
other state park-based activities shall be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used for operating state parks, developing
and renovating park facilities, undertaking deferred maintenance, enhancing
park stewardship, and other state park purposes. Expenditures from the account
may be made only after appropriation by the legislature. During the
2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the state parks
renewal and stewardship account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the appropriations reductions made by the 2002 supplemental
appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 935. RCW 80.01.080 and 2001 c
238 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

((The transportation
revolving fund and the public utilities revolving fund are abolished as of
April 1, 1949, and as of such date)) There is created in the state
treasury a (("))public service revolving fund(("
to which shall be transferred all moneys which then remain on hand to the
credit of the transportation revolving fund and the public utilities revolving
fund, subject, however, to outstanding warrants and other obligations
chargeable to appropriations made from such funds. From and after April 1,
1949,)). Regulatory fees payable by all types of public service
companies shall be deposited to the credit of the public service revolving
fund. Except for expenses payable out of the pipeline safety account, all
expense of operation of the Washington utilities and transportation commission
shall be payable out of the public service revolving fund.

During the 2001-2003
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public service revolving
fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the appropriations
reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for administrative
efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 936. RCW 82.29A.080 and 1985
c 57 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

The counties and cities
shall contract, prior to the effective date of an ordinance imposing a
leasehold excise tax, with the department of revenue for administration and
collection. The department of revenue shall deduct a percentage amount, as
provided by such contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes collected,
for administration and collection expenses incurred by the department. The
remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by RCW 82.29A.040 which is
collected by the department of revenue shall be deposited by the state
department of revenue in the local leasehold excise tax account hereby created
in the state treasury. Moneys in the local leasehold excise tax account may be
spent only for distribution to counties and cities imposing a leasehold excise
tax.

During the 2001-2003
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the local leasehold excise
tax account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the interest
earnings of the account.

Sec. 937. RCW 90.48.465 and 1998 c
262 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall establish annual fees to collect expenses for issuing and administering
each class of permits under RCW 90.48.160, 90.48.162, and 90.48.260. An
initial fee schedule shall be established by rule within one year of March 1,
1989, and thereafter the fee schedule shall be adjusted no more often than once
every two years. This fee schedule shall apply to all permits, regardless of
date of issuance, and fees shall be assessed prospectively. All fees charged
shall be based on factors relating to the complexity of permit issuance and
compliance and may be based on pollutant loading and toxicity and be designed
to encourage recycling and the reduction of the quantity of pollutants. Fees
shall be established in amounts to fully recover and not to exceed expenses
incurred by the department in processing permit applications and modifications,
monitoring and evaluating compliance with permits, conducting inspections, securing
laboratory analysis of samples taken during inspections, reviewing plans and
documents directly related to operations of permittees, overseeing performance
of delegated pretreatment programs, and supporting the overhead expenses that
are directly related to these activities.

(2) The annual fee paid
by a municipality, as defined in 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1362, for all domestic
wastewater facility permits issued under RCW 90.48.162 and 90.48.260 shall not
exceed the total of a maximum of fifteen cents per month per residence or
residential equivalent contributing to the municipality's wastewater system.
The department shall adopt by rule a schedule of credits for any municipality
engaging in a comprehensive monitoring program beyond the requirements imposed
by the department, with the credits available for five years from March 1,
1989, and with the total amount of all credits not to exceed fifty thousand
dollars in the five-year period.

(3) The department
shall ensure that indirect dischargers do not pay twice for the administrative
expense of a permit. Accordingly, administrative expenses for permits issued
by a municipality under RCW 90.48.165 are not recoverable by the department.

(4) In establishing
fees, the department shall consider the economic impact of fees on small
dischargers and the economic impact of fees on public entities required to
obtain permits for storm water runoff and shall provide appropriate
adjustments.

(5) The fee for an
individual permit issued for a dairy farm as defined under chapter 90.64 RCW
shall be fifty cents per animal unit up to one thousand one hundred sixty-seven
dollars for fiscal year 1998 and one thousand two hundred fourteen dollars for
fiscal year 1999. The fee for a general permit issued for a dairy farm as defined
under chapter 90.64 RCW shall be fifty cents per animal unit up to eight
hundred seventeen dollars for fiscal year 1998 and eight hundred fifty dollars
for fiscal year 1999. Thereafter, these fees may rise in accordance with the
fiscal growth factor as provided in chapter 43.135 RCW.

(6) All fees collected
under this section shall be deposited in the water quality permit account
hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be
appropriated only for purposes of administering permits under RCW 90.48.160,
90.48.162, and 90.48.260. During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the water quality permit account to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the appropriations reductions made by the
2002 supplemental appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and
savings.

(7) Beginning with the
biennium ending June 30, 1997, the department shall present a biennial progress
report on the use of moneys from the account to the legislature. The report
will be due December 31st of odd-numbered years. The report shall consist of
information on fees collected, actual expenses incurred, and anticipated
expenses for the current and following fiscal years.

Sec. 938. RCW 90.56.510 and 2000 c
69 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The oil spill
prevention account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from RCW
82.23B.020(2) shall be deposited in the account. Moneys from the account may
be spent only after appropriation. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. If, on the first day of any calendar
month, the balance of the oil spill response account is greater than nine
million dollars and the balance of the oil spill prevention account exceeds the
unexpended appropriation for the current biennium, then the tax under RCW
82.23B.020(2) shall be suspended on the first day of the next calendar month
until the beginning of the following biennium, provided that the tax shall not
be suspended during the last six months of the biennium. If the tax imposed
under RCW 82.23B.020(2) is suspended during two consecutive biennia, the
department shall by November 1st after the end of the second biennium,
recommend to the appropriate standing committees an adjustment in the tax
rate. ((For the biennium ending June 30, 1999, and the biennium ending June
30, 2001, the state treasurer may transfer a total of up to one million dollars
from the oil spill response account to the oil spill prevention account to
support appropriations made from the oil spill prevention account in the
omnibus appropriations act adopted not later than June 30, 1999.)) During
the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the oil spill
prevention account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the
appropriations reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for
administrative efficiencies and savings.

(2) Expenditures from
the oil spill prevention account shall be used exclusively for the
administrative costs related to the purposes of this chapter, and chapters
90.48, 88.40, and 88.46 RCW. Starting with the 1995-1997 biennium, the
legislature shall give activities of state agencies related to prevention of
oil spills priority in funding from the oil spill prevention account. Costs of
prevention include the costs of:

(a) Routine responses
not covered under RCW 90.56.500;

(b) Management and
staff development activities;

(c) Development of
rules and policies and the statewide plan provided for in RCW 90.56.060;

(d) Facility and vessel
plan review and approval, drills, inspections, investigations, enforcement, and
litigation;

(e) Interagency
coordination and public outreach and education;

(f) Collection and
administration of the tax provided for in chapter 82.23B RCW; and

(g) Appropriate travel,
goods and services, contracts, and equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
939. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 940. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End
of part)

INDEX

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE
COURTS.................................... 8

ATTORNEY GENERAL............................................... 17

BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS.......................... 86

BOARD OF TAX APPEALS........................................... 36

CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL...................................... 19

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 195

COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION............................... 103

COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS......................... 31

COMMISSION ON ASIAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS........................... 16

COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS................................. 30

COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT.................................. 8

CONSERVATION COMMISSION....................................... 115

CONTINGENCY POOL.............................................. 212

COURT OF APPEALS................................................ 7

CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION........................... 87

DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE..................................... 127

DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT....... 19

COUNTY ASSISTANCE............................................. 221

COUNTY CORPORATION ASSISTANCE................................. 221

MUNICIPAL CORPORATION ASSISTANCE.............................. 223

DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS...................................... 95

DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY......................................... 103

DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE............................... 116

DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION........................... 36

DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH........................................... 91

DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES............................. 38

DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES............................. 88

DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING....................................... 130

DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES............................... 123

DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL........................................ 30

DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS........................... 215

OPERATIONS..................................................... 31

DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE.......................................... 33

DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND.......................... 100

DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES....................... 45

ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM................. 82

AGING
AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM............................... 69

ALCOHOL
AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM............................ 76

CHILDREN
AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM........................... 46

DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM............................. 64

ECONOMIC
SERVICES PROGRAM...................................... 73

JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM................................ 50

MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM..................................... 77

MENTAL
HEALTH PROGRAM.......................................... 55

VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM.............................. 82

DEPARTMENT
OF VETERANS AFFAIRS................................. 90

EASTERN
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY................... 207

EASTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 195

ECONOMIC
AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL.......................... 28

EMPLOYEE
TRAVEL REDUCTION..................................... 212

EMPLOYMENT
SECURITY DEPARTMENT................................ 101

ENVIRONMENTAL
HEARINGS OFFICE................................. 115

EQUIPMENT
PURCHASE REDUCTION.................................. 212

GOVERNOR

COMPENSATION--INSURANCE
BENEFITS.............................. 213

GROWTH
PLANNING HEARINGS BOARD................................. 44

HIGHER
EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

FINANCIAL
AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS.............................. 200

POLICY
COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION........................ 199

HOME
CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY.................................... 91

HORSE
RACING COMMISSION........................................ 39

HOUSE
OF REPRESENTATIVES........................................ 2

HUMAN
RIGHTS COMMISSION........................................ 86

INCENTIVE
SAVINGS

FY
2002....................................................... 219

FY
2003....................................................... 220

INDETERMINATE
SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD............................ 90

INSURANCE
COMMISSIONER......................................... 38

INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION.................. 113

JOINT
LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE.................... 3

JOINT
LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE............................. 6

LAW
LIBRARY..................................................... 7

LEGISLATIVE
EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE..... 6

LIABILITY
ACCOUNT............................................. 233

LIQUOR
CONTROL BOARD........................................... 39

MILITARY
DEPARTMENT............................................ 41

OFFICE
OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS.............................. 29

OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT................................. 29

COMPENSATION
ACTIONS OF PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD............. 218

DIGITAL
GOVERNMENT REVOLVING ACCOUNT.......................... 213

EDUCATION
TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT........................ 218

EXTRAORDINARY
CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS.......................... 220

FIRE
CONTINGENCY POOL......................................... 211

PENSION
SAVINGS............................................... 216

OFFICE
OF PUBLIC DEFENSE....................................... 11

OFFICE
OF THE GOVERNOR......................................... 12

OFFICE
OF THE STATE ACTUARY..................................... 6

PERSONNEL
APPEALS BOARD........................................ 31

PUBLIC
DISCLOSURE COMMISSION................................... 13

PUBLIC
EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION......................... 43

REVOLVING
FUND REDUCTIONS..................................... 211

SALARY
COST OF LIVING ADJUSTMENT.............................. 216

SECRETARY
OF STATE............................................. 13

SENATE.......................................................... 2

SENTENCING
GUIDELINES COMMISSION.............................. 100

SPOKANE
INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE..... 206

STATE
AUDITOR.................................................. 16

STATE
BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES.............. 189

STATE
BOARD OF EDUCATION...................................... 182

STATE
CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER.............................. 44

STATE
GAMBLING COMMISSION...................................... 30

STATE
HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY.................................... 84

STATE
INVESTMENT BOARD......................................... 33

STATE
PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION......................... 112

STATE
PATROL.................................................. 131

STATE
SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND.................................... 207

STATE
SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF..................................... 207

STATE
TREASURER................................................ 16

BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST............................. 209, 210

STATE
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION............................... 235

TRANSFERS..................................................... 236

STATUTE
LAW COMMITTEE........................................... 7

SUNDRY
CLAIMS................................................. 233

SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION..................... 134, 180

BASIC
EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION......................... 149

EDUCATION
REFORM PROGRAMS..................................... 168

EDUCATIONAL
SERVICE DISTRICTS................................. 165

ELEMENTARY
AND SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT............... 168

GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT......................................... 142

INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS.............................. 166

LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM................................... 176

LOCAL
EFFORT ASSISTANCE....................................... 165

LOCAL
ENHANCEMENT FUNDS....................................... 178

NO
CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT...................................... 168

PROGRAMS
FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS.......................... 167

PUPIL
TRANSPORTATION.......................................... 157

SCHOOL
EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS...................... 155

SPECIAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS.................................... 158

STATE
FLEXIBLE EDUCATION FUNDS................................ 179

STUDENT
ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM................................... 180

TRAFFIC
SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAMS............................. 164

TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS............................... 175

SUPREME
COURT................................................... 7

THE
EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE................................... 195

UNIVERSITY
OF WASHINGTON...................................... 192

UTILITIES
AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION........................ 40

WASHINGTON
STATE ARTS COMMISSION.............................. 206

WASHINGTON
STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY........................... 206

WASHINGTON
STATE LIBRARY...................................... 206

WASHINGTON
STATE LOTTERY....................................... 30

WASHINGTON
STATE UNIVERSITY................................... 194

WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 199

WORK
FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD.......... 205

---
END ---