BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.380 and 1995 c
269 s 2501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state
superintendent of public instruction shall adopt and enforce rules not
inconsistent with the law of this state to govern the design, marking, and mode
of operation of all school buses owned and operated by any school district or
privately owned and operated under contract or otherwise with any school
district in this state for the transportation of school children. ((Those))

(2) School districts
shall not be prohibited from placing or displaying a flag of the United States
on a school bus when it does not interfere with the vehicle's safe operation.
The state superintendent of public instruction shall adopt and enforce rules
not inconsistent with the law of this state to govern the size, placement, and
display of the flag of the United States on all school buses referenced in
subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Rules
shall by reference be made a part of any such contract or other agreement with
the school district. Every school district, its officers and employees, and
every person employed under contract or otherwise by a school district is
subject to such rules. It is unlawful for any officer or employee of any
school district or for any person operating any school bus under contract with
any school district to violate any of the provisions of such rules.

--- END ---