BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 47.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must
adopt by rule a comprehensive program that allows private entities to operate
state-owned safety rest areas.

(2) The program to
allow private entities to operate state-owned safety rest areas must meet the
following criteria:

(a) In addition to
commercial services offered, privately operated safety rest areas must also
offer equivalent services, at no charge, currently provided by state-operated
safety rest areas;

(b) The department must
lease the rights to operate safety rest areas for a commercially reasonable
period of time, but no longer than twenty years;

(c) The department may
lease the right to operate either individual safety rest areas, or groups of
safety rest areas, or both, to a private entity;

(d) Before entering
into a lease with an entity, the department must contact food or beverage
retailers, restaurants, grocery and convenience stores, lodging, and service
station businesses within one mile from the highway exits immediately before
and after the rest stop location, in each direction of traffic, and allow these
businesses an opportunity to bid or otherwise negotiate with the department to
operate the facility. If no business responds with a reasonable bid or offer
within sixty days, the department must open up the bid or negotiation process
to all interested entities;

(e) The department must
take all necessary action to ensure the most favorable lease rates for the
state, whether by bid or other reasonable manner, and to require the lessee to
enter into any other contract or agreement to protect the state and its
citizens from commercial harm or other type of harm; and

(f) A
lease must allow a nonprofit organization that had previously conducted
fund-raising activities on the premises to continue such activities.
Alternatively, at the election of the nonprofit organizations, one percent of
gross sales must be divided between all of the nonprofit organizations that had
conducted fund-raising activities on the premises within the twenty-four months
prior to the effective date of the lease. Payments must be calculated and paid
every six months on a pro rata basis, whereby each nonprofit organization is
entitled to a share of the sales equal to the percentage of time that
organization actually spent working on the premises relative to any other
nonprofit organization that also conducted fund-raising activities on the
premises for the twenty-four months prior to the effective date of the lease.

--- END ---