BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that it is critical for the state to protect every citizen of the state from
fraud and invasion of privacy. The legislature further finds that fishing and
hunting activities are family friendly activities and must not be hindered.

The legislature
therefore declares that applicants for fishing or hunting licenses from the
state of Washington are not required to provide social security numbers to the
state.

Sec. 2. RCW 26.23.150 and 1999 c
138 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to assist in
child support enforcement as required by federal law, all applicants for an
original, replacement, or renewal of a professional license, commercial
driver's license, or occupational license((, or recreational license))
must furnish the licensing agency with the applicant's social security number,
which shall be recorded on the application. No applicant for an original,
replacement, or renewal noncommercial driver's license is required to furnish
the licensing agency with the applicant's social security number for purposes
of assisting in child support enforcement prior to the time necessary to comply
with the federal deadline. The licensing agencies collecting social security
numbers shall not display the social security number on the license document.
Social security numbers collected by licensing agencies shall not be disclosed
except as required by state or federal law or under RCW 26.23.120.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---