BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to:

(a) The sale of or
charge made for tangible personal property consumed or for labor and services
rendered in respect to the construction of new buildings on school district
property for use as a nonprofit youth center; and

(b) Sales of machinery
and equipment related to the buildings exempt under (a) of this subsection.

(2) Subsection (1) of
this section only applies to labor and services, machinery and equipment, or
other tangible personal property that is acquired before the construction is
complete.

(3) A sales and use tax
exemption certificate must be obtained from the department to be exempt under
this section. The application must be made to the department in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The application must contain information regarding
the location of the youth center, the size of the youth center, and any other
information required by the department. The department must rule on the
application within twenty days. The certificate applies only to expenditures
made after approval by the department.

(4) For purposes of
this section and section 2 of this act:

(a) "Youth
center" means any private center that provides, on a regular basis,
recreational, vocational, academic, or social services activities for persons
younger than twenty-one years old or for those persons and their families.

(b) "Machinery and
equipment" means tangible personal property of a capital nature which has
a useful life of one year or more that is of the type that would be depreciated
for federal income tax purposes under section 168 of the federal internal
revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 168), including such items as furniture,
computers, and tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or
component thereof.

(c)
"Nonprofit" means an organization exempt from federal income tax
under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C.
Sec. 501(c)(3)).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of tangible personal property
for the construction of a new nonprofit youth center on school district
property.

(2) The provisions and
requirements of section 1 of this act apply to this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---