BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The sum of two million
one hundred eighty‑eight thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the
general fund to the emergency management division of the Washington state
military department for the purposes of this act. The appropriated funds shall
be distributed by the emergency management division as grants to city fire
departments and fire protection districts that have purchased thermal imaging
cameras. A grant to a city fire department or fire protection district shall
not exceed fifty percent of the cost of purchase by a fire department or
district. Grants shall be based upon applications submitted to the emergency
management division and distributed throughout the state in a fair and rational
manner.

---
END ---