BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART 1

SUPPLEMENTAL CAPITAL BUDGET

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. A supplemental capital
budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act,
the several dollar amounts herein specified, or so much thereof as shall be
sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and
authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period ending June
30, 2003, out of the several funds specified in this act.

Sec. 102. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 117
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY,
TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Housing Assistance,
Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (02‑4‑010)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) At least $9,000,000
of the new appropriation from the state taxable building construction
account is provided solely for weatherization administered through the energy
matchmakers program.

(2) $5,000,000 of the
new appropriation from the state taxable building construction account
is provided solely to promote development of safe and affordable housing units
for persons eligible for services from the division of developmental
disabilities within the department of social and health services.

(3) $2,000,000 of the
appropriation from the state taxable building construction account is
provided solely for grants to nonprofit organizations and public housing
authorities for revolving loan, self-help housing programs for low and moderate
income families.

(4) $1,000,000 of the
new appropriation from the state taxable building construction account
is provided solely for shelters, transitional housing, or other housing facilities
for victims of domestic violence.

(5) Reappropriations in
this section shall not be included in the annual funds available for
determining the administrative costs authorized under RCW 43.185.050.

Appropriation:

State Taxable
Building Construction Account‑-

State.................................... $ 60,000,000

Washington Housing
Trust Account................ $ 5,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 65,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 200,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 265,000,000

Sec. 103. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 118
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Burke Museum ((Governance
and Siting)) Expansion Study (00-2-012)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funds are provided
for a study of the ((governance of the Burke museum and for an examination
of the)) potential expansion of the museum facility including siting
issues. The study shall be facilitated by the department in consultation
with the University of Washington((, the department of community, trade,
and economic development's tourism and economic development units, the
executive director of the Washington state historical society, the city of
Seattle, King county, and members of the community and businesses from various
geographic regions of the state)) and other interested public agencies
and community groups. The department shall provide a report to the
legislature by June 30, ((2002)) 2003, outlining ((funding))
strategies for an expanded state natural history museum that recognizes ((the))
limited state resources ((for capital facilities programmatic enhancements,
and outlines)) and alternative funding resources and partners.

(2) A maximum of
$150,000 from the appropriation in this section may be used for the
preservation, storage, and presentation of museum collections or for matching
other funding sources for the preservation, storage, and presentation of museum
collections.

(3) The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of
section 906(2)(b) of this act.

Reappropriation:

University of
Washington Building

Account‑-State.......................... $ 350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
104. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, & ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community Economic
Revitalization (CERB)(03-4-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriation from the public facility construction loan revolving account
shall be used solely to provide loans to eligible local governments and grants
to the extent permissible by law. The department shall ensure that all
principal and interest payments from loans made on moneys from this account are
paid into this account.

Appropriation:

Public Facility
Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State........................... $ 3,656,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,656,000

Sec. 105. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 147
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT

Budget System
Improvements (02-1-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

Funds are provided
solely for the following studies and activities:

(1) Budget evaluation
study team reviews of project proposals;

(2) The compilation of
benchmarking data and the development of standards for construction costs;

(3) Contracts
associated with a higher education facility financial responsibility study to
be conducted in conjunction with the higher education coordinating board and
the state board for community and technical colleges that shall provide
guidelines for project cost sharing between state and federal funds,
institutional funds, student fees and charges, and private donations; and

(4) Other studies and
system improvements planned in consultation with the house capital budget
committee and the senate committee on ways and means.

(5) $125,000 of the
appropriation in this section is provided solely to support the office of
financial management's reporting requirements under RCW 43.88.160 and 43.82.150.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((200,000))

325,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,200,000

TOTAL.................................... $ ((1,400,000))

1,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
106. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION

Capitol Campus Parking
(03-2-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following condition and limitation: The
department shall designate parking spaces on the west capitol campus, except
for public parking, as leased parking per WAC 236-12-290(1)(b)(ii).

Appropriation:

State Vehicle Parking
Account‑-State............. $ 531,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 531,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
107. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Engineering and
Architectural Services - Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 750,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL....................... ............ $ 750,000

Sec. 108. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 183
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Bremerton Readiness Center
(02-2-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902
and 903 of this act.

(2) No money shall be
committed or expended from the state building construction account until the
general fund‑‑federal construction funds are received and allotted
in accordance with section 903 of this act.

(3) In addition to the
annual project progress reporting requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the
department will file quarterly project progress reports with the office of
financial management. These reports will contain local, state, and federal
funding reconciliations and balance sheets for this project and will detail any
federal intentions on future readiness center projects.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal...................... $ 5,446,000

State Building
Construction

Account‑‑State...................... $ ((4,728,000))

6,377,000

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ ((10,174,000))

11,823,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 1,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 0

TOTAL............................... $ ((11,174,000))

12,823,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
109. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital
- Power Plant Revisions and Smokestack Removal (03-1-012)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,080,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,080,000

Sec. 110. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 257
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Expand Coyote Ridge
Corrections Center (98‑2‑011)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: To the
extent that funding for the design of the expansion at Coyote Ridge corrections
center is not necessary as a result of sentencing legislation passed during the
2002 legislative session, the department may expend up to $264,000 on the
predesign for the potential renovation or expansion of existing facilities to
accommodate inmate population growth in higher custody levels.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑‑State.. $ 447,348

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑

State............................... $ ((1,150,000))

1,414,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 802,069

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ ((227,763,000))

227,499,348

TOTAL............................... $ 230,162,417

Sec. 111. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 270
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Monroe Corrections
Center - 100 Bed Intensive Management and Segregation Units (00‑2‑008)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑

State............................... $ 40,665

Appropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal...................... $ ((18,162,205))

11,933,692

State Building
Construction Account‑‑

State............................... $ ((2,521,795))

8,750,308

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ 20,684,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 149,335

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 17,727,000

TOTAL............................... $ 38,601,000

Sec. 112. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 278
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Statewide: Department
of Corrections Emergency Funds (02‑1‑028)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State......... $ ((1,700,000))

2,120,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-

State............................... $ 430,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 901,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 7,800,000

TOTAL............................... $ ((10,401,000))

11,251,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
113. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Coyote Ridge
Corrections Center - 210 Emergency Beds (03-2-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,394,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,394,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
114. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

McNeil Island
Corrections Center (MICC): Water Tank Replacement (03-1-022)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,394,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL........ ........................... $ 1,394,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
115. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

McNeil Island
Corrections Center (MICC): Fire Audit Requirements (03-2-001)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 140,500

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 140,500

Sec. 116. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 303
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Local Toxics Grants to
Locals for Cleanup and Prevention (88-2-008)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
in this section is provided solely for projects under contract on or before
June 30, 2001. Reappropriated funds not associated with contracted projects
shall lapse on June 30, 2001. The office of financial management may grant
waivers from this lapse requirement for specific projects upon findings of
exceptional circumstances after notification of the chairs of the house of
representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means committee.

(2) The department
shall submit a report to the office of financial management and house of
representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means committee by
December 1, 2001, listing all projects funded from this section.

(3) The department of
ecology shall offer the port of Ridgefield a funding package totaling
$8,400,000 to conduct an emergency cleanup action on port-owned property. A
portion of the appropriation in this section shall be combined with funds from
the appropriation to the department from the state toxics control account in
the omnibus operating budget for the 2001-2003 biennium to provide a funding
package consisting of sixty-five percent grant and thirty-five percent loan.
The terms of the loan shall provide for repayment by the port of Ridgefield
commencing ten years from the effective date of this section and is contingent
upon an independent financial audit conducted at the direction of the
department to determine the port's ability to repay the loan. It is the intent
of the legislature to support necessary action by the port of Ridgefield to
protect public health and the environment without jeopardizing the port's
financial standing.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control
Account‑-State........ $ 20,749,772

Appropriation:

Local Toxics Control
Account‑-State........ $ ((50,000,000))

68,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 84,103,008

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 0

TOTAL............................... $ ((154,852,780))

173,352,780

Sec. 117. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 311
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account (02-4-002)

Appropriation:

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

State............................... $ ((113,835,792))

157,135,792

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

Federal............................. $ 45,277,010

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ ((159,112,802))

202,412,802

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 467,108,040

TOTAL............................... $ ((626,220,842))

669,520,842

Sec. 118. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 313
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Referendum 38 Water
Supply Facilities (02-4-006)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $250,000 of
the appropriation is provided solely to study the development of the Lake
Wenatchee water storage project.

(2) $300,000 of the
appropriation is provided solely to the department of ecology to develop a plan
for restoration of stream flow and fish passage in Manastash creek, Kittitas
county, through the conversion of surface water irrigation diversions to ground
water withdrawals.

Appropriation:

State and Local
Improvements Revolving

Account (Water
Supply Facilities)‑-

State............................... $ 6,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 12,000,000

TOTAL............................... $ 18,000,000

Sec. 119. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 315
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water
Fund (02-4-007)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $15,097,000 of
the water quality account appropriation is provided for the extended grant
payment to Metro/King county.

(2) Up to $10,000,000
of the water quality account appropriation is provided for the extended grant
payment to Spokane for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.

(3) $2,000,000 of the
water quality account--state appropriation is provided for water quality
facility grants for communities with a population of less than 5,000. The
department shall give priority consideration to: (a) Communities subject to a
regulatory order from the department of ecology for noncompliance with water
quality regulations; (b) projects for which design work has been completed; and
(c) projects with a local match from reasonable water quality rates and
charges.

(4) $250,000 is
provided solely for a water reclamation project for the city of Pullman and
Washington State University; the appropriation in this subsection (4) does not
imply a commitment of future funding for this project to either the city of
Pullman or Washington State University.

(5) The remaining
appropriation in this section is provided for statewide water quality
implementation and planning grants and loans. The department shall give
priority consideration to projects located in basins with critical or depressed
salmonid stocks.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction

Account‑-State...................... $ 9,525,000

Water Quality Account‑-State............... $ ((50,000,000))

40,475,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 208,000,000

TOTAL............................... $ 258,000,000

Sec. 120. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 344
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Boating Facilities
Projects (02-4-001)

Appropriation:

((Recreation
Resources Account‑-State...... $ 8,318,013))

State Building
Construction

Account‑-State...................... $ 6,934,013

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 40,300,368

TOTAL............................... $ ((48,618,381))

47,234,381

Sec. 121. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 346
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Nonhighway Road and
Off-Road Vehicle Activities (NOVA) (02-4-002)

(1) The appropriation
in this section for the nonhighway and off-road vehicle program under RCW
46.09.170(1)(d)(i) is subject to the following conditions and limitations: ((Fifty
percent)) A portion of the new appropriation ((is provided solely))
may be used for grants to projects to research, develop, publish, and distribute
informational guides and maps of nonhighway and off-road vehicle trails and
associated facilities meeting the requirements, guidelines, spirit, and intent
of the federal Americans with disabilities act.

(2) The appropriation
in this section for the nonhighway and off-road vehicle program under RCW
46.09.170(1)(d)(ii) is subject to the following conditions and limitations:
The portion of the new appropriation that applies to grants for capital
facilities ((is provided solely)) may be used for grants to
projects that meet the requirements, guidelines, spirit, and intent of the
federal Americans with disabilities act and do not compromise or impair
sensitive natural resources. The portion of the new appropriation that applies
to grants for management, maintenance, and operation of existing off-road
vehicle recreation facilities may be used to bring the facilities into
compliance with the requirements, guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal
Americans with disabilities act.

(3) The appropriation
in this section for the nonhighway and off-road vehicle program under RCW
46.09.170(1)(d)(iii) is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (a)
$175,000 is provided solely for the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation to contract with an independent entity to study the source and make
recommendations on the distribution and use of funds provided to off-road
vehicle and nonhighway road recreational activities under RCW 46.09.170. The
study shall determine the relative portion of the motor vehicle fuel tax
revenues that are attributable to vehicles operating off-road or on nonhighway
roads for recreational purposes as provided in RCW 46.09.170. The study shall
include the types of vehicles and location of their use, the types of recreational
activities, the types of recreational facilities used, and the recreational use
of forest roads relative to other, nonrecreational uses. The interagency
committee for outdoor recreation shall review the analysis and submit a report
to the standing committees of the legislature, including recommendations
regarding amendments to RCW 46.09.170 to: (((a))) (i) Allocate
revenues consistent with the relative proportion of the uses generating such
revenues, and (((b))) (ii) ensure funding for existing off-road
vehicle facilities operated by the state parks and recreation commission and
local governments. The report shall be submitted no later than December 1,
2002. (b) Funds may be expended for nonhighway road recreation facilities
which may include recreational trails that are accessed by nonhighway roads and
are intended solely for nonmotorized recreational uses.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,095,000

NOVA Program Account‑-State..................... $ 2,432,551

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 5,527,551

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 23,559,218

TOTAL.................................... $ 29,086,769

Sec. 122. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 348
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Washington Wildlife and
Recreation Program (02-4-003)

The appropriation in
this section for the wildlife and recreation program under chapter 43.99A RCW
and RCW 43.99A.040 is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The new
appropriation is provided for the approved list of projects included in LEAP
capital document No. 2001-24, as developed on June 7, 2001, and LEAP capital
document No. 2002-21, as developed on February 20, 2002.

(2) The department of
natural resources shall manage lands acquired through project No. 00-1427
"North Bay NAP" as a natural resources conservation area under
chapter 79.71 RCW.

Appropriation:

Outdoor Recreation
Account‑-State............... $ 22,500,000

Habitat Conservation
Account‑-State............. $ 22,500,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 45,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 180,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 225,000,000

Sec. 123. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 350
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Land and Water
Conservation Fund (LWCF) (02-4-005)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,500,000 of the
recreation resources account‑‑federal is appropriated for projects
chosen by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation.

(2) By January 1, 2002,
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall provide a report to the
legislature that:

(a) Describes those
projects funded subject to subsection (1) of this section; and

(b) Recommends
legislation creating a competitive process for the selection of projects that
will result in a list of projects to be submitted to the legislature for its
approval.

Appropriation:

Recreation Resources
Account‑-Federal........... $ ((2,500,000))

7,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ ((2,500,000))

7,500,000

Sec. 124. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 354
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Salmon Recovery
(02-4-007)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Activities funded
through grants provided in this section shall be consistent with the salmon
recovery funding board's goals, mission, and responsibilities.

(2) Jobs for the
environment projects submitted by lead entities are eligible to receive
funding, including wages for jobs for the environment participants.

(3) The water quality
account appropriation is provided solely to fund grants to lead entities
established under chapter 77.85 RCW or watershed planning units established
under chapter 90.82 RCW that agree to coordinate the development of
comprehensive local and regional salmon recovery plans.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal...................... $ ((27,642,000))

48,642,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State. $ ((28,000,000))

27,000,000

Water Quality
Account‑-State............... $ 1,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ ((55,642,000))

76,642,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 264,000,000

TOTAL............................... $ ((318,189,000))

340,642,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
125. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Firearms and Archery
Range (FARR) Program (02-0-001)

Appropriation:

Firearms Range Account‑-State.............. $ 400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 0

TOTAL............................... $ 400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
126. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Maury Island Community
Facility Development (02-S-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to King county to
develop and construct community facilities on Maury Island. The appropriation
is contingent upon the county receiving matching funds greater than one hundred
percent of the appropriation from each of federal government, local government,
and private sources. If matching funds are not received by January 15, 2003,
the appropriation in this section shall lapse.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction

Account‑-State...................... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 0

TOTAL............................... $ 500,000

Sec. 127. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 387
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hatchery Reform
Facility Retrofits (02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal...................... $ ((10,000,000))

2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 60,000,000

TOTAL............................... $ ((70,000,000))

62,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
128. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Deep Water Slough
Restoration (98-2-021)

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal...................... $ 155,800

State Building
Construction Account‑-State. $ 407,000

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ 562,800

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 0

TOTAL............................... $ 562,800

Sec. 129. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 388
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Forest and Fish Road
Upgrade and Abandonment on Agency Lands (02‑1‑003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal...................... $ ((1,900,000))

200,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State. $ 500,000

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ ((2,400,000))

700,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 11,600,000

TOTAL............................... $ ((14,000,000))

12,300,000

Sec. 130. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 390
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Facility and
Infrastructure Standards and Renovations (02-1-009)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) $305,000 of the
appropriation in this section shall be used to replace or renovate the
caretaker residence and construct pheasant rearing pens at the Lewis county
game farm.

(3) The department
shall expend ((the)) $300,000 ((wildlife)) of the state
building construction account‑‑state appropriation to construct
a capture and acclimation pond at Grandy Creek.

(4) $871,000 of the
state building construction account‑‑state appropriation is
provided solely for renovation and reconstruction of the Samish hatchery.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal...................... $ ((3,100,000))

700,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local................ $ ((1,500,000))

350,000

((Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account‑-State. $ 150,000))

State Building
Construction Account‑-State. $ ((7,571,000))

8,021,000

((Wildlife Account‑-State.................. $ 300,000))

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ ((12,621,000))

10,221,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 46,420,000

TOTAL............................... $ ((58,741,000))

56,641,000

Sec. 131. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 392
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Endangered Species Act
Compliance on Agency Lands (02-2-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and 906
of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal...................... $ ((8,800,000))

4,300,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State. $ 1,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ ((9,800,000))

5,300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 39,200,000

TOTAL............................... $ ((49,000,000))

44,500,000

Sec. 132. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 394
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Commercial and
Recreational Customer Satisfaction Improvements (02‑2‑006)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

((Warm Water Game
Fish Account‑-State........... $ 560,000

Wildlife Account‑-State......................... $ 500,000

Subtotal
Appropriation))

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,060,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,700,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,760,000

Sec. 133. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 396
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Watchable Fish and
Wildlife and Recreation Sites (02-2-007)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

((Wildlife)) State
Building Construction

Account‑-State.................................. $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,628,000

TOTAL............. ...................... $ 8,628,000

Sec. 134. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 397
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Partnership
Improvements with Internal and External Customers (02‑2-008)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) Expenditures of the
appropriation in this section for fencing shall comply with chapter 16.60 RCW.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal...................... $ 4,000,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local................ $ 2,000,000

((Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account

‑-State............................. $ 150,000))

State Building
Construction Account‑-State. $ ((400,000))

550,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-State........ $ 50,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-Federal..... $ 3,725,400

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-

Private/Local....................... $ 50,000

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ 10,375,400

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 46,824,700

TOTAL............................... $ 57,200,100

Sec. 135. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 416
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Land Bank (02‑2‑013)

Appropriation:

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State... $ ((4,000,000))

10,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 18,000,000

TOTAL............................... $ ((22,000,000))

28,000,000

Sec. 136. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 420
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Marine Station Public
Access (02‑2‑019)

Appropriation:

((Aquatic Lands
Enhancement)) State

Building
Construction Account‑‑State..... $ 175,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,175,000

Sec. 137. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 425
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Grants (02‑4‑018)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is provided for a list of projects in LEAP capital document No.
2001-44, as developed on June 7, 2001.

(2) The department
shall submit a list of recommended projects to be funded from the aquatic lands
enhancement account in the 2003‑2005 capital budget. The list shall
result from a competitive grants program developed by the department based
upon, at a minimum: A uniform criteria for the selection of projects and
awarding of grants for up to fifty percent of the total project cost; local
community support for the project; and a statewide geographic distribution of
projects. The list of projects shall be submitted to the office of financial
management by September 15, 2002.

Appropriation:

((Aquatic Lands
Enhancement)) State

Building
Construction Account‑‑State..... $ 5,565,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 22,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,565,000

Sec. 138. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 505
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL

Spokane Crime
Laboratory - Design (02‑2‑013)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((400,000))

635,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ ((7,950,000))

7,715,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,350,000

Sec. 139. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 506
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL

Vancouver Crime
Laboratory - Predesign (02‑2‑010)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((130,000))

365,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ ((7,400,000))

7,165,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,530,000

Sec. 140. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 602
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE BOARD OF
EDUCATION

State School
Construction Assistance Grants (02-4-001) (03-4-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $200,000 from this
appropriation is provided to fund up to two FTEs in the office of state fire
marshal to exclusively review K‑12 construction documents, provide
on-site construction inspections, and final acceptance inspections for fire
and life safety in accordance with the state building code. It is the intent
of this appropriation to provide these services only to those districts that
are located in counties without qualified review and inspection
capabilities and that request such services.

(2) Of the fiscal year
2002 appropriation, $80,000 is provided solely for skills centers study and
survey.

(3) For state
assistance grants starting July 1, 2001, for purposes of calculating square
foot eligibility, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced by fifty
percent.

(4) $5,400,000 from
this appropriation is provided for skills centers capital improvements. Skills
centers shall submit a budget plan to the state board of education and the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature for proposed expenditures and
the proposed expenditures shall conform with state board of education rules and
procedures for reimbursement of capital items. Funds not expended by June 30,
2003, shall lapse.

(5)(((a) $30,530,000
of this appropriation is provided solely to enhance the state contribution as
follows:

(i) For the state
board to increase the eligible square feet allocation by 1.5 square feet for
grades 1-12; and

(ii) For the state
board to increase the area cost allowance by $8 per square foot for grades
K-12.

(b) If chapter
. . . (House Bill No. 2173), Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess. is not
enacted by June 30, 2001, both the appropriation and the state board's
authority to increase the eligible square feet and area cost allowance in this
subsection (5) shall lapse)) Prior
to issuance of superintendent of public instruction form D4 (project approval
for districts) to a school district, the regional coordinators must validate
the study and survey information related to building conditions and enrollment
projections submitted by the school district requesting state matching funds no
later than thirty working days after receipt of the study and survey. The
validation process must include an on-site evaluation.

(6) The reappropriation
in this section is provided solely for school construction projects that have
received superintendent of public instruction form D10 (grant of authority to
enter into contracts) on or before June 30, 2002. Reappropriated funds not
associated with these projects lapse June 30, 2002.

Reappropriation:

Common School
Construction

Account‑-State
(FY 2002) (02-4-001). $ 100,677,925

Appropriation:

Common School
Construction

Account‑-State
(FY 2002) (02-4-001). $ ((212,040,308))

12,560,167

Common School
Construction

Account‑-State
(FY 2003) (03-4-001). $ ((226,846,421))

231,683,987

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 1,831,522,031

TOTAL............................... $ ((2,269,909,260))

2,176,444,110

NEW SECTION. Sec.
141. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure Savings
(03-1-001)

Projects that are
completed in accordance with section 915 of this act may have their remaining
funds transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

Sec. 142. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 624
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Bothell 2A/Cascadia
Community College (00-2-015)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under sections 902
through 904 of this act. No money from this reappropriation may be expended
that would be inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating
board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of
financial management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-

State............................... $ ((29,123,099))

8,666,030

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ ((20,976,901))

38,183,970

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 0

TOTAL............................... $ ((50,100,000))

46,850,000

Sec. 143. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 661
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Vancouver -
Multimedia/Electronic Communication Classroom Building: (02-2-907)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902
through 904 of this act. No money from the appropriation may be expended that
would be inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education
coordinating board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the
office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((12,900,000

Washington State
University Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 3,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................. $)) 15,900,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 600,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,500,000

Sec. 144. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 755
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Columbia Basin College
- Electrical Substation (((99-H-004))) (99-1-004)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 770,134

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 229,866

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

Sec. 145. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 784
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Cascadia Community
College: Development (00-2-501)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 through 904, and 906 of this act. No money may be expended that would be
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating
board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of
financial management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-

State............................... $ ((26,581,595))

7,904,031

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ ((23,518,405))

38,945,969

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 0

TOTAL............................... $ ((50,100,000))

46,850,000

Sec. 146. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 799
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle Community
College ‑ Building A: Replacement (02‑1‑217)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

((Community and
Technical College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State)) State Building

Construction
Account‑-State.............. $ 5,477,400

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,477,400

Sec. 147. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 803
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce College Fort
Steilacoom ‑ Portables: Replacement (02‑1‑223)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

((Community and
Technical College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State)) State Building

Construction
Account‑-State.............. $ 2,452,100

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,452,100

Sec. 148. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 804
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lower Columbia College ‑
Physical Science Portables: Replacement (02‑1‑226)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

((Community and
Technical College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State)) State Building

Construction
Account‑-State.............. $ 1,959,800

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,959,800

Sec. 149. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 813
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Grays Harbor Community
College ‑ Library: Renovation (02‑1‑311)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

((Community and
Technical College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State)) State Building

Construction
Account‑-State.............. $ 4,579,500

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,579,500

Sec. 150. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 824
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Technology Institute
Partner College Computer Labs (((01-S-003))) (01-2-689)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to construct and equip three computer science and
language labs, an approximate size being 1,200 square feet, one at each of the
following college districts: Highline, Olympic, and South Puget Sound.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,500,000

Sec. 151. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 828
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma Science
Building: New Facility (((01-S-001))) (01-2-687)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to conduct a predesign of the project described in
this section in accordance with the predesign manual published by the office of
financial management. Future appropriations for this project are subject to
the submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,300,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,400,000

Sec. 152. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 829
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Green River Community
College - Sciences Building: New Facility (((01-S-002))) (01-2-688)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to conduct a predesign of the project described in
this section in accordance with the predesign manual published by the office of
financial management. Future appropriations for this project are subject to
the submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,300,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
153. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Infrastructure Savings
(03-1-001)

Projects that are
completed in accordance with section 915 of this act may have their remaining
funds transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

Sec. 154. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 907
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

ACQUISITION OF
PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The following agencies
may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency,
appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more
than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this
section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option
available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements,
lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts
using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of
the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract
may be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract to the extent
provided in the financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

The director of general
administration shall ensure that the clustering of state facilities and the
collocation and consolidation of state agencies take place where such
configurations are economical and consistent with agency space needs. Agencies
shall assist the department of general administration with facility collocation
and consolidation efforts.

State agencies may
enter into agreements with the department of general administration and the
state treasurer's office to develop requests to the legislature for acquisition
of properties and facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may
include charges for services rendered.

(1) Secretary of state:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $13,582,200 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct a
regional archives building in eastern Washington to be sited on the Eastern
Washington University campus in Cheney.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $653,800 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase technology
equipment and software for an electronic data archive, provided that authority
to expend funding for acquisition of technology equipment and software
associated with the electronic data archive is conditioned on compliance with
section 902 of the 2001-2003 operating budget bill (information services
projects).

(2) Department of
general administration:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $3,956,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to expand the existing Isabella
Bush records center in Tumwater for use by state agencies.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $35,656,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to purchase two existing
office buildings and associated land in Tacoma for use by the department of
social and health services.

(c) Enter into a
financing contract for an amount approved by the office of financial management
for costs and financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94
RCW to lease develop or lease purchase a state office building of 150,000 to
200,000 square feet on state-owned property in Tumwater according to the terms
of the agreement with the Port of Olympia when the property was acquired or
within the preferred development/leasing areas in Thurston county. The
building shall be constructed and financed so that agency occupancy costs will
not exceed comparable private market rental rates. The comparable general
office space rate shall be calculated based on the three latest Thurston county
leases of new space of at least 100,000 rentable square feet adjusted for
inflation as determined by the department of general administration. The
department of general administration shall coordinate with potential state agency
tenants whose current lease expire near the time of occupancy so that buyout of
current leases do not add to state expense. The office of financial management
shall certify to the state treasurer: (i) The project description and dollar
amount; and (ii) that all requirements of this subsection (2)(c) have been met.

(3) Military
department:

(((a))) Enter
into a financing contract in the amount of $653,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct additional space
at the Spokane combined public safety training center.

(((b) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $807,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct additional space
at the Bremerton readiness center.))

(4) Department of
corrections:

Enter into a financing
contract in the amount of $4,588,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct a correctional
industries transportation services warehouse.

(5) Department of
veterans affairs:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $12,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a skilled nursing
home in Retsil.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in an amount not to exceed $5,000,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase a
state veterans' home in eastern Washington.

(6) State parks and
recreation: It is the intent of the legislature that the operating revenues of
the department provide the primary source of funds necessary to meet financing
contract obligations for the projects financed under this authority. In
addition, state parks and recreation is authorized to pledge to make payments
from appropriated funds pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW in order to:

(a) Enter into
financing contracts in the amount of $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase and install cabins
and yurts statewide.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in an amount not to exceed $2,500,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for development of
a multi-purpose dining and meeting facility at Fort Worden state park.

(c) Enter into a
financing contract in an amount not to exceed $750,000 plus financing expenses
and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for development of an
expansion park at Grayland Beach state park.

(7) Community and
technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community College in the amount of
$4,106,300 plus financing expenses and reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to renovate Lynnwood hall and Montlake Terrace hall.

(b) Enter into a financing
contract on behalf of Edmonds Community College in the amount of $3,134,900
plus financing expenses and reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct
an addition to the student center building.

(c) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Highline Community College in the amount of
$15,006,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to replace the student union building.

(d) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia College in the amount of
$2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW for up to $2,500,000 to purchase the maple terrace apartments.

(e) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Everett Community College in the amount of $1,500,000
plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for
remodeling of the fitness center.

(f) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley College in the amount of
$500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to purchase two buildings and property contiguous to the college
campus.

(g) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Olympic College in the amount of $900,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for
development of off-street student parking.

(h) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Renton Technical College in the amount of
$1,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW for the purchase of approximately ten acres within the district
boundary to support a future relocation of apprenticeship programs off the main
campus.

(i) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Bellevue community college in the amount of
$16,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW for the construction of a structured parking garage.

(8) Central Washington
University: Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $5,700,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the
Central Washington University/Edmonds Community College center.

(9) University of
Washington:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $7,500,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for renovation of Sand Point
building 5.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $5,500,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for renovation of Sand Point
building 29.

(c) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $1,600,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to complete the current, phased
renovation of Sand Point building 5.

(10) The Evergreen
State College: Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $1,610,000
plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for
expansion of the campus children's center.

Sec. 155. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 111
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community Services
Facilities Program (02-4-007)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125. The following
projects are eligible for funding:

Projects Recommendation

YMCA of Grays Harbor,
Aberdeen $300,000

Community Youth Services,
Olympia $300,000

Skagit County Community
Action, Concrete $300,000

Kindering Center, Bellevue $300,000

Bellevue Family YMCA,
Bellevue $300,000

Refugee Women's Alliance,
Seattle $300,000

YWCA of Walla Walla, Walla
Walla $300,000

Pierce County Alliance
(facility), Tacoma $61,000

Compass Health, Everett $300,000

Mid-City Concerns, Spokane $28,000

Children's Home Society,
Vaughn $70,000

Children's Home society,
Spokane $238,000

Catholic Family/Child
Services, Yakima $152,000

Korean Women's Association,
Tacoma $218,000

Factory Small Biz
Incubator, Tacoma $300,000

Lao Highland Association of
King County, Seattle $119,000

First Place, Seattle $300,000

NE Washington Rural
Resources, Colville $300,000

Filipino Community Center,
Seattle $200,000

Filipino Community Center,
Wapato $25,000

((Subtotal $4,411,000

Alternate Projects))

Nooksack Community Aid
Society, Deming $165,000

Childhaven, Seattle $149,000

((Subtotal $314,000))

Total $4,725,000

(2) $200,000 of the
appropriation in this section for the Filipino Community Center in Seattle
shall be matched by $200,000 in additional contributions toward the project
from local government.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State. $ ((4,411,000))

4,725,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 16,000,000

TOTAL............................... $ ((20,411,000))

20,725,000

Sec. 156. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 157
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Legislative Building:
Rehabilitation (01‑1‑008)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations
in this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902
and 903 of this act.

(2) The department of
general administration, in consultation with the legislature, the governor, and
the state capitol committee, shall immediately begin planning and initiate an
accelerated design/construction schedule for the renovation of the state
legislative building as follows:

(a) No new permanent
buildings shall be constructed, and the department shall follow standards for
historic preservation;

(b) The goal shall be
to reoccupy the building in time for the 2005 legislative session;

(c) The department
shall make temporary accommodations for the displacement of legislators and
legislative staff in the John L. O'Brien building, the Pritchard building, the
Cherberg building, and the Newhouse building, and may use modular space.
Decisions on the use of space for the Pritchard building will be made by
legislative leadership by July 1, 2001, to make it available for use by the
legislature by April 1, 2002;

(d) The department
shall temporarily move the state library from the Pritchard building by October
1, 2001, and, if needed, the department shall lease storage facilities in
Thurston county for books and other library assets;

(e) The department
shall make temporary accommodations for other tenants of the state legislative
building as follows:

(i) The office of the
insurance commissioner shall be temporarily moved to leased space in Thurston
county;

(ii) The office of the
governor shall be moved to the Insurance building;

(iii) The primary
office of the code reviser and the lieutenant governor shall be moved to a
location on the west capitol campus; and

(iv) The other tenants,
including the office of the state treasurer, the office of the state auditor,
and the office of the secretary of state shall be moved to leased space in
Thurston county;

(f) The state
legislative building shall be completely vacated by the office of the governor,
the office of the secretary of state, the office of treasurer, and the office
of the state auditor by November 1, 2001, and by the legislature fourteen days
after the end of the 2002 legislative session to make it available for
renovation by the contractor; and

(g) State contracts for
the legislative building renovation, Nisqually earthquake repair, and future
earthquake mitigation shall conform to all rules, regulations, and requirements
of the federal emergency management agency.

(3) The state capitol
committee, in conjunction with a legislative building renovation oversight
committee consisting of two members from both the house of representatives and
senate, each appointed by legislative leadership, shall periodically advise the
department regarding the rehabilitation, the receipt and use of private funds,
and other issues that may arise.

(4) The department
shall report on the progress of accelerated planning, design, and relocations
related to the renovation of the state legislative building to the legislature
and the governor by July 15, 2001, and November 15, 2001, and shall consult
with the legislature and governor on major decisions including placement of the
cafeteria and exiting stairs in the legislative building by August 31, 2001.

(5) In the event of any
conflicts between the conditions and limitations in this section and section 3,
chapter 123, Laws of 2001, the conditions and limitations of this section shall
apply.

(6) $204,000 of the
capital historic district construction account appropriation is provided solely
for the department of general administration to contract for fund-raising
services for the solicitation of charitable gifts, grants, or donations
specifically for the purpose of preservation and restoration of the state
legislative building and related educational exhibits and programs. By June
30, 2004, the amount provided by this subsection shall be reinvested to the
capital historic district construction account from the proceeds of the gifts,
grants, and donations.

Reappropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 2,000,000

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,500,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 4,500,000

Appropriation:

Capitol Historic
District Construction

Account‑-State........................... $ 81,681,000

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,300,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 82,981,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,300,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 90,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
157. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 184
(uncodified);

(2) 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 186
(uncodified);

(3) 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 187
(uncodified); and

(4) 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 421
(uncodified).

PART
2

JOB CREATION AND INFRASTRUCTURE
PROGRAM

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. The governor and
legislature find that the state of Washington is faced with a serious economic
downturn following the tragic events of September 11, 2001, and that creating
jobs through capital construction will help stabilize and strengthen the state's
long-term economy. The dollar amounts specified in this Part 2 are
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the
period ending June 30, 2003, for the purposes of stimulating the state economy
through state construction projects. Except where otherwise stated, the
appropriations for the job creation and infrastructure program shall be
expended for direct costs of those projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
following projects are eligible for funding:

Projects Amount

Port Orchard readiness
center................... $ 785,000

Anacortes readiness
center....................... $ 825,000

Ephrata readiness
center........................ $ 390,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)....... ............ $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
203. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
204. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z‑-CAPITAL

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely to fund the second phase of a multiphase
cooperative project with the state of Oregon to dredge the Columbia river. The
department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless an
agreement on ocean disposal sites has been reached that protects the state's
commercial crab fishery. The amount in this section shall lapse unless the
state of Oregon appropriates a dollar-for-dollar match to fund its share of the
project.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 17,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
205. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
following projects are eligible for funding:

Projects Amount

Washington state
penitentiary roof repairs...... $ 426,150

McNeil Island ferry
slip repairs................ $ 165,000

Reynolds work release
fire repairs.............. $ 56,000

Tacoma prerelease roof
repairs.................. $ 90,000

Clallam Bay exterior
improvements........... ... $ 334,500

McNeil Island roof
repairs....................... $ 90,699

Pine Lodge prerelease
improvements.............. $ 192,500

Monroe corrections
center improvements.......... $ 56,000

Ahtanum View exterior
improvements.............. $ 193,760

Airway Heights exterior
improvements............. $ 80,000

Washington corrections
center roof repairs...... $ 1,071,870

Olympic energy plant
improvements............... $ 179,000

McNeil Island roof
repairs....................... $ 146,700

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,082,179

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,082,179

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,082,179

Sec. 206. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 265
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Local Criminal Justice
Facilities (99-2-003)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($3,000,000))
$5,500,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to local jurisdictions for jail
capacity expansion projects. Grants provided in this section shall be limited
to up to $500,000 per jurisdiction.

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 2,952,091

Appropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 1,335,619

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((3,000,000))

5,500,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ ((4,335,619))

6,835,619

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,193,270

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 966,338

TOTAL.................................... $ ((9,447,318))

11,947,318

NEW SECTION. Sec.
207. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The following
projects are eligible for funding:

College Projects Amount

Bates Technical College Roof and facility repairs‑-HVAC
controls and equipment $ 1,010,000

Bellevue Community College Roof repairs $ 2,374,000

Bellingham Technical College Facility repairs‑-HVAC $ 986,000

Big Bend Community College Facility repairs‑-Fume hoods $ 100,000

Clark Community College Facility repairs‑-Structural $ 313,000

Columbia Basin College Facility repairs‑-Replace heaters $ 225,000

Everett Community College Roof repairs $ 57,000

Grays Harbor Community College Bishop
center; Roof and facility repairs‑-Electrical panels $ 745,000

Green River Community College Campus commons‑-Lighting, landscape,
and drainage $ 600,000

Highline Community College Utility tunnels; Redondo pier; Roof
repairs $ 3,189,000

Lake Washington Technical College Facility
repairs‑-Window and roof leak damage $ 105,000

Lower Columbia College Roof repairs and removal of portables,
including site work $ 290,175

Olympic Community College Facility repairs‑-HVAC, ventilation,
and dust accumulations $ 1,354,000

Peninsula Community College Facility repairs‑-HVAC, domestic
water, and ventilation $ 2,366,000

Pierce Community College -

Fort Steilacoom Facility repairs‑-HVAC, pipe, and
electrical service upgrades $ 156,000

Renton Technical College Roof repairs $ 526,000

Seattle Central Community College Roof
repairs $ 235,000

Shoreline Community College Roof repairs $ 452,000

South Seattle Community College Roof
and facility repairs‑-HVAC, fiber optic for EMS $ 2,301,000

Spokane Community College Roof and facility repairs‑-Science
building rooftop heat unit $ 285,000

Spokane Falls Community College Facility
repairs‑-HVAC, electrical service, and distribution $ 378,000

Tacoma Community College Facility repairs‑-HVAC, electrical $ 2,354,000

Walla Walla Community College Enology phase 2 and facility repairs‑-HVAC,
exhaust, and boilers $ 1,084,000

Wenatchee Valley Community College Replace
portable‑-prep and site work; Welding lab; Roof and

facility repairs $ 2,565,000

Whatcom Community College Facility repairs‑-HVAC and building
fungus $ 700,000

Yakima Valley Community College Electrical,
fiber optic, and equipment installations for 2+2 classrooms $ 1,500,000

TOTAL $ 26,250,175

(2) The community and
technical college system's board shall act to ensure that colleges implement
the eligible projects pursuant to sections 218 through 220 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account--State. $ 26,250,175

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 26,250,175

NEW SECTION. Sec.
208. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Lewis and Clark's
Station Camp‑-Park and Infrastructure Development: Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (2002-S-001)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account--State. $ 2,552,226

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 2,552,226

NEW SECTION. Sec.
209. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The following building
renovation and utility upgrade projects are eligible for funding:

Project Amount

Bayview state park:
Campground comfort station $ 400,000

Birch Bay state park:
Residence replacement $ 175,000

Brooks memorial state
park: Environmental

learning center
facility improvements $ 238,000

Camano Island state park:
Group camp

comfort station
replacement $ 250,000

Camano Island state park:
Connect

comfort station to
utility system $ 734,000

Camp Delaney:
Environmental learning center

facility improvements $ 400,000

Camp Moran: Environmental
learning center

facility improvements $ 375,000

Camp Wooten: Environmental
learning center

facility improvements $ 250,000

Central Ferry state park:
Residence replacement $ 175,000

Chief Timothy state park:
Interpretive

center renovation $ 300,000

Cornet Bay: Environmental
learning center

facility improvements $ 985,000

Curlew Lake state park:
Campground comfort

station replacement $ 240,000

Dalles Mountain Ranch state
park: Potable

water well and
distribution lines $ 125,000

Flaming Geyser state park:
Wastewater

treatment plant upgrade $ 60,000

Flaming Geyser state park:
Environmental

learning center
facility improvements $ 140,000

Fort Columbia state park:
Exterior

improvements to hostel $ 250,000

Fort Canby state park:
Upgrade north

head duplex and
carriage house $ 290,000

Fort Simcoe state park:
Preservation

of historic officers'
quarters $ 233,000

Gingko state park:
Interpretive

center renovation and
improvements $ 300,000

Ike Kinswa state park:
On-site

wastewater system
replacement $ 72,000

Iron Horse state park:
FF-16 trestle replacement $ 500,000

Iron Horse state park:
South Cle Elum depot complex $ 200,000

Kitsap Memorial state
park: Campground

comfort station
replacement $ 380,000

Lake Cushman state park:
Potable water

system improvements $ 195,000

Lake Sylvia state park:
Day use comfort

station improvements $ 90,000

Lewis & Clark Trail
state park: Improvements

to comfort stations $ 250,000

Lewis & Clark state
park: Environmental

learning center
facility improvements $ 210,000

Lime Kiln state park:
Garage renovation to

interpretive center $ 100,000

Millersylvania state park:
Wastewater

treatment plant
improvements $ 175,000

Millersylvania state park:
Comfort

station 2 historic
preservation $ 110,000

Millersylvania state park:
Kitchen 2

historic preservation $ 60,000

Millersylvania state park:
Environmental

learning center
facility improvements $ 402,000

Moran state park:
Residence replacement $ 175,000

Moran state park: South
campground

comfort station
improvements $ 100,000

Moran state park:
Recreational vehicle trailer sewage

disposal replacement $ 150,000

Moran state park: Kitchen
shelter 8

and 21 replacement $ 112,000

Ocean Beach: Access water
line purveyors $ 50,000

Ocean City state park:
North Beach area

residence replacement $ 175,000

Old Fort Townsend state
park: Residence

replacement $ 175,000

Olmstead Place state park:
Cabin historic

preservation $ 60,000

Olmstead Place state park:
Smith

house-historic
preservation $ 115,000

Palouse Falls state park:
Domestic

well development $ 415,000

Paradise Point state park:
Campground

comfort station
improvements $ 90,000

Pearrygin Lake state park:
Comfort station

improvements $ 350,000

Rainbow Falls state park:
Replace pedestrian

suspension bridge $ 250,000

Sacajawea state park:
Interpretive

center
renovation/improvements $ 600,000

Sacajawea state park:
Renovate caretaker's

residence and garage $ 170,000

Sequest state park: South
loop water

system improvements $ 50,000

Sequim Bay state park:
Fish passage

barrier replacement $ 250,000

Statewide: Campground
electrification

statewide (recreational
vehicle hookups) $ 1,500,000

Statewide: Culvert
replacements for fish passage $ 750,000

Statewide: Housing
renovation $ 1,348,000

Sun Lakes state park:
Residence replacement $ 175,000

Thorpe Bridge: Decking and
safety

railing installation $ 300,000

Twin Harbors state park:
Potable

water systems
improvements $ 185,000

Twin Harbors state park:
West

campground comfort
station replacements $ 350,000

Total: $ 16,559,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 16,559,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,559,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
210. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Culvert Replacement for
Fish Passage: Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (2002-S-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriation is provided solely to the department of fish and wildlife to
replace culverts on state lands that impair fish passage. The department shall
prioritize projects that affect fish species listed as threatened or endangered
under the federal endangered species act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
211. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND
WILDLIFE

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The following projects
are eligible for funding:

Project Amount

Tokul creek: Hatchery
pathogen-free water $ 140,000

Whitehorse hatchery: Well
and pond renovation $ 300,000

Dungeness hatchery:
Intakes $ 290,000

Issaquah hatchery: Phase 3 $ 238,000

Wallace river hatchery:
Pollution abatement pond $ 175,000

Swanson lakes wildlife
area: Sharptail

grouse viewing site $ 100,000

Othello: Coulee dam nature
tour (nonwater) $ 200,000

Crop and orchard protection
fencing $ 200,000

Sunnyside wildlife area:
Well replacement $ 30,000

Region 5 hazardous material
storage $ 45,000

Cedar creek: Trap storage $ 30,000

Statewide: Underground
storage tank removal $ 50,000

Wenatchee: Office survey
and fence $ 25,000

Wenatchee: Warehouse
renovation and storage building $ 41,000

Wenatchee: Office and
warehouse paint $ 12,000

Region 2: Office
underground sprinkler system $ 10,000

Americans with disabilities
act toilet

installation: 12
locations $ 200,000

Sherman creek: Irrigation
line replacement $ 149,000

Windmill ranch wildlife
area: Replace

pivot irrigation system $ 121,400

Methow: Headquarters
renovations $ 43,800

Johns river wildlife area:
Replace heating and

windows $ 40,200

Statewide: Elk fencing $ 500,000

St. Helens wildlife area:
Bridge replacement No. 502 $ 175,000

Sunset falls bridge: Deck
and safety improvements $ 75,000

Statewide: Paving of
bridge approaches $ 75,000

Total: $ 3,265,400

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,265,400

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,265,400

NEW SECTION. Sec.
212. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Culvert Replacement for
Fish Passage: Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (2002-S-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriation is provided solely to the department of natural resources to
replace culverts on state lands that impair fish passage. The department shall
prioritize projects that affect fish species listed as threatened or endangered
under the federal endangered species act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
213. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE

Fairground Health and
Safety Improvements: Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (2002-S-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriation is provided solely to the department of agriculture to make
grants to counties for health and safety improvements at fairs and youth shows
as authorized by chapter 15.76 RCW.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
214. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Arsenic Removal
Financing Program: Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (2002-S-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is provided to make grants to public drinking water systems and
loans to private drinking water systems for engineering services and equipment
purchase for arsenic removal and to bring systems into compliance with federal
safe drinking water act standards.

(2) The arsenic removal
financing program must be cooperatively administered by the department of
health, the public works board, and the board's administrative agent, the
department of community, trade, and economic development. The program must be
administered consistent with the provisions of the public works board under
chapter 43.155 RCW and the drinking water state revolving fund under chapter
70.119A RCW. If the provisions of these two chapters are inconsistent, chapter
43.155 RCW shall be followed.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,750,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
215. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Drinking Water
Security: Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (2002-S-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriation is provided for the public works board to make grants to public
drinking water systems for facility improvements associated with enhancing the
security of drinking water supplies and infrastructure.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
216. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

City of Grandview: Job
Creation and Infrastructure Development (2002-S-006)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriation is provided for allocation by the department to the city of
Grandview for infrastructure development, including but not limited to streets,
water, sewer, and other utilities associated with the siting of a warehouse
distribution center. If the development agreement for the warehouse
distribution center has not been signed by May 15, 2002, the appropriation in
this section shall lapse.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
217. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community Services
Facilities (2002-S-005): Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects

The following projects
are eligible for funding:

Projects Amount

Asia Pacific center $ 500,000

Blair elementary relocation $ 4,600,000

Deschutes parkway repair $ 300,000

Edmonds waterfront park $ 300,000

Fairgrounds health and
safety $ 100,000

Grace Cole memorial
park/Brookside creek $ 400,000

Highline school district
aircraft noise mitigation $ 5,000,000

Mill creek active use ball
fields $ 1,000,000

Penny creek/9th avenue
crossing $ 400,000

Port Angeles skills
center/skills consortium $ 3,000,000

Ridgefield wastewater
treatment $ 585,000

Sammamish surface water
treatment $ 1,500,000

Shoreline historical museum $ 28,000

Soundview park/playground $ 200,000

Stewart heights pool
project $ 500,000

Sundome seating expansion -
Yakima $ 1,250,000

William H. Factory small
business incubator $ 250,000

Yakima ballfields $ 1,250,000

TOTAL $ 21,163,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 21,163,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,163,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
218. Agencies shall expedite
the expenditure of appropriations for the job creation and infrastructure
program in order to: (1) Maximize additional private employment opportunities
associated with capital expenditures; (2) expediently renew and repair a wide
variety of state facilities and infrastructure; and (3) minimize
reappropriations for work under this section to those projects that have been
encumbered and are substantially underway by June 30, 2003. Agencies shall implement
the job creation and infrastructure program within the agency's current level
of employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
219. The following conditions
apply to appropriations for the job creation and infrastructure program: (1)
Agencies shall contract permitting, design, and construction services wherever
appropriate; (2) agencies shall coordinate contract and project management
services to meet the completion goals of this section; (3) agencies may
petition the office of financial management to use agency staff or to
separately contract project management services for individual projects on an
exception basis by demonstrating that this approach is more cost effective and
necessary to meet the timeline goals in this section; and (4) to carry out the
provisions of sections 201 through 220 of this act, the office of financial
management may assign responsibility for design, construction, and other
related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
220. To ensure that job
creation and infrastructure program appropriations are carried out in
accordance with legislative intent, funds shall not be allotted until eligible
projects are approved by and on file with the office of financial management.
Allotments for appropriations shall be provided for each eligible project in
accordance with the capital project review requirements adopted by the office
of financial management. No expenditure may be incurred or obligation assumed
against job creation and infrastructure program appropriations until the office
of financial management has approved the allotment of the funds to be expended.

The office of financial
management is expected to monitor the progress of eligible projects that
receive appropriations. No later than December 1, 2002, the office of
financial management shall report the following information to the capital
budget committee of the house of representatives and the ways and means
committee of the senate: (1) A status report on each project noting percent
completion; and (2) an explanation of why any appropriation remains
unexpended. Agencies shall make this information available to the office of
financial management upon request.

PART
3

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

For transfers in this
section to the state general fund, pursuant to RCW 43.135.035(5), the state
expenditure limit shall be increased by the amount of the transfer. The
increase shall occur in fiscal year 2002.

Natural Resources Real
Property Replacement

Account: For transfer
to the permanent

common school fund......................... $ 20,000,000

Natural Resources Real
Property Replacement

Account: For transfer
to the

scientific permanent
account............... $ 1,400,000

Natural Resources Real
Property Replacement

Account: For transfer
to the charitable,

educational, penal and
reformatory

institution account........................ $ 420,000

Natural Resources Real
Property Replacement

Account: For transfer
to the state

university permanent
account............... $ 96,000

Natural Resources Real
Property Replacement

Account: For transfer
to the agricultural

permanent account.......................... $ 17,000

Washington State University
Building Account:

For transfer to the
state general fund..... $ 3,000,000

Community and Technical
College Capital

Projects Account: For
transfer to the

state general fund......................... $ 14,468,800

Nonhighway and Off-Road
Vehicle Activities

Program Account: For
transfer to the

state general fund......................... $ 3,095,000

Water Quality Account: For
transfer to the

state general fund......................... $ 9,525,000

Wildlife Account: For
transfer to the state

general fund............................... $ 1,800,000

Warm Water Game Fish Account:
For transfer

to the state general
fund.................. $ 560,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account: For

transfer to the state
general fund......... $ 6,040,000

Recreation Resources
Account‑-State: For transfer

to the state general
fund.................. $ 6,934,000

Sec. 302. RCW 28B.30.730 and 1991
sp.s. c 13 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of
financing the cost of any projects, the board is hereby authorized to adopt the
resolution or resolutions and prepare all other documents necessary for the
issuance, sale and delivery of the bonds or any part thereof at such time or
times as it shall deem necessary and advisable. Said bonds:

(1) Shall not
constitute

(a) An obligation,
either general or special, of the state; or

(b) A general
obligation of Washington State University or of the board;

(2) Shall be

(a) Either registered
or in coupon form; and

(b) Issued in
denominations of not less than one hundred dollars; and

(c) Fully negotiable
instruments under the laws of this state; and

(d) Signed on behalf of
the university by the president of the board, attested by the secretary or the
treasurer of the board, have the seal of the university impressed thereon or a
facsimile of such seal printed or lithographed in the bottom border thereof,
and the coupons attached thereto shall be signed with the facsimile signatures
of such president and secretary;

(3) Shall state

(a) The date of issue;
and

(b) The series of the
issue and be consecutively numbered within the series; and

(c) That the bond is
payable both principal and interest solely out of the bond retirement fund;

(4) Each series of
bonds shall bear interest, payable either annually or semiannually, as the
board may determine;

(5) Shall be payable
both principal and interest out of the bond retirement fund;

(6) Shall be payable at
such times over a period of not to exceed forty years from date of issuance, at
such place or places, and with such reserved rights of prior redemption, as the
board may prescribe;

(7) Shall be sold in
such manner and at such price as the board may prescribe;

(8) Shall be issued
under and subject to such terms, conditions and covenants providing for the
payment of the principal thereof and interest thereon and such other terms,
conditions, covenants and protective provisions safeguarding such payment, not
inconsistent with RCW 28B.30.700 through 28B.30.780, and as found to be
necessary by the board for the most advantageous sale thereof, which may
include but not be limited to:

(a) A covenant that the
building fees shall be established, maintained and collected in such amounts
that will provide money sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on all
bonds payable out of the bond retirement account, to set aside and maintain the
reserves required to secure the payment of such principal and interest, and to
maintain any coverage which may be required over such principal and interest;

(b) A covenant that a
reserve account shall be created in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment
of the principal of and interest on all bonds issued and a provision made that
certain amounts be set aside and maintained therein;

(c) A covenant that
sufficient moneys may be transferred from the Washington State University
building account to the bond retirement account when ordered by the board of
regents in the event there is ever an insufficient amount of money in the bond
retirement account to pay any installment of interest or principal and interest
coming due on the bonds or any of them;

(d) A covenant fixing
conditions under which bonds on a parity with any bonds outstanding may be
issued.

The proceeds of the
sale of all bonds shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the
Washington State University building account and shall be used solely for
paying the costs of the projects. The Washington State University building
account shall be credited with the investment income derived pursuant to RCW
43.84.080 on the investible balances of scientific permanent fund and
agricultural permanent fund, less the allocation to the state treasurer's
service ((account [fund])) fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190. During
the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the Washington
State University building account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 303. RCW 28B.50.360 and 2000
c 65 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days
from the date of start of each quarter all collected building fees of each such
community and technical college shall be paid into the state treasury, and
shall be credited as follows:

(1) On or before June
30th of each year the college board if issuing bonds payable out of building
fees shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing
twelve-month period to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest
on such bonds. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so
certified in the community and technical college capital projects account.
Such amounts of the funds deposited in the community and technical college
capital projects account as are necessary to pay and secure the payment of the
principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by the college board as
authorized by this chapter shall be exclusively devoted to that purpose. If in
any twelve-month period it shall appear that the amount certified by the
college board is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of
and interest on the outstanding building bonds, the state treasurer shall
notify the college board and such board shall adjust its certificate so that
all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal and
interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.

(2) The community and
technical college capital projects account is hereby created in the state
treasury. The sums deposited in the capital projects account shall be
appropriated and expended exclusively to pay and secure the payment of the
principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and for the
construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and
major alteration of buildings and other capital assets owned by the state board
for community and technical colleges in the name of the state of Washington,
and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or
appurtenances in relation thereto, and for the payment of principal of and
interest on any bonds issued for such purposes. During the 2001-2003 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the account to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 304. RCW 43.30.265 and 1992 c
167 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that the department of natural resources has a need to maintain the real
property asset base it manages and needs an accounting mechanism to complete
transactions without reducing the real property asset base.

(2) The natural
resources real property replacement account is created in the state treasury.
This account shall consist of funds transferred or paid for the disposal or
transfer of real property by the department of natural resources under RCW
79.01.009. The funds in this account shall be used solely for the acquisition
of replacement real property and may be spent only when, and as, authorized by
legislative appropriation. For the period July 1, 2001, to June 30, 2003,
moneys in the account may be transferred to the following accounts: Permanent
common school fund; scientific permanent fund; charitable, educational, penal
and reformatory institutions account; state university permanent fund; and
agricultural permanent fund.

Sec. 305. RCW 46.09.165 and 1995 c
166 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The nonhighway and
off-road vehicle activities program account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys in this account are subject to legislative appropriation. The
interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall administer the account for
purposes specified in this chapter and shall hold it separate and apart from
all other money, funds, and accounts of the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation. Grants, gifts, or other financial assistance, proceeds received
from public bodies as administrative cost contributions, and any moneys made
available to the state of Washington by the federal government for outdoor
recreation may be deposited into the account. During the 2001-2003 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the account to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 306. RCW 79A.25.200 and 2000
c 11 s 77 are each amended to read as follows:

The recreation resource
account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in this account are subject
to legislative appropriation. The committee shall administer the account in
accordance with this chapter and chapter 79A.35 RCW and shall hold it separate
and apart from all other money, funds, and accounts of the committee. Moneys
received from the marine fuel tax refund account under RCW 79A.25.070 shall be
deposited into the account. Grants, gifts, or other financial assistance,
proceeds received from public bodies as administrative cost contributions, and
moneys made available to the state of Washington by the federal government for
outdoor recreation may be deposited into the account. During the 2001-2003
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the account to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
307. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 308. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---