BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. For the purpose of
providing funds for the planning, design, construction, reconstruction, and
other necessary costs for the various school and higher education facilities
improvements defined in chapter . . . (House/Senate Bill No.
. . ., the supplemental capital budget), Laws of 2002, the state
finance committee is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state
of Washington in the sum of three hundred thirty-five million fifty-two
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to finance these
projects and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this section
shall not constitute indebtedness for purposes of the limitations set forth in
RCW 39.42.060, to the extent that the bond payments are paid from the education
construction account. Bonds authorized in this section may be sold at such
price as the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds authorized in
this section may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of
the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds. The proceeds of the sale of the
bonds issued for the purposes of this section shall be deposited in the
educational capital construction account hereby created in the state treasury.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The proceeds from the
sale of the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act, shall be transferred as
follows:

(1) Twenty-five million
dollars to the common school construction account;

(2) Three hundred
million dollars to remain in the educational capital construction account
created in section 1 of this act.

These proceeds shall be
used exclusively for the purposes specified in this section and for the payment
of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the
purposes of this section, and shall be administered by the office of financial
management subject to legislative appropriation.

If the state finance
committee deems it necessary to issue taxable bonds in order to comply with
federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of
nontaxable bond proceeds, the proceeds of the taxable bonds shall be
transferred to the state taxable building construction account in lieu of any
transfer otherwise provided by this section. The state treasurer shall submit
written notice to the director of financial management if it is determined that
any such additional transfer to the state taxable building construction account
is necessary. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The nondebt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account must be used for the payment of the
principal and interest on the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act.

(2)(a) The state
finance committee must, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the
state treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet the bond
retirement and interest requirements on the bonds authorized in section 1 of
this act.

(b) On or before the
date on which any interest or principal and interest is due, the state
treasurer shall transfer from the education construction account for deposit
into the nondebt-limit reimbursable bond retirement account, the amount
computed in (a) of this subsection for bonds issued for the purposes of section
1 of this act.

(3) If the education
construction account has insufficient revenues to pay the principal and
interest computed in subsection (2)(a) of this section, then the debt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account must be used for the payment of the
principal and interest on the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act from
any additional means provided by the legislature.

(4) If at any time the
education construction account has insufficient revenues to repay the bonds,
the legislature may provide additional means for the payment of the bonds, but
any such additional means shall be subject to the state debt limit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) Bonds issued under
section 1 of this act must state that they are a general obligation of the
state of Washington, must pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the
payment of the principal and interest, and must contain an unconditional
promise to pay the principal and interest as it becomes due.

(2) The owner and
holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the owner and holder of any of
the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding require the transfer
and payment of funds as directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The legislature may
provide additional means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act, and sections 3
through 5 of this act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive method for
their payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The bonds authorized in
section 1 of this act shall be a legal investment for all state funds or funds
under state control and for all funds of any other public body.

Sec. 7. RCW 39.42.060 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 9 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

No bonds, notes, or
other evidences of indebtedness for borrowed money shall be issued by the state
which will cause the aggregate debt contracted by the state to exceed that
amount for which payments of principal and interest in any fiscal year would
require the state to expend more than seven percent of the arithmetic mean of
its general state revenues, as defined in section 1(c) of Article VIII of the
Washington state Constitution for the three immediately preceding fiscal years
as certified by the treasurer in accordance with RCW 39.42.070. It shall be
the duty of the state finance committee to compute annually the amount required
to pay principal of and interest on outstanding debt. In making such
computation, the state finance committee shall include all borrowed money
represented by bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness which are
secured by the full faith and credit of the state or are required to be paid,
directly or indirectly, from general state revenues and which are incurred by
the state, any department, authority, public corporation or quasi public
corporation of the state, any state university or college, or any other public
agency created by the state but not by counties, cities, towns, school
districts, or other municipal corporations, and shall include debt incurred
pursuant to section 3 of Article VIII of the Washington state Constitution, but
shall exclude the following:

(1) Obligations for the
payment of current expenses of state government;

(2) Indebtedness
incurred pursuant to RCW 39.42.080 or 39.42.090;

(3) Principal of and
interest on bond anticipation notes;

(4) Any indebtedness
which has been refunded;

(5) Financing contracts
entered into under chapter 39.94 RCW;

(6) Indebtedness
authorized or incurred before July 1, 1993, pursuant to statute which requires
that the state treasury be reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and
the interest on such indebtedness, from money other than general state revenues
or from the special excise tax imposed pursuant to chapter 67.40 RCW;

(7) Indebtedness
authorized and incurred after July 1, 1993, pursuant to statute that requires
that the state treasury be reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and
the interest on such indebtedness, from (a) moneys outside the state treasury,
except higher education operating fees, (b) higher education building fees, (c)
indirect costs recovered from federal grants and contracts, and (d) fees and
charges associated with hospitals operated or managed by institutions of higher
education;

(8) Any agreement,
promissory note, or other instrument entered into by the state finance
committee under RCW 39.42.030 in connection with its acquisition of bond
insurance, letters of credit, or other credit support instruments for the
purpose of guaranteeing the payment or enhancing the marketability, or both, of
any state bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness;

(9) Indebtedness incurred
for the purposes identified in RCW 43.99N.020;

(10) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes of the school district bond guaranty established by
chapter 39.98 RCW;

(11) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes of replacing the waterproof membrane over the east
plaza garage and revising related landscaping construction pursuant to RCW
43.99Q.070; and

(12) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes of the state legislative building rehabilitation, to
the extent that principal and interest payments of such indebtedness are paid
from the capitol building construction account pursuant to RCW
43.99Q.140(2)(b).

(13) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes of educational capital construction, to the extent
that principal and interest payments of such indebtedness are paid for from the
education construction account under section 3(2)(b) of this act.

To the extent necessary
because of the constitutional or statutory debt limitation, priorities with
respect to the issuance or guaranteeing of bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness by the state shall be determined by the state finance committee.

Sec. 8. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 1
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of
providing funds to finance the projects described and authorized by the
legislature in the capital and operating appropriation acts for the 2001-2003
fiscal biennium, and all costs incidental thereto, the state finance committee
is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in
the sum of ((nine)) seven hundred ((thirty-five)) sixty
million five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be required,
to finance these projects and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized
in this section may be sold at such price as the state finance committee shall
determine. No bonds authorized in this section may be offered for sale without
prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

Sec. 9. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 2
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The proceeds from the
sale of the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act shall be deposited in the
state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020. The proceeds
shall be transferred as follows:

(1) ((Seven)) Five
hundred ((seventy-four)) ninety-nine million two hundred thousand
dollars to remain in the state building construction account created by RCW
43.83.020;

(2) Twenty-two million
five hundred thousand dollars to the outdoor recreation account created by RCW
79A.25.060;

(3) Twenty-two million
five hundred thousand dollars to the habitat conservation account created by
RCW 79A.15.020;

(4) Sixty million
dollars to the state taxable building construction account which is hereby
established in the state treasury. All receipts from taxable bond issues are
to be deposited into the account. If the state finance committee deems it
necessary to issue more than fifty million dollars of the bonds authorized in
section 1 of this act as taxable bonds in order to comply with federal internal
revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond
proceeds, the proceeds of such additional taxable bonds shall be transferred to
the state taxable building construction account in lieu of any transfer
otherwise provided by this section. The state treasurer shall submit written
notice to the director of financial management if it is determined that any
such additional transfer to the state taxable building construction account is
necessary. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation;

(5) Twenty-nine million
twenty-five thousand dollars to the higher education construction account
created by RCW 28B.140.040.

These proceeds shall be
used exclusively for the purposes specified in this section and for the payment
of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the
purposes of this section, and shall be administered by the office of financial
management subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---