BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Pursuant to chapter
43.155 RCW, the following project loans recommended by the public works board
are authorized to be made with funds previously appropriated from the public
works assistance account:

(1) City of Aberdeen-sanitary
sewer project-upgrade wastewater treatment plant by modifying aeration basins,
secondary clarifier, pumps, and associated improvements to controls and related

facilities..................................... $ 5,651,650

(2) City of
Auburn-domestic water project-upgrade three water storage reservoirs to include
recoating, disinfecting, and other associated improvements necessary......................... $ 675,000

(3) City of
Bellingham-domestic water project-replace approximately four miles of water
main and associated necessary

improvements................................... $ 1,938,000

(4) City of
Bellingham-road project-rehabilitate and resurface approximately eight miles of
street, related improvements including gutter, curb, and sidewalk ramp
installation... $ 2,975,000

(5) City of Black
Diamond-domestic water project-construct new building at water storage
reservoir to house storage tanks, equipment, and related items. Work will
include trenching, vault installation, electrical work, telemetry installation,
and associated

improvements................................... $ 180,000

(6) City of Bonney
Lake-sanitary sewer project-improve the wastewater treatment plant, including
replacing influent pump station, reconstructing headworks, modifying the
clarifiers, converting the activated sludge basins, installing secondary
clarifiers, creating a new effluent disinfection system, and other necessary

improvements................................... $ 7,386,500

(7) City of Burien-road
project-reconstruct roadway from 1st avenue to 10th avenue. This will reduce
road from four lanes to two lanes with parking and sidewalks on both sides,
left turn pockets and signals, pedestrian safety design features, and other
necessary related improvements................................... $ 1,000,000

(8) City of Camas-road
project-reconstruct approximately two miles of streets, upgrade water and sewer
lines, and other related improvements and upgrades....................................... $ 1,018,000

(9) City of
Centralia-sanitary sewer project-replace over one thousand two hundred feet of
sewer pipe, backfill abandoned pipelines, resurface any disturbed roadways, and
other necessary

improvements................................... $ 294,840

(10) City of
Centralia-domestic water project-complete water system improvements, including
biological assessment, land acquisition, design, install approximately eight
thousand feet of pipeline, and other necessary related improvements........................... $ 2,367,360

(11) Clark County-road
project-upgrade NW 117th and NW 119th streets by improving travel lanes,
installing turn pockets, realigning intersecting streets, adding traffic
control devices, installing bike paths and sidewalks, improving storm drainage,
and other necessary features .................. $... 2,800,000

(12) Clark County-road
project-upgrade NE 134th street by widening the right-of-way, improving traffic
lanes, creating a turn lane, adding bike paths and sidewalks, improving
intersections, adding transit facilities, improving drainage, and making other improvements
as warranted .................. $... 900,000

(13) Clark County-road
project-improve approximately one and one-quarter miles of Padden Parkway,
improve travel lanes, shoulders, medians, pedestrian and bike paths, street
illumination, storm water detention and treatment, and other necessary related

improvements................................... $ 4,300,000

(14) Clark County-road
project-improve approximately one mile of NE 199th street, including bringing
roadway to code, adding bike and pedestrian paths, adding traffic signals,
improving storm water systems, and installing or repairing other features

necessary...................................... $ 2,000,000

(15) Clark Public
Utilities District-sanitary sewer project-upgrade La Center water reclamation
plant including headworks, piping, flow measurement stations, sequencing batch
reactor, and other necessary improvements................................... $ 1,904,926

(16) Coal Creek Utility
District-domestic water project-replace approximately twelve thousand feet of
water main, associated appurtenances will be upgraded or installed, and road
surfaces disturbed by the replacement process will be returned to their original

state.......................................... $ 1,275,000

(17) Covington Water
District-domestic water project-participate with other jurisdictions in
constructing Tacoma's second water supply line. This includes, but is not
limited to, upgrading the diversion dam, constructing fish bypasses, replacing
water mains and pipes, constructing an eight mile transmission main, building
new water treatment facilities, and rehabilitating disturbed areas throughout
the project .................. $... 10,000,000

(18) Town of
Eatonville-domestic water project-design and construct a two hundred
seventy-five thousand gallon drinking water reservoir, associated site
improvements, transmission main improvements, and other related upgrades will
be made as part of the

project........................................ $ 442,000

(19) City of Edmonds-sanitary
sewer project-upgrade sanitary sewer system, including rehabilitating
approximately three thousand two hundred feet of trunk line, replacing a pump
station, and making other associated system improvements to ensure proper
performance of the system and these rehabilitating components...................... $ 1,347,250

(20) City of
Ephrata-domestic water project-replace approximately thirteen thousand feet of
water pipe throughout the city, other ancillary items usually associated with
water main replacement will also be addressed including, but not limited to,
fire hydrant replacement, valve replacement, and surface

restoration.................................... $ 1,387,200

(21) Town of Friday
Harbor-sanitary sewer project-construct a new secondary wastewater treatment
plant, including a new operations building with laboratory, site work, and
improved solids handling capacity .................. $... 3,560,000

(22) Highland Water
District-domestic water project-install approximately sixteen thousand feet of
water main, hydrants, valves, and related equipment as needed.................... $ 1,530,000

(23) Highline Water
District-domestic water project-replace approximately four thousand three
hundred feet of water main, adding hydrants, valves, telemetry, and related
equipment as warranted. Road surface will be restored, and construct a booster
station, including a building, pump, controls, and pipes............. $ 1,297,525

(24) City of
Kent-domestic water project-install approximately forty-two miles of water
transmission line, improvements to the water intake facility, pipeline, storage
facilities, fish bypasses, and area restoration.................................... $ 10,000,000

(25) King
County-sanitary sewer project-construct North Creek wastewater storage facility
including odor control facility, an electrical building, piping, and controls
necessary to operate the facility as designed....................................... $ 10,000,000

(26) King County Water
District No. 19-domestic water project-replace approximately five thousand feet
of water line along Vashon Highway and Gorsuch Road and other related system

upgrades....................................... $ 826,870

(27) King County Water
District No. 85-domestic water project-replace approximately sixteen thousand
two hundred feet of water main, pressure release valves, other valves, and
other related

improvements................................... $ 1,240,700

(28) Kittitas
County-solid waste project-construct a transfer station and make related
improvements.................. $ 1,425,000

(29) City of Lake
Stevens-sanitary sewer project-improve sewer system including the construction
of a force main, upgrades to a lift station, construct new meter station, and
make other necessary related improvements ............................ $ 1,692,900

(30) Lake Stevens Sewer
District-sanitary sewer project-construct a lift station and replace force
mains, complete a gravity bypass, several other lift stations will be upgraded,
and other related improvements ....................... $... 4,083,400

(31) Lakehaven Utility
District-domestic water project-construct transmission lines, improve storage
facilities, create fish bypasses, and restore the project area....................... $ 10,000,000

(32) Lakewood Water
District-domestic water project-construct two water treatment plants to remove
iron and manganese from ground water supplies ................................. $ 1,232,500

(33) City of
Marysville-sanitary sewer project-upgrade and expand wastewater treatment
plant, including design and permitting of the improvements................................... $ 10,000,000

(34) City of
Milton-road project-rehabilitate and repave sixteen streets, improve storm
drainage in many of the corridors affected by the project, and make other
related

improvements................................... $ 535,325

(35) City of Monroe-domestic
water project-construct a one million one hundred fifty thousand gallon
drinking water reservoir, build a booster pump station, make site improvements
as necessary, install approximately six thousand feet of water line, create a
storm water detention pond, and make other related

improvements................................... $ 3,138,314

(36) City of Moses
Lake-sanitary sewer project-upgrade wastewater treatment plant including design
work for wastewater treatment plant upgrades. Construct the central operations
facility and improve associated equipment........................... $ 10,000,000

(37) City of Mountlake
Terrace-domestic water project-construct a two million gallon water tank and
install associated telemetry, controls, piping, and other related items................ $ 1,458,500

(38) City of
Newcastle-road project-expand Coal Creek Parkway from a two lane to a four lane
roadway, install sidewalks and bike paths, median turn lane, traffic lights,
and associated

controls....................................... $ 1,000,000

(39) City of North
Bend-domestic water project-improve water filtration plant, including
installation of an intertie, telemetry, controls, and other related equipment.
In addition, a water line, vaults, and valves will be installed, landscape will
be restored, and other site improvements will be made................................... $ 1,861,500

(40) Northshore Utility
District-sanitary sewer project-install approximately one thousand two hundred
feet of force main, construct lift station, install the necessary controls, and
complete other site work to restore the area as needed..................... $ 408,000

(41) City of
Okanogan-domestic water project-construct one million gallon reservoir, install
approximately three thousand feet of transmission line, add new pumps, and
install valves and related equipment to the water system............................ $ 1,103,400

(42) Olympic View Water
and Sewer District-domestic water project-replace approximately four thousand
feet of various sized water mains throughout the district and make other
related

improvements................................... $ 153,000

(43) City of Port
Orchard-sanitary sewer project-upgrade treatment plant, including physical,
chemical, and biological treatment processes and other associated components................ $ 10,000,000

(44) City of Port
Townsend-domestic water project-construct approximately eleven thousand feet of
water main, construct a booster pump station, construct a one million five
hundred thousand gallon reservoir, and make other related

improvements................................... $ 2,822,680

(45) City of
Renton-domestic water project-upgrade water system by constructing nearly one
thousand feet of pipe, prepare and restore the affected sites, install chlorine
monitoring equipment, modify system telemetry, and install related equipment........ $ 814,527

(46) Samish Water
District-sanitary sewer project-upgrade sanitary sewer system by replacing and
upgrading controls, telemetry, and pumping equipment, and replacing two sewage
pump stations. Other related equipment will be replaced or added as

needed......................................... $ 865,500

(47) Public Utility
District No. 1 of Skagit County-domestic water project-upgrade water treatment
plant and reservoir, and install a second high-pressure water line,
approximately seventy thousand feet of water line, and other related equipment.............. $ 10,000,000

(48) Snohomish
County-solid waste project-design and construct a new solid waste, recycling,
and transfer station, activities include but are not limited to constructing
new buildings, upgrading associated roadways, and installing utilities....................... $ 10,000,000

(49) Snohomish County
Public Utility District No. 1-domestic water project-install approximately four
thousand five hundred feet of water line, install new meters, and add related
equipment. Flow restrictions will be eliminated............................. $ 619,590

(50) City of
Snoqualmie-sanitary sewer project-improve and floodproof a pump station,
replace a force main, install submersible pumps, construct control station with
associated telemetry and controls, and make other related improvements........................... $ 1,185,000

(51) City of
Spokane-domestic water project-replace a steel standpipe, install yard piping,
along with valves, telemetry, controls, and instrumentation. In addition,
demolition, site preparation, and site restoration will be done....................... $ 1,187,500

(52) City of
Spokane-domestic water project-replace approximately nine thousand feet of
transmission line, and install valves, connections, and related equipment.
Site restoration will be

done........................................... $ 1,170,400

(53) City of
Stanwood-sanitary sewer project-construct a one million five hundred thousand
gallon per day facility plus its associated operations and maintenance
facilities, headworks, odor treatment facilities, clarifiers, and related

equipment...................................... $ 8,439,230

(54) City of
Sumner-sanitary sewer project-replace obsolete and deteriorating equipment, add
a new process to meet water quality requirements, and add facilities to
increase plant

capacity....................................... $ 4,892,800

(55) Sunland Water
District-sanitary sewer project-construct a distribution system and install
reuse alternatives and related improvements................................... $ 380,000

(56) City of
Tacoma-domestic water project-modify a reservoir and install forty-two miles of
transmission line, associated systems, equipment, and controls........................ $ 10,000,000

(57) City of
Toledo-sanitary sewer project-replace sewer mains, sewer collection pipes, and
related equipment and

material....................................... $ 712,154

(58) City of
Toppenish-sanitary sewer project-replace approximately eleven thousand six
hundred feet of sewer pipe, rehabilitate manholes, remove connections to storm
drains, restore roadways, and add associated equipment and systems.......................... $ 1,336,200

(59) Val Vue Sewer
District-sanitary sewer project-rehabilitate or install over fifteen thousand
five hundred feet of sewer line, provide emergency power to two pump stations,
complete necessary site work, and install controls............................... $ 1,908,250

(60) City of Walla
Walla-sanitary sewer project-install or repair approximately fourteen thousand
two hundred feet of pipe and sewer laterals, install metering manholes and
sensors, install grit trap, repair clarifiers, and add new systems and other
related

improvements....... ........................... $ 5,159,197

(61) Webstone Water
District-domestic water project-install approximately eleven thousand feet of
water transmission line, a pressure reducing station, and other equipment and
controls as

necessary...................................... $ 3,040,000

(62) City of West Richland-sanitary
sewer project-install approximately twenty-seven thousand feet of sewer pipe,
decommission an existing spray field and lagoon, and complete site

restoration.................................... $ 1,683,000

(63) Whatcom County
Water District No. 10-sanitary sewer project-construct a second interceptor
system to contain existing infiltration and inflow, construct sewer lines,
build pump stations, and complete miscellaneous minor modifications.............. $ 2,513,700

(64) Whatcom County
Water District No. 10-domestic water project-design and construct an intertie
with the water systems within the district ............................ $... 899,745

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---