BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the state of Washington possesses a diversity of plants and animals in a
diverse array of ecologically distinct regions. This biological diversity and
its role in forming the diverse landscapes of the state are an important part
of the high quality of life shared by all of the state's citizens and its
visitors. By better understanding the variety and status of living organisms
and the communities and ecosystems in which they occur, conservation efforts
can be more effective in ensuring that this wealth of biological diversity is
enjoyed by current and future generations.

The legislature further
finds that extensive scientific work has been completed by both public and
private entities to map the state's ecoregions and address ecoregional planning
issues, by academic institutions, by state agencies such as the departments of
natural resources and fish and wildlife, and by nongovernmental organizations
such as the nature conservancy. However, these existing information sources
are not complete, and this information may not be sufficiently coordinated or
accessible and useful to the public or policymakers. Similarly, there is no
single entity responsible for development and implementation of a coordinated
state strategy to conserve remaining functioning ecosystems and restore
habitats needed to maintain Washington's biodiversity. There should be a
comprehensive review to identify the state's needs for biodiversity data and
conservation, and to coordinate development, dissemination, and use of existing
information.

There is also a need to
strengthen the state's nonregulatory approaches to biodiversity conservation,
including incentives for voluntary conservation efforts by private landowners.
Incentives should be a major element of the state's overall biodiversity
conservation strategy.

The legislature further
finds that resource management on a single-species or single-resource basis has
proven to be costly, acrimonious, and ultimately ineffective at either
preserving the state's biodiversity or allowing reasonable economic
development.

Therefore, the purpose
of this act is to create a temporary committee to develop recommendations to
the governor and the legislature to establish the framework for the development
and implementation of a statewide biodiversity conservation strategy, to
replace existing single-species or single-resource protection programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The interagency
committee for outdoor recreation is authorized to grant up to forty-five
thousand dollars, on a competitive basis, to conduct the review of biodiversity
programs as described in this section.

(2) The successful
grantee must convene and facilitate a biodiversity conservation committee that
will review existing biodiversity mapping and research programs in Washington
conducted by state and federal agencies, nongovernmental organizations, and
other entities, as well as reviewing programs and projects in other states.

(3) The biodiversity
conservation committee must develop recommendations for a state biodiversity
program that includes:

(a) Creation and
composition of a standing public/private council to oversee design,
development, and implementation of the program;

(b) Identification of a
lead agency to support and facilitate development and implementation of a state
biodiversity conservation plan;

(c) Methods to improve
state agency and nongovernmental organization coordination and cooperation;

(d) Consistent
definitions of the state's ecoregions and an integrated system of data
management and mapping of the state's biodiversity;

(e) The state role for
housing and administering biodiversity data and making the data accessible to
local governments and others;

(f) A public education
and outreach component that includes the production of a visual overview of
Washington's ecoregions;

(g) Methods to ensure
continuing stakeholder involvement;

(h) Methods to provide
technical assistance to support state and local government land management; and

(i) Identification of
the timeframes and funding needed to implement the program.

(4) The purpose of the
state biodiversity program is to develop and implement an ongoing biodiversity
conservation strategy to maintain Washington's biodiversity in perpetuity,
within the context of human activities on the landscape, to prevent additional
species from being listed as endangered or threatened, and to create a more
predictable environment in which to conduct economic activities.

(5) The successful
grantee must invite representatives of the following groups to participate on
the biodiversity conservation committee:

(a) State agencies,
including the departments of fish and wildlife, natural resources, and ecology,
the Puget Sound action team, and the state salmon recovery office;

(b) Federal land
management and natural resource agencies;

(c) Local governments;

(d) Tribes;

(e) Property owners,
including forestry and agriculture;

(f) Business, including
land development;

(g) Academia and
research institutions; and

(h) Conservation
nongovernmental organizations.

(6) The biodiversity
conservation committee must choose a chair from among its members and adopt
operating procedures.

(7) The grant agreement
must be conditioned to require that at least an amount of funding equal to the
state grant be applied to the project from nonstate sources.

(8) The grantee must
provide a final report describing its review and recommendations to the
governor and the appropriate standing committees of the senate and the house of
representatives by October 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The sum of forty-nine
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---