BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.23.030 and 1987 c
363 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The clerk of the
superior court at the expense of the county shall keep the following records:

(1) A record in which
he or she shall enter all appearances and the time of filing all
pleadings in any cause;

(2) A docket in which
before every session, he or she shall enter the titles of all causes
pending before the court at that session in the order in which they were
commenced, beginning with criminal cases, noting in separate columns the names
of the attorneys, the character of the action, the pleadings on which it stands
at the commencement of the session. One copy of this docket shall be furnished
for the use of the court and another for the use of the members of the bar;

(3) A record for each
session in which he or she shall enter the names of witnesses and
jurors, with time of attendance, distance of travel, and whatever else is
necessary to enable him or her to make out a complete cost bill;

(4) A record in which
he or she shall record the daily proceedings of the court, and enter all
verdicts, orders, judgments, and decisions thereof, which may, as provided by
local court rule, be signed by the judge; but the court shall have full control
of all entries in ((said)) the record at any time during the
session in which they were made;

(5) An execution docket
and also one for a final record in which he or she shall make a full and
perfect record of all criminal cases in which a final judgment is rendered, and
all civil cases in which by any order or final judgment the title to real
estate, or any interest therein, is in any way affected, and such other final
judgments, orders, or decisions as the court may require;

(6) A ((journal))
record in which shall be entered all orders, decrees, and judgments made
by the court and the minutes of the court in probate proceedings;

(7) A record of wills
and bonds shall be maintained. Originals shall be placed in the original file
and shall be preserved or duplicated pursuant to RCW 36.23.065;

(8) A record of letters
testamentary, administration, and guardianship in which all letters
testamentary, administration, and guardianship shall be recorded;

(9) A record of claims
shall be entered in the appearance docket under the title of each estate or
case, stating the name of each claimant, the amount of his or her claim
and the date of filing of such;

(10) A memorandum of
the files, in which at least one page shall be given to each estate or case,
wherein shall be noted each paper filed in the case, and the date of filing
each paper;

(11) Such other records
as are prescribed by law and required in the discharge of the duties of his or
her office.

Sec. 2. RCW 6.32.350 and 1893 c
133 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

Each county clerk must
keep in his or her office ((a book)) records indexed to
the names of the judgment debtors, styled "((book)) records
of orders appointing receivers of judgment debtors." A county clerk in
whose office an order or a certified copy of an order is filed, as prescribed
in this chapter, must immediately note thereupon the time of filing it, and as
soon as practicable, must record it in the ((book)) records so
kept by him or her. He or she must also, upon request, furnish
forthwith to any party or person interested, one or more certified copies
thereof. For each omission to comply with any provision of this section, a
county clerk forfeits to the party aggrieved two hundred and fifty dollars, in
addition to all damages sustained by reason of the omission.

Sec. 3. RCW 59.28.040 and 2000 c
255 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as
provided in RCW 59.28.030, all owners of federally assisted housing shall, at
least twelve months before the expiration of the rental assistance contract or
prepayment of a mortgage or loan, serve a written notice of the anticipated
expiration or prepayment date on each tenant household residing in the housing,
on the clerk of the city, or clerk of the county legislative
authority if in an unincorporated area, in which the property is located,
on any public housing agency that would be responsible for administering
tenant-based rental assistance to persons who would otherwise be displaced from
this housing, and on the department of community, trade, and economic
development, by regular and certified mail. All owners of federally assisted
housing shall also serve written notice of the anticipated expiration or
prepayment date on each tenant household that moves into the housing after the
initial notice has been given, but before the expiration of the rental
assistance contract or prepayment of the mortgage or loan. This notice shall
be given before a new tenant is asked to execute a rental agreement or required
to pay any deposits.

---
END ---