BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 72.11.020 and 1989 c
252 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary shall be
custodian of all funds of a convicted person that are in his or her possession
upon admission to a state institution, or that are sent or brought to the
person, or earned by the person while in custody, or that are forwarded to the
superintendent on behalf of a convicted person. All such funds shall be
deposited in the personal account of the convicted person within the institutional
resident deposit account as established by the office of financial management
pursuant to RCW 43.88.195, and the secretary shall have authority to disburse
money from such person's personal account for the purposes of satisfying a
court-ordered legal financial obligation to the court. Legal financial
obligation deductions shall be made as stated in RCW 72.09.111(1) and 72.65.050
without exception. Unless specifically granted authority herein, at no
time shall the withdrawal of funds for the payment of a legal financial
obligation result in reducing the inmate's account to an amount less than the
defined level of indigency to be determined by the department.

Further, unless
specifically altered herein, court-ordered legal financial obligations shall be
paid.

Sec. 2. RCW 72.09.111 and 1999 c
325 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall
deduct from the gross wages or gratuities of each inmate working in
correctional industries work programs, taxes and legal financial obligations.
The secretary shall develop a formula for the distribution of offender wages
and gratuities.

(a) The formula shall
include the following minimum deductions from class I gross wages and from all
others earning at least minimum wage:

(i) Five percent to the
public safety and education account for the purpose of crime victims'
compensation;

(ii) Ten percent to a
department personal inmate savings account; ((and))

(iii) Twenty percent to
the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration; and

(iv) Twenty percent
for payment of legal financial obligations for all inmates who have legal
financial obligations owing in any Washington state superior court.

(b) The formula shall
include the following minimum deductions from class II gross gratuities:

(i) Five percent to the
public safety and education account for the purpose of crime victims'
compensation;

(ii) Ten percent to a
department personal inmate savings account; ((and))

(iii) Fifteen percent
to the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration; and

(iv) Twenty percent
for payment of legal financial obligations for all inmates who have legal
financial obligations owing in any Washington state superior court.

(c) The formula shall
include the following minimum deduction from class IV gross gratuities: Five
percent to the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration.

(d) The formula shall
include the following minimum deductions from class III gratuities: Five
percent for the purpose of crime victims' compensation.

Any person sentenced to
life imprisonment without possibility of release or parole under chapter 10.95
RCW or sentenced to death shall be exempt from the requirement under (a)(ii) or
(b)(ii) of this subsection.

The department personal
inmate savings account, together with any accrued interest, shall only be
available to an inmate at the time of his or her release from confinement, unless
the secretary determines that an emergency exists for the inmate, at which time
the funds can be made available to the inmate in an amount determined by the
secretary. The management of classes I, II, and IV correctional industries may
establish an incentive payment for offender workers based on productivity
criteria. This incentive shall be paid separately from the hourly
wage/gratuity rate and shall not be subject to the specified deduction for cost
of incarceration.

In the event that the
offender worker's wages or gratuity is subject to garnishment for support
enforcement, the crime victims' compensation, savings, and cost of
incarceration deductions shall be calculated on the net wages after taxes,
legal financial obligations, and garnishment.

(2) The department
shall explore other methods of recovering a portion of the cost of the inmate's
incarceration and for encouraging participation in work programs, including
development of incentive programs that offer inmates benefits and amenities
paid for only from wages earned while working in a correctional industries work
program.

(3) The department
shall develop the necessary administrative structure to recover inmates' wages
and keep records of the amount inmates pay for the costs of incarceration and
amenities. All funds deducted from inmate wages under subsection (1) of this
section for the purpose of contributions to the cost of incarceration shall be
deposited in a dedicated fund with the department and shall be used only for
the purpose of enhancing and maintaining correctional industries work programs.

(4) The expansion of
inmate employment in class I and class II correctional industries shall be
implemented according to the following schedule:

(a) Not later than June
30, 1995, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least two hundred in
the number of inmates employed in class I or class II correctional industries
work programs above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;

(b) Not later than June
30, 1996, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least four hundred
in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II correctional
industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;

(c) Not later than June
30, 1997, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least six hundred in
the number of inmates employed in class I or class II correctional industries
work programs above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;

(d) Not later than June
30, 1998, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least nine hundred
in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II correctional
industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;

(e) Not later than June
30, 1999, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least one thousand
two hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II
correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30,
1994;

(f) Not later than June
30, 2000, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least one thousand
five hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II
correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30,
1994.

(5) It shall be in the
discretion of the secretary to apportion the inmates between class I and class
II depending on available contracts and resources.

Sec. 3. RCW 72.65.050 and 1979 c
141 s 278 are each amended to read as follows:

A prisoner employed
under a work release plan shall surrender to the secretary, or to the
superintendent of such state correctional institution as shall be designated by
the secretary in the plan, his or her total earnings, less payroll
deductions required by law, or such payroll deductions as may reasonably be
required by the nature of the employment and less such amount which his or
her work release plan specifies he or she should retain to help meet
his or her personal needs, including costs necessary for his or her
participation in the work release plan such as expenses for travel, meals,
clothing, tools and other incidentals. The secretary, or the superintendent of
the state correctional institution designated in the work release plan shall deduct
from such earnings, and make payments from such work release participant's
earnings in the following order of priority:

(1) Reimbursement to
the department for any expenses advanced for vocational training pursuant to
RCW 72.65.020(2), or for expenses incident to a work release plan pursuant to
RCW 72.65.090.

(2) Payment of board
and room charges for the work release participant: PROVIDED, That if the
participant is housed at a state correctional institution, the average daily
per capita cost for the operation of such correctional institution, excluding
capital outlay expenditures, shall be paid from the work release participant's
earnings to the general fund of the state treasury: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if
such work release participant is housed in another facility pursuant to
agreement, then the charges agreed to between the department and the
appropriate authorities of such facility shall be paid from the participant's
earnings to such appropriate authorities.

(3) Payments for the
necessary support of the work release participant's dependents, if any.

(4) Ten percent for
payment of legal financial obligations for all work release participants who
have legal financial obligations owing in any Washington state superior court.

(5) Payments to
creditors of the work release participant, which may be made at his or her
discretion and request, upon proper proof of personal indebtedness.

(((5)))
(6) Payments to the work release participant himself or herself
upon parole or discharge, or for deposit in his or her personal account
if returned to a state correctional institution for confinement and treatment.

---
END ---