BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. District court judges and
district court personnel have expressed concern regarding their safety and
public safety given the potential for violence during district court sessions.
Under current law, county sheriffs have a duty to provide security for courts
of record. The issue of parity for district court security is a critical
concern for the judiciary and should be the subject of a comprehensive study so
the legislature will have additional information.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) A task force on
district court security is created to study security issues in district
courts. The task force shall consist of at least one judge, but not more than
three judges, from the district and municipal court judges association, at
least one representative, but not more than three representatives, from the
Washington state association of counties, and at least one representative, but
not more than three representatives, from the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs.

(2) The task force must
report the results of its study and any proposed legislation to the legislature
by January 1, 2003.

(3) This
section expires January 2, 2003.

---
END ---