BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.130 and 1997
c 429 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each comprehensive
land use plan and development regulations shall be subject to continuing review
and evaluation by the county or city that adopted them. Not later than
September 1, 2002, and at least every five years thereafter, a county or city
shall take action to review and, if needed, revise its comprehensive land use
plan and development regulations to ensure that the plan and regulations are
complying with the requirements of this chapter. The review and evaluation required
by this subsection may be combined with the review required by subsection (3)
of this section.

Any amendment or
revision to a comprehensive land use plan shall conform to this chapter, and
any change to development regulations shall be consistent with and implement
the comprehensive plan.

(2)(a) Each county and
city shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a public
participation program identifying procedures whereby proposed amendments or
revisions of the comprehensive plan are considered by the governing body of the
county or city no more frequently than once every year except that amendments
may be considered more frequently under the following circumstances:

(i) The governing
body of the county or city may by ordinance or resolution establish a procedure
for consideration of amendments no more frequently than once every six months;

(ii) The initial
adoption of a subarea plan;

(((ii))) (iii)
The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under the procedures
set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW; and

(((iii))) (iv)
The amendment of the capital facilities element of a comprehensive plan that
occurs concurrently with the adoption or amendment of a county or city budget.

(b) Except as otherwise
provided in (a) of this subsection, all proposals shall be considered by the
governing body concurrently so the cumulative effect of the various proposals
can be ascertained. However, after appropriate public participation a county
or city may adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that
conform with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board or with
the court.

(3) Each
county that designates urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110 shall review, at
least every ten years, its designated urban growth area or areas, and the
densities permitted within both the incorporated and unincorporated portions of
each urban growth area. In conjunction with this review by the county, each
city located within an urban growth area shall review the densities permitted
within its boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring
within the county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions
of the urban growth areas. The county comprehensive plan designating urban
growth areas, and the densities permitted in the urban growth areas by the
comprehensive plans of the county and each city located within the urban growth
areas, shall be revised to accommodate the urban growth projected to occur in
the county for the succeeding twenty-year period. The review required by this
subsection may be combined with the review and evaluation required by RCW
36.70A.215.

--- END ---