BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 361, 2001 c 300 s 4, 2001 c 217 s 12, and 2001 c 17 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Sexually
Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

((Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)))

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity
Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(a))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by
the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Vehicular
Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety
of others (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity
Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(b))

Improperly
Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.030 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 301, 2001 c 300 s 3, and 2001 c 7 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Board" means
the indeterminate sentence review board created under chapter 9.95 RCW.

(2)
"Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit,"
or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection agreement
authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring and enforcing the
offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial obligation, receiving
payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with current law, delivering
daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk without depositing it in a
departmental account.

(3)
"Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(4) "Community
corrections officer" means an employee of the department who is responsible
for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced offenders and
monitoring of sentence conditions.

(5) "Community
custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence of confinement in
lieu of earned release time or imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b),
9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670, 9.94A.690, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or
9.94A.545, served in the community subject to controls placed on the offender's
movement and activities by the department. For offenders placed on community
custody for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department shall
assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and modify conditions
of community custody, in addition to those imposed by the court, based upon the
risk to community safety.

(6) "Community
custody range" means the minimum and maximum period of community custody
included as part of a sentence under RCW 9.94A.715, as established by the
commission or the legislature under RCW 9.94A.850, for crimes committed on or
after July 1, 2000.

(7) "Community
placement" means that period during which the offender is subject to the
conditions of community custody and/or postrelease supervision, which begins
either upon completion of the term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or
at such time as the offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of
earned release. Community placement may consist of entirely community custody,
entirely postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.

(8) "Community
service" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the
benefit of the community by the offender.

(9) "Community
supervision" means a period of time during which a convicted offender is
subject to crime-related prohibitions and other sentence conditions imposed by
a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW 16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the
court finds that any offender has a chemical dependency that has contributed to
his or her offense, the conditions of supervision may, subject to available
resources, include treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for
out-of-state supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be considered
the same as probation by other states.

(10)
"Confinement" means total or partial confinement.

(11)
"Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles 10 or
13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of
a plea of guilty.

(12)
"Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting
conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the
offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders
directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs
or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts
necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by
the department.

(13) "Criminal
history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions and juvenile
adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or elsewhere. The
history shall include, where known, for each conviction (a) whether the
defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms thereof; and
(b) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of
incarceration.

(14) "Day
fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that equals the
difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable
obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any
dependents.

(15) "Day
reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to monitor the
offender's daily activities and compliance with sentence conditions, and in
which the offender is required to report daily to a specific location
designated by the department or the sentencing court.

(16)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(17) "Determinate
sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude the number of
actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial confinement, of
community supervision, the number of actual hours or days of community service
work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement
shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate sentence.

(18) "Disposable
earnings" means that part of the earnings of an offender remaining after
the deduction from those earnings of any amount required by law to be
withheld. For the purposes of this definition, "earnings" means
compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as
wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and, notwithstanding any
other provision of law making the payments exempt from garnishment, attachment,
or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation,
specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement
programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050, or Title
74 RCW.

(19) "Drug
offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option available to
persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent offense or a sex
offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW 9.94A.660.

(20) "Drug
offense" means:

(a) Any felony
violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(d)) or forged prescription for a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.403);

(b) Any offense defined
as a felony under federal law that relates to the possession, manufacture,
distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance; or

(c) Any out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(21) "Earned
release" means earned release from confinement as provided in RCW
9.94A.728.

(22) "Escape"
means:

(a) Sexually violent
predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110),
escape in the second degree (RCW 9A.76.120), willful failure to return from
furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful failure to return from work release (RCW
72.65.070), or willful failure to be available for supervision by the
department while in community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this subsection.

(23) "Felony
traffic offense" means:

(a) Vehicular homicide
(RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding a police officer
(RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(24) "Fine"
means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the
offender to the court over a specific period of time.

(25) "First-time
offender" means any person who has no prior convictions for a felony and
is eligible for the first-time offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.

(26) "Home
detention" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders
wherein the offender is confined in a private residence subject to electronic
surveillance.

(27) "Legal
financial obligation" means a sum of money that is ordered by a superior
court of the state of Washington for legal financial obligations which may
include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed crime victims'
compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or
interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense,
fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a
result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or
vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial obligations may also include payment
to a public agency of the expense of an emergency response to the incident
resulting in the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.

(28) "Most serious
offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit
any of the following felonies:

(a) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation of or criminal
conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b) Assault in the
second degree;

(c) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(d) Child molestation
in the second degree;

(e) Controlled
substance homicide;

(f) Extortion in the
first degree;

(g) Incest when
committed against a child under age fourteen;

(h) Indecent liberties;

(i) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(j) Leading organized
crime;

(k) Manslaughter in the
first degree;

(l) Manslaughter in the
second degree;

(m) Promoting
prostitution in the first degree;

(n) Rape in the third
degree;

(o) Robbery in the
second degree;

(p) Sexual
exploitation;

(q) Vehicular assault,
when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving
of a vehicle in a reckless manner;

(r) Vehicular homicide,
when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502,
or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(s) Any other class B
felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation;

(t) Any other felony
with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.602;

(u) Any felony offense
in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is comparable to a most
serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(v)(i) A prior
conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c),
chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW
9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11,
1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986,
until July 1, 1988;

(ii) A prior conviction
for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11,
1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was committed against a child
under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and
perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997, or RCW
9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993, through July 27,
1997.

(29) "Nonviolent
offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.

(30)
"Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by
state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is less than eighteen years
of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030
or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms
"offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.

(31) "Partial
confinement" means confinement for no more than one year in a facility or
institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit
of government, or, if home detention or work crew has been ordered by the
court, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the
balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work
release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and home
detention.

(32) "Persistent
offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i) Has been
convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious offense; and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this state or
elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be considered
most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score under RCW
9.94A.525; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one
conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i) Has been
convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the first
degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible compulsion;
(B) any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder
in the first degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping
in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first degree,
or burglary in the first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed
in this subsection (32)(b)(i); and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or elsewhere, of an
offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection or any federal or out-of-state
offense or offense under prior Washington law that is comparable to the
offenses listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child
in the first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the offender
committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second degree
constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender
was eighteen years of age or older when the offender committed the offense.

(33) "Postrelease
supervision" is that portion of an offender's community placement that is
not community custody.

(34)
"Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specified period of time
as payment of damages. The sum may include both public and private costs.

(35) "Risk
assessment" means the application of an objective instrument supported by
research and adopted by the department for the purpose of assessing an offender's
risk of reoffense, taking into consideration the nature of the harm done by the
offender, place and circumstances of the offender related to risk, the
offender's relationship to any victim, and any information provided to the
department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not be based on
unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

(36) "Serious
traffic offense" means:

(a) Driving while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), actual
physical control while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended
vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or

(b) Any federal,
out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the
laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(37) "Serious
violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and means:

(a)(i) Murder in the
first degree;

(ii) Homicide by abuse;

(iii) Murder in the
second degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(v) Vehicular
homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.502;

(vi) Assault in
the first degree;

(((vi))) (vii)
Kidnapping in the first degree;

(((vii))) (viii)
Rape in the first degree;

(((viii))) (ix)
Assault of a child in the first degree; or

(((ix))) (x)
An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of
these felonies; or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(38) "Sex
offense" means:

(a)(i) A felony that is
a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than RCW 9A.44.130(11);

(ii) A violation of RCW
9A.64.020;

(iii) A felony that is
a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than RCW 9.68A.070 or 9.68A.080; or

(iv) A felony that is,
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal
conspiracy to commit such crimes;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this subsection;

(c) A felony with a
finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or

(d) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this subsection.

(39) "Sexual
motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the defendant
committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification.

(40) "Standard
sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in
imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(41) "Statutory
maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time for which an offender
may be confined as punishment for a crime as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW,
RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the crime, or other statute defining the
maximum penalty for a crime.

(42) "Total
confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries of a
facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any
other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW
72.64.050 and 72.64.060.

(43) "Transition
training" means written and verbal instructions and assistance provided by
the department to the offender during the two weeks prior to the offender's
successful completion of the work ethic camp program. The transition training
shall include instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations
during the offender's period of community custody.

(44) "Victim"
means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or
financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the crime charged.

(45) "Violent
offense" means:

(a) Any of the
following felonies:

(i) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony;

(ii) Criminal
solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(iii) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the second degree;

(v) Indecent liberties
if committed by forcible compulsion;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(vii) Arson in the
second degree;

(viii) Assault in the
second degree;

(ix) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(x) Extortion in the
first degree;

(xi) Robbery in the
second degree;

(xii) Drive-by
shooting; and

(xiii) Vehicular
assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner((; and

(xiv) Vehicular
homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner));

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of this
subsection; and

(c) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b) of this
subsection.

(46) "Work
crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of civic
improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that complies with RCW
9.94A.725.

(47) "Work ethic
camp" means an alternative incarceration program as provided in RCW
9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by
requiring offenders to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and
vocational experiences, character-building work ethics training, life
management skills development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling,
literacy training, and basic adult education.

(48)
"Work release" means a program of partial confinement available to
offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study
at school.

---
END ---