BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that:

(a) The trafficking in
persons is a modern form of slavery, and it is the largest manifestation of
slavery today;

(b) At least seven
hundred thousand persons annually, primarily women and children, are trafficked
within or across international borders;

(c) Approximately fifty
thousand women and children are trafficked into the United States each year;

(d) Trafficking in
persons is not limited to the sex industry, and includes forced labor with
significant violations of labor, public health, and human rights standards
worldwide;

(e) Traffickers
primarily target women and girls, who are disproportionately affected by
poverty, the lack of access to education, chronic unemployment, discrimination,
and the lack of economic opportunities in countries of origin; and

(f) There are not
adequate services and facilities to meet the needs of trafficking victims
regarding health care, housing, education, and legal assistance, which safely
reintegrate trafficking victims into their home countries.

(2) The legislature
declares that the purpose of this act is to provide a coordinated, humane
response for victims of human trafficking through a review of existing programs
and clarification of existing options for such victims.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) There is created the
Washington state task force against the trafficking of persons.

(2) The task force
shall consist of the following members:

(a) The director of the
office of community development, or the director's designee;

(b) The secretary of
the department of health, or the secretary's designee;

(c) The secretary of
the department of social and health services, or the secretary's designee;

(d) The director of the
department of labor and industries, or the director's designee;

(e) The commissioner of
the employment security department, or the commissioner's designee;

(f) Nine members,
selected by the director of the office of community development, that represent
public and private sector organizations that provide assistance to persons who
are victims of trafficking.

(3) The task force
shall be chaired by the director of the office of community development, or the
director's designee.

(4) The task force
shall carry out the following activities:

(a) Measure and
evaluate the progress of the state in trafficking prevention activities;

(b) Identify available
federal, state, and local programs that provide services to victims of
trafficking that include, but are not limited to health care, human services,
housing, education, legal assistance, job training or preparation, interpreting
services, English as a second language classes, and victim's compensation; and

(c) Make
recommendations on methods to provide a coordinated system of support and
assistance to persons who are victims of trafficking.

(5) The task force
shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and legislature
by November 30, 2002.

(6) The office of
community development shall provide necessary administrative and clerical
support to the task force.

(7) The members of the
task force shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(8) The task force
expires March 1, 2003.

Sec. 3. RCW 7.68.020 and 2001 c
136 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The following words and
phrases as used in this chapter have the meanings set forth in this section
unless the context otherwise requires.

(1)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(2) "Criminal
act" means an act committed or attempted in this state which is: (a) Punishable
as a felony or gross misdemeanor under the laws of this state((, or));
(b) punishable under federal law comparable to a felony or gross misdemeanor
under the laws of this state; (c) an act committed outside the state of
Washington against a resident of the state of Washington which would be
compensable had it occurred inside this state((;)) and the crime
occurred in a state which does not have a crime victims compensation program,
for which the victim is eligible as set forth in the Washington compensation
law((,)); or (d) an act of terrorism as defined in 18
U.S.C. Sec. 2331, as it exists on May 2, 1997, committed outside of the United
States against a resident of the state of Washington, except as follows:

(((a))) (i)
The operation of a motor vehicle, motorcycle, train, boat, or aircraft in
violation of law does not constitute a "criminal act" unless:

(((i))) (A)
The injury or death was intentionally inflicted;

(((ii))) (B)
The operation thereof was part of the commission of another non-vehicular
criminal act as defined in this section;

(((iii))) (C)
The death or injury was the result of the operation of a motor vehicle after
July 24, 1983, and a preponderance of the evidence establishes that the death
was the result of vehicular homicide under RCW 46.61.520, or a conviction of
vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522, has been obtained: PROVIDED, That in
cases where a probable criminal defendant has died in perpetration of vehicular
assault or, in cases where the perpetrator of the vehicular assault is
unascertainable because he or she left the scene of the accident in violation
of RCW 46.52.020 or, because of physical or mental infirmity or disability the
perpetrator is incapable of standing trial for vehicular assault, the
department may, by a preponderance of the evidence, establish that a vehicular
assault had been committed and authorize benefits; or

(((iv))) (D)
The injury or death was caused by a driver in violation of RCW 46.61.502;

(((b))) (ii)
Neither an acquittal in a criminal prosecution nor the absence of any such
prosecution is admissible in any claim or proceeding under this chapter as
evidence of the noncriminal character of the acts giving rise to such claim or
proceeding, except as provided for in ((subsection (2)(a)(iii) of this
section)) (d)(i)(C) of this subsection;

(((c))) (iii)
Evidence of a criminal conviction arising from acts which are the basis for a
claim or proceeding under this chapter is admissible in such claim or
proceeding for the limited purpose of proving the criminal character of the
acts; and

(((d))) (iv)
Acts which, but for the insanity or mental irresponsibility of the perpetrator,
would constitute criminal conduct are deemed to be criminal conduct within the
meaning of this chapter.

(3) "Victim"
means a person who suffers bodily injury or death as a proximate result of a
criminal act of another person, the victim's own good faith and reasonable
effort to prevent a criminal act, or his or her good faith effort to
apprehend a person reasonably suspected of engaging in a criminal act. For the
purposes of receiving benefits pursuant to this chapter, "victim" is
interchangeable with "employee" or "((workman)) worker"
as defined in chapter 51.08 RCW as now or hereafter amended.

(4) "Child,"
"accredited school," "dependent," "beneficiary,"
"average monthly wage," "director," "injury,"
"invalid," "permanent partial disability," and "permanent
total disability" have the meanings assigned to them in chapter 51.08 RCW
as now or hereafter amended.

(5) "Gainfully
employed" means engaging on a regular and continuous basis in a lawful
activity from which a person derives a livelihood.

(6) "Private
insurance" means any source of recompense provided by contract available
as a result of the claimed injury or death at the time of such injury or death,
or which becomes available any time thereafter.

(7)
"Public insurance" means any source of recompense provided by
statute, state or federal, available as a result of the claimed injury or death
at the time of such injury or death, or which becomes available any time
thereafter.

---
END ---