BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds,
declares, and determines that limited changes in the law are necessary and
appropriate concerning actions claiming damages, indemnity, or contribution in
connection with alleged construction defects resulting in property loss or
damage. It is the intent of the legislature that this chapter apply to these
types of civil actions while preserving adequate rights and remedies for
property owners who bring and maintain such actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Action"
means any civil action in contract or tort for damages or indemnity brought
against a construction professional to assert a claim, whether by complaint,
counterclaim, or cross-claim, for damage or the loss of use of real or personal
property caused by a defect in the construction or remodel of more than half of
a residence. "Action" does not include any civil action in tort
alleging physical injury or wrongful death to a person or persons resulting
from a construction defect.

(2) "Association"
means an association, master association, or subassociation as defined and
provided for in RCW 64.34.020(4), 64.34.276, 64.34.278, and 64.38.010(1).

(3)
"Claimant" means a homeowner, association, or a construction
professional who asserts a claim against a construction professional concerning
a defect in the construction or remodel of more than half of a residence.

(4) "Construction
professional" means an architect, builder, builder vendor, contractor,
engineer, or inspector, including, but not limited to, a dealer as defined in
RCW 64.34.020(12) and a declarant as defined in RCW 64.34.020(13), performing
or furnishing the design, supervision, inspection, construction, or observation
of the construction of any improvement to real property, whether operating as a
sole proprietor, partnership, corporation, or other business entity.

(5)
"Homeowner" means any person, company, firm, partnership,
corporation, or association who contracts with a construction professional for
the construction, sale, or construction and sale of a residence.
"Homeowner" includes, but is not limited to, a subsequent purchaser
of a residence from any homeowner.

(6)
"Residence" means a single-family house, duplex, triplex, quadraplex,
or a unit in a multiunit residential structure in which title to each
individual unit is transferred to the owner under a condominium or cooperative
system, and shall include common elements as defined in RCW 64.34.020(6) and
common areas as defined in RCW 64.38.010(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) In every construction
defect action brought against a construction professional, the claimant shall,
no later than forty-five days before filing an action, serve written notice on
the construction professional, by registered mail or personal service. The
notice of claim shall state that the claimant asserts a construction defect
claim against the construction professional and shall describe the claim in
reasonable detail.

(2) Within twenty-one
days after service of the notice of claim, the construction professional shall
serve a written response on the claimant by registered mail or personal
service. The written response shall:

(a) Propose to inspect
the residence that is the subject of the claim within a specified time frame.
The proposal shall include the statement that the construction professional
shall, based on the inspection, offer to remedy the defect, compromise by
payment, or dispute the claim;

(b) Offer to compromise
and settle the claim by monetary payment without inspection. An offer made
under this subsection (2)(b) to compromise and settle a homeowner's claim
includes, but is not limited to, an express offer to purchase the claimant's
residence that is the subject of the claim, and to pay the claimant's
reasonable relocation costs; or

(c) State that the
construction professional disputes the claim and will neither remedy the
construction defect nor compromise and settle the claim.

(3)(a) If the
construction professional disputes the claim or does not respond to the
claimant's notice of claim, the claimant may, in accordance with this chapter,
bring an action against the construction professional for the claim described
in the notice of claim.

(b) If the claimant
rejects the inspection proposal or the settlement offer made by the
construction professional pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the
claimant shall serve written notice of the claimant's rejection on the
construction professional by registered mail or personal service. After
service of the rejection, the claimant may, in accordance with this chapter,
bring an action against the construction professional for the construction
defect claim described in the notice of claim.

(4)(a) If the claimant
elects to consider the inspection proposal of the construction professional
made pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, the claimant shall provide
the construction professional and its contractors or other agents reasonable access
to the claimant's residence during normal working hours to inspect the premises
and the claimed defect so that the construction professional may verify the
claim.

(b) Within fourteen
days following the inspection, the construction professional shall serve on the
claimant, by registered mail or personal service:

(i) A written offer to
remedy the construction defect at no cost to the claimant, including a
description of the additional construction that the construction professional
has determined from the inspection will be necessary to remedy the defect, and
a timetable for the completion of such construction;

(ii) A written offer to
compromise and settle the claim by monetary payment pursuant to subsection
(2)(b) of this section; or

(iii) A written statement
that the construction professional will not proceed further to remedy the
defect.

(c) If the construction
professional does not proceed further to remedy the construction defect, or if
the construction professional fails to comply with the provisions of (b) of
this subsection, the claimant may bring an action against the construction
professional for the claim described in the notice of claim.

(d) If the claimant
rejects the offer made by the construction professional pursuant to (b)(i) or
(ii) of this subsection to either remedy the construction defect or to
compromise and settle the claim by monetary payment, the claimant shall serve
written notice of the claimant's rejection on the construction professional by
registered mail or personal service. After service of the rejection notice,
the claimant may, in accordance with this chapter, bring an action against the
construction professional for the construction defect claim described in the
notice of claim.

(5)(a) Any claimant
accepting the offer of a construction professional to remedy the construction
defect pursuant to subsection (4)(b)(i) of this section shall do so by serving
the construction professional with a written notice of acceptance, by personal
service or registered mail, within a reasonable time period after receipt of
the offer. The claimant shall promptly provide the construction professional
and its contractors or other agents reasonable access to the claimant's
residence during normal working hours to perform and complete the construction
by the timetable stated in the offer.

(b) The claimant and
construction professional may, by written mutual agreement, alter the extent of
construction or the timetable for completion of construction stated in the
offer.

(6) No action may be commenced
until after the claimant has complied with the requirements of this section.

(7) Nothing in this
section may be construed to prevent a claimant from commencing an action on the
construction defect claim described in the notice of claim if:

(a) The construction
professional fails to perform the construction agreed upon, fails to remedy the
defect as defined by the terms of the agreement under subsection (5) of this
section, or fails to perform by the timetable agreed upon pursuant to
subsection (2)(a) or (5) of this section; or

(b) Notwithstanding the
completion of the construction agreed upon, the claimant later discovers latent
construction defects that the claimant attributes to the construction
professional, but that were not discoverable by a reasonable person at the time
of such completion. Any claimant who intends to bring an action for such
latent construction defects may do so only after complying with the
requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) In every action
brought against a construction professional, the claimant shall file with the
court and serve on the defendant a list of construction defects in accordance
with this section.

(2) The list of
construction defects shall contain a description of the construction that the
claimant alleges to be defective. The list of construction defects shall be
filed with the court and served on the defendant within thirty days after the
commencement of the action or within such longer period as the court in its
discretion may allow.

(3) The list of
construction defects may be amended by the claimant to identify additional
construction defects as they become known to the claimant.

(4) The list of defects
must specify, to the extent known to the claimant, the construction
professional responsible for each alleged defect identified by the claimant.

(5) If a subcontractor
or supplier is added as a party to an action under this section, the claimant
making the claim against such subcontractor or supplier shall file with the
court and serve on the defendant the list of construction defects in accordance
with this section within thirty days after service of the complaint against the
subcontractor or supplier or within such period as the court in its discretion may
allow.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1)(a) In the event the
board of directors, pursuant to RCW 64.34.304(1)(d) or 64.38.020(4), institutes
an action asserting defects in the construction of two or more residences,
common elements, or common areas, this section shall apply. For purposes of this
section, "action" has the same meaning as set forth in section 2 of
this act.

(b) The board of
directors shall substantially comply with the provisions of this section.

(2)(a) Prior to the
service of the summons and complaint on any defendant with respect to an action
governed by this section, the board of directors shall mail or deliver written
notice of the commencement or anticipated commencement of such action to each
homeowner at the last known address described in the association's records.

(b) The notice required
by (a) of this subsection shall state a general description of the following:

(i) The nature of the
action and the relief sought; and

(ii) The expenses and
fees that the board of directors anticipates will be incurred in prosecuting
the action.

(3) Nothing in this
section may be construed to:

(a) Require the
disclosure in the notice or the disclosure to a unit owner of attorney-client
communications or other privileged communications;

(b) Permit the notice
to serve as a basis for any person to assert the waiver of any applicable
privilege or right of confidentiality resulting from, or to claim immunity in
connection with, the disclosure of information in the notice; or

(c) Limit or impair the
authority of the board of directors to contract for legal services, or limit or
impair the ability to enforce such a contract for legal services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Nothing in this chapter
shall be construed to hinder or otherwise affect the employment relationship
between and among homeowners and construction professionals during the process
of construction or remodeling and does not preclude the termination of those
relationships as allowed under current law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 4.16 RCW to read as follows:

If a written notice is
filed under section 3 of this act within the time prescribed for the filing of
an action under this chapter, the period of time during which the filing of an
action is barred under section 3 of this act shall not be a part of the period
limited for the commencement of an action.

Sec. 8. RCW 64.34.452 and 1990 c
166 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A judicial
proceeding for breach of any obligations arising under RCW 64.34.443 and
64.34.445 must be commenced within four years after the cause of action
accrues: PROVIDED, That the period for commencing an action for a breach
accruing pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section shall not expire prior
to one year after termination of the period of declarant control, if any, under
RCW 64.34.308(4). Such period may not be reduced by either oral or written
agreement.

(2) Subject to
subsection (3) of this section, a cause of action or breach of warranty of
quality, regardless of the purchaser's lack of knowledge of the breach,
accrues:

(a) As to a unit, the
date the purchaser to whom the warranty is first made enters into possession if
a possessory interest was conveyed or the date of acceptance of the instrument
of conveyance if a nonpossessory interest was conveyed; and

(b) As to each common
element, at the latest of (i) the date the first unit in the condominium was
conveyed to a bona fide purchaser, (ii) the date the common element was
completed, or (iii) the date the common element was added to the condominium.

(3) If a warranty of
quality explicitly extends to future performance or duration of any improvement
or component of the condominium, the cause of action accrues at the time the
breach is discovered or at the end of the period for which the warranty
explicitly extends, whichever is earlier.

(4) If a written
notice is filed under section 3 of this act within the time prescribed for the
filing of an action under this chapter, the period of time during which the
filing of an action is barred under section 3 of this act shall not be a part
of the period limited for the commencement of an action.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 64 RCW.

---
END ---