BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to provide increased consumer awareness on the part of persons living abroad
regarding Washington residents who utilize international matchmaking services
for purposes of establishing relationships with those living abroad. The
legislature recognizes that persons living abroad are already required to
provide background information to the federal government during visa
applications, but, unlike residents of the United States, are unlikely to have
the means to access and fully verify personal history information about
prospective spouses residing in the United States. The legislature does not
intend to impede the ability of any person to establish a marital or romantic
relationship, but rather to increase the ability of persons living abroad to
make informed decisions about Washington residents.

The legislature does not
intend to adversely impact in any way those businesses who offer international
matchmaking services on a not for fee basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) Each international
matchmaking organization doing business in Washington state shall disseminate
to a recruit, upon request, state background check information and marital
history information relating to any Washington state resident about whom any
information is provided to the recruit, in the recruit's native language. The organization
shall notify all recruits that background check and marital history information
is available upon request.

(2) If an international
matchmaking organization receives a request for information from a recruit
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the organization shall notify the
Washington state resident of the request. Upon receiving notification, the
Washington state resident shall obtain from the state patrol and provide to the
organization the complete transcript of any background check information
provided pursuant to RCW 43.43.760 based on a submission of fingerprint
impressions and provided pursuant to RCW 43.43.838 and shall provide to the
organization his or her marital history information. The organization shall
require the resident to affirm that marital history information is complete and
accurate, and includes any information regarding marriages, annulments, and
dissolutions which occurred in other states or countries. The organization
shall refrain from knowingly providing any further services to the recruit or
the Washington state resident in regards to facilitating future interaction
between the recruit and the Washington state resident until the organization
has obtained the requested information and provided it to the recruit.

(3) This section does
not apply to a traditional matchmaking organization of a religious nature that
otherwise operates in compliance with the laws of the countries of the recruits
of such organization and the laws of the United States nor to any organization
that does not charge a fee to any party for the service provided.

(4) As used in this
section:

(a) "International
matchmaking organization" means a corporation, partnership, business, or
other legal entity, whether or not organized under the laws of the United
States or any state, that does business in the United States and for profit
offers to Washington state residents, including aliens lawfully admitted for
permanent residence and residing in Washington state, dating, matrimonial, or
social referral services involving citizens of a foreign country or countries
who are not residing in the United States, by: (i) An exchange of names,
telephone numbers, addresses, or statistics; (ii) selection of photographs; or
(iii) a social environment provided by the organization in a country other than
the United States.

(b) "Marital
history information" means a declaration of the person's current marital
status, the number of times the person has previously been married, and whether
any previous marriages occurred as a result of receiving services from an
international matchmaking organization.

(c) "Recruit"
means a noncitizen, nonresident person, recruited by an international
matchmaking organization for the purpose of providing dating, matrimonial, or
social referral services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. For purposes of
establishing personal jurisdiction under this act, an international matchmaking
organization is deemed to be doing business in Washington and therefore subject
to specific jurisdiction if it contracts for matchmaking services with a
Washington resident or if it is considered to be doing business under any other
provision or rule of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The legislature finds
that the practices covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the
public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in relation
to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.43.760 and 2001 c
217 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a resident
of this state appears before any law enforcement agency and requests an
impression of his or her fingerprints to be made, such agency may comply with
his or her request and make the required copies of the impressions on forms
marked "Personal Identification". The required copies shall be
forwarded to the section and marked "for personal identification
only".

The section shall
accept and file such fingerprints submitted voluntarily by such resident, for
the purpose of securing a more certain and easy identification in case of
death, injury, loss of memory, or other similar circumstances. Upon the
request of such person, the section shall return his or her identification
data.

(2) Whenever a person
claiming to be a victim of identity theft appears before any law enforcement
agency and requests an impression of his or her fingerprints to be made, such
agency may comply with this request and make the required copies of the
impressions on forms marked "Personal Identification." The required
copies shall be forwarded to the section and marked "for personal
identification only."

The section shall
accept and file such fingerprints submitted by such resident, for the purpose
of securing a more certain and easy identification in cases of identity theft.
The section shall provide a statement showing that the victim's impression of
fingerprints has been accepted and filed with the section.

The statement provided
to the victim shall state clearly in twelve-point print:

"The person
holding this statement has claimed to be a victim of identity theft. Pursuant
to chapter 9.35 RCW, a business is required by law to provide this victim with
copies of all relevant application and transaction information related to the
transaction being alleged as a potential or actual identity theft. A business
must provide this information once the victim makes a request in writing, shows
this statement, any government issued photo identification card, and a copy of
a police report."

Upon the request of
such person, the section shall return his or her identification data.

(3) Whenever any person
is an applicant for appointment to any position or is an applicant for
employment or is an applicant for a license to be issued by any governmental
agency, and the law or a regulation of such governmental agency requires that
the applicant be of good moral character or not have been convicted of a crime,
or is an applicant for appointment to or employment with a criminal justice
agency, or the department, or is an applicant for the services of an
international matchmaking organization, the applicant may request any law
enforcement agency to make an impression of his or her fingerprints to be
submitted to the section. The law enforcement agency may comply with such
request and make copies of the impressions on forms marked
"applicant", and submit such copies to the section.

The section shall
accept such fingerprints and shall cause its files to be examined and shall
promptly send to the appointing authority, employer, ((or)) licensing
authority, or international matchmaking organization indicated on the
form of application, a transcript of the record of previous crimes committed by
the person described on the data submitted, or a transcript of the dependency
record information regarding the person described on the data submitted, or if
there is no record of his or her commission of any crimes, or if there is no
dependency record information, a statement to that effect.

(4) The Washington
state patrol shall charge fees for processing of noncriminal justice system
requests for criminal history record information pursuant to this section which
will cover, as nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs to the
patrol of processing such requests.

Any law enforcement
agency may charge a fee not to exceed five dollars for the purpose of taking
fingerprint impressions or searching its files of identification for
noncriminal purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Sections 1 through 4 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act takes effect
September 1, 2002.

---
END ---