BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 63.14.090 and 1993 c
481 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The holder of any
retail installment contract, retail charge agreement, or lender credit card
agreement may not collect any delinquency or collection charges, including any
attorney's fee and court costs and disbursements, unless the contract, charge
agreement, or lender credit card agreement so provides. In such cases, the
charges shall be reasonable, and no attorney's fee may be recovered unless the
contract, charge agreement, or lender credit card agreement is referred for
collection to an attorney not a salaried employee of the holder.

(2) The contract,
charge agreement, or lender credit card agreement may contain other provisions
not inconsistent with the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited
to provisions relating to refinancing, transfer of the buyer's equity,
construction permits, and title reports.

(3)(a)
Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, where the minimum payment is
received within the ten days following the payment due date, delinquency
charges for the late payment of a retail charge agreement or lender credit card
agreement may not be more than ten percent of the average balance of the
delinquent account for the prior thirty-day period when the average balance of
the account for the prior thirty-day period is less than one hundred dollars,
except that a minimum charge of up to two dollars shall be allowed. This
subsection (3)(a) shall not apply in cases where the payment on the
account is more than thirty days overdue.

(b) In no cases may
delinquency charges be assessed against a new account's initial invoice until
the account is forty-five days overdue.

(4)(a) In assessing
delinquency charges, the holder of any retail installment contract, retail
charge agreement, or lender credit card agreement must make reasonable
allowances for disruption to the mail service. If the postmark on the payment
indicates it was mailed within a reasonable time of the due date and the delay
was due to a disruption to the mail service, the delinquency charge must be
removed from the account.

(b) Delinquency
charges for the late payment of a retail installment contract, retail charge
agreement, or lender credit card agreement must be immediately removed from the
account if the amount in delinquency is disputed by the account holder. Such
charges may not be returned to the account until the dispute is resolved.

(c)
Delinquency charges may not be assessed for the late payment or nonpayment of
delinquency charges.

--- END ---