BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be known
and cited as the uniform money services act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. PURPOSE. It is the
intent of the legislature to establish a state system of licensure and
regulation to ensure the safe and sound operation of money transmission and
currency exchange businesses, to ensure that these businesses are not used for
terrorist or criminal purposes, to promote confidence in the state's financial
system, and to protect the public interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Affiliate" means any person who directly or indirectly through one
or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control
with, another person.

(2)
"Applicant" means a person that files an application for a license
under this chapter, including the applicant's proposed responsible individual
and executive officers, and persons in control of the applicant.

(3) "Authorized
delegate" means a person a licensee designates to provide money services
on behalf of the licensee. A person that is exempt from licensing under this
chapter cannot have an authorized delegate.

(4) "Financial
institution" means any person doing business under the laws of any state
or the United States relating to commercial banks, bank holding companies,
savings banks, savings and loan associations, trust companies, or credit
unions.

(5) "Control"
means:

(a) Ownership of, or
the power to vote, directly or indirectly, at least twenty-five percent of a
class of voting securities or voting interests of a licensee or applicant, or
person in control of a licensee or applicant;

(b) Power to elect a
majority of executive officers, managers, directors, trustees, or other persons
exercising managerial authority of a licensee or applicant, or person in
control of a licensee or applicant; or

(c) Power to exercise
directly or indirectly, a controlling influence over the management or policies
of a licensee or applicant, or person in control of a licensee or applicant.

(6) "Currency
exchange" means exchanging the money of one government for money of
another government, or holding oneself out as able to exchange the money of one
government for money of another government. The following persons are not
considered currency exchangers:

(a) Affiliated
businesses that engage in currency exchange for a business purpose other than
currency exchange;

(b) A person who
provides currency exchange services for a person acting primarily for a
business, commercial, agricultural, or investment purpose when the currency
exchange is incidental to the transaction;

(c) A person who deals
in coins or a person who deals in money whose value is primarily determined because
it is rare, old, or collectible; and

(d) A person who in the
regular course of business chooses to accept from a customer the currency of a
country other than the United States in order to complete the sale of a good or
service other than currency exchange, that may include cash back to the
customer, and does not otherwise trade in currencies or transmit money for
compensation or gain.

(7) "Executive
officer" means a president, chairperson of the executive committee, chief
financial officer, responsible individual, or other individual who performs
similar functions.

(8)
"Licensee" means a person licensed under this chapter.

(9) "Material
litigation" means litigation that according to generally accepted
accounting principles is significant to an applicant's or a licensee's
financial health and would be required to be disclosed in the applicant's or
licensee's annual audited financial statements, report to shareholders, or
similar records.

(10) "Money"
means a medium of exchange that is authorized or adopted by the United States
or a foreign government or other recognized medium of exchange.
"Money" includes a monetary unit of account established by an
intergovernmental organization or by agreement between two or more governments.

(11) "Money services"
means money transmission or currency exchange.

(12) "Money
transmission" means receiving money or its equivalent value to transmit,
deliver, or instruct to be delivered the money or its equivalent value to
another location, inside or outside the United States, by any means including
but not limited to by wire, facsimile, or electronic transfer. "Money
transmission" does not include the provision solely of online or
telecommunications services, or network access.

(13) "Outstanding
money transmission" means the value of all money transmissions reported to
the licensee for which the money transmitter has received money or its
equivalent value from the customer for transmission, but has not yet completed
the money transmission by delivering the money or monetary value to the person
designated by the customer.

(14) "Payment
instrument" means a check, draft, money order, traveler's check, or other
instrument for the transmission or payment of money or its equivalent value,
whether or not negotiable. "Payment instrument" does not include a
credit card voucher, letter of credit, or instrument that is redeemable by the
issuer in goods or services.

(15) "Person"
means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership,
limited liability company, association, joint venture; government, governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; public corporation; or any other legal
or commercial entity.

(16) "Record"
means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium, or that is stored in
an electronic or other medium, and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(17) "Responsible
individual" means an individual who is employed by a licensee and has
principal managerial authority over the provision of money services by the
licensee in this state.

(18) "State"
means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the
United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to
the jurisdiction of the United States.

(19)
"Director" means the director of financial institutions.

(20) "Unsafe or
unsound practice" means a practice or conduct by a person licensed to
provide money services, or an authorized delegate of such a person, which
creates the likelihood of material loss, insolvency, or dissipation of the
licensee's assets, or otherwise materially prejudices the financial condition
of the licensee or the interests of its customers.

(21) "Board
director" means a member of the applicant's or licensee's board of directors
if the applicant is a corporation or limited liability company, or a partner if
the applicant or licensee is a partnership.

(22) "Annual
license assessment due date" means the date specified in rule by the
director upon which the annual license assessment is due.

(23) "Currency
exchanger" means a person that is engaged in currency exchange.

(24) "Money
transmitter" means a person that is engaged in money transmission.

(25) "Mobile
location" means a vehicle or movable facility where money services are
provided.

(26) "Stored
value" means the recognition of value or credit to the account of persons,
when that value or credit is primarily intended to be redeemed for a limited
universe of goods, intangibles, services, or other items provided by the issuer
of the stored value, its affiliates, or others involved in transactions
functionally related to the goods, intangibles, services, or other items of the
issuer or its affiliates.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. EXCLUSIONS. This chapter
does not apply to:

(1) The United States
or a department, agency, or instrumentality thereof;

(2) Money transmission
by the United States postal service or by a contractor on behalf of the United
States postal service;

(3) A state, county,
city, or a department, agency, or instrumentality thereof;

(4) A financial
institution or its subsidiaries, affiliates, and service corporations, or any
office of an international banking corporation, branch of a foreign bank, or
corporation organized pursuant to the Bank Service Corporation Act (12 U.S.C.
Sec. 1861‑1867) or a corporation organized under the Edge Act (12 U.S.C.
Sec. 611‑633);

(5) Electronic funds
transfer of governmental benefits for a federal, state, county, or governmental
agency by a contractor on behalf of the United States or a department, agency,
or instrumentality thereof, or a state or governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality thereof;

(6) A board of trade
designated as a contract market under the federal Commodity Exchange Act (7
U.S.C. Sec. 1-25) or a person that, in the ordinary course of business,
provides clearance and settlement services for a board of trade to the extent
of its operation as, or for, a board of trade;

(7) A registered
futures commission merchant under the federal commodities laws to the extent of
its operation as such a merchant;

(8) A person that
provides clearance or settlement services under a registration as a clearing
agency, or an exemption from that registration granted under the federal
securities laws, to the extent of its operation as such a provider;

(9) An operator of a
payment system only to the extent that it provides processing, clearing, or
settlement services, between or among persons who are all excluded by this
section, in connection with wire transfers, credit card transactions, debit
card transactions, stored-value transactions, automated clearinghouse
transfers, or similar funds transfers;

(10) A person
registered as a securities broker-dealer or investment advisor under federal or
state securities laws to the extent of its operation as such a broker-dealer or
investment advisor;

(11) An insurance
company, title insurance company, or escrow agent to the extent that such an
entity is lawfully authorized to conduct business in this state as an insurance
company, title insurance company, or escrow agent and to the extent that they
engage in money transmission or currency exchange as an ancillary service when
conducting insurance, title insurance, or escrow activity; or

(12) The issuance, sale,
use, redemption, or exchange of stored value or of payment instruments.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. MONEY TRANSMITTER LICENSE
REQUIRED. (1) A person may not engage in the business of money transmission,
or advertise, solicit, or hold itself out as providing money transmission,
unless the person is:

(a) Licensed as a money
transmitter under this chapter; or

(b) An authorized
delegate of a person licensed as a money transmitter under this chapter.

(2) A money transmitter
license is not transferable or assignable.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. APPLICATION FOR A MONEY
TRANSMITTER LICENSE. (1) A person applying for a money transmitter license
under this chapter shall do so in a form and in a medium prescribed in rule by
the director. The application must state or contain:

(a) The legal name,
business addresses, and residential address, if applicable, of the applicant
and any fictitious or trade name used by the applicant in conducting its
business;

(b) The legal name,
residential and business addresses, date of birth, social security number,
employment history for the ten-year period preceding the submission of the
application of the applicant's proposed responsible individual, and
documentation that the proposed responsible individual is a citizen of the
United States or has obtained legal immigration status to work in the United
States. In addition, the applicant shall provide the fingerprints of the
proposed responsible individual upon the request of the director;

(c) For the ten-year
period preceding submission of the application, a list of any criminal
convictions of the proposed responsible individual of the applicant, any
material litigation in which the applicant has been involved, and any
litigation involving the proposed responsible individual relating to the
provision of money services;

(d) A description of
any money services previously provided by the applicant and the money services
that the applicant seeks to provide in this state;

(e) A list of the
applicant's proposed authorized delegates and the locations in this state where
the applicant and its authorized delegates propose to engage in the provision
of money services;

(f) A list of other
states in which the applicant is licensed to engage in money transmission, or
provide other money services, and any license revocations, suspensions,
restrictions, or other disciplinary action taken against the applicant in
another state;

(g) A list of any
license revocations, suspensions, restrictions, or other disciplinary action
taken against any money services business involving the proposed responsible
individual;

(h) Information
concerning any bankruptcy or receivership proceedings involving or affecting
the applicant or the proposed responsible individual;

(i) A sample form of
contract for authorized delegates, if applicable;

(j) A description of
the source of money and credit to be used by the applicant to provide money
services; and

(k) Any other
information regarding the background, experience, character, financial
responsibility, and general fitness of the applicant, the applicant's
responsible individual, or authorized delegates that the director may require
in rule.

(2) If an applicant is
a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or other entity, the
applicant shall also provide:

(a) The date of the
applicant's incorporation or formation and state or country of incorporation or
formation;

(b) If applicable, a
certificate of good standing from the state or country in which the applicant
is incorporated or formed;

(c) A brief description
of the structure or organization of the applicant, including any parent or
subsidiary of the applicant, and whether any parent or subsidiary is publicly
traded;

(d) The legal name, any
fictitious or trade name, all business and residential addresses, date of
birth, social security number, and employment history in the ten-year period
preceding the submission of the application for each executive officer, board
director, or person that has control of the applicant;

(e) If the applicant or
its corporate parent is not a publicly traded entity, the director may request
the fingerprints of each executive officer, board director, or person that has
control of the applicant;

(f) A list of any
criminal convictions, material litigation, and any litigation related to the
provision of money services, in the ten-year period preceding the submission of
the application in which any executive officer, board director, or person in
control of the applicant has been involved;

(g) A copy of the
applicant's audited financial statements for the most recent fiscal year or, if
the applicant is a wholly owned subsidiary of another corporation, the most
recent audited consolidated annual financial statement of the parent
corporation or the applicant's most recent audited consolidated annual
financial statement, and in each case, if available, for the two-year period
preceding the submission of the application;

(h) A copy of the
applicant's unconsolidated financial statements for the current fiscal year,
whether audited or not, and, if available, for the two-year period preceding
the submission of the application;

(i) If the applicant is
publicly traded, a copy of the most recent report filed with the United States
securities and exchange commission under section 13 of the federal Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 78m);

(j) If the applicant is
a wholly owned subsidiary of:

(i) A corporation
publicly traded in the United States, a copy of audited financial statements
for the parent corporation for the most recent fiscal year or a copy of the
parent corporation's most recent report filed under section 13 of the federal
Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 78m); or

(ii) A corporation
publicly traded outside the United States, a copy of similar documentation
filed with the regulator of the parent corporation's domicile outside the
United States;

(k) If the applicant
has a registered agent in this state, the name and address of the applicant's
registered agent in this state; and

(l) Any other
information that the director may require in rule regarding the applicant, each
executive officer, or each board director to determine the applicant's
background, experience, character, financial responsibility, and general
fitness.

(3) A nonrefundable
application fee and an initial license fee, as determined in rule by the
director, must accompany an application for a license under this chapter. The
initial license fee must be refunded if the application is denied.

(4) The director may
waive one or more requirements of subsection (1) or (2) of this section or
permit an applicant to submit other information in lieu of the required
information.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. SECURITY. (1) Each money
transmitter licensee shall maintain a surety bond, or other similar security
acceptable to the director, in the amount of fifty thousand dollars plus ten
thousand dollars per location, including locations of authorized delegates, not
exceeding a total addition of five hundred thousand dollars.

(2) The surety bond
shall run to the state of Washington as obligee, and shall run to the benefit of
the state and any person or persons who suffer loss by reason of a licensee's
or licensee's authorized delegate's violation of this chapter or the rules
adopted under this chapter. A claimant against a money transmitter licensee
may maintain an action on the bond, or the director may maintain an action on
behalf of the claimant.

(3) The surety bond
shall be continuous and may be canceled by the surety upon the surety giving
written notice to the director of its intent to cancel the bond. The cancellation
is effective thirty days after the notice of cancellation is received by the
director or the director's designee. Whether or not the bond is renewed,
continued, replaced, or modified, including increases or decreases in the penal
sum, it is considered one continuous obligation, and the surety upon the bond
is not liable in an aggregate or cumulative amount exceeding the penal sum set
forth on the face of the bond. In no event may the penal sum, or any portion
thereof, at two or more points in time, be added together in determining the
surety's liability.

(4) A surety bond or
other security must cover claims for at least five years after the date of a
money transmitter licensee's violation of this chapter, or at least five years
after the date the money transmitter licensee ceases to provide money services
in this state, whichever is longer.

(5) In the event that a
money transmitter licensee does not maintain a surety bond or other form of
security satisfactory to the director in the amount required under subsection
(1) of this section, the director may issue a temporary cease and desist order
under section 28 of this act.

(6) The director may
increase the amount of security required to a maximum of one million dollars if
the financial condition of a money transmitter licensee so requires, as
evidenced by reduction of net worth, financial losses, potential losses as a
result of violations of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, or
other relevant criteria specified by the director in rule.

(7) An applicant or a
licensee may petition the director or the director's designee to waive the
requirement for a surety bond if the applicant is unable to obtain a surety
bond.

(8) In determining
whether to grant a waiver of the surety bond requirement, the director or
director's designee shall consider the potential benefit and potential risk to
the public in granting the waiver, including but not limited to:

(a) The availability
and affordability of money transmission services in the community served by the
applicant or licensee;

(b) The general
availability and affordability of surety bonds in the insurance market;

(c) Whether unique
characteristics of the licensee or applicant make it difficult for the licensee
or applicant to obtain a surety bond;

(d) Whether the
applicant or licensee has violated this chapter, the rules adopted under this
chapter, or any similar statute or rules in any other state where the applicant
or licensee held or holds a license;

(e) Whether the
applicant or licensee has paid claims, either directly or through a surety bond
or other insurance policy, in the three calendar years preceding the filing of
the petition for a waiver of the surety bond requirement; and

(f) Whether the
responsible individual, or any executive officer, board director, or person in
control of the applicant or licensee has been charged and is awaiting trial, or
has been convicted of, a felony or of any other crime alleging dishonesty,
theft, or fraud.

(9) When granting a
waiver of the surety bond requirement, the director or the director's designee
may require the applicant or licensee to maintain higher net worth or may
restrict the license of the applicant or licensee as a condition of granting a
waiver from the surety bond requirement, including but not limited to
restricting the geographic area the applicant or licensee may serve,
restricting the community the applicant or licensee may serve, or restricting
the volume of money transmissions the applicant or licensee may perform in a
given period of time.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. NET WORTH FOR MONEY
TRANSMITTER. A money transmitter licensed under this chapter shall maintain a
net worth, determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles, as determined in rule by the director. The director shall require
a net worth of at least ten thousand dollars and not more than fifty thousand
dollars. In the event that a licensee's net worth, as determined in accordance
with generally accepted accounting principles, falls below twenty-five thousand
dollars, the director or the director's designee may initiate action under
sections 25 and 28 of this act. The licensee may request a hearing on such an
action under chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. ISSUANCE OF MONEY
TRANSMITTER LICENSE. (1) When an application for a money transmitter license
is filed under this chapter, the director or the director's designee shall
investigate the applicant's financial condition and responsibility, financial
and business experience, competence, character, and general fitness. The
director or the director's designee may conduct an on-site investigation of the
applicant, the cost of which must be paid by the applicant as specified in
section 34 of this act or rules adopted under this chapter. The director shall
issue a money transmitter license to an applicant under this chapter if the
director or the director's designee finds that all of the following conditions
have been fulfilled:

(a) The applicant has
complied with sections 6, 7, and 8 of this act;

(b) The financial
condition and responsibility, financial and business experience, competence,
character, and general fitness of the applicant; and the competence, financial
and business experience, character, and general fitness of the executive
officers, proposed responsible individual, board directors, and persons in
control of the applicant; indicate that it is in the interest of the public to
permit the applicant to engage in the business of providing money transmission
services; and

(c) Neither the applicant,
nor any executive officer, nor person who exercises control over the applicant,
nor the proposed responsible individual is listed on the specially designated
nationals and blocked persons list prepared by the United States department of
the treasury as a potential threat to commit terrorist acts or to finance
terrorist acts.

(2) The director may
for good cause extend the application review period.

(3) An applicant whose
application is denied by the director under this chapter may appeal under chapter
34.05 RCW.

(4) A money transmitter
license issued under this chapter is valid from the date of issuance and
remains in effect with no fixed date of expiration unless otherwise suspended
or revoked by the director or unless the license expires for nonpayment of the
annual license assessment and any late fee, if applicable.

(5) A money transmitter
licensee may surrender a license by delivering the original license to the
director along with a written notice of surrender. The written notice of
surrender must include notice of where the records of the licensee will be
stored and the name, address, telephone number, and other contact information
of a responsible party who is authorized to provide access to the records. The
surrender of a license does not reduce or eliminate the licensee's civil or
criminal liability arising from acts or omissions occurring prior to the
surrender of the license, including any administrative actions undertaken by
the director or the director's designee to revoke or suspend a license, to
assess fines, to order payment of restitution, or to exercise any other
authority authorized under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. CURRENCY EXCHANGE LICENSE
REQUIRED. (1) A person may not engage in the business of currency exchange or
advertise, solicit, or hold itself out as able to engage in currency exchange
for which the person receives revenue equal to or greater than five percent of
total revenues, unless the person is:

(a) Licensed to provide
currency exchange under this chapter;

(b) Licensed for money
transmission under this chapter; or

(c) An authorized
delegate of a person licensed under this chapter.

(2) A license under
this chapter is not transferable or assignable.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. APPLICATION FOR A
CURRENCY EXCHANGE LICENSE. (1) A person applying for a currency exchange
license under this chapter shall do so in a form and in a medium prescribed in
rule by the director. The application must state or contain:

(a) The legal name,
business addresses, and residential address, if applicable, of the applicant
and any fictitious or trade name used by the applicant in conducting its
business, and the legal name, residential and business addresses, date of
birth, social security number, employment history for the ten-year period
preceding the submission of the application; and upon request of the director,
fingerprints of the applicant's proposed responsible individual and
documentation that the proposed responsible individual is a citizen of the
United States or has obtained legal immigration status to work in the United
States;

(b) For the ten-year
period preceding the submission of the application, a list of any criminal
convictions of the proposed responsible individual of the applicant, any
material litigation in which the applicant has been involved, and any
litigation involving the proposed responsible individual relating to the
provision of money services;

(c) A description of
any money services previously provided by the applicant and the money services
that the applicant seeks to provide in this state;

(d) A list of the
applicant's proposed authorized delegates and the locations in this state where
the applicant and its authorized delegates propose to engage in currency
exchange;

(e) A list of other
states in which the applicant engages in currency exchange or provides other
money services and any license revocations, suspensions, restrictions, or other
disciplinary action taken against the applicant in another state;

(f) A list of any
license revocations, suspensions, restrictions, or other disciplinary action
taken against any money services business involving the proposed responsible
individual;

(g) Information
concerning any bankruptcy or receivership proceedings involving or affecting
the applicant or the proposed responsible individual;

(h) A sample form of
contract for authorized delegates, if applicable;

(i) A description of
the source of money and credit to be used by the applicant to provide currency
exchange; and

(j) Any other
information regarding the background, experience, character, financial
responsibility, and general fitness of the applicant, the applicant's responsible
individual, or authorized delegates that the director may require in rule.

(2) If an applicant is
a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or other entity, the
applicant shall also provide:

(a) The date of the
applicant's incorporation or formation and state or country of incorporation or
formation;

(b) If applicable, a
certificate of good standing from the state or country in which the applicant
is incorporated or formed;

(c) A brief description
of the structure or organization of the applicant, including any parent or
subsidiary of the applicant, and whether any parent or subsidiary is publicly
traded;

(d) The legal name, any
fictitious or trade name, all business and residential addresses, date of
birth, social security number, and employment history in the ten-year period
preceding the submission of the application for each executive officer, board
director, or person that has control of the applicant;

(e) If the applicant or
its corporate parent is not a publicly traded entity, the director may request
the fingerprints for each executive officer, board director, or person that has
control of the applicant; and

(f) A list of any
criminal convictions, material litigation, and any litigation related to the
provision of money services, in which any executive officer, board director, or
person in control of the applicant has been involved in the ten-year period
preceding the submission of the application.

(3) A nonrefundable
application fee and an initial license fee, as determined in rule by the
director, must accompany an application for a currency exchange license under
this chapter. The license fee must be refunded if the application is denied.

(4) The director may
waive one or more requirements of subsection (1) or (2) of this section or
permit an applicant to submit other information in lieu of the required
information.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. ISSUANCE OF A CURRENCY
EXCHANGE LICENSE. (1) When an application for a currency exchange license is
filed under this chapter, the director or the director's designee shall
investigate the applicant's financial condition and responsibility, financial
and business experience, competence, character, and general fitness. The
director or the director's designee may conduct an on-site investigation of the
applicant, the cost of which must be paid by the applicant as specified in
section 34 of this act or rules adopted under this chapter. The director shall
issue a currency exchange license to an applicant under this chapter if the
director or the director's designee finds that all of the following conditions
have been fulfilled:

(a) The applicant has
complied with section 11 of this act;

(b) The financial and
business experience, competence, character, and general fitness of the
applicant; and the competence, financial and business experience, character,
and general fitness of the executive officers, proposed responsible individual,
board directors, and persons in control of the applicant indicate that it is in
the interest of the public to permit the applicant to engage in the business of
providing currency exchange; and

(c) Neither the
applicant, nor any executive officer, nor person who exercises control over the
applicant, nor the proposed responsible individual are listed on the specially
designated nationals and blocked persons list prepared by the United States
department of treasury as a potential threat to commit terrorist acts or to
finance terrorist acts.

(2) The director may
for good cause extend the application review period.

(3) An applicant whose
application is denied by the director under this chapter may appeal under
chapter 34.05 RCW.

(4) A currency exchange
license issued under this chapter is valid from the date of issuance and
remains in effect with no fixed date of expiration unless otherwise suspended
or revoked by the director, or unless the license expires for nonpayment of the
annual license assessment and any late fee, if applicable.

(5) A currency exchange
licensee may surrender a license by delivering the original license to the
director along with a written notice of surrender. The written notice of
surrender must include notice of where the records of the licensee will be
stored and the name, address, telephone number, and other contact information
of a responsible party who is authorized to provide access to the records. The
surrender of a license does not reduce or eliminate the licensee's civil or
criminal liability arising from acts or omissions occurring prior to the
surrender of the license, including any administrative actions undertaken by
the director or the director's designee to revoke or suspend a license, to
assess fines, to order payment of restitution, or to exercise any other
authority authorized under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. ANNUAL LICENSE ASSESSMENT
AND ANNUAL REPORT. (1) A licensee shall pay an annual license assessment as
established in rule by the director no later than the annual license assessment
due date or, if the annual license assessment due date is not a business day,
on the next business day.

(2) A licensee shall
submit an annual report with the annual license assessment, in a form and in a
medium prescribed by the director in rule. The annual report must state or
contain:

(a) If the licensee is
a money transmitter, a copy of the licensee's most recent audited annual
financial statement or, if the licensee is a wholly owned subsidiary of another
corporation, the most recent audited consolidated annual financial statement of
the parent corporation or the licensee's most recent audited consolidated
annual financial statement;

(b) A description of
each material change, as defined in rule by the director, to information
submitted by the licensee in its original license application which has not
been previously reported to the director on any required report;

(c) If the licensee is
a money transmitter, a list of the licensee's permissible investments and a
certification that the licensee continues to maintain permissible investments
according to the requirements set forth in sections 22 and 23 of this act;

(d) If the licensee is a
money transmitter, proof that the licensee continues to maintain adequate
security as required by section 7 of this act; and

(e) A list of the
locations in this state where the licensee or an authorized delegate of the
licensee engages in or provides money services.

(3) If a licensee does
not file an annual report or pay its annual license assessment by the annual
license assessment due date or any extension of time granted by the director or
the director's designee, the director or the director's designee shall send the
licensee a notice of suspension and assess the licensee a late fee not to
exceed twenty-five percent of the annual license assessment as established in
rule by the director. To prevent expiration of the license, the licensee's
annual report and payment of both the annual license assessment and the late
fee must arrive in the department's offices by 5:00 p.m. on the thirtieth day
after the assessment due date or any extension of time granted by the director,
unless that date is not a business day, in which case the licensee's annual
report and payment of both the annual license assessment and the late fee must
arrive in the department's offices by 5:00 p.m. on the next occurring business
day. If the licensee's annual report and payment of both the annual license
assessment and late fee do not arrive by such date, the expiration of the
licensee's license is effective at 5:00 p.m. on the thirtieth day after the
assessment due date, unless that date is not a business day, in which case the expiration
of the licensee's license is effective at 5:00 p.m. on the next occurring
business day. The expiration of the license may be lifted if, within twenty
days after its effective date, the licensee:

(a) Files the annual
report and pays both the annual license assessment and the late fee; and

(b) The licensee did
not engage in or provide money services during the period its license was
expired.

(4) The director for
good cause may grant an extension of the assessment due date.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN
LICENSEE AND AUTHORIZED DELEGATE. (1) In this section, "remit" means
to make direct payments of money to a licensee or its representative authorized
to receive money or to deposit money in a bank in an account specified by the
licensee.

(2) A contract between
a licensee and an authorized delegate must require the authorized delegate to
operate in full compliance with this chapter and the rules adopted under this
chapter. The licensee shall furnish to each authorized delegate policies and
procedures to assist each authorized delegate in preventing violations of this
chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter.

(3) Neither the
licensee nor an authorized delegate may authorize subdelegates.

(4) An authorized
delegate shall remit all money owing to the licensee in accordance with the
terms of the contract between the licensee and the authorized delegate.

(5) If a license is
suspended or revoked or a licensee surrenders its license, the director shall notify
all authorized delegates of the licensee whose names are filed with the
director of the suspension, revocation, or surrender and shall publish the name
of the licensee. An authorized delegate shall immediately cease to provide
money services as a delegate of the licensee upon receipt of notice, or after
publication is made, that the licensee's license has been suspended, revoked,
or surrendered.

(6) An authorized
delegate may not provide money services other than those allowed the licensee
under its license. In addition, an authorized delegate may not provide money
services outside the scope of activity permissible under the contract between
the authorized delegate and the licensee, except activity in which the
authorized delegate is authorized to engage under section 5 or 10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. AUTHORITY TO CONDUCT
EXAMINATIONS AND INVESTIGATIONS. (1) For the purpose of discovering violations
of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, discovering unsafe and
unsound practices, or securing information lawfully required under this
chapter, the director may at any time, either personally or by designee,
investigate or examine the business and, wherever located, the books, accounts,
records, papers, documents, files, and other information used in the business
of every licensee or its authorized delegates, and of every person who is
engaged in the business of providing money services, whether the person acts or
claims to act under or without the authority of this chapter. For these
purposes, the director or designated representative shall have free access to
the offices and places of business, books, accounts, papers, documents, other
information, records, files, safes, and vaults of all such persons. The
director or the director's designee may require the attendance of and examine
under oath all persons whose testimony may be required about the business or
the subject matter of any investigation, examination, or hearing and may
require such person to produce books, accounts, papers, documents, records,
files, and any other information the director or designated person declares is
relevant to the inquiry. The director may require the production of original
books, accounts, papers, documents, records, files, and other information; may
require that such original books, accounts, papers, documents, records, files,
and other information be copied; or may make copies himself or herself or by
designee of such original books, accounts, papers, documents, records, files,
or other information. If a licensee or person does not attend and testify, or
does not produce the requested books, accounts, papers, documents, records,
files, or other information, then the director or designated person may issue a
subpoena or subpoena duces tecum requiring attendance or compelling production
of the books, accounts, papers, documents, records, files, or other
information.

(2) The licensee,
applicant, or person subject to licensing under this chapter shall pay the cost
of examinations and investigations as specified in section 34 of this act or
rules adopted under this chapter.

(3) Information
obtained during an examination or investigation under this chapter may be
disclosed only as provided in section 21 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. JOINT EXAMINATIONS. (1)
The director may conduct an on-site examination or investigation of the books,
accounts, records, papers, documents, files, and other information used in the
business of every licensee or its authorized delegates in conjunction with
representatives of other state agencies or agencies of another state or of the
federal government. The director may accept an examination report or an
investigation report of an agency of this state or of another state or of the
federal government.

(2) A joint examination
or investigation, or an acceptance of an examination or investigation report,
does not preclude the director from conducting an examination or investigation
under this chapter. A joint report or a report accepted under this section is
an official report of the director for all purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. REPORTS. (1) A licensee
shall file with the director within thirty business days any material changes
in information provided in a licensee's application as prescribed in rule by
the director. If this information indicates that the licensee is no longer in
compliance with this chapter, the director may take any action authorized under
this chapter to ensure that the licensee operates in compliance with this
chapter.

(2) A licensee shall
file with the director within forty-five days after the end of each fiscal
quarter a current list of all authorized delegates and locations in this state
where the licensee, or an authorized delegate of the licensee, provides money
services, including mobile locations. The licensee shall state the name and
street address of each location and authorized delegate operating at the
location.

(3) A licensee shall
file a report with the director within one business day after the licensee has
reason to know of the occurrence of any of the following events:

(a) The filing of a
petition by or against the licensee, or any authorized delegate of the
licensee, under the United States Bankruptcy Code (11 U.S.C. Sec. 101-110) for
bankruptcy or reorganization;

(b) The filing of a
petition by or against the licensee, or any authorized delegate of the
licensee, for receivership, the commencement of any other judicial or
administrative proceeding for its dissolution or reorganization, or the making
of a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors;

(c) The commencement of
a proceeding to revoke, suspend, restrict, or condition its license, or
otherwise discipline or sanction the licensee, in a state or country in which
the licensee engages in business or is licensed;

(d) The cancellation or
other impairment of the licensee's bond or other security;

(e) A charge or
conviction of the licensee or of an executive officer, responsible individual,
board director of the licensee, or person in control of the licensee, for a
felony; or

(f) A charge or
conviction of an authorized delegate for a felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. CHANGE OF CONTROL. (1)
A licensee shall:

(a) Provide the
director with written notice of a proposed change of control within fifteen
days after learning of the proposed change of control and at least thirty days
prior to the proposed change of control;

(b) Request approval of
the change of control by submitting the information required in rule by the
director; and

(c) Submit, with the
notice, a nonrefundable fee as prescribed in rule by the director.

(2) After review of a
request for approval under subsection (1) of this section, the director may
require the licensee to provide additional information concerning the
licensee's proposed persons in control. The additional information must be
limited to the same types required of the licensee, or persons in control of
the licensee, as part of its original license application.

(3) The director shall
approve a request for change of control under subsection (1) of this section
if, after investigation, the director determines that the person, or group of
persons, requesting approval meets the criteria for licensing set forth in
sections 9 and 12 of this act and that the public interest will not be
jeopardized by the change of control.

(4) Subsection (1) of
this section does not apply to a public offering of securities.

(5) Before filing a request
for approval to acquire control of a licensee, or person in control of a
licensee, a person may request in writing a determination from the director as
to whether the person would be considered a person in control of a licensee
upon consummation of a proposed transaction. If the director determines that
the person would not be a person in control of a licensee, the director shall
respond in writing to that effect and the proposed person and transaction is
not subject to the requirements of subsections (1) through (3) of this section.

(6) The director may
exempt by rule any person from the requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this
section, if it is in the public interest to do so.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. RECORDS. (1) A licensee
shall maintain the following records for determining its compliance with this
chapter for at least five years:

(a) A general ledger
posted at least monthly containing all assets, liabilities, capital, income,
and expense accounts;

(b) Bank statements and
bank reconciliation records;

(c) A list of the last
known names and addresses of all of the licensee's authorized delegates;

(d) Copies of all
currency transaction reports and suspicious activity reports filed in
compliance with section 20 of this act; and

(e) Any other records
required in rule by the director.

(2) The items specified
in subsection (1) of this section may be maintained in any form of record that
is readily accessible to the director or the director's designee upon request.

(3) Records may be
maintained outside this state if they are made accessible to the director on
seven business days' notice that is sent in writing.

(4) All records
maintained by the licensee are open to inspection by the director or the
director's designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. MONEY LAUNDERING
REPORTS. (1) Every licensee and its authorized delegates shall file with the
director or the director's designee all reports required by federal currency
reporting, recordkeeping, and suspicious transaction reporting requirements as
set forth in 31 U.S.C. Sec. 5311, 31 C.F.R. Sec. 103 (2000), and other federal
and state laws pertaining to money laundering. Every licensee and its
authorized delegates shall maintain copies of these reports in its records in
compliance with section 19 of this act.

(2) The timely filing
of a complete and accurate report required under subsection (1) of this section
with the appropriate federal agency is compliance with the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section, unless the director notifies the licensee that
reports of this type are not being regularly and comprehensively transmitted by
the federal agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. CONFIDENTIALITY. (1)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, all information
or reports obtained by the director from an applicant, licensee, or authorized
delegate and all information contained in, or related to, examination,
investigation, operating, or condition reports prepared by, on behalf of, or
for the use of the director, or financial statements, balance sheets, or
authorized delegate information, are confidential and are not subject to
disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW.

(2) The director may
disclose information not otherwise subject to disclosure under subsection (1)
of this section to representatives of state or federal agencies who agree in
writing to maintain the confidentiality of the information; or if the director
finds that the release is reasonably necessary for the protection of the public
and in the interests of justice.

(3) This section does
not prohibit the director from disclosing to the public a list of persons
licensed under this chapter or the aggregated financial data concerning those
licensees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. MAINTENANCE OF
PERMISSIBLE INVESTMENTS. (1) A money transmitter licensee shall maintain at
all times permissible investments that have a market value computed in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles of not less than the
aggregate amount of all outstanding money transmission by the licensee or its
authorized delegates.

(2) The director, with
respect to any money transmitter licensee, may limit the extent to which a type
of investment within a class of permissible investments may be considered a
permissible investment, except for money, time deposits, savings deposits,
demand deposits, and certificates of deposit issued by a federally insured
financial institution. The director may prescribe in rule, or by order allow,
other types of investments that the director determines to have a safety
substantially equivalent to other permissible investments.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. TYPES OF PERMISSIBLE
INVESTMENTS. (1) Except to the extent otherwise limited by the director under
section 22 of this act, the following investments are permissible for a money
transmitter licensee under section 22 of this act:

(a) Cash, time
deposits, savings deposits, demand deposits, a certificate of deposit, or
senior debt obligation of an insured depositary institution as defined in
section 3 of the federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1813) or as
defined under the federal Credit Union Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1781);

(b) Banker's acceptance
or bill of exchange that is eligible for purchase upon endorsement by a member
bank of the federal reserve system and is eligible for purchase by a federal
reserve bank;

(c) An investment
bearing a rating of one of the three highest grades as defined by a nationally
recognized organization that rates securities;

(d) An investment
security that is an obligation of the United States or a department, agency, or
instrumentality thereof; an investment in an obligation that is guaranteed
fully as to principal and interest by the United States; or an investment in an
obligation of a state or a governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality
thereof;

(e) Receivables that
are payable to a licensee from its authorized delegates, in the ordinary course
of business, pursuant to contracts which are not past due or doubtful of
collection, if the aggregate amount of receivables under this subsection (1)(e)
does not exceed twenty percent of the total permissible investments of a
licensee and the licensee does not hold, at one time, receivables under this
subsection (1)(e) in any one person aggregating more than ten percent of the
licensee's total permissible investments; and

(f) A share or a
certificate issued by an open-end management investment company that is
registered with the United States securities and exchange commission under the
Investment Companies Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80(a)(1) through (64), and
whose portfolio is restricted by the management company's investment policy to
investments specified in (a) through (d) of this subsection.

(2) The following
investments are permissible under section 22 of this act, but only to the
extent specified as follows:

(a) An interest-bearing
bill, note, bond, or debenture of a person whose equity shares are traded on a
national securities exchange or on a national over-the-counter market, if the
aggregate of investments under this subsection (2)(a) does not exceed twenty
percent of the total permissible investments of a licensee and the licensee does
not, at one time, hold investments under this subsection (2)(a) in any one
person aggregating more than ten percent of the licensee's total permissible
investments;

(b) A share of a person
traded on a national securities exchange or a national over-the-counter market
or a share or a certificate issued by an open-end management investment company
that is registered with the United States securities and exchange commission
under the Investment Companies Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80(a)(1) through
(64), and whose portfolio is restricted by the management company's investment
policy to shares of a person traded on a national securities exchange or a
national over-the-counter market, if the aggregate of investments under this
subsection (2)(b) does not exceed twenty percent of the total permissible
investments of a licensee and the licensee does not, at one time, hold
investments under this subsection (2)(b) in any one person aggregating more
than ten percent of the licensee's total permissible investments;

(c) A demand-borrowing
agreement made to a corporation or a subsidiary of a corporation whose
securities are traded on a national securities exchange, if the aggregate of
the amount of principal and interest outstanding under demand-borrowing
agreements under this subsection (2)(c) does not exceed twenty percent of the
total permissible investments of a licensee and the licensee does not, at one
time, hold principal and interest outstanding under demand-borrowing agreements
under this subsection (2)(c) with any one person aggregating more than ten
percent of the licensee's total permissible investments; and

(d) Any other
investment the director designates, to the extent specified in rule by the
director.

(3) The aggregate of
investments under subsection (2) of this section may not exceed fifty percent
of the total permissible investments of a licensee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. ADMINISTRATIVE
PROCEEDINGS. All administrative proceedings under this chapter must be
conducted in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW. Any licensee or authorized delegate subject to a statement of charges and
order of intent from the director shall be provided with an opportunity for a
hearing as provided for in the administrative procedure act. Unless the person
subject to the order appears in person or is represented by counsel at the
hearing, the person has consented to issuance of the order. If after a
hearing, the director finds by a preponderance of the evidence that grounds for
sanctions under this chapter exist, then the director may impose any sanctions
authorized by this chapter in a final order. As provided for in section 28 of
this act, a temporary order to cease and desist is effective upon service upon
the licensee or authorized delegate, and remains effective pending a hearing to
determine if the order shall become permanent.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
25. SUSPENSION, REVOCATION,
AND RECEIVERSHIP. (1) The director may issue an order to suspend, revoke, or
condition a license, place a licensee in receivership, revoke the designation
of an authorized delegate, compel payment of restitution by a licensee to
damaged parties, require affirmative actions as are necessary by a licensee to
comply with this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, or remove from
office or prohibit from participation in the affairs of any authorized delegate
or any licensee, or both, any responsible individual, executive officer, person
in control, or employee of the licensee, if:

(a) The licensee
violates this chapter or a rule adopted or an order issued under this chapter
or is convicted of a violation of a state or federal money laundering or
terrorism statute;

(b) The licensee does
not cooperate with an examination, investigation, or subpoena lawfully issued
by the director or the director's designee;

(c) The licensee
engages in fraud, intentional misrepresentation, or gross negligence;

(d) An authorized
delegate is convicted of a violation of a state or federal money laundering
statute, or violates this chapter or a rule adopted or an order issued under
this chapter as a result of the licensee's willful misconduct or deliberate
avoidance of knowledge;

(e) The financial
condition and responsibility, competence, experience, character, or general
fitness of the licensee, authorized delegate, person in control of a licensee,
or responsible individual of the licensee or authorized delegate indicates that
it is not in the public interest to permit the person to provide money
services;

(f) The licensee
engages in an unsafe or unsound practice, or an unfair and deceptive act or
practice;

(g) The licensee is
insolvent, fails to maintain the required net worth, suspends payment of its
obligations, or makes a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors;

(h) The licensee does
not remove an authorized delegate after the director issues and serves upon the
licensee a final order including a finding that the authorized delegate has
violated this chapter; or

(i) The licensee, its
responsible individual, or any of its executive officers or other persons in
control of the licensee are listed or become listed on the specially designated
nationals and blocked persons list prepared by the United States department of
the treasury as a potential threat to commit terrorist acts or to finance
terrorist acts.

(2) In determining
whether a licensee or other person subject to this chapter is engaging in an
unsafe or unsound practice, the director may consider the size and condition of
the licensee's money transmission services, the magnitude of the loss or
potential loss to consumers or others, the gravity of the violation of this
chapter, any action against the licensee by another state or the federal
government, and the previous conduct of the person involved.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
26. SUSPENSION AND REVOCATION
OF AUTHORIZED DELEGATES. (1) The director may issue an order to suspend, revoke,
or condition the designation of an authorized delegate, impose civil penalties,
require payment of restitution to damaged parties, require affirmative actions
as are necessary to comply with this chapter or the rules adopted under this
chapter, or remove from office or prohibit from participation in the affairs of
the authorized delegate or licensee, or both, any executive officer, person in
control, or employee of the authorized delegate if the director finds that:

(a) The authorized
delegate violated this chapter or a rule adopted or an order issued under this
chapter;

(b) The authorized
delegate does not cooperate with an examination, investigation, or subpoena
lawfully issued by the director or the director's designee;

(c) The authorized
delegate engaged in fraud, intentional misrepresentation, or gross negligence;

(d) The authorized
delegate is convicted of a violation of a state or federal money laundering or
terrorism statute;

(e) The competence,
experience, character, or general fitness of the authorized delegate or a
person in control of the authorized delegate indicates that it is not in the
public interest to permit the authorized delegate to provide money services;

(f) The authorized
delegate engaged in or is engaging in an unsafe or unsound practice, or unfair
and deceptive act or practice; or

(g) The authorized
delegate, or any of its executive officers or other persons in control of the
authorized delegate, are listed or become listed on the specially designated
nationals and blocked persons list prepared by the United States department of
the treasury as a potential threat to commit terrorist acts or to finance
terrorist acts.

(2) In determining
whether an authorized delegate is engaging in an unsafe or unsound practice,
the director may consider the size and condition of the authorized delegate's
provision of money services, the magnitude of the loss or potential loss to
consumers or others, the gravity of the violation of this chapter or a rule
adopted or order issued under this chapter, any action against the authorized
delegate taken by another state or the federal government, and the previous
conduct of the authorized delegate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
27. UNLICENSED PERSONS. (1)
If the director has reason to believe that a person has violated or is
violating section 5 or 10 of this act, the director or the director's designee
may conduct an examination or investigation as authorized under section 15 of this
act.

(2) If as a result of
such investigation or examination, the director finds that a person has
violated section 5 or 10 of this act, the director may issue a temporary cease
and desist order as authorized under section 28 of this act.

(3) If as a result of
such an investigation or examination, the director finds that a person has
violated section 5 or 10 of this act, the director may issue an order to
prohibit the person from continuing to engage in providing money services, to
compel the person to pay restitution to damaged parties, to impose civil money
penalties on the person, and to prohibit from participation in the affairs of
any licensee or authorized delegate, or both, any executive officer, person in
control, or employee of the person.

(4) The director may
petition the superior court for the issuance of a temporary restraining order
under the rules of civil procedure.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
28. TEMPORARY ORDERS TO CEASE
AND DESIST. (1) If the director determines that a violation of this chapter or
of a rule adopted or an order issued under this chapter by a licensee,
authorized delegate, or other person subject to this chapter is likely to cause
immediate and irreparable harm to the licensee, its customers, or the public as
a result of the violation, or cause insolvency or significant dissipation of
the assets of the licensee, the director may issue a temporary order to cease
and desist requiring the licensee, authorized delegate, or other person subject
to this chapter to cease and desist from conducting business in this state or
to cease and desist from the violation or undertake affirmative actions as are
necessary to comply with this chapter, any rule adopted under this chapter, or
order issued by the director under this chapter. The order is effective upon
service upon the licensee, authorized delegate, or other person subject to this
chapter.

(2) A temporary order
to cease and desist remains effective and enforceable pending the completion of
an administrative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW. If, after a hearing, the
director finds that by a preponderance of the evidence, all or any part of the
order is supported by the facts, the director may make the temporary order to
cease and desist permanent under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) A licensee, an
authorized delegate, or other person subject to this chapter that is served
with a temporary order to cease and desist may petition the superior court for
a judicial order setting aside, limiting, or suspending the enforcement,
operation, or effectiveness of the order pending the completion of an
administrative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
29. CONSENT ORDERS. The
director may enter into a consent order at any time with a person to resolve a
matter arising under this chapter or a rule adopted or order issued under this
chapter. A consent order must be signed by the person to whom it is issued or
by the person's authorized representative, and must indicate agreement with the
terms contained in the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
30. VIOLATIONS‑-LIABILITY.
(1) A licensee is liable for any conduct violating this chapter or rules
adopted under this chapter committed by employees of the licensee.

(2) A licensee that
commits willful misconduct in its supervision of its authorized delegate or
willfully avoids knowledge of its authorized delegate's business activities may
be subjected to administrative sanctions for any violations of this chapter or rules
adopted under this chapter by the licensee's authorized delegates.

(3) The responsible
individual is responsible under the license and may be subjected to
administrative sanctions for any violations of this chapter or rules adopted
under this chapter committed by the licensee or, if the responsible individual
commits willful misconduct in supervising an authorized delegate or willfully
avoids knowledge of an authorized delegate's business activities, violations
committed by the licensee's authorized delegates.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
31. CIVIL PENALTIES. The
director may assess a civil penalty against a licensee, responsible individual,
authorized delegate, or other person that violates this chapter or a rule
adopted or an order issued under this chapter in an amount not to exceed one
hundred dollars per day for each day the violation is outstanding, plus this
state's costs and expenses for the investigation and prosecution of the matter,
including reasonable attorneys' fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
32. CRIMINAL PENALTIES. (1)
A person that intentionally makes a false statement, misrepresentation, or
false certification in a record filed or required to be maintained under this
chapter or that intentionally makes a false entry or omits a material entry in
that record is guilty of a class C felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) A person that
knowingly engages in an activity for which a license is required under this
chapter without being licensed under this chapter and who receives more than
five hundred dollars in compensation within a thirty-day period from this
activity is guilty of a gross misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) A person that
knowingly engages in an activity for which a license is required under this
chapter without being licensed under this chapter and who receives no more than
five hundred dollars in compensation within a thirty-day period from this
activity is guilty of a misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
33. ADMINISTRATION AND
RULE-MAKING POWERS. The director has the power and broad administrative
discretion to administer and interpret this chapter to fulfill the intent of
the legislature as expressed in section 2 of this act. In accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW, the director may issue rules under this chapter to govern
the activities of licensees and other persons subject to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
34. FEES. (1) The director
shall establish fees by rule sufficient to cover the costs of administering
this chapter. The director may establish different fees for each type of
license authorized under this chapter. These fees may include:

(a) An annual license
assessment specified in rule by the director paid by each licensee on or before
the annual license assessment due date;

(b) A late fee for late
payment of the annual license assessment as specified in rule by the director;

(c) An hourly
examination or investigation fee to cover the costs of any examination or
investigation of the books and records of a licensee or other person subject to
this chapter;

(d) A nonrefundable
application fee to cover the costs of processing license applications made to
the director under this chapter;

(e) An initial license
fee to cover the period from the date of licensure to the end of the calendar
year in which the license is initially granted; and

(f) A transaction fee
or set of transaction fees to cover the administrative costs associated with
processing changes in control, changes of address, and other administrative
changes as specified in rule by the director.

(2) The director shall
ensure that when an examination or investigation, or any part of the
examination or investigation, of any licensee applicant or person subject to
licensing under this chapter, requires travel and services outside this state
by the director or designee, the licensee applicant or person subject to
licensing under this chapter that is the subject of the examination or
investigation shall pay the actual travel expenses incurred by the director or
designee conducting the examination or investigation.

(3) All moneys, fees,
and penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited into the
financial services regulation account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
35. MONEY TRANSMITTER
DELIVERY, RECEIPTS, AND REFUNDS. (1) Every money transmitter licensee and its
authorized delegates shall transmit the monetary equivalent of all money or
equivalent value received from a customer for transmission, net of any fees, or
issue instructions committing the money or its monetary equivalent, to the
person designated by the customer within ten business days after receiving the
money or equivalent value, unless otherwise ordered by the customer or unless
the licensee or its authorized delegate has reason to believe that a crime has
occurred, is occurring, or may occur as a result of transmitting the money.
For purposes of this subsection, money is considered to have been transmitted
when it is available to the person designated by the customer and a reasonable
effort has been made to inform this designated person that the money is
available, whether or not the designated person has taken possession of the
money. As used in this subsection, "monetary equivalent," when used
in connection with a money transmission in which the customer provides the
licensee or its authorized delegate with the money of one government, and the designated
recipient is to receive the money of another government, means the amount of
money, in the currency of the government that the designated recipient is to
receive, as converted at the retail exchange rate offered by the licensee or
its authorized delegate to the customer in connection with the transaction.

(2) Every money
transmitter licensee and its authorized delegates shall provide a receipt to
the customer that clearly states the amount of money presented for
transmission, the total of any fees not including any earnings from currency
exchange, the net amount of United States money transmitted. As used in this
section, "fees" does not include revenue that a licensee or its
authorized delegate generates, in connection with a money transmission, in the
conversion of the money of one government into the money of another government.

(3) Every money
transmitter licensee and its authorized delegates shall refund to the customer
all moneys received for transmittal within ten days of receipt of a written
request for a refund unless any of the following occurs:

(a) The moneys have
been transmitted and delivered to the person designated by the customer prior
to receipt of the written request for a refund;

(b) Instructions have
been given committing an equivalent amount of money to the person designated by
the customer prior to receipt of a written request for a refund;

(c) The licensee or its
authorized delegate has reason to believe that a crime has occurred, is
occurring, or may potentially occur as a result of transmitting the money as
requested by the customer or refunding the money as requested by the customer;
or

(d) The licensee is
otherwise barred by law from making a refund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
36. PROHIBITED PRACTICES. It
is a violation of this chapter for any licensee, executive officer, responsible
individual, or other person subject to this chapter in connection with the
provision of money services to:

(1) Directly or
indirectly employ any scheme, device, or artifice to defraud or mislead any
person;

(2) Directly or
indirectly engage in any unfair or deceptive act or practice toward any person;

(3) Directly or
indirectly obtain property by fraud or misrepresentation;

(4) Knowingly make,
publish, or disseminate any false, deceptive, or misleading information in the
provision of money services;

(5) Knowingly receive
or take possession for personal use of any property of any money services
business, other than in payment for services rendered, and with intent to
defraud, omit to make, or cause or direct to omit to make, a full and true
entry thereof in the books and accounts of the business;

(6) Make or concur in
making any false entry, or omit or concur in omitting any material entry, in
the books or accounts of the business;

(7) Knowingly make or
publish to the director or director's designee, or concur in making or
publishing to the director or director's designee any written report, exhibit,
or statement of its affairs or pecuniary condition containing any material
statement which is false, or omit or concur in omitting any statement required
by law to be contained therein; or

(8) Fail to make any
report or statement lawfully required by the director or other public official.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
37. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act
takes effect October 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
38. IMPLEMENTATION. The
director or the director's designee may take such steps as are necessary to
ensure that this act is implemented on its effective date. In particular, the
director or the director's designee shall conduct outreach to small businesses
and immigrant communities to enhance awareness of and compliance with state and
federal laws governing money transmission and currency exchange, and to provide
technical assistance in applying for a license under this chapter and
understanding the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
39. UNIFORMITY OF APPLICATION
AND CONSTRUCTION. In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must
be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its
subject matter among states that enact it.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
40. SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
41. CAPTIONS NOT LAW.
Captions used in this chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 42. Sections 1 through 41 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---