BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.38.070 and 1998 c
300 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any county, city, town, public
utility district or other municipal corporation, or quasi municipal
corporation providing utility services may provide such services at reduced
rates for low‑income senior citizens or other low-income
citizens: PROVIDED, That, for the purposes of this section, "low-income
senior citizen" or "other low-income citizen" shall be defined
by appropriate ordinance or resolution adopted by the governing body of the
county, city, town, public utility district or other municipal
corporation, or quasi municipal corporation providing the utility services ((except
as provided in subsection (2) of this section)). Any reduction in rates
granted in whatever manner to low-income senior citizens or other low-income
citizens in one part of a service area shall be uniformly extended to
low-income senior citizens or other low-income citizens in all other parts of
the service area.

(((2)
For purposes of implementing this section by any public utility district, (a)
"low-income senior citizen" means a person who is sixty-two years of
age or older and whose total income, including that of his or her spouse or
cotenant, does not exceed the amount specified in RCW 84.36.381(5)(b), as now or
hereafter amended and (b) "other low-income citizen" means a person
whose household income does not exceed the amount specified in RCW
70.164.020(4).))

--- END ---