BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 11.20.050 and 1967 c
168 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

All wills
((shall be recorded by the clerk after filing, but)) filed with the
clerk of the superior court must be noted in the record required to be kept
under RCW 36.23.030(7). They may be withdrawn from the record on
the order of the court.

--- END ---