BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that a working knowledge of the English language is essential for applicants
wishing to be issued a commercial driver's license. The legislature finds that
it is essential for the safety and security of Washington's traveling public
that those persons issued a commercial driver's license be able to understand
directions given by law enforcement personnel, and be able to understand and
communicate with law enforcement personnel.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.25.060 and 1989 c
178 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) No person may be
issued a commercial driver's license unless that person is a resident of this
state and has passed a knowledge and skills test for driving a commercial motor
vehicle that complies with minimum federal standards established by federal
regulation enumerated in 49 C.F.R. part 383, subparts G and H, and has
satisfied all other requirements of the CMVSA in addition to other requirements
imposed by state law or federal regulation. The tests must be prescribed and
conducted by the department, and must include a section requiring the
applicant to demonstrate a sufficient working knowledge of the English language
to enable the applicant to communicate with and understand directions from law
enforcement personnel. In addition to the fee charged for issuance or
renewal of any license, the applicant shall pay a fee of no more than ten
dollars for each classified knowledge examination, classified endorsement
knowledge examination, or any combination of classified license and endorsement
knowledge examinations. The applicant shall pay a fee of no more than fifty
dollars for each classified skill examination or combination of classified
skill examinations conducted by the department.

(b) The department may
authorize a person, including an agency of this or another state, an employer,
a private driver training facility, or other private institution, or a
department, agency, or instrumentality of local government, to administer the
skills test specified by this section under the following conditions:

(i) The test is the
same which would otherwise be administered by the state;

(ii) The third party
has entered into an agreement with the state that complies with the
requirements of 49 C.F.R. part 383.75; and

(iii) The director has
adopted rules as to the third party testing program and the development and
justification for fees charged by any third party.

(2) The department may
waive the skills test specified in this section for a commercial driver's
license applicant who meets the requirements of 49 C.F.R. part 383.77.

(3) A commercial
driver's license or commercial driver's instruction permit may not be issued to
a person while the person is subject to a disqualification from driving a
commercial motor vehicle, or while the person's driver's license is suspended,
revoked, or canceled in any state, nor may a commercial driver's license be
issued to a person who has a commercial driver's license issued by any other
state unless the person first surrenders all such licenses, which must be
returned to the issuing state for cancellation.

(4)(a) A commercial
driver's instruction permit may be issued to an individual who holds a valid
automobile or classified driver's license.

(b) A
commercial driver's instruction permit may not be issued for a period to exceed
six months. Only one renewal or reissuance may be granted within a two-year
period. The holder of a commercial driver's instruction permit may drive a
commercial motor vehicle on a highway only when accompanied by the holder of a
commercial driver's license valid for the type of vehicle driven who occupies a
seat beside the individual for the purpose of giving instruction in driving the
commercial motor vehicle. An application for a commercial driver's instruction
permit shall be accompanied by a fee of five dollars. The department shall
forthwith transmit the fees collected for commercial driver's instruction
permits to the state treasurer.

---
END ---