BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.48.010 and
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of
this chapter, ((as now or hereinafter amended,)) unless the context
indicates otherwise:

(a)
"Building" has the definition in RCW 9A.04.110(5), and where a
building consists of two or more units separately secured or occupied, each
unit shall not be treated as a separate building;

(b)
"Damages", in addition to its ordinary meaning, includes any
charring, scorching, burning, or breaking, or agricultural or industrial
sabotage, and shall include any diminution in the value of any property as a
consequence of an act;

(c) "Property
of another" means property in which the actor possesses anything less than
exclusive ownership.

(2) To constitute arson
it ((shall)) is not ((be)) necessary that a person other
than the actor ((should have had)) has ownership in the building
or structure damaged or set on fire.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---