BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 64.36.070 and 1983
1st ex.s. c 22 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Any individual offering
timeshare units or timeshare interest reservations for the individual's
own account or for the account of others shall be registered as a timeshare
salesperson unless the timeshare offering is exempt from registration under RCW
64.36.020. Registration may be obtained by filing an application with the
department of licensing on a form prescribed by the director. The director may
require that the applicant demonstrate sufficient knowledge of the timeshare
industry and this chapter. A timeshare salesperson who is licensed as a real
estate broker or salesperson under chapter 18.85 RCW is exempt from the
registration requirement of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 64.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of
this section, "timeshare interest reservation" means a revocable
right to purchase an interest in a timeshare project for which construction has
not yet been completed and an effective registration has been obtained under
this chapter.

(2) An effective
registration pursuant to this chapter is required for any party to offer to
sell a timeshare interest reservation. Promoters offering a timeshare interest
reservation under this section must provide the registered disclosure document
required by RCW 64.36.140 to each prospective purchaser before he or she enters
into a timeshare interest reservation. Prior to the signing of a purchase agreement,
the subject property or properties must be completed, the timeshare offering
registration required by RCW 64.36.020 must be amended to reflect any changes
to the property and must be reapproved by the department, the disclosure
document required by RCW 64.36.140 must be revised, and the new version of the
disclosure document must be provided to the prospective purchaser.

(3) Deposits accepted
by promoters on a timeshare interest reservation may be no more than twenty
percent of the total purchase price of the timeshare interest that is being
purchased. Within one business day after being accepted by the promoter, any
deposit on a timeshare interest reservation shall be deposited in an account in
a federally insured depository located in the state of Washington. This
account must be an escrow account wherein the deposited funds are held for the
benefit of the purchaser. The department may request that deposits be placed
in impoundment under RCW 64.36.130.

(4) In addition to the
cancellation rights provided in RCW 64.36.150, the purchaser has the right to
cancel the purchase at any time before the signing of a purchase agreement. If
the purchaser notifies the promoter that he or she wishes to cancel the
timeshare interest reservation, the promoter must refund the full amount of the
deposit minus any account fees within ten days of the notice.

(5) If prior to the
signing of a purchase agreement, the purchaser learns that the promoter
proposes to raise the purchase price above the price agreed to in the written
reservation agreement for the timeshare interest reservation, the written
reservation agreement is void and all deposit moneys including account fees
shall be returned to the purchaser within ten days after the purchaser learns
of the proposed price increase.

(6) If the promoter
charges account fees to pay for administrative costs of holding the purchaser's
funds in escrow, these fees may be no more than one percent of the total
deposit paid towards the timeshare interest reservation by the purchaser.

(7) The promoter shall
provide instructions to the escrow company for release of the funds to be held
in escrow in compliance with this section and rules of the department.

(8) The purchaser's
right to cancel and the amount of the deposit proposed to be retained for
account fees in the event of cancellation must be included in the contract for
the sale of a timeshare interest reservation and the contract must state:

PURCHASER
CANCELLATION RIGHTS

As a purchaser of a
timeshare interest reservation, you have the right to cancel this timeshare
interest reservation and receive a refund of all consideration paid (less only
those account fee deductions which were fully disclosed at the time of the agreement)
by providing written notice of the cancellation to the promoter or the
promoter's agent at any time prior to signing a purchase agreement. You also
have a right to cancel your purchase within seven days of signing a purchase
agreement.

(9) If it
appears that the timeshare project will become or does become insolvent prior
to completion, the promoter shall instruct the escrow company to immediately
return all deposits to purchasers of timeshare interest reservations. If funds
are returned under this subsection, the promoter may not retain any portion of
the deposits for account fees.

---
END ---