BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.12.270 and 1988 c
236 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

An employer shall allow
an employee to use the employee's ((accrued)) choice of sick
leave or other paid time off to care for a ((child of the employee
under the age of eighteen)) spouse, child, parent, parent-in-law, or
grandparent of the employee with a health condition that requires treatment
or supervision. Use of leave other than ((accrued)) sick leave or
other paid time off to care for a child, spouse, parent, parent-in-law,
or grandparent under the circumstances described in this section shall be
governed by the terms of the appropriate collective bargaining agreement or
employer policy, as applicable.

For the purposes of
this section, "sick leave or other paid time off" includes time
allowed to an employee for illness, vacation, and personal holiday. If, under
the terms of the appropriate collective bargaining agreement or employer policy
pertaining to the employee, the employee is entitled to sick leave or other
time off for his or her illness, vacation, and/or personal holiday, then the
employee may use any or all of such time to care for another person as
described in this act. If the appropriate collective bargaining agreement or
employer policy requires the employee to provide advance notice for vacation or
personal holiday time, then the employee must comply with such agreement or
policy. "Sick leave or other paid time off" does not include jury
duty or military duty.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 49.12 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295 unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Child"
means a biological, adopted, or foster child, a stepchild, a legal ward, or a
child of a person standing in loco parentis who is: (a) Under eighteen years
of age; or (b) eighteen years of age or older and incapable of self-care
because of a mental or physical disability.

(2)
"Grandparent" means a parent of a parent of an employee.

(3) "Parent"
means a biological parent of an employee or an individual who stood in loco
parentis to an employee when the employee was a child.

(4)
"Parent-in-law" means a parent of the spouse of an employee.

(5) "Spouse"
means a husband or wife, as the case may be.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 49.12 RCW to read as follows:

An
employer shall not discharge, threaten to discharge, demote, suspend,
discipline, or otherwise discriminate against an employee because the
employee: (1) Has exercised, or attempted to exercise, any right provided
under RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295; or (2) has filed a complaint, testified,
or assisted in any proceeding under RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295.

---
END ---