BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
that when the death of a person, serious injury to a person, or other
substantial loss is alleged or suspected to be caused at least in part by the
actions of a state agency, a loss prevention review shall be conducted. The
legislature recognizes the tension inherent in a loss prevention review and the
need to balance the prevention of harm to the public with state agencies'
accountability to the public. The legislature intends to minimize this tension
and to foster open and frank discussions by granting members of the loss
prevention review teams protection from having to testify, and by declaring a
general rule that the work product of these teams is inadmissible in civil
actions or administrative proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The director of
financial management shall appoint a loss prevention review team when the death
of a person, serious injury to a person, or other substantial loss is alleged
or suspected to be caused at least in part by the actions of a state agency, unless
the director in his or her discretion determines that the incident does not
merit review. A loss prevention review team may also be appointed when any
other substantial loss occurs as a result of agency policies, litigation or
defense practices, or other management practices. When the director decides
not to appoint a loss prevention review team he or she shall issue a statement
of the reasons for the director's decision. The statement shall be made
available on the web site of the office of financial management. The
director's decision pursuant to this section to appoint or not appoint a loss
prevention review team shall not be admitted into evidence in a civil or
administrative proceeding.

(2) A loss prevention
review team shall consist of at least three but no more than five persons, and
may include independent consultants, contractors, or state employees, but it
shall not include any person employed by the agency involved in the loss or
risk of loss giving rise to the review, nor any person with testimonial
knowledge of the incident to be reviewed. At least one member of the review
team shall have expertise relevant to the matter under review.

(3) The loss prevention
review team shall review the death, serious injury, or other incident and the
circumstances surrounding it, evaluate its causes, and recommend steps to
reduce the risk of such incidents occurring in the future. The loss prevention
review team shall accomplish these tasks by reviewing relevant documents,
interviewing persons with relevant knowledge, and reporting its recommendations
in writing to the director of financial management and the director of the
agency involved in the loss or risk of loss within the time requested by the
director of financial management. The final report shall not disclose the
contents of any documents required by law to be kept confidential.

(4) Pursuant to
guidelines established by the director, state agencies must notify the office
of financial management immediately upon becoming aware of a death, serious
injury, or other substantial loss that is alleged or suspected to be caused at
least in part by the actions of the state agency. State agencies shall provide
the loss prevention review team ready access to relevant documents in their
possession and ready access to their employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The final report
from a loss prevention review team to the director of financial management
shall be made public by the director promptly upon receipt, and shall be
subject to public disclosure. The final report shall be subject to discovery
in a civil or administrative proceeding. However, the final report shall not
be admitted into evidence or otherwise used in a civil or administrative
proceeding except pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The relevant
excerpt or excerpts from the final report of a loss prevention review team may
be used to impeach a fact witness in a civil or administrative proceeding only
if the party wishing to use the excerpt or excerpts from the report first shows
the court by clear and convincing evidence that the witness, in testimony
provided in deposition or at trial in the present proceeding, has contradicted
his or her previous statements to the loss prevention review team on an issue
of fact material to the present proceeding. In that case, the party may use
only the excerpt or excerpts necessary to demonstrate the contradiction. This
section shall not be interpreted as expanding the scope of material that may be
used to impeach a witness.

(3) No member of a loss
prevention review team may be examined in a civil or administrative proceeding
as to (a) the work of the loss prevention review team, (b) the incident under
review, (c) his or her statements, deliberations, thoughts, analyses, or
impressions relating to the work of the loss prevention review team or the
incident under review, or (d) the statements, deliberations, thoughts,
analyses, or impressions of any other member of the loss prevention review
team, or any person who provided information to it, relating to the work of the
loss prevention review team or the incident under review.

(4) Any document that
exists prior to the appointment of a loss prevention review team, or that is
created independently of such a team, does not become inadmissible merely
because it is reviewed or used by the loss prevention review team. A person
does not become unavailable as a witness merely because the person has been interviewed
by or has provided a statement to a loss prevention review team. However, if
called as a witness, the person may not be examined regarding the person's
interactions with the loss prevention review team, including without limitation
whether the loss prevention review team interviewed the person, what questions
the loss prevention review team asked, and what answers the person provided to
the loss prevention review team. This section shall not be construed as
restricting the person from testifying fully in any proceeding regarding his or
her knowledge of the incident under review.

(5) Documents prepared
by or for the loss prevention review team are inadmissible and may not be used
in a civil or administrative proceeding, except that excerpts may be used to
impeach the credibility of a witness under the same circumstances that excerpts
of the final report may be used pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

(6) The restrictions
set forth in this section shall not apply in a licensing or disciplinary
proceeding arising from an agency's effort to revoke or suspend the license of
any licensed professional based in whole or in part upon allegations of
wrongdoing in connection with the death, injury, or other incident reviewed by
the loss prevention review team.

(7) Within one hundred
twenty days after completion of the final report of a loss prevention review
team, the agency under review shall issue to the office of financial management
a response to the report. The response will indicate (a) which of the report's
recommendations the agency hopes to implement, (b) whether implementation of
those recommendations will require additional funding or legislation, and (c)
whatever other information the director may require. This response shall be
considered part of the final report and shall be subject to all provisions of
this section that apply to the final report, including without limitation the
restrictions on admissibility and use in civil or administrative proceedings
and the obligation of the director to make the final report public.

(8)
Nothing in section 2 of this act or this section is intended to limit the scope
of a legislative inquiry into or review of an incident that is the subject of a
loss prevention review.

---
END ---