BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.230.120 and 1984
c 178 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) School districts
shall issue diplomas to students signifying graduation from high school upon
the students' satisfactory completion of all local and state graduation
requirements. Districts shall grant students the option of receiving a final
transcript in addition to the regular diploma.

(2) School districts or
schools of attendance shall establish policies and procedures to notify senior
students of the transcript option and shall direct students to indicate their
decisions in a timely manner. School districts shall make appropriate
provisions to assure that students who choose to receive a copy of their final
transcript shall receive such transcript after graduation.

(3)(a) A school
district may issue a high school diploma to a person who:

(i) Is an honorably
discharged member of the armed forces of the United States;

(ii) Was scheduled
to graduate from high school after 1940 and before 1951; and

(iii) Left high
school before graduation to serve in World War II.

(b) A school
district may issue a diploma to or on behalf of a person otherwise eligible
under (a) of this subsection notwithstanding the fact that the person holds a
high school equivalency certification or is deceased.

(c) The
superintendent of public instruction shall adopt a form for a diploma
application to be used by a veteran or a person acting on behalf of a deceased
veteran under this subsection (3). The superintendent of public instruction
shall specify what constitutes acceptable evidence of eligibility for a
diploma.

--- END ---