BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department may
sell advertising or enter into agreements for the purpose of selling
advertising for inclusion in any of its publications, materials, or mailings.

(2) The department may
enter into agreements for the distribution of third-party publications or other
materials related to its mission of protecting and enhancing the public safety
and welfare in the areas it licenses and regulates that may contain commercial
advertisements or logos.

(3) The department
shall retain the right by agreement to approve advertising content to ensure that
the products or services are harmonious with the subject matter of the
publication and are not inconsistent with the department's mission to promote
public safety. The director shall deny any advertisement that includes content
that may be interpreted as contrary to the agency's mission or may carry
connotations offensive to good taste and decency or that would be misleading.
Any public information materials that include advertising of any kind must
provide a statement that inclusion of the materials does not constitute an
endorsement by the state or the agency of the products or services so
advertised.

(4) The department
shall deposit proceeds from advertising into the department of licensing
advertising account.

(5) The department
shall adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.68 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of licensing advertising account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The department shall deposit all receipts from advertising in
department publications, materials, and mailings into the account. The
department may spend money from the account only for purposes of offsetting
production, distribution, or postage costs of publications, materials, or
mailings relating to traffic safety and the licensing or regulation of motor
vehicles and motor vehicle operators. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

---
END ---