BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.56.230 and 1991 c
245 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

On the
first day of each month the county treasurer shall distribute pro rata to
those taxing districts for which the county treasurer also serves as the
district treasurer, according to the rate of levy for each fund, the amount
collected as consolidated tax during the preceding month: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That the county treasurer, at his or her option, may distribute the total
amount of such taxes collected according to the ratio that the levy of taxes
made for each taxing district in the county bears to such total amount
collected. On or before the tenth day of each month the county treasurer shall
remit to the respective city treasurers ((the cities')) and all other
taxing districts for which the county treasurer does not serve as district
treasurer, their pro rata share of all taxes collected for the previous
month as provided for in RCW 36.29.110.

--- END ---