BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The western Washington
center for agriculture and garden research is created. The purpose of the
western Washington center for agriculture and garden research is to provide
statewide leadership in research and extension programs in agriculture and
gardening. The western Washington center for agriculture and garden research
exists as a quasi-administrative unit of Washington State University, but must
be a nonprofit, self-supporting membership organization in its own right.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The western Washington
center for agriculture and garden research must require membership dues and
accept those gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests, whether real or
personal property, in trust or otherwise, for the use or benefit of the western
Washington center for agriculture and garden research; and sell, lease or
exchange, invest or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income
thereof except as limited by the terms of the gifts, grants, conveyances,
bequests, and devises; and adopt proper rules to govern and protect the receipt
and expenditure of the proceeds of all fees, and the proceeds, rents, profits,
and income of all gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The western
Washington center for agriculture and garden research is to work cooperatively
with Washington State University to maximize the use of financial resources in
addressing agriculture and gardening issues and enhancing agricultural productivity
and environmental stewardship for improved quality of life, including, but not
limited to:

(a) Urban plant health
care;

(b) Environmental
studies;

(c) Organic farm and
food systems; and

(d) Human and community
development.

(2) All assets at
Washington State University's research and extension centers located in
Puyallup and Mt. Vernon must be transferred to the western Washington center
for agriculture and garden research created in section 1 of this act by June
30, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The governance of the
western Washington center for agriculture and garden research is vested in a
board of directors to consist of ten members. For the first six years of the
existence of the western Washington center for agriculture and garden research,
the directors must be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the
senate. The directors hold their offices for a term of six years, beginning
October 1, 2002. The directors hold their office until their successors are
elected by the membership of the western Washington center for agriculture and
garden research.

(2) Six members of the
board of directors constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In the
case of a vacancy, the governor must fill the vacancy for the remainder of the
term of the director whose position has been vacated.

(3) Each director must,
before entering upon the discharge of his or her respective duties as such,
execute a good and sufficient bond to the state of Washington, with two or more
sufficient sureties, residents of the state, or with a surety company licensed
to do business within the state, in the sum of not less than five thousand
dollars, conditioned for the faithful performance of his or her duties as a
director. However, the western Washington center for agriculture and garden
research must pay any fees incurred for such a bond for the board members.
Members of the board must be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The western Washington
center for agriculture and garden research must be managed by an administrator
hired by the board of directors.

(1) The board of
directors created in section 4 of this act must advise the administrator.

(2) It is the
responsibility of the administrator, in consultation with the board of
directors, to:

(a) Recommend research
and extension priorities for the western Washington center for agriculture and
garden research;

(b) Conduct a
competitive grants process to solicit, review, and prioritize research and
extension proposals; and

(c) Advise Washington
State University on the progress of the development and implementation of
research, teaching, and extension programs.

(3) The western
Washington center for agriculture and garden research must cooperate with
public and private laboratories.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 5 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

---
END ---