BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.230.195 and 1999
c 373 s 603 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If students' scores
on the test or assessments under RCW 28A.230.190, 28A.230.193,
28A.230.230, and ((28A.630.885)) 28A.655.060 indicate that
students need help in identified areas, the school district shall evaluate its
instructional practices and make appropriate adjustments.

(2) Each school
district shall notify the parents of each student of their child's performance
on the test and assessments conducted under this chapter.

(3) After the office
of the superintendent of public instruction has verified that the school
district data are complete and accurate, the Washington assessment of student
learning test booklets shall be redistributed to the schools. The schools
shall make available each student's test booklet to that student's teacher to
use as a diagnostic tool to help the student meet the state standards.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.655.090 and 1999
c 388 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By September 10,
1998, and by September 10th each year thereafter, the superintendent of public
instruction shall report to schools, school districts, and the legislature on
the results of the Washington assessment of student learning and state-mandated
norm-referenced standardized tests.

(2) The reports shall
include the assessment results by school and school district, and include
changes over time. For the Washington assessment of student learning, results
shall be reported as follows:

(a) The percentage of
students meeting the standards;

(b) The percentage of
students performing at each level of the assessment; and

(c) A learning
improvement index that shows changes in student performance within the
different levels of student learning reported on the Washington assessment of
student learning.

(3) The reports shall
contain data regarding the different characteristics of schools, such as
poverty levels, percent of English as a second language students, dropout
rates, attendance, percent of students in special education, and student
mobility so that districts and schools can learn from the improvement efforts
of other schools and districts with similar characteristics.

(4) The reports shall
contain student scores on mandated tests by comparable Washington schools of
similar characteristics.

(5) The reports shall
contain information on public school choice options available to students,
including vocational education.

(6) The reports shall
be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's internet web site.

(7) To protect the
privacy of students, the results of schools and districts that test fewer than
ten students in a grade level shall not be reported. In addition, in order to
ensure that results are reported accurately, the superintendent of public
instruction shall maintain the confidentiality of statewide data files until
the superintendent determines that the data are complete and accurate.

(8) After the office
of the superintendent of public instruction has verified that the school district
data are complete and accurate, the Washington assessment of student learning
test booklets shall be redistributed to the schools. The schools shall make
available each student's test booklet to that student's teacher to use as a
diagnostic tool to help the student meet the state standards.

(9)
The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor the percentage and
number of special education and limited English-proficient students exempted
from taking the assessments by schools and school districts to ensure the
exemptions are in compliance with exemption guidelines.

---
END ---