BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.73.180 and 1987 c
214 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Other
vehicles not herein defined by this chapter shall not be used for
transportation of patients who must be carried on a stretcher for purposes
of medical care or who may require medical attention en route, except that
such transportation may be used when a disaster creates a situation that cannot
be served by licensed ambulances.

(2) The
department of health, in consultation with the department of licensing, shall
define by rule adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW the terms necessary to
administer this section and assure the health and safety of those who travel in
a prone or supine position.

--- END ---