BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.82.280 and 1986 c
80 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall apply
throughout this chapter.

(1) "Driver
training school" means a commercial driver training school engaged in the
business of giving instruction, for a fee, in the operation of automobiles.

(2)
"Director" means the director of the department of licensing of the
state of Washington.

(3) "Advisory
committee" means the driving instructors' advisory committee as created in
this chapter.

(4) "Fraudulent
practices" means any conduct or representation on the part of a licensee
under this chapter tending to induce anyone to believe, or to give the
impression, that a license to operate a motor vehicle or any other license
granted by the director may be obtained by any means other than those
prescribed by law, or furnishing or obtaining the same by illegal or improper
means, or requesting, accepting, or collecting money for such purposes.

(5)
"Instructor" means any person employed by a driver training school to
instruct persons in the operation of automobiles.

(6) "Place of
business" means a designated location at which the business of a driver
training school is transacted and its records are kept.

(7) "Branch
classroom" means a designated location where driver training takes place
that is separate from the established place of business.

(8)
"Person" means any individual, firm, corporation, partnership, or
association.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.82.360 and 1989 c
337 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The license of any
driver training school or instructor may be suspended, revoked, denied, or
refused renewal for failure to comply with the business practices specified in
this section.

(1) No place of
business shall be established nor any business of a driver training school
conducted or solicited within one thousand feet of an office or building owned
or leased by the department of licensing in which examinations for drivers'
licenses are conducted. The distance of one thousand feet shall be measured
along the public streets by the nearest route from the place of business to
such building.

(2) Any automobile used
by a driver training school or an instructor for instruction purposes must be
equipped with:

(a) Dual controls for
foot brake and clutch, or foot brake only in a vehicle equipped with an
automatic transmission;

(b) An instructor's
rear view mirror; and

(c) A sign displayed on
the back or top, or both, of the vehicle not less than twenty inches in
horizontal width or less than ten inches in vertical height and having the
words "student driver" or "instruction car," or both, in
legible, printed, English letters at least two and one-half inches in height
near the top and the name of the school in similarly legible letters not less
than one inch in height placed somewhere below the aforementioned words, and
the street number and name and the telephone number in similarly legible
letters at least one inch in height placed next below the name of the school.
The lettering and background colors shall be of contrasting shades so as to be
clearly readable at one hundred feet in clear daylight. The sign shall be
displayed at all times when instruction is being given.

(3) Instruction may not
be given by an instructor to a student in an automobile unless the student
possesses a current and valid instruction permit issued pursuant to RCW
46.20.055 or a current and valid driver's license.

(4) No driver training
school or instructor shall advertise or otherwise indicate that the issuance of
a driver's license is guaranteed or assured as a result of the course of
instruction offered.

(5) No driver training
school or instructor shall utilize any types of advertising without using the
full, legal name of the school and identifying itself as a driver training
school. Items and services advertised must be available in a manner as might
be expected by the average person reading the advertisement.

(6) A driver training
school shall have an established place of business owned, rented, or leased by
the school and regularly occupied and used exclusively for the business of
giving driver instruction. The established place of business of a driver
training school that applies for an initial license after July 23, 1989, shall
be located in a district that is zoned for business or commercial purposes.

(a) A driver
training school may have branch classrooms as long as the school has an
established place of business in this state.

(i) The branch
classroom may be in a location that is used for other educational purposes and
need not be regularly occupied or used only for driver education. If a driver
training school commences a course at a branch classroom, the school may not
change branch classroom locations until all the classes scheduled as part of
the course have been held. The only exception is when the branch classroom
becomes unusable to the driver training school.

(ii) The records of
the driver training school need not be maintained at the branch classroom.
However, the driver training school must segregate the records for the branch
classroom from the records for other classrooms used by the school and keep the
records at an established place of business in this state.

(b) The
established place of business, branch ((office, or)) classroom,
or advertised address of any such driver training school shall not consist of
or include a house trailer, residence, tent, temporary stand, temporary
address, bus, telephone answering service if such service is the sole means of
contacting the driver training school, a room or rooms in a hotel or rooming
house or apartment house, or premises occupied by a single or multiple-unit
dwelling house. ((To classify as a branch office or classroom the facility
must be within a thirty-five mile radius of the established place of business.))

(c) Nothing in
this subsection may be construed as limiting the authority of local governments
to grant conditional use permits or variances from zoning ordinances.

(7) No driver training
school or instructor shall conduct any type of instruction or training on a
course used by the department of licensing for testing applicants for a
Washington driver's license.

(8) Each driver
training school shall maintain records on all of its students, including the
student's name and address, the starting and ending dates of instruction, the
student's instruction permit or driver's license number, the type of training
given, and the total number of hours of instruction. Records of past students
shall be maintained for five years following the completion of the instruction.

(9) Each driver
training school shall, at its established place of business or its branch
classroom, display, in a place where it can be seen by all clients, a copy
of the required minimum curriculum compiled by the driver advisory committee.
Copies of the required minimum curriculum are to be provided to driver training
schools and instructors by the director.

(10)
Driver training schools and instructors shall submit to periodic inspections of
their business practices, facilities, records, and insurance by authorized
representatives of the director of the department of licensing.

---
END ---