BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.158.110 and 1989
c 20 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within the first
minute of the telephone call, a commercial telephone solicitor or salesperson
shall:

(a) Identify himself or
herself, the company on whose behalf the solicitation is being made, the
property, goods, or services being sold; and

(b) Terminate the
telephone call within ten seconds if the purchaser indicates he or she does not
wish to continue the conversation.

(2) If at any time
during the telephone contact, the purchaser states or indicates that he or she
does not wish to be called again by the commercial telephone solicitor or wants
to have his or her name and individual telephone number removed from the
telephone lists used by the commercial telephone solicitor:

(a) The commercial
telephone solicitor shall not make any additional commercial telephone
solicitation of the called party at that telephone number within a period of at
least one year; and

(b) The commercial
telephone solicitor shall not sell or give the called party's name and
telephone number to another commercial telephone solicitor: PROVIDED, That the
commercial telephone solicitor may return the list, including the called
party's name and telephone number, to the company or organization from which it
received the list.

(3) The utilities and
transportation commission shall by rule ensure that telecommunications
companies inform their residential customers of the provisions of this section and
section 2 of this act. The notification may be made by:

(a) Annual inserts in
the billing statements mailed to residential customers; or

(b) Conspicuous
publication of the notice in the consumer information pages of local telephone
directories.

(4) If a sale or an
agreement to purchase is completed, the commercial telephone solicitor must
inform the purchaser of his or her cancellation rights as enunciated in this
chapter, state the registration number issued by the department of licensing,
and give the street address of the seller.

(5) If, at any time
prior to sale or agreement to purchase, the commercial telephone solicitor's registration
number is requested by the purchaser, it must be provided.

(6) All oral
disclosures required by this section shall be made in a clear and intelligible
manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 19.158 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department
of licensing shall provide for the establishment and operation of a list of
telephone numbers of persons who object to receiving commercial telephone
solicitations. The list shall be called the do not call list. The department
shall update the list quarterly, and shall provide the list, in written or
electronic form, to commercial telephone solicitors that are registered with
the department under RCW 19.158.050 and have paid all applicable fees. The
department shall establish a fee sufficient to support the costs of
administering and enforcing this section and providing the list quarterly to
each commercial telephone solicitor. Each commercial telephone solicitor registered
under this chapter must pay the fee annually.

(b) Beginning July 1,
2003, persons wishing to have their phone numbers placed on the list must
notify the department of licensing. A listing shall be effective for two
years, after which the person may renew the listing for successive two-year
periods by notifying the department of licensing. The department of licensing
shall determine the notification requirements.

(c) All fees collected
by the department of licensing under this section, and civil penalties and
attorneys' fees collected by the attorney general in enforcing this section,
shall be deposited in the commercial telephone solicitation account created in
section 3 of this act, and used solely for the administration and enforcement
of this section.

(2) No commercial
telephone solicitor may make a commercial telephone solicitation to any
telephone number more than sixty days after the number appears on the current
do not call list. Except that no commercial telephone solicitor may be liable
if the solicitor demonstrates that: (a) The solicitor established and
implemented written procedures and trained its employees to follow such
procedures to comply with this section; (b) the solicitor deleted from its call
list any listing of a number on the then current quarterly do not call list;
and (c) the call was made inadvertently.

(3) The legislature
finds that the practices covered by this section are matters vitally affecting
the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this section is not reasonable in relation
to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. In addition to any
other penalties or remedies available under this chapter or chapter 19.86 RCW,
a person injured by a violation of subsection (2) of this section may bring an
action for recovery of liquidated damages in the amount of one thousand dollars
per violation, plus court costs and attorneys' fees.

(4) The director of the
department of licensing may make rules, create forms, and issue orders as
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 19.158 RCW to read as follows:

The commercial
telephone solicitation account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All moneys received by the department under section 2 of this act
and civil penalties and attorneys' fees collected by the attorney general in
enforcing section 2 of this act shall be deposited in the commercial telephone
solicitation account and used solely for the administration and enforcement of
section 2 of this act. Only the director of the department of licensing or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account
is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for expenditures.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---