BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature makes the
following findings:

(1) Washington state is
at significant risk to damages caused by humans and natural disasters;

(2) Here in the state
of Washington there exists no other statewide warning system other than the
emergency alert system to warn the public of terrorist incidents, other
human-caused emergencies, or natural disasters;

(3) Tone alert weather
radios are available for purchase by the general public at minimal cost;

(4) The technology
exists for a partnership of government agencies at the federal, state, and
local levels, working in cooperation with other public and private agencies to
provide a low cost system for providing warning; and

(5) It is the duty of
government to provide adequate warning to its citizenry.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The emergency
management division of the state military department, will provide, with
funding from this act, and in coordination with other federal and state
agencies, a communications infrastructure that provides for activation of the
emergency alert system at state and county levels.

(2) Public and private
facilities must have installed, routinely test, and have in operation tone
alert weather radios that can be used to warn employees, residents, or patrons
of ongoing terrorist attacks, hazardous materials spills, volcanic eruptions,
impending storms, or other emergency information.

(3) For purposes of
this section, "public and private facilities" includes buildings that
may have a population of one hundred or more people at any time during the
day. Examples of these facilities include schools, other government buildings,
office buildings, theaters, manufacturing facilities, restaurants, and shopping
malls.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The sum of five hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the emergency
management division of the military department for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---