BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.19.1905 and 1995
c 269 s 1402 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of general
administration shall establish overall state policy for compliance by all state
agencies, including educational institutions, regarding the following
purchasing and material control functions:

(1) Development of a
state commodity coding system, including common stock numbers for items
maintained in stores for reissue;

(2) Determination where
consolidations, closures, or additions of stores operated by state agencies and
educational institutions should be initiated;

(3) Institution of
standard criteria for determination of when and where an item in the state
supply system should be stocked;

(4) Establishment of
stock levels to be maintained in state stores, and formulation of standards for
replenishment of stock;

(5) Formulation of an
overall distribution and redistribution system for stock items which
establishes sources of supply support for all agencies, including interagency
supply support;

(6) Determination of
what function data processing equipment, including remote terminals, shall
perform in statewide purchasing and material control for improvement of service
and promotion of economy;

(7) Standardization of
records and forms used statewide for supply system activities involving
purchasing, receiving, inspecting, storing, requisitioning, and issuing
functions, including a standard notification form for state agencies to report
cost-effective direct purchases, which shall at least identify the price of the
goods as available through the division of purchasing, the price of the goods
as available from the alternative source, the total savings, and the signature
of the notifying agency's director or the director's designee;

(8) Screening of
supplies, material, and equipment excess to the requirements of one agency for
overall state need before sale as surplus;

(9) Establishment of
warehouse operation and storage standards to achieve uniform, effective, and
economical stores operations;

(10) Establishment of
time limit standards for the issuing of material in store and for processing
requisitions requiring purchase;

(11) Formulation of
criteria for determining when centralized rather than decentralized purchasing
shall be used to obtain maximum benefit of volume buying of identical or
similar items, including procurement from federal supply sources;

(12) Development of
criteria for use of leased, rather than state owned, warehouse space based on
relative cost and accessibility;

(13) Institution of
standard criteria for purchase and placement of state furnished materials,
carpeting, furniture, fixtures, and nonfixed equipment, in newly constructed or
renovated state buildings;

(14) Determination of
how transportation costs incurred by the state for materials, supplies,
services, and equipment can be reduced by improved freight and traffic
coordination and control;

(15) Establishment of a
formal certification program for state employees who are authorized to perform
purchasing functions as agents for the state under the provisions of chapter
43.19 RCW;

(16) Development of
performance measures for the reduction of total overall expense for material,
supplies, equipment, and services used each biennium by the state;

(17) Establishment of a
standard system for all state organizations to record and report dollar savings
and cost avoidance which are attributable to the establishment and
implementation of improved purchasing and material control procedures;

(18) Development of
procedures for mutual and voluntary cooperation between state agencies,
including educational institutions, and political subdivisions for exchange of
purchasing and material control services;

(19) Resolution of all
other purchasing and material matters which require the establishment of
overall statewide policy for effective and economical supply management;

(20) Development of
guidelines and criteria for the purchase of vehicles, including high gas
mileage and lower emission vehicles; alternate vehicle fuels and systems((,));
equipment((,)); and materials that reduce overall energy-related
costs and energy use by the state((, including)). Vehicle purchase
guidelines and criteria must include the requirement that new passenger
vehicles purchased by the state meet or exceed the minimum standards for
passenger automobile fuel economy established by the United States secretary of
transportation pursuant to the energy policy and conservation act (15 U.S.C.
Sec. 2002) and investigations into opportunities for aggregated purchasing
by state and local governments of higher gas mileage and lower emission
vehicles;

(21) Development of
guidelines and criteria for the purchase of qualified alternative energy
resources as defined in RCW 19.29A.090, including investigations into
opportunities to aggregate purchases for facilities that are owned or leased by
state agencies and educational institutions and that are located within a
serving utility's service area. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed
as prohibiting any state agency or educational institution from purchasing
aggregated billing services.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.19.570 and 1989 c
113 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall
direct and be responsible for the acquisition, operation, maintenance, storage,
repair, and replacement of state motor vehicles under its control. The
department shall utilize state facilities available for the maintenance,
repair, and storage of such motor vehicles, and may provide directly or by
contract for the maintenance, repair, and servicing of all motor vehicles, and
other property related thereto and under its control.

(2) The department may
arrange, by agreement with agencies, for the utilization by one of the storage,
repair, or maintenance facilities of another, with such provision for charges
and credits as may be agreed upon. The department may acquire and maintain
storage, repair, and maintenance facilities for the motor vehicles under its
control from such funds as may be appropriated by the legislature.

(3)(a) The legislature
finds that a clean environment is important and that global warming effects may
be offset by decreasing the emissions of harmful compounds from motor vehicles.
The legislature further finds that the state is in a position to set an example
of large scale use of high gas mileage vehicles, lower emission vehicles,
and alternative vehicle fuels in motor vehicles.

(b) The department
shall consider the use of state vehicles to conduct field tests on alternative
fuels in areas where air pollution constraints may be eased by these optional
fuels. These fuels should include but are not limited to gas-powered and
electric-powered vehicles.

(c) ((For)) The
department and other state agencies shall, before completing planned
purchases of high gas mileage vehicles, lower emission vehicles, and
vehicles using alternative fuels, ((the department and other state agencies
shall)) explore opportunities to purchase these vehicles together with the
federal government, agencies of other states, other Washington state agencies,
local governments, or private organizations for less cost.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.19.637 and 1991 c
199 s 213 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At least thirty
percent of all new vehicles purchased through a state contract shall be
clean-fuel vehicles.

(2) The percentage of
clean-fuel vehicles purchased through a state contract shall increase at the
rate of five percent each year.

(3) In meeting the
procurement requirement established in this section, preference shall be given
to vehicles designed to operate exclusively on clean fuels. In the event that
vehicles designed to operate exclusively on clean fuels are not available or
would not meet the operational requirements for which a vehicle is to be
procured, conventionally powered vehicles may be converted to clean fuel or
dual fuel use to meet the requirements of this section.

(4) Fuel purchased
through a state contract shall be a clean fuel when the fuel is purchased for
the operation of a clean-fuel vehicle.

(5)(a) Weight classes
are established by the following motor vehicle types:

(i) Passenger cars;

(ii) Light duty trucks,
trucks with a gross vehicle weight rating by the vehicle manufacturer of less
than eight thousand five hundred pounds;

(iii) Heavy duty
trucks, trucks with a gross vehicle weight rating by the vehicle manufacturer
of eight thousand five hundred pounds or more.

(b) This subsection does
not place an obligation upon the state or its political subdivisions to
purchase vehicles in any number or weight class other than to meet the percent
procurement requirement.

(6) The percentages
of clean-fuel vehicles required under subsections (1) and (2) of this section
are intended as minimum procurement levels. The department shall seek to
increase the purchasing levels of clean-fuel vehicles above the minimum by
investigating all known opportunities for lowering costs and making purchases
more cost-efficient through aggregated purchasing with local governments.

(7) For the
purposes of this section, "clean fuels" and "clean-fuel
vehicles" shall be those fuels and vehicles meeting the specifications
provided for in RCW 70.120.210.

Sec. 4. RCW 19.29A.090 and 2001
c 214 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning January
1, 2002, each electric utility must provide to its retail electricity customers
a voluntary option to purchase qualified alternative energy resources in
accordance with this section.

(2) Each electric
utility must include with its retail electric customer's regular billing
statements, at least quarterly, a voluntary option to purchase qualified
alternative energy resources. The option may allow customers to purchase
qualified alternative energy resources at fixed or variable rates and for fixed
or variable periods of time, including but not limited to monthly, quarterly, or
annual purchase agreements. A utility may provide qualified alternative energy
resource options through either: (a) Resources it owns or contracts for; or
(b) the purchase of credits issued by a clearinghouse or other system by which
the utility may secure, for trade or other consideration, verifiable evidence
that a second party has a qualified alternative energy resource and that the
second party agrees to transfer such evidence exclusively to the benefit of the
utility.

(3) For the purposes of
this section, a "qualified alternative energy resource" means the
electricity produced from generation facilities that are fueled by: (a) Wind;
(b) solar energy; (c) geothermal energy; (d) landfill gas; (e) wave or tidal
action; (f) gas produced during the treatment of wastewater; (g) qualified
hydropower; or (h) biomass energy based on solid organic fuels from wood,
forest, or field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include wood
pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper‑chrome‑arsenic.

(4) For the purposes of
this section, "qualified hydropower" means the energy produced
either: (a) As a result of modernizations or upgrades made after June 1, 1998,
to hydropower facilities operating on May 8, 2001, that have been demonstrated
to reduce the mortality of anadromous fish; or (b) by run of the river or run
of the canal hydropower facilities that are not responsible for obstructing the
passage of anadromous fish.

(5) The rates, terms,
conditions, and customer notification of each utility's option or options
offered in accordance with this section must be approved by the governing body
of the consumer-owned utility or by the commission for investor-owned
utilities. All costs and benefits associated with any option offered by an
electric utility under this section must be allocated to the customers who
voluntarily choose that option and may not be shifted to any customers who have
not chosen such option. Utilities may pursue known, lawful aggregated
purchasing of qualified alternative energy resources with other utilities to
the extent aggregated purchasing can reduce the unit cost of qualified
alternative energy resources, and are encouraged to investigate opportunities
to aggregate the purchase of alternative energy resources by their customers.
Aggregated purchases by investor-owned utilities must comply with any
applicable rules or policies adopted by the commission related to least-cost
planning or the acquisition of renewable resources.

(6) Each consumer-owned
utility must report annually to the department and each investor-owned utility
must report annually to the commission beginning October 1, 2002, until October
1, 2012, describing the option or options it is offering its customers under
the requirements of this section, the rate of customer participation, the
amount of qualified alternative energy resources purchased by customers, ((and))
the amount of utility investments in qualified alternative energy resources,
and the results of pursuing aggregated purchasing opportunities. The
department and the commission together shall report annually to the
legislature, beginning December 1, 2002, until December 1, 2012, with the
results of the utility reports.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. In preparing the biennial
energy report required under RCW 43.21F.045(2)(h) to be transmitted to the
governor and the legislature by December 1, 2002, the department must include
the following information:

(1) The percentage of
clean-fuel vehicles purchased in 2001 through a state contract pursuant to RCW
43.19.637; and

(2) The
results of efforts by the department of general administration and other state
agencies to aggregate purchasing of higher gas mileage and lower emission
vehicles and qualified alternative energy resources.

---
END ---