BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.02.030 and 1999 c
240 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created
within the department of licensing a business license center.

(2) The duties of the
center shall include:

(a) Developing and
administering a computerized one-stop master license system capable of storing,
retrieving, and exchanging license information with due regard to privacy
statutes, as well as issuing and renewing master licenses in an efficient
manner;

(b) Providing a license
information service detailing requirements to establish or engage in business
in this state;

(c) Providing for
staggered master license renewal;

(d) Identifying types
of licenses appropriate for inclusion in the master license system;

(e) Recommending in
reports to the governor and the legislature the elimination, consolidation, or
other modification of duplicative, ineffective, or inefficient licensing or
inspection requirements; and

(f) Incorporating
licenses into the master license system.

(3) The director of
licensing may adopt under chapter 34.05 RCW such rules as may be necessary to
effectuate the purposes of this chapter, including the setting of fees in
accordance with the fee policy established in RCW 43.24.086.

Sec. 2. RCW 19.02.075 and 1995 c
403 s 1007 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall collect a handling fee ((of fifteen dollars on)) from
each applicant for each master application filed with the department.
The ((entire)) master application handling fee shall be deposited
in the master license fund.

(2) The department
shall collect a handling fee ((of nine dollars on)) from each
licensee for each master license renewal application filed with
the department. The master license renewal application handling
fee((s)) shall be deposited in the master license fund.

(3) The fees
authorized by this section are application handling fees and as such are not
refundable to the applicant or licensee after the respective application has
been processed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
September 1, 2002. The director of the department of licensing may take such
action prior to the effective date of this act necessary to ensure rules
required by section 1 of this act are effective on September 1, 2002.

---
END ---