BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.655.030 and 1999
c 388 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

The powers and duties
of the academic achievement and accountability commission shall include, but
are not limited to the following:

(1) For purposes of
statewide accountability, the commission shall:

(a) Adopt and revise
performance improvement goals in reading, writing, science, and mathematics by
subject and grade level as the commission deems appropriate to improve student
learning, once assessments in these subjects are required statewide. The
goals shall be consistent with student privacy protection provisions of RCW
28A.655.090(7) and shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of
the federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, as amended. The
goals may be established for all students, economically disadvantaged students,
limited English proficient students, students with disabilities, and students from
disproportionately academically underachieving racial and ethnic backgrounds.
The commission may establish school and school district goals addressing high
school graduation rates and dropout reduction goals for students in grades
seven through twelve. The goals shall be in addition to any goals adopted
in RCW 28A.655.050. The commission may also revise any goal adopted in RCW
28A.655.050. The commission shall adopt the goals by rule. However, before
each goal is implemented, the commission shall present the goal to the
education committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the
committees' review and comment in a time frame that will permit the legislature
to take statutory action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature;

(b) Identify the scores
students must achieve in order to meet the standard on the Washington
assessment of student learning and determine student scores that identify
levels of student performance below and beyond the standard. The commission
shall set such performance standards and levels in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and after consideration of any
recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that may be
established for this purpose;

(c) Adopt objective,
systematic criteria to identify successful schools and school districts and
recommend to the superintendent of public instruction schools and districts to
be recognized for two types of accomplishments, student achievement and
improvements in student achievement. Recognition for improvements in student
achievement shall include consideration of one or more of the following
accomplishments:

(i) An increase in the
percent of students meeting standards. The level of achievement required for
recognition may be based on the achievement goals established by the
legislature under RCW 28A.655.050 and the commission under (a) of this
subsection;

(ii) Positive progress
on an improvement index that measures improvement in all levels of the assessment;
and

(iii) Improvements
despite challenges such as high levels of mobility, poverty, English as a
second language learners, and large numbers of students in special populations
as measured by either the percent of students meeting the standard, or the improvement
index.

When determining the
baseline year or years for recognizing individual schools, the commission may
use the assessment results from the initial years the assessments were
administered, if doing so with individual schools would be appropriate;

(d) Adopt objective,
systematic criteria to identify schools and school districts in need of
assistance and those in which significant numbers of students persistently fail
to meet state standards. In its deliberations, the commission shall consider
the use of all statewide mandated criterion-referenced and norm-referenced
standardized tests;

(e) Identify schools
and school districts in which state intervention measures will be needed and a
range of appropriate intervention strategies, beginning no earlier than June
30, 2001, and after the legislature has authorized a set of intervention
strategies. Beginning no earlier than June 30, 2001, and after the legislature
has authorized a set of intervention strategies, at the request of the
commission, the superintendent shall intervene in the school or school district
and take corrective actions. This chapter does not provide additional
authority for the commission or the superintendent of public instruction to
intervene in a school or school district;

(f) Identify
performance incentive systems that have improved or have the potential to
improve student achievement;

(g) Annually review the
assessment reporting system to ensure fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and
equity of opportunity, especially with regard to schools with special
circumstances and unique populations of students, and a recommendation to the
superintendent of public instruction of any improvements needed to the system;

(h) Annually report by
December 1st to the legislature, the governor, the superintendent of public
instruction, and the state board of education on the progress, findings, and
recommendations of the commission. The report may include recommendations of
actions to help improve student achievement;

(i) By December 1,
2000, and by December 1st annually thereafter, report to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate on the progress that
has been made in achieving the reading goal under RCW 28A.655.050 and any
additional goals adopted by the commission;

(j) Coordinate its
activities with the state board of education and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction;

(k) Seek advice from
the public and all interested educational organizations in the conduct of its
work; and

(l) Establish advisory
committees, which may include persons who are not members of the commission;

(2) Holding meetings
and public hearings, which may include regional meetings and hearings;

(3) Hiring necessary
staff and determining the staff's duties and compensation. However, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide staff support to the
commission until the commission has hired its own staff, and shall provide most
of the technical assistance and logistical support needed by the commission
thereafter. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall be
the fiscal agent for the commission. The commission may direct the office of
the superintendent of public instruction to enter into subcontracts, within the
commission's resources, with school districts, teachers, higher education
faculty, state agencies, business organizations, and other individuals and
organizations to assist the commission in its deliberations; and

(4)
Receiving per diem and travel allowances as permitted under RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

--- END ---