BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited
as the Uniform Athlete Agents Act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. DEFINITIONS. In this
chapter:

(1) "Agency
contract" means an agreement in which a student-athlete authorizes a
person to negotiate or solicit on behalf of the student-athlete a
professional-sports-services contract or an endorsement contract.

(2) "Athlete
agent" means an individual who enters into an agency contract with a
student-athlete or, directly or indirectly, recruits or solicits a
student-athlete to enter into an agency contract. The term does not include a
spouse, parent, sibling, grandparent, or legal guardian of the student-athlete
or an individual acting solely on behalf of a professional sports team or
professional sports organization. The term includes an individual who
represents to the public that the individual is an athlete agent.

(3) "Athletic
director" means an individual responsible for administering the overall
athletic program of an educational institution or, if an educational
institution has separately administered athletic programs for male students and
female students, the athletic program for males or the athletic program for
females, as appropriate.

(4) "Contact"
means a communication, direct or indirect, between an athlete agent and a student-athlete,
to recruit or solicit the student-athlete to enter into an agency contract.

(5) "Endorsement
contract" means an agreement under which a student-athlete is employed or
receives consideration to use on behalf of the other party any value that the
student-athlete may have because of publicity, reputation, following, or fame
obtained because of athletic ability or performance.

(6)
"Intercollegiate sport" means a sport played at the collegiate level
for which eligibility requirements for participation by a student-athlete are
established by a national association for the promotion or regulation of
collegiate athletics.

(7) "Person"
means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership,
limited liability company, association, joint venture, or government;
governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; public corporation; or
any other legal or commercial entity.

(8)
"Professional-sports-services contract" means an agreement under
which an individual is employed or agrees to render services as a player on a
professional sports team, with a professional sports organization, or as a
professional athlete.

(9) "Record"
means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in
an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(10) "State"
means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the
United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to
the jurisdiction of the United States.

(11)
"Student-athlete" means an individual who engages in, is eligible to
engage in, or may be eligible in the future to engage in, any intercollegiate
sport. If an individual is permanently ineligible to participate in a
particular intercollegiate sport, the individual is not a student-athlete for
purposes of that sport.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. SERVICE OF PROCESS. By
engaging in the business of an athlete agent in this state, a nonresident
individual appoints the secretary of state as the individual's agent to accept
service of process in any civil action related to the individual's business as
an athlete agent in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. ATHLETE AGENTS‑‑DELIVERY
OF DISCLOSURE FORM REQUIRED. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(2) of this section, an individual may not act as an athlete agent in this
state unless on the day of initial contact with any student-athlete the athlete
agent delivers to the student-athlete the athlete agent disclosure form as
required by section 5 of this act.

(2) An individual may
act as an athlete agent before delivering an athlete agent disclosure form for
all purposes except signing an agency contract if:

(a) A student-athlete
or another acting on behalf of the student-athlete initiates communication with
the individual; and

(b) Within seven days
after an initial act as an athlete agent, the individual delivers an athlete
agent disclosure form to the student-athlete.

(3) An agency contract
resulting from conduct in violation of this section is void. The athlete agent
shall return any consideration received under the contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. ATHLETE AGENT DISCLOSURE
FORM‑‑ REQUIREMENTS. (1) The athlete agent disclosure form must be
in a record executed in the name of an individual and signed by the athlete
agent under penalty of perjury and, except as otherwise provided in subsection
(2) of this section, must state or contain:

(a) The name of the
athlete agent and the address of the athlete agent's principal place of
business;

(b) The name of the
athlete agent's business or employer, if applicable;

(c) Any business or
occupation engaged in by the athlete agent for the five years next preceding
the date of execution of the athlete agent disclosure form;

(d) A description of
the athlete agent's:

(i) Formal training as
an athlete agent;

(ii) Practical
experience as an athlete agent; and

(iii) Educational
background relating to the athlete agent's activities as an athlete agent;

(e) The names and
addresses of three individuals not related to the athlete agent who are willing
to serve as references;

(f) The name, sport,
and last known team for each individual for whom the athlete agent provided
services as an athlete agent during the five years next preceding the date of
execution of the athlete agent disclosure form;

(g) The names and
addresses of all persons who are:

(i) With respect to the
athlete agent's business if it is not a corporation, the partners, officers,
associates, or profit-sharers; and

(ii) With respect to a
corporation employing the athlete agent, the officers, directors, and any
shareholder of the corporation with a five percent or greater interest;

(h) Whether the athlete
agent or any other person named pursuant to (g) of this subsection has been
convicted of a crime that, if committed in this state, would be a felony or
other crime involving moral turpitude, and identify the crime;

(i) Whether there has
been any administrative or judicial determination that the athlete agent or any
other person named pursuant to (g) of this subsection has made a false,
misleading, deceptive, or fraudulent representation;

(j) Any instance in
which the conduct of the athlete agent or any other person named pursuant to
(g) of this subsection resulted in the imposition of a sanction, suspension, or
declaration of ineligibility to participate in an interscholastic or
intercollegiate athletic event on a student-athlete or educational institution;

(k) Any sanction,
suspension, or disciplinary action taken against the athlete agent or any other
person named pursuant to (g) of this subsection arising out of occupational or
professional conduct; and

(l) Whether there has
been any denial of an application for, suspension or revocation of, or refusal
to renew, the registration or licensure of the athlete agent or any other
person named pursuant to (g) of this subsection as an athlete agent in any
state.

(2) An individual who
has submitted an application for, and received a certificate of or a renewal of
a certificate of, registration or licensure as an athlete agent in another
state may submit a copy of the application and a valid certificate of registration
or licensure from the other state in lieu of submitting an athlete agent
disclosure form in the form prescribed pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, but only if the application to the other state:

(a) Was submitted in
the other state within the six months next preceding the date of delivery of
the athlete agent disclosure form in this state and the athlete agent certifies
the information contained in the application is current;

(b) Contains
information substantially similar to or more comprehensive than that required
in an athlete agent disclosure form under subsection (1) of this section; and

(c) Was signed by the
athlete agent under penalty of perjury.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. DISQUALIFICATIONS. No
person may engage in the business of an athlete agent who has:

(1) Been convicted of a
crime that, if committed in this state, would be a felony or other crime
involving moral turpitude;

(2) Made a materially
false, misleading, deceptive, or fraudulent representation as an athlete agent
or in the application for licensure or registration as an athlete agent in
another state;

(3) Engaged in conduct
prohibited by section 11 of this act;

(4) Had a registration
or licensure as an athlete agent suspended, revoked, or denied or been refused
renewal of registration or licensure in any state; or

(5) Engaged in conduct
or failed to engage in conduct the consequence of which was that a sanction,
suspension, or declaration of ineligibility to participate in an
interscholastic or intercollegiate athletic event was imposed on a
student-athlete or educational institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. FORM OF CONTRACT. (1) An
agency contract must be in a record signed by the parties.

(2) An agency contract
must state or contain:

(a) The amount and
method of calculating the consideration to be paid by the student-athlete for
services to be provided by the athlete agent under the contract and any other
consideration the athlete agent has received or will receive from any other
source for entering into the contract or for providing the services;

(b) The name of any
person other than the athlete agent who will be compensated because the student
athlete signed the agency contract;

(c) A description of
any expenses that the student-athlete agrees to reimburse;

(d) A description of
the services to be provided to the student-athlete;

(e) The duration of the
contract; and

(f) The date of
execution.

(3) An agency contract
must contain, in close proximity to the signature of the student-athlete, a
conspicuous notice in boldface type in capital letters stating:

WARNING
TO STUDENT-ATHLETE

IF YOU SIGN THIS
CONTRACT:

(a) YOU MAY LOSE
YOUR ELIGIBILITY TO COMPETE AS A STUDENT-ATHLETE IN YOUR SPORT;

(b) BOTH YOU AND
YOUR ATHLETE AGENT ARE REQUIRED TO TELL YOUR ATHLETIC DIRECTOR, IF YOU HAVE AN
ATHLETIC DIRECTOR, WITHIN SEVENTY-TWO HOURS PRIOR TO ENTERING INTO AN AGENCY
CONTRACT AND AGAIN WITHIN SEVENTY-TWO HOURS AFTER ENTERING INTO AN AGENCY
CONTRACT; AND

(c) YOU MAY CANCEL
THIS CONTRACT WITHIN FOURTEEN DAYS AFTER SIGNING IT. CANCELLATION OF THE
CONTRACT MAY NOT REINSTATE YOUR ELIGIBILITY.

(4) A copy of the
athlete agent disclosure form delivered to the student-athlete shall be
attached to the agency contract.

(5) An agency contract
that does not conform to this section is voidable by the student-athlete.

(6) The athlete agent
shall give a copy of the signed agency contract to the student-athlete at the
time of signing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. NOTICE TO EDUCATIONAL
INSTITUTION. (1) Within seventy-two hours prior to entering into an agency
contract, the athlete agent shall give notice in a record of the existence of
the contract and shall provide a copy of the athlete agent disclosure form to
the athletic director of the educational institution at which the
student-athlete is enrolled or the athlete agent has reasonable grounds to
believe the student-athlete intends to enroll.

(2) Within seventy-two
hours after entering into an agency contract or before the next scheduled
athletic event in which the student-athlete may participate, whichever occurs
first, the athlete agent shall give notice in a record of the existence of the
contract and shall provide a copy of the athlete agent disclosure form to the
athletic director of the educational institution at which the student-athlete
is enrolled or the athlete agent has reasonable grounds to believe the
student-athlete intends to enroll.

(3) Within seventy-two
hours after entering into an agency contract or before the next athletic event
in which the student-athlete may participate, whichever occurs first, the
student-athlete shall inform the athletic director of the educational
institution at which the student-athlete is enrolled that he or she has entered
into an agency contract and shall provide a copy of the athlete agent
disclosure form.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. STUDENT-ATHLETE'S RIGHT
TO CANCEL. (1) A student-athlete may cancel an agency contract by giving
notice in a record to the athlete agent of the cancellation within fourteen
days after the contract is signed.

(2) A student-athlete
may not waive the right to cancel an agency contract.

(3) If a
student-athlete cancels an agency contract, the student-athlete is not required
to pay any consideration under the contract or to return any consideration
received from the agent to induce the student-athlete to enter into the
contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. REQUIRED RECORDS. (1) An
athlete agent shall retain the following records for a period of five years:

(a) The name and
address of each individual represented by the athlete agent;

(b) Any agency contract
entered into by the athlete agent; and

(c) Any direct costs
incurred by the athlete agent in the recruitment or solicitation of a
student-athlete.

(2) Records required by
subsection (1) of this section to be retained are subject to subpoena in a
judicial proceeding.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. PROHIBITED ACTS. (1) An
athlete agent may not do any of the following with the intent to induce a
student-athlete to enter into an agency contract:

(a) Give any materially
false or misleading information or make a materially false promise or
representation;

(b) Furnish anything of
value to a student-athlete before the student-athlete enters into the agency
contract; or

(c) Furnish anything of
value to any individual other than the student-athlete or another registered
athlete agent.

(2) An athlete agent
may not intentionally:

(a) Initiate contact
with a student-athlete unless providing the student-athlete with the athlete
agent disclosure form as provided in section 4 of this act;

(b) Refuse or willfully
fail to retain or produce in response to subpoena the records required by
section 10 of this act;

(c) Fail to disclose
information required by section 5 of this act;

(d) Provide materially
false or misleading information in an athlete agent disclosure form;

(e) Predate or postdate
an agency contract;

(f) Fail to notify a
student-athlete prior to the student-athlete's signing an agency contract for a
particular sport that the signing by the student-athlete may make the
student-athlete ineligible to participate as a student-athlete in that sport;

(g) Ask or allow a
student-athlete to waive or attempt to waive rights under this chapter;

(h) Fail to give notice
required under section 8 of this act; or

(i) Engage in the
business of an athlete agent in this state: (A) At any time after conviction
under section 12 of this act; or (B) within five years of entry of a civil
judgment under section 13 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. CRIMINAL PENALTIES. The
commission of any act prohibited by section 11 of this act by an athlete agent
is a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW. In addition to
any criminal penalties, the court may assess a civil penalty of up to ten
thousand dollars for a violation of section 11 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. CIVIL REMEDIES. (1) An
educational institution has a right of action against an athlete agent or a
former student-athlete for damages caused by a violation of this chapter. In
an action under this section, the court may award to the prevailing party costs
and reasonable attorneys' fees.

(2) Damages of an
educational institution under subsection (1) of this section include losses and
expenses incurred because, as a result of the activities of an athlete agent or
former student-athlete, the educational institution was injured by a violation
of this chapter or was penalized, disqualified, or suspended from participation
in athletics by a national association for the promotion and regulation of
athletics, by an athletic conference, or by reasonable self-imposed
disciplinary action taken to mitigate sanctions.

(3) A right of action
under this section does not accrue until the educational institution discovers
or by the exercise of reasonable diligence would have discovered the violation
by the athlete agent or former student-athlete.

(4) Any liability of
the athlete agent or the former student-athlete under this section is several
and not joint.

(5) This chapter does
not restrict rights, remedies, or defenses of any person under law or equity.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. APPLICATION AND
CONSTRUCTION. In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must
be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its
subject matter of this chapter among states that enact it.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. SEVERABILITY. If any
provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. CAPTIONS NOT LAW.
Captions used in this chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. Sections 1 through 16 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---