BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 3.50.135 and 1984 c
258 s 126 are each amended to read as follows:

In all civil cases, the
plaintiff or defendant may demand a jury, which shall consist of six citizens
of the state who shall be impaneled and sworn as in cases before district
courts, or the trial may be by a judge of the municipal court: PROVIDED, That
no jury trial may be held on a proceeding involving a traffic infraction. A
party requesting a jury shall pay to the court a fee ((which shall be the
same as that for a jury in district court)) equal to the fee specified
in RCW 36.18.016(3)(a). If more than one party requests a jury, only one
jury fee shall be collected by the court. The fee shall be apportioned among
the requesting parties. Each juror may receive up to twenty-five dollars but
in no case less than ten dollars for each day in attendance upon the municipal
court, and in addition thereto shall receive mileage at the rate determined
under RCW 43.03.060: PROVIDED, That the compensation paid jurors shall be
determined by the legislative authority of the city and shall be uniformly
applied. Jury trials shall be allowed in all criminal cases unless waived by
the defendant.

Sec. 2. RCW 3.62.060 and 1992 c
62 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Clerks of the district
courts shall collect the following fees for their official services:

(1) In any civil action
commenced before or transferred to a district court, the plaintiff shall, at
the time of such commencement or transfer, pay to such court a filing fee of
thirty-one dollars plus any surcharge authorized by RCW 7.75.035. No party
shall be compelled to pay to the court any other fees or charges up to and
including the rendition of judgment in the action other than those listed.

(2) For issuing a writ
of garnishment or other writ a fee of six dollars.

(3) For filing a
supplemental proceeding a fee of twelve dollars.

(4) For demanding a
jury in a civil case a fee ((of fifty dollars)) equal to the fee
specified in RCW 36.18.016(3)(a) to be paid by the person demanding a jury.

(5) For preparing a
transcript of a judgment a fee of six dollars.

(6) For certifying any
document on file or of record in the clerk's office a fee of five dollars.

(7) For preparing the
record of a case for appeal to superior court a fee of forty dollars including
any costs of tape duplication as governed by the rules of appeal for courts of
limited jurisdiction (RALJ).

(8) For duplication of
part or all of the electronic tape or tapes of a proceeding ten dollars per
tape.

The fees or charges
imposed under this section shall be allowed as court costs whenever a judgment
for costs is awarded.

Sec. 3. RCW 10.46.190 and 1977
ex.s. c 248 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every person convicted
of a crime or held to bail to keep the peace shall be liable to all the costs
of the proceedings against him or her, including, when tried by a jury
in the superior court((, a jury fee as provided for in civil actions, and
when)) or tried by a jury before a committing magistrate, ((twenty-five
dollars for)) a jury fee equal to the fee specified in RCW
36.18.016(3)(b), for which judgment shall be rendered and collection had as
in cases of fines. The jury fee, when collected for a case tried by the
superior court, shall be paid to the clerk, to be ((by him)) applied by
the clerk as the jury fee in civil cases is applied.

Sec. 4. RCW 12.12.030 and 1981 c
260 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

After the appearance of
the defendant, and before the justice shall proceed to enquire into the merits
of the cause, either party may demand a jury to try the action, which jury
shall be composed of six good and lawful persons having the qualifications of
jurors in the superior court of the same county, unless the parties shall agree
upon a lesser number: PROVIDED, That the party demanding the jury shall first
pay to the justice the sum ((of twenty-five dollars)) equal to the
fee specified in RCW 36.18.016(3)(a), which shall be paid over by the
justice to the county, and ((said)) such amount shall be taxed as
costs against the losing party.

Sec. 5. RCW 35.20.090 and 1987 c
202 s 195 are each amended to read as follows:

In all civil cases and
criminal cases where jurisdiction is concurrent with district courts as
provided in RCW 35.20.250, within the jurisdiction of the municipal court, the
plaintiff or defendant may demand a jury, which shall consist of six citizens
of the state who shall be impaneled and sworn as in cases before district
courts, or the trial may be by a judge of the municipal court: PROVIDED, That no
jury trial may be held on a proceeding involving a traffic infraction. A
defendant requesting a jury shall pay to the court a fee ((which shall be
the same as that for a jury in district court)) equal to the fee
specified in RCW 36.18.016(3). Where there is more than one defendant in
an action and one or more of them requests a jury, only one jury fee shall be
collected by the court. Each juror may receive up to twenty-five dollars but
in no case less than ten dollars for each day in attendance upon the municipal
court, and in addition thereto shall receive mileage at the rate determined
under RCW 43.03.060: PROVIDED, That the compensation paid jurors shall be
determined by the legislative authority of the city and shall be uniformly
applied. Trial by jury shall be allowed in criminal cases involving violations
of city ordinances commencing January 1, 1972, unless such incorporated city
affected by this chapter has made provision therefor prior to January 1, 1972.

Sec. 6. RCW 36.18.016 and 2001 c
146 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Revenue collected
under this section is not subject to division under RCW 36.18.025 or 27.24.070.

(2) For the filing of a
petition for modification of a decree of dissolution or paternity, within the
same case as the original action, a fee of twenty dollars must be paid.

(3)(a) The party making
a demand for a jury of six in a civil action shall pay, at the time, a fee of
one hundred twenty-five dollars; if the demand is for a jury of twelve, a fee
of two hundred fifty dollars. If, after the party demands a jury of six and
pays the required fee, any other party to the action requests a jury of twelve,
an additional one hundred twenty-five dollar fee will be required of the party
demanding the increased number of jurors.

(b) Upon conviction in
criminal cases a jury demand charge of ((fifty)) one hundred
twenty-five dollars for a jury of six, or ((one)) two hundred
fifty dollars for a jury of twelve may be imposed as costs under RCW 10.46.190.

(4) For preparing,
transcribing, or certifying an instrument on file or of record in the clerk's
office, with or without seal, for the first page or portion of the first page,
a fee of two dollars, and for each additional page or portion of a page, a fee
of one dollar must be charged. For authenticating or exemplifying an
instrument, a fee of one dollar for each additional seal affixed must be
charged.

(5) For executing a
certificate, with or without a seal, a fee of two dollars must be charged.

(6) For a garnishee
defendant named in an affidavit for garnishment and for a writ of attachment, a
fee of twenty dollars must be charged.

(7) For approving a
bond, including justification on the bond, in other than civil actions and
probate proceedings, a fee of two dollars must be charged.

(8) For the issuance of
a certificate of qualification and a certified copy of letters of
administration, letters testamentary, or letters of guardianship, there must be
a fee of two dollars.

(9) For the preparation
of a passport application, the clerk may collect an execution fee as authorized
by the federal government.

(10) For clerk's
services such as processing ex parte orders, performing historical searches,
compiling statistical reports, and conducting exceptional record searches, the
clerk may collect a fee not to exceed twenty dollars per hour or portion of an
hour.

(11) For duplicated
recordings of court's proceedings there must be a fee of ten dollars for each
audio tape and twenty-five dollars for each video tape.

(12) For the filing of
oaths and affirmations under chapter 5.28 RCW, a fee of twenty dollars must be
charged.

(13) For filing a
disclaimer of interest under RCW 11.86.031(4), a fee of two dollars must be
charged.

(14) For registration
of land titles, Torrens Act, under RCW 65.12.780, a fee of five dollars must be
charged.

(15) For the issuance
of extension of judgment under RCW 6.17.020 and chapter 9.94A RCW, a fee of one
hundred ten dollars must be charged.

(16) A facilitator
surcharge of ten dollars must be charged as authorized under RCW 26.12.240.

(17) For filing a water
rights statement under RCW 90.03.180, a fee of twenty-five dollars must be
charged.

(18) A service fee of
three dollars for the first page and one dollar for each additional page must
be charged for receiving faxed documents, pursuant to Washington state rules of
court, general rule 17.

(19) For preparation of
clerk's papers under RAP 9.7, a fee of fifty cents per page must be charged.

(20) For copies and
reports produced at the local level as permitted by RCW 2.68.020 and supreme
court policy, a variable fee must be charged.

(21) Investment service
charge and earnings under RCW 36.48.090 must be charged.

(22) Costs for
nonstatutory services rendered by clerk by authority of local ordinance or
policy must be charged.

(23) For filing a
request for mandatory arbitration, a fee may be assessed against the party
filing a statement of arbitrability not to exceed one hundred twenty dollars as
established by authority of local ordinance and approved by a vote of the
people if it is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction that such a
vote is required by chapter 1, Laws of 2000 (Initiative Measure No. 695). This
charge shall be used solely to offset the cost of the mandatory arbitration
program.

(24) For
filing a request for trial de novo of an arbitration award, a fee not to exceed
two hundred fifty dollars as established by authority of local ordinance must
be charged.

---
END ---