BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Custom-built
vehicle" means a passenger car or light truck that is custom-designed and
fabricated by the owner for his or her own use, and does not include any major
body parts from a manufactured vehicle or produced for a manufactured vehicle.
For titling and registration purposes, a custom-built vehicle will be
considered a homemade vehicle.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.37.518 and 1996 c
225 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
the requirements of this chapter, hoods and bumpers are optional equipment on
street rods ((and)), kit vehicles, and custom-built vehicles.
Street rods ((and)), kit vehicles, and custom-built vehicles
must comply with fender requirements under RCW 46.37.500(2) and the windshield
requirement of RCW 46.37.410(1).

---
END ---