BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.110.050 and 1997
c 437 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A special
account is created in the state treasury to be known as the county research
services account. The account shall consist of all money transferred to the
account under RCW 82.08.170 or otherwise transferred or appropriated to the
account by the legislature. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. The account is subject to the allotment process under chapter
43.88 RCW.

Moneys in the county
research services account may be expended only to finance the costs of county
research.

(2) All
unobligated moneys remaining in the account at the end of the fiscal biennium
shall be distributed by the treasurer to the counties of the state in the same
manner as the distribution under RCW 82.08.170(1)(a).

Sec. 2. RCW 66.08.190 and 2000 c
227 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When excess funds
are distributed, all moneys subject to distribution shall be disbursed as
follows:

(a) Three-tenths of one
percent to border areas under RCW 66.08.195; and

(b) From the amount
remaining after distribution under (a) of this subsection, (i) fifty
percent to the general fund of the state, (ii) ten percent to the
counties of the state, and (iii) forty percent to the incorporated
cities and towns of the state.

(2) During the months
of ((July, October, January, and April)) June, September, December,
and March of each year, prior to disbursing the distribution to
incorporated cities and towns under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the
treasurer shall deduct from that distribution an amount that((, when
combined with any cash balance in the city and town research services account,))
will fund that quarter's allotments under RCW 43.88.110 from any legislative
appropriation from the city and town research services account. The treasurer
shall deposit the amount deducted into the city and town research services
account.

(3) The governor may
notify and direct the state treasurer to withhold the revenues to which the
counties and cities are entitled under this section if the counties or cities
are found to be in noncompliance pursuant to RCW 36.70A.340.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.08.170 and 1997 c
437 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) During the months
of January, April, July and October of each year, the state treasurer shall
make the apportionment and distribution of all moneys in the liquor excise tax
fund to the counties, cities and towns in the following proportions: (a)
Twenty percent of the moneys in ((said)) the liquor excise tax
fund shall be divided among and distributed to the counties of the state in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 66.08.200; and (b) eighty percent
of the moneys in ((said)) the liquor excise tax fund shall be
divided among and distributed to the cities and towns of the state in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 66.08.210.

(2) Each fiscal quarter
and prior to making the twenty percent distribution to counties under
subsection (1)(a) of this section, the treasurer shall transfer to the
county research services account under RCW 43.110.050 sufficient moneys ((that,
when combined with any cash balance in the account, will)) to fund
the allotments from any legislative appropriations from the county research
services account.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.110.060 and 2000
c 227 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The city and town
research services account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the
account shall consist of amounts transferred under RCW 66.08.190(2) and any
other transfers or appropriations to the account. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after an appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for city and town research.

All unobligated
moneys remaining in the account at the end of the fiscal biennium shall be
distributed by the treasurer to the incorporated cities and towns of the state in
the same manner as the distribution under RCW 66.08.190(1)(b)(iii).

The
treasurer may disburse amounts appropriated to the municipal research council
from the city and town research services account by warrant or check to the
contracting parties on invoices or vouchers certified by the chair of the
municipal research council or his or her designee. Payments to public agencies
may be made in advance of actual work contracted for, at the discretion of the
council.

---
END ---