BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.25 RCW to read as follows:

All medical review
officers or breath alcohol technicians hired by or under contract to a motor
carrier or employer who is required to have a testing program under 49 C.F.R.
382 or to a consortium the carrier belongs to, as defined in 49 C.F.R. 382.17,
shall report the finding of a commercial driver's confirmed positive drug or
alcohol test to the department of licensing on a form provided by the
department. Motor carriers, employers, or consortiums shall make it a written
condition of their contract or agreement with a medical review officer or
breath alcohol technician, regardless of the state where the medical review
officer or breath alcohol technician is located, that the medical review
officer or breath alcohol technician is required to report all Washington state
licensed drivers who have a confirmed positive drug or alcohol test to the
department of licensing within three business days of the confirmed test.
Failure to obtain this contractual condition or agreement with the medical
review officer or breath alcohol technician by the motor carrier, employer, or
consortium will result in an administrative fine as provided in RCW 81.04.405.
Substances obtained for testing may not be used for any purpose other than drug
or alcohol testing under 49 C.F.R. 382.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.25 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When the department
of licensing receives a report from a medical review officer or breath alcohol
technician that the holder of a commercial driver's license has a confirmed
positive drug or alcohol test, either as part of the testing program required
by 49 C.F.R. 382 or as part of a preemployment drug test, the department shall
disqualify the driver from driving a commercial motor vehicle under RCW
46.25.090(7) subject to a hearing as provided in this section. The department
shall notify the person in writing of the disqualification by first class
mail. The notice must explain the procedure for the person to request a
hearing.

(2) A person
disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for having a confirmed
positive drug or alcohol test may request a hearing to challenge the
disqualification within twenty days from the date notice is given. If the
request for a hearing is mailed, it must be postmarked within twenty days after
the department has given notice of the disqualification.

(3) The hearing must be
conducted in the county of the person's residence, except that the department
may conduct all or part of the hearing by telephone or other electronic means.

(4) For the purposes of
this section, the hearing must be limited to the following issues: (a) Whether
the driver is the person who took the drug or alcohol test; (b) whether the
motor carrier, employer, or consortium has a program that meets the federal
requirements under 49 C.F.R. 382; and (c) whether the medical review officer or
breath alcohol technician making the report accurately followed the protocols
for testing established to certify the results. Evidence may be presented to
demonstrate that the test results are a false positive. For the purpose of a
hearing under this section, a copy of the positive test result with a
declaration by the tester or medical review officer or breath alcohol
technician stating the accuracy of the laboratory protocols followed to arrive
at the test result is prima facie evidence of a confirmed positive drug or
alcohol test result. After the hearing, the department shall order the
disqualification of the person either be rescinded or sustained.

(5) If the person does
not request a hearing within the twenty-day time limit, or if the person fails
to appear at a hearing, the person has waived the right to a hearing and the
department shall sustain the disqualification.

(6) A decision by the
department disqualifying a person from driving a commercial motor vehicle is
stayed and does not take effect while a formal hearing is pending under this
section or during the pendency of a subsequent appeal to superior court so long
as there is no conviction for a moving violation or no finding that the person
has committed a traffic infraction that is a moving violation and the
department receives no further report of a confirmed positive drug or alcohol
test during the pendency of the hearing and appeal. If the disqualification is
sustained after the hearing, the person who is disqualified may file a petition
in the superior court of the county of his or her residence to review the final
order of disqualification by the department in the manner provided in RCW
46.20.334.

(7) The department of
licensing may adopt rules specifying further requirements for requesting a
hearing under this section.

(8) The department of
licensing is not civilly liable for damage resulting from disqualifying a
driver based on a confirmed positive drug or alcohol test result as required by
this section or for damage resulting from release of this information that
occurs in the normal course of business.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.25.090 and 1996 c
30 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is
disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of not less
than one year if a report has been received by the department pursuant to RCW
46.25.120, or if the person has been convicted of a first violation, within
this or any other jurisdiction, of:

(a) Driving a
commercial motor vehicle under the influence of alcohol or any drug;

(b) Driving a
commercial motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration in the person's system
is 0.04 or more as determined by any testing methods approved by law in this
state or any other state or jurisdiction;

(c) Leaving the scene
of an accident involving a commercial motor vehicle driven by the person;

(d) Using a commercial
motor vehicle in the commission of a felony;

(e) Refusing to submit
to a test to determine the driver's alcohol concentration while driving a motor
vehicle.

If any of the
violations set forth in this subsection occurred while transporting a hazardous
material required to be identified by a placard, the person is disqualified for
a period of not less than three years.

(2) A person is
disqualified for life if it has been determined that the person has committed
or has been convicted of two or more violations of any of the offenses
specified in subsection (1) of this section, or any combination of those
offenses, arising from two or more separate incidents. Only offenses committed
after October 1, 1989, may be considered in applying this subsection.

(3) The department may
adopt rules, in accordance with federal regulations, establishing guidelines,
including conditions, under which a disqualification for life under subsection
(2) of this section may be reduced to a period of not less than ten years.

(4) A person is
disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for life who uses a
commercial motor vehicle in the commission of a felony involving the
manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of a controlled substance, as defined
by chapter 69.50 RCW, or possession with intent to manufacture, distribute, or
dispense a controlled substance, as defined by chapter 69.50 RCW.

(5) A person is
disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of not less
than sixty days if convicted of or found to have committed two serious traffic
violations, or one hundred twenty days if convicted of or found to have
committed three serious traffic violations, committed in a commercial motor
vehicle arising from separate incidents occurring within a three-year period.

(6) A person is
disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of:

(a) Not less than
ninety days nor more than one year if convicted of or found to have committed a
first violation of an out-of-service order while driving a commercial
vehicle;

(b) Not less than one
year nor more than five years if, during a ten-year period, the person is
convicted of or is found to have committed two violations of out-of-service
orders while driving a commercial vehicle in separate incidents;

(c) Not less than three
years nor more than five years if, during a ten-year period, the person is
convicted of or is found to have committed three or more violations of
out-of-service orders while driving commercial vehicles in separate
incidents;

(d) Not less than one
hundred eighty days nor more than two years if the person is convicted of or is
found to have committed a first violation of an out-of-service order while
transporting hazardous materials required to be placarded under the Hazardous
Materials Transportation Act (46 U.S.C. Sec. 1801-1813), or while operating
motor vehicles designed to transport sixteen or more passengers, including the
driver. A person is disqualified for a period of not less than three years nor
more than five years if, during a ten-year period, the person is convicted of
or is found to have committed subsequent violations of out-of-service orders,
in separate incidents, while transporting hazardous materials required to be
placarded under the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, or while operating
motor vehicles designed to transport sixteen or more passengers, including the
driver.

(7) A person is
disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle if a report has been
received by the department under section 2 of this act that the person has
received a confirmed positive drug or alcohol test either as part of the
testing program required by 49 C.F.R. 382 or 49 C.F.R. 40 or as part of a
preemployment drug test. A disqualification under this subsection remains in
effect until the person undergoes a drug and alcohol assessment by an agency
certified by the department of social and health services and, if the person is
classified as an alcoholic, drug addict, alcohol abuser, or drug abuser, until
the person presents evidence of satisfactory participation in or successful
completion of a drug or alcohol treatment program that has been certified by
the department of social and health services under chapter 70.96A RCW and until
the person has met the requirements of RCW 46.25.100. The agency making a drug
and alcohol assessment under this section shall forward a diagnostic evaluation
and treatment recommendation to the department of licensing for use in
determining the person's eligibility for driving a commercial motor vehicle.
Persons who are disqualified under this subsection more than twice in a
five-year period are disqualified for life.

(8) Within ten
days after suspending, revoking, or canceling a commercial driver's license,
the department shall update its records to reflect that action. After
suspending, revoking, or canceling a nonresident commercial driver's
privileges, the department shall notify the licensing authority of the state
that issued the commercial driver's license.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.25.100 and 1989 c
178 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

When a person has been
disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle, the person is not
entitled to have the commercial driver's license restored until after the
expiration of the appropriate disqualification period required under RCW
46.25.090 or until the department has received a drug and alcohol assessment
and evidence is presented of satisfactory participation in or completion of any
required drug or alcohol treatment program for ending the disqualification
under RCW 46.25.090(7). After expiration of the appropriate period and
upon payment of a requalification fee of twenty dollars, or one hundred
fifty dollars if the person has been disqualified under RCW 46.25.090(7),
the person may apply for a new, duplicate, or renewal commercial driver's license
as provided by law. If the person has been disqualified for a period of one
year or more, the person shall demonstrate that he or she meets the commercial
driver's license qualification standards specified in RCW 46.25.060.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.25.120 and 1998 c
41 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who drives
a commercial motor vehicle within this state is deemed to have given consent,
subject to RCW 46.61.506, to take a test or tests of that person's blood or
breath for the purpose of determining that person's alcohol concentration or
the presence of other drugs.

(2) A test or tests may
be administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer, who after
stopping or detaining the commercial motor vehicle driver, has probable cause
to believe that driver was driving a commercial motor vehicle while having
alcohol in his or her system.

(3) The law enforcement
officer requesting the test under subsection (1) of this section shall warn the
person requested to submit to the test that a refusal to submit will result in
that person being disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle under
RCW 46.25.090.

(4) If the person
refuses testing, or submits to a test that discloses an alcohol concentration
of 0.04 or more, the law enforcement officer shall submit a sworn report to the
department certifying that the test was requested pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section and that the person refused to submit to testing, or submitted to
a test that disclosed an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more.

(5) Upon receipt of the
sworn report of a law enforcement officer under subsection (4) of this section,
the department shall disqualify the driver from driving a commercial motor
vehicle under RCW 46.25.090, subject to the hearing provisions of RCW 46.20.329
and 46.20.332. The hearing shall be conducted in the county of the arrest.
For the purposes of this section, the hearing shall cover the issues of whether
a law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been
driving or was in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle within
this state while having alcohol in the person's system, whether the person
refused to submit to the test or tests upon request of the officer after having
been informed that the refusal would result in the disqualification of the
person from driving a commercial motor vehicle, and, if the test was
administered, whether the results indicated an alcohol concentration of 0.04
percent or more. The department shall order that the disqualification of the
person either be rescinded or sustained. Any decision by the department
disqualifying a person from driving a commercial motor vehicle is stayed and
does not take effect while a formal hearing is pending under this section or
during the pendency of a subsequent appeal to superior court so long as there
is no conviction for a moving violation or no finding that the person has
committed a traffic infraction that is a moving violation during the pendency of
the hearing and appeal. If the disqualification of the person is sustained
after the hearing, the person who is disqualified may file a petition in the
superior court of the county of arrest to review the final order of
disqualification by the department in the manner provided in RCW 46.20.334.

(6) The
hearing provisions of this section do not apply to those persons disqualified
from driving a commercial motor vehicle under RCW 46.25.090(7).

---
END ---