BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Authority" means a city transportation authority created pursuant to
this act.

(2) "Authority
area" means the territory within a city as designated in the ordinance
creating the authority.

(3) "Bonds"
means bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness.

(4) "Public
monorail transportation function" means the transportation of passengers
and their incidental baggage by means of public monorail transportation
facilities as authorized in this chapter.

(5) "Public
monorail transportation facilities" means a transportation system that
utilizes train cars running on a guideway, together with the necessary
passenger stations, terminals, parking facilities, related facilities or other
properties, and facilities necessary and appropriate for passenger and
vehicular access to and from people-moving systems, not including fixed
guideway light rail systems.

(6) "Qualified
elector" means any person registered to vote within the city boundaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) A city transportation
authority to perform a public monorail transportation function may be created
in every city with a population greater than three hundred thousand to perform
a public monorail transportation function. The authority shall embrace all the
territory in the authority area. A city transportation authority is a
municipal corporation, an independent taxing "authority" within the
meaning of Article 7, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a "taxing
district" within the meaning of Article 7, section 2 of the state
Constitution.

(2) Any city
transportation authority and proposed taxes established pursuant to this
chapter, either by ordinance or petition as provided in this chapter, must be
approved by a majority vote of the electors residing within the proposed
authority area voting at a regular or special election.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) A city that
undertakes to propose creation of an authority must propose the authority by
ordinance of the city legislative body. The ordinance must:

(a) Propose the
authority area and the size and method of selection of the governing body of
the authority, which governing body may be appointed or elected, provided that
officers or employees of any single city government body may not compose a
majority of the members of the authority's governing body;

(b) Propose whether all
or a specified portion of the public monorail transportation function will be
exercised by the authority;

(c) Propose an initial
array of taxes to be voted upon by the electors within the proposed authority
area; and

(d) Provide for an
interim governing body of the authority which will govern the authority upon
voter approval of formation of the authority, until a permanent governing body
is selected, but in no event longer than fourteen months.

(2) An authority may
also be proposed to be created by a petition setting forth the matters
described in subsection (1) of this section, and signed by one percent of the
qualified electors of the proposed authority area.

(3) Upon approval by
the qualified electors of the formation of the city transportation authority
and any proposed taxes, either by ordinance or by petition as provided in this
chapter, the governing body of an authority, or interim governing body, as
applicable, will adopt bylaws determining, among other things, the authority's
officers and the method of their selection, and other matters the governing
body deems appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The authority is subject
to all standard requirements of a governmental entity pursuant to RCW
35.21.759.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Every authority has the
following powers:

(1) To acquire by
purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to lease, construct, add to,
improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate, and regulate the use of public
monorail transportation facilities, including passenger terminal and parking
facilities and properties, and other facilities and properties as may be necessary
for passenger and vehicular access to and from public monorail transportation
facilities, together with all lands, rights of way, and property within or
outside the authority area, and together with equipment and accessories
necessary or appropriate for these facilities, except that property, including
but not limited to other types of public transportation facilities, that is
owned by any city, county, county transportation authority, public
transportation benefit area, metropolitan municipal corporation, or regional
transit authority may be acquired or used by an authority only with the consent
of the public entity owning the property. The entities are authorized to
convey or lease property to an authority or to contract for their joint use on
terms fixed by agreement between the entity and the authority;

(2) To fix rates,
tolls, fares, and charges for the use of facilities and to establish various
routes and classes of service. Rates, tolls, fares, or charges may be adjusted
or eliminated for any distinguishable class of users including, but not limited
to, senior citizens and handicapped persons;

(3) To contract with
the United States or any of its agencies, any state or any of its agencies, any
metropolitan municipal corporation, and other country, city, other political
subdivision or governmental instrumentality, or governmental agency, or any
private person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of receiving any gifts or
grants or securing loans or advances for preliminary planning and feasibility studies,
or for the design, construction, operation, or maintenance of public monorail
transportation facilities as follows:

(a) Notwithstanding the
provisions of any law to the contrary, and in addition to any other authority
provided by law, the governing body of a city transportation authority may
contract with one or more vendors for the design, construction, operation, or
maintenance, or other service related to the development of a monorail public
transportation system including, but not limited to, monorail trains, operating
systems and control equipment, guideways, and pylons, together with the
necessary passenger stations, terminals, parking facilities, and other related
facilities necessary and appropriate for passenger and vehicular access to and from
the monorail train.

(b) If the governing
body of the city transportation authority decides to proceed with the
consideration of qualifications or proposals for services from qualified
vendors, the authority must publish notice of its requirements and request
submission of qualifications statements or proposals. The notice must be
published in the official newspaper of the city creating the authority at least
once a week for two weeks, not less than sixty days before the final date for
the submission of qualifications statements or proposals. The notice must
state in summary form: (i) The general scope and nature of the design,
construction, operation, maintenance, or other services being sought related to
the development of the proposed monorail, tram, or trolley public
transportation system; (ii) the name and address of a representative of the
city transportation authority who can provide further details; (iii) the final
date for the submission of qualifications statements or proposals; (iv) an estimated
schedule for the consideration of qualifications statements or proposals, the
selection of vendors, and the negotiation of a contract or contracts for
services; (v) the location of which a copy of any requests for qualifications
statements or requests for proposals will be made available; and (vi) the
criteria established by the governing body of the authority to select a vendor
or vendors, which may include, but is not limited to, the vendor's prior
experience, including design, construction, operation, or maintenance of other
similar public transportation facilities, respondent's management capabilities,
proposed project schedule, availability and financial resources, costs of the
services to be provided, nature of facility design proposed by the vendors,
system reliability, performance standards required for the facilities,
compatibility with existing public transportation facilities operated by the
authority or any other public body or other providers of similar services to
the public, project performance guarantees, penalties, and other enforcement
provisions, environmental protection measures to be used by the vendor,
consistency with the applicable regional transportation plans, and the proposed
allocation of project risks.

(c) If the governing body
of the city transportation authority decides to proceed with the consideration
of qualifications statements or proposals submitted by vendors, it may
designate a representative to evaluate the vendors who submitted qualifications
statements or proposals and conduct discussions regarding qualifications or
proposals with one or more vendors. The governing body or its representative
may request submission of qualifications statements and may later request more
detailed proposals from one or more vendors who have submitted qualifications
statements, or may request detailed proposals without having first received and
evaluated qualifications statements. The governing body or its representative
will evaluate the qualifications or proposals, as applicable. If two or more
vendors submit qualifications or proposals that meet the criteria established
by the governing body of the authority, discussions and interviews must be held
with at least two vendors. Any revisions to a request for qualifications or
request for proposals must be made available to all vendors then under
consideration by the governing body of the authority and must be made available
to any other person who has requested receipt of that information.

(d) Based on the
criteria established by the governing body of the authority, the representative
will recommend to the governing body a vendor or vendors that are initially
determined to be the best qualified to provide one or more of the design,
construction, operation or maintenance, or other service related to the
development of the proposed monorail public transportation system.

(e) The governing body
of the authority or its representative may attempt to negotiate a contract with
the vendor or vendors selected for one or more of the design, construction,
operation or maintenance, or other service related to the development of the
proposed monorail public transportation system on terms that the governing body
of the authority determines to be fair and reasonable and in the best interest
of the authority. If the governing body, or its representative, is unable to
negotiate a contract with any one or more of the vendors first selected on
terms that it determines to be fair and reasonable and in the best interest of
the authority, negotiations with any one or more of the vendors must be
terminated or suspended and another qualified vendor or vendors may be selected
in accordance with the procedures set forth in this section. If the governing
body decides to continue the process of selection, negotiations will continue
with a qualified vendor or vendors in accordance with this section at the sole
discretion of the governing body of the authority until an agreement is reached
with one or more qualified vendors, or the process is terminated by the governing
body. The process may be repeated until an agreement is reached.

(f) Prior to entering
into a contract with a vendor, the governing body of the authority must make
written findings, after holding a public hearing on the proposal, that it is in
the public interest to enter into the contract, that the contract is
financially sound, and that it is advantageous for the governing body of the
authority to use this method for awarding contracts for one or more of the
design, construction, or operation or maintenance of the proposed monorail
public transportation system as compared to all other methods of awarding such
contracts.

(g) Each contract must
include a project performance bond or bonds or other security by the vendor.

(h) The provisions of
chapters 39.12 and 39.19 RCW apply to a contract entered into under this
section as if the public transportation systems and facilities were owned by a
public body.

(i) The vendor
selection process permitted by this section is supplemental to and is not
construed as a repeal of or limitation on any other authority granted by law.

(j) Contracts for the
construction of facilities, other than contracts for facilities to be provided
by the selected vendor, with an estimated cost greater than two hundred
thousand dollars must be awarded after a competitive bid process consistent
with chapter 39.04 RCW or awarded through an alternative public works
contracting procedure consistent with chapter 39.10 RCW;

(4) To contract with
the United States or any of its agencies, any state or any of its agencies, any
metropolitan municipal corporation, any other county, city, other political
subdivision or governmental instrumentality, any governmental agency, or any
private person, firm, or corporation for the use by either contracting party of
all or any part of the facilities, structures, lands, interests in lands, air
rights over lands, and rights of way of all kinds which are owned, leased, or
held by the other party and for the purpose of planning, designing,
constructing, operating any public transportation facility, or performing any
service related to transportation which the authority is authorized to operate
or perform, on terms as may be agreed upon by the contracting parties;

(5) To acquire any
existing public transportation facility by conveyance, sale, or lease. In any
acquisition from a county, city, or other political subdivision of the state,
the authority will receive credit from the county or city or other political
subdivision for any federal assistance and state matching assistance used by
the county or city or other political subdivision in acquiring any portion of
the public transportation facility. Upon acquisition, the authority must
assume and observe all existing labor contracts relating to the public
transportation facility and, to the extent necessary for operation of the
public transportation facility, all of the employees of the public
transportation facility whose duties are necessary to efficiently operate the
public transportation facility must be appointed to comparable positions to
those which they held at the time of the transfer, and no employee or retired
or pensioned employee of the public transportation facility will be placed in
any worse position with respect to pension seniority, wages, sick leave,
vacation, or other benefits than he or she enjoyed as an employee of the public
transportation facility prior to the acquisition. Furthermore, the authority
must engage in collective bargaining with the duly appointed representatives of
any employee labor organization having existing contracts with the acquired
facility and may enter into labor contracts with the employee labor
organization;

(6) To contract for,
participate in, and support research, demonstration, testing, and development
of public monorail transportation facilities, equipment, and use incentives,
and have all powers necessary to comply with any criteria, standards, and
regulations which may be adopted under state and federal law, and to take all
actions necessary to meet the requirements of those laws. The authority has,
in addition to these powers, the authority to prepare, adopt, and carry out a
comprehensive public monorail plan and to make other plans and studies and to
perform programs as the authority deems necessary to implement and comply with
those laws;

(7) To establish local
improvement districts within the authority area to finance public monorail
transportation facilities, to levy special assessments on property specially
benefited by those facilities, and to issue local improvement bonds to be
repaid by the collection of local improvement assessments. The method of
establishment, levying, collection, enforcement, and all other matters relating
to the local improvement districts, assessments, collection, and bonds are as
provided in the statutes governing local improvement districts of cities and
towns. The duties devolving upon the city treasurer in those statutes are imposed
on the treasurer of the authority;

(8) To exercise all
other powers necessary and appropriate to carry out its responsibilities,
including without limitation the power to sue and be sued, to own, construct,
purchase, lease, add to, and maintain any real and personal property or
property rights necessary for the conduct of the affairs of the authority, to
enter into contracts, and to employ the persons as the authority deems
appropriate. An authority may also sell, lease, convey, or otherwise dispose of
any real or personal property no longer necessary for the conduct of the
affairs of the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Each authority will
establish necessary and appropriate funds and accounts consistent with the
uniform system of accounts developed pursuant to RCW 43.09.210. The authority
may designate a treasurer or may contract with any city with territory within
the authority area for treasury and other financial functions. The city must
be reimbursed for the expenses of treasury services. However, no city whose
treasurer serves as treasurer of an authority is liable for the obligations of
the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The authority must adopt
a public transportation plan for public transportation facilities to be
provided by the authority and the facilities must be provided substantially in
accordance with that plan. The plan, and any adopted plan amendments, will be
submitted for approval to the legislative authority of the city. Prior to
adoption of the plan, the authority will provide a minimum of sixty days during
which sufficient public hearings will be held to provide interested persons an
opportunity to participate in development of the plan. The plan or any
amendment is not effective until approval is granted or until ninety days has
elapsed since the plan or amendment has been submitted for approval and the
city has neither approved not disapproved the plan or amendment within those
ninety days. The plan as approved by the legislative authority, or after the
passage of ninety days, when the vote has neither been approved nor
disapproved, shall be put before the qualified electors of the authority area.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Every authority has the
power to:

(1) Levy excess levies
upon the property included within the authority area, in the manner prescribed
by Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution and by RCW 84.52.052 for
operating funds, capital outlay funds, and cumulative reserve funds;

(2) Issue general
obligation bonds, not to exceed an amount, together with any outstanding
nonvoter-approved general obligation indebtedness equal to one and one-half
percent of the value of the taxable property within the authority area, as the
term "value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015. An
authority may additionally issue general obligation bonds, together with
outstanding voter‑approved and nonvoter-approved general obligation
indebtedness, equal to two and one-half percent of the value of the taxable
property within the authority area, as the term "value of the taxable
property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015, when the bonds are approved by
three-fifths of the qualified electors of the authority at a general or special
election called for that purpose and may provide for the retirement thereof by
levies in excess of dollar rate limitations in accordance with the provisions
of RCW 84.52.056. These elections will be held as provided in RCW 39.36.050;

(3) Issue revenue bonds
payable from any revenues other than taxes levied by the authority, and to
pledge those revenues for the repayment of the bonds. Proceeds of revenue
bonds may only be expended for the costs of public monorail transportation
facilities, for financing costs, and for capitalized interest during
construction plus six months thereafter. The bonds and warrants will be issued
and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

No bonds issued by an
authority are obligations of any city, county, or the state of Washington or
any political subdivision thereof other than the authority, and the bonds will
so state, unless the legislative authority of any city or county or the
legislature expressly authorizes particular bonds to be either guaranteed by or
obligations of its respective city or county or of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) Every authority has
the power to levy and collect a special excise tax not exceeding two and
one-half percent on the value of every motor vehicle owned by a resident of the
authority area for the privilege of using a motor vehicle. Before utilization
of any excise tax money collected under this section for acquisition of right
of way or construction of a public monorail transportation facility on a separate
right of way, the authority must adopt rules affording the public an
opportunity for corridor public hearings and design public hearings, which
provide in detail the procedures necessary for public participation in the
following instances: (a) Prior to adoption of location and design plans having
a substantial social, economic, or environmental effect upon the locality upon
which they are to be constructed; or (b) on the public transportation
facilities operating on a separate right of way whenever a substantial change
is proposed relating to location or design in the adopted plan. In adopting
rules the authority must adhere to the provisions of the administrative
procedure act.

(2) A "corridor
public hearing" is a public hearing that: (a) Is held before the
authority is committed to a specific route proposal for the public
transportation facility, and before a route location is established; (b) is
held to afford an opportunity for participation by those interested in the
determination of the need for, and the location of, the public transportation
facility; and (c) provides a public forum that affords a full opportunity for
presenting views on the public transportation facility route location, and the
social, economic, and environmental effects on that location and alternate
locations. However, the hearing is not deemed to be necessary before adoption
of a transportation plan as provided in section 7 of this act or a vote of the
qualified electors under subsection (5) of this section.

(3) A "design public
hearing" is a public hearing that: (a) Is held after the location is
established but before the design is adopted; (b) is held to afford an
opportunity for participation by those interested in the determination of major
design features of the public monorail transportation facility; and (c)
provides a public forum to afford a full opportunity for presenting views on
the public transportation system design, and the social, economic, and
environmental effects of that design and alternate designs, including
people-mover technology.

(4) An authority
imposing a tax under subsection (1) of this section may also impose a sales and
use tax, in addition to any tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030, upon retail car
rentals within the city that are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW. The rate of tax must not exceed 1.944 percent of the base of the
tax. The base of the tax will be the selling price in the case of a sales tax
or the rental value of the vehicle used in the case of a use tax. The revenue
collected under this subsection will be distributed in the same manner as sales
and use taxes under chapter 82.14 RCW.

(5) Before any
authority may impose any of the taxes authorized under this section, the
authorization for imposition of the taxes must be approved by the qualified
electors of the authority area.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) Every authority has
the power to fix and impose a fee, not to exceed one hundred dollars per
vehicle, for each vehicle that is subject to relicensing tab fees under RCW
46.16.0621 and for each vehicle that is subject to RCW 46.16.070 with an
unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less, and that is determined by the
department of licensing to be registered within the boundaries of the authority
area. The department of licensing must provide an exemption from the fee for
any vehicle the owner of which demonstrates is not operated within the
authority area.

(2) The department of
licensing will administer and collect the fee. The department will deduct a
percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent of the
taxes collected, for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds will be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer
for monthly distribution to the authority.

(3) The authority
imposing this fee will delay the effective date at least six months from the
date the fee is approved by the qualified voters of the authority area to allow
the department of licensing to implement administration and collection of the
fee.

(4) Before any
authority may impose any of the fees authorized under this section, the
authorization for imposition of the fees must be approved by a majority of the
qualified electors of the authority area voting.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. (1) Every authority has
the power to impose annual regular property tax levies in an amount equal to
one dollar and fifty cents or less per thousand dollars of assessed value of
property in the authority area when specifically authorized to do so by a
majority of the voters voting on a proposition submitted at a special election
or at the regular election of the authority. A proposition authorizing the tax
levies will not be submitted by an authority more than twice in any
twelve-month period. Ballot propositions must conform with RCW 29.30.111. The
number of years during which the regular levy will be imposed may be limited as
specified in the ballot proposition or may be unlimited in duration. In the
event an authority is levying property taxes, which in combination with
property taxes levied by other taxing districts subject to the limitations
provided in RCW 84.52.043 and 84.52.050, exceed these limitations, the
authority's property tax levy shall be reduced or eliminated consistent with
RCW 84.52.010.

(2) The limitation in
RCW 84.55.010 does not apply to the first levy imposed under this section
following the approval of the levies by the voters under subsection (1) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. All taxes and fees levied
and collected by an authority must be used solely for the purpose of paying all
or any part of the cost of acquiring, designing, constructing, equipping,
maintaining, or operating public monorail transportation facilities or
contracting for the services thereof, or to pay or secure the payment of all or
part of the principal of or interest on any general obligation bonds or revenue
bonds issued for authority purposes. Until expended, money accumulated in the
funds and accounts of an authority may be invested in the manner authorized by
the governing body of the authority, consistent with state law.

If any of the revenue
from any tax or fee authorized to be levied by an authority has been pledged by
the authority to secure the payment of any bonds as herein authorized, then as
long as that pledge is in effect the legislature will not withdraw from the
authority the authorization to levy and collect the tax or fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. The city transportation
authority may be dissolved by a vote of the people residing within the
boundaries of the authority if the authority is faced with significant
financial problems. Any referendum petition to dissolve the city
transportation authority must be filed with the city council and contain
provisions for dissolution of the authority. Within seven days, the city
prosecutor must review the validity of the petition and submit its report to
the petitioner and city council. If the petitioner's claims are deemed valid
by the city prosecutor, within ten days of the petitioner's filing, the city
council will confer with the petitioner concerning the form and style of the
petition, issue an identification number for the petition, and write a ballot
title for the measure. The ballot title must be posed as a question and an
affirmative vote on the measure results in authority retention and a negative
vote on the measure results in the authority's dissolution. The petitioner
will be notified of the identification number and ballot title within this
ten-day period.

After this
notification, the petitioner has ninety days in which to secure on petition
forms, the signatures of not less than fifteen percent of the registered voters
in the authority area and to file the signed petitions with the filing
officer. Each petition form must contain the ballot title and the full text of
the measure to be referred. The filing officer will verify the sufficiency of
the signatures on the petitions. If sufficient valid signatures are properly
submitted, the filing officer shall submit the initiative to the authority area
voters at a general or special election held on one of the dates provided in
RCW 29.13.010 as determined by the city council, which election will not take
place later than one hundred twenty days after the signed petition has been
filed with the filing officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. The special excise tax
imposed under section 9(1) of this act will be collected at the same time and
in the same manner as relicensing tab fees under RCW 46.16.0621 and section 10
of this act. Every year on January 1st, April 1st, July 1st, and October 1st
the department of licensing shall remit special excise taxes collected on
behalf of an authority, back to the authority, at no cost to the authority.
Valuation of motor vehicles for purposes of the special excise tax imposed
under section 9(1) of this act must be consistent with chapter 82.44 RCW.

Sec. 15. RCW 84.52.010 and 1995
2nd sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as is permitted
under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be levied or voted in specific amounts.

The rate percent of all
taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing districts
coextensive with the county, shall be determined, calculated and fixed by the
county assessors of the respective counties, within the limitations provided by
law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes levied for
purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be determined, calculated
and fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the
limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the
taxing districts respectively.

When a county assessor
finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is subject to
the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the
limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor shall recompute
and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(1) The full certified
rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district, and city or town
purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not exceeding the
limitations established by law; however any state levy shall take precedence
over all other levies and shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that
required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW
84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district
that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined rate of
regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then these
levies shall be reduced as follows: (a) The portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; (b) if the combined rate of
regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the
levies imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy
imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the
combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated; and (c) if the combined rate of regular
property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069
shall be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or eliminated.

(2) The certified rates
of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior taxing districts
imposing taxes on such property shall be reduced or eliminated as follows to
bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the provisions of
these limitations:

(a) First, the
certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts authorized
under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, section 11 of this act, and 67.38.130
shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(b) Second, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;

(c) Third, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other than fire
protection districts, library districts, the first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts, and the
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for public
hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(d) Fourth, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under RCW
52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and

(e) Fifth, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts under RCW
52.16.130, library districts, metropolitan park districts under their first
fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public hospital
districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

In determining whether
the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is subject to the
limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in
that section, the assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy, as
apportioned to the county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW
84.48.080 without regard to the reduction under RCW 84.55.012.

Sec. 16. RCW 84.52.052 and 1996 c
230 s 1615 are each amended to read as follows:

The limitations imposed
by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056, and RCW 84.52.043 shall not prevent the
levy of additional taxes by any taxing district except school districts in
which a larger levy is necessary in order to prevent the impairment of the
obligation of contracts. As used in this section, the term "taxing district"
means any county, metropolitan park district, park and recreation service area,
park and recreation district, water-sewer district, solid waste disposal
district, public facilities district, flood control zone district, county rail
district, service district, public hospital district, road district, rural
county library district, island library district, rural partial-county library
district, intercounty rural library district, fire protection district,
cemetery district, city, town, transportation benefit district, emergency
medical service district with a population density of less than one thousand
per square mile, ((or)) cultural arts, stadium, and convention district,
or city transportation authority.

Any such taxing
district may levy taxes at a rate in excess of the rate specified in RCW
84.52.050 through 84.52.056 and 84.52.043, or 84.55.010 through 84.55.050, when
authorized so to do by the voters of such taxing district in the manner set
forth in Article VII, section 2(a) of the Constitution of this state at a
special or general election to be held in the year in which the levy is made.

A special election may
be called and the time therefor fixed by the county legislative authority, or
council, board of commissioners, or other governing body of any such taxing
district, by giving notice thereof by publication in the manner provided by law
for giving notices of general elections, at which special election the
proposition authorizing such excess levy shall be submitted in such form as to
enable the voters favoring the proposition to vote "yes" and those
opposed thereto to vote "no."

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. Sections 1 through 14 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. This act is null and void
if a regional transportation act does not become law by December 31, 2002.

---
END ---