BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.22.110 and 1963 c
4 s 36.22.110 are each amended to read as follows:

The person
holding the office of county auditor, or deputy, or performing its duties,
shall not practice as an attorney or represent any person who is making any
claim against the county, or who is seeking to procure any legislative or other
action by the board of county commissioners. The county auditor, during his or
her term of office, and any deputy appointed by him or her is
disqualified from performing the duties of any other county officer or acting
as deputy for any other county officer, except for clerical or ministerial
duties. ((Nor shall any)) No other county officer or his or
her deputy may act as auditor or deputy, or perform any of the
duties of ((said)) the office of county auditor, except for
clerical or ministerial duties.

--- END ---