BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.50.030 and 1997 c
393 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If on the first day of
January in any year, two installments of any local improvement assessment are
delinquent, or if the final installment thereof has been delinquent for more
than one year, the city or town shall proceed with the foreclosure of the
delinquent assessment or delinquent installments thereof by proceedings brought
in its own name in the superior court of the county in which the city or town
is situate.

The proceedings shall
be commenced on or before March 1st of that year or on or before such other
date in such year as may be fixed by general ordinance, but not before the city
or town treasurer has notified by certified mail the persons whose names appear
on the current assessment roll as owners of the property charged with
the assessments or installments which are delinquent, at the address last known
to the treasurer, a notice thirty days before the commencement of the
proceedings. If the person whose name appears on the ((tax)) assessment
rolls of the county assessor as owner of the property, or whose name appears
on the tax rolls of the county treasurer as taxpayer of the property, or
the address shown for the owner, differs from that appearing on the city or
town assessment roll, then the treasurer shall also mail a copy of the notice
to that person or that address.

The notice shall state
the amount due, including foreclosure costs, upon each separate lot, tract, or
parcel of land and the date after which the proceedings will be commenced. The
city or town treasurer shall file with the clerk of the superior court at the
time of commencement of the foreclosure proceeding the affidavit of the person
who mailed the notices. This affidavit shall be conclusive proof of compliance
with the requirements of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.94.230 and 1981 c
313 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Utility local
improvement districts and local improvement districts to carry out all or any
portion of the general plan, or additions and betterments thereof, may be
initiated either by resolution of the county legislative authority or by
petition signed by the owners according to the records of the office of the
county ((auditor)) assessor of at least fifty-one percent of the
area of land within the limits of the local district to be created.

In case the county legislative
authority desires to initiate the formation of a local district by resolution,
it shall first pass a resolution declaring its intention to order such
improvement, setting forth the nature and territorial extent of such proposed
improvement, designating the number of the proposed local district, describing
the boundaries thereof, stating the estimated cost and expense of the
improvement and the proportionate amount thereof which will be borne by the
property within the proposed district, and fixing a date, time, and place for a
public hearing on the formation of the proposed local district.

In case any such local
district is initiated by petition, such petition shall set forth the nature and
territorial extent of such proposed improvement and the fact that the signers
thereof are the owners according to the records of the county ((auditor))
assessor of at least fifty-one percent of the area of land within the
limits of the local district to be created. Upon the filing of such petition
with the clerk of the county legislative authority, the authority shall
determine whether the same is sufficient, and the authority's determination
thereof shall be conclusive upon all persons. No person may withdraw his or
her name from said petition after the filing thereof with the clerk of the
county legislative authority. If the county legislative authority finds the
petition to be sufficient, it shall proceed to adopt a resolution declaring its
intention to order the improvement petitioned for, setting forth the nature and
territorial extent of said improvement, designating the number of the proposed
local district, describing the boundaries thereof, stating the estimated cost
and expense of the improvement and the proportionate amount thereof which will
be borne by the property within the proposed local district, and fixing a date,
time, and place for a public hearing on the formation of the proposed local
district.

Notice of the adoption
of the resolution of intention, whether adopted on the initiative of the board
or pursuant to a petition of the property owners, shall be published in at
least two consecutive issues of a newspaper of general circulation in the
proposed local district, the date of the first publication to be at least
fifteen days prior to the date fixed by such resolution for hearing before the
county legislative authority. Notice of the adoption of the resolution of
intention shall also be given each owner or reputed owner of any lot, tract,
parcel of land, or other property within the proposed local district by mailing
said notice at least fifteen days before the date fixed for the public hearing
to the owner or reputed owner of the property as shown on the tax rolls of the
county treasurer at the address shown thereon. The notice shall refer to the
resolution of intention and designate the proposed local district by number.
Said notice shall also set forth the nature of the proposed improvement, the
total estimated cost, the proportion of total cost to be borne by assessments,
the estimated amount of the cost and expense of such improvement to be borne by
the particular lot, tract, or parcel, the date, time, and place of the hearing
before the county legislative authority; and in the case of improvements
initiated by resolution, said notice shall also state that all persons desiring
to object to the formation of the proposed district must file their written
protests with the clerk of the county legislative authority before the time
fixed for said public hearing.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.09.240 and 1995 c
301 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

Every public officer
and employee of a local government shall keep all accounts of his or her office
in the form prescribed and make all reports required by the state auditor. Any
public officer or employee who refuses or willfully neglects to perform such
duties shall be subject to removal from office in an appropriate proceeding for
that purpose brought by the attorney general or by any prosecuting attorney.

Every public officer
and employee, whose duty it is to collect or receive payments due or for the
use of the public shall deposit such moneys collected or received by him or her
with the treasurer of the local government once every twenty-four consecutive
hours. The treasurer may in his or her discretion grant an exception where
such daily transfers would not be administratively practical or feasible as
long as the treasurer has received a written request from the department,
district, or agency, and where the department, district, or agency certifies
that the money is held with proper safekeeping and that the entity carries out
proper theft protection to reduce risk of loss of funds. Exceptions granted by
the treasurer shall state the frequency with which deposits are required as
long as no exception exceeds a time period greater than one deposit per week.

In case a public
officer or employee collects or receives funds for the account of a local
government of which he or she is an officer or employee, the treasurer shall,
by Friday of each week, pay to the proper officer of the local government for
the account of which the collection was made or payment received, the full
amount collected or received during the current week for the account of the
district.

Sec. 4. RCW 36.29.010 and 2001 c
299 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The county treasurer:

(1) Shall receive all
money due the county and disburse it on warrants issued and attested by the
county auditor and electronic funds transfer under RCW 39.58.750 as attested by
the county auditor;

(2) Shall issue a
receipt in duplicate for all money received other than taxes; the treasurer
shall deliver immediately to the person making the payment the original receipt
and the duplicate shall be retained by the treasurer;

(3) Shall affix on the
face of all paid warrants the date of redemption or, in the case of proper
contract between the treasurer and a qualified public depositary, the treasurer
may consider the date affixed by the financial institution as the date of
redemption;

(4) Shall endorse,
before the date of issue by the county or by any taxing district for whom the
county treasurer acts as treasurer, on the face of all warrants for which there
are not sufficient funds for payment, "interest bearing warrant."
When there are funds to redeem outstanding warrants, the county treasurer shall
give notice:

(a) By publication in a
legal newspaper published or circulated in the county; or

(b) By posting at three
public places in the county if there is no such newspaper; or

(c) By notification to
the financial institution holding the warrant;

(5) Shall pay interest
on all interest-bearing warrants from the date of issue to the date of
notification;

(6) Shall maintain
financial records reflecting receipts and disbursement by fund in accordance
with generally accepted accounting principles;

(7) Shall account for
and pay all bonded indebtedness for the county and all special districts for
which the county treasurer acts as treasurer;

(8) Shall invest all
funds of the county or any special district in the treasurer's custody, not
needed for immediate expenditure, in a manner consistent with appropriate
statutes. If cash is needed to redeem warrants issued from any fund in the
custody of the treasurer, the treasurer shall liquidate investments in an
amount sufficient to cover such warrant redemptions; and

(9) May provide certain
collection services for county departments.

The treasurer, at the
expiration of the term of office, shall make a complete settlement with the
county legislative authority, and shall deliver to the successor all public
money, books, and papers in the treasurer's possession.

Money received by
all entities for whom the county treasurer serves as treasurer must be
deposited within twenty-four hours unless a waiver is granted by the county
treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.09.240.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.16.160 and 1999 c
270 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The owner of a vehicle
which under reciprocal relations with another jurisdiction would be required to
obtain a license registration in this state or an unlicensed vehicle which
would be required to obtain a license registration for operation on public
highways of this state may, as an alternative to such license registration,
secure and operate such vehicle under authority of a trip permit issued by this
state in lieu of a Washington certificate of license registration, and licensed
gross weight if applicable. The licensed gross weight may not exceed eighty
thousand pounds for a combination of vehicles nor forty thousand pounds for a
single unit vehicle with three or more axles. Trip permits ((may also be
issued)) are required for movement of mobile homes ((pursuant to
RCW 46.44.170)) or park model trailers and may only be issued if
property taxes are paid in full. For the purpose of this section, a
vehicle is considered unlicensed if the licensed gross weight currently in
effect for the vehicle or combination of vehicles is not adequate for the load
being carried. Vehicles registered under RCW 46.16.135 shall not be operated
under authority of trip permits in lieu of further registration within the same
registration year.

(2) Each trip permit
shall authorize the operation of a single vehicle at the maximum legal weight
limit for such vehicle for a period of three consecutive days commencing with
the day of first use. No more than three such permits may be used for any one
vehicle in any period of thirty consecutive days, except that in the case of a
recreational vehicle as defined in RCW 43.22.335, no more than two trip permits
may be used for any one vehicle in a one-year period. Every permit shall
identify, as the department may require, the vehicle for which it is issued and
shall be completed in its entirety and signed by the operator before operation
of the vehicle on the public highways of this state. Correction of data on the
permit such as dates, license number, or vehicle identification number
invalidates the permit. The trip permit shall be displayed on the vehicle to
which it is issued as prescribed by the department.

(3) Vehicles operating
under authority of trip permits are subject to all laws, rules, and regulations
affecting the operation of like vehicles in this state.

(4) Prorate operators
operating commercial vehicles on trip permits in Washington shall retain the
customer copy of such permit for four years.

(5) Trip permits may be
obtained from field offices of the department of transportation, Washington
state patrol, department of licensing, or other agents appointed by the
department. For each permit issued, there shall be collected a filing fee as
provided by RCW 46.01.140, an administrative fee of eight dollars, and an
excise tax of one dollar. If the filing fee amount of one dollar prescribed by
RCW 46.01.140 is increased or decreased after January 1, 1981, the
administrative fee shall be adjusted to compensate for such change to insure
that the total amount collected for the filing fee, administrative fee, and
excise tax remain at ten dollars. These fees and taxes are in lieu of all
other vehicle license fees and taxes. No exchange, credits, or refunds may be
given for trip permits after they have been purchased.

(6) The department may
appoint county auditors or businesses as agents for the purpose of selling trip
permits to the public. County auditors or businesses so appointed may retain
the filing fee collected for each trip permit to defray expenses incurred in
handling and selling the permits.

(7) A violation of or a
failure to comply with any provision of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

(8) The department of
licensing may adopt rules as it deems necessary to administer this section.

(9) A surcharge of five
dollars is imposed on the issuance of trip permits. The portion of the
surcharge paid by motor carriers must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund
for the purpose of supporting vehicle weigh stations, weigh-in-motion programs,
and the commercial vehicle information systems and networks program. The
remaining portion of the surcharge must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund
for the purpose of supporting congestion relief programs. All other
administrative fees and excise taxes collected under the provisions of this
chapter shall be forwarded by the department with proper identifying detailed
report to the state treasurer who shall deposit the administrative fees to the
credit of the motor vehicle fund and the excise taxes to the credit of the
general fund. Filing fees will be forwarded and reported to the state
treasurer by the department as prescribed in RCW 46.01.140.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.44.170 and 1986 c
211 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person moving a
mobile home as defined in RCW 46.04.302 or a park model trailer as defined
in RCW 46.04.622 upon public highways of the state must obtain a special
permit from the department of transportation and local authorities pursuant to
RCW 46.44.090 and 46.44.093 and shall pay the proper fee as prescribed by RCW
46.44.0941 and 46.44.096.

(2) A special permit
issued as provided in subsection (1) of this section for the movement of any
mobile home or a park model that is assessed for purposes of property taxes
shall not be valid until the county treasurer of the county in which the mobile
home or park model trailer is located shall endorse or attach thereto
his or her certificate that all property taxes which are a lien or which
are delinquent, or both, upon the mobile home or park model trailer
being moved have been satisfied. Further, any mobile home or park model
trailer required to have a special movement permit under this section shall
display an easily recognizable decal: PROVIDED, That endorsement or
certification by the county treasurer and the display of said decal is not
required when a mobile home or park model trailer is to enter the state
or is being moved from a manufacturer or distributor to a retail sales outlet
or directly to the purchaser's designated location or between retail and sales
outlets. It shall be the responsibility of the owner of the mobile home or
park model trailer subject to property taxes or the agent to obtain such
endorsement from the county treasurer and said decal.

(3) Nothing herein
should be construed as prohibiting the issuance of vehicle license plates for a
mobile home or park model trailer subject to property taxes, but no such
plates shall be issued unless the mobile home or park model trailer subject
to property taxes for which such plates are sought has been listed for
property tax purposes in the county in which it is principally located and the
appropriate fee for such license has been paid.

(4) The
department of transportation and local authorities are authorized to adopt
reasonable rules for implementing the provisions of this section. The
department of transportation shall adopt rules specifying the design,
reflective characteristics, annual coloration, and for the uniform
implementation of the decal required by this section.

Sec. 7. RCW 46.44.173 and 1984 c
7 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon validation of
a special permit as provided in RCW 46.44.170, the county treasurer shall
forward notice of movement of the mobile home or park model trailer subject
to property taxes to the treasurer's own county assessor and to the county
assessor of the county in which the mobile home or park model trailer
will be located.

(2) When a single trip
special permit not requiring tax certification is issued, the department of
transportation or the local authority shall notify the assessor of the county
in which the mobile home or park model trailer is to be located. When a
continuous trip special permit is used to transport a mobile home or park
model trailer not requiring tax certification, the transporter shall notify
the assessor of the county in which the mobile home or park model trailer
is to be located. Notification is not necessary when the destination of a
mobile home or park model trailer is a manufacturer, distributor,
retailer, or location outside the state.

(3) A
notification under this section shall state the specific, residential
destination of the mobile home or park model trailer.

Sec. 8. RCW 84.40.042 and 1997 c
393 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When real property
is divided in accordance with chapter 58.17 RCW, the assessor shall carefully
investigate and ascertain the true and fair value of each lot and assess each
lot on that same basis, unless specifically provided otherwise by law. For
purposes of this section, "lot" has the same definition as in RCW
58.17.020.

(a) For each lot on
which an advance tax deposit has been paid in accordance with RCW 58.08.040,
the assessor shall establish the true and fair value by October 30 of the year
following the recording of the plat, replat, altered plat, or binding site
plan. The value established shall be the value of the lot as of January 1 of
the year the original parcel of real property was last revalued. An additional
property tax shall not be due on the land until the calendar year following the
year for which the advance tax deposit was paid if the deposit was sufficient
to pay the full amount of the taxes due on the property.

(b) For each lot on
which an advance tax deposit has not been paid, the assessor shall establish
the true and fair value not later than the calendar year following the
recording of the plat, map, subdivision, or replat. For purposes of this
section, "subdivision" means a division of land into two or more
lots.

(c) For each subdivision,
all current year and delinquent taxes and assessments on the entire tract must
be paid in full in accordance with RCW 58.17.160 and 58.08.030 except when
property is being acquired by a government for public use. For purposes of
this section, "current year taxes" means taxes that are collectible
under RCW 84.56.010 subsequent to February 14.

(2) When the assessor
is required by law to segregate any part or parts of real property, assessed
before or after July 27, 1997, as one parcel or when the assessor is required
by law to combine parcels of real property assessed before or after July 27,
1997, as two or more parcels, the assessor shall carefully investigate and
ascertain the true and fair value of each part or parts of the real property and
each combined parcel and assess each part or parts or each combined parcel on
that same basis.

Sec. 9. RCW 84.56.120 and 1991 c
245 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

((After personal
property has been assessed,)) It shall be unlawful for any person to
sell or to remove ((the same)) personal property subject to
property taxes from the county in which the property ((was)) has
been or will be assessed ((and)) or from the state until all
taxes and interest due are paid((, or until)). The property
taxes shall be satisfied before any recognizance, mortgage, judgment, debt,
obligation, or responsibility to or with which the personal property may become
charged or liable. Prior to removing personal property, selling, or conducting
any public or private sale of property, written notice ((has been)) shall
be given to the county treasurer listing and describing the property
((to be removed and in case of public sales of personal property, a list of
the property desired to be sold shall be sent to the treasurer, and no property
shall be sold at such sale until the tax has been paid,)). The tax
((to)) shall be computed upon the consolidated tax levy for the
previous year. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 10. RCW 84.64.060 and 1963 c
88 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person owning an
interest in lands or lots upon which judgment is prayed, as provided in this
chapter, may in person or by agent pay the taxes, interest and costs due
thereon to the county treasurer of the county in which the same are situated,
at any time before the day of the sale; and for the amount so paid he or she
shall have a lien on the property liable for taxes, interest and costs for
which judgment is prayed; and the person or authority who shall collect or
receive the same shall give a receipt for such payment, or issue to such person
a certificate showing such payment. If paying by agent, the agent shall
provide notarized documentation of the agency relationship.

Sec. 11. RCW 84.64.070 and 1991 c
245 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

Real property upon
which certificates of delinquency have been issued under the provisions of this
chapter, may be redeemed at any time before the close of business the day
before the day of the sale, by payment, as prescribed by the county treasurer,
to the county treasurer of the proper county, of the amount for which the
certificate of delinquency was issued, together with interest at the statutory
rate per annum charged on delinquent general real and personal property taxes
from date of issuance of the certificate of delinquency until paid. The person
redeeming such property shall also pay the amount of all taxes, interest and
costs accruing after the issuance of such certificate of delinquency, together
with interest at the statutory rate per annum charged on delinquent general
real and personal property taxes on such payment from the day the same was
made. No fee shall be charged for any redemption. Tenants in common or joint
tenants shall be allowed to redeem their individual interest in real property
for which certificates of delinquency have been issued under the provisions of
this chapter, in the manner and under the terms specified in ((this section))
RCW 84.64.060 for the redemption of real property other than that of
persons adjudicated to be legally incompetent or minors for purposes of this
section. If the real property of any minor, or any person adjudicated to
be legally incompetent, be sold for nonpayment of taxes, the same may be
redeemed at any time within three years after the date of sale upon the terms
specified in this section, on the payment of interest at the statutory rate per
annum charged on delinquent general real and personal property taxes on the
amount for which the same was sold, from and after the date of sale, and in
addition the redemptioner shall pay the reasonable value of all improvements
made in good faith on the property, less the value of the use thereof, which
redemption may be made by themselves or by any person in their behalf.

Sec. 12. RCW 84.69.020 and 1999
sp.s. c 8 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

On the order of the
county treasurer, ad valorem taxes paid before or after delinquency shall be
refunded if they were:

(1) Paid more than
once;

(2) Paid as a result of
manifest error in description;

(3) Paid as a result of
a clerical error in extending the tax rolls;

(4) Paid as a result of
other clerical errors in listing property;

(5) Paid with respect
to improvements which did not exist on assessment date;

(6) Paid under levies
or statutes adjudicated to be illegal or unconstitutional;

(7) Paid as a result of
mistake, inadvertence, or lack of knowledge by any person exempted from paying
real property taxes or a portion thereof pursuant to RCW 84.36.381 through
84.36.389, as now or hereafter amended;

(8) Paid as a result of
mistake, inadvertence, or lack of knowledge by either a public official or
employee or by any person with respect to real property in which the person
paying the same has no legal interest;

(9) Paid on the basis
of an assessed valuation which was appealed to the county board of equalization
and ordered reduced by the board;

(10) Paid on the basis
of an assessed valuation which was appealed to the state board of tax appeals
and ordered reduced by the board: PROVIDED, That the amount refunded under
subsections (9) and (10) of this section shall only be for the difference
between the tax paid on the basis of the appealed valuation and the tax payable
on the valuation adjusted in accordance with the board's order;

(11) Paid as a state
property tax levied upon property, the assessed value of which has been
established by the state board of tax appeals for the year of such levy:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the amount refunded shall only be for the difference
between the state property tax paid and the amount of state property tax which
would, when added to all other property taxes within the one percent limitation
of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution equal one percent of the
assessed value established by the board;

(12) Paid on the basis
of an assessed valuation which was adjudicated to be unlawful or excessive:
PROVIDED, That the amount refunded shall be for the difference between the
amount of tax which was paid on the basis of the valuation adjudged unlawful or
excessive and the amount of tax payable on the basis of the assessed valuation
determined as a result of the proceeding;

(13) Paid on property
acquired under RCW 84.60.050, and canceled under RCW 84.60.050(2);

(14) Paid on the basis
of an assessed valuation that was reduced under RCW 84.48.065;

(15) Paid on the basis
of an assessed valuation that was reduced under RCW 84.40.039; or

(16) Abated under RCW
84.70.010.

No refunds under the
provisions of this section shall be made because of any error in determining
the valuation of property, except as authorized in subsections (9), (10), (11),
and (12) of this section nor may any refunds be made if a bona fide purchaser
has acquired rights that would preclude the assessment and collection of the
refunded tax from the property that should properly have been charged with the
tax. Any refunds made on delinquent taxes shall include the proportionate
amount of interest and penalties paid. However, refunds as a result of an
incorrect payment authorized under subsection (8) of this section made by a
third party payee shall not include refund interest. The county treasurer
may deduct from moneys collected for the benefit of the state's levy, refunds
of the state levy including interest on the levy as provided by this section
and chapter 84.68 RCW.

The county treasurer of
each county shall make all refunds determined to be authorized by this section,
and by the first Monday in February of each year, report to the county
legislative authority a list of all refunds made under this section during the
previous year. The list is to include the name of the person receiving the
refund, the amount of the refund, and the reason for the refund.

Sec. 13. RCW 84.69.100 and 1997 c
67 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
otherwise stated, refunds of taxes made pursuant to RCW 84.69.010 through
84.69.090 shall include interest from the date of collection of the portion
refundable: PROVIDED, That refunds on a state, county, or district wide basis
shall not commence to accrue interest until six months following the date of
the final order of the court. No written protest by individual taxpayers need
to be filed to receive a refund on a state, county, or district wide basis.
The rate of interest shall be the equivalent coupon issue yield (as published
by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System) of the average bill
rate for twenty-six week treasury bills as determined at the first bill market
auction conducted after June 30th of the calendar year preceding the date the
taxes were paid. The department of revenue shall adopt this rate of interest
by rule.

---
END ---