BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.34.108 and 2001 c
305 s 3, 201 c 249 s 14, and 2001 c 185 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

(1) When land has once
been classified under this chapter, a notation of the classification shall be
made each year upon the assessment and tax rolls and the land shall be valued
pursuant to RCW 84.34.060 or 84.34.065 until removal of all or a portion of the
classification by the assessor upon occurrence of any of the following:

(a) Receipt of notice
from the owner to remove all or a portion of the classification;

(b) Sale or transfer to
an ownership, except a transfer that resulted from a default in loan payments
made to or secured by a governmental agency that intends to or is required by
law or regulation to resell the property for the same use as before, making all
or a portion of the land exempt from ad valorem taxation;

(c) Sale or transfer of
all or a portion of the land to a new owner, unless the new owner has signed a
notice of classification continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an
heir or devisee of a deceased owner shall not, by itself, result in removal of
classification. The notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared by the
department. If the notice of continuance is not signed by the new owner and
attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all additional taxes
calculated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section shall become due and
payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The auditor shall not
accept an instrument of conveyance of classified land for filing or recording
unless the new owner has signed the notice of continuance or the additional tax
has been paid, as evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto
by the treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the new
assessed valuation calculated under subsection (4) of this section to the
county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW
84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board of
equalization to hear these appeals;

(d) Determination by
the assessor, after giving the owner written notice and an opportunity to be
heard, that all or a portion of the land no longer meets the criteria for
classification under this chapter. The criteria for classification pursuant to
this chapter continue to apply after classification has been granted.

The granting authority,
upon request of an assessor, shall provide reasonable assistance to the
assessor in making a determination whether the land continues to meet the
qualifications of RCW 84.34.020 (1) or (3). The assistance shall be provided
within thirty days of receipt of the request.

(2) Land may not be
removed from classification because of:

(a) The creation, sale,
or transfer of forestry riparian easements under RCW 76.13.120; or

(b) The creation, sale,
or transfer of a fee interest or a conservation easement for the riparian open
space program under RCW 76.09.040.

(3) Within thirty days
after such removal of all or a portion of the land from current use
classification, the assessor shall notify the owner in writing, setting forth
the reasons for the removal. The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal the
removal to the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions
of RCW 84.40.038.

(4) Unless the removal
is reversed on appeal, the assessor shall revalue the affected land with
reference to its true and fair value on January 1st of the year of removal from
classification. Both the assessed valuation before and after the removal of
classification shall be listed and taxes shall be allocated according to that
part of the year to which each assessed valuation applies. Except as provided
in subsection (6) of this section, an additional tax, applicable interest, and
penalty shall be imposed which shall be due and payable to the treasurer thirty
days after the owner is notified of the amount of the additional tax. As soon as
possible, the assessor shall compute the amount of additional tax, applicable
interest, and penalty and the treasurer shall mail notice to the owner of the
amount thereof and the date on which payment is due. The amount of the
additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty shall be determined as
follows:

(a) The amount of
additional tax shall be equal to the difference between the property tax paid
as "open space land", "farm and agricultural land", or
"timber land" and the amount of property tax otherwise due and
payable for the seven years last past had the land not been so classified;

(b) The amount of
applicable interest shall be equal to the interest upon the amounts of the
additional tax paid at the same statutory rate charged on delinquent property
taxes from the dates on which the additional tax could have been paid without
penalty if the land had been assessed at a value without regard to this
chapter;

(c) The amount of the
penalty shall be as provided in RCW 84.34.080. The penalty shall not be
imposed if:

(i) The removal
satisfies the conditions of RCW 84.34.070; or

(ii) Up to five
acres of farm and agricultural land classified under RCW 84.34.020(2) that
includes a residential homesite is removed from classification when the owner
sells or transfers the remainder of the classified land to a new ownership if
the new owner signs a notice of continuance; the remaining land qualifies for
continued classification as farm and agricultural land under RCW 84.34.020(2);
and the removed land is not transferred to a new owner within five years of the
initial removal. If the land is transferred within five years of the initial
removal, the penalty shall be due on transfer and shall become a lien on the
land and be collected in the same manner as provided in subsection (5) of this
section.

(5) Additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty, shall become a lien on the land which shall
attach at the time the land is removed from classification under this chapter
and shall have priority to and shall be fully paid and satisfied before any
recognizance, mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation or responsibility to or with
which the land may become charged or liable. This lien may be foreclosed upon
expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner provided
by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property taxes as provided
in RCW 84.64.050 now or as hereafter amended. Any additional tax unpaid on its
due date shall thereupon become delinquent. From the date of delinquency until
paid, interest shall be charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent
ad valorem property taxes.

(6) The additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty specified in subsection (4) of this section
shall not be imposed if the removal of classification pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section resulted solely from:

(a) Transfer to a
government entity in exchange for other land located within the state of
Washington;

(b)(i) A taking through
the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or (ii) sale or transfer to an
entity having the power of eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of
such power, said entity having manifested its intent in writing or by other
official action;

(c) A natural disaster
such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other such calamity rather than by
virtue of the act of the landowner changing the use of the property;

(d) Official action by
an agency of the state of Washington or by the county or city within which the
land is located which disallows the present use of the land;

(e) Transfer of land to
a church when the land would qualify for exemption pursuant to RCW 84.36.020;

(f) Acquisition of
property interests by state agencies or agencies or organizations qualified
under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes enumerated in those
sections. At such time as these property interests are not used for the
purposes enumerated in RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 the additional tax specified
in subsection (4) of this section shall be imposed;

(g) Removal of land
classified as farm and agricultural land under RCW 84.34.020(2)(e);

(h) Removal of land
from classification after enactment of a statutory exemption that qualifies the
land for exemption and receipt of notice from the owner to remove the land from
classification;

(i) The creation, sale,
or transfer of forestry riparian easements under RCW 76.13.120;

(j) The creation, sale,
or transfer of a fee interest or a conservation easement for the riparian open
space program under RCW 76.09.040;

(k) The sale or
transfer of land within two years after the death of the owner of at least a
fifty percent interest in the land if the land has been assessed and valued as
classified forest land, designated as forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW, or
classified under this chapter continuously since 1993;

(l) The sale or
transfer of land after the death of the owner of at least a fifty percent
interest in the land if the land has been assessed and valued as classified
forest land, designated as forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW, or classified
under this chapter continuously since 1993 and the sale or transfer takes place
within two years after July 22, 2001, and the death of the owner occurred after
January 1, 1991; or

(m) The
date of death shown on a death certificate is the date used for the purpose of
this subsection (6).

--- END ---