BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 15.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that it is a common practice for consumers to be provided information as
to the country origin for many products available to them for purchase. The
legislature finds that consumers have a right to know the origin of the fresh
fruits and vegetables being offered to them at retail sale. The legislature
finds that there is value to the consumer being able to make an informed buying
decision as to whether the fresh fruit or vegetable was produced under
standards and conditions required in the United States. Further, the
legislature finds that consumers should be given the ability to make an
informed choice to buy fresh fruits and vegetables that are grown in Washington
state as a means of supporting the economy of the state.

(2) Stores or other
businesses offering fresh fruit and vegetables for retail sale to consumers
shall place a placard on the bin, shelf, or other location the product is
displayed that informs the consumer where the fruit or vegetable was grown if
it was grown in the United States or grown in Washington. The placard shall
indicate that the product was either "Grown in United States" or
"Grown in Washington." Placards are not required if (a) the product
was grown outside of the United States, or (b) each item in the bin, shelf, or
other location contains a sticker or label that indicates where the fruit or
vegetable product was grown.

(3) The
department shall administer this section. If the store or other retail location
is found to be in violation of this section, for the first violation per
location each calendar year, the department shall issue a warning. For a
second violation for the same location in the same calendar year, the
department may issue a civil fine of up to two hundred fifty dollars. For the
third and subsequent violations for the same location in the same calendar
year, the department may issue a civil fine of up to one thousand dollars.

--- END ---