BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 1989 c 350 s 1
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that recent developments in molecular biology and genetics have important
applications for forensic science. It has been scientifically established that
there is a unique pattern to the chemical structure of the deoxyribonucleic acid
(DNA) contained in each cell of the human body. The process for identifying
this pattern is called "DNA identification."

The legislature further
finds that ((the accuracy of identification provided by this method is
superior to that of any presently existing technique and recognizes the
importance of this scientific breakthrough in providing a reliable and accurate
tool for the investigation and prosecution of sex offenses as defined in RCW
9.94A.030(26) and violent offenses as defined in RCW 9.94A.030(29))) DNA
data bases are important tools in criminal investigations, in the exclusion of
individuals who are the subject of investigations or prosecutions, and in
detecting recidivist acts. It is the policy of this state to assist federal,
state, and local criminal justice and law enforcement agencies in both the
identification and detection of individuals in criminal investigations and the
identification and location of missing and unidentified persons. Therefore, it
is in the best interest of the state to establish a DNA data base and DNA data
bank containing DNA samples submitted by persons convicted of felony offenses
and DNA samples necessary for the identification of missing persons and
unidentified human remains.

The legislature
further finds that the DNA identification system used by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and the Washington state patrol has no ability to predict genetic
disease or predisposal to illness. Nonetheless, the legislature intends that
biological samples collected under RCW 43.43.754, and DNA identification data
obtained from the samples, be used only for purposes related to criminal
investigation, identification of human remains or missing persons, or improving
the operation of the system authorized under RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.43.754 and 1999 c
329 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every adult
or juvenile individual convicted of a felony, stalking under RCW 9A.46.110,
harassment under RCW 9A.46.020, communicating with a minor for immoral purposes
under RCW 9.68A.090, or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile
offense ((defined as a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030(33)(a) or a violent
offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 shall have a blood sample drawn)) must
have a biological sample collected for purposes of DNA identification
analysis((.)) in the following manner:

(a) For persons
convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile
offense who ((are serving or who are to serve a term of confinement in a
county jail or detention)) do not serve a term of confinement in a
department of corrections facility, and do serve a term of confinement in a
city or county jail facility, the city or county shall be
responsible for obtaining ((blood)) the biological samples either
as part of the intake process into the city or county jail or detention
facility for those persons convicted on or after ((July 25, 1999)) the
effective date of this act, or within a reasonable time after ((July 25,
1999)) the effective date of this act, for those persons
incarcerated ((prior to July 25, 1999)) before the effective date of
this act, who have not yet had a ((blood)) biological sample
((drawn)) collected, beginning with those persons who will be
released the soonest.

(b) For persons
convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile
offense who do not serve a term of confinement in a department of corrections
facility, and do not serve a term of confinement in a city or county jail
facility, the city or county is responsible for obtaining the biological
samples after sentencing on or after the effective date of this act.

(c) For persons
convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile
offense, who are serving or who are to serve a term of confinement in a
department of corrections facility or a ((division of juvenile
rehabilitation)) department of social and health services facility,
the facility holding the person shall be responsible for obtaining ((blood))
the biological samples either as part of the intake process into such
facility for those persons convicted on or after ((July 25, 1999)) the
effective date of this act, or within a reasonable time after ((July 25,
1999)) the effective date of this act, for those persons
incarcerated ((prior to July 25, 1999)) before the effective date of
this act, who have not yet had a ((blood)) biological sample
((drawn)) collected, beginning with those persons who will be
released the soonest.

(2) Any ((blood))
biological sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758 may
be retained by the forensic laboratory services bureau, and shall be used
solely for the purpose of providing DNA or other ((blood grouping))
tests for identification analysis and prosecution of a ((sex offense or a
violent offense)) criminal offense or for the identification of human
remains or missing persons. Nothing in this section prohibits the submission
of results derived from the biological samples to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
combined DNA index system.

(3) The director of
the forensic laboratory services bureau of the Washington state patrol shall
perform testing on all biological samples collected under subsection (1) of
this section, to the extent allowed by funding available for this purpose. The
director shall give priority to testing on samples collected from those adults
or juveniles convicted of a felony or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent
juvenile offense that is defined as a sex offense or a violent offense in RCW
9.94A.030.

(4) This section
applies to all adults who are convicted of a sex or violent offense
after July 1, 1990; and to all adults who were convicted of a sex or violent
offense on or prior to July 1, 1990, and who are still incarcerated on or after
July 25, 1999. This section applies to all juveniles who are adjudicated
guilty of a sex or violent offense after July 1, 1994; and to all
juveniles who were adjudicated guilty of a sex or violent offense on or
prior to July 1, 1994, and who are still incarcerated on or after July 25,
1999. This section applies to all adults and juveniles who are convicted of
a felony, stalking under RCW 9A.46.110, harassment under RCW 9A.46.020, or
communicating with a minor for immoral purposes under RCW 9.68A.090, or
adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense, on or after the effective
date of this act; and to all adults and juveniles who were convicted or
adjudicated guilty of such an offense before the effective date of this act and
are still incarcerated on or after the effective date of this act.

(5) This section
creates no rights in a third person. No cause of action may be brought based
upon the noncollection or nonanalysis or the delayed collection or analysis of
a biological sample authorized to be taken under RCW 43.43.752 through
43.43.758.

(6) The detention,
arrest, or conviction of a person based upon a data base match or data base
information is not invalidated if it is determined that the sample was obtained
or placed in the data base by mistake, or if the conviction or juvenile
adjudication that resulted in the collection of the biological sample was
subsequently vacated or otherwise altered in any future proceeding including
but not limited to posttrial or postfact-finding motions, appeals, or
collateral attacks.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.43.759 and 1990 c
230 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state
patrol shall consult with the forensic investigations council and adopt
rules to implement RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758. The rules shall prohibit
the use of DNA identification data for any research or other purpose that is
not related to a criminal investigation, to the identification of human
remains or missing persons, or to improving the operation of the system
authorized by RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758. The rules must also identify
appropriate sources and collection methods for biological samples needed for
purposes of DNA identification analysis.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

Every sentence imposed
under chapter 9.94A RCW, for a felony specified in RCW 43.43.754 that is
committed on or after the effective date of this act, must include a fee of one
hundred dollars for collection of a biological sample as required under RCW 43.43.754,
unless the court finds that imposing the fee would result in undue hardship on
the offender. The fee is a court‑ordered legal financial obligation as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030, payable by the offender after payment of all other
legal financial obligations included in the sentence has been completed. The
clerk of the court shall transmit fees collected to the state treasurer for
deposit in the state DNA data base account created under section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

The state DNA data base
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts under
section 4 of this act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for creation, operation, and maintenance of the
DNA data base under RCW 43.43.754. Only the chief of the Washington state
patrol or the chief's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 6. RCW 9.94A.505 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 312 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a person is
convicted of a felony, the court shall impose punishment as provided in this
chapter.

(2)(a) The court shall
impose a sentence as provided in the following sections and as applicable in
the case:

(i) Unless another term
of confinement applies, the court shall impose a sentence within the standard
sentence range established in RCW 9.94A.510;

(ii) RCW 9.94A.700 and
9.94A.705, relating to community placement;

(iii) RCW 9.94A.710 and
9.94A.715, relating to community custody;

(iv) RCW 9.94A.545,
relating to community custody for offenders whose term of confinement is one
year or less;

(v) RCW 9.94A.570,
relating to persistent offenders;

(vi) RCW 9.94A.540,
relating to mandatory minimum terms;

(vii) RCW 9.94A.650,
relating to the first-time offender waiver;

(viii) RCW 9.94A.660,
relating to the drug offender sentencing alternative;

(ix) RCW 9.94A.670,
relating to the special sex offender sentencing alternative;

(x) RCW 9.94A.712,
relating to certain sex offenses;

(xi) RCW 9.94A.535,
relating to exceptional sentences;

(xii) RCW 9.94A.589,
relating to consecutive and concurrent sentences.

(b) If a standard
sentence range has not been established for the offender's crime, the court
shall impose a determinate sentence which may include not more than one year of
confinement; community service work; until July 1, 2000, a term of community
supervision not to exceed one year and on and after July 1, 2000, a term of
community custody not to exceed one year, subject to conditions and sanctions
as authorized in RCW 9.94A.710 (2) and (3); and/or other legal financial
obligations. The court may impose a sentence which provides more than one year
of confinement if the court finds reasons justifying an exceptional sentence as
provided in RCW 9.94A.535.

(3) If the court
imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty days or less, the court may,
in its discretion, specify that the sentence be served on consecutive or
intermittent days. A sentence requiring more than thirty days of confinement
shall be served on consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule
court-ordered intermittent sentences as space permits.

(4) If a sentence
imposed includes payment of a legal financial obligation, it shall be imposed
as provided in RCW 9.94A.750, 9.94A.753, ((and)) 9.94A.760, and
section 4 of this act.

(5) Except as provided
under RCW 9.94A.750(4) and 9.94A.753(4), a court may not impose a sentence
providing for a term of confinement or community supervision, community
placement, or community custody which exceeds the statutory maximum for the
crime as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(6) The sentencing
court shall give the offender credit for all confinement time served before the
sentencing if that confinement was solely in regard to the offense for which
the offender is being sentenced.

(7) The court shall
order restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.750 and 9.94A.753.

(8) As a part of any
sentence, the court may impose and enforce crime-related prohibitions and
affirmative conditions as provided in this chapter.

(9) The court may order
an offender whose sentence includes community placement or community
supervision to undergo a mental status evaluation and to participate in
available outpatient mental health treatment, if the court finds that
reasonable grounds exist to believe that the offender is a mentally ill person
as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and that this condition is likely to have
influenced the offense. An order requiring mental status evaluation or
treatment must be based on a presentence report and, if applicable, mental
status evaluations that have been filed with the court to determine the
offender's competency or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may
order additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.

(10) In any sentence of
partial confinement, the court may require the offender to serve the partial
confinement in work release, in a program of home detention, on work crew, or
in a combined program of work crew and home detention.

(11) In sentencing an
offender convicted of a crime of domestic violence, as defined in RCW
10.99.020, if the offender has a minor child, or if the victim of the offense
for which the offender was convicted has a minor child, the court may, as part
of any term of community supervision, community placement, or community
custody, order the offender to participate in a domestic violence perpetrator
program approved under RCW 26.50.150.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Section 1 of this act is
added to chapter 43.43 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---