BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that in some regions
of the state there is growing controversy over the purchase of large
tracts of land by state agencies for wildlife habitat and related
purposes, especially in areas of the state with a limited private land
base. There is concern that these purchases may decrease local tax
revenues, may cause inflated land values, and that the stewardship of
the lands may not be adequate, leading to weed infestation and other
impacts to neighboring properties. Therefore, the legislature finds
that the joint legislative audit and review committee should
investigate these concerns and others, and make recommendations for
legislative action where warranted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The joint legislative audit and review
committee must conduct a review of state agency land purchases for
wildlife habitat and related purposes over the last five years in the
six counties of the state with the highest proportion of public land
ownership. The review must include an assessment of the following:

(1) The cumulative effect of the purchases of state land on local
government property tax revenues;

(2) The process used to select properties for state land purchase;

(3) The method of appraising potential lands for purchase, and the
appraised value in comparison to the final purchase price;

(4) Whether state agency land purchases have impacted property
values positively or negatively in the immediate vicinity of the
property;

(5) The maintenance and management of state lands purchased,
specifically with regard to weed management; and

(6) The effects on the local economy from the changes in use of the
property purchased.

The report must be submitted to the natural resources committees of
the senate and house of representatives by December 1, 2003.

--- END ---