BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The department must
develop procedures to compensate livestock owners for damage to livestock
caused by wildlife. Compensation must be based on the fair market value of the
livestock at slaughter. For the purposes of this section,
"livestock" has the same meaning as defined RCW 16.36.005.

Nothing in
this section may be construed to grant the department rule-making authority.

--- END ---