BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 13.40.020 and 1997 c
338 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter:

(1)
"Community-based rehabilitation" means one or more of the following:
Employment; attendance of information classes; literacy classes; counseling,
outpatient substance abuse treatment programs, outpatient mental health
programs, anger management classes, education or outpatient treatment programs
to prevent animal cruelty, or other services; or attendance at school or other
educational programs appropriate for the juvenile as determined by the school
district. Placement in community-based rehabilitation programs is subject to
available funds;

(2) Community-based
sanctions may include one or more of the following:

(a) A fine, not to
exceed five hundred dollars;

(b) Community service
not to exceed one hundred fifty hours of service;

(3) "Community
service" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the
benefit of the community by the offender as punishment for committing an
offense. Community service may be performed through public or private
organizations or through work crews;

(4) "Community
supervision" means an order of disposition by the court of an adjudicated
youth not committed to the department or an order granting a deferred
disposition. A community supervision order for a single offense may be for a
period of up to two years for a sex offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030 and up to
one year for other offenses. As a mandatory condition of any term of community
supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to refrain from committing new
offenses. As a mandatory condition of community supervision, the court shall
order the juvenile to comply with the mandatory school attendance provisions of
chapter 28A.225 RCW and to inform the school of the existence of this
requirement. Community supervision is an individualized program comprised of
one or more of the following:

(a) Community-based
sanctions;

(b) Community-based
rehabilitation;

(c) Monitoring and
reporting requirements;

(d) Posting of a
probation bond;

(5)
"Confinement" means physical custody by the department of social and
health services in a facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the
state, or physical custody in a detention facility operated by or pursuant to a
contract with any county. The county may operate or contract with vendors to
operate county detention facilities. The department may operate or contract to
operate detention facilities for juveniles committed to the department.
Pretrial confinement or confinement of less than thirty-one days imposed as
part of a disposition or modification order may be served consecutively or
intermittently, in the discretion of the court;

(6) "Court,"
when used without further qualification, means the juvenile court judge(s) or
commissioner(s);

(7) "Criminal
history" includes all criminal complaints against the respondent for
which, prior to the commission of a current offense:

(a) The allegations
were found correct by a court. If a respondent is convicted of two or more
charges arising out of the same course of conduct, only the highest charge from
among these shall count as an offense for the purposes of this chapter; or

(b) The criminal
complaint was diverted by a prosecutor pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter on agreement of the respondent and after an advisement to the
respondent that the criminal complaint would be considered as part of the
respondent's criminal history. A successfully completed deferred adjudication
that was entered before July 1, 1998, or a deferred disposition shall not be
considered part of the respondent's criminal history;

(8)
"Department" means the department of social and health services;

(9) "Detention
facility" means a county facility, paid for by the county, for the
physical confinement of a juvenile alleged to have committed an offense or an
adjudicated offender subject to a disposition or modification order.
"Detention facility" includes county group homes, inpatient substance
abuse programs, juvenile basic training camps, and electronic monitoring;

(10) "Diversion
unit" means any probation counselor who enters into a diversion agreement
with an alleged youthful offender, or any other person, community
accountability board, or other entity except a law enforcement official or
entity, with whom the juvenile court administrator has contracted to arrange
and supervise such agreements pursuant to RCW 13.40.080, or any person,
community accountability board, or other entity specially funded by the
legislature to arrange and supervise diversion agreements in accordance with
the requirements of this chapter. For purposes of this subsection,
"community accountability board" means a board comprised of members
of the local community in which the juvenile offender resides. The superior
court shall appoint the members. The boards shall consist of at least three
and not more than seven members. If possible, the board should include a
variety of representatives from the community, such as a law enforcement
officer, teacher or school administrator, high school student, parent, and
business owner, and should represent the cultural diversity of the local
community;

(11) "Foster
care" means temporary physical care in a foster family home or group care
facility as defined in RCW 74.15.020 and licensed by the department, or other
legally authorized care;

(12)
"Institution" means a juvenile facility established pursuant to
chapters 72.05 and 72.16 through 72.20 RCW;

(13) "Intensive
supervision program" means a parole program that requires intensive
supervision and monitoring, offers an array of individualized treatment and
transitional services, and emphasizes community involvement and support in
order to reduce the likelihood a juvenile offender will commit further
offenses;

(14)
"Juvenile," "youth," and "child" mean any
individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen years and who has not
been previously transferred to adult court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 or who is
otherwise under adult court jurisdiction;

(15) "Juvenile
offender" means any juvenile who has been found by the juvenile court to
have committed an offense, including a person eighteen years of age or older
over whom jurisdiction has been extended under RCW 13.40.300;

(16) "Local
sanctions" means one or more of the following: (a) 0‑30 days of confinement;
(b) 0‑12 months of community supervision; (c) 0‑150 hours of
community service; or (d) $0‑$500 fine;

(17) "Manifest
injustice" means a disposition that would either impose an excessive
penalty on the juvenile or would impose a serious, and clear danger to society
in light of the purposes of this chapter;

(18) "Monitoring
and reporting requirements" means one or more of the following: Curfews;
requirements to remain at home, school, work, or court-ordered treatment
programs during specified hours; restrictions from leaving or entering
specified geographical areas; requirements to report to the probation officer
as directed and to remain under the probation officer's supervision; and other
conditions or limitations as the court may require which may not include
confinement;

(19)
"Offense" means an act designated a violation or a crime if committed
by an adult under the law of this state, under any ordinance of any city or
county of this state, under any federal law, or under the law of another state
if the act occurred in that state;

(20) "Probation
bond" means a bond, posted with sufficient security by a surety justified
and approved by the court, to secure the offender's appearance at required
court proceedings and compliance with court-ordered community supervision or
conditions of release ordered pursuant to RCW 13.40.040 or 13.40.050. It also
means a deposit of cash or posting of other collateral in lieu of a bond if
approved by the court;

(21)
"Respondent" means a juvenile who is alleged or proven to have
committed an offense;

(22)
"Restitution" means financial reimbursement by the offender to the
victim, and shall be limited to easily ascertainable damages for injury to or
loss of property, actual expenses incurred for medical treatment for physical
injury to persons, lost wages resulting from physical injury, and costs of the
victim's counseling reasonably related to the offense ((if the offense is a
sex offense)). Restitution shall not include reimbursement for damages for
mental anguish, pain and suffering, or other intangible losses. Nothing in
this chapter shall limit or replace civil remedies or defenses available to the
victim or offender;

(23)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services. "Assistant secretary" means the assistant secretary
for juvenile rehabilitation for the department;

(24)
"Services" means services which provide alternatives to incarceration
for those juveniles who have pleaded or been adjudicated guilty of an offense
or have signed a diversion agreement pursuant to this chapter;

(25) "Sex
offense" means an offense defined as a sex offense in RCW 9.94A.030;

(26) "Sexual
motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the respondent
committed the offense was for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification;

(27) "Surety"
means an entity licensed under state insurance laws or by the state department
of licensing, to write corporate, property, or probation bonds within the
state, and justified and approved by the superior court of the county having
jurisdiction of the case;

(28) "Victim"
means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or
financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the crime
charged. "Victim" may also include a known parent or guardian of a
victim who is a minor child unless the parent or guardian is the perpetrator of
the offense;

(29)
"Violation" means an act or omission, which if committed by an adult,
must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt, and is punishable by sanctions which
do not include incarceration;

(((29)))
(30) "Violent offense" means a violent offense as defined in
RCW 9.94A.030.

--- END ---