BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) It is lawful for
all school administrators, school teachers, and all other school employees to
carry concealed firearms on school facilities in the state of Washington
subject to the following requirements:

(a) The person must be
qualified to lawfully possess firearms under the laws of the state of
Washington;

(b) The person must
possess a valid concealed pistol license where required by law;

(c) Only ammunition
determined not to ricochet intact, or over-penetrate, such as the Glaser Safety
Slug, may be used;

(d) Firearms and
ammunition must be on the user's person at all times, unless placed in secure
locked storage equivalent to Palmer Security Products' Model 7000TC gun locker.

(2) The state of
Washington, local authorities, and local school districts are immune from
liability for injuries inflicted by persons who choose to carry concealed
firearms under this section.

(3) Persons who qualify
and choose to carry concealed firearms under this section are immune from
liability for injuries inflicted while exercising lawful use of force on school
facilities.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.41.280 and 1999 c
167 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for
a person to carry onto, or to possess on, public or private elementary or
secondary school premises, school-provided transportation, or areas of
facilities while being used exclusively by public or private schools:

(a) Any firearm;

(b) Any other dangerous
weapon as defined in RCW 9.41.250;

(c) Any device commonly
known as "nun-chu-ka sticks", consisting of two or more lengths of
wood, metal, plastic, or similar substance connected with wire, rope, or other
means;

(d) Any device,
commonly known as "throwing stars", which are multi-pointed, metal
objects designed to embed upon impact from any aspect; or

(e) Any air gun,
including any air pistol or air rifle, designed to propel a BB, pellet, or
other projectile by the discharge of compressed air, carbon dioxide, or other
gas.

(2) Any such person
violating subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. If
any person is convicted of a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section,
the person shall have his or her concealed pistol license, if any revoked for a
period of three years. Anyone convicted under this subsection is prohibited
from applying for a concealed pistol license for a period of three years. The
court shall send notice of the revocation to the department of licensing, and
the city, town, or county which issued the license.

Any violation of
subsection (1) of this section by elementary or secondary school students
constitutes grounds for expulsion from the state's public schools in accordance
with RCW 28A.600.010. An appropriate school authority shall promptly notify
law enforcement and the student's parent or guardian regarding any allegation
or indication of such violation.

Upon the arrest of a
person at least twelve years of age and not more than twenty-one years of age
for violating subsection (1)(a) of this section, the person shall be detained
or confined in a juvenile or adult facility for up to seventy-two hours. The
person shall not be released within the seventy-two hours until after the
person has been examined and evaluated by the county-designated mental health
professional unless the court in its discretion releases the person sooner
after a determination regarding probable cause or on probation bond or bail.

Within twenty-four
hours of the arrest, the arresting law enforcement agency shall refer the
person to the county-designated mental health professional for examination and
evaluation under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW and inform a parent or guardian of
the person of the arrest, detention, and examination. The county-designated
mental health professional shall examine and evaluate the person subject to the
provisions of chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW. The examination shall occur at the
facility in which the person is detained or confined. If the person has been
released on probation, bond, or bail, the examination shall occur wherever is
appropriate.

The county-designated
mental health professional may determine whether to refer the person to the
county-designated chemical dependency specialist for examination and evaluation
in accordance with chapter 70.96A RCW. The county-designated chemical
dependency specialist shall examine the person subject to the provisions of
chapter 70.96A RCW. The examination shall occur at the facility in which the
person is detained or confined. If the person has been released on probation,
bond, or bail, the examination shall occur wherever is appropriate.

Upon completion of any
examination by the county-designated mental health professional or the
county-designated chemical dependency specialist, the results of the
examination shall be sent to the court, and the court shall consider those
results in making any determination about the person.

The county-designated
mental health professional and county-designated chemical dependency specialist
shall, to the extent permitted by law, notify a parent or guardian of the
person that an examination and evaluation has taken place and the results of
the examination. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the delivery of
additional, appropriate mental health examinations to the person while the
person is detained or confined.

If the
county-designated mental health professional determines it is appropriate, the
county-designated mental health professional may refer the person to the local
regional support network for follow-up services or the department of social and
health services or other community providers for other services to the family
and individual.

(3) Subsection (1) of
this section does not apply to:

(a) Any student or
employee of a private military academy when on the property of the academy;

(b) Any person engaged
in military, law enforcement, or school district security activities;

(c) Any person who is
involved in a convention, showing, demonstration, lecture, or firearms safety
course authorized by school authorities in which the firearms of collectors or
instructors are handled or displayed;

(d) Any person while
the person is participating in a firearms or air gun competition approved by
the school or school district;

(e) Any person in
possession of a pistol who has been issued a license under RCW 9.41.070, or is
exempt from the licensing requirement by RCW 9.41.060, while picking up or
dropping off a student;

(f) Any nonstudent at
least eighteen years of age legally in possession of a firearm or dangerous
weapon that is secured within an attended vehicle or concealed from view within
a locked unattended vehicle while conducting legitimate business at the school;

(g) Any nonstudent at
least eighteen years of age who is in lawful possession of an unloaded firearm,
secured in a vehicle while conducting legitimate business at the school; ((or))

(h) Any law enforcement
officer of the federal, state, or local government agency;

(i) Any person in
compliance with section 1(1) of this act.

(4) Subsections (1)(c)
and (d) of this section do not apply to any person who possesses nun-chu-ka
sticks, throwing stars, or other dangerous weapons to be used in martial arts
classes authorized to be conducted on the school premises.

(5) Except as provided
in subsection (3)(b), (c), (f), ((and)) (h), and (i) of this
section, firearms are not permitted in a public or private school building.

(6) "GUN-FREE
ZONE" signs shall be posted around school facilities giving warning of the
prohibition of the possession of firearms on school grounds.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.41.--- and 2002 c
. . . s 1 (section 1 of this act) are each amended to read as
follows:

(1) It is lawful for ((all
school administrators, school teachers, and all other school employees)) any
person to carry concealed firearms on school facilities in the state of
Washington subject to the following requirements:

(a) The person must be
qualified to lawfully possess firearms under the laws of the state of
Washington;

(b) The person must
possess a valid concealed pistol license where required by law;

(c) In cases of
school administrators, teachers, and all other employees who carry concealed
firearms while working under this section, only ammunition determined not
to ricochet intact, or over-penetrate, such as the Glaser Safety Slug, may be
used;

(d) Firearms and
ammunition must be on the user's person at all times, unless placed in secure
locked storage equivalent to Palmer Security Products' Model 7000TC gun locker.

(2) The state of
Washington, local authorities, and local school districts are immune from
liability for injuries inflicted by persons who choose to carry concealed
firearms under this section.

(3) Persons who qualify
and choose to carry concealed firearms under this section are immune from
liability for injuries inflicted while exercising lawful use of force on school
facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 3 of this act
takes effect July 1, 2007.

---
END ---