BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be known
and cited as the rental car insurance limited agent license act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Endorsee" means an unlicensed employee or agent of a rental car
agent who meets the requirements of this chapter.

(2) "Person"
means an individual or a business entity.

(3) "Rental
agreement" means any written master, corporate, group, or individual
agreement setting forth the terms and conditions governing the use of a rental
car rented or leased by a rental car company.

(4) "Rental
car" means any motor vehicle that is intended to be rented or leased for a
period of thirty consecutive days or less by a driver who is not required to
possess a commercial driver's license to operate the motor vehicle and the
motor vehicle is either of the following:

(a) A private passenger
motor vehicle, including a passenger van, recreational vehicle, minivan, or
sports utility vehicle; or

(b) A cargo vehicle,
including a cargo van, pickup truck, or truck with a gross vehicle weight of
less than twenty-six thousand pounds.

(5) "Rental car
agent" means any rental car company that is licensed to offer, sell, or
solicit rental car insurance under this chapter.

(6) "Rental car
company" means any person in the business of renting rental cars to the
public, including a franchisee.

(7) "Rental car
insurance" means insurance offered, sold, or solicited in connection with
and incidental to the rental of rental cars, whether at the rental office or by
preselection of coverage in master, corporate, group, or individual agreements
that: (a) Is nontransferable; (b) applies only to the rental car that is the
subject of the rental agreement; and (c) is limited to the following kinds of
insurance:

(i) Personal accident
insurance for renters and other rental car occupants, for accidental death or
dismemberment, and for medical expenses resulting from an accident that occurs
with the rental car during the rental period;

(ii) Liability
insurance, including uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage, whether
offered separately or in combination with other liability insurance, that
provides protection to the renters and to other authorized drivers of a rental
car for liability arising from the operation of the rental car during the
rental period;

(iii) Personal effects
insurance that provides coverage to renters and other vehicle occupants for
loss of, or damage to, personal effects in the rental car during the rental
period; and

(iv) Roadside
assistance and emergency sickness protection insurance.

(8) "Renter"
means any person who obtains the use of a vehicle from a rental car company
under the terms of a rental agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. GENERAL RULES. (1) A
rental car company, or officer, director, employee, or agent of a rental car
company, may not offer, sell, or solicit the purchase of rental car insurance
unless that person is licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or is in compliance with
this chapter.

(2) The commissioner
may issue a license to a rental car company that is in compliance with this
chapter authorizing the rental car company to act as a rental car agent under
this chapter, in connection with and incidental to rental agreements, on behalf
of any insurer authorized to write rental car insurance in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. LICENSING RENTAL CAR
COMPANIES AS RENTAL CAR AGENTS. A rental car company may apply to be licensed
as a rental car agent under, and if in compliance with, this chapter by filing
the following documents with the commissioner:

(1) A written
application for licensure, signed by the applicant or by an officer of the
applicant, in the form prescribed by the commissioner that includes a listing
of all locations at which the rental car company intends to offer, sell, or
solicit rental car insurance; and

(2)(a) A certificate by
the insurer that is to be named in the rental car agent license, stating that:
(i) The insurer has satisfied itself that the named applicant is trustworthy
and competent to act as its rental car agent, limited to this purpose; (ii) the
insurer has reviewed the endorsee training and education program required by
section 5(4) of this act and believes that it satisfies the statutory
requirements; and (iii) the insurer will appoint the applicant to act as its
rental car agent to offer, sell, or solicit rental car insurance, if the
license for which the applicant is applying is issued by the commissioner.

(b) The certification
shall be subscribed by an authorized representative of the insurer on a form
prescribed by the commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. RENTAL CAR AGENT
ENDORSEES. (1) An employee or agent of a rental car agent may be an endorsee
authorized to offer, sell, or solicit rental car insurance under the authority
of the rental car agent license, if all of the following conditions have been
satisfied:

(a) The employee or
agent is eighteen years of age or older;

(b) The employee or
agent is a trustworthy person and has not committed any act set forth in RCW
48.17.530;

(c) The employee or
agent has completed a training and education program;

(d) The rental car
company, at the time it submits its rental car agent license application, also
submits a list of the names of all endorsees to its rental car agent license on
forms prescribed by the commissioner. The list shall be updated and submitted
to the commissioner quarterly on a calendar year basis. Each list shall be
retained by the rental car company for a period of three years from submission;
and

(e) The rental car
company or its agent submits to the commissioner with its initial rental car
agent license application, and annually thereafter, a certification subscribed
by an officer of the rental car company on a form prescribed by the commissioner,
stating all of the following:

(i) No person other
than an endorsee offers, sells, or solicits rental car insurance on its behalf
or while working as an employee or agent of the rental car agent; and

(ii) All endorsees have
completed the training and education program under subsection (4) of this
section.

(2) A rental car
agent's endorsee may only act on behalf of the rental car agent in the offer,
sale, or solicitation of a rental car insurance. A rental car agent is
responsible for, and must supervise, all actions of its endorsees related to
the offering, sale, or solicitation of rental car insurance. The conduct of an
endorsee acting within the scope of his or her employment or agency is the same
as the conduct of the rental car agent for purposes of this chapter.

(3) The manager at each
location of a rental car agent, or the direct supervisor of the rental car
agent's endorsees at each location, must be an endorsee of that rental car
agent and is responsible for the supervision of each additional endorsee at
that location. Each rental car agent shall identify the endorsee who is the
manager or direct supervisor at each location in the endorsee list that it
submits under subsection (1)(d) of this section.

(4) Each rental car
agent shall provide a training and education program for each endorsee prior to
allowing an endorsee to offer, sell, or solicit rental car insurance. Details
of the program must be submitted to the commissioner, along with the license
application, for approval prior to use, and resubmitted for approval of any
changes prior to use. This training program shall meet the following minimum
standards:

(a) Each endorsee shall
receive instruction about the kinds of insurance authorized under this chapter
that may be offered for sale to prospective renters; and

(b) Each endorsee shall
receive training about the requirements and limitations imposed on car rental
agents and endorsees under this chapter. The training must include specific
instruction that the endorsee is prohibited by law from making any statement or
engaging in any conduct express or implied, that would lead a consumer to
believe that the:

(i) Purchase of rental
car insurance is required in order for the renter to rent a motor vehicle;

(ii) Renter does not
have insurance policies in place that already provide the coverage being
offered by the rental car company under this chapter; or

(iii) Endorsee is
qualified to evaluate the adequacy of the renter's existing insurance
coverages.

(5) The training and
education program submitted to the commissioner is approved if no action is
taken within thirty days of its submission.

(6) An endorsee's
authorization to offer, sell, or solicit rental car insurance expires when the
endorsee's employment with the rental car company is terminated.

(7) The rental car
agent shall retain for a period of one year from the date of each transaction
records which enable it to identify the name of the endorsee involved in each
rental transaction when a renter purchases rental car insurance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. RENTAL CAR AGENT
RESTRICTIONS. Insurance may not be offered, sold, or solicited under this
section, unless:

(1) The rental period
of the rental car agreement is thirty consecutive days or less;

(2) At every location
where rental agreements are executed, the rental car agent or endorsee provides
brochures or other written materials to each renter who purchases rental car
insurance that clearly, conspicuously, and in plain language:

(a) Summarize, clearly
and correctly, the material terms, exclusions, limitations, and conditions of
coverage offered to renters, including the identity of the insurer;

(b) Describe the
process for filing a claim in the event the renter elects to purchase coverage,
including a toll-free telephone number to report a claim;

(c) Provide the rental
car agent's name, address, telephone number, and license number, as well as the
commissioner's consumer hotline number;

(d) Inform the consumer
that the rental car insurance offered, sold, or solicited by the rental car
agent may provide a duplication of coverage already provided by a renter's
personal automobile insurance policy, homeowners' insurance policy, or by
another source of coverage;

(e) Inform the consumer
that the purchase by the renter of the rental car insurance is not required in
order to rent a rental car from the rental car agent; and

(f) Inform the consumer
that the rental car agent and the rental car agent's endorsees are not qualified
to evaluate the adequacy of the renter's existing insurance coverages;

(3) The purchaser of
rental car insurance acknowledges in writing the receipt of the brochures or
written materials required by subsection (2) of this section;

(4) Evidence of the rental
car insurance coverage is stated on the face of the rental agreement;

(5) All costs for the
rental car insurance are separately itemized in the rental agreement;

(6) When the rental car
insurance is not the primary source of coverage, the consumer is informed in
writing in the form required by subsection (2) of this section that their
personal insurance will serve as the primary source of coverage; and

(7) For transactions
conducted by electronic means, the rental car agent must comply with the requirements
of this section, and the renter must acknowledge in writing or by electronic
signature the receipt of the following disclosures:

(a) The insurance
policies offered by the rental car agent may provide a duplication of coverage
already provided by a renter's personal automobile insurance policy,
homeowners' insurance policy, or by another source of coverage;

(b) The purchase by the
renter of rental car insurance is not required in order to rent a rental car
from the rental car agent; and

(c) The rental car
agent and the rental car agent's endorsees are not qualified to evaluate the
adequacy of the renter's existing insurance coverages.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. RENTAL CAR AGENT
PROHIBITIONS. A rental car agent may not:

(1) Offer, sell, or
solicit the purchase of insurance except in conjunction with and incidental to
rental car agreements;

(2) Advertise,
represent, or otherwise portray itself or any of its employees or agents as
licensed insurers, insurance agents, or insurance brokers;

(3) Pay any person,
including a rental car agent endorsee, any compensation, fee, or commission
that is dependent primarily on the placement of insurance under the license
issued under this chapter;

(4) Make any statement
or engage in any conduct, express or implied, that would lead a customer to
believe that the:

(a) Insurance policies
offered by the rental car agent do not provide a duplication of coverage
already provided by a renter's personal automobile insurance policy,
homeowners' insurance policy, or by another source of coverage;

(b) Purchase by the
renter of rental car insurance is required in order to rent a rental car from
the rental car agent; and

(c) Rental car agent or
the rental car agent's endorsees are qualified to evaluate the adequacy of the
renter's existing insurance coverages.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. ENFORCEMENT. (1) Every
rental car agent licensed under this chapter shall promptly reply in writing to
an inquiry of the commissioner relative to the business of car rental
insurance.

(2)(a) In the event of
a violation of this chapter by a rental car agent, the commissioner may revoke,
suspend, or refuse to issue or renew any rental car agent's license that is
issued or may be issued under this chapter for any cause specified in any other
provision of this title, or for any of the following causes:

(i) For any cause that
the issuance of this license could have been refused had it then existed and
been known to the commissioner;

(ii) If the licensee or
applicant willfully violates or knowingly participates in a violation of this
title or any proper order or rule of the commissioner;

(iii) If the licensee
or applicant has obtained or attempted to obtain a license through willful
misrepresentation or fraud;

(iv) If the licensee or
applicant has misappropriated or converted funds that belong to, or should be
paid to, another person as a result of, or in connection with, a car rental or
insurance transaction;

(v) If the licensee or
applicant has, with intent to deceive, materially misrepresented the terms or
effects of any insurance contract, or has engaged, or is about to engage, in
any fraudulent transaction;

(vi) If the licensee or
applicant or officer of the licensee or applicant has been convicted by final
judgment of a felony;

(vii) If the licensee
or applicant is shown to be, and is determined by the commissioner, incompetent
or untrustworthy, or a source of injury and loss to the public; and

(viii) If the licensee
has dealt with, or attempted to deal with, insurances, or has exercised powers
relative to insurance outside the scope of the car rental agent license or
other insurance licenses.

(b) If any natural
person named under a firm or corporate car rental agent license, or application
therefore, commits or has committed any act, or fails or has failed to perform
any duty, that constitutes grounds for the commissioner to revoke, suspend, or
refuse to issue or renew the license or application for license, the commissioner
may revoke, suspend, refuse to renew, or refuse to issue the license or
application for a license of the corporation or firm.

(c) Any conduct of an
applicant or licensee that constitutes grounds for disciplinary action under
this title may be addressed under this section regardless of where the conduct
took place.

(d) The holder of any
license that has been revoked or suspended shall surrender the license to the
commissioner at the commissioner's request.

(e) After notice and
hearing the commissioner may impose other penalties, including suspending the
transaction of insurance at specific rental locations where violations of this
section have occurred and imposing fines on the manager or supervisor at each
location responsible for the supervision and conduct of each endorsee, as the
commissioner determines necessary or convenient to carry out the purpose of
this chapter.

(3) The commissioner
may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew any car rental agent license by an
order served by mail or personal service upon the licensee not less than
fifteen days prior to its effective date. The order is subject to the right of
the licensee to a hearing under chapter 48.04 RCW.

(4) The commissioner
may temporarily suspend a license by an order served by mail or personal
service upon the licensee not less than three days prior to its effective
date. However, the order must contain a notice of revocation and include a
finding that the public safety or welfare imperatively requires emergency
action. These suspensions may continue only until proceedings for revocation
are concluded. The commissioner may also temporarily suspend a license in
cases when proceedings for revocation are pending if it is found that the
public safety or welfare imperatively requires emergency action.

(5) Service by mail
under this section means posting in the United States mail, addressed to the
licensee at the most recent address shown in the commissioner's licensing
records for the licensee. Service by mail is complete upon deposit in the
United States mail.

(6) If any person sells
insurance in connection with or incidental to rental car agreements, or holds
himself or herself or a company out as a rental car agent, without satisfying
the requirements of this chapter, the commissioner is authorized to issue a
cease and desist order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. TRUST ACCOUNT. A rental
car agent is not required to treat moneys collected from renters purchasing
rental car insurance as funds received in a fiduciary capacity, if:

(1) The charges for
rental car insurance coverage are itemized and ancillary to a rental
transaction; and

(2) The insurer has
consented in writing, signed by an officer of the insurer, that premiums need
not be segregated from funds received by the rental car agent.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. RULE MAKING. The commissioner
may adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter, including rules
establishing licensing fees to defray the cost of administering this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. CAPTIONS. Captions used
in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. Sections 1 through 11 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

---
END ---