BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.50.050 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 18 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall establish a treatment program to provide, within available funds, alcohol
and drug treatment services for indigent persons eligible under this chapter.
The treatment services may include but are not limited to:

(a) Intensive inpatient
treatment services;

(b) Recovery house
treatment;

(c) Outpatient
treatment and counseling, including assistance in obtaining employment, and
including a living allowance while undergoing outpatient treatment. The living
allowance may not be used to provide shelter to clients in a dormitory setting
that does not require sobriety as a condition of residence. The living
allowance shall be administered on the clients' behalf by the outpatient
treatment facility or other social service agency designated by the
department. The department is authorized to pay the facility a fee for
administering this allowance.

(2) ((No individual
may receive treatment services under this section for more than six months in
any two-year period: PROVIDED, That the department may approve additional
treatment and/or living allowance as an exception.

(3))) The department may require an applicant or
recipient selecting treatment to complete inpatient and recovery house
treatment when, in the judgment of a designated assessment center, such
treatment is necessary prior to providing the outpatient program.

--- END ---