BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 11.98.070 and 1997 c
252 s 75 are each amended to read as follows:

A trustee, or the
trustees jointly, of a trust, in addition to the authority otherwise given by
law, have discretionary power to acquire, invest, reinvest, exchange, sell,
convey, control, divide, partition, and manage the trust property in accordance
with the standards provided by law, and in so doing may:

(1) Receive property
from any source as additions to the trust or any fund of the trust to be held
and administered under the provisions of the trust;

(2) Sell on credit;

(3) Grant, purchase or
exercise options;

(4) Sell or exercise
subscriptions to stock or other corporate securities and to exercise conversion
rights;

(5) Deposit stock or
other corporate securities with any protective or other similar committee;

(6) Assent to corporate
sales, leases, and encumbrances;

(7) Vote trust
securities in person or by proxy with power of substitution; and enter into
voting trusts;

(8) Register and hold
any stocks, securities, or other property in the name of a nominee or nominees
without mention of the trust relationship, provided the trustee or trustees are
liable for any loss occasioned by the acts of any nominee, except that this
subsection shall not apply to situations covered by RCW 11.98.070(31);

(9) Grant leases of
trust property, with or without options to purchase or renew, to begin within a
reasonable period and for terms within or extending beyond the duration of the
trust, for any purpose including exploration for and removal of oil, gas and
other minerals; enter into community oil leases, pooling and unitization
agreements;

(10) Subdivide,
develop, dedicate to public use, make or obtain the vacation of public plats,
adjust boundaries, partition real property, and on exchange or partition to
adjust differences in valuation by giving or receiving money or money's worth;

(11) Compromise or
submit claims to arbitration;

(12) Borrow money,
secured or unsecured, from any source, including a corporate trustee's banking
department, or from the individual trustee's own funds;

(13) Make loans, either
secured or unsecured, at such interest as the trustee may determine to any
person, including any beneficiary of a trust, except that no trustee who is a
beneficiary of a trust may participate in decisions regarding loans to such beneficiary
from the trust, unless the loan is as described in RCW 83.110.020(2), and then
only to the extent of the loan, and also except that if a beneficiary or the
grantor of a trust has the power to change a trustee of the trust, the power to
loan shall be limited to loans at a reasonable rate of interest and for
adequate security;

(14) Determine the
hazards to be insured against and maintain insurance for them;

(15) Select any part of
the trust estate in satisfaction of any partition or distribution, in kind, in
money or both; make nonpro rata distributions of property in kind; allocate
particular assets or portions of them or undivided interests in them to any one
or more of the beneficiaries without regard to the income tax basis of specific
property allocated to any beneficiary and without any obligation to make an
equitable adjustment;

(16) Pay any income or
principal distributable to or for the use of any beneficiary, whether that
beneficiary is under legal disability, to the beneficiary or for the
beneficiary's use to the beneficiary's parent, guardian, custodian under the
uniform gifts to minors act of any state, person with whom he resides, or third
person;

(17) Change the
character of or abandon a trust asset or any interest in it;

(18) Mortgage, pledge
the assets or the credit of the trust estate, or otherwise encumber trust
property, including future income, whether an initial encumbrance or a renewal
or extension of it, for a term within or extending beyond the term of the
trust, in connection with the exercise of any power vested in the trustee;

(19) Make ordinary or
extraordinary repairs or alterations in buildings or other trust property,
demolish any improvements, raze existing structures, and make any improvements
to trust property;

(20) Create
restrictions, easements, including easements to public use without
consideration, and other servitudes;

(21) Manage any
business interest, including any farm or ranch interest, regardless of form,
received by the trustee from the trustor of the trust, as a result of the death
of a person, or by gratuitous transfer from any other transferor, and with
respect to the business interest, have the following powers:

(a) To hold, retain,
and continue to operate that business interest solely at the risk of the trust,
without need to diversify and without liability on the part of the trustee for
any resulting losses;

(b) To enlarge or
diminish the scope or nature or the activities of any business;

(c) To authorize the
participation and contribution by the business to any employee benefit plan,
whether or not qualified as being tax deductible, as may be desirable from time
to time;

(d) To use the general
assets of the trust for the purpose of the business and to invest additional
capital in or make loans to such business;

(e) To endorse or
guarantee on behalf of the trust any loan made to the business and to secure
the loan by the trust's interest in the business or any other property of the
trust;

(f) To leave to the
discretion of the trustee the manner and degree of the trustee's active
participation in the management of the business, and the trustee is authorized
to delegate all or any part of the trustee's power to supervise, manage, or
operate to such persons as the trustee may select, including any partner,
associate, director, officer, or employee of the business; and also including
electing or employing directors, officers, or employees of the trustee to take
part in the management of the business as directors or officers or otherwise,
and to pay that person reasonable compensation for services without regard to
the fees payable to the trustee;

(g) To engage,
compensate, and discharge or to vote for the engaging, compensating, and
discharging of managers, employees, agents, lawyers, accountants, consultants,
or other representatives, including anyone who may be a beneficiary of the
trust or any trustee;

(h) To cause or agree
that surplus be accumulated or that dividends be paid;

(i) To accept as
correct financial or other statements rendered by any accountant for any sole
proprietorship or by any partnership or corporation as to matters pertaining to
the business except upon actual notice to the contrary;

(j) To treat the
business as an entity separate from the trust, and in any accounting by the trustee
it is sufficient if the trustee reports the earning and condition of the
business in a manner conforming to standard business accounting practice;

(k) To exercise with
respect to the retention, continuance, or disposition of any such business all the
rights and powers that the trustor of the trust would have if alive at the time
of the exercise, including all powers as are conferred on the trustee by law or
as are necessary to enable the trustee to administer the trust in accordance
with the instrument governing the trust, subject to any limitations provided
for in the instrument; and

(l) To satisfy
contractual and tort liabilities arising out of an unincorporated business,
including any partnership, first out of the business and second out of the estate
or trust, but in no event may there be a liability of the trustee, except as
provided in RCW 11.98.110 (2) and (4), and if the trustee is liable, the
trustee is entitled to indemnification from the business and the trust,
respectively;

(22) Participate in the
establishment of, and thereafter in the operation of, any business or other
enterprise according to subsection (21) of this section except that the trustee
shall not be relieved of the duty to diversify;

(23) Cause or
participate in, directly or indirectly, the formation, reorganization, merger,
consolidation, dissolution, or other change in the form of any corporate or
other business undertaking where trust property may be affected and retain any
property received pursuant to the change;

(24) Limit
participation in the management of any partnership and act as a limited or
general partner;

(25) Charge profits and
losses of any business operation, including farm or ranch operation, to the
trust estate as a whole and not to the trustee; make available to or invest in
any business or farm operation additional moneys from the trust estate or other
sources;

(26) Pay reasonable
compensation to the trustee or co-trustees considering all circumstances
including the time, effort, skill, and responsibility involved in the
performance of services by the trustee;

(27) Employ persons,
including lawyers, accountants, investment advisors, or agents, even if they
are associated with the trustee, to advise or assist the trustee in the
performance of the trustee's duties or to perform any act, regardless of
whether the act is discretionary, and to act without independent investigation
upon their recommendations, except that:

(a) A trustee may not
delegate all of the trustee's duties and responsibilities;

(b) This power to
employ and to delegate duties does not relieve the trustee of liability for
such person's discretionary acts, that, if done by the trustee, would result in
liability to the trustee;

(c) This power to
employ and to delegate duties does not relieve the trustee of the duty to
select and retain a person with reasonable care;

(d) The trustee, or a
successor trustee, may sue the person to collect any damages suffered by the
trust estate even though the trustee might not be personally liable for those
damages, subject to the statutes of limitation that would have applied had the
claim been one against the trustee who was serving when the act or failure to
act occurred;

(28) Appoint an
ancillary trustee or agent to facilitate management of assets located in
another state or foreign country;

(29) Retain and store
such items of tangible personal property as the trustee selects and pay
reasonable storage charges thereon from the trust estate;

(30) Issue proxies to
any adult beneficiary of a trust for the purpose of voting stock of a
corporation acting as the trustee of the trust;

(31) Place all or any
part of the securities at any time held by the trustee in the care and custody
of any bank, trust company, or member firm of the New York Stock Exchange with
no obligation while the securities are so deposited to inspect or verify the
same and with no responsibility for any loss or misapplication by the bank,
trust company, or firm, so long as the bank, trust company, or firm was
selected and retained with reasonable care, and have all stocks and registered
securities placed in the name of the bank, trust company, or firm, or in the
name of its nominee, and to appoint such bank, trust company, or firm agent as
attorney to collect, receive, receipt for, and disburse any income, and
generally may perform, but is under no requirement to perform, the duties and
services incident to a so-called "custodian" account;

(32) Determine at any
time that the corpus of any trust is insufficient to implement the intent of
the trust, and upon this determination by the trustee, terminate the trust by
distribution of the trust to the current income beneficiary or beneficiaries of
the trust or their legal representatives, except that this determination may
only be made by the trustee if the trustee is neither the grantor nor the
beneficiary of the trust, and if the trust has no charitable beneficiary; ((and))

(33) Continue to be a
party to any existing voting trust agreement or enter into any new voting trust
agreement or renew an existing voting trust agreement with respect to any
assets contained in trust; and

(34)(a) Donate a
qualified conservation easement, as defined by section 2031(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code, on any real property, or consent to the donation of a qualified
conservation easement on any real property by a personal representative of an
estate of which the trustee is a devisee, to obtain the benefit of the estate
tax exclusion allowed under section 2031(c) of the Internal Revenue Code or the
deduction allowed under section 2055(f) of the Internal Revenue Code as long
as:

(i)(A) The governing
instrument authorizes the donation of a qualified conservation easement on the
real property; or

(B) Each beneficiary
that may be affected by the qualified conservation easement consents to the
donation under the provisions of chapter 11.96A RCW; and

(ii) The donation of
a qualified conservation easement will not result in the insolvency of the
decedent's estate.

(b) The authority
granted under this subsection includes the authority to amend a previously
donated qualified conservation easement, as defined under section 2031(c)(8)(B)
of the Internal Revenue Code, and to amend a previously donated unqualified
conservation easement for the purpose of making the easement a qualified
conservation easement under section 2031(c)(8)(B).

Sec. 2. RCW 11.96A.030 and 1999
c 42 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Matter"
includes any issue, question, or dispute involving:

(a) The determination
of any class of creditors, devisees, legatees, heirs, next of kin, or other
persons interested in an estate, trust, nonprobate asset, or with respect to
any other asset or property interest passing at death;

(b) The direction of a
personal representative or trustee to do or to abstain from doing any act in a
fiduciary capacity;

(c) The determination
of any question arising in the administration of an estate or trust, or with
respect to any nonprobate asset, or with respect to any other asset or property
interest passing at death, that may include, without limitation, questions
relating to: (i) The construction of wills, trusts, community property
agreements, and other writings; (ii) a change of personal representative or
trustee; (iii) a change of the situs of a trust; (iv) an accounting from a
personal representative or trustee; or (v) the determination of fees for a
personal representative or trustee;

(d) The grant to a
personal representative or trustee of any necessary or desirable power not
otherwise granted in the governing instrument or given by law;

(e) The amendment,
reformation, or conformation of a will or a trust instrument to comply with
statutes and regulations of the United States internal revenue service in order
to achieve qualification for deductions, elections, and other tax requirements,
including the qualification of any gift thereunder for the benefit of a
surviving spouse who is not a citizen of the United States for the estate tax
marital deduction permitted by federal law, including the addition of mandatory
governing instrument requirements for a qualified domestic trust under section
2056A of the internal revenue code, the qualification of any gift thereunder
as a qualified conservation easement as permitted by federal law, or the
qualification of any gift for the charitable estate tax deduction permitted by
federal law, including the addition of mandatory governing instrument
requirements for a charitable remainder trust; and

(f) With respect to any
nonprobate asset, or with respect to any other asset or property interest
passing at death, including joint tenancy property, property subject to a
community property agreement, or assets subject to a pay on death or transfer
on death designation:

(i) The ascertaining of
any class of creditors or others for purposes of chapter 11.18 or 11.42 RCW;

(ii) The ordering of a
qualified person, the notice agent, or resident agent, as those terms are
defined in chapter 11.42 RCW, or any combination of them, to do or abstain from
doing any particular act with respect to a nonprobate asset;

(iii) The ordering of a
custodian of any of the decedent's records relating to a nonprobate asset to do
or abstain from doing any particular act with respect to those records;

(iv) The determination
of any question arising in the administration under chapter 11.18 or 11.42 RCW
of a nonprobate asset;

(v) The determination
of any questions relating to the abatement, rights of creditors, or other
matter relating to the administration, settlement, or final disposition of a
nonprobate asset under this title;

(vi) The resolution of
any matter referencing this chapter, including a determination of any questions
relating to the ownership or distribution of an individual retirement account
on the death of the spouse of the account holder as contemplated by RCW
6.15.020(6);

(vii) The resolution of
any other matter that could affect the nonprobate asset.

(2) "Notice
agent" has the meanings given in RCW 11.42.010.

(3) "Nonprobate
assets" has the meaning given in RCW 11.02.005.

(4) "Party"
or "parties" means each of the following persons who has an interest
in the subject of the particular proceeding and whose name and address are
known to, or are reasonably ascertainable by, the petitioner:

(a) The trustor if
living;

(b) The trustee;

(c) The personal
representative;

(d) An heir;

(e) A beneficiary,
including devisees, legatees, and trust beneficiaries;

(f) The surviving
spouse of a decedent with respect to his or her interest in the decedent's
property;

(g) A guardian ad
litem;

(h) A creditor;

(i) Any other person
who has an interest in the subject of the particular proceeding;

(j) The attorney
general if required under RCW 11.110.120;

(k) Any duly appointed
and acting legal representative of a party such as a guardian, special
representative, or attorney in fact;

(l) Where applicable,
the virtual representative of any person described in this subsection the
giving of notice to whom would meet notice requirements as provided in RCW
11.96A.120;

(m) Any notice agent,
resident agent, or a qualified person, as those terms are defined in chapter
11.42 RCW; and

(n) The owner or the
personal representative of the estate of the deceased owner of the nonprobate
asset that is the subject of the particular proceeding, if the subject of the
particular proceeding relates to the beneficiary's liability to a decedent's
estate or creditors under RCW 11.18.200.

(5) "Persons
interested in the estate or trust" means the trustor, if living, all
persons beneficially interested in the estate or trust, persons holding powers
over the trust or estate assets, the attorney general in the case of any
charitable trust where the attorney general would be a necessary party to
judicial proceedings concerning the trust, and any personal representative or
trustee of the estate or trust.

(6) "Principal
place of administration of the trust" means the trustee's usual place of
business where the day-to-day records pertaining to the trust are kept, or the
trustee's residence if the trustee has no such place of business.

(7) The
"situs" of a trust means the place where the principal place of
administration of the trust is located, unless otherwise provided in the
instrument creating the trust.

(8) "Trustee"
means any acting and qualified trustee of the trust.

(9)
"Representative" and other similar terms refer to a person who
virtually represents another under RCW 11.96A.120.

---
END ---