BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In computing tax,
the purchase price of parts used in the repair and maintenance of commercial
aircraft components may be deducted from the measure of the tax by persons
taxable under RCW 82.04.250(2), if the parts are purchased from another person.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "commercial aircraft" means aircraft used exclusively
for the transport of passengers or cargo for payment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
August 1, 2002.

---
END ---