BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.95.150 and 2001
c 184 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The committee may
establish a college savings program. If such a program is established, the
college savings program shall be established, in such form as may be determined
by the committee, to be a qualified state tuition program as defined by the
internal revenue service under section 529 of the internal revenue code, and
shall be administered in a manner consistent with the Washington advanced
college tuition payment program. The committee, in planning and devising the
program, shall consult with the state investment board, the state treasurer, a
qualified actuarial consulting firm with appropriate expertise to evaluate such
plans, the legislative fiscal and higher education committees, and the
institutions of higher education.

(2) ((Up to two
hundred thousand dollars of administrative fees collected from guaranteed
education tuition program participants may be applied as a loan to fund the
development of a college savings program. This loan must be repaid with
interest before the conclusion of the biennium in which the committee draws
funds for this purpose from the advanced college tuition payment program
account.

(3))) If such a college savings program is established,
the college savings program account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer for the purpose of administering the college savings program. If
created, the account shall be a discrete nontreasury account in the custody of
the state treasurer. Interest earnings shall be retained in accordance with
RCW 43.79A.040. Disbursements from the account, except for program
administration, are exempt from appropriations and the allotment provisions of
chapter 43.88 RCW. Money used for program administration is subject to the
allotment provisions, but without appropriation.

(((4))) (3)
The committee, after consultation with the state investment board, shall
determine the investment policies for the college savings program. Program
contributions may be invested by the state investment board or the committee
may contract with an investment company licensed to conduct business in this
state to do the investing. The committee shall keep or cause to be kept full
and adequate accounts and records of the assets of each individual participant
in the college savings program.

(((5))) (4)
Neither the state nor any eligible educational institution may be considered or
held to be an insurer of the funds or assets of the individual participant
accounts in the college savings program created under this section nor may any
such entity be held liable for any shortage of funds in the event that balances
in the individual participant accounts are insufficient to meet the educational
expenses of the institution chosen by the student for which the individual
participant account was intended.

(((6))) (5)
The committee shall adopt rules to implement this section. Such rules shall
include but not be limited to administration, investment management, promotion,
and marketing; compliance with internal revenue service standards; application
procedures and fees; ((start-up)) development and operating
costs; loans; phasing in the savings program and withdrawals therefrom;
deterrents to early withdrawals and provisions for hardship withdrawals; and
reenrollment in the savings program after withdrawal. At the discretion of
the committee, funds from the advanced college tuition payment program account
may be applied as a loan to fund the development and operation of a college
savings program. Funds borrowed are to be repaid, including interest as
established by the committee, during the time period consistent with the
fiduciary role of the committee.

(((7))) (6)
The committee may, at its discretion, determine to cease operation of the
college savings program if it determines the continuation is not in the best
interest of the state. The committee shall adopt rules to implement this
section addressing the orderly distribution of assets.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---