BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Regional jails may
be created and operated between two or more local governments and may be
governed by representatives from multiple jurisdictions.

(2) The creation and
operation of any regional jail must comply with the interlocal cooperation act
described in chapter 39.34 RCW.

(3)
Nothing in this section prevents counties and cities from contracting for jail
services as described in RCW 70.48.090.

--- END ---