BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.24.550 and 2001 c
283 s 2 and 2001 c 169 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Public agencies are
authorized to release information to the public regarding sex offenders and
kidnapping offenders when the agency determines that disclosure of the
information is relevant and necessary to protect the public and counteract the
danger created by the particular offender. This authorization applies to
information regarding: (a) Any person adjudicated or convicted of a sex
offense as defined in RCW 9A.44.130 or a kidnapping offense as defined by RCW
9A.44.130; (b) any person under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence
review board as the result of a sex offense or kidnapping offense; (c) any
person committed as a sexually violent predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or as a
sexual psychopath under chapter 71.06 RCW; (d) any person found not guilty of a
sex offense or kidnapping offense by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77
RCW; and (e) any person found incompetent to stand trial for a sex offense or
kidnapping offense and subsequently committed under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW.

(2) The extent of the
public disclosure of relevant and necessary information shall be rationally
related to: (a) The level of risk posed by the offender to the community; (b)
the locations where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is regularly
found; and (c) the needs of the affected community members for information to
enhance their individual and collective safety.

(3) Local law
enforcement agencies shall consider the following guidelines in determining the
extent of a public disclosure made under this section: (a) For offenders
classified as risk level I, the agency shall share information with other
appropriate law enforcement agencies and may disclose, upon request, relevant,
necessary, and accurate information to any victim or witness to the offense and
to any individual community member who lives near the residence where the
offender resides, expects to reside, or is regularly found; (b) for offenders
classified as risk level II, the agency may also disclose relevant, necessary,
and accurate information to public and private schools, child day care centers,
family day care providers, businesses and organizations that serve primarily
children, women, or vulnerable adults, and neighbors and community groups near
the residence where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is regularly
found; (c) for offenders classified as risk level III, the agency may also
disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information to the public at large;
and (d) because more localized notification is not feasible and homeless and
transient offenders may present unique risks to the community, the agency may
also disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information to the public at
large for offenders registered as homeless or transient.

(4) The county sheriff
with whom an offender classified as risk level III is registered shall cause to
be published by legal notice, advertising, or news release a sex offender
community notification that conforms to the guidelines established under RCW
4.24.5501 in at least one legal newspaper with general circulation in the area
of the sex offender's registered address or location. The county sheriff shall
also cause to be published consistent with this subsection a current list of
level III registered sex offenders, twice yearly. This list shall be
maintained by the county sheriff on a publicly accessible web site and shall be
updated at least once per month.

(5) The Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall create a web site available to
the public that provides electronic links to county-operated web sites that
offer sex offender registration information.

(6) Local law
enforcement agencies that disseminate information pursuant to this section
shall: (a) Review available risk level classifications made by the department
of corrections, the department of social and health services, and the
indeterminate sentence review board; (b) assign risk level classifications to
all offenders about whom information will be disseminated; and (c) make a good
faith effort to notify the public and residents at least fourteen days before
the offender is released from confinement or, where an offender moves from
another jurisdiction, as soon as possible after the agency learns of the
offender's move, except that in no case may this notification provision be
construed to require an extension of an offender's release date. The juvenile
court shall provide local law enforcement officials with all relevant
information on offenders allowed to remain in the community in a timely manner.

(((6))) (7)
An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or public agency as
defined in RCW 4.24.470 ((is)), or units of local government and its
employees, as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are immune from civil liability
for damages for any discretionary risk level classification decisions or
release of relevant and necessary information, unless it is shown that the
official, employee, or agency acted with gross negligence or in bad faith. The
immunity in this section applies to risk level classification decisions and the
release of relevant and necessary information regarding any individual for whom
disclosure is authorized. The decision of a local law enforcement agency or
official to classify an offender to a risk level other than the one assigned by
the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, or
the indeterminate sentence review board, or the release of any relevant and
necessary information based on that different classification shall not, by
itself, be considered gross negligence or bad faith. The immunity provided
under this section applies to the release of relevant and necessary information
to other public officials, public employees, or public agencies, and to the
general public.

(((7))) (8)
Except as may otherwise be provided by law, nothing in this section shall
impose any liability upon a public official, public employee, or public agency
for failing to release information authorized under this section.

(((8))) (9)
Nothing in this section implies that information regarding persons designated
in subsection (1) of this section is confidential except as may otherwise be provided
by law.

(((9)))
(10) When a local law enforcement agency or official classifies an
offender differently than the offender is classified by the department of
corrections, the department of social and health services, or the indeterminate
sentence review board, the law enforcement agency or official shall notify the
appropriate department or the board and submit its reasons supporting the
change in classification.

--- END ---