BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.56.070 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.070 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Every person
who shall)) (a) A person is guilty of taking a motor vehicle without
permission in the first degree if he or she, without the permission of the
owner or person entitled to possession, intentionally takes or drives away an
automobile or motor vehicle, whether propelled by steam, electricity, or
internal combustion engine, that is the property of another, and he or she:

(i) Alters the motor
vehicle for the purpose of changing its appearance or primary identification,
including obscuring, removing, or changing the manufacturer's serial number or
the vehicle identification number plates;

(ii) Removes, or
participates in the removal of, a part or parts from the motor vehicle;

(iii) Exports, or
attempts to export, the motor vehicle across state lines or out of the United
States for profit;

(iv) Intends to sell
the motor vehicle; or

(v) Is engaged in a
conspiracy and the central object of the conspiratorial agreement is the theft
of motor vehicles for sale to others for profit.

(b) Taking a motor
vehicle without permission in the first degree is a class B felony.

(2)(a) A person is
guilty of taking a motor vehicle without permission in the second degree if he
or she, without the permission of the owner or person entitled to ((the))
possession ((thereof)), intentionally takes or drives
away any automobile or motor vehicle, whether propelled by steam, electricity,
or internal combustion engine, that is the property of another, ((shall
be deemed guilty of a felony, and every person)) or he or she
voluntarily ((riding)) rides in or upon ((said)) the
automobile or motor vehicle with knowledge of the fact that ((the same))
it was unlawfully taken ((shall be equally guilty with the person
taking or driving said automobile or motor vehicle and shall be deemed guilty
of taking a motor vehicle without permission)).

(((2))) (b)
Taking a motor vehicle without permission in the second degree is a
class C felony.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 361, 2001 c 300 s 4, 2001 c 217 s 12, and 2001 c 17 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Sexually
Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070(1))

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity
Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(a))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by
the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Vehicular
Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety
of others (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity
Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(b))

Improperly
Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.070(2))

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 3. RCW 13.40.0357 and 2001
c 217 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION
AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

juvenile juvenile
disposition

disposition category
for attempt,

offense bailjump,
conspiracy,

category description (rcw citation) or
solicitation

........................................

Arson
and Malicious Mischief

A Arson
1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson
2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless
Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless
Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious
Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious
Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious Mischief 3 (<$50 is

E
class) (9A.48.090) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm

Apparatus
(9.40.100) E

A Possession of Incendiary Device

(9.40.120) B+

Assault and Other Crimes

Involving Physical Harm

A Assault
1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault
2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault
3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault
4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By Shooting

(9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless Endangerment

(9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting Suicide Attempt

(9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion
(9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial
Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary
and Trespass

B+ Burglary
1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential Burglary

(9A.52.025) C

B Burglary
2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools (Possession of)

(9A.52.060) E

D Criminal
Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Vehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle
Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption of Alcohol

(66.44.270) E

C Illegally Obtaining Legend Drug

(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery, Possession of
Legend

Drug with Intent to Sell

(69.41.030) D+

E Possession of Legend Drug

(69.41.030) E

B+ Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Narcotic,

Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam

Sale
(69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii)) B+

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Sale

(69.50.401(a)(1)(iii)) C

E Possession of Marihuana <40
grams

(69.50.401(e)) E

C Fraudulently Obtaining Controlled

Substance
(69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of Controlled Substance

for
Profit (69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful
Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Narcotic,

Methamphetamine,
or Flunitrazepam

Counterfeit Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1)
(i) or (ii)) B

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances
Act - Nonnarcotic

Counterfeit Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1)
(iii), (iv), (v)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances
Act - Possession of a

Controlled Substance

(69.50.401(d)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances
Act - Possession of a

Controlled Substance

(69.50.401(c)) C

Firearms
and Weapons

B Theft
of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of Stolen Firearm

(9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded Pistol Without

Permit
(9.41.050) E

C Possession of Firearms by Minor
(<18)

(9.41.040(1)(b)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of Dangerous Weapon

(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating Another Person by use

of
Weapon (9.41.270) E

Homicide

A+ Murder
1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder
2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter
1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter
2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular
Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap
1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap
2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful Imprisonment

(9A.40.040) D+

Obstructing Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a Law Enforcement

Officer
(9A.76.020) E

E Resisting
Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing Contraband 1

(9A.76.140) C

C Introducing Contraband 2

(9A.76.150) D

E Introducing Contraband 3

(9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a Public Servant

(9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a Witness

(9A.72.110) C+

Public Disturbance

C+ Riot
with Weapon (9A.84.010) D+

D+ Riot Without Weapon

(9A.84.010) E

E Failure to Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly
Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape
1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape
2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape
3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape
of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape
of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest
1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest
2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent Exposure

(Victim
<14) (9A.88.010) E

E Indecent
Exposure

(Victim
14 or over) (9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting
Prostitution 1

(9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting Prostitution 2

(9A.88.080) D+

E O
& A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent
Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child
Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child
Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and
Forgery

B Theft
1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft
2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft
3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft
of Livestock (9A.56.080) C

C Forgery
(9A.60.020) D

A Robbery
1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery
2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion
1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion
2 (9A.56.130) D+

C Identity
Theft 1 (9.35.020(2)(a)) D

D Identity
Theft 2 (9.35.020(2)(b)) E

D Improperly
Obtaining Financial

Information
(([(9.35.010)]))

(9.35.010) E

B Possession of Stolen Property 1

(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of Stolen Property 2

(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of Stolen Property 3

(9A.56.170) E

C Taking Motor Vehicle Without

((Owner's)) Permission 1
and 2

(9A.56.070
(1) and (2)) D

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E Driving Without a License

(46.20.005) E

B+ Hit
and Run - Death

(46.52.020(4)(a)) C+

C Hit and Run - Injury

(46.52.020(4)(b)) D

D Hit and Run-Attended

(46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and Run-Unattended

(46.52.010) E

C Vehicular
Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to Elude Pursuing

Police
Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless
Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While Under the Influence

(46.61.502
and 46.61.504) E

Other

B Bomb
Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape
11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape
21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape
3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene,
Harassing, Etc.,

Phone
Calls (9.61.230) E

A Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class A Felony B+

B Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class B Felony C

C Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class C Felony D

D Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Gross Misdemeanor E

E Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Misdemeanor E

V Violation
of Order of Restitution,

Community
Supervision, or

Confinement
(13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C
offenses and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted
escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks confinement

2nd escape or attempted
escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement

3rd and subsequent
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks confinement

2If
the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order, it may impose
a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE
SENTENCING STANDARDS

This
schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may select sentencing
option A, B, or C.

OPTION
A

JUVENILE
OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID

STANDARD
RANGE

A+ 180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS|WEEKS

EXCEPT | | |

30-40 | | |

WEEKS FOR | | |

15-17 | | |

YEAR OLDS | | |

Current B+ 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

Offense WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL | |52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) |15-36 WEEKS |WEEKS

C+ LS |

|15-36 WEEKS

C LS |15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions: |

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Service

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4 or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE: References in the
grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement.

(1) The vertical axis
of the grid is the current offense category. The current offense category is
determined by the offense of adjudication.

(2) The horizontal axis
of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included in the juvenile's
criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count as one point.
Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall
count as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.

(3) The standard range
disposition for each offense is determined by the intersection of the column
defined by the prior adjudications and the row defined by the current offense
category.

(4) RCW 13.40.180
applies if the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense.

(5) A current offense
that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of E. However, a
disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.

OR

OPTION
B

CHEMICAL
DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile
offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local sanctions or 15 to
36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+ offense, the court
may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION
C

MANIFEST
INJUSTICE

If the court determines that a disposition under option A or B
would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a disposition
outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).

---
END ---