BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 7.68.015 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 5 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of labor
and industries shall operate the crime victims' compensation program within the
(1) appropriations and the conditions and limitations on the
appropriations provided for this program; and (2) funds available under RCW
7.68.090.

Sec. 2. RCW 7.68.030 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 5 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the duty of
the director to establish and administer a program of benefits to innocent
victims of criminal acts within the terms and limitations of this chapter. In
so doing, the director shall, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, adopt rules
((and regulations)) necessary to the administration of this chapter, and
the provisions contained in chapter 51.04 RCW, including but not limited to RCW
51.04.020, 51.04.030, 51.04.040, 51.04.050 and 51.04.100 ((as now or
hereafter amended,)) shall apply where appropriate in keeping with the
intent of this chapter. ((The director may apply for and, subject to
appropriation, expend federal funds under Public Law 98-473 and any other
federal program providing financial assistance to state crime victim compensation
programs. The federal funds shall be deposited in the public safety and
education account in the general fund and may be expended only for purposes
authorized by applicable federal law.))

Sec. 3. RCW 7.68.050 and 1998 c
91 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No right of action
at law for damages incurred as a consequence of a criminal act shall be lost as
a consequence of being entitled to benefits under the provisions of this
chapter. The victim or his or her beneficiary may elect to seek damages
from the person or persons liable for the claimed injury or death, and such
victim or beneficiary is entitled to the full compensation and benefits
provided by this chapter regardless of any election or recovery made pursuant
to this section.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, the rights, privileges, responsibilities, duties, limitations,
and procedures contained in RCW 51.24.050 through 51.24.110 apply.

(3) ((If the
recovery involved is against the state, the lien of the department includes the
interest on the benefits paid by the department to or on behalf of such person
under this chapter computed at the rate of eight percent per annum from the
date of payment.

(4))) The 1980 amendments to this section apply only
to injuries which occur on or after April 1, 1980.

Sec. 4. RCW 7.68.090 and 1995 c
234 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director
shall establish such fund or funds, separate from existing funds, necessary to
administer this chapter((, and payment to these funds shall be from
legislative appropriation, statutory provision, reimbursement and subrogation
as provided in this chapter, and from any contributions or grants specifically
so directed)).

(2) A crime victims'
compensation trust account is created in the custody of the state treasury.
Such subaccounts as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter are
permitted to be established within the account. The purpose of the account is
to allow the state to use all local, federal, and other funds that become
available to fund crime victims' benefits. Moneys in the account may only be
used to fund crime victims' benefits and administrative costs of the program
administered by the department of labor and industries. Only the director or
the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(a) The department
is authorized to apply for funds from, and to submit all necessary forms to,
any federal agency participating in a cooperative program to compensate victims
of crime.

(b) The moneys
placed in this account for victims of crime under this chapter shall consist of
moneys recovered on behalf of the department by subrogation or other action,
recovered on behalf of the department through restitution, received from grants
or federal funds given to the department for benefits of victims, appropriated
from the public safety and education account or other sources, from sources
within the department of corrections, from any grants or contributions from any
public or private sources, from transfers from other state funds or accounts,
or from any other lawful source. All interest earned on moneys deposited in
the account shall remain in the account and may be used for any eligible
purpose.

(c) In the event of
funding shortfalls, the department shall utilize the following priorities in
reducing expenditures:

(i) Implement any
conditions and limitations of the appropriation that pertain to cost savings in
the crime victims' compensation program, as long as those conditions and limitations
are not in conflict with other statutes; and

(ii)
Withhold crime victims' payment, in the following priority order: Providers,
permanent impairment awards, pension benefits, and time loss compensation. The
amount of withholding shall be a percent reduction as determined by the
department. The percent reduction applies to the net payment due. The
department shall give at least thirty days' written notice to affected parties
prior to implementation of the withholding. The department shall seek supplemental
funding for any payments withheld. If funds are approved, any withheld
payments shall be paid to the affected parties in a lump sum without interest.

Sec. 5. RCW 72.09.095 and 1995 c
234 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Each year the
department shall transfer twenty-five percent of the total annual revenues and
receipts received in each institutional betterment fund subaccount to the
department of labor and industries crime victims' compensation trust account
for the purpose of providing direct benefits to crime victims through the crime
victims' compensation program as outlined in chapter 7.68 RCW. This transfer
takes priority over any expenditure of betterment funds and shall be reflected
on the monthly financial statements of each institution's betterment fund
subaccount.

Any funds so
transferred to the department of labor and industries shall be in addition to
the crime victims' compensation amount provided in an omnibus appropriation
bill. It is the intent of the legislature that the funds forecasted or
transferred pursuant to this section shall not reduce the funding levels
provided by appropriation.

Sec. 6. RCW 72.09.110 and 1993
sp.s. c 20 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

All inmates working in
prison industries shall participate in the cost of corrections, including costs
to develop and implement correctional industries programs, by means of
deductions from their gross wages. The secretary may direct the state
treasurer to deposit a portion of these moneys ((in the crime victims
compensation account)) into the crime victims' compensation trust
account for the purpose of providing direct benefits to crime victims through
the crime victims' compensation program under chapter 7.68 RCW. The
secretary shall direct that all moneys received by an inmate for testifying in
any judicial proceeding shall be ((deposited into the crime victims
compensation account)) transferred to the crime victims' compensation
trust account for the purpose of providing direct benefits to crime victims
through the crime victims' compensation program under chapter 7.68 RCW.

When the
secretary finds it appropriate and not unduly destructive of the work incentive,
the secretary may also provide deductions for savings and family support.

Sec. 7. RCW 72.09.111 and 1999 c
325 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall
deduct from the gross wages or gratuities of each inmate working in
correctional industries work programs, taxes and legal financial obligations.
The secretary shall develop a formula for the distribution of offender wages
and gratuities.

(a) The formula shall
include the following minimum deductions from class I gross wages and from all
others earning at least minimum wage:

(i) Five percent to the
((public safety and education)) crime victims' compensation trust
account for the purpose of crime victims' compensation;

(ii) Ten percent to a department
personal inmate savings account; and

(iii) Twenty percent to
the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration.

(b) The formula shall
include the following minimum deductions from class II gross gratuities:

(i) Five percent to the
((public safety and education)) crime victims' compensation trust
account for the purpose of crime victims' compensation;

(ii) Ten percent to a
department personal inmate savings account; and

(iii) Fifteen percent
to the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration.

(c) The formula shall
include the following minimum deduction from class IV gross gratuities: Five
percent to the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration.

(d) The formula shall
include the following minimum deductions from class III gratuities: Five
percent to the crime victims' compensation trust account for the purpose
of crime victims' compensation.

Any person sentenced to
life imprisonment without possibility of release or parole under chapter 10.95
RCW or sentenced to death shall be exempt from the requirement under (a)(ii) or
(b)(ii) of this subsection.

The department personal
inmate savings account, together with any accrued interest, shall only be
available to an inmate at the time of his or her release from confinement,
unless the secretary determines that an emergency exists for the inmate, at
which time the funds can be made available to the inmate in an amount
determined by the secretary. The management of classes I, II, and IV
correctional industries may establish an incentive payment for offender workers
based on productivity criteria. This incentive shall be paid separately from
the hourly wage/gratuity rate and shall not be subject to the specified
deduction for cost of incarceration.

In the event that the
offender worker's wages or gratuity is subject to garnishment for support
enforcement, the crime victims' compensation, savings, and cost of
incarceration deductions shall be calculated on the net wages after taxes,
legal financial obligations, and garnishment.

(2) The department
shall explore other methods of recovering a portion of the cost of the inmate's
incarceration and for encouraging participation in work programs, including
development of incentive programs that offer inmates benefits and amenities
paid for only from wages earned while working in a correctional industries work
program.

(3) The department
shall develop the necessary administrative structure to recover inmates' wages
and keep records of the amount inmates pay for the costs of incarceration and
amenities. All funds deducted from inmate wages under subsection (1) of this
section for the purpose of contributions to the cost of incarceration shall be
deposited in a dedicated fund with the department and shall be used only for the
purpose of enhancing and maintaining correctional industries work programs.

(4) The expansion of
inmate employment in class I and class II correctional industries shall be
implemented according to the following schedule:

(a) Not later than June
30, 1995, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least two hundred in
the number of inmates employed in class I or class II correctional industries
work programs above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;

(b) Not later than June
30, 1996, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least four hundred
in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II correctional
industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;

(c) Not later than June
30, 1997, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least six hundred in
the number of inmates employed in class I or class II correctional industries
work programs above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;

(d) Not later than June
30, 1998, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least nine hundred
in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II correctional
industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;

(e) Not later than June
30, 1999, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least one thousand
two hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II
correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30,
1994;

(f) Not later than June
30, 2000, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least one thousand
five hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II
correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30,
1994.

(5) It shall be in the
discretion of the secretary to apportion the inmates between class I and class
II depending on available contracts and resources.

Sec. 8. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2001
c 201 s 4 and 2001 c 184 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Money in the
treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state
treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same
extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2) All income received
from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set aside in an account
in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.

(3) The investment
income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on
behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected
state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial
institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a) Monthly, the
state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the investment income
account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The
college savings program account, the Washington advanced college tuition
payment program account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian
scholarship endowment fund, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve
account, the crime victims' compensation trust account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the game
farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium
and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the
self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the
children's trust fund. However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(c) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the advanced environmental
mitigation revolving account, the city and county advance right-of-way
revolving fund, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high
occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---