BE IT ENACTED
BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of the
legislature to encourage cooperation between and among public agencies to
stimulate economic development. The joint investment of funds by these
agencies in public infrastructure of local and regional significance can induce
private investment and stimulate economic activity that will produce tax
revenues to these agencies. It is not necessary for a public agency to be authorized
to perform a particular governmental service, activity, or undertaking for it
to benefit from its public infrastructure funding of the service, activity, or
undertaking performed by another public agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added
to chapter 39.34 RCW to read as follows:

Any one or more public agencies may contract
with any one or more other public agencies for the performance of a government
service, activity, or undertaking involving public infrastructure of local and
regional significance that the contracting party which is to perform the
service, activity, or undertaking is authorized by law to perform, as long as
the contract is in writing and approved by the governing body of each party.
The contract must (1) contain a finding that any public agency contributing
funds pursuant to the public infrastructure contract, but not authorized to
perform the undertaking itself, is reasonably likely to recover its investment
through the collection of taxes resulting from the economic activity expected
to occur from the public investment; and (2) set forth fully the purposes,
powers, rights, objectives, and responsibilities of the contracting parties.

--- END ---