BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to improve the safety of law enforcement officers and the public by providing
consistent education and training for officers in the matter of vehicle
pursuit. The legislature recognizes there are a multitude of factors which
enter into the determination of pursuit and intends that the criminal justice
training commission be given the responsibility of identifying those factors
and developing appropriate standards for training of law enforcement officers
in this area.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By December 1,
2002, the Washington state criminal justice training commission, the Washington
state patrol, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and
organizations representing state and local law enforcement officers shall
develop a written model policy on vehicular pursuits.

(2) The model policy
must meet all of the following minimum standards:

(a) Provide for
supervisory control, if available, of the pursuit;

(b) Provide procedures
for designating the primary pursuit vehicle and for determining the total
number of vehicles to be permitted to participate at one time in the pursuit;

(c) Provide procedures
for coordinating operations with other jurisdictions; and

(d) Provide guidelines
for determining when the interests of public safety and effective law
enforcement justify a vehicular pursuit and when a vehicular pursuit should not
be initiated or should be terminated.

(3) By June 1, 2003,
every state, county, and municipal law enforcement agency shall adopt and
implement a written vehicular pursuit policy. The policy adopted may, but need
not, be the model policy developed under subsections (1) and (2) of this
section. However, any policy adopted must address the minimum requirements
specified in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By June 30, 2005,
every full-time law enforcement officer employed by a state, county, or
municipal law enforcement agency shall have been trained on vehicular
pursuits. Every new full-time law enforcement officer employed by a state,
county, or municipal law enforcement agency after June 30, 2005, also shall be
trained, within six months of employment, on vehicular pursuits.

(2)
Nothing in this act requires training on vehicular pursuit of any law
enforcement officer who is employed in a state, county, or city law enforcement
agency on the effective date of this act beyond that which he or she has
received prior to the effective date of this act.

---
END ---