BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.44.093 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 357 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of sexual misconduct with a minor in the first degree when: (a) The person
has, or knowingly causes another person under the age of eighteen to have,
sexual intercourse with another person who is at least sixteen years old but
less than eighteen years old and not married to the perpetrator, if the
perpetrator is at least sixty months older than the victim, is in a significant
relationship to the victim, and abuses a supervisory position within that
relationship in order to engage in or cause another person under the age of
eighteen to engage in sexual intercourse with the victim; or (b) the person is
a school employee who has, or knowingly causes another person under the age of
eighteen to have, sexual intercourse with a registered student of the school
who is at least sixteen years old but less than eighteen years old and
not married to the employee, if the employee is at least sixty months older
than the student.

(2) Sexual misconduct
with a minor in the first degree is a class C felony.

(3) For the purposes of
this section, "school employee" means an employee of a common school
defined in RCW 28A.150.020, or a grade kindergarten through twelve employee of
a private school under chapter 28A.195 RCW, who is not enrolled as a student of
the common school or private school.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.44.096 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 358 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree when: (a) The person
has, or knowingly causes another person under the age of eighteen to have,
sexual contact with another person who is at least sixteen years old but less
than eighteen years old and not married to the perpetrator, if the perpetrator
is at least sixty months older than the victim, is in a significant
relationship to the victim, and abuses a supervisory position within that
relationship in order to engage in or cause another person under the age of
eighteen to engage in sexual contact with the victim; or (b) the person is a
school employee who has, or knowingly causes another person under the age of
eighteen to have, sexual contact with a registered student of the school who is
at least sixteen years old but less than eighteen years old and not
married to the employee, if the employee is at least sixty months older than
the student.

(2) Sexual misconduct
with a minor in the second degree is a gross misdemeanor.

(3) For
the purposes of this section, "school employee" means an employee of
a common school defined in RCW 28A.150.020, or a grade kindergarten through
twelve employee of a private school under chapter 28A.195 RCW, who is not
enrolled as a student of the common school or private school.

---
END ---