BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that the Enabling Act for the state of Washington requires that the state
Constitution not be repugnant to the principles of the Declaration of
Independence.

(2) The Declaration of
Independence declares the self-evident truth that all men are created. The
Declaration of Independence also declares that our rights are endowed by the
Creator, and that governments are instituted among men to secure these
God-given rights.

(3) The Preamble to the
Washington state Constitution also acknowledges the Supreme Ruler of the
Universe as the grantor of our liberties.

(4) Article I, section
1 of the Washington state Constitution also declares that governments are
established to protect and maintain individual rights, which rights are already
acknowledged in the preamble as being granted by the Creator.

(5) RCW 28A.405.030
requires all teachers to teach the principles of truth and to instruct their
pupils in the principles of free government in the common schools of the state
of Washington. The self-evident truth that all men were created and endowed by
their Creator with unalienable rights and that governments are accountable both
to the Creator and the people to secure those rights is the foundation of all
political, civil, and religious liberty in America.

(6) Both the United
States Constitution and the Washington state Constitution were instituted to
protect rights endowed by the Creator.

(7) All state
legislators in the state of Washington swear an oath to uphold the
Constitutions of the United States and the state of Washington.

(8) The legislature
finds that the teaching of the theory of evolution in the common schools of the
state of Washington is repugnant to the principles of the Declaration of
Independence and thereby unconstitutional and unlawful.

(9) All
textbooks and curriculum that teach the theory of evolution shall be removed
from the public schools forthwith and replaced with textbooks and curriculum
that teach the self-evident truth of creation.

--- END ---