BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 13.40.040 and 1999 c
167 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A juvenile may be
taken into custody:

(a) Pursuant to a court
order if a complaint is filed with the court alleging, and the court finds
probable cause to believe, that the juvenile has committed an offense or has
violated terms of a disposition order or release order; or

(b) Without a court
order, by a law enforcement officer if grounds exist for the arrest of an adult
in identical circumstances. Admission to, and continued custody in, a court detention
facility shall be governed by subsection (2) of this section; or

(c) Pursuant to a court
order that the juvenile be held as a material witness; or

(d) Where the secretary
or the secretary's designee has suspended the parole of a juvenile offender.

(2) A juvenile may not
be held in detention unless there is probable cause to believe that:

(a) The juvenile has
committed an offense or has violated the terms of a disposition order; and

(i) The juvenile will
likely fail to appear for further proceedings; or

(ii) Detention is
required to protect the juvenile from himself or herself; or

(iii) The juvenile is a
threat to community safety; or

(iv) The juvenile will
intimidate witnesses or otherwise unlawfully interfere with the administration
of justice; or

(v) The juvenile has
committed a crime while another case was pending; or

(b) The juvenile is a
fugitive from justice; or

(c) The juvenile's
parole has been suspended or modified; or

(d) The juvenile is a
material witness.

(3) Notwithstanding
subsection (2) of this section, a juvenile who has been found guilty of one of
the following offenses shall be detained pending disposition: Rape in the
first or second degree (RCW 9A.44.040 and 9A.44.050); rape of a child in the
first, second, or third degree (RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, and 9A.44.079); child
molestation in the first, second, or third degree (RCW 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086,
and 9A.44.089); sexual misconduct with a minor in the first or second degree
(RCW 9A.44.093 and 9A.44.096); indecent liberties (RCW 9A.44.100); incest (RCW
9A.64.020); luring (RCW 9A.40.090); any class A or B felony that is a sexually
motivated offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; a felony violation of RCW
9.68A.090; or any offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
solicitation, or conspiracy to commit one of those offenses.

(4) Upon a
finding that members of the community have threatened the health of a juvenile
taken into custody, at the juvenile's request the court may order continued
detention pending further order of the court.

(((4))) (5)
Except as provided in RCW 9.41.280, a juvenile detained under this section may
be released upon posting a probation bond set by the court. The juvenile's
parent or guardian may sign for the probation bond. A court authorizing such a
release shall issue an order containing a statement of conditions imposed upon
the juvenile and shall set the date of his or her next court appearance. The
court shall advise the juvenile of any conditions specified in the order and
may at any time amend such an order in order to impose additional or different
conditions of release upon the juvenile or to return the juvenile to custody
for failing to conform to the conditions imposed. In addition to requiring the
juvenile to appear at the next court date, the court may condition the
probation bond on the juvenile's compliance with conditions of release. The
juvenile's parent or guardian may notify the court that the juvenile has failed
to conform to the conditions of release or the provisions in the probation
bond. If the parent notifies the court of the juvenile's failure to comply
with the probation bond, the court shall notify the surety. As provided in the
terms of the bond, the surety shall provide notice to the court of the
offender's noncompliance. A juvenile may be released only to a responsible
adult or the department of social and health services. Failure to appear on
the date scheduled by the court pursuant to this section shall constitute the
crime of bail jumping.

Sec. 2. RCW 13.40.210 and 2001 c
137 s 2 and 2001 c 51 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The
secretary shall set a release date for each juvenile committed to its custody.
The release date shall be within the prescribed range to which a juvenile has
been committed under RCW 13.40.0357 or 13.40.030 except as provided in RCW
13.40.320 concerning offenders the department determines are eligible for the
juvenile offender basic training camp program. Such dates shall be determined
prior to the expiration of sixty percent of a juvenile's minimum term of
confinement included within the prescribed range to which the juvenile has been
committed. The secretary shall release any juvenile committed to the custody
of the department within four calendar days prior to the juvenile's release
date or on the release date set under this chapter. Days spent in the custody
of the department shall be tolled by any period of time during which a juvenile
has absented himself or herself from the department's supervision without the
prior approval of the secretary or the secretary's designee.

(b) For any juvenile
found guilty of a felony sex offense, the juvenile rehabilitation
administration shall approve the offender's residence and may not approve a
residence location if the proposed residence: (i) Includes a minor victim or
child of similar age or circumstance as a previous victim who the department
determines may be put at substantial risk of harm by the offender's residence
in the household; or (ii) is within close proximity of the current residence of
a victim, unless the whereabouts of the victim cannot be determined or unless
such a restriction would impede family reunification efforts ordered by the
court or directed by the department.

(c) Out-of-home
placements made pursuant to this subsection are not subject to the provisions
of chapter 26.44 RCW, unless the child otherwise meets the criteria of chapter
26.44 RCW.

(2) The secretary shall
monitor the average daily population of the state's juvenile residential
facilities. When the secretary concludes that in-residence population of
residential facilities exceeds one hundred five percent of the rated bed
capacity specified in statute, or in absence of such specification, as
specified by the department in rule, the secretary may recommend reductions to
the governor. On certification by the governor that the recommended reductions
are necessary, the secretary has authority to administratively release a sufficient
number of offenders to reduce in-residence population to one hundred percent of
rated bed capacity. The secretary shall release those offenders who have
served the greatest proportion of their sentence. However, the secretary may
deny release in a particular case at the request of an offender, or if the
secretary finds that there is no responsible custodian, as determined by the
department, to whom to release the offender, or if the release of the offender
would pose a clear danger to society. The department shall notify the
committing court of the release at the time of release if any such early
releases have occurred as a result of excessive in-residence population. In no
event shall an offender adjudicated of a violent offense be granted release
under the provisions of this subsection.

(3)(a) Following the
release of any juvenile under subsection (1) of this section, the secretary may
require the juvenile to comply with a program of parole to be administered by
the department in his or her community which shall last no longer than eighteen
months, except that in the case of a juvenile sentenced for rape in the first
or second degree, rape of a child in the first or second degree, child
molestation in the first degree, or indecent liberties with forcible
compulsion, the period of parole shall be twenty-four months and, in the
discretion of the secretary, may be up to thirty-six months when the secretary
finds that an additional period of parole is necessary and appropriate in the
interests of public safety or to meet the ongoing needs of the juvenile. A
parole program is mandatory for offenders released under subsection (2) of this
section. The decision to place an offender on parole shall be based on an
assessment by the department of the offender's risk for reoffending upon
release. The department shall prioritize available parole resources to provide
supervision and services to offenders at moderate to high risk for reoffending.

(b) The secretary
shall, for the period of parole, facilitate the juvenile's reintegration into
his or her community and to further this goal shall require the juvenile to
refrain from possessing a firearm or using a deadly weapon and refrain from
committing new offenses and may require the juvenile to: (i) Undergo available
medical, psychiatric, drug and alcohol, sex offender, mental health, and other
offense-related treatment services; (ii) report as directed to a parole officer
and/or designee; (iii) pursue a course of study, vocational training, or
employment; (iv) notify the parole officer of the current address where he or
she resides; (v) be present at a particular address during specified hours;
(vi) remain within prescribed geographical boundaries; (vii) submit to
electronic monitoring; (viii) refrain from using illegal drugs and alcohol, and
submit to random urinalysis when requested by the assigned parole officer; (ix)
refrain from contact with specific individuals or a specified class of
individuals; (x) meet other conditions determined by the parole officer to
further enhance the juvenile's reintegration into the community; (xi) pay any
court-ordered fines or restitution; and (xii) perform community service.
Community service for the purpose of this section means compulsory service,
without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender. Community service may be performed through public or private
organizations or through work crews.

(c) The secretary may
further require up to twenty-five percent of the highest risk juvenile offenders
who are placed on parole to participate in an intensive supervision program.
Offenders participating in an intensive supervision program shall be required
to comply with all terms and conditions listed in (b) of this subsection and
shall also be required to comply with the following additional terms and
conditions: (i) Obey all laws and refrain from any conduct that threatens
public safety; (ii) report at least once a week to an assigned community case
manager; and (iii) meet all other requirements imposed by the community case
manager related to participating in the intensive supervision program. As a
part of the intensive supervision program, the secretary may require day
reporting.

(d) After termination
of the parole period, the juvenile shall be discharged from the department's
supervision.

(4)(a) The department
may also modify parole for violation thereof. If, after affording a juvenile
all of the due process rights to which he or she would be entitled if the
juvenile were an adult, the secretary finds that a juvenile has violated a
condition of his or her parole, the secretary shall order one of the following
which is reasonably likely to effectuate the purpose of the parole and to
protect the public: (i) Continued supervision under the same conditions
previously imposed; (ii) intensified supervision with increased reporting
requirements; (iii) additional conditions of supervision authorized by this
chapter; (iv) except as provided in (a)(v) and (vi) of this subsection,
imposition of a period of confinement not to exceed thirty days in a facility
operated by or pursuant to a contract with the state of Washington or any city
or county for a portion of each day or for a certain number of days each week
with the balance of the days or weeks spent under supervision; (v) the
secretary may order any of the conditions or may return the offender to
confinement for the remainder of the sentence range if the offense for which
the offender was sentenced is rape in the first or second degree, rape of a child
in the first or second degree, child molestation in the first degree, indecent
liberties with forcible compulsion, or a sex offense that is also a serious
violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030; and (vi) the secretary may order
any of the conditions or may return the offender to confinement for the
remainder of the sentence range if the youth has completed the basic training
camp program as described in RCW 13.40.320.

(b) If the department
finds that any juvenile in a program of parole has possessed a firearm or used
a deadly weapon during the program of parole, the department shall modify the
parole under (a) of this subsection and confine the juvenile for at least
thirty days. Confinement shall be in a facility operated by or pursuant to a
contract with the state or any county.

(5) A parole officer of
the department of social and health services shall have the power to arrest a
juvenile under his or her supervision on the same grounds as a law enforcement
officer would be authorized to arrest the person.

(6) If so requested and
approved under chapter 13.06 RCW, the secretary shall permit a county or group
of counties to perform functions under subsections (3) through (5) of this
section.

Sec. 3. RCW 72.09.340 and 1996 c
215 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In making all
discretionary decisions regarding release plans for and supervision of sex
offenders, the department shall set priorities and make decisions based on an
assessment of public safety risks.

(2) The department
shall, no later than September 1, 1996, implement a policy governing the
department's evaluation and approval of release plans for sex offenders. The
policy shall include, at a minimum, a formal process by which victims,
witnesses, and other interested people may provide information and comments to
the department on potential safety risks to specific individuals or classes of
individuals posed by a specific sex offender. The department shall make all
reasonable efforts to publicize the availability of this process through
currently existing mechanisms and shall seek the assistance of courts,
prosecutors, law enforcement, and victims' advocacy groups in doing so. Notice
of an offender's proposed residence shall be provided to all people registered
to receive notice of an offender's release under RCW 9.94A.612(2), except that
in no case may this notification requirement be construed to require an
extension of an offender's release date.

(3) For any offender
convicted of a felony sex offense against a minor victim after June 6, 1996, or
a victim of any age on or after the effective date of this act, the
department shall not approve a residence location if the proposed residence:
(a) Includes a minor victim or child of similar age or circumstance as a
previous victim who the department determines may be put at substantial risk of
harm by the offender's residence in the household; or (b) is within close
proximity of the current residence of a ((minor)) victim, unless the
whereabouts of the ((minor)) victim cannot be determined or unless such
a restriction would impede family reunification efforts ordered by the court or
directed by the department of social and health services. The department is
further authorized to reject a residence location if the proposed residence is
within close proximity to schools, child care centers, playgrounds, or other
grounds or facilities where children of similar age or circumstance as a
previous victim are present who the department determines may be put at substantial
risk of harm by the sex offender's residence at that location.

(4) When the department
requires supervised visitation as a term or condition of a sex offender's
community placement under RCW 9.94A.700(6), the department shall, prior to
approving a supervisor, consider the following: (a) The relationships between
the proposed supervisor, the offender, and the minor; (b) the proposed
supervisor's acknowledgment and understanding of the offender's prior criminal
conduct, general knowledge of the dynamics of child sexual abuse, and
willingness and ability to protect the minor from the potential risks posed by
contact with the offender; and (c) recommendations made by the department of
social and health services about the best interests of the child.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

When more than four sex
offenders subject to level two or level three community notification live in
the same building or within the same city block and are under the supervision
of the department for terms of community custody, community placement, or community
supervision, the secretary shall, upon a request from the community or from law
enforcement, meet with the community.

The secretary shall
provide community education and technical assistance to the community in
establishing an appropriate neighborhood watch program. Such a meeting should
reinforce the policies underlying the community notification program
established in RCW 4.24.550 and shall emphasize that no neighborhood watch
program may be used to harass or intimidate any person.

The
department shall, to the extent possible, incorporate the features of other
successful neighborhood watch programs into its technical assistance.

---
END ---