BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.14.390 and 1999 c
165 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (6) of this section, the governing body of a public facilities
district created under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that commences construction
of a new regional center, or improvement or rehabilitation of an existing new
regional center, before January 1, 2003, may submit an authorizing
proposition to the voters, and if the proposition is approved by a majority of
persons voting, fix and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the
terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law
and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within
the public facilities district. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.033 percent
of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in
the case of a use tax.

(2) The tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the amount of tax
otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue
under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the
collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public
facilities district.

(3) No tax may be
collected under this section before August 1, 2000. The tax imposed in this
section shall expire when the bonds issued for the construction of the regional
center and related parking facilities are retired, but not more than
twenty-five years after the tax is first collected.

(4) Moneys collected
under this section shall only be used for the purposes set forth in RCW
35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount from other public or private
sources equal to thirty-three percent of the amount collected under this
section, provided that amounts generated from nonvoter approved taxes
authorized under chapter 35.57 RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under
chapter 36.100 RCW shall not constitute a public or private source. For the
purpose of this section, public or private sources includes, but is not limited
to cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development or
improvement of the regional center, land that is donated and used for the
siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind contributions from public or
private foundations, or amounts attributed to private sector partners as part
of a public and private partnership agreement negotiated by the public
facilities district.

(5) The combined total
tax levied under this section shall not be greater than 0.033 percent. If both
a public facilities district created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public
facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under this
section, the tax imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter
35.57 RCW shall be credited against the tax imposed by a public facilities
district created under chapter 36.100 RCW.

(6) A public facilities
district created under chapter 36.100 RCW is not eligible to impose the tax
under this section if the legislative authority of the county where the public
facilities district is located has imposed a sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

(7) The
voting requirement under subsection (1) of this section only applies to sales
and use taxes to be imposed on or after the effective date of this act.

--- END ---