BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

The history, economy,
culture, and the future of Washington state to a large degree all involve
agriculture. In order to develop and promote Washington's agricultural
products as part of the existing comprehensive scheme to regulate agricultural
commodities, the legislature declares:

(1) That the marketing of agricultural
products within this state is in the public interest. It is vital to the
continued economic well-being of the citizens of this state and their general
welfare that its agricultural commodities be properly promoted by (a) enabling
producers of agricultural commodities to help themselves in establishing
orderly, fair, sound, efficient, and unhampered marketing and grading, and
standardizing of the commodities they produce; and (b) working towards
stabilizing the agricultural industry by increasing consumption of agricultural
commodities within the state, nation, and internationally;

(2) That farmers and ranchers operate within
a regulatory environment that imposes burdens on them. Those restrictions
impair the agricultural producer's ability to compete in local, domestic, and
foreign markets;

(3) That it is now in the overriding public
interest that support for the agricultural industry be clearly expressed, that
adequate protection be given to agricultural commodities, uses, activities, and
operations, and that each agricultural commodity be promoted individually, and
as part of a comprehensive industry to:

(a) Enhance the reputation and image of
Washington state's agricultural commodities and producers;

(b) Increase the sale and use of Washington
state's agricultural commodities in local, domestic, and foreign markets;

(c) Protect the public by educating the
public in reference to the quality, care, and methods used in the production of
Washington state's agricultural commodities;

(d) Increase the knowledge of the
health-giving qualities and the nutritional and dietetic value of Washington
state's agricultural commodities and products; and

(e) Support and engage in programs or
activities that benefit the planting, production, harvesting, handling,
processing, transportation, marketing, and uses of agricultural commodities
produced in Washington state;

(4) That the director seek to enhance,
protect, and perpetuate the ability of the private sector to produce food and
fiber, and seek to maintain the economic well-being of the agricultural
industry in Washington state consistent with its regulatory activities and
responsibilities;

(5) That the director is hereby authorized to
implement, administer, and enforce this chapter through the establishment of
commodity commissions; and

(6) That this chapter is enacted in the
exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of protecting the
health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

Sec. 2. RCW 15.66.010 and 1993 c
80 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter:

(1)
"Director" means the director of agriculture of the state of
Washington or any qualified person or persons designated by the director of
agriculture to act for him or her concerning some matter under this
chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of agriculture of the state of
Washington.

(3) "Marketing
order" means an order ((issued)) adopted by rule by the
director that establishes a commodity commission for an agricultural
commodity pursuant to this chapter.

(4) "Agricultural
commodity" means any of the following commodities or products: Llamas,
alpacas, or any other animal or any distinctive type of agricultural, horticultural,
viticultural, vegetable, and/or animal product, including, but not limited to,
products qualifying as organic food products under chapter 15.86 RCW and
private sector cultured aquatic products as defined in RCW 15.85.020 and other
fish and fish products, within its natural or processed state, including beehives
containing bees and honey and Christmas trees but not including timber or
timber products. The director is authorized to determine what kinds, types or
subtypes should be classed together as an agricultural commodity for the
purposes of this chapter.

(5)
"Producer" means any person engaged in the business of producing or
causing to be produced for market in commercial quantities any agricultural
commodity. "To produce" means to act as a producer. For the
purposes of ((RCW 15.66.060, 15.66.090, and 15.66.120, as now or hereafter
amended)) this chapter, "producer" shall include bailees
who contract to produce or grow any agricultural product on behalf of a bailor
who retains title to the seed and its resulting agricultural product or the
agricultural product delivered for further production or increase.

(6) "Affected
producer" means any producer ((of an affected commodity)) who is
subject to a marketing order.

(7) "Affected
commodity" means ((any agricultural commodity for which the director
has established a list of producers pursuant to RCW 15.66.060)) the
agricultural commodity that is specified in the marketing order.

(8) "Commodity
commission" or "commission" means a commission formed to carry
out the purposes of this chapter under a particular marketing order concerning
an affected commodity.

(9) "Unit"
means a unit of volume, quantity or other measure in which an agricultural
commodity is commonly measured.

(10) "Unfair trade
practice" means any practice which is unlawful or prohibited under the
laws of the state of Washington including but not limited to Titles 15, 16 and
69 RCW and chapters 9.16, 19.77, 19.80, 19.84, and 19.83 RCW, or any practice,
whether concerning interstate or intrastate commerce that is unlawful under the
provisions of the act of Congress of the United States, September 26, 1914,
chapter 311, section 5, 38 U.S. Statutes at Large 719 as amended, known as the
"Federal Trade Commission Act of 1914", or the violation of or
failure accurately to label as to grades and standards in accordance with any
lawfully established grades or standards or labels.

(11) "Person"
includes any individual, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
trust, association, partnership, society, or any other organization of
individuals or any unit or agency of local, state, or federal government.

(12) "Cooperative
association" means any incorporated or unincorporated association of
producers which conforms to the qualifications set out in the act of Congress
of the United States, Feb. 18, 1922, chapter 57, sections 1 and 2, 42 U.S.
Statutes at Large 388 as amended, known as the "Capper-Volstead Act"
and which is engaged in making collective sales or in marketing any agricultural
commodity or product thereof or in rendering service for or advancing the
interests of the producers of such commodity on a nonprofit cooperative basis.

(13) "Member of a
cooperative association" or "member" means any producer of an
agricultural commodity who markets his or her product through such
cooperative association and who is a voting stockholder of or has a vote in the
control of or is under a marketing agreement with such cooperative association
with respect to such product.

(14) "Affected
handler" means any handler of an affected commodity.

(15) "Affected
parties" means any producer, affected producer, handler, or commodity
commission board member.

(16)
"Assessment" means the monetary amount established in a marketing
order that is to be paid by each affected producer to a commission in
accordance with the schedule established in the marketing order.

(17) "Mail"
or "send," for purposes of any notice relating to rule making,
referenda, or elections, means regular mail or electronic distribution, as
provided in RCW 34.05.260 for rule making. "Electronic distribution"
or "electronically" means distribution by electronic mail or
facsimile mail.

(18)
"Handler" means any person who acts, either as principal, agent, or
otherwise, in the processing, selling, marketing, or distributing of an
agricultural commodity that is not produced by the handler.
"Handler" does not include a common carrier used to transport an
agricultural commodity. "To handle" means to act as a handler.

(19) "List of
affected parties" means a list containing the names and mailing addresses
of affected parties. This list must contain the names and addresses of all
affected parties and, if requested by the director, the amount, by unit, of the
affected commodity produced during a designated period under this chapter.

(20) "List of
affected producers" means a list containing the names and mailing
addresses of affected producers. This list must contain the names and
addresses of all affected producers and, if requested by the director, the
amount, by unit, of the affected commodity produced during a designated period
under this chapter.

(21) "List of
affected handlers" means a list containing the names and addresses of
affected handlers. This list must contain the names and addresses of all
affected handlers and, if requested by the director, the amount, by unit, of
the affected commodity handled during a designated period under this chapter.

(22) "Percent
by numbers" means the percent of those persons on the list of affected
parties or affected producers.

(23)
"Referendum" means a vote by the affected parties or affected
producers which is conducted by secret ballot.

(24)
"Rule-making proceedings" means rule making under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(25)
"Vacancy" means that a board member leaves or is removed from a board
position prior to the end of a term, or a nomination process for the beginning of
a term concludes with no candidates for a position.

(26) "Volume of
production" means the percent of the average volume of production of the
affected commodity of those on the list of affected parties or affected
producers for a production period. For the purposes of this chapter, a
production period is a minimum three-year period or as specified in the
marketing order.

Sec. 3. RCW 15.66.030 and 2001 c
315 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Marketing orders may be
made for any one or more of the following purposes:

(1) To establish plans
and conduct programs for advertising and sales promotion, to maintain present
markets, or to create new or larger markets for any agricultural
commodity grown in the state of Washington;

(2) To provide for
carrying on research studies to find more efficient methods of production, irrigation,
processing, transportation, handling, and marketing of any
agricultural commodity;

(3) To provide for
improving standards and grades by defining, establishing, and providing
labeling requirements with respect to the same;

(4) To investigate and
take necessary action to prevent unfair trade practices;

(5) To provide
information or communicate on matters pertaining to the production, irrigation,
processing, transportation, marketing, or uses of an agricultural
commodity produced in Washington state to any elected official or officer or
employee of any agency;

(6) To provide
marketing information and services for producers of an agricultural commodity;

(7) To provide
information and services for meeting resource conservation objectives of
producers of an agricultural commodity;

(8) To engage in
cooperative efforts in the domestic or foreign marketing of food products of an
agricultural commodity; and

(9) To provide for
commodity-related education and training.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter and the
rules adopted under it are only one aspect of the comprehensively regulated
agricultural industry. Other laws applicable to agricultural commodities
include the following chapters and rules:

(1) Chapter 15.08 RCW,
horticultural pests and diseases;

(2) Chapter 15.13 RCW,
horticultural plants and facilities‑-inspection and licensing;

(3) Chapter 15.14 RCW,
planting stock;

(4) Chapter 15.15 RCW,
certified seed potatoes;

(5) Chapter 15.17 RCW,
standards of grades and packs;

(6) Chapter 15.19 RCW,
ginseng;

(7) Chapter 15.30 RCW,
controlled atmosphere storage of fruits and vegetables;

(8) Chapter 15.49 RCW,
seeds;

(9) Chapter 15.53 RCW,
commercial feed;

(10) Chapter 15.54 RCW,
fertilizers, minerals, and limes;

(11) Chapter 15.58 RCW,
Washington pesticide control act;

(12) Chapter 15.60 RCW,
apiaries;

(13) Chapter 15.64 RCW,
farm marketing;

(14) Chapter 15.83 RCW,
agricultural marketing and fair practices;

(15) Chapter 15.85 RCW,
aquaculture marketing;

(16) Chapter 15.86 RCW,
organic food products;

(17) Chapter 15.92 RCW,
center for sustaining agriculture and natural resources;

(18) Chapter 17.24 RCW,
insect pests and plant diseases;

(19) Chapter 19.94 RCW,
weights and measures;

(20) Chapter 20.01 RCW,
agricultural products‑-commission merchants, dealers, brokers, buyers,
agents;

(21) Chapter 22.09 RCW,
agricultural commodities;

(22) Chapter 69.04 RCW,
intrastate commerce in food, drugs, and cosmetics; and poisons including
provisions of 21 C.F.R. relating to the general manufacturing practices, food
labeling, food standards, food additives, and pesticide tolerances;

(23) Chapter 69.07 RCW,
Washington food processing act;

(24) Chapter 69.25 RCW,
Washington wholesome eggs and egg products act;

(25) Chapter 69.28 RCW,
honey; and

(26) 7 U.S.C. Sec. 136,
the federal insecticide, fungicide, and rodenticide act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the
laws and regulations listed in section 4 of this act that apply to the
agricultural industry as a whole, the potato industry is regulated by or must
comply with the following additional laws and the rules or regulations adopted
thereunder:

(a) 7 C.F.R. Part 51,
United States standards for grades of potatoes;

(b) 7 C.F.R. Part 946,
federal marketing order for Irish potatoes grown in Washington;

(c) 7 C.F.R. Part 1207,
potato research and promotion plan.

(2) In addition to the
laws and regulations listed in section 4 of this act that apply to the
agricultural industry as a whole, the wheat and barley industries are regulated
by or must comply with the following additional laws and the rules adopted
thereunder:

(a) 7 U.S.C. Sec. 1621,
the agricultural marketing act;

(b) Chapter 70.94 RCW, Washington
clean air act, agricultural burning.

(3) In addition to the
laws and regulations listed in section 4 of this act that apply to the
agricultural industry as a whole, the poultry industry is regulated by or must
comply with the following additional laws and the rules adopted thereunder:

(a) 21 U.S.C., chapter
10, poultry and poultry products inspection;

(b) 21 U.S.C., chapter
9, packers and stockyards;

(c) 7 U.S.C. Sec. 1621,
the agricultural marketing act;

(d) Washington fryer
commission labeling standards.

Sec. 6. RCW 15.66.110 and 2001 c
315 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every
marketing order shall establish a commodity commission composed of not less
than five nor more than thirteen members. In addition, the director shall be
an ex officio member of each commodity commission unless otherwise specified
in the marketing order. Commission board members shall be citizens
and residents of this state if required by the marketing order, and over the
age of eighteen. Not more than one board member may be part of the same
"person" as defined by this chapter. The term of office of
commission members shall be three years with the terms rotating so than
one-third of the terms will commence as nearly as practicable each year.
However, the first commission shall be selected, one-third for a term of one
year, one-third for a term of two years, and one-third for a term of three
years, as nearly as practicable. Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, no less than two-thirds of the commission board
members shall be elected by the affected producers and such elected members
shall all be affected producers. The remaining members shall be appointed by
the commission and shall be either affected producers, others active in matters
relating to the affected commodity, or persons not so related.

(2) A marketing
order may provide that a majority of the commission's board be appointed by the
director, but in any event, no less than one-third of the board members shall
be elected by the affected producers.

(3) In the event
that the marketing order provides that a majority of the commission's board be
appointed by the director, the marketing order must incorporate either the
provisions of section 7 or 8 of this act for board member selection.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

Either this section or
section 8 of this act applies for director appointed positions.

(1) Candidates for
director appointed board positions on a commission must be nominated pursuant
to RCW 15.66.120(1).

(2) Not less than sixty
days nor more than seventy-five days prior to the commencement of a board
member term, the director must cause an advisory vote to be held for the
director appointed positions. Advisory ballots must be mailed to all affected
producers and be returned to the director not less than thirty days prior to
the commencement of the term. The advisory ballot must be conducted in a
manner so that it is a secret ballot. The names of the two candidates
receiving the most votes in the advisory vote must be forwarded to the director
to select one for appointment to the commission board. In the event there are
only two candidates nominated for a board position, an advisory vote will not
be held and the candidates' names must be forwarded to the director to select
one for appointment.

(3) The candidates
whose names are forwarded to the director for potential appointment must submit
to the director a letter stating why he or she wishes to be appointed to the
commission board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

Either this section or
section 7 of this act applies for director appointed positions.

(1) Candidates for
director appointed board positions on a commission must be nominated pursuant
to RCW 15.66.120(1).

(2) Not less than sixty
days nor more than seventy-five days prior to the commencement of a board
member term, the director must cause an advisory vote to be held for the
director appointed positions. Advisory ballots must be mailed to all affected
producers and be returned to the director not less than thirty days prior to
the commencement of the term. The advisory ballot must be conducted in a
manner so that it is a secret ballot. The name of the candidate receiving the
most votes in the advisory vote must be forwarded to the director for
appointment to the commission board.

(3) The director must
appoint the candidate receiving the most votes in an advisory ballot unless the
candidate fails to meet the qualifications of commission board members listed
in this chapter and the marketing order. In the event the director rejects the
candidate receiving the most votes, the position will be deemed vacant and
filled pursuant to RCW 15.66.120(8).

Sec. 9. RCW 15.66.120 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 7 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Not less
than ninety days nor more than one hundred and five days prior to the beginning
of each term of each elected commission member, ((the director shall give))
notice ((by mail)) shall be mailed to all affected producers ((of
the vacancy and)) with a call for nominations in accordance with
this section and ((with the)) provisions of the marketing order ((and
shall give)). The notice ((of)) shall give the final
date for filing nominations, which shall not be less than eighty days nor more
than eighty-five days before the beginning of such term. ((Such)) The
notice shall also advise that nominating petitions shall be signed by five
persons qualified to vote for such candidates or, if the number of nominating
signers is provided for in the marketing order, ((such)) then the
number ((as such)) provided in the marketing order ((provides)).

(2) Not less
than sixty days nor more than seventy-five days prior to the commencement of ((such))
a commission board member term, the director shall ((submit by))
mail ballots to all affected producers((, which)). Ballots shall
be required to be returned to the director not less than thirty days prior to
the commencement of ((such)) the term. ((Such)) The
mail ballot shall be conducted in a manner so that it shall be a secret
ballot. With respect to the first commission for a particular commodity, the
director may call for nominations for board members in the notice of ((his))
the director's decision following the hearing and the ballot may be
submitted at the time the director's proposed order is submitted to the
affected producers for their assent.

((Said elected))
(3) Board members may be elected or appointed from various
districts within the area covered by the marketing order if the order so
provides, with the number of members from each district to be in accordance with
the provisions of the marketing order.

(4) The board
members of the commission not elected by the affected producers shall be
elected by a majority of the commission's board at a meeting of the
commission within ninety days prior to expiration of the term ((but to fill
nonelective vacancies caused by other reasons than the expiration of a term,
the new member shall be elected by the commission at its first meeting after
the occurrence of the vacancy)), or appointed by the director in
accordance with this chapter and the marketing order.

(5) When only
one nominee is nominated for any position on the commission, the director shall
((deem that said nominee satisfies the requirements of the position and then
it shall be deemed that said nominee has been duly)) determine whether
the nominee meets the qualifications of the position and, if so, the director
shall declare the nominee elected or appoint the nominee to the position.

(6) In the event of
a vacancy in an elected board member position on a commodity commission, the
remaining board members shall select a qualified person to fill the vacant
position for the remainder of the current term or as provided in the marketing
order.

(7) In the event of
a vacancy in a commission appointed board member position on a commodity
commission, the appointment of board members must be as specified in the
marketing order.

(8) In the event of
a vacancy in a director appointed board member position on a commodity
commission, the remaining board members must recommend to the director a
qualified person for appointment to the vacant position. The director must
appoint the person recommended by the board unless the person fails to meet the
qualifications of commission board members listed in this chapter and the
marketing order.

Sec. 10. RCW 15.66.130 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 6 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Each commodity
commission shall hold such regular meetings as the marketing order may
prescribe or that the commission by resolution may prescribe, together with
such special meetings that may be called in accordance with provisions of its
resolutions upon reasonable notice to all members thereof. A majority of the voting
members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business of the
commission. ((In the event of a vacancy in an elected or appointed position
on the commission, the remaining elected members of the commission shall select
a qualified person to fill the unexpired term.))

Each member of the
commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.230. Members and
employees of the commission may be reimbursed for actual travel expenses
incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter, as defined under the
commodity board's marketing order. Otherwise, if not defined or referenced in
the marketing order, reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 11. RCW 15.66.140 and 2001 c
315 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Every ((marketing))
commodity commission shall have such powers and duties in accordance
with provisions of this chapter as may be provided in the marketing order and
shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To elect a ((chairman))
chair and such other officers as determined advisable;

(2) To adopt, rescind
and amend rules and regulations reasonably necessary for the administration and
operation of the commission and the enforcement of its duties under the
marketing order;

(3) To administer,
enforce, direct and control the provisions of the marketing order and of this
chapter relating thereto;

(4) To employ and
discharge at its discretion such administrators and additional personnel,
attorneys, advertising and research agencies and other persons and firms that
it may deem appropriate and pay compensation to the same;

(5) To acquire personal
property and purchase or lease office space and other necessary real property
and transfer and convey the same;

(6) To institute and
maintain in its own name any and all legal actions, including actions by
injunction, mandatory injunction or civil recovery, or proceedings before
administrative tribunals or other governmental authorities necessary to carry
out the provisions of this chapter and of the marketing order;

(7) To keep accurate
records of all its receipts and disbursements, which records shall be open to
inspection and audit by the state auditor or private auditor designated by the
state auditor at least every five years;

(8) Borrow money and
incur indebtedness;

(9) Make necessary
disbursements for routine operating expenses;

(10) To expend funds
for commodity-related education, training, and leadership programs as each
commission deems expedient;

(11) To work
cooperatively with other local, state, and federal agencies; universities; and
national organizations for the purposes provided in the commission's marketing
order;

(12) To enter into
contracts or interagency agreements with any private or public agency, whether
federal, state, or local, to carry out the purposes provided in the commission's
marketing order. Personal service contracts must comply with chapter 39.29
RCW;

(13) To accept and
expend or retain any gifts, bequests, contributions, or grants from private
persons or private and public agencies to carry out the purposes provided in
the commission's marketing order;

(14) To enter into
contracts or agreements for research in the production, irrigation,
processing, transportation, marketing, use, or distribution of an
affected commodity;

(15) To retain in
emergent situations the services of private legal counsel to conduct legal
actions on behalf of a commission. The retention of a private attorney is
subject to review by the office of the attorney general;

(16) To engage in
appropriate fund-raising activities for the purpose of supporting activities of
the commission authorized by the marketing order;

(17) To participate in
international, federal, state, and local hearings, meetings, and other
proceedings relating to the production, irrigation, manufacture,
regulation, transportation, distribution, sale, or use of affected
commodities including activities authorized under RCW 42.17.190, including the
reporting of those activities to the public disclosure commission; ((and))

(18) To engage in
cooperative advertising and promotion efforts with individual manufacturers,
processors, packers/shippers, cooperatives, and producers of the affected
commodity grown in the state of Washington, provided the commodity commission
publicly offers these types of cooperative programs to all manufacturers,
processors, packers/shippers, and producers of the affected Washington state
commodity;

(19) To maintain a
list of the names and addresses of affected producers that may be compiled from
information used to collect assessments under the provisions of the marketing
order and data on the value of each producer's production for a minimum
three-year period;

(20) To maintain a
list of the names and addresses of persons who handle the affected commodity
within the affected area and data on the amount and value of the commodity
handled for a minimum three-year period by each person; and

(21) Such other
powers and duties that are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

Agricultural commodity
commissions shall adopt rules governing promotional hosting expenditures by
commodity commission employees, agents, or board members under RCW 15.04.200.

Sec. 13. RCW 15.66.185 and 1967
ex.s. c 54 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any funds of any
agricultural commodity commission may be invested in savings or time deposits
in banks, trust companies, and mutual savings banks ((which)) that
are doing business in ((this state)) the United States, up to the
amount of insurance afforded such accounts by the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation. This section shall apply to all funds which may be lawfully so
invested, which in the judgment of any agricultural commodity commission are
not required for immediate expenditure. The authority granted by this section
is not exclusive and shall be construed to be cumulative and in addition to
other authority provided by law for the investment of such funds.

Sec. 14. RCW 15.66.245 and 1988 c
54 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any marketing agreement
or order may authorize the members of a commodity commission, or their agents
or designees, to participate in federal or state hearings or other proceedings
concerning regulation of the manufacture, distribution, sale, or use of any
pesticide as defined by RCW 15.58.030(((1))) (30) or any
agricultural chemical which is of use or potential use in producing the
affected commodity. Any marketing agreement or order may authorize the
expenditure of commodity commission funds for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

A commodity commission
under this chapter is exempt from the limitations of RCW 43.01.040, 43.01.041,
and 43.01.044 concerning the accumulation of employee annual leave in excess of
thirty days, provided the commodity commission establishes an incentive program
for commission employees that exceeds the requirements of RCW 43.01.040,
43.01.041, and 43.01.044 in the following manner:

(1) In January of the
year following any year in which a minimum of thirty days of annual leave is
accrued, and each January thereafter, any eligible employee may exercise an
option to receive remuneration for unused annual leave accumulated in the
previous year at a rate equal to one day's monetary compensation of the
employee for each two full days of annual leave in excess of thirty days.
Annual leave for which compensation has been received must be deducted from
accrued annual leave at the rate of two days for every one day of monetary
compensation. Annual leave remuneration under this subsection may not be
included in the computation of retirement benefits and may not result in any
increase in a retirement allowance under any public retirement system in this
state.

(2) At the time of
separation from commodity commission employment due to death, reduction in
force, resignation, dismissal, or retirement, an eligible employee or the
employee's estate must receive remuneration of annual leave at a rate equal to
one day's current monetary compensation of the employee for each day of accrued
annual leave up to a maximum of thirty days.

(3) Should the
legislature revoke any benefits granted under this section, no affected
employee is entitled thereafter to receive the benefits as a matter of
contractual right.

(4) The commodity
commission may adopt rules under its marketing order to carry out the purposes
of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. RCW 15.66.020 (Declaration of purpose)
and 1961 c 11 s 15.66.020 are each repealed.

---
END ---