BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.10.569 and 1990
c 288 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each institution of
higher education with a commissioned police force shall report to the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs or its successor agency,
on a monthly basis, crime statistics for the Washington state uniform crime
report, in the format required by the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs, or its successor agency. Institutions of higher education which
do not have commissioned police forces shall report crime statistics through
appropriate local law enforcement agencies.

(2) Each institution of
higher education shall publish and distribute a report which shall be updated
annually and which shall include the crime statistics as reported under
subsection (1) of this section for the most recent three-year period. Upon
request, the institution shall provide the report to every person who submits
an application for admission to ((either a main or branch)) any
campus, and to each new employee at the time of employment. In its
acknowledgement of receipt of the formal application for admission, the
institution shall notify the applicant of the availability of such
information. The information also shall be provided on an annual basis to all students
and employees. Institutions with more than one campus shall provide the
required information on a campus-by-campus basis.

(3) Each institution of
higher education shall provide to every new student and new employee, and upon
request to other interested persons, information which follows the general
categories for safety policies and procedures outlined in this section. Such
categories shall, at a minimum, include campus enrollments, campus nonstudent
work force profile, the number and duties of campus security personnel,
arrangements with state and local police, and policies on controlled
substances. Information for the most recent academic year also shall include a
description of any programs offered by an institution's student affairs or
services department, and by student government organizations regarding crime
prevention and counseling, including a directory of available services and
appropriate telephone numbers and physical locations of these services. In
addition, institutions maintaining student housing facilities shall include
information detailing security policies and programs.

Institutions with ((a
main campus and one or more branch campuses)) more than one campus not
including off-campus centers of regional universities and The Evergreen State
College shall provide the information on a campus-by-campus basis.

In the case of
community colleges, colleges shall provide such information to the main
campuses only and shall provide reasonable alternative information at any
off-campus centers and other affiliated college sites enrolling less than one
hundred students.

(4) Each institution
shall establish a task force which shall annually examine campus security and
safety issues. The task force shall review the report published and distributed
pursuant to this section in order to ensure the accuracy and effectiveness of
the report, and make any suggestions for improvement. This task force shall
include representation from the institution's administration, faculty, staff,
recognized student organization, and police or security organization.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.45.010 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 7 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that the benefits of higher education should be more widely available to the
citizens of the state of Washington. The legislature also finds that a
citizen's place of residence can restrict that citizen's access to educational
opportunity at the upper division and graduate level.

Because most of the
state-supported baccalaureate universities are located in areas removed from
major metropolitan areas, the legislature finds that many of the state's
citizens, especially those citizens residing in the central Puget Sound area,
the Tri-Cities, Spokane, Vancouver, and Yakima, have insufficient and
inequitable access to upper-division baccalaureate and graduate education.

This lack of sufficient
educational opportunities in urban areas makes it difficult or impossible for
place-bound individuals, who are unable to relocate, to complete a
baccalaureate or graduate degree. It also exacerbates the difficulty
financially needy students have in attending school, since many of those
students need to work, and work is not always readily available in some
communities where the baccalaureate institutions of higher education are
located.

The lack of sufficient
educational opportunities in metropolitan areas also affects the economy of the
underserved communities. Businesses benefit from access to the research and
teaching capabilities of institutions of higher education. The absence of
these institutions from some of the state's major urban centers prevents
beneficial interaction between businesses in these communities and the state's
universities.

The Washington state
master plan for higher education, adopted by the higher education coordinating
board, recognizes the need to expand upper-division and graduate educational
opportunities in the state's large urban centers. The board has also attempted
to provide a means for helping to meet future educational demand through a
system of ((branch)) campuses in the state's major urban areas: The
University of Washington Tacoma, the University of Washington Bothell,
Washington State University Vancouver, Washington State University Tri-Cities,
and Washington State University Spokane.

The legislature
endorses the assignment of responsibility to serve these urban centers that the
board has made to various institutions of higher education. The legislature
also endorses the creation of ((branch campuses for the University of
Washington and Washington State University)) : The University of
Washington Tacoma, the University of Washington Bothell, Washington State
University Vancouver, Washington State University Tri-Cities, and Washington State
University Spokane.

The legislature
recognizes that, among their other responsibilities, the state's comprehensive
community colleges share with the four-year universities and colleges the
responsibility of providing the first two years of a baccalaureate education.
It is the intent of the legislature that the four-year institutions and the
community colleges work as cooperative partners to ensure the successful and
efficient operation of the state's system of higher education. The legislature
further intends that the four-year institutions work cooperatively with the
community colleges to ensure that ((branch campuses)) the University
of Washington Tacoma, the University of Washington Bothell, Washington State
University Vancouver, Washington State University Tri-Cities, and Washington
State University Spokane are operated as models of a two plus two
educational system.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.45.020 and 1994
c 217 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
University of Washington is responsible for ensuring the expansion of
upper-division and graduate educational programs in the central Puget Sound
area under rules or guidelines adopted by the higher education coordinating
board. The University of Washington shall meet that responsibility through the
operation of ((at least two branch campuses. One branch campus shall be
located in the Tacoma area. Another branch campus shall be collocated with
Cascadia Community College in the Bothell-Woodinville area)) the
University of Washington Tacoma and the University of Washington Bothell.

Sec. 4. RCW 28B.45.0201 and 1994
c 217 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that population growth in north King and south Snohomish counties has created a
need to expand higher education and work force training programs for the people
living and working in those areas. In keeping with the recommendations of the
higher education coordinating board, the legislature intends to help address those
education and training needs through the creation of Cascadia Community
College, expansion of educational opportunities at Lake Washington Technical
College, and support of the University of Washington(('s branch campus at
Bothell-Woodinville)) Bothell. It is further the intention of the
legislature, in keeping with the higher education coordinating board
recommendations, that the Cascadia Community College and the University of
Washington ((branch campus)) Bothell be collocated, and that the
new community college and the University of Washington(('s branch campus))
Bothell work in partnership to ensure that properly prepared students
from community colleges and other institutions are able to transfer smoothly to
the ((branch campus)) University of Washington Bothell.

((The legislature
further finds that a governing board for Cascadia Community College needs to be
appointed and confirmed as expeditiously as possible. The legislature intends
to work cooperatively with the governor to facilitate the appointment and
confirmation of trustees for the college.))

Sec. 5. RCW 28B.45.030 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 7 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Washington State
University is responsible for providing upper-division and graduate level
higher education programs to the citizens of the Tri-Cities area, under rules
or guidelines adopted by the higher education coordinating board. Washington
State University shall meet that responsibility through the operation of ((a
branch campus in the Tri-Cities area. The branch campus shall replace and
supersede the Tri-Cities university center. All land, facilities, equipment,
and personnel of the Tri-Cities university center shall be transferred from the
University of Washington to)) Washington State University Tri-Cities.

Sec. 6. RCW 28B.45.040 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 7 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Washington State University
is responsible for providing upper-division and graduate level higher education
programs to the citizens of the southwest Washington area, under rules or
guidelines adopted by the higher education coordinating board. Washington
State University shall meet that responsibility through the operation of ((a
branch campus in the southwest Washington area)) Washington State
University Vancouver.

Sec. 7. RCW 28B.45.050 and 1991
c 205 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Washington State
University and Eastern Washington University are responsible for providing
upper-division and graduate level programs to the citizens of the Spokane
area((, under rules or guidelines adopted by the joint center for higher
education)). However, before any degree is authorized under this section
it shall be subject to the review and approval of the higher education
coordinating board. Washington State University shall meet its responsibility
through the operation of ((a branch campus in the)) Washington State
University Spokane ((area)). Eastern Washington University shall
meet its responsibility through the operation of programs and facilities in
Spokane.

Sec. 8. RCW 28B.80.450 and 1990
c 288 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The higher education
coordinating board shall study upper division baccalaureate educational needs
of placebound students, and the graduate educational needs of teachers, living
in areas of the state not currently served by either existing four-year
institutions or ((branch campuses)) the University of Washington
Tacoma, the University of Washington Bothell, Washington State University
Vancouver, Washington State University Tri-Cities, or Washington State
University Spokane. The study shall include recommendations on how the
needs should be addressed, and which institutions should be responsible for
serving specific areas.

Sec. 9. RCW 28B.80.510 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 7 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

In rules
and guidelines adopted for purposes of chapter 7, Laws of 1989 1st ex. sess.,
the higher education coordinating board shall ensure a collaborative
partnership between the community colleges and the four-year institutions. The
partnership shall be one in which the community colleges prepare students for
transfer to the upper-division programs of the ((branch campuses)) four-year
institutions.

Sec. 10. RCW 28B.101.020 and 1990
c 288 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
this chapter, "placebound" means unable to relocate to complete a
college program because of family or employment commitments, health concerns,
monetary inability, or other similar factors.

(2) To be eligible for
an educational opportunity grant, applicants must be placebound residents of
the state of Washington who are needy students as defined in RCW 28B.10.802(3)
and who have completed the associate of arts degree or its equivalent. A
placebound resident is one who may be influenced by the receipt of an enhanced
student financial aid award to attend an institution that has existing unused
capacity rather than attend ((a branch campus established pursuant to
chapter 28B.45 RCW)) the University of Washington Tacoma, the University
of Washington Bothell, Washington State University Vancouver, Washington State
University Tri-Cities, or Washington State University Spokane. An eligible
placebound applicant is further defined as a person whose residence is located
in an area served by a ((branch campus)) one of these institutions of
higher education who, because of family or employment commitments, health
concerns, monetary need, or other similar factors, would be unable to complete
an upper-division course of study but for receipt of an educational opportunity
grant.

Sec. 11. RCW 28B.101.040 and 1993
sp.s. c 18 s 35 and 1993 c 385 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

Grants may be used by
eligible participants to attend any public or private college or university in
the state of Washington that is accredited by an accrediting association
recognized by rule of the higher education coordinating board and that has an
existing unused capacity. Grants shall not be used to attend ((any branch
campus or educational program established under chapter 28B.45 RCW)) the
University of Washington Tacoma, the University of Washington Bothell,
Washington State University Vancouver, Washington State University Tri-Cities,
or Washington State University Spokane. The participant shall not be
eligible for a grant if it will be used for any programs that include religious
worship, exercise, or instruction or to pursue a degree in theology. Each
participating student may receive up to two thousand five hundred dollars per
academic year, not to exceed the student's demonstrated financial need for the
course of study. Resident students as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2)(((e)))
(f) are not eligible for grants under this chapter.

Sec. 12. RCW 34.05.514 and 2001 c
220 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, proceedings for review under this
chapter shall be instituted by paying the fee required under RCW 36.18.020 and
filing a petition in the superior court, at the petitioner's option, for (a)
Thurston county, (b) the county of the petitioner's residence or principal
place of business, or (c) in any county where the property owned by the petitioner
and affected by the contested decision is located.

(2) For proceedings
involving institutions of higher education, the petition shall be filed either
in the county in which the principal office of the institution involved is
located or in the county of ((a branch campus)) the University of
Washington Tacoma, the University of Washington Bothell, Washington State
University Vancouver, Washington State University Tri-Cities, or Washington
State University Spokane if the action involves ((such branch)) one
of those institutions.

(3) For proceedings
conducted by the pollution control hearings board pursuant to chapter 43.21B
RCW or as otherwise provided in RCW 90.03.210(2) involving decisions of the
department of ecology on applications for changes or transfers of water rights
that are the subject of a general adjudication of water rights that is being
litigated actively under chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW, the petition must be filed
with the superior court conducting the adjudication, to be consolidated by the
court with the general adjudication. A party to the adjudication shall be a
party to the appeal under this chapter only if the party files or is served
with a petition for review to the extent required by this chapter.

Sec. 13. RCW 43.105.820 and 1999
c 285 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The information
services board shall prepare a technical plan for the design and construction
of the K-20 telecommunication system. The board shall ensure that the
technical plan adheres to the goals and objectives established under RCW
43.105.041. The board shall provide formal project approval and oversight
during the development and implementation of the K-20 telecommunications
network. In approving the plan, the board shall conduct a request for proposal
process. The technical plan shall be developed in phases as follows:

(1) Phase one shall
provide a telecommunication backbone connecting educational service districts,
the main campuses of public baccalaureate institutions, the ((branch
campuses of public research institutions)) University of Washington
Tacoma, the University of Washington Bothell, Washington State University
Vancouver, Washington State University Tri-Cities, and Washington State
University Spokane, and the main campuses of community colleges and
technical colleges.

(2) Phase two shall
provide for (a) connection to the network by entities that include, but need
not be limited to: School districts, public higher education off-campus and
extension centers, and ((branch)) other campuses of community
colleges and technical colleges, as prioritized by the K-20 telecommunications
oversight and policy committee, or as modified by the board; (b) distance
education facilities and components for entities listed in subsections (1) and
(2) of this section; and (c) connection for independent nonprofit institutions
of higher education, provided that:

(i) The K-20 board and
each independent nonprofit institution of higher education to be connected
agree in writing to terms and conditions of connectivity. The terms and
conditions shall ensure, among other things, that the provision of K-20
services does not violate Article VIII, section 5 of the state Constitution and
that the institution shall adhere to network policies; and

(ii) The K-20 board
determines that inclusion of the independent nonprofit institutions of higher
education will not significantly affect the network's eligibility for federal
universal service fund discounts or subsidies.

(3)
Subsequent phases may include, but need not be limited to, connections to
public libraries, state and local governments, community resource centers, and
the private sector.

---
END ---