BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.45.030 and 1983 c
167 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Local improvement
bonds shall be in such denominations as may be provided in the ordinance
authorizing their issue and shall be numbered from one upwards consecutively.
Each bond shall (a) be signed by the mayor and attested by the clerk, (b) have
the seal of the city or town affixed thereto, (c) refer to the improvement to
pay for which it is issued and the ordinance ordering it, (d) provide that the
principal sum therein named and the interest thereon shall be payable out of
the local improvement fund created for the cost and expense of the
improvement((, or)) and out of the local improvement guaranty
fund, unless the ordinance under which it was issued provides that the bonds
shall not be secured by the local improvement guaranty fund; and out of a
reserve fund, if one is established for such bonds pursuant to RCW 35.51.040;
or, with respect to interest only, shall be payable out of the general
revenues of the city or town, but only if pledged to the payment of such
interest pursuant to RCW 35.45.065, and not otherwise, (e) provide that the
bond owners' remedy in case of nonpayment shall be confined to the enforcement
of the special assessments made for the improvement and to the guaranty fund and
reserve fund, as applicable, and (f) be in any form, including bearer bonds
or registered bonds as provided in RCW 39.46.030.

Any interest coupons
may be signed by the mayor and attested by the clerk, or in lieu thereof, may
have printed thereon a facsimile of their signatures.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection
(1) of this section, but subject to RCW 35.45.010, such bonds may be issued and
sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.45.070 and 1965 c
7 s 35.45.070 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Neither
the holder nor owner of any bond, interest coupon, ((or)) warrant, or
other short-term obligation issued against a local improvement fund shall
have any claim therefor against the city or town by which it is issued, except
for payment from the special assessments made for the improvement for which the
bond or warrant was issued and except also for payment from the local
improvement guaranty fund of the city or town as to bonds issued after the
creation of a local improvement guaranty fund of that city or town. The city
or town shall not be liable to the holder or owner of any bond, interest
coupon, ((or)) warrant, or other short-term obligation for any
loss to the local improvement guaranty fund occurring in the lawful operation
thereof.

(b) A copy of
the foregoing ((part)) in (a) of this ((section)) subsection
shall be plainly written, printed, or engraved on each bond, interest
coupon, warrant, or other short-term obligation.

(2) Notwithstanding
the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, with respect to bonds,
interest coupons, warrants, or other short-term obligations issued under an
ordinance providing that the obligations are not secured by the local
improvement guaranty fund:

(a) Neither the
holder nor owner of any obligation issued against a local improvement fund
shall have any claim against the city or town by which it is issued, except for
payment from the special assessments made for the improvement for which the
obligation was issued.

(b) A copy of the
foregoing in (a) of this subsection shall be plainly written, printed, or
engraved on each bond, interest coupon, warrant, or other short-term obligation.

Sec. 3. RCW 35.45.080 and 1965 c
7 s 35.45.080 are each amended to read as follows:

If a city or town fails
to pay any bonds or to promptly collect any local improvement assessments when
due, the owner of the bonds may proceed in his own name to collect the
assessment and foreclose the lien thereof in any court of competent
jurisdiction and shall recover in addition to the amount of the bond and
interest thereon, five percent, together with the cost of suit. Any number of
holders of bonds for any single improvement may join as plaintiffs and any
number of owners of property upon which the assessments are liens may be joined
as defendants in the same suit.

The owners of local
improvement bonds issued by a city or town after the creation of a local
improvement guaranty fund therein, shall also have recourse against the local
improvement guaranty fund of such city or town unless the ordinance under
which the bonds were issued provides that the bonds are not secured by the
local improvement guaranty fund.

Sec. 4. RCW 35.54.010 and 1971
ex.s. c 116 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is
established in every city and town a fund to be designated the "local
improvement guaranty fund" for the purpose of guaranteeing, to the extent
of the fund, the payment of its local improvement bonds and warrants or
other short-term obligations issued to pay for any local improvement
ordered in the city or town or in any area wholly or partly outside its
corporate boundaries: (((1))) (a) In any city of the first class
having a population of more than three hundred thousand, subsequent to June 8, 1927;
(((2))) (b) in any city or town having created and maintained a
guaranty fund under chapter 141, Laws of 1923, subsequent to the date of
establishment of such fund; and (((3))) (c) in any other city or
town subsequent to April 7, 1926: PROVIDED, That this shall not apply to any
city of the first class which maintains a local improvement guaranty fund under
chapter 138, Laws of 1917, but any such city maintaining a guaranty fund under
chapter 138, Laws of 1917 may by ordinance elect to operate under the
provisions of this chapter and may transfer to the guaranty fund created
hereunder all the assets of the former fund and, upon such election and
transfer, all bonds guaranteed under the former fund shall be guaranteed under
the provisions of this chapter.

(2) The
local improvement guaranty fund established under subsection (1) of this
section shall not be subject to any claim by the owner or holder of any local
improvement bond, warrant, or other short-term obligation issued under an
ordinance that provides that such obligations shall not be secured by the local
improvement guaranty fund.

---
END ---