BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.99.050 and 2000 c
83 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) A city or
town ((shall)) may not place ((or extend)) a moratorium or
interim zoning control on siting facilities for personal wireless
services that exceeds one hundred eighty days. A moratorium or interim zoning
control may be renewed up to an additional one hundred eighty days if: (a) The
city or town and affected companies seeking to locate personal wireless
facilities agree to the renewal; or (b) the renewal is supported by a work plan
that is developed and agreed upon by the city or town and affected companies
seeking to locate personal wireless facilities. A city or town may not place a
moratorium or interim zoning control, including renewals, more often than once
in a five-year period.

(2) Moratoria and
interim zoning controls must not be used to stall, discourage, or otherwise
effectively prohibit the placement of personal wireless facilities within a
community.

(3) During the time
a moratorium or interim zoning control is in effect, a city or town will
continue to process complete applications for the placement of personal
wireless facilities that were filed before the effective date of the moratorium
or interim zoning control.

(4) During the time
a moratorium or interim zoning control is in effect, a city or town will
continue to accept and process, to the degree possible, applications for the
placement of personal wireless facilities.

(5) Any city or town
implementing a moratorium or interim zoning control will, at the request of any
company seeking to locate personal wireless facilities affected by the
moratorium or interim zoning control, participate with the service provider in
the informal dispute resolution process included within section II of the
guidelines for facilities siting implementation as agreed to on August 5, 1998,
by the federal communications commission's local and state government advisory
committee, the cellular telecommunications industry association, the personal
communications industry association, and the American mobile telecommunications
association.

(6) The limitation
on moratoria and interim zoning controls in subsection (1) of this section
includes any moratoria or interim zoning controls concerning the acceptance
and processing of applications, permitting, construction, maintenance, repair,
replacement, extension, operation, or use of any facilities for personal
wireless services((, except as consistent with the guidelines for facilities
siting implementation, as agreed to on August 5, 1998, by the federal
communications commission's local and state government advisory committee, the
cellular telecommunications industry association, the personal communications
industry association, and the American mobile telecommunications association.
Any city or town implementing such a moratorium shall, at the request of a
service provider impacted by the moratorium, participate with the service
provider in the informal dispute resolution process included with the
guidelines for facilities siting implementation)).

Sec. 2. RCW 35A.21.245 and 2000
c 83 s 10 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Each code city is
subject to the requirements and restrictions regarding facilities and rights of
way under ((this)) chapter 35.99 RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 35.63.200 and 1992 c
207 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A council or board that
adopts a moratorium or interim zoning control, without holding a public hearing
on the proposed moratorium or interim zoning control, shall hold a public
hearing on the adopted moratorium or interim zoning control within at least
sixty days of its adoption, whether or not the council or board received a
recommendation on the matter from the commission. If the council or board does
not adopt findings of fact justifying its action before this hearing, then the council
or board shall do so immediately after this public hearing. A moratorium or
interim zoning control adopted under this section may be effective for not
longer than six months, but may be effective for up to one year if a work plan
is developed for related studies providing for such a longer period. A
moratorium or interim zoning control may be renewed for one or more six-month
periods if a subsequent public hearing is held and findings of fact are made
prior to each renewal.

A council or board
is also subject to the moratorium and interim zoning control provisions in RCW
35.99.050.

Sec. 4. RCW 35A.63.220 and 1992
c 207 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A legislative body that
adopts a moratorium or interim zoning ordinance, without holding a public
hearing on the proposed moratorium or interim zoning ordinance, shall hold a
public hearing on the adopted moratorium or interim zoning ordinance within at least
sixty days of its adoption, whether or not the legislative body received a
recommendation on the matter from the planning agency. If the legislative body
does not adopt findings of fact justifying its action before this hearing, then
the legislative body shall do so immediately after this public hearing. A
moratorium or interim zoning ordinance adopted under this section may be
effective for not longer than six months, but may be effective for up to one
year if a work plan is developed for related studies providing for such a
longer period. A moratorium of interim zoning ordinance may be renewed for one
or more six-month periods if a subsequent public hearing is held and findings
of fact are made prior to each renewal.

A legislative body
is also subject to the moratorium and interim zoning control provisions in RCW
35.99.050.

Sec. 5. RCW 36.70.795 and 1992 c
207 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A board that adopts a
moratorium, interim zoning map, interim zoning ordinance, or interim official
control without holding a public hearing on the proposed moratorium, interim
zoning map, interim zoning ordinance, or interim official control, shall hold a
public hearing on the adopted moratorium, interim zoning map, interim zoning
ordinance, or interim official control within at least sixty days of its
adoption, whether or not the board received a recommendation on the matter from
the commission or department. If the board does not adopt findings of fact
justifying its action before this hearing, then the board shall do so
immediately after this public hearing. A moratorium, interim zoning map,
interim zoning ordinance, or interim official control adopted under this
section may be effective for not longer than six months, but may be effective
for up to one year if a work plan is developed for related studies providing
for such a longer period. A moratorium, interim zoning map, interim zoning
ordinance, or interim official control may be renewed for one or more six-month
periods if a subsequent public hearing is held and findings of fact are made
prior to each renewal.

A board is also
subject to the moratorium and interim zoning control provisions in RCW
35.99.050.

Sec. 6. RCW 36.70A.390 and 1992
c 207 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A county or city
governing body that adopts a moratorium, interim zoning map, interim zoning
ordinance, or interim official control without holding a public hearing on the
proposed moratorium, interim zoning map, interim zoning ordinance, or interim
official control, shall hold a public hearing on the adopted moratorium,
interim zoning map, interim zoning ordinance, or interim official control
within at least sixty days of its adoption, whether or not the governing body
received a recommendation on the matter from the planning commission or
department. If the governing body does not adopt findings of fact justifying
its action before this hearing, then the governing body shall do so immediately
after this public hearing. A moratorium, interim zoning map, interim zoning
ordinance, or interim official control adopted under this section may be
effective for not longer than six months, but may be effective for up to one
year if a work plan is developed for related studies providing for such a
longer period. A moratorium, interim zoning map, interim zoning ordinance, or
interim official control may be renewed for one or more six-month periods if a
subsequent public hearing is held and findings of fact are made prior to each
renewal.

This section does not
apply to the designation of critical areas, agricultural lands, forest lands,
and mineral resource lands, under RCW 36.70A.170, and the conservation of these
lands and protection of these areas under RCW 36.70A.060, prior to such actions
being taken in a comprehensive plan adopted under RCW 36.70A.070 and
implementing development regulations adopted under RCW 36.70A.120, if a public
hearing is held on such proposed actions.

A
county or city governing body is also subject to the moratorium and interim
zoning control provisions in RCW 35.99.050.

---
END ---