BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.68.030 and 1990 c
42 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except for
proceeds from fees for vehicle licensing for vehicles paying such fees under
RCW 46.16.070 and 46.16.085, and as otherwise provided for in subsection (2)
of this section and in chapter 46.16 RCW, all fees received by the director
for vehicle licenses under the provisions of chapter 46.16 RCW shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer, accompanied by a proper identifying detailed
report, and be deposited to the credit of the motor vehicle fund, except that
the proceeds from the vehicle license fee and renewal license fee shall be
deposited by the state treasurer as hereinafter provided. After July 1, 1981,
that portion of each vehicle license fee in excess of $7.40 and that portion of
each renewal license fee in excess of $3.40 shall be deposited in the state
patrol highway account in the motor vehicle fund, hereby created. Vehicle
license fees, renewal license fees, and all other funds in the state patrol
highway account shall be for the sole use of the Washington state patrol for
highway activities of the Washington state patrol, subject to proper
appropriations and reappropriations therefor, for any fiscal biennium after
June 30, 1981, and twenty-seven and three-tenths percent of the proceeds from
$7.40 of each vehicle license fee and $3.40 of each renewal license fee shall
be deposited each biennium in the Puget Sound ferry operations account. Any
remaining amounts of vehicle license fees and renewal license fees that are not
deposited in the Puget Sound ferry operations account shall be deposited in the
motor vehicle fund.

(2)
Five dollars of each thirty-dollar license tab fee collected for licensing
motorcycles must be deposited into the motorcycle safety education account
created under RCW 46.68.065, and the remainder must be distributed as prescribed
in subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---