BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.14.110 and 1996 c
42 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If a
member dies, the amount of the accumulated contributions standing to the
member's credit at the time of the member's death shall be paid to the member's
estate, or such person or persons, trust, or organization as the member has
nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts. If there is no such
designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's death,
the member's accumulated contributions shall be paid to the member's surviving
spouse as if in fact the spouse had been nominated by written designation or,
if there is no such surviving spouse, then to the member's legal
representatives.

Sec. 2. RCW 2.43.020 and 1989 c
358 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1)
"Non-English-speaking person" means any person involved in a legal
proceeding who cannot readily speak or understand the English language, but
does not include hearing-impaired persons who are covered under chapter 2.42
RCW.

(2) "Qualified
interpreter" means a person who is able readily to interpret or translate
spoken and written English for non-English-speaking persons and to interpret or
translate oral or written statements of non-English-speaking persons into
spoken English.

(3) "Legal
proceeding" means a proceeding in any court in this state, grand jury
hearing, or hearing before an inquiry judge, or before (([an])) an
administrative board, commission, agency, or licensing body of the state or any
political subdivision thereof.

(4) "Certified interpreter"
means an interpreter who is certified by the administrative office of
the ((administrator for the)) courts.

(5)
"Appointing authority" means the presiding officer or similar
official of any court, department, board, commission, agency, licensing
authority, or legislative body of the state or of any political subdivision
thereof.

Sec. 3. RCW 2.43.030 and 1990 c
183 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever an
interpreter is appointed to assist a non-English-speaking person in a legal
proceeding, the appointing authority shall, in the absence of a written waiver
by the person, appoint a certified or a qualified interpreter to assist the
person throughout the proceedings.

(a) Except as otherwise
provided for in (b) of this subsection, the interpreter appointed shall be a
qualified interpreter.

(b) Beginning on July
1, 1990, when a non-English-speaking person is a party to a legal proceeding,
or is subpoenaed or summoned by an appointing authority or is otherwise
compelled by an appointing authority to appear at a legal proceeding, the
appointing authority shall use the services of only those language interpreters
who have been certified by the administrative office of the ((administrator
for the)) courts, unless good cause is found and noted on the record by the
appointing authority. For purposes of chapter 358, Laws of 1989, "good
cause" includes but is not limited to a determination that:

(i) Given the totality
of the circumstances, including the nature of the proceeding and the potential
penalty or consequences involved, the services of a certified interpreter are
not reasonably available to the appointing authority; or

(ii) The current list
of certified interpreters maintained by the administrative office of the
((administrator for the)) courts does not include an interpreter
certified in the language spoken by the non-English-speaking person.

(c) Except as otherwise
provided in this section, when a non-English-speaking person is involved in a
legal proceeding, the appointing authority shall appoint a qualified
interpreter.

(2) If good cause is
found for using an interpreter who is not certified or if a qualified
interpreter is appointed, the appointing authority shall make a preliminary
determination, on the basis of testimony or stated needs of the
non-English-speaking person, that the proposed interpreter is able to interpret
accurately all communications to and from such person in that particular
proceeding. The appointing authority shall satisfy itself on the record that
the proposed interpreter:

(a) Is capable of
communicating effectively with the court or agency and the person for whom the
interpreter would interpret; and

(b) Has
read, understands, and will abide by the code of ethics for language
interpreters established by court rules.

Sec. 4. RCW 2.43.070 and 1989 c
358 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
availability of funds, the administrative office of the ((administrator
for the)) courts shall establish and administer a comprehensive testing and
certification program for language interpreters.

(2) The administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts shall work cooperatively
with community colleges and other private or public educational institutions,
and with other public or private organizations to establish a certification
preparation curriculum and suitable training programs to ensure the
availability of certified interpreters. Training programs shall be made readily
available in both eastern and western Washington locations.

(3) The administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts shall establish and adopt
standards of proficiency, written and oral, in English and the language to be
interpreted.

(4) The administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts shall conduct periodic
examinations to ensure the availability of certified interpreters. Periodic
examinations shall be made readily available in both eastern and western
Washington locations.

(5) The administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts shall compile, maintain,
and disseminate a current list of interpreters certified by the office ((of
the administrator for the courts)).

(6) The administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts may charge reasonable
fees for testing, training, and certification.

Sec. 5. RCW 2.56.010 and 1984 c
20 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a state
office to be known as the administrative office of ((administrator
for)) the courts. The executive officer of the administrative office of
the courts is the administrator for the courts, who shall be appointed by
the supreme court of this state from a list of five persons submitted by the
governor of the state of Washington, and shall hold office at the pleasure of
the appointing power. ((He shall not be over the age of sixty years at the
time of his appointment. He shall receive a)) The administrator's
salary ((to)) shall be fixed by the supreme court.

Sec. 6. RCW 2.56.020 and 1957 c
259 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The administrator for
the courts, with the approval of the chief justice of the supreme court of this
state, shall appoint and fix the compensation of such assistants as are
necessary to enable ((him to perform)) performance of the power
and duties vested in ((him. During his term of office or employment,)) the
administrative office of the courts. Neither the administrator nor any
assistant shall engage ((directly or indirectly)) in the practice of law
for remuneration in this state.

Sec. 7. RCW 2.56.030 and 1997 c
41 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The administrator for
the courts shall, under the supervision and direction of the chief justice:

(1) Examine the
administrative methods and systems employed in the offices of the judges,
clerks, stenographers, and employees of the courts and make recommendations,
through the chief justice, for the improvement of the same;

(2) Examine the state
of the dockets of the courts and determine the need for assistance by any
court;

(3) Make
recommendations to the chief justice relating to the assignment of judges where
courts are in need of assistance and carry out the direction of the chief
justice as to the assignments of judges to counties and districts where the
courts are in need of assistance;

(4) Collect and compile
statistical and other data and make reports of the business transacted by the
courts and transmit the same to the chief justice to the end that proper action
may be taken in respect thereto;

(5) Prepare and submit
budget estimates of state appropriations necessary for the maintenance and
operation of the judicial system and make recommendations in respect thereto;

(6) Collect statistical
and other data and make reports relating to the expenditure of public moneys,
state and local, for the maintenance and operation of the judicial system and
the offices connected therewith;

(7) Obtain reports from
clerks of courts in accordance with law or rules adopted by the supreme court
of this state on cases and other judicial business in which action has been
delayed beyond periods of time specified by law or rules of court and make
report thereof to supreme court of this state;

(8) Act as secretary of
the judicial conference referred to in RCW 2.56.060;

(9) Submit annually, as
of February 1st, to the chief justice, a report of the activities of the administrator's
office for the preceding calendar year including activities related to
courthouse security;

(10) Administer
programs and standards for the training and education of judicial personnel;

(11) Examine the need
for new superior court and district judge positions under ((a weighted
caseload)) an objective workload analysis that takes into account ((the
time required to hear all the cases in a particular court and the amount of
time existing judges have available to hear cases in that)) available judicial
resources and the caseload activity of each court. The results of the ((weighted
caseload)) objective workload analysis shall be reviewed by the
board for judicial administration which shall make recommendations to the
legislature. It is the intent of the legislature that ((weighted caseload))
an objective workload analysis become the basis for creating additional
district court positions, and recommendations should address that objective;

(12) Provide staff to
the judicial retirement account plan under chapter 2.14 RCW;

(13) Attend to such
other matters as may be assigned by the supreme court of this state;

(14) Within available
funds, develop a curriculum for a general understanding of child development,
placement, and treatment resources, as well as specific legal skills and
knowledge of relevant statutes including chapters 13.32A, 13.34, and 13.40 RCW,
cases, court rules, interviewing skills, and special needs of the abused or
neglected child. This curriculum shall be completed and made available to all
juvenile court judges, court personnel, and service providers and be updated
yearly to reflect changes in statutes, court rules, or case law;

(15) Develop, in
consultation with the entities set forth in RCW 2.56.150(3), a comprehensive
statewide curriculum for persons who act as guardians ad litem under Title 13
or 26 RCW. The curriculum shall be made available July 1, 1997, and include
specialty sections on child development, child sexual abuse, child physical
abuse, child neglect, clinical and forensic investigative and interviewing
techniques, family reconciliation and mediation services, and relevant
statutory and legal requirements. The curriculum shall be made available to
all superior court judges, court personnel, and all persons who act as
guardians ad litem;

(16) Develop a
curriculum for a general understanding of crimes of malicious harassment, as
well as specific legal skills and knowledge of RCW 9A.36.080, relevant cases,
court rules, and the special needs of malicious harassment victims. This
curriculum shall be made available to all superior court and court of appeals
judges and to all justices of the supreme court;

(17) Develop, in
consultation with the criminal justice training commission and the commissions
established under chapters 43.113, 43.115, and 43.117 RCW, a curriculum for a
general understanding of ethnic and cultural diversity and its implications for
working with youth of color and their families. The curriculum shall be
available to all superior court judges and court commissioners assigned to
juvenile court, and other court personnel. Ethnic and cultural diversity
training shall be provided annually so as to incorporate cultural sensitivity
and awareness into the daily operation of juvenile courts statewide;

(18) Authorize the use
of closed circuit television and other electronic equipment in judicial
proceedings. The administrator shall promulgate necessary standards and
procedures and shall provide technical assistance to courts as required;

(19) Administer
state funds for improving the operation of the courts and provide support for
court coordinating councils, under the direction of the board for judicial
administration.

Sec. 8. RCW 2.56.120 and 1986 c
158 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts, in cooperation with
appropriate legislative committees and legislative staff, shall establish a
procedure for the provision of judicial impact notes on the effect legislative
bills will have on the workload and administration of the courts of this
state. The ((administrator for)) administrative office of the
courts and the office of financial management shall coordinate the development
of judicial impact notes with the preparation of fiscal notes under chapters
43.88A and 43.132 RCW.

(2) The ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts shall provide a judicial
impact note on any legislative proposal at the request of any legislator. The
note shall be provided to the requesting legislator and copies filed with the
appropriate legislative committees in accordance with subsection (3) of this
section when the proposed legislation is introduced in either house.

(3) When a judicial
impact note is prepared and approved by the ((administrator for)) administrative
office of the courts, copies of the note shall be filed with:

(a) The chairperson of
the committee to which the bill was referred upon introduction in the house of
origin;

(b) The senate
committee on ways and means;

(c) The house of
representatives committee on ways and means;

(d) The senate
judiciary committee;

(e) The house of
representatives judiciary committee; and

(f) The office of
financial management.

(4) This section shall
not prevent either house of the legislature from acting on any bill before it
as otherwise provided by the state Constitution, by law, and by the rules and
joint rules of the senate and house of representatives, nor shall the lack of
any judicial impact note as provided in this section or any error in the
accuracy thereof affect the validity of any measure otherwise duly passed by
the legislature.

Sec. 9. RCW 2.56.150 and 1996 c
249 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The administrator
for the courts shall review the advisability and feasibility of the statewide
mandatory use of court-appointed special advocates as described in RCW
26.12.175 to act as guardians ad litem in appropriate cases under Titles 13 and
26 RCW. The review must explore the feasibility of obtaining various sources
of private and public funding to implement statewide mandatory use of
court-appointed special advocates, such as grants and donations, instead of or
in combination with raising court fees or assessments.

(2) The administrator
shall also conduct a study on the feasibility and desirability of requiring all
persons who act as guardians ad litem under Titles 11, 13, and 26 RCW to be
certified as qualified guardians ad litem prior to their eligibility for
appointment.

(3) In conducting the
review and study the administrator shall consult with: (a) The presidents or
directors of all public benefit nonprofit corporations that are eligible to
receive state funds under RCW 43.330.135; (b) the attorney general, or a
designee; (c) the secretary of the department of social and health services, or
a designee; (d) the superior court judges association; (e) the Washington state
bar association; (f) public defenders who represent children under Title 13 or
26 RCW; (g) private attorneys who represent parents under Title 13 or 26 RCW;
(h) professionals who evaluate families for the purposes of determining the
custody or placement decisions of children; (i) the office of financial
management; (j) persons who act as volunteer or compensated guardians ad litem;
and (k) parents who have dealt with guardians ad litem in court cases. For the
purposes of studying the feasibility of a certification requirement for
guardians ad litem acting under Title 11 RCW the administrator shall consult
with the advisory group formed under RCW 11.88.090.

(4) The ((office of
the)) administrator ((for the courts)) shall also conduct a review
of problems and concerns about the role of guardians ad litem in actions under
Titles 11, 13, and 26 RCW and recommend alternatives to strengthen judicial
oversight of guardians ad litem and ensure fairness and impartiality of the
process. The ((office of the)) administrator ((for the courts))
must accept and obtain comments from parties designated in subsection (3) of
this section.

Sec. 10. 2000 c 111 s 8
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The program established
by the ((office of the)) administrator for the courts pursuant to RCW
2.56.160 shall by June 1, 2003, report to the legislature on the effectiveness
and costs of the pilot program. Copies of the report shall be distributed to
the house of representatives judiciary committee and the senate judiciary
committee.

Sec. 11. RCW 2.68.020 and 1994 c
8 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created an
account in the custody of the state treasurer to be known as the judicial
information system account. The administrative office of the ((administrator
for the)) courts shall maintain and administer the account, in which shall
be deposited all moneys received from in-state noncourt users and any
out-of-state users of the judicial information system and moneys as specified
in RCW 2.68.040 for the purposes of providing judicial information system
access to noncourt users and providing an adequate level of automated services
to the judiciary. The legislature shall appropriate the funds in the account
for the purposes of the judicial information system. The account shall be used
for the acquisition of equipment, software, supplies, services, and other costs
incidental to the acquisition, development, operation, and administration of
information services, telecommunications, systems, software, supplies, and
equipment, including the payment of principal and interest on items paid in
installments.

Sec. 12. RCW 2.70.050 and 1996 c
221 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All powers, duties,
and functions of the supreme court and the administrative office of the
((administrator for the)) courts pertaining to appellate indigent
defense are transferred to the office of public defense.

(2)(a) All reports,
documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the
possession of the supreme court or the administrative office of the ((administrator
for the)) courts pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the office of public defense.
All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the supreme court or the administrative office of
the ((administrator for the)) courts in carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to the office of
public defense. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with
the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the office
of public defense.

(b) Any appropriations
made to the supreme court or the administrative office of the ((administrator
for the)) courts for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall, on June 6, 1996, be transferred and credited to the office
of public defense.

(c) Whenever any question
arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records,
papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the
exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions
transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as
to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of
the supreme court or the administrative office of the ((administrator
for the)) courts engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties
transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the office of public
defense. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil
service law, are assigned to the office of public defense to perform their
usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights,
subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the
laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all pending
business before the supreme court or the administrative office of the ((administrator
for the)) courts pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the office of public defense.
All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be
performed by the office of public defense.

(5) The transfer of the
powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the supreme court or the administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts shall not affect the
validity of any act performed before June 6, 1996.

(6) If apportionments
of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this
section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments
to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of
these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and
appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the
certification.

(7)
Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any existing
collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective
bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining
unit has been modified by action of the personnel board as provided by law.

Sec. 13. RCW 3.46.030 and 2000 c
111 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

A municipal department
shall have exclusive jurisdiction of matters arising from ordinances of the
city, and no jurisdiction of other matters except as conferred by statute. A
municipal department participating in the program established by the administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts pursuant to RCW 2.56.160
shall have jurisdiction to take recognizance, approve bail, and arraign
defendants held within its jurisdiction on warrants issued by any court of
limited jurisdiction participating in the program.

Sec. 14. RCW 3.50.020 and 2000 c
111 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The municipal court
shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over traffic infractions arising
under city ordinances and exclusive original criminal jurisdiction of all
violations of city ordinances duly adopted by the city in which the municipal
court is located and shall have original jurisdiction of all other actions
brought to enforce or recover license penalties or forfeitures declared or
given by such ordinances or by state statutes. The municipal court shall also
have the jurisdiction as conferred by statute. The municipal court is
empowered to forfeit cash bail or bail bonds and issue execution thereon; and
in general to hear and determine all causes, civil or criminal, including
traffic infractions, arising under such ordinances and to pronounce judgment in
accordance therewith. A municipal court participating in the program
established by the administrative office of the ((administrator for
the)) courts pursuant to RCW 2.56.160 shall have jurisdiction to take
recognizance, approve bail, and arraign defendants held within its jurisdiction
on warrants issued by any court of limited jurisdiction participating in the
program.

Sec. 15. RCW 3.66.010 and 2000 c
111 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The justices of the
peace elected in accordance with chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW are authorized
to hold court as judges of the district court for the trial of all actions
enumerated in chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW or assigned to the district court
by law; to hear, try, and determine the same according to the law, and for that
purpose where no special provision is otherwise made by law, such court shall
be vested with all the necessary powers which are possessed by courts of record
in this state; and all laws of a general nature shall apply to such district
court as far as the same may be applicable and not inconsistent with the
provisions of chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW. The district court shall, upon
the demand of either party, impanel a jury to try any civil or criminal case in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 12.12 RCW. No jury trial may be held
in a proceeding involving a traffic infraction.

(2) A district court
participating in the program established by the administrative office of
the ((administrator for the)) courts pursuant to RCW 2.56.160 shall have
jurisdiction to take recognizance, approve bail, and arraign defendants held
within its jurisdiction on warrants issued by any other court of limited
jurisdiction participating in the program.

Sec. 16. RCW 3.66.070 and 2001 c
15 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All criminal
actions shall be brought in the district where the alleged violation occurred:
PROVIDED, That (a) the prosecuting attorney may file felony cases in the
district in which the county seat is located, (b) with the consent of the
defendant criminal actions other than those arising out of violations of city
ordinances may be brought in or transferred to the district in which the county
seat is located, (c) if the alleged violation relates to driving, or being in
actual physical control of, a motor vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug and the alleged violation occurred within a
judicial district which has been designated an enhanced enforcement district
under RCW 2.56.110, the charges may be filed in that district or in a district
within the same county which is adjacent to the district in which the alleged
violation occurred, and (d) a district court participating in the program
established by the administrative office of the ((administrator for
the)) courts pursuant to RCW 2.56.160 shall have jurisdiction to take
recognizance, approve bail, and arraign defendants held within its jurisdiction
on warrants issued by any other court of limited jurisdiction participating in
the program.

(2) In the event of an
emergency created by act of nature, civil unrest, technological failure, or
other hazardous condition, temporary venue for court of limited jurisdiction
matters may be had in a court district not impacted by the emergency. Such
emergency venue is appropriate only for the duration of the emergency.

(3) A criminal action
commenced under a local ordinance is deemed to be properly heard by the court
of original jurisdiction even though the hearing may take place by video or
other electronic means as approved by the supreme court and the defendant is
appearing by an electronic method from a location outside the court's
geographic jurisdiction or boundaries.

Sec. 17. RCW 9.73.230 and 1989 c
271 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As part of a bona
fide criminal investigation, the chief law enforcement officer of a law
enforcement agency or his or her designee above the rank of first line
supervisor may authorize the interception, transmission, or recording of a
conversation or communication by officers under the following circumstances:

(a) At least one party
to the conversation or communication has consented to the interception,
transmission, or recording;

(b) Probable cause
exists to believe that the conversation or communication involves the unlawful
manufacture, delivery, sale, or possession with intent to manufacture, deliver,
or sell, controlled substances as defined in chapter 69.50 RCW, or legend drugs
as defined in chapter 69.41 RCW, or imitation controlled substances as defined
in chapter 69.52 RCW; and

(c) A written report
has been completed as required by subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The agency's chief
officer or designee authorizing an interception, transmission, or recording
under subsection (1) of this section, shall prepare and sign a written report
at the time of authorization indicating:

(a) The circumstances
that meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section;

(b) The names of the
authorizing and consenting parties, except that in those cases where the
consenting party is a confidential informant, the name of the confidential
informant need not be divulged;

(c) The names of the
officers authorized to intercept, transmit, and record the conversation or
communication;

(d) The identity of the
particular person or persons, if known, who may have committed or may commit
the offense;

(e) The details of the
particular offense or offenses that may have been or may be committed and the
expected date, location, and approximate time of the conversation or
communication; and

(f) Whether there was
an attempt to obtain authorization pursuant to RCW 9.73.090(2) and, if there
was such an attempt, the outcome of the attempt.

(3) An authorization
under this section is valid in all jurisdictions within Washington state and
for the interception of communications from additional persons if the persons
are brought into the conversation or transaction by the nonconsenting party or
if the nonconsenting party or such additional persons cause or invite the
consenting party to enter another jurisdiction.

(4) The recording of
any conversation or communication under this section shall be done in such a
manner that protects the recording from editing or other alterations.

(5) An authorization
made under this section is valid for no more than twenty-four hours from the
time it is signed by the authorizing officer, and each authorization shall
independently meet all of the requirements of this section. The authorizing
officer shall sign the written report required under subsection (2) of this
section, certifying the exact date and time of his or her signature. An
authorization under this section may be extended not more than twice for an
additional consecutive twenty-four hour period based upon the same probable
cause regarding the same suspected transaction. Each such extension shall be
signed by the authorizing officer.

(6) Within fifteen days
after the signing of an authorization that results in any interception,
transmission, or recording of a conversation or communication pursuant to this
section, the law enforcement agency which made the interception, transmission,
or recording shall submit a report including the original authorization under
subsection (2) of this section to a judge of a court having jurisdiction which
report shall identify (a) the persons, including the consenting party, who
participated in the conversation, and (b) the date, location, and approximate
time of the conversation.

In those cases where
the consenting party is a confidential informant, the name of the confidential
informant need not be divulged.

A monthly report shall
be filed by the law enforcement agency with the administrator for the courts
indicating the number of authorizations granted, the date and time of each
authorization, interceptions made, arrests resulting from an interception, and
subsequent invalidations.

(7)(a) Within two
judicial days of receipt of a report under subsection (6) of this section, the
court shall make an ex parte review of the authorization, but not of the
evidence, and shall make a determination whether the requirements of subsection
(1) of this section were met. If the court determines that any of the requirements
of subsection (1) of this section were not met, the court shall order that any
recording and any copies or transcriptions of the conversation or communication
be destroyed. Destruction of recordings, copies, or transcriptions shall be
stayed pending any appeal of a finding that the requirements of subsection (1)
of this section were not met.

(b) Absent a
continuation under (c) of this subsection, six months following a determination
under (a) of this subsection that probable cause did not exist, the court shall
cause a notice to be mailed to the last known address of any nonconsenting
party to the conversation or communication that was the subject of the
authorization. The notice shall indicate the date, time, and place of any
interception, transmission, or recording made pursuant to the authorization.
The notice shall also identify the agency that sought the authorization and
shall indicate that a review under (a) of this subsection resulted in a
determination that the authorization was made in violation of this section.

(c) An authorizing
agency may obtain six-month extensions to the notice requirement of (b) of this
subsection in cases of active, ongoing criminal investigations that might be
jeopardized by sending the notice.

(8) In any subsequent
judicial proceeding, evidence obtained through the interception or recording of
a conversation or communication pursuant to this section shall be admissible
only if:

(a) The court finds
that the requirements of subsection (1) of this section were met and the
evidence is used in prosecuting an offense listed in subsection (1)(b) of this
section; or

(b) The evidence is
admitted with the permission of the person whose communication or conversation
was intercepted, transmitted, or recorded; or

(c) The evidence is
admitted in a prosecution for a "serious violent offense" as defined
in RCW 9.94A.030 in which a party who consented to the interception,
transmission, or recording was a victim of the offense; or

(d) The evidence is
admitted in a civil suit for personal injury or wrongful death arising out of
the same incident, in which a party who consented to the interception,
transmission, or recording was a victim of a serious violent offense as defined
in RCW 9.94A.030.

Nothing in this subsection
bars the admission of testimony of a party or eyewitness to the intercepted,
transmitted, or recorded conversation or communication when that testimony is
unaided by information obtained solely by violation of RCW 9.73.030.

(9) Any determination of
invalidity of an authorization under this section shall be reported by the
court to the administrative office of the ((administrator for the))
courts.

(10) Any person who
intentionally intercepts, transmits, or records or who intentionally authorizes
the interception, transmission, or recording of a conversation or communication
in violation of this section, is guilty of a class C felony punishable
according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(11) An authorizing
agency is liable for twenty-five thousand dollars in exemplary damages, in
addition to any other damages authorized by this chapter or by other law, to a
person whose conversation or communication was intercepted, transmitted, or
recorded pursuant to an authorization under this section if:

(a) In a review under
subsection (7) of this section, or in a suppression of evidence proceeding, it
has been determined that the authorization was made without the probable cause
required by subsection (1)(b) of this section; and

(b) The
authorization was also made without a reasonable suspicion that the
conversation or communication would involve the unlawful acts identified in
subsection (1)(b) of this section.

Sec. 18. RCW 9.94A.660 and 2001 c
10 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An offender is
eligible for the special drug offender sentencing alternative if:

(a) The offender is
convicted of a felony that is not a violent offense or sex offense and the
violation does not involve a sentence enhancement under RCW 9.94A.510 (3) or
(4);

(b) The offender has no
current or prior convictions for a sex offense or violent offense in this
state, another state, or the United States;

(c) For a violation of
the Uniform Controlled Substances Act under chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal
solicitation to commit such a violation under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the offense
involved only a small quantity of the particular controlled substance as determined
by the judge upon consideration of such factors as the weight, purity,
packaging, sale price, and street value of the controlled substance; and

(d) The offender has
not been found by the United States attorney general to be subject to a
deportation detainer or order and does not become subject to a deportation
order during the period of the sentence.

(2) If the standard
sentence range is greater than one year and the sentencing court determines
that the offender is eligible for this alternative and that the offender and
the community will benefit from the use of the alternative, the judge may waive
imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range and impose a
sentence that must include a period of total confinement in a state facility
for one-half of the midpoint of the standard sentence range. During
incarceration in the state facility, offenders sentenced under this subsection
shall undergo a comprehensive substance abuse assessment and receive, within
available resources, treatment services appropriate for the offender. The
treatment services shall be designed by the division of alcohol and substance
abuse of the department of social and health services, in cooperation with the
department of corrections.

The court shall also
impose:

(a) The remainder of
the midpoint of the standard range as a term of community custody which must
include appropriate substance abuse treatment in a program that has been
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of
social and health services;

(b) Crime-related
prohibitions including a condition not to use illegal controlled substances;

(c) A requirement to
submit to urinalysis or other testing to monitor that status; and

(d) A term of community
custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.715 to be imposed upon failure to complete or
administrative termination from the special drug offender sentencing
alternative program.

The court may prohibit
the offender from using alcohol or controlled substances and may require that
the monitoring for controlled substances be conducted by the department or by a
treatment alternatives to street crime program or a comparable court or
agency-referred program. The offender may be required to pay thirty dollars
per month while on community custody to offset the cost of monitoring. In
addition, the court shall impose three or more of the following conditions:

(i) Devote time to a
specific employment or training;

(ii) Remain within
prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the community corrections
officer before any change in the offender's address or employment;

(iii) Report as
directed to a community corrections officer;

(iv) Pay all
court-ordered legal financial obligations;

(v) Perform community
service work;

(vi) Stay out of areas
designated by the sentencing court;

(vii) Such other
conditions as the court may require such as affirmative conditions.

(3) If the offender
violates any of the sentence conditions in subsection (2) of this section or is
found by the United States attorney general to be subject to a deportation
order, a violation hearing shall be held by the department unless waived by the
offender.

(a) If the department
finds that conditions have been willfully violated, the offender may be
reclassified to serve the remaining balance of the original sentence.

(b) If the department
finds that the offender is subject to a valid deportation order, the department
may administratively terminate the offender from the program and reclassify the
offender to serve the remaining balance of the original sentence.

(4) The department
shall determine the rules for calculating the value of a day fine based on the
offender's income and reasonable obligations which the offender has for the
support of the offender and any dependents. These rules shall be developed in
consultation with the ((administrator for)) administrative office of
the courts, the office of financial management, and the commission.

(5) An offender who
fails to complete the special drug offender sentencing alternative program or
who is administratively terminated from the program shall be reclassified to
serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence as ordered by the sentencing
court and shall be subject to all rules relating to earned release time. An
offender who violates any conditions of supervision as defined by the
department shall be sanctioned. Sanctions may include, but are not limited to,
reclassifying the offender to serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence
as ordered by the sentencing court. If an offender is reclassified to serve
the unexpired term of his or her sentence, the offender shall be subject to all
rules relating to earned release time.

Sec. 19. RCW 9.94A.850 and 2000 c
28 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A sentencing
guidelines commission is established as an agency of state government.

(2) The legislature
finds that the commission, having accomplished its original statutory directive
to implement this chapter, and having expertise in sentencing practice and
policies, shall:

(a) Evaluate state
sentencing policy, to include whether the sentencing ranges and standards are
consistent with and further:

(i) The purposes of
this chapter as defined in RCW 9.94A.010; and

(ii) The intent of the
legislature to emphasize confinement for the violent offender and alternatives
to confinement for the nonviolent offender.

The commission shall
provide the governor and the legislature with its evaluation and
recommendations under this subsection not later than December 1, 1996, and
every two years thereafter;

(b) Recommend to the
legislature revisions or modifications to the standard sentence ranges, state
sentencing policy, prosecuting standards, and other standards. If
implementation of the revisions or modifications would result in exceeding the
capacity of correctional facilities, then the commission shall accompany its
recommendation with an additional list of standard sentence ranges which are
consistent with correction capacity;

(c) Study the existing
criminal code and from time to time make recommendations to the legislature for
modification;

(d)(i) Serve as a
clearinghouse and information center for the collection, preparation, analysis,
and dissemination of information on state and local adult and juvenile
sentencing practices; (ii) develop and maintain a computerized adult and
juvenile sentencing information system by individual superior court judge
consisting of offender, offense, history, and sentence information entered from
judgment and sentence forms for all adult felons; and (iii) conduct ongoing
research regarding adult and juvenile sentencing guidelines, use of total
confinement and alternatives to total confinement, plea bargaining, and other
matters relating to the improvement of the adult criminal justice system and
the juvenile justice system;

(e) Assume the powers
and duties of the juvenile disposition standards commission after June 30,
1996;

(f) Evaluate the
effectiveness of existing disposition standards and related statutes in
implementing policies set forth in RCW 13.40.010 generally, specifically review
the guidelines relating to the confinement of minor and first-time offenders as
well as the use of diversion, and review the application of current and
proposed juvenile sentencing standards and guidelines for potential adverse
impacts on the sentencing outcomes of racial and ethnic minority youth;

(g) Solicit the
comments and suggestions of the juvenile justice community concerning
disposition standards, and make recommendations to the legislature regarding
revisions or modifications of the standards. The evaluations shall be
submitted to the legislature on December 1 of each odd-numbered year. The
department of social and health services shall provide the commission with
available data concerning the implementation of the disposition standards and
related statutes and their effect on the performance of the department's
responsibilities relating to juvenile offenders, and with recommendations for
modification of the disposition standards. The administrative office of
the ((administrator for the)) courts shall provide the commission with
available data on diversion and dispositions of juvenile offenders under
chapter 13.40 RCW; and

(h) Not later than
December 1, 1997, and at least every two years thereafter, based on available
information, report to the governor and the legislature on:

(i) Racial
disproportionality in juvenile and adult sentencing;

(ii) The capacity of
state and local juvenile and adult facilities and resources; and

(iii) Recidivism
information on adult and juvenile offenders.

(3) Each of the
commission's recommended standard sentence ranges shall include one or more of
the following: Total confinement, partial confinement, community supervision,
community service, and a fine.

(4) The standard
sentence ranges of total and partial confinement under this chapter are subject
to the following limitations:

(a) If the maximum term
in the range is one year or less, the minimum term in the range shall be no
less than one-third of the maximum term in the range, except that if the
maximum term in the range is ninety days or less, the minimum term may be less
than one-third of the maximum;

(b) If the maximum term
in the range is greater than one year, the minimum term in the range shall be
no less than seventy-five percent of the maximum term in the range, except that
for murder in the second degree in seriousness level XIV under RCW 9.94A.510,
the minimum term in the range shall be no less than fifty percent of the
maximum term in the range; and

(c) The maximum term of
confinement in a range may not exceed the statutory maximum for the crime as
provided in RCW 9A.20.021.

(5)(a) Not later than
December 31, 1999, the commission shall propose to the legislature the initial
community custody ranges to be included in sentences under RCW 9.94A.715 for
crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000. Not later than December 31 of each
year, the commission may propose modifications to the ranges. The ranges shall
be based on the principles in RCW 9.94A.010, and shall take into account the
funds available to the department for community custody. The minimum term in
each range shall not be less than one-half of the maximum term.

(b) The legislature
may, by enactment of a legislative bill, adopt or modify the community custody
ranges proposed by the commission. If the legislature fails to adopt or modify
the initial ranges in its next regular session after they are proposed, the
proposed ranges shall take effect without legislative approval for crimes
committed on or after July 1, 2000.

(c) When the commission
proposes modifications to ranges pursuant to this subsection, the legislature
may, by enactment of a bill, adopt or modify the ranges proposed by the
commission for crimes committed on or after July 1 of the year after they were
proposed. Unless the legislature adopts or modifies the commission's proposal
in its next regular session, the proposed ranges shall not take effect.

(6) The commission
shall exercise its duties under this section in conformity with chapter 34.05
RCW.

Sec. 20. RCW 9.94A.855 and 1999 c
143 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall
appoint a research staff of sufficient size and with sufficient resources to
accomplish its duties. The commission may request from the office of financial
management, the indeterminate sentence review board, ((administrator for))
the administrative office of the courts, the department of corrections,
and the department of social and health services such data, information, and
data processing assistance as it may need to accomplish its duties, and such
services shall be provided without cost to the commission. The commission
shall adopt its own bylaws.

The salary for a
full-time executive officer, if any, shall be fixed by the governor pursuant to
RCW 43.03.040.

Sec. 21. 1983 c 199 s 2
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts shall notify all courts
of the requirements contained in RCW 10.40.200. The judicial council shall
recommend to the supreme court appropriate court rules to ensure compliance
with the requirements of RCW 10.40.200. Until court rules are promulgated, the
administrative office of the ((administrator for the)) courts
shall develop and distribute forms necessary for the courts to comply with RCW
10.40.200.

Sec. 22. RCW 10.64.120 and 1996 c
298 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every judge of a
court of limited jurisdiction shall have the authority to levy upon a person a
monthly assessment not to exceed one hundred dollars for services provided
whenever the person is referred by the court to the misdemeanant probation
department for evaluation or supervision services. The assessment may also be
made by a judge in superior court when such misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
cases are heard in the superior court.

(2) For the purposes of
this section the administrative office of the ((administrator for the))
courts shall define a probation department and adopt rules for the
qualifications of probation officers based on occupational and educational
requirements developed by an oversight committee. This oversight committee
shall include a representative from the district and municipal court judges
association, the misdemeanant corrections association, the administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts, and associations of
cities and counties. The oversight committee shall consider qualifications
that provide the training and education necessary to (a) conduct presentencing
and postsentencing background investigations, including sentencing
recommendations to the court regarding jail terms, alternatives to
incarceration, and conditions of release; and (b) provide ongoing supervision
and assessment of offenders' needs and the risk they pose to the community.

(3) It shall be the
responsibility of the probation services office to implement local procedures
approved by the court of limited jurisdiction to ensure collection and payment
of such fees into the general fund of the city or county treasury.

(4) Revenues raised
under this section shall be used to fund programs for probation services and
shall be in addition to those funds provided in RCW 3.62.050.

Sec. 23. RCW 10.98.080 and 1985 c
201 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The section shall
promptly furnish a state identification number to the originating agency and to
the prosecuting attorney who received a copy of the arrest and fingerprint
form. In the case of juvenile felony-like adjudications, the section shall
furnish, upon request, the state identification number to the juvenile
information section of the ((administrator for)) administrative
office of the courts.

Sec. 24. RCW 10.98.100 and 1985 c
201 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The section shall
administer a compliance audit at least once annually for each prosecuting
attorney, district and municipal court, and originating agency to ensure that
all disposition reports have been received and added to the criminal offender
record information described in RCW 43.43.705. The section shall prepare
listings of all arrests charged and listed in the criminal offender record
information for which no disposition report has been received and which has
been outstanding for more than nine months since the date of arrest. Each
prosecuting attorney, district and municipal court, and originating agency
shall be furnished a list of outstanding disposition reports. Cases pending
prosecution shall be considered outstanding dispositions in the compliance
audit. Within forty-five days, the prosecuting attorney, district and
municipal court, and originating agency shall provide the section with a
current disposition report for each outstanding disposition. The section shall
assist prosecuting attorneys with the compliance audit by cross-checking
outstanding cases with the ((administrator for)) administrative
office of the courts and the department of corrections. The section may
provide technical assistance to prosecuting attorneys, district or municipal
courts, or originating agencies for their compliance audits. The results of
compliance audits shall be published annually and distributed to legislative
committees dealing with criminal justice issues, the office of financial
management, and criminal justice agencies and associations.

Sec. 25. RCW 10.98.160 and 1999 c
143 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

In the
development and modification of the procedures, definitions, and reporting
capabilities of the section, the department, the office of financial
management, and the responsible agencies and persons shall consider the needs
of other criminal justice agencies such as the ((administrator for)) administrative
office of the courts, local law enforcement agencies, jailers, the
sentencing guidelines commission, the indeterminate sentence review board, the
clemency board, prosecuting attorneys, and affected state agencies such as the
office of financial management and legislative committees dealing with criminal
justice issues. An executive committee appointed by the heads of the
department, the Washington state patrol, and the office of financial management
shall review and provide recommendations for development and modification of
the section, the department, and the office of financial management's felony
criminal information systems.

Sec. 26. RCW 13.34.102 and 2000 c
124 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All guardians ad
litem must comply with the training requirements established under RCW
2.56.030(15), prior to their appointment in cases under Title 13 RCW, except
that volunteer guardians ad litem or court-appointed special advocates may
comply with alternative training requirements approved by the administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts that meet or exceed the
statewide requirements.

(2)(a) Each guardian ad
litem program for compensated guardians ad litem shall establish a rotational
registry system for the appointment of guardians ad litem. If a judicial
district does not have a program the court shall establish the rotational
registry system. Guardians ad litem shall be selected from the registry except
in exceptional circumstances as determined and documented by the court. The
parties may make a joint recommendation for the appointment of a guardian ad
litem from the registry.

(b) In judicial
districts with a population over one hundred thousand, a list of three names
shall be selected from the registry and given to the parties along with the
background information as specified in RCW 13.34.100(3), including their hourly
rate for services. Each party may, within three judicial days, strike one name
from the list. If more than one name remains on the list, the court shall make
the appointment from the names on the list. In the event all three names are
stricken the person whose name appears next on the registry shall be appointed.

(c) If a party
reasonably believes that the appointed guardian ad litem lacks the necessary
expertise for the proceeding, charges an hourly rate higher than what is
reasonable for the particular proceeding, or has a conflict of interest, the
party may, within three judicial days from the appointment, move for
substitution of the appointed guardian ad litem by filing a motion with the
court.

(d) The superior court
shall remove any person from the guardian ad litem registry who misrepresents
his or her qualifications pursuant to a grievance procedure established by the
court.

(3) The
rotational registry system shall not apply to court-appointed special advocate
programs.

Sec. 27. RCW 13.64.080 and 1993 c
294 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts shall prepare and
distribute to the county court clerks appropriate forms for minors seeking to
initiate a petition of emancipation.

Sec. 28. RCW 13.70.130 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 17 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts may apply for and receive
funds from federal, local, and private sources for carrying out the purposes of
this chapter.

Sec. 29. RCW 26.12.177 and 2000 c
124 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All guardians ad
litem and investigators appointed under this title must comply with the
training requirements established under RCW 2.56.030(15), prior to their
appointment in cases under Title 26 RCW, except that volunteer guardians ad
litem or court-appointed special advocates may comply with alternative training
requirements approved by the administrative office of the ((administrator
for the)) courts that meet or exceed the statewide requirements.

(2)(a) Each guardian ad
litem program for compensated guardians ad litem shall establish a rotational
registry system for the appointment of guardians ad litem and investigators
under this title. If a judicial district does not have a program the court
shall establish the rotational registry system. Guardians ad litem and
investigators under this title shall be selected from the registry except in
exceptional circumstances as determined and documented by the court. The
parties may make a joint recommendation for the appointment of a guardian ad
litem from the registry.

(b) In judicial
districts with a population over one hundred thousand, a list of three names
shall be selected from the registry and given to the parties along with the
background information as specified in RCW 26.12.175(3), including their hourly
rate for services. Each party may, within three judicial days, strike one name
from the list. If more than one name remains on the list, the court shall make
the appointment from the names on the list. In the event all three names are
stricken the person whose name appears next on the registry shall be appointed.

(c) If a party
reasonably believes that the appointed guardian ad litem lacks the necessary
expertise for the proceeding, charges an hourly rate higher than what is
reasonable for the particular proceeding, or has a conflict of interest, the
party may, within three judicial days from the appointment, move for
substitution of the appointed guardian ad litem by filing a motion with the
court.

(d) Under this section,
within either registry referred to in (a) of this subsection, a subregistry may
be created that consists of guardians ad litem under contract with the
department of social and health services' division of child support. Guardians
ad litem on such a subregistry shall be selected and appointed in
state-initiated paternity cases only.

(e) The superior court
shall remove any person from the guardian ad litem registry who misrepresents
his or her qualifications pursuant to a grievance procedure established by the
court.

(3) The
rotational registry system shall not apply to court-appointed special advocate
programs.

Sec. 30. RCW 26.12.802 and 1999 c
397 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts shall conduct a unified
family court pilot program.

(1) Pilot program sites
shall be selected through a request for proposal process, and shall be
established in no more than three superior court judicial districts.

(2) To be eligible for
consideration as a pilot project site, judicial districts must have a
statutorily authorized judicial complement of at least five judges.

(3) The ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts shall develop criteria for
the unified family court pilot program. The pilot program shall include:

(a) All case types
under Title 13 RCW, chapters 26.09, 26.10, 26.12, 26.18, 26.19, 26.20, 26.26,
26.50, 26.27, and 28A.225 RCW;

(b) Unified family
court judicial officers, who volunteer for the program, and meet training
requirements established by local court rule;

(c) Case management
practices that provide a flexible response to the diverse court-related needs
of families involved in multiple areas of the justice system. Case management
practices should result in a reduction in process redundancies and an efficient
use of time and resources, and create a system enabling multiple case type
resolution by one judicial officer or judicial team;

(d) A court facilitator
to provide assistance to parties with matters before the unified family court;
and

(e) An emphasis on
providing nonadversarial methods of dispute resolution such as a settlement
conference, evaluative mediation by attorney mediators, and facilitative
mediation by nonattorney mediators.

(4) The administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts shall publish and
disseminate a state-approved listing of definitions of nonadversarial methods
of dispute resolution so that court officials, practitioners, and users can
choose the most appropriate process for the matter at hand.

(5) The administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts shall provide to the
judicial districts selected for the pilot program the computer resources needed
by each judicial district to implement the unified family court pilot program.

(6) The administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts shall conduct a study of
the pilot program measuring improvements in the judicial system's response to
family involvement in the judicial system. The administrator for the courts
shall report preliminary findings and final results of the study to the
governor, the chief justice of the supreme court, and the legislature on a
biennial basis. The initial report is due by July 1, 2000, and the final
report is due by December 1, 2004.

Sec. 31. RCW 26.12.804 and 1999 c
397 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The judges of the
superior court judicial districts with unified family court pilot programs
shall adopt local court rules directing the program. The local court rules
shall comply with the criteria established by the ((administrator for)) administrative
office of the courts and shall include:

(1) A requirement that
all judicial officers hearing cases in unified family court:

(a) Complete an initial
training program including the topic areas of childhood development, domestic
violence, cultural awareness, child abuse and neglect, chemical dependency, and
mental illness; and

(b) Subsequent to the
training in (a) of this subsection, annually attend a minimum of eight hours of
continuing education of pertinence to the unified family court;

(2) Case management
that is based on the practice of one judge or judicial team handling all
matters relating to a family;

(3) An emphasis on
coordinating or consolidating, to the extent possible, all cases before the
unified family court relating to a family; and

(4) Programs that
provide for record confidentiality to protect the confidentiality of court
records in accordance with the law. However law enforcement agencies shall have
access to the records to the extent permissible under the law.

Sec. 32. RCW 26.18.210 and 1990
1st ex.s. c 2 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts shall develop a child
support order summary report form to provide for the reporting of summary
information in every case in which a child support order is entered or modified
either judicially or administratively. The ((administrator for)) administrative
office of the courts shall attempt to the greatest extent possible to make
the form simple and understandable by the parties. The form shall indicate the
following:

(a) The county in which
the order was entered and the cause number;

(b) Whether it was a
judicial or administrative order;

(c) Whether the order
is an original order or from a modification;

(d) The number of
children of the parties and the children's ages;

(e) The combined
monthly net income of parties;

(f) The monthly net
income of the father as determined by the court;

(g) The monthly net income
of the mother as determined by the court;

(h) The basic child
support obligation for each child as determined from the economic table;

(i) Whether or not the
court deviated from the child support for each child;

(j) The reason or
reasons stated by the court for the deviation;

(k) The amount of child
support after the deviation;

(l) Any amount awarded
for day care;

(m) Any other
extraordinary amounts in the order;

(n) Any amount ordered
for postsecondary education;

(o) The total amount of
support ordered;

(p) In the case of a
modification, the amount of support in the previous order;

(q) If the change in
support was in excess of thirty percent, whether the change was phased in;

(r) The amount of the
transfer payment ordered;

(s) Which parent was
ordered to make the transfer payment; and

(t) The date of the
entry of the order.

(2) The ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts shall make the form
available to the parties.

Sec. 33. RCW 26.18.220 and 1992 c
229 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts shall develop not later
than July 1, 1991, standard court forms and format rules for mandatory use by
litigants in all actions commenced under chapters 26.09, 26.10, and 26.26 RCW
effective January 1, 1992. The administrator for the courts shall develop
mandatory forms for financial affidavits for integration into the worksheets.
The forms shall be developed and approved not later than September 1, 1992.
The parties shall use the mandatory form for financial affidavits for actions
commenced on or after September 1, 1992. The ((administrator for)) administrative
office of the courts has continuing responsibility to develop and revise
mandatory forms and format rules as appropriate.

(2) A party may delete
unnecessary portions of the forms according to the rules established by the ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts. A party may supplement
the mandatory forms with additional material.

(3) A party's failure
to use the mandatory forms or follow the format rules shall not be a reason to
dismiss a case, refuse a filing, or strike a pleading. However, the court may
require the party to submit a corrected pleading and may impose terms payable
to the opposing party or payable to the court, or both.

(4) The ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts shall distribute a master
copy of the forms to all county court clerks. The ((administrator for))
administrative office of the courts and county clerks shall distribute
the mandatory forms to the public upon request and may charge for the cost of
production and distribution of the forms. Private vendors may distribute the
mandatory forms. Distribution may be in printed or electronic form.

Sec. 34. RCW 26.19.011 and 1991
sp.s. c 28 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Basic child
support obligation" means the monthly child support obligation determined
from the economic table based on the parties' combined monthly net income and
the number of children for whom support is owed.

(2) "Child support
schedule" means the standards, economic table, worksheets, and
instructions, as defined in this chapter.

(3) "Court"
means a superior court judge, court commissioner, and presiding and reviewing
officers who administratively determine or enforce child support orders.

(4)
"Deviation" means a child support amount that differs from the
standard calculation.

(5) "Economic
table" means the child support table for the basic support obligation
provided in RCW 26.19.020.

(6)
"Instructions" means the instructions developed by the administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts pursuant to RCW 26.19.050
for use in completing the worksheets.

(7)
"Standards" means the standards for determination of child support as
provided in this chapter.

(8) "Standard
calculation" means the presumptive amount of child support owed as
determined from the child support schedule before the court considers any
reasons for deviation.

(9) "Support
transfer payment" means the amount of money the court orders one parent to
pay to another parent or custodian for child support after determination of the
standard calculation and deviations. If certain expenses or credits are
expected to fluctuate and the order states a formula or percentage to determine
the additional amount or credit on an ongoing basis, the term "support
transfer payment" does not mean the additional amount or credit.

(10)
"Worksheets" means the forms developed by the administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts pursuant to RCW 26.19.050
for use in determining the amount of child support.

Sec. 35. RCW 26.19.035 and 1992 c
229 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Application of
the child support schedule. The child support schedule shall be applied:

(a) In each county of
the state;

(b) In judicial and
administrative proceedings under this title or Title 13 or 74 RCW;

(c) In all proceedings
in which child support is determined or modified;

(d) In setting
temporary and permanent support;

(e) In automatic
modification provisions or decrees entered pursuant to RCW 26.09.100; and

(f) In addition to
proceedings in which child support is determined for minors, to adult children
who are dependent on their parents and for whom support is ordered pursuant to
RCW 26.09.100.

The provisions of this
chapter for determining child support and reasons for deviation from the
standard calculation shall be applied in the same manner by the court,
presiding officers, and reviewing officers.

(2) Written findings
of fact supported by the evidence. An order for child support shall be
supported by written findings of fact upon which the support determination is
based and shall include reasons for any deviation from the standard calculation
and reasons for denial of a party's request for deviation from the standard
calculation. The court shall enter written findings of fact in all cases
whether or not the court: (a) Sets the support at the presumptive amount, for
combined monthly net incomes below five thousand dollars; (b) sets the support
at an advisory amount, for combined monthly net incomes between five thousand
and seven thousand dollars; or (c) deviates from the presumptive or advisory
amounts.

(3) Completion of
worksheets. Worksheets in the form developed by the administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts shall be completed under
penalty of perjury and filed in every proceeding in which child support is
determined. The court shall not accept incomplete worksheets or worksheets
that vary from the worksheets developed by the administrative office of
the ((administrator for the)) courts.

(4) Court review of
the worksheets and order. The court shall review the worksheets and the
order setting support for the adequacy of the reasons set forth for any
deviation or denial of any request for deviation and for the adequacy of the
amount of support ordered. Each order shall state the amount of child support
calculated using the standard calculation and the amount of child support
actually ordered. Worksheets shall be attached to the decree or order or if
filed separately shall be initialed or signed by the judge and filed with the
order.

Sec. 36. RCW 26.19.050 and 1990
1st ex.s. c 2 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts shall develop and adopt
worksheets and instructions to assist the parties and courts in establishing
the appropriate child support level and apportionment of support. The ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts shall attempt to the
greatest extent possible to make the worksheets and instructions understandable
by persons who are not represented by legal counsel.

(2) The ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts shall develop and adopt
standards for the printing of worksheets and shall establish a process for
certifying printed worksheets. The administrator may maintain a register of
sources for approved worksheets.

(3) The ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts should explore methods to
assist pro se parties and judges in the courtroom to calculate support payments
through automated software, equipment, or personal assistance.

Sec. 37. RCW 26.26.065 and 1992 c
229 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Effective January
1, 1992, a party shall not file any pleading with the clerk of the court in an
action commenced under this chapter unless on forms approved by the ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts.

(2) The parties shall
comply with requirements for submission to the court of forms as provided in
RCW 26.18.220.

Sec. 38. RCW 26.50.030 and 1996 c
248 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall exist an
action known as a petition for an order for protection in cases of domestic
violence.

(1) A petition for
relief shall allege the existence of domestic violence, and shall be
accompanied by an affidavit made under oath stating the specific facts and
circumstances from which relief is sought. Petitioner and respondent shall
disclose the existence of any other litigation concerning the custody or
residential placement of a child of the parties as set forth in RCW 26.27.090
and the existence of any other restraining, protection, or no-contact orders
between the parties.

(2) A petition for
relief may be made regardless of whether or not there is a pending lawsuit,
complaint, petition, or other action between the parties except in cases where
the court realigns petitioner and respondent in accordance with RCW
26.50.060(4).

(3) Within ninety days
of receipt of the master copy from the ((administrator for)) administrative
office of the courts, all court clerk's offices shall make available the
standardized forms, instructions, and informational brochures required by RCW
26.50.035 and shall fill in and keep current specific program names and
telephone numbers for community resources. Any assistance or information
provided by clerks under this section does not constitute the practice of law
and clerks are not responsible for incorrect information contained in a
petition.

(4) No filing fee may
be charged for proceedings under this section. Forms and instructional
brochures shall be provided free of charge.

(5) A person is not
required to post a bond to obtain relief in any proceeding under this section.

Sec. 39. RCW 26.50.035 and 2000 c
119 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts shall develop and prepare
instructions and informational brochures required under RCW 26.50.030(4),
standard petition and order for protection forms, and a court staff handbook on
domestic violence and the protection order process. The standard petition and
order for protection forms must be used after September 1, 1994, for all
petitions filed and orders issued under this chapter. The instructions,
brochures, forms, and handbook shall be prepared in consultation with
interested persons, including a representative of the state domestic violence
coalition, judges, and law enforcement personnel.

(a) The instructions
shall be designed to assist petitioners in completing the petition, and shall
include a sample of standard petition and order for protection forms.

(b) The informational
brochure shall describe the use of and the process for obtaining, modifying,
and terminating a domestic violence protection order as provided under this
chapter, an antiharassment no-contact order as provided under chapter 9A.46
RCW, a domestic violence no-contact order as provided under chapter 10.99 RCW,
a restraining order as provided under chapters 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, and 26.44
RCW, an antiharassment protection order as provided by chapter 10.14 RCW, and a
foreign protection order as defined in chapter 26.52 RCW.

(c) The order for
protection form shall include, in a conspicuous location, notice of criminal
penalties resulting from violation of the order, and the following statement:
"You can be arrested even if the person or persons who obtained the order
invite or allow you to violate the order's prohibitions. The respondent has
the sole responsibility to avoid or refrain from violating the order's
provisions. Only the court can change the order upon written
application."

(d) The court staff
handbook shall allow for the addition of a community resource list by the court
clerk.

(2) All court clerks
shall obtain a community resource list from a domestic violence program,
defined in RCW 70.123.020, serving the county in which the court is located.
The community resource list shall include the names and telephone numbers of
domestic violence programs serving the community in which the court is located,
including law enforcement agencies, domestic violence agencies, sexual assault
agencies, legal assistance programs, interpreters, multicultural programs, and
batterers' treatment programs. The court shall make the community resource
list available as part of or in addition to the informational brochures
described in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts shall distribute a master
copy of the petition and order forms, instructions, and informational brochures
to all court clerks and shall distribute a master copy of the petition and
order forms to all superior, district, and municipal courts.

(4) For purposes of
this section, "court clerks" means court administrators in courts of
limited jurisdiction and elected court clerks.

(5) The ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts shall determine the
significant non-English-speaking or limited English-speaking populations in the
state. The administrator shall then arrange for translation of the
instructions and informational brochures required by this section, which shall
contain a sample of the standard petition and order for protection forms, into
the languages spoken by those significant non-English-speaking populations and
shall distribute a master copy of the translated instructions and informational
brochures to all court clerks by January 1, 1997.

(6) The ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts shall update the
instructions, brochures, standard petition and order for protection forms, and
court staff handbook when changes in the law make an update necessary.

Sec. 40. RCW 35.20.030 and 2000 c
111 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The municipal court
shall have jurisdiction to try violations of all city ordinances and all other
actions brought to enforce or recover license penalties or forfeitures declared
or given by any such ordinances. It is empowered to forfeit cash bail or bail
bonds and issue execution thereon, to hear and determine all causes, civil or
criminal, arising under such ordinances, and to pronounce judgment in
accordance therewith: PROVIDED, That for a violation of the criminal
provisions of an ordinance no greater punishment shall be imposed than a fine
of five thousand dollars or imprisonment in the city jail not to exceed one
year, or both such fine and imprisonment, but the punishment for any criminal
ordinance shall be the same as the punishment provided in state law for the
same crime. All civil and criminal proceedings in municipal court, and
judgments rendered therein, shall be subject to review in the superior court by
writ of review or on appeal: PROVIDED, That an appeal from the court's
determination or order in a traffic infraction proceeding may be taken only in
accordance with RCW 46.63.090(5). Costs in civil and criminal cases may be
taxed as provided in district courts. A municipal court participating in the
program established by the administrative office of the ((administrator
for the)) courts pursuant to RCW 2.56.160 shall have jurisdiction to take
recognizance, approve bail, and arraign defendants held within its jurisdiction
on warrants issued by any court of limited jurisdiction participating in the
program.

Sec. 41. RCW 36.01.050 and 2000 c
244 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All actions against
any county may be commenced in the superior court of such county, or in the
superior court of either of the two nearest judicial districts. All actions by
any county shall be commenced in the superior court of the county in which the
defendant resides, or in either of the two judicial districts nearest to the
county bringing the action.

(2) The determination
of the nearest judicial districts is measured by the travel time between county
seats using major surface routes, as determined by the administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts.

Sec. 42. RCW 36.18.018 and 1995 c
292 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) State revenue
collected by county clerks under subsection (2) of this section must be
transmitted to the appropriate state court. The administrative office
of the ((state administrator for the)) courts shall retain fees
collected under subsection (3) of this section.

(2) For appellate
review under RAP 5.1(b), two hundred fifty dollars must be charged.

(3) For all copies and reports
produced by the ((administrator for)) administrative office of
the courts as permitted under RCW 2.68.020 and supreme court policy, a variable
fee must be charged.

Sec. 43. RCW 43.08.250 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 7 s 914 and 2001 c 289 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:

The money received by
the state treasurer from fees, fines, forfeitures, penalties, reimbursements or
assessments by any court organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, or chapter 2.08
RCW, shall be deposited in the public safety and education account which is
hereby created in the state treasury. The legislature shall appropriate the
funds in the account to promote traffic safety education, highway safety,
criminal justice training, crime victims' compensation, judicial education, the
judicial information system, civil representation of indigent persons, winter
recreation parking, drug court operations, and state game programs. During the
fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2003, the legislature may appropriate moneys
from the public safety and education account for purposes of appellate indigent
defense and other operations of the office of public defense, the criminal
litigation unit of the attorney general's office, the treatment alternatives to
street crimes program, crime victims advocacy programs, justice information
network telecommunication planning, treatment for supplemental security income
clients, sexual assault treatment, operations of the administrative
office of ((administrator for)) the courts, security in the common
schools, alternative school start-up grants, programs for disruptive students,
criminal justice data collection, Washington state patrol criminal justice
activities, drug court operations, unified family courts, local court backlog
assistance, financial assistance to local jurisdictions for extraordinary costs
incurred in the adjudication of criminal cases, domestic violence treatment and
related services, the department of corrections' costs in implementing chapter
196, Laws of 1999, reimbursement of local governments for costs associated with
implementing criminal and civil justice legislation, the replacement of the
department of corrections' offender-based tracking system, and
methamphetamine-related enforcement, education, training, and drug and alcohol
treatment services.

Sec. 44. RCW 43.70.540 and 1995 c
399 s 76 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature
recognizes that the state patrol, the administrative office of the ((administrator
for the)) courts, the sheriffs' and police chiefs' association, the
department of social and health services, the department of community, trade,
and economic development, the sentencing guidelines commission, the department
of corrections, and the superintendent of public instruction each have
comprehensive data and analysis capabilities that have contributed greatly to
our current understanding of crime and violence, and their causes.

The legislature finds,
however, that a single health-oriented agency must be designated to provide
consistent guidelines to all these groups regarding the way in which their data
systems collect this important data. It is not the intent of the legislature
by RCW 43.70.545 to transfer data collection requirements from existing
agencies or to require the addition of major new data systems. It is rather
the intent to make only the minimum required changes in existing data systems
to increase compatibility and comparability, reduce duplication, and to
increase the usefulness of data collected by these agencies in developing more
accurate descriptions of violence.

Sec. 45. RCW 43.101.280 and 1993
c 415 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The criminal justice
training commission shall develop, in consultation with the ((administrator
for)) administrative office of the courts and the commissions
established under chapters 43.113, 43.115, and 43.117 RCW, a curriculum for a
general understanding of ethnic and cultural diversity and its implications for
working with youth of color and their families. The curriculum shall be
developed by October 1, 1993. The commission shall ensure that ethnic and
diversity training becomes an integral part of the training of law enforcement
personnel so as to incorporate cultural sensitivity and awareness into the
daily activities of law enforcement personnel.

Sec. 46. RCW 46.20.286 and 1996 c
199 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of licensing shall adopt procedures in cooperation with the administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts and the department of
corrections to implement RCW 46.20.285.

Sec. 47. RCW 74.14C.100 and 1995
c 311 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall, within available funds, provide for ongoing training and consultation to
department personnel to carry out their responsibilities effectively. Such
training may:

(a) Include the family
unit as the primary focus of service; identifying family member strengths;
empowering families; child, adult, and family development; stress management;
and may include parent training and family therapy techniques;

(b) Address intake and
referral, assessment of risk, case assessment, matching clients to services,
and service planning issues in the context of the home-delivered service model,
including strategies for engaging family members, defusing violent situations,
and communication and conflict resolution skills;

(c) Cover methods of
helping families acquire the skills they need, including home management
skills, life skills, parenting, child development, and the use of community
resources;

(d) Address crisis
intervention and other strategies for the management of depression, and
suicidal, assaultive, and other high-risk behavior; and

(e) Address skills in
collaborating with other disciplines and services in promoting the safety of
children and other family members and promoting the preservation of the family.

(2) The department and
the administrative office of the ((administrator for the)) courts
shall, within available funds, collaborate in providing training to judges, and
others involved in the provision of services pursuant to this title, including
service providers, on the function and use of preservation services.

Sec. 48. RCW 74.20A.340 and 1997
c 58 s 804 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In furtherance of
the public policy of increasing collection of child support and to assist in
evaluation of the program established in RCW 74.20A.320, the department shall
report the following to the legislature and the governor on December 1, 1998,
and annually thereafter:

(a) The number of
responsible parents identified as licensees subject to RCW 74.20A.320;

(b) The number of
responsible parents identified by the department as not in compliance with a
child support order;

(c) The number of
notices of noncompliance served upon responsible parents by the department;

(d) The number of
responsible parents served a notice of noncompliance who request an adjudicative
proceeding;

(e) The number of
adjudicative proceedings held, and the results of the adjudicative proceedings;

(f) The number of
responsible parents certified to the department of licensing or licensing
entities for noncompliance with a child support order, and the number of each
type of licenses that were suspended;

(g) The costs incurred
in the implementation and enforcement of RCW 74.20A.320 and an estimate of the
amount of child support collected due to the department under RCW 74.20A.320;

(h) Any other
information regarding this program that the department feels will assist in
evaluation of the program;

(i) Recommendations for
the addition of specific licenses in the program or exclusion of specific
licenses from the program, and reasons for such recommendations; and

(j) Any recommendations
for statutory changes necessary for the cost-effective management of the
program.

(2) To assist in
evaluation of the program established in RCW 74.20A.320, the administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts shall report the
following to the legislature and the governor on December 1, 1998, and annually
thereafter:

(a) The number of
motions for contempt for violation of a visitation or residential order filed
under RCW 26.09.160(3);

(b) The number of
parents found in contempt under RCW 26.09.160(3); and

(c) The number of
parents whose licenses were suspended under RCW 26.09.160(3).

(3) This section
expires December 2, 2002.

Sec. 49. RCW 82.14.310 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 7 s 915 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county criminal
justice assistance account is created in the state treasury. Beginning in
fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer shall transfer into the county criminal
justice assistance account from the general fund the sum of twenty-three
million two hundred thousand dollars divided into four equal deposits occurring
on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1. For each fiscal year thereafter,
the state treasurer shall increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth
factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the
office of financial management in November of the preceding year.

(2) The moneys
deposited in the county criminal justice assistance account for distribution
under this section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes under subsection
(4) of this section, shall be distributed at such times as distributions are
made under RCW 82.44.150 and on the relative basis of each county's funding
factor as determined under this subsection.

(a) A county's funding
factor is the sum of:

(i) The population of
the county, divided by one thousand, and multiplied by two-tenths;

(ii) The crime rate of
the county, multiplied by three-tenths; and

(iii) The annual number
of criminal cases filed in the county superior court, for each one thousand in
population, multiplied by five-tenths.

(b) Under this section
and RCW 82.14.320 and 82.14.330:

(i) The population of
the county or city shall be as last determined by the office of financial
management;

(ii) The crime rate of
the county or city is the annual occurrence of specified criminal offenses, as
calculated in the most recent annual report on crime in Washington state as
published by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, for each
one thousand in population;

(iii) The annual number
of criminal cases filed in the county superior court shall be determined by the
most recent annual report of the courts of Washington, as published by the administrative
office of the ((administrator for the)) courts;

(iv) Distributions and
eligibility for distributions in the 1989‑91 biennium shall be based on
1988 figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii) of this subsection
and the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as described under (iii)
of this subsection. Future distributions shall be based on the most recent
figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii) of this subsection and
the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as described under (iii) of
this subsection.

(3) Moneys distributed
under this section shall be expended exclusively for criminal justice purposes
and shall not be used to replace or supplant existing funding. Criminal
justice purposes are defined as activities that substantially assist the
criminal justice system, which may include circumstances where ancillary
benefit to the civil or juvenile justice system occurs, and which includes (a)
domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic violence
programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW
70.123.020, and (b) during the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, juvenile
dispositional hearings relating to petitions for at-risk youth, truancy, and
children in need of services. Existing funding for purposes of this subsection
is defined as calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal
justice purposes. Calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for
criminal justice purposes exclude the following: Expenditures for
extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions for
criminal justice services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction
receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.

(4) Not
more than five percent of the funds deposited to the county criminal justice
assistance account shall be available for appropriations for enhancements to
the state patrol crime laboratory system and the continuing costs related to
these enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for such enhancements
shall not supplant existing funds from the state general fund.

---
END ---