BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.08.180 and 1987 c
73 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A case in the superior
court of any county may be tried by a judge pro tempore, who must be either:
(1) A member of the bar, agreed upon in writing by the parties litigant, or
their attorneys of record, approved by the court, and sworn to try the case; ((and
his)) or (2) pursuant to supreme court rule, any sitting elected judge.
Any action in the trial of such cause shall have the same effect as if ((he
were)) it was made by a judge of such court. However, if a previously
elected judge of the superior court retires leaving a pending case in which the
judge has made discretionary rulings, the judge is entitled to hear the pending
case as a judge pro tempore without any written agreement.

A judge pro tempore
shall, before entering upon his or her duties in any cause, take and
subscribe the following oath or affirmation:

"I do solemnly
swear (or affirm, as the case may be,) that I will support the Constitution of
the United States and the Constitution of the State of Washington, and that I
will faithfully discharge the duties of the office of judge pro tempore in the
cause wherein . . . . . . is plaintiff and
. . . . . . defendant, according to the best of my
ability."

A judge
pro tempore who is a practicing attorney and who is not a retired justice of
the supreme court or judge of a superior court of the state of Washington, or
who is not an active judge of ((an inferior)) a court of the
state of Washington, shall receive a compensation of one-two hundred ((and))
fiftieth of the annual salary of a superior court judge for each day engaged in
said trial, to be paid in the same manner as the salary of the superior judge.
A judge who is an active judge of ((an inferior)) a court of the
state of Washington shall receive no compensation as judge pro tempore. A
justice or judge who has retired from the supreme court, court of appeals, or
superior court of the state of Washington shall receive compensation as judge
pro tempore in the amount of sixty percent of the amount payable to a judge pro
tempore under this section.

--- END ---