BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes and acknowledges that technology has become an integral part of the
facilities and educational delivery systems in our schools. In order to
prepare our state's students to participate fully in our state's economy,
substantial capital investments must continue to be made in our schools'
comprehensive technology systems, facilities, and projects. These investments
are declared to be a major capital purpose.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.320.330 and 1990
c 33 s 337 are each amended to read as follows:

School districts shall
establish the following funds in addition to those provided elsewhere by law:

(1) A general fund for
maintenance and operation of the school district to account for all financial
operations of the school district except those required to be accounted for in
another fund.

(2) A capital projects
fund shall be established for major capital purposes. All statutory references
to a "building fund" shall mean the capital projects fund so
established. Money to be deposited into the capital projects fund shall
include, but not be limited to, bond proceeds, proceeds from excess levies
authorized by RCW 84.52.053, state apportionment proceeds as authorized by RCW
28A.150.270, and earnings from capital projects fund investments as authorized
by RCW 28A.320.310 and 28A.320.320.

Money derived from the
sale of bonds, including interest earnings thereof, may only be used for those
purposes described in RCW 28A.530.010, except that accrued interest paid for bonds
shall be deposited in the debt service fund.

Money to be deposited
into the capital projects fund shall include but not be limited to rental and
lease proceeds as authorized by RCW 28A.335.060, and proceeds from the sale of
real property as authorized by RCW 28A.335.130.

Money legally deposited
into the capital projects fund from other sources may be used for the purposes
described in RCW 28A.530.010, and for the purposes of:

(a) Major renovation,
including the replacement of facilities and systems where periodical repairs
are no longer economical. Major renovation and replacement shall include, but
shall not be limited to, roofing, heating and ventilating systems, floor
covering, and electrical systems.

(b) Renovation and
rehabilitation of playfields, athletic fields, and other district real
property.

(c) The conduct of
preliminary energy audits and energy audits of school district buildings. For
the purpose of this section:

(i) "Preliminary
energy audits" means a determination of the energy consumption
characteristics of a building, including the size, type, rate of energy
consumption, and major energy using systems of the building.

(ii) "Energy
audit" means a survey of a building or complex which identifies the type,
size, energy use level, and major energy using systems; which determines
appropriate energy conservation maintenance or operating procedures and
assesses any need for the acquisition and installation of energy conservation
measures, including solar energy and renewable resource measures.

(iii) "Energy
capital improvement" means the installation, or modification of the
installation, of energy conservation measures in a building which measures are
primarily intended to reduce energy consumption or allow the use of an
alternative energy source.

(d) Those energy
capital improvements which are identified as being cost-effective in the audits
authorized by this section.

(e) Purchase or
installation of additional major items of equipment and furniture: PROVIDED,
That vehicles shall not be purchased with capital projects fund money.

(f) Costs associated
with implementing technology systems, facilities, and projects, including
acquiring hardware, licensing software, and on-line applications and training
related to the foregoing. However, the software or applications must be an
integral part of the district's technology systems, facilities, or projects.

(3) A debt service fund
to provide for tax proceeds, other revenues, and disbursements as authorized in
chapter 39.44 RCW.

(4) An associated
student body fund as authorized by RCW 28A.325.030.

(5)
Advance refunding bond funds and refunded bond funds to provide for the
proceeds and disbursements as authorized in chapter 39.53 RCW.

---
END ---