BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 51.48.017 and 1985 c
347 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a
self-insurer unreasonably delays or refuses to pay benefits as they become due
there shall be paid by the self-insurer upon order of the director an
additional amount equal to five hundred dollars or twenty-five percent of the
amount then due, whichever is greater, which shall accrue for the benefit of
the claimant and shall be paid to him or her with the benefits which may
be assessed under this title.

(2) If a
self-insurer's unreasonable delay or refusal to pay benefits has resulted in
damages suffered by the claimant, there must be paid by the self-insurer to the
claimant upon order of the director a damage award equal to the amount of
damages suffered by the claimant, but not exceeding ten thousand dollars.

(3)
The director shall issue an order determining whether there was an unreasonable
delay or refusal to pay benefits, or whether damages had been suffered and
the amount of the damages, within thirty days upon the request of the claimant.
Such an order shall conform to the requirements of RCW 51.52.050.

--- END ---