BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.505 and 2001 c
168 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(a) No judgment of
forfeiture of property in a civil forfeiture proceeding under this section by
the state or any of its political subdivisions shall be allowed or entered
until and unless the owner of the property is convicted of a criminal violation
of this chapter or an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction and the state
demonstrates by a preponderance of the evidence that the property was
instrumental in committing or facilitating the crime or the property is
proceeds of that crime. The value of the property forfeited under the
provisions of this subsection shall be substantially proportional to the
specific conduct for which the owner of the property has been convicted.

(b) In a civil
forfeiture proceeding if a financial institution claiming an interest in the
property demonstrates that it holds an interest, its interest shall not be
subject to forfeiture. In a civil forfeiture proceeding if a person claiming
an interest in the property, other than a financial institution or a defendant
who has been charged with or convicted of a crime involving that property,
demonstrates that the person has an interest in the property, that person's
interest shall not be subject to forfeiture unless:

(1) The forfeiting
agency proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the person took the
property or the interest with the intent to defeat the forfeiture; or

(2) A conviction
under subsection (a) of this section is later obtained against the person.

(c) Notwithstanding
the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, if, following notice as
required in this section, no person claims an interest in the seized property
or if the property is contraband, a judgment of forfeiture may be allowed and
entered without a criminal conviction as provided in subsection (i) of this
section.

(d) Nothing in this
section may be construed to affect the temporary seizure of property for
evidentiary, forfeiture, or protective purposes, or to alter the power of the
governor to remit fines or forfeitures under Article III, section 11 of the
Washington Constitution.

(e) The
following are subject to seizure and forfeiture ((and no property right
exists in them)) in accordance with subsections (a), (b), (c), and (d)
of this section:

(1) All controlled
substances which have been manufactured, distributed, dispensed, acquired, or
possessed in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW, and all
hazardous chemicals, as defined in RCW 64.44.010, used or intended to be used
in the manufacture of controlled substances;

(2) All raw materials,
products, and equipment of any kind which are used, or intended for use, in
manufacturing, compounding, processing, delivering, importing, or exporting any
controlled substance in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52
RCW;

(3) All property which
is used, or intended for use, as a container for property described in ((paragraphs))
(1) or (2) of this subsection;

(4) All conveyances,
including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels, which are used, or intended for use,
in any manner to facilitate the sale, delivery, or receipt of property
described in ((paragraphs)) (1) or (2) of this subsection, except
that((:

(i) No conveyance
used by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business as a
common carrier is subject to forfeiture under this section unless it appears
that the owner or other person in charge of the conveyance is a consenting
party or privy to a violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW;

(ii) No conveyance
is subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of any act or omission
established by the owner thereof to have been committed or omitted without the
owner's knowledge or consent;

(iii))) no conveyance is subject to forfeiture
under this section if used in the receipt of only an amount of marijuana for
which possession constitutes a misdemeanor under RCW 69.50.401(e)((;

(iv) A forfeiture of
a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the
interest of the secured party if the secured party neither had knowledge of nor
consented to the act or omission; and

(v) When the owner
of a conveyance has been arrested under this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52
RCW the conveyance in which the person is arrested may not be subject to
forfeiture unless it is seized or process is issued for its seizure within ten
days of the owner's arrest));

(5) All books, records,
and research products and materials, including formulas, microfilm, tapes, and
data which are used, or intended for use, in violation of this chapter or
chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW;

(6) All drug
paraphernalia;

(7) All moneys,
negotiable instruments, securities, or other tangible or intangible property of
value furnished or intended to be furnished by any person in exchange for a
controlled substance in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52
RCW, all tangible or intangible personal property, proceeds, or assets acquired
in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to an exchange or series of
exchanges in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW, and all
moneys, negotiable instruments, and securities used or intended to be used to
facilitate any violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW((. A
forfeiture of money, negotiable instruments, securities, or other tangible or
intangible property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to
the interest of the secured party if, at the time the security interest was
created, the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or
omission. No personal property may be forfeited under this paragraph, to the
extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission which that
owner establishes was committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or
consent)); and

(8) All real property,
including any right, title, and interest in the whole of any lot or tract of
land, and any appurtenances or improvements which are being used with the
knowledge of the owner for the manufacturing, compounding, processing,
delivery, importing, or exporting of any controlled substance, or which have
been acquired in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to an exchange or
series of exchanges in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW,
if such activity is not less than a class C felony and a substantial nexus
exists between the commercial production or sale of the controlled substance
and the real property. However:

(i) ((No property
may be forfeited pursuant to this subsection, to the extent of the interest of
an owner, by reason of any act or omission committed or omitted without the
owner's knowledge or consent;

(ii))) The bona fide gift of a controlled substance,
legend drug, or imitation controlled substance shall not result in the
forfeiture of real property;

(((iii))) (ii)
The possession of marijuana shall not result in the forfeiture of real property
unless the marijuana is possessed for commercial purposes, the amount possessed
is five or more plants or one pound or more of marijuana, and a substantial
nexus exists between the possession of marijuana and the real property. In
such a case, the intent of the offender shall be determined by the
preponderance of the evidence, including the offender's prior criminal history,
the amount of marijuana possessed by the offender, the sophistication of the
activity or equipment used by the offender, and other evidence which
demonstrates the offender's intent to engage in commercial activity; and

(((iv))) (iii)
The unlawful sale of marijuana or a legend drug shall not result in the
forfeiture of real property unless the sale was forty grams or more in the case
of marijuana or one hundred dollars or more in the case of a legend drug, and a
substantial nexus exists between the unlawful sale and the real property((;
and

(v) A forfeiture of
real property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the
interest of the secured party if the secured party, at the time the security
interest was created, neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or
omission)).

(((b))) (f)
Real or personal property subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be
seized by any board inspector or law enforcement officer of this state upon
process issued by any superior court having jurisdiction over the property.
Seizure of real property shall include the filing of a lis pendens by the
seizing agency. Real property seized under this section shall not be
transferred or otherwise conveyed ((until ninety days after seizure or))
until a judgment of forfeiture is entered((, whichever is later: PROVIDED,
That)). However, real property seized under this section may be
transferred or conveyed to any person or entity who acquires title by
foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a security interest.

The board or law
enforcement agency is not liable for damages for loss of or injury to the
seized personal or real property unless the damage could have been avoided by
the exercise of such care in regard to the personal or real property as a
reasonably careful person would exercise under like circumstances.

(g) Seizure of
personal property without process may be made if:

(1) The seizure is
incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant or an inspection under
an administrative inspection warrant;

(2) The property
subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the
state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon this
chapter;

(3) A board inspector
or law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property is
directly or indirectly dangerous to health or safety; or

(4) The board inspector
or law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property was
used or is intended to be used in violation of this chapter.

(((c))) (h)
In the event of seizure pursuant to subsection (((b))) (f) or (g) of
this section, proceedings for forfeiture shall be deemed commenced by the
seizure. The law enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure was made
shall cause notice to be served within fifteen days following the seizure on
the owner of the property seized and the person in charge thereof and any
person having any known right or interest therein, including any community
property interest, of the seizure and intended forfeiture of the seized
property. Service of notice of seizure of real property shall be made
according to the rules of civil procedure. However, the state may not obtain a
default judgment with respect to real property against a party who is served by
substituted service absent an affidavit stating that a good faith effort has
been made to ascertain if the defaulted party is incarcerated within the state,
and that there is no present basis to believe that the party is incarcerated
within the state. Notice of seizure in the case of property subject to a
security interest that has been perfected by filing a financing statement in
accordance with chapter 62A.9A RCW, or a certificate of title, shall be made by
service upon the secured party or the secured party's assignee at the address
shown on the financing statement or the certificate of title. The notice of
seizure in other cases may be served by any method authorized by law or court
rule including but not limited to service by certified mail with return receipt
requested. Service by mail shall be deemed complete upon mailing within the
fifteen day period following the seizure.

(((d))) (i)
If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the
person's claim of ownership or right to possession of items specified in
subsection (((a))) (e)(4), (((a)))(7), or (((a)))(8)
of this section within forty-five days of the seizure in the case of personal
property and ninety days in the case of real property, the item seized shall be
deemed forfeited. The community property interest in real property of a person
whose spouse committed a violation giving rise to seizure of the real property
may not be forfeited if the person did not participate in the violation.

(((e))) (j)
If any person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the
person's claim of ownership or right to possession of items specified in
subsection (((a))) (e)(2), (((a)))(3), (((a)))(4),
(((a)))(5), (((a)))(6), (((a)))(7), or (((a)))(8)
of this section within forty-five days of the seizure in the case of personal
property and ninety days in the case of real property, the person or persons
shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to the claim or
right. The hearing shall be before the chief law enforcement officer of the
seizing agency or the chief law enforcement officer's designee, except where
the seizing agency is a state agency as defined in RCW 34.12.020(4), the
hearing shall be before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency
or an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except that
any person asserting a claim or right may remove the matter to a court of
competent jurisdiction. Removal of any matter involving personal property may
only be accomplished according to the rules of civil procedure. The person
seeking removal of the matter must serve process against the state, county,
political subdivision, or municipality that operates the seizing agency, and
any other party of interest, in accordance with RCW 4.28.080 or 4.92.020,
within forty-five days after the person seeking removal has notified the
seizing law enforcement agency of the person's claim of ownership or right to
possession. The court to which the matter is to be removed shall be the
district court when the aggregate value of personal property is within the
jurisdictional limit set forth in RCW 3.66.020. A hearing before the seizing
agency and any appeal therefrom shall be under Title 34 RCW. In all cases, the
burden of proof is upon the law enforcement agency to establish, by a
preponderance of the evidence, that the property is subject to forfeiture.

If the seizing
agency fails to show by a preponderance of the evidence that the seized
property is subject to forfeiture, the seizing law enforcement agency shall
promptly return the article or articles to the claimant ((upon a
determination by the administrative law judge or court that the claimant is the
present lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession thereof of items
specified in subsection (a)(2), (a)(3), (a)(4), (a)(5), (a)(6), (a)(7), or
(a)(8) of this section)).

(((f))) (k)
In any proceeding to forfeit property under this title, where the claimant
substantially prevails, the claimant is entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees
reasonably incurred by the claimant. In addition, in a court hearing between
two or more claimants to the article or articles involved, the prevailing party
is entitled to a judgment for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.

(((g))) (l)
When property is forfeited under this chapter the board or seizing law
enforcement agency ((may)) shall:

(1) ((Retain it for
official use or upon application by any law enforcement agency of this state
release such property to such agency for the exclusive use of enforcing the
provisions of this chapter;

(2))) Sell that which is not required to be destroyed
by law and which is not harmful to the public;

(((3) Request the
appropriate sheriff or director of public safety to take custody of the
property and remove it for disposition in accordance with law; or

(4) Forward it to
the drug enforcement administration for disposition.

(h)(1) When property
is forfeited, the seizing agency shall)) (2) Keep a record indicating the identity of the prior owner,
if known, a description of the property, the disposition of the property, the
value of the property at the time of seizure, and the amount of proceeds
realized from disposition of the property((.));

(((2) Each seizing
agency shall)) (3) Retain records of forfeited property for at least
seven years((.));

(((3) Each seizing
agency shall)) (4) File a report including a copy of the records of
forfeited property with the state treasurer each calendar quarter. (((4)))
The quarterly report need not include a record of forfeited property that is
still being held for use as evidence during the investigation or prosecution of
a case or during the appeal from a conviction;

(5) Destroy any
property that is harmful to the public, required to be destroyed by law, or
otherwise not appropriate for sale to the public;

(6) Report the
nature and disposition of all property and proceeds seized for forfeiture or
forfeited to the state auditor. The state auditor shall annually perform a
statewide audit of seizures and forfeitures as authorized under this section.
The audit shall be performed in conjunction with routine audits of local
governments as provided under RCW 43.09.260. The state auditor shall annually
publish a statewide report on the amount of federal and state seizure and
forfeiture funds received and expended in the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account in total and by each local government for the current year
and the previous three years. The report shall also disclose the beginning and
ending balances in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account attributable
to seizures and forfeitures. The state auditor's report shall include a report
on statewide compliance with this section and RCW 69.50.520, including an
identification of best practices, instances of noncompliance, and
recommendations to the legislature.

(((i))) (m)(1)
By January 31st of each year, each seizing agency shall remit all of the net
proceeds of any property forfeited during the preceding calendar year to
the state treasurer ((an amount equal to ten percent of the net proceeds of
any property forfeited during the preceding calendar year)). Money
remitted shall be deposited in the ((violence reduction and drug enforcement
account under RCW 69.50.520)) common school construction fund as
required by Article IX, section 3 of the Constitution of the state of
Washington.

(2) The net proceeds of
forfeited property is the value of the forfeitable interest in the property
after deducting: (i) The cost of satisfying any bona fide security
interest to which the property is subject at the time of seizure; and in the
case of sold property, after deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable
fees or commissions paid to independent selling agents, and the cost of any
valid landlord's claim for damages under subsection (((o))) (s)
of this section; (ii) any foreclosed liens, security interest, and contracts
in the order of their priority; and (iii) actual and reasonable expenses
related to the costs of the forfeiture proceeding, including attorneys' fees,
storage, maintenance, management, and disposition of the property incurred in
connection with the sale of any forfeited property in an amount not to exceed
twenty-five percent of the total proceeds in any single forfeiture.

(3) The value of sold
forfeited property is the sale price. The value of retained forfeited property
is the fair market value of the property at the time of seizure, determined
when possible by reference to an applicable commonly used index, such as the
index used by the department of licensing for valuation of motor vehicles. A
seizing agency may use, but need not use, an independent qualified appraiser to
determine the value of retained property. If an appraiser is used, the value
of the property appraised is net of the cost of the appraisal. The value of
destroyed ((property and retained firearms or)) illegal property is
zero.

(((j))) (n)
Forfeited property and net proceeds ((not required to be paid to the state
treasurer shall be retained by the seizing law enforcement agency exclusively
for the expansion and improvement of controlled substances related law
enforcement activity. Money retained under this section may not be used to
supplant preexisting funding sources)), including shared property or
proceeds obtained from the federal government, shall be disposed of or
distributed according to the following:

(1) Any sale of
forfeited property shall be conducted in a commercially reasonable manner.
Property or proceeds forfeited under this section shall be distributed or
applied as required by subsection (l) of this section.

(2) The state of
Washington or any of its political subdivisions shall take all necessary steps
to obtain shared property or proceeds from the United States department of
justice resulting from a forfeiture. Any property or proceeds received from
the United States department of justice by the state of Washington or any of
its political subdivisions shall be applied as provided in (1) of this
subsection.

(3) Neither the
state of Washington, its political subdivisions, nor any forfeiting agency
shall transfer forfeiture proceedings to the federal government unless a state
court has affirmatively found that:

(i) The activity
giving rise to the forfeiture is interstate in nature and sufficiently complex
to justify the transfer;

(ii) The seized
property may only be forfeited under federal law; or

(iii) Pursuing
forfeiture under state law would unduly burden the state forfeiting agencies.

(((k))) (o)
Controlled substances listed in Schedule I, II, III, IV, and V that are
possessed, transferred, sold, or offered for sale in violation of this chapter
are contraband and shall be seized and summarily forfeited to the state.
Controlled substances listed in Schedule I, II, III, IV, and V, which are seized
or come into the possession of the board, the owners of which are unknown, are
contraband and shall be summarily forfeited to the board.

(((l))) (p)
Species of plants from which controlled substances in Schedules I and II may be
derived which have been planted or cultivated in violation of this chapter, or
of which the owners or cultivators are unknown, or which are wild growths, may
be seized and summarily forfeited to the board.

(((m))) (q)
The failure, upon demand by a board inspector or law enforcement officer, of
the person in occupancy or in control of land or premises upon which the
species of plants are growing or being stored to produce an appropriate
registration or proof that he or she is the holder thereof constitutes
authority for the seizure and forfeiture of the plants.

(((n))) (r)
Upon the entry of an order of forfeiture of real property, the court shall
forward a copy of the order to the assessor of the county in which the property
is located. Orders for the forfeiture of real property shall be entered by the
superior court, subject to court rules. Such an order shall be filed by the
seizing agency in the county auditor's records in the county in which the real
property is located.

(((o))) (s)
A landlord may assert a claim against proceeds from the sale of assets ((seized
and forfeited)) under subsection (((g)(2))) (n) of this
section, only if:

(1) A law enforcement
officer, while acting in his or her official capacity, directly caused damage
to the complaining landlord's property while executing a search of a tenant's
residence; and

(2) The landlord has
applied any funds remaining in the tenant's deposit, to which the landlord has
a right under chapter 59.18 RCW, to cover the damage directly caused by a law
enforcement officer prior to asserting a claim under the provisions of this
section;

(i) Only if the funds
applied under (2) of this subsection are insufficient to satisfy the damage
directly caused by a law enforcement officer, may the landlord seek
compensation for the damage by filing a claim against the governmental entity
under whose authority the law enforcement agency operates within thirty days
after the search;

(ii) Only if the
governmental entity denies or fails to respond to the landlord's claim within
sixty days of the date of filing, may the landlord collect damages under this
subsection by filing within thirty days of denial or the expiration of the
sixty-day period, whichever occurs first, a claim with the seizing law
enforcement agency. The seizing law enforcement agency must notify the
landlord of the status of the claim by the end of the thirty-day period.
Nothing in this section requires the claim to be paid by the end of the
sixty-day or thirty-day period.

(3) For any claim filed
under (2) of this subsection, the law enforcement agency shall pay the claim
unless the agency provides substantial proof that the landlord either:

(i) Knew or consented
to actions of the tenant in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52
RCW; or

(ii) Failed to respond
to a notification of the illegal activity, provided by a law enforcement agency
under RCW 59.18.075, within seven days of receipt of notification of the
illegal activity.

(((p))) (t)
The landlord's claim for damages under subsection (((o))) (s) of
this section may not include a claim for loss of business and is limited to:

(1) Damage to tangible
property and clean-up costs;

(2) The lesser of the cost
of repair or fair market value of the damage directly caused by a law
enforcement officer;

(3) The proceeds from
the sale of the specific tenant's property ((seized and forfeited))
under subsection (((g)(2))) (n) of this section; and

(4) The proceeds
available after the seizing law enforcement agency satisfies any bona fide
security interest in the tenant's property and costs related to sale of the
tenant's property as provided by subsection (((i)(2))) (n) of
this section.

(((q))) (u)
Subsections (((o))) (s) and (((p))) (t) of this
section do not limit any other rights a landlord may have against a tenant to
collect for damages. However, if a law enforcement agency satisfies a
landlord's claim under subsection (((o))) (s) of this section,
the rights the landlord has against the tenant for damages directly caused by a
law enforcement officer under the terms of the landlord and tenant's contract
are subrogated to the law enforcement agency.

(v) For the purposes
of this section:

(1)
"Contraband" means personal property, articles, or things, including
but not limited to controlled substances or drug paraphernalia and illegal
firearms, that a person is prohibited by Washington statute or local ordinance
from producing, obtaining, or possessing; and

(2)
"Property" means any interest in anything of value, including the
whole of any lot or tract of land and tangible and intangible personal
property, including currency, instruments or securities or any other kind of
privilege, interest, claim, or right whether due or to become due.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.83.030 and 2001 c
168 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Proceeds traceable
to or derived from specified unlawful activity or a violation of RCW 9A.83.020
are subject to seizure and forfeiture. The attorney general or county
prosecuting attorney may file a civil action for the forfeiture of proceeds.
Unless otherwise provided for under this section, no property rights exist in
these proceeds. All right, title, and interest in the proceeds shall vest in
the governmental entity of which the seizing law enforcement agency is a part
upon commission of the act or omission giving rise to forfeiture under this
section.

(2) Real or personal
property subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be seized by any law
enforcement officer of this state upon process issued by a superior court that
has jurisdiction over the property. Any agency seizing real property shall
file a lis pendens concerning the property. Real property seized under this
section shall not be transferred or otherwise conveyed until ninety days after
seizure or until a judgment of forfeiture is entered, whichever is later. Real
property seized under this section may be transferred or conveyed to any person
or entity who acquires title by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a
security interest. Seizure of personal property without process may be made
if:

(a) The seizure is
incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant or an inspection under
an administrative inspection warrant issued pursuant to RCW 69.50.502; or

(b) The property
subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the
state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon this
chapter.

(3) A seizure under
subsection (2) of this section commences proceedings for forfeiture. The law
enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure was made shall cause
notice of the seizure and intended forfeiture of the seized proceeds to be
served within fifteen days after the seizure on the owner of the property
seized and the person in charge thereof and any person who has a known right or
interest therein, including a community property interest. Service of notice
of seizure of real property shall be made according to the rules of civil
procedure. However, the state may not obtain a default judgment with respect
to real property against a party who is served by substituted service absent an
affidavit stating that a good faith effort has been made to ascertain if the
defaulted party is incarcerated within the state, and that there is no present
basis to believe that the party is incarcerated within the state. The notice
of seizure in other cases may be served by any method authorized by law or
court rule including but not limited to service by certified mail with return
receipt requested. Service by mail is complete upon mailing within the
fifteen-day period after the seizure.

(4) If no person
notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of
ownership or right to possession of the property within forty-five days of the
seizure in the case of personal property and ninety days in the case of real
property, the property seized shall be deemed forfeited. The community
property interest in real property of a person whose spouse committed a
violation giving rise to seizure of the real property may not be forfeited if
the person did not participate in the violation.

(5) If a person
notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of
ownership or right to possession of property within forty-five days of the
seizure in the case of personal property and ninety days in the case of real
property, the person or persons shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to
be heard as to the claim or right. The provisions of RCW 69.50.505(((e)))
(j) shall apply to any such hearing. The seizing law enforcement agency
shall promptly return property to the claimant upon the direction of the administrative
law judge or court.

(6)
Disposition of forfeited property shall be made in the manner provided for in
RCW 69.50.505 (((h))) (l) through (((j))) (n) and
(((n))) (r).

Sec. 3. RCW 69.50.520 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 7 s 920 and 2001 c 168 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:

The
violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in the state
treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8), 66.24.210(4),
66.24.290(2), ((69.50.505(i)(1),)) 82.08.150(5), 82.24.020(2),
82.64.020, and section 420, chapter 271, Laws of 1989 shall be deposited into
the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for funding
services and programs under chapter 271, Laws of 1989 and chapter 7, Laws of
1994 sp. sess., including state incarceration costs. Funds from the account
may also be appropriated to reimburse local governments for costs associated
with implementing criminal justice legislation including chapter 338, Laws of
1997. During the 2001-2003 biennium, funds from the account may also be used
for costs associated with providing grants to local governments in accordance
with chapter 338, Laws of 1997, the replacement of the department of
corrections' offender-based tracking system, maintenance and operating costs of
the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs jail reporting system,
and for multijurisdictional narcotics task forces. After July 1, 2003, at
least seven and one-half percent of expenditures from the account shall be used
for providing grants to community networks under chapter 70.190 RCW by the
family policy council.

---
END ---