BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 19.86 RCW to read as follows:

Unless clearly required
by federal law or regulation, it is a violation of RCW 19.86.020 for any
private business entity to require a social security number for identification
purposes or as a condition of doing business with a customer.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. If any part of this act
is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part
of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies
concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that
are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.

---
END ---