BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1) An offender who is
convicted in adult criminal court pursuant to RCW 13.04.030(1)(e)(v) of any
charge other than murder in the first degree or murder in the second degree,
may be sentenced under the youthful offender sentencing alternative.

(2) In considering
whether to impose the youthful offender sentencing alternative, the court shall
consider relevant reports, facts, opinions, and arguments justifying the
imposition of the youthful offender sentencing alternative. The court shall
consider the history, character, and condition of the offender, including the
offender's sophistication and maturity, pattern of living, and emotional and
mental development. The court may impose a youthful offender sentencing
alternative upon a finding that sentence would be in the best interest of the
community.

(3) If a youthful
offender sentencing alternative is imposed, the court shall:

(a) Impose both an
adult sentence and a sentence in the juvenile system at the time of sentencing;

(b) Determine the adult
sentence according to the sentencing reform act;

(c) Commit the offender
to the custody of the juvenile rehabilitation administration until age
twenty-one;

(d) For cases involving
serious violent offenses, order the offender transferred to the custody of the
department of corrections at age twenty-one and committed to the department of
corrections until age twenty-five or the length of the adult sentence,
whichever is shorter; and

(e) Suspend the adult
sentence on the condition of the offender's compliance with the terms of the
youthful offender sentencing alternative sentence.

(4) The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall submit annual reports on the offender's
compliance with the terms of the youthful offender sentencing alternative to
the court.

(5) If, at any time
while the offender is serving the youthful offender alternative sentence, the
offender fails to make progress in rehabilitative programs made available to
him or her, reoffends, or constitutes a serious threat to the physical safety
of others, the court may, upon its own motion or upon application by the
juvenile rehabilitation administration or the department of corrections, revoke
the youthful offender sentencing alternative sentence and impose the suspended
adult sentence. If the youthful offender sentencing alternative sentence is
revoked, and the offender is in the custody of the juvenile rehabilitation
administration, the offender shall be transferred to the department of
corrections to serve the adult sentence.

(6) For cases that are
not serious violent offenses, no sooner than three months before the offender's
twenty-first birthday, the offender shall appear before the court to determine
compliance with the youthful sentencing alternative sentence. Victims enrolled
in the victim notification program shall be notified of the hearing. Victims
have the right to participate in the hearing in whatever manner they choose.

(a) If the court
determines at the hearing that the offender has made progress in available
rehabilitative programs, has not reoffended, and has not posed a serious threat
to the physical safety of others, the court shall release the offender from the
adult sentence and order community custody with the department of corrections
for up to forty-eight months.

(b) If the court
determines at the hearing that the offender has not made progress in available
rehabilitative programs, has reoffended, or has posed a serious threat to the
physical safety of others, then the court shall revoke the youthful offender
sentencing alternative and impose the suspended adult sentence.

(7) For cases involving
serious violent offenses, the offender shall remain in the custody of the
department of corrections until age twenty-five or for the length of the adult
sentence, whichever is shorter. No sooner than three months before the
offender's twenty-fifth birthday or an expected release date, the offender
shall appear before the sentencing court to determine compliance with the
youthful sentencing alternative sentence. Victims enrolled in the victim
notification program shall be notified of the hearing. Victims have the right
to participate in the hearing in whatever manner they choose.

(a) If the sentencing
court determines at the hearing that the offender has made progress in
available rehabilitative programs, has not reoffended, and has not posed a
serious threat to the physical safety of others, the court may release the
offender from the adult sentence and order community custody with the
department of corrections for up to forty-eight months.

(b) If the court
determines at the hearing that the offender has not made progress in available
rehabilitative programs, has reoffended, or has posed a serious threat to the
physical safety of others, then the court shall revoke the youthful offender
sentencing alternative and impose the suspended adult sentence.

(8)(a) If the offender
is released from the adult portion of the sentence as provided in subsection
(6)(a) or (7)(a) of this section, then the matter shall be considered a
juvenile offense for all purposes.

(b) If the youthful
offender sentencing alternative sentence is revoked the matter shall be
considered an adult conviction for all purposes. The offender shall be given
credit for the time served while committed to the custody of the juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the department of corrections.

(9) The department of
corrections and the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop a
system of shared information and resources for assessment and placement of
offenders in community custody under this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.505 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 312 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a person is
convicted of a felony, the court shall impose punishment as provided in this
chapter.

(2)(a) The court shall
impose a sentence as provided in the following sections and as applicable in
the case:

(i) Unless another term
of confinement applies, the court shall impose a sentence within the standard
sentence range established in RCW 9.94A.510;

(ii) RCW 9.94A.700 and
9.94A.705, relating to community placement;

(iii) RCW 9.94A.710 and
9.94A.715, relating to community custody;

(iv) RCW 9.94A.545,
relating to community custody for offenders whose term of confinement is one
year or less;

(v) RCW 9.94A.570,
relating to persistent offenders;

(vi) RCW 9.94A.540,
relating to mandatory minimum terms;

(vii) RCW 9.94A.650,
relating to the first-time offender waiver;

(viii) RCW 9.94A.660,
relating to the drug offender sentencing alternative;

(ix) RCW 9.94A.670,
relating to the special sex offender sentencing alternative;

(x) Section 1 of
this act, relating to the youthful offender sentencing alternative;

(xi) RCW
9.94A.712, relating to certain sex offenses;

(((xi))) (xii)
RCW 9.94A.535, relating to exceptional sentences;

(((xii))) (xiii)
RCW 9.94A.589, relating to consecutive and concurrent sentences.

(b) If a standard
sentence range has not been established for the offender's crime, the court
shall impose a determinate sentence which may include not more than one year of
confinement; community service work; until July 1, 2000, a term of community
supervision not to exceed one year and on and after July 1, 2000, a term of
community custody not to exceed one year, subject to conditions and sanctions
as authorized in RCW 9.94A.710 (2) and (3); and/or other legal financial
obligations. The court may impose a sentence which provides more than one year
of confinement if the court finds reasons justifying an exceptional sentence as
provided in RCW 9.94A.535.

(3) If the court
imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty days or less, the court may,
in its discretion, specify that the sentence be served on consecutive or
intermittent days. A sentence requiring more than thirty days of confinement
shall be served on consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule
court-ordered intermittent sentences as space permits.

(4) If a sentence
imposed includes payment of a legal financial obligation, it shall be imposed
as provided in RCW 9.94A.750, 9.94A.753, and 9.94A.760.

(5) Except as provided
under RCW 9.94A.750(4) and 9.94A.753(4), a court may not impose a sentence
providing for a term of confinement or community supervision, community
placement, or community custody which exceeds the statutory maximum for the
crime as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(6) The sentencing
court shall give the offender credit for all confinement time served before the
sentencing if that confinement was solely in regard to the offense for which
the offender is being sentenced.

(7) The court shall
order restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.750 and 9.94A.753.

(8) As a part of any
sentence, the court may impose and enforce crime-related prohibitions and
affirmative conditions as provided in this chapter.

(9) The court may order
an offender whose sentence includes community placement or community
supervision to undergo a mental status evaluation and to participate in
available outpatient mental health treatment, if the court finds that
reasonable grounds exist to believe that the offender is a mentally ill person
as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and that this condition is likely to have
influenced the offense. An order requiring mental status evaluation or
treatment must be based on a presentence report and, if applicable, mental
status evaluations that have been filed with the court to determine the
offender's competency or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may
order additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.

(10) In any sentence of
partial confinement, the court may require the offender to serve the partial
confinement in work release, in a program of home detention, on work crew, or
in a combined program of work crew and home detention.

(11) In sentencing an
offender convicted of a crime of domestic violence, as defined in RCW
10.99.020, if the offender has a minor child, or if the victim of the offense
for which the offender was convicted has a minor child, the court may, as part
of any term of community supervision, community placement, or community
custody, order the offender to participate in a domestic violence perpetrator
program approved under RCW 26.50.150.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.94A.030 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 301, 2001 c 300 s 3, and 2001 c 7 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Board"
means the indeterminate sentence review board created under chapter 9.95 RCW.

(2)
"Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit,"
or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection agreement
authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring and enforcing the
offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial obligation, receiving
payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with current law, delivering
daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk without depositing it in a
departmental account.

(3)
"Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(4) "Community
corrections officer" means an employee of the department who is
responsible for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced
offenders and monitoring of sentence conditions.

(5) "Community
custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence of confinement in
lieu of earned release time or imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b),
9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670, section 1 of this act, 9.94A.690, 9.94A.700
through 9.94A.715, or 9.94A.545, served in the community subject to controls
placed on the offender's movement and activities by the department. For
offenders placed on community custody for crimes committed on or after July 1,
2000, the department shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may
establish and modify conditions of community custody, in addition to those
imposed by the court, based upon the risk to community safety.

(6) "Community
custody range" means the minimum and maximum period of community custody
included as part of a sentence under RCW 9.94A.715, as established by the
commission or the legislature under RCW 9.94A.850, for crimes committed on or
after July 1, 2000.

(7) "Community
placement" means that period during which the offender is subject to the
conditions of community custody and/or postrelease supervision, which begins
either upon completion of the term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or
at such time as the offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of
earned release. Community placement may consist of entirely community custody,
entirely postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.

(8) "Community
service" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the
benefit of the community by the offender.

(9) "Community
supervision" means a period of time during which a convicted offender is
subject to crime-related prohibitions and other sentence conditions imposed by
a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW 16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the
court finds that any offender has a chemical dependency that has contributed to
his or her offense, the conditions of supervision may, subject to available
resources, include treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for
out-of-state supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be considered
the same as probation by other states.

(10)
"Confinement" means total or partial confinement.

(11)
"Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles 10 or
13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of
a plea of guilty.

(12)
"Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting
conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the
offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders
directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs
or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts
necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by
the department.

(13) "Criminal
history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions and juvenile
adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or elsewhere. The
history shall include, where known, for each conviction (a) whether the
defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms thereof; and
(b) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of
incarceration.

(14) "Day
fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that equals the
difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable
obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any
dependents.

(15) "Day
reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to monitor the
offender's daily activities and compliance with sentence conditions, and in
which the offender is required to report daily to a specific location
designated by the department or the sentencing court.

(16)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(17) "Determinate
sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude the number of
actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial confinement, of
community supervision, the number of actual hours or days of community service
work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement
shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate sentence.

(18) "Disposable
earnings" means that part of the earnings of an offender remaining after
the deduction from those earnings of any amount required by law to be
withheld. For the purposes of this definition, "earnings" means
compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as
wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and, notwithstanding any
other provision of law making the payments exempt from garnishment, attachment,
or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation,
specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement
programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050, or Title
74 RCW.

(19) "Drug
offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option available to
persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent offense or a sex
offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW 9.94A.660.

(20) "Drug
offense" means:

(a) Any felony
violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(d)) or forged prescription for a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.403);

(b) Any offense defined
as a felony under federal law that relates to the possession, manufacture,
distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance; or

(c) Any out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(21) "Earned
release" means earned release from confinement as provided in RCW
9.94A.728.

(22) "Escape"
means:

(a) Sexually violent
predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110),
escape in the second degree (RCW 9A.76.120), willful failure to return from
furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful failure to return from work release (RCW
72.65.070), or willful failure to be available for supervision by the
department while in community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this subsection.

(23) "Felony
traffic offense" means:

(a) Vehicular homicide
(RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding a police officer
(RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(24) "Fine"
means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the
offender to the court over a specific period of time.

(25) "First-time
offender" means any person who has no prior convictions for a felony and
is eligible for the first-time offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.

(26) "Home
detention" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders
wherein the offender is confined in a private residence subject to electronic
surveillance.

(27) "Legal
financial obligation" means a sum of money that is ordered by a superior
court of the state of Washington for legal financial obligations which may
include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed crime victims'
compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or
interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense,
fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a
result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or
vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial obligations may also include payment
to a public agency of the expense of an emergency response to the incident
resulting in the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.

(28) "Most serious
offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit
any of the following felonies:

(a) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation of or criminal
conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b) Assault in the
second degree;

(c) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(d) Child molestation
in the second degree;

(e) Controlled
substance homicide;

(f) Extortion in the
first degree;

(g) Incest when
committed against a child under age fourteen;

(h) Indecent liberties;

(i) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(j) Leading organized
crime;

(k) Manslaughter in the
first degree;

(l) Manslaughter in the
second degree;

(m) Promoting
prostitution in the first degree;

(n) Rape in the third
degree;

(o) Robbery in the
second degree;

(p) Sexual
exploitation;

(q) Vehicular assault,
when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving
of a vehicle in a reckless manner;

(r) Vehicular homicide,
when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502,
or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(s) Any other class B
felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation;

(t) Any other felony
with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.602;

(u) Any felony offense
in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is comparable to a most
serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(v)(i) A prior
conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c),
chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW
9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11,
1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986,
until July 1, 1988;

(ii) A prior conviction
for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11,
1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was committed against a child
under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and
perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997, or RCW
9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993, through July 27,
1997.

(29) "Nonviolent
offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.

(30)
"Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by
state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is less than eighteen years
of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030
or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms
"offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.

(31) "Partial
confinement" means confinement for no more than one year in a facility or
institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit
of government, or, if home detention or work crew has been ordered by the
court, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the
balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work
release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and home
detention.

(32) "Persistent
offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i) Has been
convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious offense; and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this state or
elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be considered
most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score under RCW
9.94A.525; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one
conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i) Has been
convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the first
degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible compulsion;
(B) any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder
in the first degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping
in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first degree,
or burglary in the first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed
in this subsection (32)(b)(i); and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or elsewhere, of an
offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense
or offense under prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed
in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the first
degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the
offender was sixteen years of age or older when the offender committed the
offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second degree constitutes a
conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender was eighteen
years of age or older when the offender committed the offense.

(33) "Postrelease
supervision" is that portion of an offender's community placement that is
not community custody.

(34)
"Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specified period of time
as payment of damages. The sum may include both public and private costs.

(35) "Risk
assessment" means the application of an objective instrument supported by
research and adopted by the department for the purpose of assessing an
offender's risk of reoffense, taking into consideration the nature of the harm
done by the offender, place and circumstances of the offender related to risk,
the offender's relationship to any victim, and any information provided to the
department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not be based on
unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

(36) "Serious
traffic offense" means:

(a) Driving while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), actual physical
control while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended
vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or

(b) Any federal,
out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the
laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(37) "Serious
violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and means:

(a)(i) Murder in the
first degree;

(ii) Homicide by abuse;

(iii) Murder in the
second degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(v) Assault in the
first degree;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
first degree;

(vii) Rape in the first
degree;

(viii) Assault of a
child in the first degree; or

(ix) An attempt, criminal
solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of these felonies; or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a) of this subsection.

(38) "Sex
offense" means:

(a)(i) A felony that is
a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than RCW 9A.44.130(11);

(ii) A violation of RCW
9A.64.020;

(iii) A felony that is
a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than RCW 9.68A.070 or 9.68A.080; or

(iv) A felony that is,
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal
conspiracy to commit such crimes;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this subsection;

(c) A felony with a
finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or

(d) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this subsection.

(39) "Sexual
motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the defendant committed
the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification.

(40) "Standard
sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in
imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(41) "Statutory
maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time for which an offender
may be confined as punishment for a crime as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW,
RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the crime, or other statute defining the
maximum penalty for a crime.

(42) "Total
confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries of a
facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any
other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW
72.64.050 and 72.64.060.

(43) "Transition
training" means written and verbal instructions and assistance provided by
the department to the offender during the two weeks prior to the offender's
successful completion of the work ethic camp program. The transition training
shall include instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations
during the offender's period of community custody.

(44) "Victim"
means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or
financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the crime charged.

(45) "Violent offense"
means:

(a) Any of the
following felonies:

(i) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony;

(ii) Criminal
solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(iii) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the second degree;

(v) Indecent liberties
if committed by forcible compulsion;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(vii) Arson in the
second degree;

(viii) Assault in the
second degree;

(ix) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(x) Extortion in the
first degree;

(xi) Robbery in the
second degree;

(xii) Drive-by
shooting;

(xiii) Vehicular
assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner; and

(xiv) Vehicular
homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of this
subsection; and

(c) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b) of this
subsection.

(46) "Work
crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of civic
improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that complies with RCW
9.94A.725.

(47) "Work ethic
camp" means an alternative incarceration program as provided in RCW
9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by
requiring offenders to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and
vocational experiences, character-building work ethics training, life
management skills development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling,
literacy training, and basic adult education.

(48) "Work
release" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders who
are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study at school.

Sec. 4. RCW 9.94A.585 and 2000 c
28 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A sentence within
the standard sentence range for the offense shall not be appealed. For
purposes of this section, a sentence imposed on a first-time offender under RCW
9.94A.650 or a youthful offender under section 1 of this act shall also
be deemed to be within the standard sentence range for the offense and shall
not be appealed.

(2) A sentence outside
the standard sentence range for the offense is subject to appeal by the
defendant or the state. The appeal shall be to the court of appeals in accordance
with rules adopted by the supreme court.

(3) Pending review of
the sentence, the sentencing court or the court of appeals may order the
defendant confined or placed on conditional release, including bond.

(4) To reverse a
sentence which is outside the standard sentence range, the reviewing court must
find: (a) Either that the reasons supplied by the sentencing court are not
supported by the record which was before the judge or that those reasons do not
justify a sentence outside the standard sentence range for that offense; or (b)
that the sentence imposed was clearly excessive or clearly too lenient.

(5) A review under this
section shall be made solely upon the record that was before the sentencing
court. Written briefs shall not be required and the review and decision shall
be made in an expedited manner according to rules adopted by the supreme court.

(6) The court of
appeals shall issue a written opinion in support of its decision whenever the
judgment of the sentencing court is reversed and may issue written opinions in
any other case where the court believes that a written opinion would provide
guidance to sentencing courts and others in implementing this chapter and in
developing a common law of sentencing within the state.

(7) The department may
petition for a review of a sentence committing an offender to the custody or
jurisdiction of the department. The review shall be limited to errors of law.
Such petition shall be filed with the court of appeals no later than ninety
days after the department has actual knowledge of terms of the sentence. The
petition shall include a certification by the department that all reasonable
efforts to resolve the dispute at the superior court level have been exhausted.

Sec. 5. RCW 13.40.300 and 2000 c
71 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In no case may a
juvenile offender be committed by the juvenile court to the department of
social and health services for placement in a juvenile correctional institution
beyond the juvenile offender's twenty-first birthday. A juvenile may be under
the jurisdiction of the juvenile court or the authority of the department of
social and health services beyond the juvenile's eighteenth birthday only if
prior to the juvenile's eighteenth birthday:

(a) Proceedings are
pending seeking the adjudication of a juvenile offense and the court by written
order setting forth its reasons extends jurisdiction of juvenile court over the
juvenile beyond his or her eighteenth birthday;

(b) The juvenile has
been found guilty after a fact finding or after a plea of guilty and an
automatic extension is necessary to allow for the imposition of disposition; ((or))

(c) Disposition has
been held and an automatic extension is necessary to allow for the execution
and enforcement of the court's order of disposition. If an order of
disposition imposes commitment to the department, then jurisdiction is
automatically extended to include a period of up to twelve months of parole, in
no case extending beyond the offender's twenty-first birthday; or

(d) The juvenile has
been sentenced under section 1 of this act, the youthful offender sentencing
alternative.

(2) If the juvenile
court previously has extended jurisdiction beyond the juvenile offender's
eighteenth birthday and that period of extension has not expired, the court may
further extend jurisdiction by written order setting forth its reasons.

(3) In no event may the
juvenile court have authority to extend jurisdiction over any juvenile offender
beyond the juvenile offender's twenty-first birthday except for the purpose of
enforcing an order of restitution or penalty assessment.

(4)
Notwithstanding any extension of jurisdiction over a person pursuant to this
section, the juvenile court has no jurisdiction over any offenses alleged to
have been committed by a person eighteen years of age or older.

---
END ---