BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.24.510 and 1999 c
54 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A person
who ((in good faith)) communicates a complaint or information to any branch
or agency of federal, state, or local government, or to any self-regulatory
organization that regulates persons involved in the securities or futures
business and that has been delegated authority by a federal, state, or local
government agency and is subject to oversight by the delegating agency, is
immune from civil liability for claims based upon the communication to the
agency or organization regarding any matter reasonably of concern to that
agency or organization. A person prevailing upon the defense provided for in
this section ((shall be)) is entitled to recover ((costs))
expenses and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in establishing the
defense and in addition shall receive statutory damages of ten thousand
dollars. Statutory damages may be denied if the court finds that the complaint
or information was communicated in bad faith.

--- END ---