BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.210 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The attendance of
every child at every public school in the state shall be conditioned upon the
presentation before or on each child's first day of attendance at a particular
school of a physician's medication or treatment order addressing any life-threatening
health condition that requires the child to receive medical services at the
school. Once such an order has been presented, the child shall be allowed to
attend school.

(2) The chief
administrator of every public school shall prohibit the further presence at the
school for any and all purposes of each child for whom a physician's medication
or treatment order has not been provided in accordance with this section if the
child has a life-threatening health condition that may require medical services
to be performed at the school and shall continue to prohibit the child's
presence until such order has been provided. The exclusion of a child from a
school shall be accomplished in accordance with rules of the state board of
education. Before excluding a child, each school shall provide written notice
to the parents or legal guardians of each child or to the adults in loco
parentis to each child, who is not in compliance with the requirements of this
section. The notice shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (a)
The requirements established by this section; (b) the fact that the child will
be prohibited from further attendance at the school unless this section is
complied with; and (c) such procedural due process rights as are established
pursuant to this section.

(3) The state board of
education shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that establish the
procedural and substantive due process requirements governing the exclusion of
children from public schools under this section. The superintendent of public
instruction shall develop in consultation with the department of health any
policies necessary to implement this section, including a definition of
"life-threatening health condition." The rules shall include any
requirements under applicable federal laws.

(4) As
used in this section, "physician's medication or treatment order"
means the authority a registered nurse obtains under RCW 18.79.260(2).

--- END ---