BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 48.18 RCW to read as follows:

UNDERWRITING RESTRICTIONS THAT APPLY TO
PERSONAL INSURANCE. (1) For the purposes of this
section:

(a) "Adverse
action" has the same meaning as defined in the fair credit reporting act,
15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq. Adverse actions include, but are not limited to:

(i) Cancellation,
denial, or nonrenewal of personal insurance coverage;

(ii) Charging a higher
insurance premium for personal insurance than would have been offered if the
credit history or insurance score had been more favorable, whether the charge
is by:

(A) Application of a
rating rule;

(B) Assignment to a
rating tier that does not have the lowest available rates; or

(C) Placement with an
affiliate company that does not offer the lowest rates available to the
consumer within the affiliate group of insurance companies; or

(iii) Any reduction,
adverse, or unfavorable change in the terms of coverage or amount of any
personal insurance due to a consumer's credit history or insurance score. A
reduction, adverse, or unfavorable change in the terms of coverage occurs when:

(A) Coverage provided
to the consumer is not as broad in scope as coverage requested by the consumer
but available to other insureds of the insurer or any affiliate; or

(B) The consumer is not
eligible for benefits such as dividends that are available through affiliate
insurers.

(b)
"Affiliate" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 48.31B.005(1).

(c)
"Consumer" means an individual policyholder or applicant for
insurance.

(d) "Consumer
report" has the same meaning as defined in the fair credit reporting act,
15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.

(e) "Credit
history" means any written, oral, or other communication of any
information by a consumer reporting agency bearing on a consumer's
creditworthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity that is used or expected
to be used, or collected in whole or in part, for the purpose of serving as a
factor in determining personal insurance premiums or eligibility for coverage.

(f) "Insurance
score" means a number or rating that is derived from an algorithm,
computer application, model, or other process that is based in whole or in part
on credit history.

(g) "Personal
insurance" means:

(i) Private passenger
automobile coverage, including motorcycle and recreational vehicle coverage;

(ii) Homeowner's
coverage, including mobile homeowners, manufactured homeowners, condominium
owners, and renter's coverage;

(iii) Dwelling property
coverage;

(iv) Earthquake
coverage for a residence or personal property;

(v) Personal liability
and theft coverage;

(vi) Personal inland
marine coverage; and

(vii) Mechanical
breakdown coverage for personal auto or home appliances.

(h) "Tier"
means a category within a single insurer into which insureds with substantially
like insuring, risk or exposure factors, and expense elements are placed for
purposes of determining rate or premium.

(2) An insurer that
takes adverse action against a consumer based in whole or in part on credit
history or insurance score shall provide written notice to the applicant or
named insured. The notice must state the true and actual reason for the
adverse action in clear and simple language. Significant factors of the credit
history or insurance score that resulted in the adverse action shall be
identified. The insurer shall also inform the consumer that the consumer is
entitled to a free copy of their consumer report under the fair credit
reporting act.

(3) An insurer shall
not cancel or nonrenew personal insurance based in whole or in part on a
consumer's credit history or insurance score. Placement with an affiliate
insurer does not constitute cancellation or nonrenewal under this section.

(4) An insurer may use
credit history to deny personal insurance only in combination with other
substantive underwriting factors. For the purposes of this subsection:

(a) "Deny"
means an insurer refuses to offer insurance coverage to a consumer;

(b) Placement with an
affiliate insurer does not constitute denial of coverage; and

(c) An insurer may
reject an application when coverage is not bound or cancel an insurance
contract within the first sixty days after the effective date of the contract.

(5) Insurers shall not
deny personal insurance coverage based on:

(a) The absence of
credit history or the inability to determine the consumer's credit history, if
the insurer has received accurate and complete information from the consumer;

(b) The number of
credit inquiries;

(c) Credit history or
an insurance score based on collection accounts identified with a medical
industry code;

(d) The initial
purchase or finance of a vehicle or house that adds a new loan to the
consumer's existing credit history, if evident from the consumer report;
however, an insurer may consider the bill payment history of any loan, the
total number of loans, or both;

(e) The consumer's use
of a particular type of credit card, charge card, or debit card; or

(f) The consumer's
total available line of credit; however, an insurer may consider the total
amount of outstanding debt in relation to the total available line of credit.

(6)(a) If disputed
credit history is used to determine eligibility for coverage and a consumer is
placed with an affiliate that charges higher premiums or offers less favorable
policy terms:

(i) The insurer shall
reissue or rerate the policy retroactive to the effective date of the current
policy term; and

(ii) The policy, as
reissued or rerated, shall provide premiums and policy terms the consumer would
have been eligible for if accurate credit history had been used to determine
eligibility.

(b) This subsection
only applies if the consumer resolves the dispute under the process set forth
in the fair credit reporting act and notifies the insurer in writing that the
dispute has been resolved.

(7) The commissioner
may adopt rules to implement this section.

(8) This section
applies to all personal insurance policies issued or renewed after January 1,
2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 48.19 RCW to read as follows:

MAKING OF RATES‑-PERSONAL
INSURANCE. (1) For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Consumer" means an individual policyholder or applicant for
insurance.

(b) "Credit
history" means any written, oral, or other communication of any
information by a consumer reporting agency bearing on a consumer's
creditworthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity that is used or expected
to be used, or collected in whole or in part, for the purpose of serving as a
factor in determining personal insurance premiums or eligibility for coverage.

(c) "Insurance
score" means a number or rating that is derived from an algorithm,
computer application, model, or other process that is based in whole or in part
on credit history.

(d) "Personal
insurance" means:

(i) Private passenger
automobile coverage, including motorcycle and recreational vehicle coverage;

(ii) Homeowner's
coverage, including mobile homeowners, manufactured homeowners, condominium
owners, and renter's coverage;

(iii) Dwelling property
coverage;

(iv) Earthquake
coverage for a residence or personal property;

(v) Personal liability
and theft coverage;

(vi) Personal inland
marine coverage; and

(vii) Mechanical
breakdown coverage for personal auto or home appliances.

(2) Credit history
shall not be used to determine personal insurance rates, premiums, or
eligibility for coverage unless the insurance scoring models are filed with the
commissioner. Insurance scoring models include all attributes and factors used
in the calculation of an insurance score. RCW 48.19.040(5) does not apply to
any information filed under this subsection, and the information shall be
withheld from public inspection and kept confidential by the commissioner. All
information filed under this subsection shall be considered trade secrets under
RCW 48.02.120(3). Information filed under this subsection may be made public
by the commissioner for the sole purpose of enforcement actions taken by the
commissioner.

(3) Insurers shall not
use the following types of credit history to calculate a personal insurance
score or determine personal insurance premiums or rates:

(a) The absence of
credit history or the inability to determine the consumer's credit history,
unless the insurer has filed actuarial data segmented by demographic factors in
a manner prescribed by the commissioner that demonstrates compliance with RCW
48.19.020;

(b) The number of
credit inquiries;

(c) Credit history or
an insurance score based on collection accounts identified with a medical
industry code;

(d) The initial
purchase or finance of a vehicle or house that adds a new loan to the
consumer's existing credit history, if evident from the consumer report;
however, an insurer may consider the bill payment history of any loan, the
total number of loans, or both;

(e) The consumer's use
of a particular type of credit card, charge card, or debit card; or

(f) The consumer's
total available line of credit; however, an insurer may consider the total
amount of outstanding debt in relation to the total available line of credit.

(4) If a consumer is
charged higher premiums due to disputed credit history, the insurer shall
rerate the policy retroactive to the effective date of the current policy
term. As rerated, the consumer shall be charged the same premiums they would
have been charged if accurate credit history was used to calculate an insurance
score. This subsection applies only if the consumer resolves the dispute under
the process set forth in the fair credit reporting act and notifies the insurer
in writing that the dispute has been resolved.

(5) The commissioner
may adopt rules to implement this section.

(6) This section
applies to all personal insurance policies issued or renewed on or after June
30, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The commissioner shall
report to the legislature by January 1, 2004, on issues related to the use of
credit history in personal insurance underwriting and rating and the
implementation of this act. The report must include:

(1) A review of how
this act has been implemented and how it has impacted consumers; and

(2) A review and
analysis of insurance scoring, including:

(a) Which types of
consumers, based on demographic factors, benefit from or are harmed by the use
of credit history in personal insurance rating and underwriting;

(b) The extent to which
the use of credit history affects rates charged to the consumer;

(c) Whether insurance
scoring results in discrimination against a protected class of people or the
poor; and

(d) Other
issues as determined by the commissioner.

---
END ---