BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purpose of this
chapter is to allow all state or local governmental entities that award
contracts for publicly funded projects to select contractors by the lowest
responsible bidder method. This chapter does not supersede the requirements of
chapter 39.10 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A state or local
governmental entity that awards contracts for publicly funded projects
estimated to cost more than two hundred thousand dollars must determine whether
the lowest responsive bidder is responsible using the criteria in section 3 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. In determining whether
the lowest responsive bidder is responsible, the governmental entity awarding
the contract must consider the following elements:

(1) The ability,
capacity, and skill of the bidder to perform the contract or provide the
service required;

(2) The experience of
the bidder;

(3) Whether the bidder
has demonstrated the ability to perform within the time specified by previous
contracts;

(4) The satisfactory
completion of previous contracts or services by the bidder; and

(5) The previous and
current compliance by the bidder with contracting laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Governmental entities
shall use, in substantial form, a questionnaire created by the Washington state
department of general administration to determine compliance with section 3 of
this act. Modifications to the form may be utilized after notice has been
given by the governmental entity, prior to requesting bids on a project for
which the questionnaire will be used.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The apparent low bidder
must submit the questionnaire required by section 4 of this act within three
business days of the bid opening. Failure to submit the information within the
time provided will render the bid nonresponsible and the bidder shall forfeit
any bid deposit submitted to the contracting agency in support of the bid. If
the information that is provided is false on a material point, then the bid
will be deemed nonresponsible.

Immediately after an
award is made, the bids received shall be open to public inspection.

The governmental entity
must make an affirmative determination that the lowest responsive bidder is
responsible.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. If the governmental
entity deems the apparent low bidder to be not responsible, it shall notify the
bidder in writing with specificity as to the reasons why the bidder was deemed
not responsible. Within three business days of receipt of such notification,
the bidder may withdraw its bid or it may present additional information,
including any information from interested parties as defined in RCW 39.12.010,
that the bidder believes proves its responsibility. Within three business days
of a bidder's submission of additional information, the governmental entity
shall reconsider the bid and make a second determination of responsibility,
which shall be final.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

---
END ---