BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout sections 1 through 12 of this act unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Business
incentive" or "incentive" means a tax credit, tax deferral, or
tax exemption taken by or provided to a recipient under:

(a) Chapter 82.60,
82.62, or 82.63 RCW; or

(b) RCW 82.04.4452,
82.04.44525, 82.04.4456, 82.04.4457, 82.08.02565, 82.08.820, 82.12.02565, or
82.12.820.

(2) "Employee
benefits" means employer-provided health or medical insurance, vacation or
sick leave, and pension or retirement benefits.

(3)
"Recipient" means any for-profit business entity that receives a
business incentive.

(4) "Wage
bands" means the following five groupings of wage rates: (a) Up to state
minimum wage plus two dollars per hour; (b) between state minimum wage plus two
dollars and one cent to state minimum wage plus four dollars per hour; (c)
between state minimum wage plus four dollars and one cent to state minimum wage
plus six dollars per hour; (d) between state minimum wage plus six dollars and
one cent to state minimum wage plus eight dollars per hour; (e) between state
minimum wage plus eight dollars and one cent to state minimum wage plus ten
dollars; and (f) greater than state minimum wage plus ten dollars per hour.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) A recipient who
during a calendar year has taken an exemption, credit, or deferral identified
as a business incentive in this act must report as required by this section.

(2) The department of
revenue shall collect information on the exemption under RCW 82.08.02565 and
82.12.02565 using a statistical sampling of recipients, rather than by a
recipient report under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The department of
revenue shall develop a business incentive disclosure statement and make it
available electronically and in paper form and shall provide a copy to all
affected recipients.

(4) The department may
request information necessary for the legislature to evaluate the effectiveness
of the business incentives, such as the value of the incentive, net new jobs
created as a result of the incentive, and the average hourly wages of net new
jobs created.

(5)(a) The department
of revenue shall provide a business incentive disclosure report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1st of each year and
shall post a copy of the report on the department web site.

(b) The report shall
include a compilation and a summary of the data gathered under this section.
In addition, the report shall include a breakdown of the data by geographic
area and by industry, as well as wage bands, benefits, job classification, and
hiring levels. After September 1, 2004, the report shall include a section
comparing the data over time.

(c) The report shall
also include specific recommendations on whether the definition of business
incentives identified in section 1 of this act should be expanded or contracted
based on the department's experience in producing the report and based on
changes in statutes.

(6) The confidentiality
provisions of RCW 82.32.330 do not apply to the business incentive disclosure
statement received by the department of revenue under this section or to any
survey data gathered under this section and the business incentive disclosure
statement and any data may be disclosed to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to any
other reporting requirements under this chapter, a recipient taking a credit
under RCW 82.04.4452, 82.04.44525, 82.04.4456, or 82.04.4457 must complete and
return the business incentive disclosure statement in section 2 of this act to
the department of revenue by March 1st of each year. As used in this section,
"recipient" has the same meaning as in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to any
other reporting requirements under RCW 82.08.820, a recipient taking the
exemption under RCW 82.08.820 must complete and return the business incentive
disclosure statement in section 2 of this act to the department of revenue by
March 1st of each year. As used in this section, "recipient" has the
same meaning as in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to any
other reporting requirements under RCW 82.08.02565, a recipient taking the
exemption as under RCW 82.08.02565 must, if asked in writing by the department
of revenue, participate in a statistical sampling conducted under section 2 of
this act. As used in this section, "recipient" has the same meaning
as in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to any
other reporting requirements under RCW 82.12.820, a recipient taking the
exemption under RCW 82.12.820 must complete and return the business incentive
disclosure statement in section 2 of this act to the department of revenue by
March 1st of each year. As used in this section, "recipient" has the
same meaning as in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to any
other reporting requirements under RCW 82.12.02565, a recipient taking the
exemption as a credit under RCW 82.12.02565 must, if asked in writing by the
department of revenue, participate in a statistical sampling conducted under
section 2 of this act. As used in this section, "recipient" has the
same meaning as in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 82.60 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to any
other requirements under this chapter, a recipient participating in the
deferral program under this chapter must complete and return the business
incentive disclosure statement in section 2 of this act to the department of
revenue by March 1st of each year. As used in this section,
"recipient" has the same meaning as in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 82.62 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to any
other requirements under this chapter, a recipient taking the credit under this
chapter must complete and return the business incentive disclosure statement in
section 2 of this act to the department of revenue by March 1st of each year.
As used in this section, "recipient" has the same meaning as in
section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 82.63 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to any
other requirements under this chapter, a recipient participating in the
deferral program under this chapter must complete and return the business
incentive disclosure statement in section 2 of this act to the department of
revenue by March 1st of each year. As used in this section,
"recipient" has the same meaning as in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. Sections 1 and 2 of this
act are each added to chapter 82.32 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. This act applies to all
business incentives granted, received, or taken during calendar year 2002 and
thereafter.

---
END ---