BE IT ENACTED
BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)"Dental amalgam" means a mixture of mercury, and an
alloy of silver, tin, and copper, used in dentistry.

(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department of
ecology.

(4) "Health care facility" means a hospital, nursing home,
extended care facility, long-term care facility, clinical or medical
laboratory, state or private health or mental institution, clinic, physician's
office, or health maintenance organization.

(5) "Manufacturer" means any person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, or joint venture
that produces a mercury-added product or an importer or domestic distributor of
a mercury-added product produced in a foreign country. In the case of a
multicomponent product containing mercury, the manufacturer is the last
manufacturer to produce or assemble the product. If the multicomponent product
or mercury-added product is produced in a foreign country, the manufacturer is
the importer or domestic distributor.

(6) "Mercury-added product" means a product, commodity,
or chemical, or a product with a component that contains mercury or a mercury
compound intentionally added to the product, commodity, or chemical in order to
provide a specific characteristic, appearance, or quality, or to perform a
specific function, or for any other reason. Mercury‑added products
include, but are not limited to, mercury thermometers, mercury thermostats, and
mercury switches in motor vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Nothing in this chapter
applies to prescription drugs regulated by the food and drug administration
under the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.), to
biological products regulated by the food and drug administration under the public
health service act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 262 et seq.), to any substance that may be
lawfully sold over-the-counter without a prescription under the federal food,
drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.), or to dental amalgam.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) A person may not
knowingly dispose of mercury-added products in any manner other than by
recycling the product or disposing of the product as hazardous waste.

(2) When a mercury-added product is removed from service, the
mercury in the item must be source-separated for reuse or recycling, stabilized
for retirement, or otherwise managed to prevent its release into the
environment.

(3) A person may not knowingly send a multicomponent product
containing a mercury-added product, that has been intentionally flattened,
crushed, or baled, to a scrap processor, as defined in RCW 46.79.010, for
recycling without first removing the mercury-added product. A scrap processor
may accept a multicomponent product, knowing it contains a mercury-added
product, if the processor takes responsibility for removing the mercury-added
product. This subsection (3) does not apply to individuals disposing of
mercury-added household products.

(4) A person engaging in solid waste handling, including solid
waste storage, collection, transportation, treatment, utilization, processing,
incineration, and final disposal of solid wastes, may not knowingly collect or
accept for disposal solid waste that contains one or more mercury-added
products, unless the waste is collected at a permitted household hazardous
waste collection facility for the purpose of recycling the household hazardous
waste. A solid waste collector or transporter will not be deemed to have
knowingly accepted mercury-added products if the solid waste collector or
transporter has notified customers in writing at least once a year that it is
illegal to dispose of mercury-added products in solid waste containers, and if
no mercury-added products are clearly visible and easily identifiable in the
container. A solid waste treatment, processing, incineration, or disposal
facility will not be deemed to have knowingly accepted a mercury-added product
for processing or disposal if the facility has implemented the following:

(a) Posted signs at the solid waste management facility providing
notice of the prohibition of the disposal and incineration of mercury-added
products; and

(b) Provided written notification to or have contractual agreements
with the solid waste management facility's customers, providing notice of the
prohibition of the disposal and incineration of mercury-added products.

(5) For the purposes of this section a person acts knowingly when:

(a) The person is aware of a fact, facts, or circumstances or
result described by a statute defining a prohibited act; or

(b) The person has information that would lead a reasonable person
in the same situation to believe that the existing facts are the facts
described by a statute defining a prohibited act.

(6) Every two years the department must make available to the
public information concerning the amount of mercury diverted from the solid
waste stream that would otherwise be sent to solid waste management facilities
for disposal or incineration.

(7) Those persons involved in the recycling, dismantling, or hulk
hauling of motor vehicles are exempt from this section. The department shall
assemble an advisory committee of parties concerned with and involved in the
recycling and waste disposal of motor vehicles to make recommendations on the
reduction and removal of mercury components from the waste stream caused by the
scrapping and dismantling of motor vehicles. With the help of the advisory
committee, the department shall prepare recommendations to the legislature on
how mercury components may be reduced or eliminated from motor vehicle scrap,
how this will occur, and at what stage of the vehicle's life, as well as the liable
parties. The department's recommendations shall be presented to the
legislature no later than January 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) No later than January
1, 2003, the department, in consultation with the Washington hospital
association and other interested and affected parties, must develop the
following plans for mercury purchase and use at health care facilities:

(a) A mercury elimination plan for thermometers, thermostats,
manometers, and other mercury-added products for which alternatives are
available; and

(b) A mercury reduction plan for lab reagents, lights, batteries,
and other mercury-added products for which alternatives are not available.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "health care
facility" does not include a clinic, physician's office, dentist's office,
veterinarian's office, or a clinic, physician's office, or dentist's office
located within a health maintenance organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) The department must
develop a plan and proposed budget for a comprehensive public education,
outreach, and assistance program for households, hazardous waste generators,
municipalities, solid waste management districts, small businesses, health care
facilities, scrap metal facilities, dismantlers, institutions of higher
education, schools, and other interested groups. The plan must: (a) Focus on
the hazards of mercury, particularly those associated with the consumption of
mercury-contaminated fresh and saltwater fish, the requirements and obligations
of individuals, manufacturers, and agencies under this chapter, and voluntary
efforts that individuals, institutions, and businesses can undertake to help
further reduce mercury in the environment; (b) include a mechanism for
providing information to retailers, wholesalers, and the public on which
products are mercury-added products and information on possible nonmercury
alternatives; (c) include a description of how manufacturers of mercury-added
products and other affected businesses will be involved in the development and
implementation of a public education and technical assistance program; (d)
describe how the program will assist the municipalities and solid waste
management districts in developing, designing, and disseminating information
for the public about mercury-added products, source separation of waste
mercury-added products, and the collection programs that are available to the
public; and (e) describe how the program will be directed specifically at large
public and private institutions that use and discard substantial numbers of
waste mercury-added products, and at any other large users of those products.
The plan and proposed budget must be submitted to the governor and the
legislature by January 1, 2003.

(2) The department may develop an awards program to recognize the
accomplishments of manufacturers, municipalities, solid waste management
facilities, solid waste recycling facilities, household hazardous waste
collection facilities, citizens, or entities that go beyond the minimum
requirements established under this chapter and excel at reducing or
eliminating mercury in air emissions, solid waste, and wastewater discharges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. (1) The department of
general administration must, by July 1, 2003, revise its rules, policies, and
guidelines to implement the purpose of this chapter.

(2) The department of general administration must give priority and
preference to the purchase of equipment, supplies, and other products that
contain no mercury-added compounds or components, unless: (a) There is no
economically feasible nonmercury-added alternative that performs a similar
function; or (b) the product containing mercury is designed to reduce electricity
consumption by at least forty percent and there is no nonmercury or lower
mercury alternative available that saves the same or a greater amount of
electricity as the exempted product. In circumstances where a nonmercury-added
product is not available, preference must be given to the purchase of products
that contain the least amount of mercury added to the product necessary for the
required performance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. The department is
authorized to participate in a regional or multistate clearinghouse to assist
in carrying out any of the requirements of this chapter. A clearinghouse may
also be used for examining notification and label requirements, developing
education and outreach activities, and maintaining a list of all mercury-added
products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. The department may adopt
rules to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. (1) The department must
develop a planned strategy for the elimination of mercury from the
environment. This strategy will be known as the mercury chemical action plan.
The development of the mercury chemical action plan will be a model for how all
future chemical action plans will be developed.

(2) The mercury chemical action plan must include, but is not
limited to: (a) Identifying current mercury uses in Washington; (b) analyzing
current state and federal laws, regulations, rules, and voluntary measures that
can be used to reduce or eliminate mercury and mercury-added products; (c)
identifying mercury reduction and elimination options for mercury-added
products; and (d) implementing actions to reduce or eliminate mercury uses and
releases.

(3) In developing the mercury chemical action plan, the department
must involve an advisory committee not to exceed twelve members composed of
adequate and balanced representation of local government, business,
agriculture, and environmental, public health, and community groups. In
addition, the department must invite and strongly encourage any interested
tribes or federal agencies to participate in the advisory committee process.
The advisory committee must be involved in the development of the mercury
chemical action plan. All information that will serve as the basis for any
decisions in the mercury chemical action plan's development must be available
to the advisory committee members. The advisory committee has sixty days to
provide input to the department on the elements of the mercury chemical action
plan. The comments and suggestions made by the advisory committee must be
considered by the department; however, consensus of the advisory committee is
not necessary for the department to move forward in the development of the
mercury chemical action plan. All meetings of the advisory committee are
subject to the provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW. The advisory committee for the
mercury chemical action plan must be established by April 15, 2002.

(4) By June 30, 2002, the department must develop and issue a draft
mercury chemical action plan in consultation with the advisory committee.
Following the release of the draft plan, the department must allow for a
sixty-day public comment period. The department must reconvene the advisory
committee following the comment period to consider the public comments
received.

(5) The final mercury chemical action plan, developed after
considering the public comments and the input of the advisory committee, must
outline actions for the department to take, including, but not limited to the
development of any rules that are within the department's authority and
recommending any legislation.

(6) The mercury chemical action plan must be finalized by December
1, 2002, and implementation must begin no later than January 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. Any fiscal impact on the
department of ecology that results from the implementation of this act shall be
paid for out of existing funds previously appropriated out of the state toxics
control account for the implementation of the department's persistent,
bioaccumulative toxic chemical strategy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. The department of ecology
shall: (1) Study issues relating to the collection and recycling of
mercury-added products, including options for manufacturer responsibility for
those products; and (2) prepare a report to the appropriate legislative
committees specifying what mercury-added products currently have
cost-effective, nonmercury alternatives that are readily available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. (1) Sections 1, 2, and 4
through 8 of this act take effect July 1, 2002.

(2) Section 3 of this act takes effect January 1, 2003.

(3) Section 9 of this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state
government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 1 through 9 and
12 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---