BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

The law enforcement
memorial account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from the sale of special license plates for the law enforcement
memorial, less the administration and collection costs incurred by the
department of licensing under RCW 46.16.313 (6) and (7), must be deposited into
the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for building and
maintaining a law enforcement memorial on the capitol campus. Only the
director of general administration or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Law enforcement
memorial license plates" means license plates issued under section 3 of
this act that display the symbol of law enforcement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

In cooperation with the
Washington state patrol and the memorial committee, the department of licensing
shall create, design, and issue a special license plate displaying a symbol of
law enforcement that may be used in lieu of regular or personalized license
plates for motor vehicles required to display two motor vehicle license plates,
excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and
conditions established by the department. These special plates will honor
Washington law enforcement and provide funding for a law enforcement memorial.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c
291 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may
establish a fee of no more than forty dollars for each type of special
license plates issued under RCW 46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing
before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, ((in an amount
calculated)) to offset the cost of production of the special license plates
and the administration of this program. ((Until December 31, 1997, the fee
shall not exceed thirty-five dollars, but effective with vehicle registrations
due or to become due on January 1, 1998, the department may adjust the fee to
no more than forty dollars.)) This fee is in addition to all other fees
required to register and license the vehicle for which the plates have been
requested. All such additional special license plate fees collected by the
department shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the motor
vehicle fund.

(2) ((Until December
31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application, registration, and renewal registration of a motor vehicle, the
holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection expenses
incurred by it. The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production,
shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(3) Effective with vehicle
registrations due or to become due on January 1, 1998,)) In addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the
holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars.
The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection expenses
incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the
state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The state treasurer
shall credit the funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as
provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(((4) Effective with
annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 1999,)) (3) In
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay a fee
of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted
to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(((5))) (4)
In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a special baseball stadium
license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The
remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds
issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW
82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary preconstruction costs, while the
taxes are being collected under RCW 82.14.360. After this date, the state
treasurer shall credit the funds to the state general fund.

(((6) Effective with
annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 1999,)) (5) In
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a special baseball stadium license plate
shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not
to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds
shall be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
state general fund.

(6) The memorial
committee shall collect the applications for law enforcement memorial license
plates until July 1, 2003. If the memorial committee collects at least nine
hundred applications, the committee will submit them to the department of
licensing and, effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2004, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a special law
enforcement memorial license plate shall pay an initial fee of thirty-seven
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of
each fee collected under this subsection for administration and collection of
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds will be deposited in the law
enforcement memorial account created under section 1 of this act.

(7)
Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 2005, in
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a special law enforcement memorial license
plate shall pay a fee of twenty-seven dollars. The department shall deduct an
amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection
for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds will be deposited in the law enforcement memorial account created
under section 1 of this act.

---
END ---