BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 13.40.165 and 2001 c
164 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The purpose of this
disposition alternative is to ensure that successful treatment options to
reduce recidivism are available to eligible youth, pursuant to RCW 70.96A.520.
The court must consider eligibility for the chemical dependency disposition
alternative when a juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition
of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A-
or B+ offense, other than a first time B+ offense under chapter 69.50 RCW. The
court, on its own motion or the motion of the state or the respondent if the
evidence shows that the offender may be chemically dependent or substance
abusing, may order an examination by a chemical dependency counselor from a
chemical dependency treatment facility approved under chapter 70.96A RCW to
determine if the youth is chemically dependent or substance abusing. The
offender shall pay the cost of any examination ordered under this subsection
unless the court finds that the offender is indigent and no third party
insurance coverage is available, in which case the state shall pay the cost.

(2) The report of the
examination shall include at a minimum the following: The respondent's version
of the facts and the official version of the facts, the respondent's offense
history, an assessment of drug-alcohol problems and previous treatment
attempts, the respondent's social, educational, and employment situation, and other
evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of the
examiner's information.

(3) The examiner shall
assess and report regarding the respondent's relative risk to the community. A
proposed treatment plan shall be provided and shall include, at a minimum:

(a) Whether inpatient
and/or outpatient treatment is recommended;

(b) Availability of
appropriate treatment;

(c) Monitoring plans,
including any requirements regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements,
and monitoring by family members, legal guardians, or others;

(d) Anticipated length
of treatment; and

(e) Recommended
crime-related prohibitions.

(4) The court on its
own motion may order, or on a motion by the state or the respondent shall
order, a second examination. The evaluator shall be selected by the party
making the motion. The requesting party shall pay the cost of any examination
ordered under this subsection unless the requesting party is the offender and
the court finds that the offender is indigent and no third party insurance
coverage is available, in which case the state shall pay the cost.

(5)(a) After receipt of
reports of the examination, the court shall then consider whether the offender
and the community will benefit from use of this chemical dependency disposition
alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the offender should
receive a treatment disposition under this section.

(b) If the court
determines that this chemical dependency disposition alternative is
appropriate, then the court shall impose the standard range for the offense, or
if the court concludes, and enters reasons for its conclusion, that such
disposition would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a
disposition above the standard range as indicated in option C of RCW 13.40.0357
if the disposition is an increase from the standard range and the confinement
of the offender does not exceed a maximum of fifty-two weeks, suspend
execution of the disposition, and place the offender on community supervision
for up to one year. As a condition of the suspended disposition, the court
shall require the offender to undergo available outpatient drug/alcohol
treatment and/or inpatient drug/alcohol treatment. For purposes of this
section, inpatient treatment may not exceed ninety days. As a condition of the
suspended disposition, the court may impose conditions of community supervision
and other sanctions, including up to thirty days of confinement, one hundred
fifty hours of community service, and payment of legal financial obligations
and restitution.

(6) The drug/alcohol
treatment provider shall submit monthly reports on the respondent's progress in
treatment to the court and the parties. The reports shall reference the
treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of attendance,
respondent's compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the
respondent's relative progress in treatment, and any other material specified
by the court at the time of the disposition.

At the time of the
disposition, the court may set treatment review hearings as the court considers
appropriate.

If the offender
violates any condition of the disposition or the court finds that the
respondent is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment, the court may
impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or revoke the suspension and order
execution of the disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement
time previously served if that confinement was for the offense for which the
suspension is being revoked.

(7) For purposes of
this section, "victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct
result of the offense charged.

(8) Whenever a juvenile
offender is entitled to credit for time spent in detention prior to a
dispositional order, the dispositional order shall specifically state the
number of days of credit for time served.

(9) In no case shall
the term of confinement imposed by the court at disposition exceed that to
which an adult could be subjected for the same offense.

(10) A
disposition under this section is not appealable under RCW 13.40.230.

--- END ---