BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.20A.010 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 9 s 211 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of social and health services is designed to integrate and
coordinate all those activities involving provision of care for individuals
who, as a result of their economic, social or health condition, require
financial assistance, institutional care, rehabilitation or other social and
health services. In order to provide for maximum efficiency of operation
consistent with meeting the needs of those served or affected, the department
will encompass substantially all of the powers, duties and functions vested by
law on June 30, 1970, in the department of public assistance, the department of
institutions, the veterans' rehabilitation council and the division of vocational
rehabilitation of the coordinating council on occupational education. The
department will concern itself with changing social needs, and will expedite
the development and implementation of programs designed to achieve its goals.
In furtherance of this policy, it is the legislative intent to set forth only
the broad outline of the structure of the department, leaving specific details
of its internal organization and management to those charged with its
administration. In no event shall administration costs for any single
administration or the agency as a whole exceed twelve percent of the total
agency budget. The department shall expand its current caseload carrying
capacity by requiring supervisors, managers, trainers, and any other
professional staff who may be qualified to carry a caseload, to do so in
addition to managing, supervising, or other duties. The goal is to maximize
caseload carrying capacity, while reducing or keeping administration expenses
to a minimum.

--- END ---