BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The director of the
department of fish and wildlife must establish the ballast water work group.

(2) The ballast water
work group consists of the following individuals:

(a) One staff person
from the governor's executive policy office. This person must act as chair of
the ballast water work group;

(b) Two representatives
from the Puget Sound steamship operators;

(c) Two representatives
from the Columbia river steamship operators;

(d) Three
representatives from the Washington public ports, one of whom must be a marine
engineer;

(e) Two representatives
from the petroleum transportation industry; and

(f) Two representatives
from the environmental community.

(3) The ballast water
work group must study, and provide a report to the legislature by December 15,
2003, the following issues:

(a) All issues relating
to ballast water technology, including exchange and treatment methods and the
associated costs;

(b) The services needed
by the industry and the state to protect the marine environment; and

(c) The costs
associated with, and possible funding methods for, implementing the ballast
water program.

(4) The ballast water
work group must begin operation immediately upon the effective date of this
section. The department of fish and wildlife must provide staff for the
ballast water work group. The staff must come from existing personnel within
the department of fish and wildlife.

(5)(a) The ballast
water work group expires June 30, 2004.

(b) This section
expires June 30, 2004.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.120.030 and 2000
c 108 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The owner or operator
in charge of any vessel covered by this chapter is required to ensure that the
vessel under their ownership or control does not discharge ballast water into
the waters of the state except as authorized by this section.

(1) Discharge into
waters of the state is authorized if the vessel has conducted an open sea
exchange of ballast water. A vessel is exempt from this requirement if the
vessel's master reasonably determines that such a ballast water exchange
operation will threaten the safety of the vessel or the vessel's crew, or is
not feasible due to vessel design limitations or equipment failure. If a
vessel relies on this exemption, then it may discharge ballast water into
waters of the state, subject to any requirements of treatment under subsection
(2) of this section and subject to RCW 77.120.040.

(2) After July 1, ((2002))
2004, discharge of ballast water into waters of the state is authorized
only if there has been an open sea exchange or if the vessel has treated its
ballast water to meet standards set by the department. When weather or
extraordinary circumstances make access to treatment unsafe to the vessel or
crew, the master of a vessel may delay compliance with any treatment required
under this subsection until it is safe to complete the treatment.

(3) The requirements of
this section do not apply to a vessel discharging ballast water or sediments
that originated solely within the waters of Washington state, the Columbia
river system, or the internal waters of British Columbia south of latitude
fifty degrees north, including the waters of the Straits of Georgia and Juan de
Fuca.

(4) Open sea exchange
is an exchange that occurs fifty or more nautical miles offshore. If the
United States coast guard requires a vessel to conduct an exchange further
offshore, then that distance is the required distance for purposes of
compliance with this chapter.

Sec. 3. RCW 77.120.060 and 2000
c 108 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

((The legislature recognizes
that international and national laws relating to this chapter are changing and
that state law must adapt accordingly. The department shall submit to the
legislature, and make available to the public, a report that summarizes the
results of this chapter and makes recommendations for improvement to this
chapter on or before December 1, 2001, and a second report on or before
December 1, 2004. The 2001 report shall describe how the costs of treatment
required as of July 1, 2002, will be substantially equivalent among ports where
treatment is required.)) The department shall strive to fund the
provisions of this chapter through existing resources, cooperative agreements
with the maritime industry, and federal funding sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 77.120 RCW to read as follows:

The
department, working with the United States coast guard and the marine exchange,
will work cooperatively to improve the ballast water information system and make
improvements no later than October 1, 2002. The cooperative effort will strive
to obtain ballast water reports for the United States coast guard under
contract. The reports may be used for ballast water management information
under this chapter and be forwarded to the United States coast guard for its
management purposes. Prior to July 1, 2002, steps must be taken to reduce or
eliminate the costs of reporting by the department.

---
END ---