BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.04.010 and 1996 c
93 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions ((set forth in the
sections preceding RCW 82.04.220)) in this chapter apply throughout
this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise or unless otherwise
provided.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.050 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Sale at
retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible personal
property (including articles produced, fabricated, or imprinted) to all persons
irrespective of the nature of their business and including, among others,
without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter,
improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers
other than a sale to a person who presents a resale certificate under RCW
82.04.470 and who:

(a) Purchases for the
purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of
business without intervening use by such person, but a purchase for the purpose
of resale by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale
for resale; or

(b) Installs, repairs,
cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates real or personal
property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal property becomes an
ingredient or component of such real or personal property without intervening
use by such person; or

(c) Purchases for the
purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for sale a new article
of tangible personal property or substance, of which such property becomes an
ingredient or component or is a chemical used in processing, when the primary
purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through
contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or

(d) Purchases for the
purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is
subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of
such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an
ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(e) Purchases for the
purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of competitive telephone
service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065. The term shall include every sale of
tangible personal property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed
in the performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail"
or "retail sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as
provided in (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following such use.
The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons engaged
in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and (7) and 82.04.290.

(2) The term "sale
at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the sale of or charge
made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor and services
rendered in respect to the following:

(a) The installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of tangible personal
property of or for consumers, including charges made for the mere use of
facilities in respect thereto((, but excluding)). The provision of
linen and uniform supply services, as that phrase is defined in chapter 82.08
RCW, is deemed to be made at the place of delivery of the customer. The term
"retail sale" excludes charges made for the use of coin-operated
laundry facilities when such facilities are situated in an apartment house,
rooming house, or mobile home park for the exclusive use of the tenants
thereof, and also ((excluding)) excludes sales of laundry service
to nonprofit health care facilities, and ((excluding)) excludes
services rendered in respect to live animals, birds, and insects;

(b) The constructing,
repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for consumers, including
the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the
realty by virtue of installation, and shall also include the sale of services
or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;

(c) The charge for
labor and services rendered in respect to constructing, repairing, or improving
any structure upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who
conveys the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person
performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of
performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then
reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original owner;

(d) The sale of or
charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the cleaning,
fumigating, razing or moving of existing buildings or structures, but shall not
include the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes of this
section the term "janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning and
caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service
businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor
cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or sandblasting;

(e) The sale of or
charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to automobile towing and
similar automotive transportation services, but not in respect to those required
to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;

(f) The sale of and
charge made for the furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel,
rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any
similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the renting or
leasing of real property, and it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real
property for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same;

(g) The sale of or
charge made for tangible personal property, labor and services to persons
taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this subsection when such
sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used or
consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any activity
defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though
such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or consumption.
Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to modify subsection
(1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section
shall be construed to modify this subsection.

(3) The term "sale
at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the sale of or charge
made for personal, business, or professional services including amounts
designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and other service emoluments
however designated, received by persons engaging in the following business
activities:

(a) Amusement and
recreation services including but not limited to golf, pool, billiards,
skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips for sightseeing purposes, and
others, when provided to consumers;

(b) Abstract, title
insurance, and escrow services;

(c) Credit bureau services;

(d) Automobile parking
and storage garage services;

(e) Landscape
maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i) horticultural services
provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming, repairing, removing, and
clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission or distribution lines or
equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an electric utility.
"Horticultural services provided to farmers" include but are not
limited to: Soil preparation of land currently being used to raise plant crops
such as plowing, weed control, or stump removal before planting; cultivation
activities, such as planting, thinning, weeding, pruning, or spraying; and
harvesting activities, such as threshing grain or legumes, mowing and baling
hay, or picking fruit;

(f) Service charges
associated with tickets to professional sporting events; and

(g) The following
personal services: Physical fitness services, tanning salon services, tattoo
parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath services, escort services,
and dating services.

(4) The term shall also
include the renting or leasing of tangible personal property to consumers and
the rental of equipment with an operator.

(5) The term shall also
include the providing of telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, to
consumers.

(6) The term shall also
include the sale of canned software other than a sale to a person who presents
a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the method of delivery
to the end user, but shall not include custom software or the customization of
canned software.

(7) The term shall not
include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect
to the building, repairing, or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation
or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used
or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass
transportation vehicles of any kind.

(8) The term shall also
not include sales of chemical sprays or washes to persons for the purpose of
postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or
decay, nor shall it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents
for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials
to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve program,
the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands reserve program, and
the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their successors administered by
the United States department of agriculture; (b) farmers for the purpose of
producing for sale any agricultural product; and (c) farmers acting under
cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an organization exempt
from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or the Washington state
department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land
that the farmer owns or leases.

(9) The term shall not
include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect
to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing
buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the
United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing, or
attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation. Nor shall the term include the sale of services or charges made
for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the United States,
any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor shall
the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning up for the
United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other byproducts
of weapons production and nuclear research and development.

(10) Until July 1,
2003, the term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor and
services rendered for environmental remedial action as defined in RCW
82.04.2635(2).

Sec. 3. RCW 82.04.260 and 2001 2nd
sp.s. c 25 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing:

(a) Wheat into flour,
barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola into canola oil,
canola meal, or canola byproducts, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to
such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to
the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;

(b) Seafood products
which remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing by that person; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect
to such business shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured,
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;

(c) By canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits and vegetables,
or selling at wholesale fresh fruits and vegetables canned, preserved, frozen,
processed, or dehydrated by the seller and sold to purchasers who transport in
the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons
the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of
the products canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports in the
ordinary course of business goods out of this state, the seller shall annually
provide a statement in a form prescribed by the department and retain the
statement as a business record; and

(d) Dairy products that
as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131,
133, and 135, including byproducts from the manufacturing of the dairy products
such as whey and casein; or selling the same to purchasers who transport in the
ordinary course of business the goods out of state; as to such persons the tax
imposed shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured or the
gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports in the ordinary course of
business goods out of this state, the seller shall annually provide a statement
in a form prescribed by the department and retain the statement as a business
record.

(2) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of splitting or processing dried
peas; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the value of the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent.

(3) Upon every
nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association engaging within this state in
research and development, as to such corporations and associations, the amount
of tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the gross income
derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(4) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of slaughtering, breaking and/or
processing perishable meat products and/or selling the same at wholesale only
and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the
gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(5) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of making sales, at retail or
wholesale, of nuclear fuel assemblies manufactured by that person, as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the
gross proceeds of sales of the assemblies multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.

(6) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing nuclear fuel
assemblies, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business
shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured multiplied by the rate
of 0.275 percent.

(7) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour
operator; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(8) Upon every person
engaging within this state in business as an international steamship agent,
international customs house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel
and/or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo
agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only
international activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(9) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of stevedoring and associated
activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in waterborne
interstate or foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to
taxation under this subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by
chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the conduct
of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are
defined as all activities of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby
cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over,
onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a
warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement
in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be
stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for delivery to
its consignee. Specific activities included in this definition are: Wharfage,
handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery
to the consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode;
documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking,
care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo; imported
automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and
incidental vessel services, including but not limited to plugging and
unplugging refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other refrigerated
cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.

(10) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of disposing of low-level waste, as
defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such persons the amount of the tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross income of the business,
excluding any fees imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of
3.3 percent.

If the gross income of
the taxpayer is attributable to activities both within and without this state,
the gross income attributable to this state shall be determined in accordance
with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.

(11) Upon every person
engaging within this state as an insurance agent, insurance broker, or
insurance solicitor licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW; as to such persons, the amount
of the tax with respect to such licensed activities shall be equal to the gross
income of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(12) Upon every person
engaging within this state in business as a hospital, as defined in chapter
70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any
of its political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent
thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall be deposited in
the health services account created under RCW 43.72.900.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.04.272 and 1998 c
343 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of warehousing and reselling
prescription drugs; as to such persons, the amount of the tax shall be equal to
the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(2) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Prescription
drug" has the same meaning as that term is given in RCW 82.08.0281; and

(b) "Warehousing
and reselling prescription drugs" means the buying of prescription drugs
from a manufacturer or another wholesaler, warehousing in this state,
and then reselling of the drugs to persons selling at retail or to
hospitals, clinics, health care providers, or other providers of health care
services, by a wholesaler or retailer who is registered with the federal drug
enforcement administration and licensed by the state board of pharmacy.

Sec. 5. RCW 82.04.290 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 9 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of providing international
investment management services, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross income or gross proceeds
of sales of the business multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.

(2) Upon every person
engaging within this state in any business activity other than or in addition
to ((those enumerated in RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250, 82.04.255,
82.04.260, 82.04.270, 82.04.298, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280, 82.04.2635, 82.04.2907,
and 82.04.272,)) an activity taxed explicitly under another section in
this chapter and subsection (1) of this section; as to such persons the
amount of tax on account of such activities shall be equal to the gross income
of the business multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.

(3) This section
includes, among others, and without limiting the scope hereof (whether or not
title to materials used in the performance of such business passes to another
by accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged in the
business of rendering any type of service which does not constitute a
"sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of
advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials furnished to
an agent by his principal or supplier to be used for informational, educational
and promotional purposes shall not be considered a part of the agent's
remuneration or commission and shall not be subject to taxation under this
section.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.04.290 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 9 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of providing international
investment management services, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross income or gross proceeds
of sales of the business multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.

(2) Upon every person
engaging within this state in any business activity other than or in addition
to ((those enumerated in RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250, 82.04.255,
82.04.260, 82.04.270, 82.04.298, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280, 82.04.2907, and
82.04.272,)) an activity taxed explicitly under another section in this
chapter and subsection (1) of this section; as to such persons the amount
of tax on account of such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.

(3) This section
includes, among others, and without limiting the scope hereof (whether or not
title to materials used in the performance of such business passes to another
by accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged in the
business of rendering any type of service which does not constitute a
"sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of
advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials furnished to
an agent by his principal or supplier to be used for informational, educational
and promotional purposes shall not be considered a part of the agent's
remuneration or commission and shall not be subject to taxation under this
section.

Sec. 7. RCW 82.04.470 and 1993
sp.s. c 25 s 701 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless a seller has
taken from the buyer a resale certificate, the burden of proving that a sale of
tangible personal property, or of services, was not a sale at retail shall be
upon the person who made it.

(2) If a seller does
not receive a resale certificate at the time of the sale, have a resale
certificate on file at the time of the sale, or obtain a resale certificate
from the buyer within a reasonable time after the sale, the seller shall remain
liable for the tax as provided in RCW 82.08.050, unless the seller can
demonstrate facts and circumstances according to rules adopted by the
department of revenue that show the sale was properly made without payment of
sales tax.

(3) Resale certificates
shall be valid for a period of four years from the date the certificate is
provided to the seller.

(4) The department may provide
by rule for suggested forms for resale certificates ((or equivalent
documents)) containing the information that will be accepted as resale
certificates. The department shall provide by rule the categories of items or
services that must be specified on resale certificates and the business
classifications that may use a blanket resale certificate.

(5) As used in this
section, "resale certificate" means documentation provided by a buyer
to a seller stating that the purchase is for resale in the regular course of
business((, or that the buyer is exempt from retail sales tax,)) and
containing the following information:

(a) The name and
address of the buyer;

(b) The uniform
business identifier or revenue registration number of the buyer, if the buyer is
required to (([be])) be registered;

(c) The type of
business engaged in;

(d) The categories of
items or services to be purchased for resale ((or that are exempt)),
unless the buyer is in a business classification that may present a blanket
resale certificate as provided by the department by rule;

(e) The date on which
the certificate was provided;

(f) A statement that
the items or services purchased ((either: (i))) are purchased
for resale in the regular course of business((; or (ii) are exempt from tax
pursuant to statute));

(g) A statement that
the buyer acknowledges that the buyer is solely responsible for purchasing
within the categories specified on the certificate and that misuse of the
resale ((or exemption)) privilege claimed on the certificate subjects
the buyer to a penalty of fifty percent of the tax due, in addition to the tax,
interest, and any other penalties imposed by law;

(h) The name of the
individual authorized to sign the certificate, printed in a legible fashion;

(i) The signature of
the authorized individual; and

(j) The name of the
seller.

Sec. 8. RCW 82.08.010 and 1985 c
38 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in
chapter 82.04 RCW apply throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise or unless otherwise provided. For the purposes of this
chapter:

(1) "Selling
price" means the consideration, whether money, credits, rights, or other
property except trade-in property of like kind, expressed in the terms of money
paid or delivered by a buyer to a seller without any deduction on account of the
cost of tangible property sold, the cost of materials used, labor costs,
interest, discount, delivery costs, taxes other than taxes imposed under this
chapter if the seller advertises the price as including the tax or that the
seller is paying the tax, or any other expenses whatsoever paid or accrued and
without any deduction on account of losses; but shall not include the amount of
cash discount actually taken by a buyer; and shall be subject to modification
to the extent modification is provided for in RCW 82.08.080.

When tangible personal
property is rented or leased under circumstances that the consideration paid
does not represent a reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or
leased, the "selling price" shall be determined as nearly as possible
according to the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of
like quality and character under such rules as the department of revenue may
prescribe;

(2) "Seller"
means every person, including the state and its departments and institutions,
making sales at retail or retail sales to a buyer or consumer, whether as
agent, broker, or principal, except "seller" does not mean the state
and its departments and institutions when making sales to the state and its
departments and institutions;

(3) "Buyer"
and "consumer" include, without limiting the scope hereof, every
individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm,
copartnership, joint venture, club, company, joint stock company, business
trust, corporation, association, society, or any group of individuals acting as
a unit, whether mutual, cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise,
municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation, and also the state, its
departments and institutions and all political subdivisions thereof,
irrespective of the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed,
and also the United States or any instrumentality thereof((;

(4) The meaning
attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax year,"
"taxable year," "person," "company,"
"sale," "sale at retail," "retail sale,"
"sale at wholesale," "wholesale," "business,"
"engaging in business," "cash discount,"
"successor," "consumer," "in this state" and
"within this state" shall apply equally to the provisions of this
chapter)).

Sec. 9. RCW 82.08.0266 and 1999
c 358 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 shall not apply to sales to nonresidents of this state for use
outside of this state of watercraft requiring coast guard registration or
registration by the state of principal use according to the Federal Boating Act
of 1958, even though delivery be made within this state, but only when (1) the
watercraft will not be used within this state for more than forty-five days and
(2) an appropriate exemption certificate supported by identification
ascertaining residence as required by the department ((of revenue)) and
signed by the ((purchaser)) buyer or ((his)) the
buyer's agent establishing the fact that the ((purchaser)) buyer
is a nonresident and that the watercraft is for use outside of this state, a
copy of which shall be retained by the ((dealer)) seller.

Sec. 10. RCW 82.08.02665 and 1999
c 358 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 does not apply to sales of vessels to residents of foreign countries
for use outside of this state, even though delivery is made within this state,
but only if (1) the vessel will not be used within this state for more than
forty-five days and (2) an appropriate exemption certificate supported by
identification as required by the department ((of revenue)) and signed
by the ((purchaser)) buyer or the ((purchaser's)) buyer's
agent establishes the fact that the ((purchaser)) buyer is a resident
of a foreign country and that the vessel is for use outside of this state. A
copy of the exemption certificate is to be retained by the ((dealer)) seller.

As used in this
section, "vessel" means every watercraft used or capable of being
used as a means of transportation on the water, other than a seaplane.

Sec. 11. RCW 82.08.02745 and 1997
c 438 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to charges made for labor and services rendered
by any person in respect to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or
improving of new or existing buildings or other structures used as agricultural
employee housing, or to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of the buildings or other structures during the course
of the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving the buildings or other
structures((, but)). The exemption is available only if the
buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department ((by rule)).

(2) The exemption
provided in this section for agricultural employee housing provided to
year-round employees of the agricultural employer, only applies if that housing
is built to the current building code for single-family or multifamily
dwellings according to the state building code, chapter 19.27 RCW.

(3) Any agricultural
employee housing built under this section shall be used according to this
section for at least five consecutive years from the date the housing is
approved for occupancy, or the full amount of tax otherwise due shall be
immediately due and payable together with interest, but not penalties, from the
date the housing is approved for occupancy until the date of payment. If at
any time agricultural employee housing that is not located on agricultural land
ceases to be used in the manner specified in subsection (2) of this section,
the full amount of tax otherwise due shall be immediately due and payable with
interest, but not penalties, from the date the housing ceases to be used as
agricultural employee housing until the date of payment.

(4) The exemption
provided in this section shall not apply to housing built for the occupancy of
an employer, family members of an employer, or persons owning stock or shares
in a farm partnership or corporation business.

(5) For purposes of
this section and RCW 82.12.02685:

(a) "Agricultural
employee" or "employee" has the same meaning as given in RCW
19.30.010;

(b) "Agricultural
employer" or "employer" has the same meaning as given in RCW
19.30.010; and

(c) "Agricultural
employee housing" means all facilities provided by an agricultural
employer, housing authority, local government, state or federal agency,
nonprofit community or neighborhood-based organization that is exempt from
income tax under section 501(c) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C.
Sec. 501(c)), or for-profit provider of housing for housing agricultural
employees on a year-round or seasonal basis, including bathing, food handling,
hand washing, laundry, and toilet facilities, single-family and multifamily
dwelling units and dormitories, and includes labor camps under RCW ((70.54.110))
70.114A.110. "Agricultural employee housing" does not include
housing regularly provided on a commercial basis to the general public.
"Agricultural employee housing" does not include housing provided by
a housing authority unless at least eighty percent of the occupants are
agricultural employees whose adjusted income is less than fifty percent of
median family income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the
housing is provided.

Sec. 12. RCW 82.08.0283 and 2001
c 75 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax
levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of insulin; prosthetic devices
and the components thereof; dental appliances, devices, restorations, and
substitutes, and the components thereof, including but not limited to full and
partial dentures, crowns, inlays, fillings, braces, and retainers; orthotic
devices prescribed for an individual by a person licensed under chapters 18.22,
18.25, 18.57, or 18.71 RCW, and the components thereof; hearing
instruments dispensed or fitted by a person licensed or certified under chapter
18.35 RCW, and the components thereof; medicines of mineral, animal, and
botanical origin prescribed, administered, dispensed, or used in the treatment
of an individual by a person licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW; ostomic items;
and ((medically prescribed)) oxygen, including, but not limited to,
oxygen concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid oxygen systems, ((and))
gaseous, bottled oxygen systems, and other like portable systems, to be
prescribed for use by an individual, whether or not purchased by an
individual. The prescription must be by a person licensed under chapter
18.57 or 18.71 RCW for use in the medical treatment of ((that)) the
individual.

(2) In addition,
the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to charges made for labor and
services rendered in respect to the repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
of any of the items exempted under this section.

Sec. 13. RCW 82.08.820 and 1997 c
450 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Wholesalers or
third-party warehousers who own or operate warehouses or grain elevators and
retailers who own or operate distribution centers, and who have paid the tax
levied by RCW 82.08.020 on:

(a) Material-handling
and racking equipment, and labor and services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the equipment; or

(b) Construction of a
warehouse or grain elevator, including materials, and including service and
labor costs,

are eligible for an
exemption in the form of a remittance. The amount of the remittance is
computed under subsection (3) of this section and is based on the state share
of sales tax.

(2) For purposes of
this section and RCW 82.12.820:

(a) "Agricultural
products" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.213;

(b)
"Construction" means the actual construction of a warehouse or grain
elevator that did not exist before the construction began.
"Construction" includes expansion if the expansion adds at least two
hundred thousand square feet of additional space to an existing warehouse or
additional storage capacity of at least one million bushels to an existing
grain elevator. "Construction" does not include renovation, remodeling,
or repair;

(c)
"Department" means the department of revenue;

(d) "Distribution
center" means a warehouse that is used exclusively by a retailer solely
for the storage and distribution of finished goods to retail outlets of the
retailer. "Distribution center" does not include a warehouse at
which retail sales occur;

(e) "Finished
goods" means tangible personal property intended for sale by a retailer or
wholesaler. "Finished goods" does not include agricultural products
stored by wholesalers, third-party warehouses, or retailers if the storage
takes place on the land of the person who produced the agricultural product.
"Finished goods" does not include ((logs, minerals, petroleum,
gas, or other)) extracted products stored as raw materials or in bulk;

(f) "Grain
elevator" means a structure used for storage and handling of grain in
bulk;

(g)
"Material-handling equipment and racking equipment" means equipment
in a warehouse or grain elevator that is primarily used to handle, store,
organize, convey, package, or repackage finished goods. The term includes
tangible personal property with a useful life of one year or more that becomes
an ingredient or component of the equipment, including repair and replacement
parts. The term does not include equipment in offices, lunchrooms, restrooms,
and other like space, within a warehouse or grain elevator, or equipment used
for nonwarehousing purposes. "Material-handling equipment" includes
but is not limited to: Conveyers, carousels, lifts, positioners, pick-up-and-place
units, cranes, hoists, mechanical arms, and robots; mechanized systems,
including containers that are an integral part of the system, whose purpose is
to lift or move tangible personal property; and automated handling, storage,
and retrieval systems, including computers that control them, whose purpose is
to lift or move tangible personal property; and forklifts and other
off-the-road vehicles that are used to lift or move tangible personal property
and that cannot be operated legally on roads and streets. "Racking
equipment" includes, but is not limited to, conveying systems, chutes,
shelves, racks, bins, drawers, pallets, and other containers and storage
devices that form a necessary part of the storage system;

(h) "Person"
has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030;

(i)
"Retailer" means a person who makes "sales at retail" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property;

(j) "Square
footage" means the product of the two horizontal dimensions of each floor
of a specific warehouse. The entire footprint of the warehouse shall be
measured in calculating the square footage, including space that juts out from
the building profile such as loading docks. "Square footage" does
not mean the aggregate of the square footage of more than one warehouse at a
location or the aggregate of the square footage of warehouses at more than one
location;

(k) "Third-party
warehouser" means a person taxable under RCW 82.04.280(4);

(l)
"Warehouse" means an enclosed building or structure in which finished
goods are stored. A warehouse building or structure may have more than one
storage room and more than one floor. Office space, lunchrooms, restrooms, and
other space within the warehouse and necessary for the operation of the
warehouse are considered part of the warehouse as are loading docks and other
such space attached to the building and used for handling of finished goods.
Landscaping and parking lots are not considered part of the warehouse. A
storage yard is not a warehouse, nor is a building in which manufacturing takes
place; and

(m)
"Wholesaler" means a person who makes "sales at wholesale"
as defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property, but
"wholesaler" does not include a person who makes sales exempt under RCW
82.04.330.

(3)(a) A person
claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of a remittance under this
section must pay the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020. The buyer may then apply to
the department for remittance of all or part of the tax paid under RCW
82.08.020. For grain elevators with bushel capacity of one million but less
than two million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred thousand or more and
for grain elevators with bushel capacity of two million or more, the remittance
is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying
construction, materials, service, and labor, and fifty percent of the amount of
tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment, and
labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving the equipment.

(b) The department
shall determine eligibility under this section based on information provided by
the buyer and through audit and other administrative records. The buyer shall
on a quarterly basis submit an information sheet, in a form and manner as
required by the department by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax
claimed and the qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the department
to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the criteria under
this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents describing the material-handling
equipment and racking equipment; location and size of warehouses and grain
elevators; and construction invoices and documents.

(c) The department
shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted amounts to qualifying persons who
submitted applications during the previous quarter.

(4) Warehouses, grain
elevators, and material-handling equipment and racking equipment for which an
exemption, credit, or deferral has been or is being received under chapter
82.60, 82.61, 82.62, or 82.63 RCW or RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are not
eligible for any remittance under this section. Warehouses and grain elevators
upon which construction was initiated before May 20, 1997, are not eligible for
a remittance under this section.

(5) The lessor or owner
of a warehouse or grain elevator is not eligible for a remittance under this
section unless the underlying ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and
the material-handling equipment and racking equipment vests exclusively in the
same person, or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the
economic benefit of the remittance to the lessee in the form of reduced rent
payments.

Sec. 14. RCW 82.08.890 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 18 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to eligible persons of services rendered
in respect to operating, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of dairy
nutrient management equipment and facilities, or to sales of tangible personal
property that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment and
facilities. The equipment and facilities must be used exclusively for
activities necessary to maintain a dairy nutrient management plan as required
under chapter 90.64 RCW. This exemption applies to sales made after the dairy
nutrient management plan is certified under chapter 90.64 RCW.

(2)(a) The department
((of revenue)) must provide an exemption certificate to an eligible
person upon application by that person. The department of ((agriculture))
ecology must provide a list of eligible persons to the department of
revenue. The application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the
department and must contain information regarding the location of the dairy and
other information the department may require.

(b) The exemption is
available only ((when)) if the buyer provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(3) The definitions in
this subsection apply to this section and RCW 82.12.890 unless the context
clearly requires otherwise:

(a) "Dairy
nutrient management equipment and facilities" means machinery, equipment,
and structures used in the handling and treatment of dairy manure, such as
aerators, agitators, alley scrapers, augers, dams, gutter cleaners, loaders,
lagoons, pipes, pumps, separators, and tanks. The term also includes tangible
personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment and
facilities, including repair and replacement parts.

(b) "Eligible
person" means a person licensed to produce milk under chapter 15.36 RCW
who has a certified dairy nutrient management plan by December 31, 2003, as
required by chapter 90.64 RCW.

Sec. 15. RCW 82.12.02565 and 1999
c 211 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the use by a
manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used directly in
a manufacturing operation or research and development operation or to the use
by a person engaged in testing for a manufacturer or processor for hire of
machinery and equipment used directly in a testing operation.

(2) The provisions of
this chapter shall not apply to a bailor upon the bailment without intervening
use when the bailment is by a manufacturer or processor for hire of tangible
personal property to a manufacturer or processor for hire, if the bailee's use
of the tangible personal property is eligible for the exemption from tax under
this section.

Sec. 16. 2001 c 188 s 1
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that programs to allow buyers to remit sales and use tax, rather than
traditional collection and remittance by the seller of sales and use tax, can
assist in tax compliance, ease administrative burdens, and reduce ((impacts
on)) expenses of buyers and sellers. It is the intent of the
legislature to grant the department of revenue the authority to permit certain
buyers to make direct payment ((authority)) of tax in those
instances where it can be shown, to the satisfaction of the department, that
direct payment does not burden sellers and does not complicate administration
for the department. Buyers authorized for direct payment will remit tax
directly to the department, and will pay use tax on tangible personal property
and sales tax on retail labor and/or services.

This act does not
affect the requirements to use a resale certificate nor does it affect the
business and occupation tax treatment of the seller or reduce the tax burden
of the buyer.

Sec. 17. RCW 82.12.010 and 2001 c
188 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter:

(1)(a) "Value of
the article used" shall mean the consideration, whether money, credit,
rights, or other property except trade-in property of like kind, expressed in
terms of money, paid or given or contracted to be paid or given by the
purchaser to the seller for the article of tangible personal property, the use
of which is taxable under this chapter. The term includes, in addition to the
consideration paid or given or contracted to be paid or given, the amount of
any tariff or duty paid with respect to the importation of the article used.
In case the article used is acquired by lease or by gift or is extracted,
produced, or manufactured by the person using the same or is sold under
conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value
thereof, the value of the article used shall be determined as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar
products of like quality and character under such rules as the department of
revenue may prescribe.

(b) In case the
articles used are acquired by bailment, the value of the use of the articles so
used shall be in an amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the
articles so bailed, determined as nearly as possible according to the value of
such use at the places of use of similar products of like quality and character
under such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case any such
articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to the construction,
repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become or are to become an
ingredient or component of, new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant
to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of any such
articles therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such
articles so used shall be determined according to the retail selling price of
such articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as possible
according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of
like quality and character or, in the absence of either of these selling price
measures, such value may be determined upon a cost basis, in any event under
such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe.

(c) In the case of
articles owned by a user engaged in business outside the state which are
brought into the state for no more than one hundred eighty days in any period
of three hundred sixty-five consecutive days and which are temporarily used for
business purposes by the person in this state, the value of the article used
shall be an amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the
articles, unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter 82.08
RCW upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this
subsection.

(d) In the case of
articles manufactured or produced by the user and used in the manufacture or
production of products sold or to be sold to the department of defense of the
United States, the value of the articles used shall be determined according to
the value of the ingredients of such articles.

(e) In the case of an
article manufactured or produced for purposes of serving as a prototype for the
development of a new or improved product, the value of the article used shall
be determined by: (i) The retail selling price of such new or improved product
when first offered for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into
the prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered for
sale.

(f) In the case of an
article purchased with a direct pay permit under RCW 82.32.087, the value of
the article used shall be determined by the retail selling price, as defined in
RCW 82.08.010, of such article if but for the use of the direct pay permit the
transaction would have been subject to sales tax;

(2) "Use,"
"used," "using," or "put to use" shall have their
ordinary meaning, and shall mean the first act within this state by which the
taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of tangible
personal property (as a consumer), and include installation, storage,
withdrawal from storage, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use
or consumption within this state. In the case of an article purchased with
a direct pay permit under RCW 82.32.087, and stored within this state
preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption outside this state, such
storage within this state is deemed to be actual use within this state, if but
for the use of the direct pay permit the transaction would have been subject to
the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020;

(3)
"Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included
within the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word
"consumer" as defined in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW;

(4)
"Retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010 and every
person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property at retail
and every person required to collect from purchasers the tax imposed under this
chapter;

(5) The meaning
ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW, insofar as
applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect to taxes imposed
under the provisions of this chapter. "Consumer," in addition to the
meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW insofar as applicable,
shall also mean any person who distributes or displays, or causes to be
distributed or displayed, any article of tangible personal property, except
newspapers, the primary purpose of which is to promote the sale of products or
services.

Sec. 18. RCW 82.12.02567 and 2001
c 213 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter shall not apply with respect to machinery and equipment used
directly in generating not less than two hundred watts of electricity using fuel
cells, wind, sun, or landfill gas as the principal source of power.

(2) The definitions in
RCW 82.08.02567 apply to this section.

(3) This section
expires June 30, 2009.

Sec. 19. RCW 82.12.0277 and 2001
c 75 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of insulin;
prosthetic devices and the components thereof; dental appliances, devices,
restorations, and substitutes, and the components thereof, including but not
limited to full and partial dentures, crowns, inlays, fillings, braces, and
retainers; orthotic devices prescribed for an individual by a person licensed
under chapters 18.22, 18.25, 18.57, or 18.71 RCW, and the components thereof;
hearing instruments dispensed or fitted by a person licensed or certified under
chapter 18.35 RCW, and the components thereof; medicines of mineral, animal,
and botanical origin prescribed, administered, dispensed, or used in the
treatment of an individual by a person licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
ostomic items; and ((medically prescribed)) oxygen, including, but not
limited to, oxygen concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid oxygen
systems, ((and)) gaseous, bottled oxygen systems, and other like
portable systems, to be prescribed for use by an individual,
whether or not purchased by an individual. The prescription must be by a
person licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW for use in the medical
treatment of ((that)) the individual.

Sec. 20. RCW 82.12.045 and 1996 c
149 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((In the
collection of the use tax on motor vehicles,)) The department ((of
revenue)) may designate the county auditors of the several counties of the
state as its collecting agents in the collection of the use tax on tangible
personal property consisting of vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.670, off-road
vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020, snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010,
or vessels as defined in RCW 88.02.010. Upon such designation, ((it
shall be the duty of)) each county auditor ((to)) shall
collect the tax ((at the time)) when an applicant applies for the
registration of, and transfer of certificate of ownership or vessel
certificate of title to, the ((motor vehicle)) property, except
((in the following instances)) where the:

(a) ((Where the))
Applicant exhibits a dealer's report of sale showing that ((the
retail sales tax has been collected by)) the dealer has collected the
retail sales tax;

(b) ((Where the))
Application is for the renewal of registration;

(c) ((Where the))
Applicant presents a written statement signed by the department ((of
revenue)), or its duly authorized agent showing that no use tax is legally
due; or

(d) ((Where the))
Applicant presents satisfactory evidence showing that the applicant
has paid the retail sales tax or the use tax ((has been paid by him))
on the ((vehicle)) property in question.

(2) ((The term
"motor vehicle," as used in this section means and includes all motor
vehicles, trailers and semitrailers used, or of a type designed primarily to be
used, upon the public streets and highways, for the convenience or pleasure of
the owner, or for the conveyance, for hire or otherwise, of persons or
property, including fixed loads, facilities for human habitation, and vehicles
carrying exempt licenses.

(3) It shall be the
duty of)) Every applicant
applying for registration and transfer of certificate of ownership or
vessel certificate of title who is subject to payment of tax under this
section ((to)) shall declare upon ((his)) the
application the value of the ((vehicle)) property for which
application is made, which shall consist of the consideration paid or
contracted to be paid therefor.

(((4) Each county
auditor who acts as agent of the department of revenue shall at the time of))
(3) When remitting license fee receipts on ((motor vehicles)) tangible
personal property subject to the provisions of this section, each county
auditor shall pay over and account to the state treasurer for all use tax
revenue collected under this section((, after first deducting as his)).
Each county auditor may deduct a collection fee ((the sum)) of two
dollars for each ((motor vehicle)) transfer of personal property
upon which the tax ((has been)) was collected. The state
treasurer shall credit all revenue received ((by the state treasurer))
under this section ((shall be credited)) to the general fund. Each
county auditor shall deposit the ((auditor's)) collection fee ((shall
be deposited)) in the county current expense fund. A duplicate of the
county auditor's transmittal report to the state treasurer shall be forwarded
((forthwith)) immediately to the department ((of revenue)).

(((5))) (4)
Any applicant who ((has)) paid use tax to a county auditor under this
section may apply to the department ((of revenue)) for refund thereof if
((he)) the applicant has reason to believe that such tax was not
legally due and owing. No refund shall be allowed unless application therefor
is received by the department of revenue within the statutory period for
assessment of taxes, penalties, or interest prescribed by RCW 82.32.050(3).
Upon receipt of an application for refund the department ((of revenue))
shall consider the same and issue its order either granting or denying it and
if refund is denied the taxpayer shall have the right of appeal as provided in
RCW 82.32.170((,)) and 82.32.180 ((and 82.32.190)).

(((6))) (5)
The provisions of this section shall be construed as cumulative of other
methods prescribed in ((chapters 82.04 to 82.32 RCW)) this title,
inclusive, for the collection of the tax imposed by this chapter. The
department ((of revenue shall have power to promulgate)) may adopt
such rules as may be necessary to administer the provisions of this section.
Any duties required by this section to be performed by the county auditor may
be performed by the director of licensing but no collection fee shall be
deductible by said director in remitting use tax revenue to the state
treasurer.

Sec. 21. RCW 82.14.0485 and 1995
3rd sp.s. c 1 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of a county with a population of one million or more may impose a
sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those
persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax shall
not exceed 0.017 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax.

(2) The tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section ((shall be deducted from the amount of
tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department of
revenue)) is a credit against the state tax under chapter 82.08 or
82.12 RCW. The department ((of revenue)) shall perform the collection
of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county and shall
remit the tax to the county pursuant to RCW 82.14.060.

(3) Moneys collected
under this section shall only be used for the purpose of paying the principal
and interest payments on bonds issued by a county to construct a baseball
stadium.

(4) No tax may be
collected under this section before January 1, 1996, and no tax may be
collected under this section unless the taxes under RCW 82.14.360 are being
collected. The tax imposed in this section shall expire when the bonds issued
for the construction of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than
twenty years after the tax is first collected.

(5) As used in this
section, "baseball stadium" means a baseball stadium with natural
turf and a retractable roof or canopy, together with associated parking
facilities, constructed in the largest city in a county with a population of
one million or more.

Sec. 22. RCW 82.14.0494 and 1997
c 220 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of a county that has created a public stadium authority to develop a
stadium and exhibition center under RCW 36.102.050 may impose a sales and use
tax in accordance with this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes
authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by
the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable
event within the county. The rate of tax shall be 0.016 percent of the selling
price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a
use tax.

(2) The tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section ((shall be deducted from the amount of
tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department of
revenue)) is a credit against the state tax under chapter 82.08 or
82.12 RCW. The department ((of revenue)) shall perform the collection
of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county and shall
remit the tax pursuant to RCW 82.14.060.

(3) Before the issuance
of bonds in RCW 43.99N.020, all revenues collected on behalf of the county
under this section shall be transferred to the public stadium authority. After
bonds are issued under RCW 43.99N.020, all revenues collected on behalf of the county
under this section shall be deposited in the stadium and exhibition center
account under RCW 43.99N.060.

(4) The definitions in
RCW 36.102.010 apply to this section.

(5) This section
expires on the earliest of the following dates:

(a) December 31, 1999,
if the conditions for issuance of bonds under RCW 43.99N.020 have not been met
before that date;

(b) The date on which
all bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 have been retired; or

(c) Twenty-three years
after the date the tax under this section is first imposed.

Sec. 23. RCW 82.14.370 and 1999 c
311 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of a rural county may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with
the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by
law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within
the county. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.08 percent of the selling price
in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use
tax, except that for rural counties with population densities between sixty and
one hundred persons per square mile, the rate shall not exceed 0.04 percent
before January 1, 2000.

(2) The tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section ((shall be deducted from the amount of
tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue))
is a credit against the state tax under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The
department ((of revenue)) shall perform the collection of such taxes on
behalf of the county at no cost to the county and shall remit the tax
pursuant to RCW 82.14.060.

(3) Moneys collected
under this section shall only be used for the purpose of financing public
facilities in rural counties. The public facility must be listed as an item in
the officially adopted county overall economic development plan, or the
economic development section of the county's comprehensive plan, or the
comprehensive plan of a city or town located within the county for those
counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040. For those counties that do not have an
adopted overall economic development plan and do not plan under the growth
management act, the public facility must be listed in the county's capital
facilities plan or the capital facilities plan of a city or town located within
the county. In implementing this section, the county shall consult with
cities, towns, and port districts located within the county. For the purposes
of this section, "public facilities" means bridges, roads, domestic
and industrial water facilities, sanitary sewer facilities, earth
stabilization, storm sewer facilities, railroad, electricity, natural gas,
buildings, structures, telecommunications infrastructure, transportation
infrastructure, or commercial infrastructure, and port facilities in the state
of Washington.

(4) No tax may be
collected under this section before July 1, 1998. No tax may be collected
under this section by a county more than twenty-five years after the date that
a tax is first imposed under this section.

(5) For purposes of
this section, "rural county" means a county with a population density
of less than one hundred persons per square mile as determined by the office of
financial management and published each year by the department for the period
July 1st to June 30th.

Sec. 24. RCW 82.14.390 and 1999 c
165 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (6) of this section, the governing body of a public facilities
district created under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that commences construction
of a new regional center, or improvement or rehabilitation of an existing new
regional center, before January 1, 2003, may impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of
any taxable event within the public facilities district. The rate of tax shall
not exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax.

(2) The tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section ((shall be deducted from the amount of
tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department of
revenue)) is a credit against the state tax under chapter 82.08 or
82.12 RCW. The department ((of revenue)) shall perform the collection
of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public facilities
district and shall remit the tax pursuant to RCW 82.14.060.

(3) No tax may be
collected under this section before August 1, 2000. The tax imposed in this
section shall expire when the bonds issued for the construction of the regional
center and related parking facilities are retired, but not more than
twenty-five years after the tax is first collected.

(4) Moneys collected
under this section shall only be used for the purposes set forth in RCW
35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount from other public or private
sources equal to thirty-three percent of the amount collected under this
section, provided that amounts generated from nonvoter approved taxes
authorized under chapter 35.57 RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under
chapter 36.100 RCW shall not constitute a public or private source. For the
purpose of this section, public or private sources includes, but is not limited
to cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development or
improvement of the regional center, land that is donated and used for the
siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind contributions from public or
private foundations, or amounts attributed to private sector partners as part
of a public and private partnership agreement negotiated by the public
facilities district.

(5) The combined total
tax levied under this section shall not be greater than 0.033 percent. If both
a public facilities district created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public
facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under this
section, the tax imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter 35.57
RCW shall be credited against the tax imposed by a public facilities district
created under chapter 36.100 RCW.

(6) A
public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW is not eligible to
impose the tax under this section if the legislative authority of the county
where the public facilities district is located has imposed a sales and use tax
under RCW 82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

Sec. 25. RCW 82.16.010 and 1996 c
150 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in
chapter 82.04 RCW apply throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise or unless otherwise provided. For the purposes of this
chapter, unless otherwise required by the context:

(1) "Railroad
business" means the business of operating any railroad, by whatever power
operated, for public use in the conveyance of persons or property for hire. It
shall not, however, include any business herein defined as an urban
transportation business.

(2) "Express
business" means the business of carrying property for public hire on the
line of any common carrier operated in this state, when such common carrier is
not owned or leased by the person engaging in such business.

(3) "Railroad car
business" means the business of operating stock cars, furniture cars,
refrigerator cars, fruit cars, poultry cars, tank cars, sleeping cars, parlor
cars, buffet cars, tourist cars, or any other kinds of cars used for
transportation of property or persons upon the line of any railroad operated in
this state when such railroad is not owned or leased by the person engaging in
such business.

(4) "Water
distribution business" means the business of operating a plant or system
for the distribution of water for hire or sale.

(5) "Light and
power business" means the business of operating a plant or system for the
generation, production or distribution of electrical energy for hire or sale
and/or for the wheeling of electricity for others.

(6) "Telegraph
business" means the business of affording telegraphic communication for
hire.

(7) "Gas
distribution business" means the business of operating a plant or system
for the production or distribution for hire or sale of gas, whether
manufactured or natural.

(8) "Motor
transportation business" means the business (except urban transportation
business) of operating any motor propelled vehicle by which persons or property
of others are conveyed for hire, and includes, but is not limited to, the
operation of any motor propelled vehicle as an auto transportation company
(except urban transportation business), common carrier or contract carrier as
defined by RCW 81.68.010 and 81.80.010: PROVIDED, That "motor
transportation business" shall not mean or include the transportation of
logs or other forest products exclusively upon private roads or private
highways.

(9) "Urban
transportation business" means the business of operating any vehicle for
public use in the conveyance of persons or property for hire, insofar as (a)
operating entirely within the corporate limits of any city or town, or within
five miles of the corporate limits thereof, or (b) operating entirely within
and between cities and towns whose corporate limits are not more than five
miles apart or within five miles of the corporate limits of either thereof. Included
herein, but without limiting the scope hereof, is the business of operating
passenger vehicles of every type and also the business of operating cartage,
pickup, or delivery services, including in such services the collection and
distribution of property arriving from or destined to a point within or without
the state, whether or not such collection or distribution be made by the person
performing a local or interstate line-haul of such property.

(10) "Public
service business" means any of the businesses defined in subdivisions (1),
(2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), and (9) or any business subject to control
by the state, or having the powers of eminent domain and the duties incident
thereto, or any business hereafter declared by the legislature to be of a
public service nature, except telephone business as defined in RCW 82.04.065
and low-level radioactive waste site operating companies as redefined in RCW
81.04.010. It includes, among others, without limiting the scope hereof:
Airplane transportation, boom, dock, ferry, pipe line, toll bridge, toll
logging road, water transportation and wharf businesses.

(11) "Tugboat
business" means the business of operating tugboats, towboats, wharf boats
or similar vessels in the towing or pushing of vessels, barges or rafts for
hire.

(12) "Gross
income" means the value proceeding or accruing from the performance of the
particular public service or transportation business involved, including
operations incidental thereto, but without any deduction on account of the cost
of the commodity furnished or sold, the cost of materials used, labor costs,
interest, discount, delivery costs, taxes, or any other expense whatsoever paid
or accrued and without any deduction on account of losses.

(((13) The meaning
attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the term "tax year,"
"person," "value proceeding or accruing,"
"business," "engaging in business," "in this
state," "within this state," "cash discount" and
"successor" shall apply equally in the provisions of this chapter.))

Sec. 26. RCW 82.18.060 and 1989 c
431 s 87 are each amended to read as follows:

To prevent pyramiding
and multiple taxation of a single transaction, the solid waste collection taxes
imposed in this chapter shall not apply to any solid waste collection business
using the services of another solid waste collection business for the transfer,
storage, processing, or disposal of the waste collected during the transaction.

To be eligible for this
exemption, a ((person first must be certified by the department of revenue
as a)) solid waste collection business using the services of another
solid waste collection business must provide the business with an exemption
certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The solid waste
collection business providing the services shall retain a copy of the exemption
certificate for its files.

Sec. 27. RCW 82.32.050 and 1997 c
157 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If upon examination
of any returns or from other information obtained by the department it appears
that a tax or penalty has been paid less than that properly due, the department
shall assess against the taxpayer such additional amount found to be due and
shall add thereto interest on the tax only. The department shall notify the
taxpayer by mail of the additional amount and the additional amount shall
become due and shall be paid within thirty days from the date of the notice, or
within such further time as the department may provide.

(a) For tax liabilities
arising before January 1, 1992, interest shall be computed at the rate of nine
percent per annum from the last day of the year in which the deficiency is
incurred until the earlier of December 31, 1998, or the date of payment. After
December 31, 1998, the rate of interest shall be variable and computed as
provided in subsection (2) of this section. The rate so computed shall be
adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest
for that calendar year.

(b) For tax liabilities
arising after December 31, 1991, the rate of interest shall be variable and
computed as provided in subsection (2) of this section from the last day of the
year in which the deficiency is incurred until the date of payment. The rate
so computed shall be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use
in computing interest for that calendar year.

(c) Interest imposed
after December 31, 1998, shall be computed from the last day of the month
following each calendar year included in a notice, and the last day of the
month following the final month included in a notice if not the end of a
calendar year, until the due date of the notice. If payment in full is not
made by the due date of the notice, additional interest shall be computed until
the date of payment. The rate of interest shall be variable and computed as
provided in subsection (2) of this section. The rate so computed shall be
adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest
for that calendar year.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, the rate of interest to be charged to the taxpayer shall be an
average of the federal short-term rate as defined in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1274(d)
plus two percentage points. The rate set for each new year shall be
computed by taking an arithmetical average to the nearest percentage point of
the federal short-term rate, compounded annually((, for the months of
January, April, July, and October of the immediately preceding calendar year as
published by the United States secretary of the treasury)). That
average shall be calculated using the rates from four months: January, April,
and June of the calendar year immediately preceding the new year, and October
of the previous preceding year.

(3) No assessment or correction
of an assessment for additional taxes, penalties, or interest due may be made
by the department more than four years after the close of the tax year, except
(a) against a taxpayer who has not registered as required by this chapter, (b)
upon a showing of fraud or of misrepresentation of a material fact by the
taxpayer, or (c) where a taxpayer has executed a written waiver of such
limitation. The execution of a written waiver shall also extend the period for
making a refund or credit as provided in RCW 82.32.060(2).

(4) For the purposes of
this section, "return" means any document a person is required by the
state of Washington to file to satisfy or establish a tax or fee obligation
that is administered or collected by the department of revenue and that has a
statutorily defined due date.

Sec. 28. RCW 82.32.060 and 1999 c
358 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If, upon receipt of
an application by a taxpayer for a refund or for an audit of the taxpayer's records,
or upon an examination of the returns or records of any taxpayer, it is
determined by the department that within the statutory period for assessment of
taxes, penalties, or interest prescribed by RCW 82.32.050 any amount of tax,
penalty, or interest has been paid in excess of that properly due, the excess
amount paid within, or attributable to, such period shall be credited to the
taxpayer's account or shall be refunded to the taxpayer, at the taxpayer's
option. Except as provided in subsection((s)) (2) ((and (3))) of
this section, no refund or credit shall be made for taxes, penalties, or
interest paid more than four years prior to the beginning of the calendar year
in which the refund application is made or examination of records is completed.

(2) The execution of a
written waiver under RCW 82.32.050 or 82.32.100 shall extend the time for
making a refund or credit of any taxes paid during, or attributable to, the
years covered by the waiver if, prior to the expiration of the waiver period,
an application for refund of such taxes is made by the taxpayer or the
department discovers a refund or credit is due.

(3) ((Notwithstanding
the foregoing limitations there shall be refunded or credited to taxpayers
engaged in the performance of United States government contracts or
subcontracts the amount of any tax paid, measured by that portion of the
amounts received from the United States, which the taxpayer is required by
contract or applicable federal statute to refund or credit to the United
States, if claim for such refund is filed by the taxpayer with the department
within one year of the date that the amount of the refund or credit due to the
United States is finally determined and filed within four years of the date on
which the tax was paid: PROVIDED, That no interest shall be allowed on such
refund.

(4))) Any such refunds shall be made by means of
vouchers approved by the department and by the issuance of state warrants drawn
upon and payable from such funds as the legislature may provide. However, taxpayers
who are required to pay taxes by electronic funds transfer under RCW 82.32.080
shall have any refunds paid by electronic funds transfer.

(((5))) (4)
Any judgment for which a recovery is granted by any court of competent
jurisdiction, not appealed from, for tax, penalties, and interest which were
paid by the taxpayer, and costs, in a suit by any taxpayer shall be paid in the
same manner, as provided in subsection (((4))) (3) of this
section, upon the filing with the department of a certified copy of the order
or judgment of the court.

(a) Interest at the
rate of three percent per annum shall be allowed by the department and by any
court on the amount of any refund, credit, or other recovery allowed to a
taxpayer for taxes, penalties, or interest paid by the taxpayer before January
1, 1992. This rate of interest shall apply for all interest allowed through
December 31, 1998. Interest allowed after December 31, 1998, shall be computed
at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2). The rate so computed shall be
adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest
for that calendar year.

(b) For refunds or
credits of amounts paid or other recovery allowed to a taxpayer after December
31, 1991, the rate of interest shall be the rate as computed for assessments
under RCW 82.32.050(2) less one percent. This rate of interest shall apply for
all interest allowed through December 31, 1998. Interest allowed after
December 31, 1998, shall be computed at the rate as computed under RCW
82.32.050(2). The rate so computed shall be adjusted on the first day of
January of each year for use in computing interest for that calendar year.

Sec. 29. RCW 82.45.032 and 2001 c
282 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Real
estate" or "real property" means any interest, estate, or
beneficial interest in land or anything affixed to land, including the
ownership interest or beneficial interest in any entity which itself owns land
or anything affixed to land. The term includes used mobile homes, used park
model trailers, used floating homes, and improvements constructed upon leased
land.

(2) "Used mobile
home" means a mobile home which has been previously sold at retail and has
been subjected to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, or which has been previously
used and has been subjected to tax under chapter 82.12 RCW, and which has
substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit at the time of sale by virtue
of its being ((fixed in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of
the mobile home and placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed pipe
connections with sewer, water, and other utilities)) permanently sited
in location and placed on a foundation of either posts or blocks with
connections with sewer, water, or other utilities for the operation of
installed fixtures and appliances.

(3) "Mobile
home" means a mobile home as defined by RCW 46.04.302, as now or hereafter
amended.

(4) "Park model
trailer" means a park model trailer as defined in RCW 46.04.622.

(5) "Used floating
home" means a floating home in respect to which tax has been paid under
chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW.

(6) "Used park model
trailer" means a park model trailer that has been previously sold at
retail and has been subjected to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, or that has been
previously used and has been subjected to tax under chapter 82.12 RCW, and that
has substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being
permanently sited in location and placed on a foundation of either posts or
blocks with connections with sewer, water, or other utilities for the operation
of installed fixtures and appliances.

(7) "Floating
home" means a building on a float used in whole or in part for human
habitation as a single-family dwelling, which is not designed for self
propulsion by mechanical means or for propulsion by means of wind, and which is
on the property tax rolls of the county in which it is located.

Sec. 30. RCW 84.04.090 and 1987 c
155 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The term
"real property" for the purposes of taxation shall be held and
construed to mean and include the land itself, whether laid out in town lots or
otherwise, and all buildings, structures or improvements or other fixtures of
whatsoever kind thereon, except improvements upon lands the fee of which is
still vested in the United States, or in the state of Washington, and all
rights and privileges thereto belonging or in any wise appertaining, except
leases of real property and leasehold interests therein for a term less than
the life of the holder; and all substances in and under the same; all standing
timber growing thereon, except standing timber owned separately from the
ownership of the land upon which the same may stand or be growing; and all
property which the law defines or the courts may interpret, declare and hold to
be real property under the letter, spirit, intent and meaning of the law for
the purposes of taxation. The term real property shall also include a mobile
home which has substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of
its being permanently ((fixed in location upon land owned or leased by the
owner of the mobile home and placed on a permanent foundation (posts or blocks)
with fixed pipe connections with sewer, water, or other utilities)) sited
in location and placed on a foundation of either posts or blocks with
connections with sewer, water, or other utilities for the operation of
installed fixtures and appliances: PROVIDED, That a mobile home located on
land leased by the owner of the mobile home shall be subject to the personal
property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.

Sec. 31. RCW 84.36.383 and 1999 c
358 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in RCW
84.36.381 through 84.36.389, except where the context clearly indicates a
different meaning:

(1) The term
"residence" means a single family dwelling unit whether such unit be
separate or part of a multiunit dwelling, including the land on which such
dwelling stands not to exceed one acre. The term shall also include a share
ownership in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership if
the person claiming exemption can establish that his or her share represents
the specific unit or portion of such structure in which he or she resides. The
term shall also include a single family dwelling situated upon lands the fee of
which is vested in the United States or any instrumentality thereof including
an Indian tribe or in the state of Washington, and notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090, such a residence shall be deemed
real property.

(2) The term "real
property" shall also include a mobile home which has substantially lost
its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being ((fixed in location
upon land owned or leased by the owner of the mobile home and placed on a
foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed pipe, connections with sewer, water, or
other utilities)) permanently sited in location and placed on a
foundation of either posts or blocks with connections with sewer, water, or
other utilities for the operation of installed fixtures and appliances. A
mobile home located on land leased by the owner of the mobile home is subject,
for tax billing, payment, and collection purposes, only to the personal
property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.

(3)
"Department" means the state department of revenue.

(4) "Combined
disposable income" means the disposable income of the person claiming the
exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her spouse, and the disposable
income of each cotenant occupying the residence for the assessment year, less
amounts paid by the person claiming the exemption or his or her spouse during
the assessment year for:

(a) Drugs supplied by
prescription of a medical practitioner authorized by the laws of this state or
another jurisdiction to issue prescriptions; and

(b) The treatment or
care of either person received in the home or in a nursing home.

(5) "Disposable
income" means adjusted gross income as defined in the federal internal
revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989, or such subsequent date as
the director may provide by rule consistent with the purpose of this section,
plus all of the following items to the extent they are not included in or have
been deducted from adjusted gross income:

(a) Capital gains,
other than gain excluded from income under section 121 of the federal internal
revenue code to the extent it is reinvested in a new principal residence;

(b) Amounts deducted
for loss;

(c) Amounts deducted
for depreciation;

(d) Pension and annuity
receipts;

(e) Military pay and
benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(f) Veterans benefits
other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(g) Federal social
security act and railroad retirement benefits;

(h) Dividend receipts;
and

(i) Interest received
on state and municipal bonds.

(6)
"Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming the
exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
32. Section 5 of this act
expires July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
33. Section 6 of this act
takes effect July 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 34. Section 18 of this act
applies retroactively to July 1, 2001.

---
END ---