BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.52.0531 and 1997
c 259 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The maximum dollar
amount which may be levied by or for any school district for maintenance and
operation support under the provisions of RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as
follows:

(1) For excess levies
for collection in calendar year 1997, the maximum dollar amount shall be
calculated pursuant to the laws and rules in effect in November 1996.

(2) For excess levies
for collection in calendar year 1998 and thereafter, the maximum dollar amount
shall be the sum of (a) plus or minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d)
of this subsection:

(a) The district's levy
base as defined in subsection (3) of this section multiplied by the district's
maximum levy percentage as defined in subsection (4) of this section;

(b) For districts in a
high/nonhigh relationship, the high school district's maximum levy amount shall
be reduced and the nonhigh school district's maximum levy amount shall be
increased by an amount equal to the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due
to the high school district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the
school year commencing the year of the levy;

(c) For districts in an
interdistrict cooperative agreement, the nonresident school district's maximum
levy amount shall be reduced and the resident school district's maximum levy
amount shall be increased by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation
included in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:

(i) The number of
full-time equivalent students served from the resident district in the prior
school year; multiplied by:

(ii) The serving district's
maximum levy percentage determined under subsection (4) of this section;
increased by:

(iii) The percent
increase per full-time equivalent student as stated in the state basic
education appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year divided by fifty-five percent;

(d) The district's
maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the maximum amount of state matching
funds for which the district is eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.

(3) For excess levies
for collection in calendar year 1998 and thereafter, a district's levy base
shall be the sum of allocations in (a) through (c) of this subsection received
by the district for the prior school year, including allocations for
compensation increases, plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the
percent increase per full time equivalent student as stated in the state basic
education appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property tax
levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations not identified
in (a) through (c) of this subsection.

(a) The district's
basic education allocation as determined pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250,
28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;

(b) State and federal
categorical allocations for the following programs:

(i) Pupil
transportation;

(ii) Special education;

(iii) Education of
highly capable students;

(iv) Compensatory
education, including but not limited to learning assistance, migrant education,
Indian education, refugee programs, and bilingual education;

(v) Food services; and

(vi) State-wide block
grant programs; and

(c) Any other federal
allocations for elementary and secondary school programs, including direct
grants, other than federal impact aid funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.

(4)(a) A
district's maximum levy percentage shall be ((twenty-two)) twenty-four
percent in ((1998)) 2002 and ((twenty-four)) twenty-eight
percent in ((1999)) 2003 and every year thereafter; ((plus,))

(b) For
qualifying districts, in addition to the percentage in (a) of this
subsection the grandfathered percentage shall be added, determined
as follows:

(((a))) (i)
For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum levy percentage
and twenty percent; and

(((b))) (ii)
For ((1998)) 2004 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as
follows:

(((i))) (A)
Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times the district's
levy base determined under subsection (3) of this section;

(((ii))) (B)
Reduce the result of (((b)(i))) (ii)(A) of this subsection by any
levy reduction funds as defined in subsection (5) of this section that are to
be allocated to the district for the current school year;

(((iii))) (C)
Divide the result of (((b)(ii))) (ii)(B) of this subsection by
the district's levy base; and

(((iv))) (D)
Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in (((b)(iii))) (ii)(C)
of this subsection.

(5) "Levy
reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from the prior school
year for programs included under subsection (3) of this section: (a) That are
not attributable to enrollment changes, compensation increases, or inflationary
adjustments; and (b) that are or were specifically identified as levy reduction
funds in the appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on
formula factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall estimate
the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school year data in
place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds shall not include
moneys received by school districts from cities or counties.

(6) For the purposes of
this section, "prior school year" means the most recent school year
completed prior to the year in which the levies are to be collected.

(7) For the purposes of
this section, "current school year" means the year immediately following
the prior school year.

(8) Funds collected
from transportation vehicle fund tax levies shall not be subject to the levy
limitations in this section.

(9) The
superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules and regulations and
inform school districts of the pertinent data necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.

--- END ---