BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.128.060 and 2001
c 193 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An application for
license shall be made to the department upon forms provided by it and shall
contain such information as the department reasonably requires.

(2) The department
shall issue a license to an adult family home if the department finds that the
applicant and the home are in compliance with this chapter and the rules
adopted under this chapter, unless (a) the applicant has prior violations of
this chapter relating to the adult family home subject to the application or
any other adult family home, or of any other law regulating residential care
facilities within the past five years that resulted in revocation or nonrenewal
of a license; or (b) the applicant has a history of significant noncompliance
with federal, state, or local laws, rules, or regulations relating to the
provision of care or services to vulnerable adults or to children.

(3) The license fee
shall be submitted with the application.

(4) The department
shall serve upon the applicant a copy of the decision granting or denying an application
for a license. An applicant shall have the right to contest denial of his or
her application for a license as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW by requesting a
hearing in writing within twenty-eight days after receipt of the notice of
denial.

(5) The department
shall not issue a license to a provider if the department finds that the
provider or any partner, officer, director, managerial employee, or owner of
five percent or more if the provider has a history of significant noncompliance
with federal or state regulations, rules, or laws in providing care or services
to vulnerable adults or to children.

(6) The department
shall license an adult family home for the maximum level of care that the adult
family home may provide. The department shall define, in rule, license levels
based upon the education, training, and caregiving experience of the licensed
provider or staff.

(7) The department
shall establish, by rule, standards used to license nonresident providers and
multiple facility operators.

(8) The department
shall establish, by rule, for multiple facility operators educational standards
substantially equivalent to recognized national certification standards for
residential care administrators.

(9) ((The license
fee shall be set at fifty dollars per year for each home. A fifty dollar
processing fee shall also be charged each home when the home is initially
licensed)) The department shall establish licensing fees by rule at an
amount consistent with the adult family home licensing expenditures and
revenues authorized in the biennial appropriations act.

(10) A
provider who receives notification of the department's initiation of a denial,
suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of an adult family home license may, in
lieu of appealing the department's action, surrender or relinquish the
license. The department shall not issue a new license to or contract with the
provider, for the purposes of providing care to vulnerable adults or children,
for a period of twenty years following the surrendering or relinquishment of
the former license. The licensing record shall indicate that the provider
relinquished or surrendered the license, without admitting the violations,
after receiving notice of the department's initiation of a denial, suspension,
nonrenewal, or revocation of a license.

--- END ---