BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.56.020 and
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Theft"
means:

(a) To wrongfully
obtain or exert unauthorized control over the property or services of another
or the value thereof, with intent to deprive him or her of such property
or services; or

(b) By color or aid of
deception to obtain control over the property or services of another or the
value thereof, with intent to deprive him or her of such property or
services; or

(c) To appropriate lost
or misdelivered property or services of another, or the value thereof, with
intent to deprive him or her of such property or services.

(2) In any prosecution
for theft, it shall be a sufficient defense that:

(a) The property
or service was appropriated openly and avowedly under a claim of title made in
good faith, even though the claim be untenable; or

(b) The property was
merchandise pallets that were received by a pallet recycler or repairer in the
ordinary course of its business.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.56.140 and 1998 c
236 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Possessing
stolen property" means knowingly to receive, retain, possess, conceal, or
dispose of stolen property knowing that it has been stolen and to withhold or
appropriate the same to the use of any person other than the true owner or
person entitled thereto.

(2) The fact that the
person who stole the property has not been convicted, apprehended, or
identified is not a defense to a charge of possessing stolen property.

(3) When a person has
in his or her possession, or under his or her control, stolen access devices
issued in the names of two or more persons, or ten or more stolen merchandise
pallets, or ten or more stolen beverage crates, or a combination of ten or more
stolen merchandise pallets and beverage crates, as defined under RCW 9A.56.010,
he or she is presumed to know that they are stolen.

(4) The presumption in
subsection (3) of this section is rebuttable by evidence raising a reasonable
inference that the possession of such stolen access devices, merchandise
pallets, or beverage crates was without knowledge that they were stolen.

(5) In
any prosecution for possessing stolen property, it is a sufficient defense that
the property was merchandise pallets that were received by a pallet recycler or
repairer in the ordinary course of its business.

---
END ---