BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.100 and 1999 c
274 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Application.
The application of a person under the age of eighteen years for a driver's
license or a motorcycle endorsement must be signed by a parent or guardian with
custody of the minor. If the person under the age of eighteen has no father,
mother, or guardian, then the application must be signed by the minor's
employer.

(2) Traffic safety
education requirement. For a person under the age of eighteen years to
obtain a driver's license he or she must meet the traffic safety education
requirements of this subsection.

(a) To meet the traffic
safety education requirement for a driver's license the applicant must satisfactorily
complete a traffic safety education course as defined in RCW 28A.220.020 for
a course offered by a school district, or as defined by the department of
licensing for a course offered by a driver training school licensed under
chapter 46.82 RCW. The course offered by a school district or an
approved private school must meet the standards established by the office
of the state superintendent of public instruction. The course offered by a
driver training school must meet the standards established by the department of
licensing through the driver instructors' advisory committee, pursuant to RCW
46.82.300. The traffic safety education course may be provided by:

(i) A recognized
secondary school; or

(ii) A ((commercial
driving enterprise)) driver training school licensed under chapter 46.82
RCW that is annually approved by the ((office of the superintendent of
public instruction)) department of licensing.

(b) To meet the traffic
safety education requirement for a motorcycle endorsement, the applicant must
successfully complete a motorcycle safety education course that meets the
standards established by the department of licensing.

(c) The department may
waive the traffic safety education requirement for a driver's license if the
applicant demonstrates to the department's satisfaction that:

(i) He or she was
unable to take or complete a traffic safety education course;

(ii) A need exists for
the applicant to operate a motor vehicle; and

(iii) He or she has the
ability to operate a motor vehicle in such a manner as not to jeopardize the
safety of persons or property.

The department may adopt
rules to implement this subsection (2)(c) in concert with the supervisor of the
traffic safety education section of the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.

(d) The department may
waive the traffic safety education requirement if the applicant was licensed to
drive a motor vehicle or motorcycle outside this state and provides proof that
he or she has had education equivalent to that required under this subsection.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.20.055 and 1999 c
274 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Driver's
instruction permit. The department may issue a driver's instruction permit
with a photograph to an applicant who has successfully passed all parts of the
examination other than the driving test, provided the information required by
RCW 46.20.091, paid a five-dollar fee, and meets the following requirements:

(a) Is at least fifteen
and one-half years of age; or

(b) Is at least fifteen
years of age and:

(i) Has submitted a
proper application; and

(ii) Is enrolled in a
traffic safety education program offered, approved, and
accredited by the superintendent of public instruction or offered by a
driving training school licensed and inspected by the department of licensing
under chapter 46.82 RCW, that includes practice driving.

(2) Nonphoto permit
fee. An applicant who meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section other than payment of the five-dollar fee may obtain a driver's
instruction permit without a photograph by paying a fee of four dollars.

(3) Waiver of
written examination for instruction permit. The department may waive the
written examination, if, at the time of application, an applicant is enrolled
in:

(a) A traffic safety
education course as defined by RCW 28A.220.020(2); or

(b) A course of
instruction offered by a licensed driver training school as defined by RCW
46.82.280(1).

The department may
require proof of registration in such a course as it deems necessary.

(4) Effect of
instruction permit. A person holding a driver's instruction permit may
drive a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, upon the public highways if:

(a) The person has
immediate possession of the permit; and

(b) An approved
instructor, or a licensed driver with at least five years of driving
experience, occupies the seat beside the driver.

(5) Term of
instruction permit. A driver's instruction permit is valid for one year
from the date of issue.

(a) The department may
issue one additional one-year permit.

(b) The
department may issue a third driver's permit if it finds after an investigation
that the permittee is diligently seeking to improve driving proficiency.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.20.070 and 1999 c
6 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Agricultural
driving permit authorized. The director may issue a juvenile agricultural
driving permit to a person under the age of eighteen years if:

(a) The application is
signed by the applicant and the applicant's father, mother, or legal guardian;

(b) The applicant has
passed the driving examination required by RCW 46.20.120;

(c) The department has
investigated the applicant's need for the permit and determined that the need
justifies issuance;

(d) The department has
determined the applicant is capable of operating a motor vehicle without
endangering himself or herself or other persons and property; and

(e) The applicant has
paid a fee of three dollars.

The permit must contain
a photograph of the person.

(2) Effect of
agricultural driving permit. (a) The permit authorizes the holder to:

(i) Drive a motor
vehicle on the public highways of this state in connection with farm work. The
holder may drive only within a restricted farming locality described on the
permit; and

(ii) Participate in the
classroom portion of a traffic safety education course authorized under RCW
28A.220.030 or the classroom portion of a traffic safety education course
offered by a driver training school licensed and inspected by the department of
licensing under chapter 46.82 RCW offered in the community where the holder
resides.

(b) The director may
transfer the permit from one farming locality to another. A transfer is not a
renewal of the permit.

(3) Term and renewal
of agricultural driving permit. An agricultural driving permit expires one
year from the date of issue.

(a) A person under the
age of eighteen who holds a permit may renew the permit by paying a three-dollar
fee.

(b) An agricultural
driving permit is invalidated when a permittee attains age eighteen. In order
to drive a motor vehicle on a highway he or she must obtain a motor vehicle
driver's license under this chapter.

(4) Suspension,
revocation, or cancellation. The director has sole discretion to suspend,
revoke, or cancel a juvenile agricultural driving permit if:

(a) The permittee has
been found to have committed an offense that requires mandatory suspension or
revocation of a driver's license; or

(b) The director is
satisfied that the permittee has violated the permit's restrictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 46.82 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Persons instructing
students under eighteen years of age are required to have a background check
through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system and through
the federal bureau of investigation. The background check shall also include a
fingerprint check using a fingerprint card.

(2) The cost of the
background check shall be paid by the instructor.

(3) The department may
waive the background check for any applicant who has had a background check
within two years before applying to become an instructor.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.82.300 and 1984 c
287 s 93 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
be assisted in the duties and responsibilities of this chapter by the driver
instructors' advisory committee, consisting of five members. Members of the
advisory committee shall be appointed by the director for two-year terms and
shall consist of a representative of the driver training schools, a
representative of the driving instructors (who shall not be from the same
school as the school member), a representative of the superintendent of public
instruction, a representative of the department of licensing, and a
representative from the Washington state traffic safety commission. Members
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. A member who is receiving a salary from the state shall not receive
compensation other than travel expenses incurred in such service.

(2) The advisory
committee shall meet at least semiannually and shall have additional meetings
as may be called by the director. The director or the director's
representative shall attend all meetings of the advisory committee and shall
serve as chairman.

(3) Duties of the
advisory committee shall be to:

(a) Advise and confer
with the director or the director's representative on matters pertaining to the
establishment of rules necessary to carry out this chapter;

(b) Review violations
of this chapter and to recommend to the director appropriate enforcement or
disciplinary action as provided in this chapter;

(c) Review and update
when necessary a curriculum consisting of a list of items of knowledge and the
processes of driving a motor vehicle specifying the minimum requirements
adjudged necessary in teaching a proper and adequate course of driver
education; ((and))

(d) Review and
update instructor certification standards to be consistent with RCW 46.82.330
and take into consideration those standards required to be met by traffic
safety education teachers under RCW 28A.220.020(3); and

(e) Prepare the
examination for a driver instructor's certificate and review examination
results at least once each calendar year for the purpose of updating and
revising examination standards.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---