BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 47.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Local transit
authority bus shelters within the right of way of the state highway system may
display and maintain commercial advertisements subject to applicable federal
regulations, if any. Pursuant to RCW 47.12.120, the department shall lease
state right of way air space to local transit authorities for this purpose,
unless there are significant safety concerns regarding the placement of certain
advertisements.

(2) Advertisements
posted on a local transit authority's bus shelter may not exceed twenty-four
square feet on each side of the panel. One back-to-back panel is allowed on
the downstream side of the shelter.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.12.120 and 1977
ex.s. c 151 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((is
authorized, subject to the provisions and requirements of zoning ordinances of
political subdivisions of government, to)) may rent or lease any
lands, improvements, or air space above or below any lands((, including
those used or to be used for both limited access and conventional highways
which)) that are held for highway purposes but are not presently
needed((,)). The rental or lease:

(1) Must be upon
such terms and conditions as the department may determine;

(2) Is subject to
the provisions and requirements of zoning ordinances of political subdivisions
of government;

(3) Includes lands
used or to be used for both limited access and conventional highways that
otherwise meet the requirements of this section; and

(4) In the case of
bus shelters provided by a local transit authority that include commercial
advertising, may charge the transit authority only for commercial space.

Sec. 3. RCW 47.36.030 and 1977
ex.s. c 151 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary of transportation shall have the power and it shall be its duty to
adopt and designate a uniform state standard for the manufacture, display,
erection, and location of all signs, signals, signboards, guideposts, and other
traffic devices erected or to be erected upon the state highways of the state
of Washington for the purpose of furnishing information to persons traveling
upon such state highways regarding traffic regulations, directions, distances, points
of danger, and conditions requiring caution, and for the purpose of imposing
restrictions upon persons operating vehicles thereon. Such signs shall conform
as nearly as practicable to the manual of specifications for the manufacture,
display, and erection of uniform traffic control devices for streets and
highways and all amendments, corrections, and additions thereto. The
department of transportation shall prepare plans and specifications of the
uniform state standard of traffic devices so adopted and designated, showing
the materials, colors, and designs thereof, and shall upon the issuance of any
such plans and specifications or revisions thereof and upon request, furnish to
the boards of county commissioners and the governing body of any incorporated
city or town, a copy thereof. Signs, signals, signboards, guideposts, and
other traffic devices erected on county roads shall conform in all respects to
the specifications of color, design, and location approved by the secretary.
Traffic devices hereafter erected within incorporated cities and towns shall
conform to such uniform state standard of traffic devices so far as is
practicable. The uniform system must allow local transit authority bus
shelters located within the right of way of the state highway system to display
and maintain commercial advertisements subject to applicable federal
regulations, if any.

---
END ---