BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.53.050 and 1996 c
191 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
licensed optometrist shall renew his or her license by complying with
administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined
according to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. However, no licensed optometrist
who is over age fifty-five and certified to use drugs for diagnostic and
therapeutic purposes is required to meet continuing competency requirements if
he or she is either: (1) A part-time or full-time employee of a nonprofit
public or private corporation; or (2) an independent optometrist who contracts
for his or her services with a state, county, regional, municipal, or federal
organization providing publicly subsidized eye care.

--- END ---