BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.12.010 and 1985 c
145 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the
inhabitants of ((any)) a county, the courthouse of which is
not listed on the Washington state register of historic places or the national
register of historic places, desire to remove the county seat of the county
from the place where it is fixed by law or otherwise, they shall present a
petition to the board of county commissioners of their county praying such
removal, and that an election be held to determine to what place such removal
must be made. The petition shall set forth the names of the towns or cities to
which the county seat is proposed to be removed and shall be filed at least six
months before the election. The county shall issue a statement analyzing the
financial impact of the proposed removal at least sixty days before the
election. The financial impact statement shall include, but not be limited to,
an analysis of the: (((1))) (a) Probable costs to the county
government involved in relocating the county seat; (((2))) (b)
probable costs to county employees as a result of relocating the county seat;
and (((3))) (c) probable impact on the city or town from which
the county seat is proposed to be removed, and on the city or town where the
county seat is proposed to be relocated.

(2) The
county seat of a county, the courthouse of which is listed on the Washington
state register of historic places or the national register of historic places,
is not subject to removal.

--- END ---