BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 72.09.010 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 19 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature to establish a comprehensive system of corrections for convicted
law violators within the state of Washington to accomplish the following
objectives.

(1) The system should
ensure the public safety. The system should be designed and managed to provide
the maximum feasible safety for the persons and property of the general public,
the staff, and the inmates.

(2) The system should
punish the offender for violating the laws of the state of Washington. This
punishment should generally be limited to the denial of liberty of the
offender.

(3) The system should
positively impact offenders by stressing personal responsibility and
accountability and by discouraging recidivism.

(4) The system should
treat all offenders fairly and equitably without regard to race, religion, sex,
national origin, residence, or social condition.

(5) The system, as much
as possible, should reflect the values of the community including:

(a) Citizens who
live and work in the community shall not be displaced from their jobs by
inmates.

(b) Avoiding
idleness. Idleness is not only wasteful but destructive to the individual and
to the community.

(((b))) (c)
Adoption of the work ethic. It is the community expectation that all
individuals should work and through their efforts benefit both themselves and
the community.

(((c))) (d)
Providing opportunities for self improvement. All individuals should have
opportunities to grow and expand their skills and abilities so as to fulfill
their role in the community.

(((d))) (e)
Linking the receipt or denial of privileges to responsible behavior and
accomplishments. The individual who works to improve himself or herself and
the community should be rewarded for these efforts. As a corollary, there
should be no rewards for no effort.

(((e))) (f)
Sharing in the obligations of the community. All citizens, the public and
inmates alike, have a personal and fiscal obligation in the corrections
system. All communities must share in the responsibility of the corrections
system.

(6) The system should
provide for prudent management of resources. The avoidance of unnecessary or
inefficient public expenditures on the part of offenders and the department is
essential. Offenders must be accountable to the department, and the department
to the public and the legislature. The human and fiscal resources of the
community are limited. The management and use of these resources can be
enhanced by wise investment, productive programs, the reduction of duplication
and waste, and the joining together of all involved parties in a common
endeavor. Since most offenders return to the community, it is wise for the
state and the communities to make an investment in effective rehabilitation
programs for offenders and the wise use of resources.

(7) The system
should provide for inmate work programs. Inmates shall be paid a wage
comparable to the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in
which the industry is located as determined by the director of correctional
industries in consultation with the commissioner of employment security. If
the director and commissioner cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage,
then the pay shall not be less than the state minimum wage.

(8) The system
should provide for restitution. Those who have damaged others, persons or
property, have a responsibility to make restitution for these damages.

(((8))) (9)
The system should be accountable to the citizens of the state. In return, the
individual citizens and local units of government must meet their
responsibilities to make the corrections system effective.

(((9))) (10)
The system should meet those national standards which the state determines to
be appropriate.

Sec. 2. RCW 72.09.100 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 19 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature to vest in the department the power to provide for a comprehensive
inmate work program and to remove statutory and other restrictions which have
limited work programs in the past. For purposes of establishing such a
comprehensive program, the legislature recommends that the department consider
adopting any or all, or any variation of, the following classes of work
programs:

(1) CLASS I: FREE
VENTURE INDUSTRIES. The employer model industries in this class shall be
operated and managed in total or in part by any profit or nonprofit
organization pursuant to an agreement between the organization and the
department. The organization shall produce goods or services for sale to both
the public and private sector.

The customer model
industries in this class shall be operated and managed by the department to
provide Washington state manufacturers or businesses with products or services
currently produced or provided by out-of-state or foreign suppliers. The
correctional industries board of directors shall review these proposed
industries before the department contracts to provide such products or
services. The review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of the
proposed products and services on the Washington state business community and
labor market.

The department of
corrections shall supply appropriate security and custody services without
charge to the participating firms.

Inmates who work in
free venture industries shall do so at their own choice. They shall be paid a
wage comparable to the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality
in which the industry is located, as determined by the director of correctional
industries in consultation with the commissioner of employment security.
If the director and commissioner cannot reasonably determine the
comparable wage, then the pay shall not be less than the ((federal)) state
minimum wage.

An inmate who is
employed in the class I program of correctional industries shall not be
eligible for unemployment compensation benefits pursuant to any of the
provisions of Title 50 RCW until released on parole or discharged.

(2) CLASS II: TAX
REDUCTION INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be state-owned and
operated enterprises designed to reduce the costs for goods and services for
tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit organizations. The industries
selected for development within this class shall, as much as possible, match
the available pool of inmate work skills and aptitudes with the work opportunities
in the free community. The industries shall be closely patterned after private
sector industries but with the objectives ((of reducing public
support costs rather than making a profit)) following the legislative
intent under RCW 72.09.010. The products and services of this industry,
including purchased products and services necessary for a complete product
line, may be sold to public agencies, to nonprofit organizations, and to
private contractors when the goods purchased will be ultimately used by a
public agency or a nonprofit organization. Clothing manufactured by an
industry in this class may be donated to nonprofit organizations that provide
clothing free of charge to low-income persons. Correctional industries
products and services shall be reviewed by the correctional industries board of
directors before offering such products and services for sale to private
contractors. The board of directors shall conduct a yearly marketing review of
the products and services offered under this subsection. Such review shall
include an analysis of the potential impact of the proposed products and
services on the Washington state business community and labor market.
To avoid waste or spoilage and consequent loss to the state, when there is no
public sector market for such goods, byproducts and surpluses of timber,
agricultural, and animal husbandry enterprises may be sold to private persons,
at private sale. Surplus byproducts and surpluses of timber, agricultural and
animal husbandry enterprises that cannot be sold to public agencies or to
private persons may be donated to nonprofit organizations. All sales of
surplus products shall be carried out in accordance with rules prescribed by
the secretary.

Security and custody
services shall be provided without charge by the department of corrections.

Inmates working in this
class of industries shall do so at their own choice and shall be paid ((for
their work on a gratuity scale which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of
a similar nature in the locality in which the industry is located and which is
approved by the director of correctional industries)) a wage comparable
to the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the
industry is located as determined by the director of correctional industries in
consultation with the commissioner of employment security. If the director and
commissioner cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage, then the pay
shall not be less than the state minimum wage.

Subject to approval of
the correctional industries board, provisions of RCW 41.06.380 prohibiting
contracting out work performed by classified employees shall not apply to
contracts with Washington state businesses entered into by the department of
corrections through class II industries.

(3) CLASS III:
INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be operated
by the department of corrections. They shall be designed and managed to
accomplish the following objectives:

(a) Whenever possible,
to provide basic work training and experience so that the inmate will be able
to qualify for better work both within correctional industries and the free
community. It is not intended that an inmate's work within this class of
industries should be his or her final and total work experience as an inmate.

(b) Whenever possible,
to provide forty hours of work or work training per week.

(c) Whenever possible,
to offset tax and other public support costs.

Supervising,
management, and custody staff shall be employees of the department.

All able and eligible
inmates who are assigned work and who are not working in other classes of
industries shall work in this class.

Except for inmates who
work in work training programs, inmates in this class shall be paid ((for
their work in accordance with an inmate gratuity scale. The scale shall be
adopted by the secretary of corrections)) a wage comparable to the wage
paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry is
located, as determined by the director of correctional industries in
consultation with the commissioner of employment security. If the director and
commissioner cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage, then the pay
shall not be less than the state minimum wage.

(4) CLASS IV:
COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be operated by the
department of corrections. They shall be designed and managed to provide
services in the inmate's resident community at a reduced cost. The services
shall be provided to public agencies, to persons who are poor or infirm, or to
nonprofit organizations.

Inmates in this program
shall reside in facilities owned by, contracted for, or licensed by the
department of corrections. A unit of local government shall provide work
supervision services without charge to the state and shall pay the inmate's
wage.

The department of
corrections shall reimburse participating units of local government for
liability and workers compensation insurance costs.

Inmates who work in
this class of industries shall do so at their own choice and shall ((receive
a gratuity which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar nature in
the locality in which the industry is located)) be paid a wage
comparable to the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in
which the industry is located, as determined by the director of correctional
industries in consultation with the commissioner of employment security. If
the director and commissioner cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage,
then the pay shall not be less than the state minimum wage.

(5) CLASS V: COMMUNITY
SERVICE PROGRAMS. Programs in this class shall be subject to supervision by
the department of corrections. The purpose of this class of industries is to
enable an inmate, placed on community supervision, to work off all or part of a
community service order as ordered by the sentencing court.

Employment shall be in
a community service program operated by the state, local units of government,
or a nonprofit agency.

To the extent that
funds are specifically made available for such purposes, the department of
corrections shall reimburse nonprofit agencies for workers compensation
insurance costs.

Sec. 3. RCW 72.09.111 and 1999 c
325 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall
deduct from the gross wages or gratuities of each inmate working in
correctional industries work programs, taxes and legal financial obligations.
The secretary shall develop a formula for the distribution of offender wages
and gratuities following the legislative intent under RCW 72.09.010.

(a) The formula shall
include the following minimum deductions from class I gross wages and from all
others earning at least minimum wage:

(i) Five percent to the
public safety and education account for the purpose of crime victims'
compensation;

(ii) Ten percent to a
department personal inmate savings account; and

(iii) Twenty percent to
the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration.

(b) The formula shall include
the following minimum deductions from class II gross gratuities:

(i) Five percent to the
public safety and education account for the purpose of crime victims'
compensation;

(ii) Ten percent to a
department personal inmate savings account; and

(iii) Fifteen percent
to the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration.

(c) The formula shall
include the following minimum deduction from class IV gross gratuities: Five
percent to the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration.

(d) The formula shall
include the following minimum deductions from class III gratuities: Five
percent for the purpose of crime victims' compensation.

Any person sentenced to
life imprisonment without possibility of release or parole under chapter 10.95
RCW or sentenced to death shall be exempt from the requirement under (a)(ii) or
(b)(ii) of this subsection.

The department personal
inmate savings account, together with any accrued interest, shall only be
available to an inmate at the time of his or her release from confinement,
unless the secretary determines that an emergency exists for the inmate, at
which time the funds can be made available to the inmate in an amount
determined by the secretary. The management of classes I, II, and IV
correctional industries may establish an incentive payment for offender workers
based on productivity criteria. This incentive shall be paid separately from
the hourly wage/gratuity rate and shall not be subject to the specified
deduction for cost of incarceration.

In the event that the
offender worker's wages or gratuity is subject to garnishment for support
enforcement, the crime victims' compensation, savings, and cost of
incarceration deductions shall be calculated on the net wages after taxes,
legal financial obligations, and garnishment.

(2) The department
shall explore other methods of recovering a portion of the cost of the inmate's
incarceration and for encouraging participation in work programs, including
development of incentive programs that offer inmates benefits and amenities
paid for only from wages earned while working in a correctional industries work
program.

(3) The department
shall develop the necessary administrative structure to recover inmates' wages
and keep records of the amount inmates pay for the costs of incarceration and
amenities. All funds deducted from inmate wages under subsection (1) of this
section for the purpose of contributions to the cost of incarceration shall be
deposited in a dedicated fund with the department and shall be used only for
the purpose of enhancing and maintaining correctional industries work programs.

(4) The expansion of
inmate employment in class I and class II correctional industries shall be
implemented according to the following schedule, and following the legislative
intent under RCW 72.09.010:

(a) Not later than June
30, 1995, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least two hundred in
the number of inmates employed in class I or class II correctional industries
work programs above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;

(b) Not later than June
30, 1996, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least four hundred
in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II correctional
industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;

(c) Not later than June
30, 1997, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least six hundred in
the number of inmates employed in class I or class II correctional industries
work programs above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;

(d) Not later than June
30, 1998, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least nine hundred
in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II correctional
industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;

(e) Not later than June
30, 1999, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least one thousand
two hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II
correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30,
1994;

(f) Not later than June
30, 2000, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least one thousand
five hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II
correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30,
1994.

(5) It
shall be in the discretion of the secretary to apportion the inmates between
class I and class II depending on available contracts and resources.

---
END ---