BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes the potential economic and environmental damage that can occur from
the introduction of invasive aquatic species. The purpose of this act is to
increase public awareness of invasive aquatic species and enhance the
department of fish and wildlife's regulatory capability to address threats
posed by these species.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.08.010 and 2001 c
253 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this title
or rules adopted under this title, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise:

(1)
"Director" means the director of fish and wildlife.

(2)
"Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.

(3)
"Commission" means the state fish and wildlife commission.

(4) "Person"
means and includes an individual; a corporation; a public or private entity or
organization; a local, state, or federal agency; all business organizations,
including corporations and partnerships; or a group of two or more individuals
acting with a common purpose whether acting in an individual, representative,
or official capacity.

(5) "Fish and
wildlife officer" means a person appointed and commissioned by the
director, with authority to enforce this title and rules adopted pursuant to
this title, and other statutes as prescribed by the legislature. Fish and
wildlife officer includes a person commissioned before June 11, 1998, as a
wildlife agent or a fisheries patrol officer.

(6) "Ex officio
fish and wildlife officer" means a commissioned officer of a municipal,
county, state, or federal agency having as its primary function the enforcement
of criminal laws in general, while the officer is in the appropriate
jurisdiction. The term "ex officio fish and wildlife officer"
includes special agents of the national marine fisheries service, state parks
commissioned officers, United States fish and wildlife special agents,
department of natural resources enforcement officers, and United States forest
service officers, while the agents and officers are within their respective jurisdictions.

(7) "To hunt"
and its derivatives means an effort to kill, injure, capture, or harass a wild
animal or wild bird.

(8) "To trap"
and its derivatives means a method of hunting using devices to capture wild
animals or wild birds.

(9) "To fish,"
"to harvest," and "to take," and their derivatives means an
effort to kill, injure, harass, or catch a fish or shellfish.

(10) "Open
season" means those times, manners of taking, and places or waters
established by rule of the commission for the lawful hunting, fishing, taking,
or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish, food fish, or shellfish
that conform to the special restrictions or physical descriptions established
by rule of the commission or that have otherwise been deemed legal to hunt,
fish, take, harvest, or possess by rule of the commission. "Open
season" includes the first and last days of the established time.

(11) "Closed
season" means all times, manners of taking, and places or waters other
than those established by rule of the commission as an open season.
"Closed season" also means all hunting, fishing, taking, or
possession of game animals, game birds, game fish, food fish, or shellfish that
do not conform to the special restrictions or physical descriptions established
by rule of the commission as an open season or that have not otherwise been
deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, harvest, or possess by rule of the commission
as an open season.

(12) "Closed
area" means a place where the hunting of some or all species of wild
animals or wild birds is prohibited.

(13) "Closed
waters" means all or part of a lake, river, stream, or other body of
water, where fishing or harvesting is prohibited.

(14) "Game
reserve" means a closed area where hunting for all wild animals and wild
birds is prohibited.

(15) "Bag
limit" means the maximum number of game animals, game birds, or game fish
which may be taken, caught, killed, or possessed by a person, as specified by
rule of the commission for a particular period of time, or as to size, sex, or
species.

(16)
"Wildlife" means all species of the animal kingdom whose members
exist in Washington in a wild state. This includes but is not limited to
mammals, birds, reptiles, amphibians, fish, and invertebrates. The term
"wildlife" does not include feral domestic mammals, old world rats
and mice of the family Muridae of the order Rodentia, or those fish, shellfish,
and marine invertebrates classified as food fish or shellfish by the director.
The term "wildlife" includes all stages of development and the bodily
parts of wildlife members.

(17) "Wild
animals" means those species of the class Mammalia whose members exist in
Washington in a wild state and the species Rana catesbeiana (bullfrog). The
term "wild animal" does not include feral domestic mammals or old
world rats and mice of the family Muridae of the order Rodentia.

(18) "Wild
birds" means those species of the class Aves whose members exist in
Washington in a wild state.

(19) "Protected
wildlife" means wildlife designated by the commission that shall not be
hunted or fished.

(20) "Endangered
species" means wildlife designated by the commission as seriously
threatened with extinction.

(21) "Game
animals" means wild animals that shall not be hunted except as authorized
by the commission.

(22) "Fur-bearing
animals" means game animals that shall not be trapped except as authorized
by the commission.

(23) "Game
birds" means wild birds that shall not be hunted except as authorized by
the commission.

(24) "Predatory
birds" means wild birds that may be hunted throughout the year as
authorized by the commission.

(25) "Deleterious
exotic wildlife" means species of the animal kingdom not native to
Washington and designated as dangerous to the environment or wildlife of the
state.

(26) "Game
farm" means property on which wildlife is held or raised for commercial
purposes, trade, or gift. The term "game farm" does not include
publicly owned facilities.

(27) "Person of
disability" means a permanently disabled person who is not ambulatory
without the assistance of a wheelchair, crutches, or similar devices.

(28) "Fish"
includes all species classified as game fish or food fish by statute or rule,
as well as all fin fish not currently classified as food fish or game fish if
such species exist in state waters. The term "fish" includes all
stages of development and the bodily parts of fish species.

(29) "Raffle"
means an activity in which tickets bearing an individual number are sold for
not more than twenty-five dollars each and in which a permit or permits are
awarded to hunt or for access to hunt big game animals or wild turkeys on the
basis of a drawing from the tickets by the person or persons conducting the raffle.

(30) "Youth"
means a person fifteen years old for fishing and under sixteen years old for
hunting.

(31) "Senior"
means a person seventy years old or older.

(32) "License
year" means the period of time for which a recreational license is valid.
The license year begins April 1st, and ends March 31st.

(33)
"Saltwater" means those marine waters seaward of river mouths.

(34)
"Freshwater" means all waters not defined as saltwater including, but
not limited to, rivers upstream of the river mouth, lakes, ponds, and
reservoirs.

(35) "State
waters" means all marine waters and fresh waters within ordinary high
water lines and within the territorial boundaries of the state.

(36) "Offshore
waters" means marine waters of the Pacific Ocean outside the territorial
boundaries of the state, including the marine waters of other states and
countries.

(37) "Concurrent
waters of the Columbia river" means those waters of the Columbia river
that coincide with the Washington-Oregon state boundary.

(38)
"Resident" means a person who has maintained a permanent place of
abode within the state for at least ninety days immediately preceding an
application for a license, has established by formal evidence an intent to
continue residing within the state, and who is not licensed to hunt or fish as
a resident in another state.

(39)
"Nonresident" means a person who has not fulfilled the qualifications
of a resident.

(40)
"Shellfish" means those species of marine and freshwater
invertebrates that have been classified and that shall not be taken except as
authorized by rule of the commission. The term "shellfish" includes
all stages of development and the bodily parts of shellfish species.

(41)
"Commercial" means related to or connected with buying, selling, or
bartering.

(42) "To
process" and its derivatives mean preparing or preserving fish, wildlife,
or shellfish.

(43) "Personal
use" means for the private use of the individual taking the fish or
shellfish and not for sale or barter.

(44) "Angling
gear" means a line attached to a rod and reel capable of being held in
hand while landing the fish or a hand-held line operated without rod or reel.

(45)
"Fishery" means the taking of one or more particular species of fish
or shellfish with particular gear in a particular geographical area.

(46)
"Limited-entry license" means a license subject to a license
limitation program established in chapter 77.70 RCW.

(47)
"Seaweed" means marine aquatic plant species that are dependent upon
the marine aquatic or tidal environment, and exist in either an attached or
free floating form, and includes but is not limited to marine aquatic plants in
the classes Chlorophyta, Phaeophyta, and Rhodophyta.

(48)
"Trafficking" means offering, attempting to engage, or engaging in
sale, barter, or purchase of fish, shellfish, wildlife, or deleterious exotic
wildlife.

(49) "Invasive
species" means a nonnative species that either:

(a) Causes or may
cause displacement of, or otherwise threatens, native species in their natural
communities;

(b) Threatens or may
threaten natural resources or their use in the state; or

(c) Causes or may
cause economic damage to commercial or recreational activities that are
dependent upon state waters.

(50)
"Prohibited aquatic animal species" means an invasive species of the
animal kingdom that has been classified as a prohibited aquatic animal species
by the commission.

(51) "Regulated
aquatic animal species" means a potentially invasive species of the animal
kingdom that has been classified as a regulated aquatic animal species by the
commission.

(52)
"Unregulated aquatic animal species" means a nonnative animal species
that has been classified as an unregulated aquatic animal species by the
commission.

(53) "Unlisted
aquatic animal species" means a nonnative animal species that has not been
classified as a prohibited aquatic animal species, a regulated aquatic animal
species, or an unregulated aquatic animal species by the commission.

(54) "Aquatic
plant species" means an emergent, submersed, partially submersed,
free-floating, or floating-leaving plant species that grows in or near a body
of water or wetland.

Sec. 3. RCW 77.12.020 and 1994 c
264 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
investigate the habits and distribution of the various species of wildlife
native to or adaptable to the habitats of the state. The commission shall
determine whether a species should be managed by the department and, if so,
classify it under this section.

(2) The commission may
classify by rule wild animals as game animals and game animals as fur-bearing
animals.

(3) The commission may
classify by rule wild birds as game birds or predatory birds. All wild birds
not otherwise classified are protected wildlife.

(4) In addition to
those species listed in RCW 77.08.020, the commission may classify by rule as
game fish other species of the class Osteichthyes that are commonly found in
fresh water except those classified as food fish by the director.

(5) The director may
recommend to the commission that a species of wildlife should not be hunted or
fished. The commission may designate species of wildlife as protected.

(6) If the director
determines that a species of wildlife is seriously threatened with extinction in
the state of Washington, the director may request its designation as an
endangered species. The commission may designate an endangered species.

(7) If the director
determines that a species of the animal kingdom, not native to Washington, is
dangerous to the environment or wildlife of the state, the director may request
its designation as deleterious exotic wildlife. The commission may designate
deleterious exotic wildlife.

(8) Upon
recommendation by the director, the commission may classify nonnative aquatic
animal species according to the following categories:

(a) Prohibited
aquatic animal species: These species are considered by the commission to have
a high risk of becoming an invasive species and may not be possessed, imported,
purchased, sold, propagated, transported, or released into state waters except
as provided in section 4 of this act;

(b) Regulated
aquatic animal species: These species are considered by the commission to have
some beneficial use along with a moderate, but manageable risk of becoming an
invasive species, and may not be released into state waters, except as provided
in section 4 of this act;

(c) Unregulated
aquatic animal species: These species are considered by the commission as
having some beneficial use along with a low risk of becoming an invasive
species, and are not subject to regulation under this title;

(d) Unlisted aquatic
animal species: These species are not designated as a prohibited aquatic
animal species, regulated aquatic animal species, or unregulated aquatic animal
species by the commission, and may not be released into state waters. Upon
request, the commission may determine the appropriate category for an unlisted
aquatic animal species and classify the species accordingly;

(e) This subsection
(8) does not apply to the transportation or release of nonnative aquatic animal
species by ballast water or ballast water discharge.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 77.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of unlawful use of a prohibited aquatic animal species if he or she possesses,
imports, purchases, sells, propagates, transports, or releases a prohibited
aquatic animal species within the state, except as provided in this section.

(2) Unless otherwise
prohibited by law, a person may:

(a) Transport
prohibited aquatic animal species to the department, or to another destination
designated by the director, in a manner designated by the director, for
purposes of identifying a species or reporting the presence of a species;

(b) Possess a
prohibited aquatic animal species if he or she is in the process of removing it
from watercraft or equipment in a manner specified by the department;

(c) Release a
prohibited aquatic animal species if the species was caught while fishing and
it is being immediately returned to the water from which it came; or

(d) Possess, transport,
or release a prohibited aquatic animal species as the commission may otherwise
prescribe.

(3) Unlawful use of a
prohibited aquatic animal species is a gross misdemeanor. A subsequent
violation of subsection (1) of this section within five years is a class C
felony.

(4) A person is guilty
of unlawful release of a regulated aquatic animal species if he or she releases
a regulated aquatic animal species into state waters, unless allowed by the
commission.

(5) Unlawful release of
a regulated aquatic animal species is a gross misdemeanor.

(6) A person is guilty
of unlawful release of an unlisted aquatic animal species if he or she releases
an unlisted aquatic animal species into state waters without requesting a
commission designation under RCW 77.12.020.

(7) Unlawful release of
an unlisted aquatic animal species is a gross misdemeanor.

(8) This section does
not apply to the transportation or release of organisms in ballast water.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission may
designate by rule state waters as infested if the director determines that
these waters contain a prohibited aquatic animal species.

(2) The commission, in
consultation with the department of ecology, may designate state waters as
infested if it is determined that these waters contain an invasive aquatic
plant species.

(3) The department
shall work with the aquatic nuisance species committee and its member agencies
to create educational materials informing the public of state waters that are infested
with invasive species, and advise them of applicable rules and practices
designed to reduce the spread of the invasive species infesting the waters.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
create a rapid response plan in cooperation with the aquatic nuisance species
committee and its member agencies that describes actions to be taken when a
prohibited aquatic animal species is found to be infesting a water body. These
actions include eradication or control programs where feasible and containment
of infestation where practical through notification, public education, and the
enforcement of regulatory programs.

(2) The commission may
adopt rules to implement the rapid response plan.

(3) The director, the
department of ecology, and the Washington state parks and recreation commission
may post signs at water bodies that are infested with aquatic animal species
that are classified as prohibited aquatic animal species under RCW 77.12.020 or
with invasive species of the plant kingdom. The signs should identify the
prohibited plant and animal species present and warn users of the water body of
the hazards and penalties for possessing and transporting these species.
Educational signs may be placed at uninfested sites.

Sec. 7. RCW 77.15.290 and 2001 c
253 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of unlawful transportation of fish or wildlife in the second degree if the
person:

(a) Knowingly imports,
moves within the state, or exports fish, shellfish, or wildlife in violation of
any rule of the commission or the director governing the transportation or
movement of fish, shellfish, or wildlife and the transportation does not
involve big game, endangered fish or wildlife, deleterious exotic wildlife, or
fish, shellfish, or wildlife having a value greater than two hundred fifty
dollars; or

(b) Possesses but fails
to affix or notch a big game transport tag as required by rule of the
commission or director.

(2) A person is guilty
of unlawful transportation of fish or wildlife in the first degree if the
person:

(a) Knowingly imports,
moves within the state, or exports fish, shellfish, or wildlife in violation of
any rule of the commission or the director governing the transportation or
movement of fish, shellfish, or wildlife and the transportation involves big
game, endangered fish or wildlife, deleterious exotic wildlife, or fish,
shellfish, or wildlife with a value of two hundred fifty dollars or more; or

(b) Knowingly
transports shellfish, shellstock, or equipment used in commercial culturing,
taking, handling, or processing shellfish without a permit required by
authority of this title.

(3)(a) Unlawful transportation
of fish or wildlife in the second degree is a misdemeanor.

(b) Unlawful
transportation of fish or wildlife in the first degree is a gross misdemeanor.

(4) A person is
guilty of unlawful transport of aquatic plants if the person transports aquatic
plants on any state or public road, including forest roads, except as provided
in this section.

(5) Unless otherwise
prohibited by law, a person may transport aquatic plants:

(a) To the
department, or to another destination designated by the director, in a manner
designated by the department, for purposes of identifying a species or
reporting the presence of a species;

(b) When legally
obtained for aquarium use, wetland or lakeshore restoration, or ornamental
purposes;

(c) When
transporting a commercial aquatic plant harvester to a suitable location for
purposes of removing aquatic plants;

(d) In a manner that
prevents their unintentional dispersal, to a suitable location for disposal,
research, or educational purposes; or

(e) As the
commission may otherwise prescribe.

(6) Unlawful
transport of aquatic plants is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 8. RCW 77.15.080 and 2001 c
306 s 1 and 2001 c 253 s 23 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Based upon
articulable facts that a person is engaged in fishing, harvesting, or hunting
activities, fish and wildlife officers have the authority to temporarily stop
the person and check for valid licenses, tags, permits, stamps, or catch record
cards, and to inspect all fish, shellfish, seaweed, and wildlife in possession
as well as the equipment being used to ensure compliance with the requirements
of this title, and may request the person to write his or her signature for
comparison with the signature on the license. Failure to comply with the
request is prima facie evidence that the person is not the person named on the
license. For licenses purchased over the internet or telephone, fish and
wildlife officers may require the person, if age eighteen or older, to exhibit
a driver's license or other photo identification.

(2) Based upon
articulable facts that a person is transporting a prohibited aquatic animal
species or any aquatic plant, fish and wildlife officers and ex officio fish
and wildlife officers have the authority to temporarily stop the person and
inspect the watercraft to ensure that the watercraft and associated equipment
are not transporting prohibited aquatic animal species or aquatic plants.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. In consultation with the
aquatic nuisance species committee, the director of the department of fish and
wildlife and the chief of the state patrol must jointly develop a plan to
inspect watercraft entering the state to prevent the introduction of invasive
aquatic species. The plan shall be provided to the legislature by December
2003.

---
END ---