BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

ARTICLE 1

GENERAL PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited
as the uniform interstate family support act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. DEFINITIONS. In this
chapter:

(1) "Child"
means an individual, whether over or under the age of majority, who is or is
alleged to be owed a duty of support by the individual's parent or who is or is
alleged to be the beneficiary of a support order directed to the parent.

(2) "Child support
order" means a support order for a child, including a child who has
attained the age of majority under the law of the issuing state.

(3) "Duty of
support" means an obligation imposed or imposable by law to provide
support for a child, spouse, or former spouse, including an unsatisfied
obligation to provide support.

(4) "Home
state" means the state in which a child lived with a parent or a person
acting as parent for at least six consecutive months immediately preceding the
time of filing of a petition or comparable pleading for support and, if a child
is less than six months old, the state in which the child lived from birth with
any of them. A period of temporary absence of any of them is counted as part
of the six-month or other period.

(5) "Income"
includes earnings or other periodic entitlements to money from any source and
any other property subject to withholding for support under the law of this
state.

(6)
"Income-withholding order" means an order or other legal process
directed to an obligor's employer or other debtor, as defined by RCW 50.04.080,
to withhold support from the income of the obligor.

(7) "Initiating
state" means a state from which a proceeding is forwarded or in which a
proceeding is filed for forwarding to a responding state under this chapter or
a law or procedure substantially similar to this chapter.

(8) "Initiating
tribunal" means the authorized tribunal in an initiating state.

(9) "Issuing
state" means the state in which a tribunal issues a support order or
renders a judgment determining parentage.

(10) "Issuing
tribunal" means the tribunal that issues a support order or renders a
judgment determining parentage.

(11) "Law"
includes decisional and statutory law and rules having the force of law.

(12)
"Obligee" means:

(a) An individual to
whom a duty of support is or is alleged to be owed or in whose favor a support
order has been issued or a judgment determining parentage has been rendered;

(b) A state or
political subdivision to which the rights under a duty of support or support
order have been assigned or which has independent claims based on financial
assistance provided to an individual obligee; or

(c) An individual
seeking a judgment determining parentage of the individual's child.

(13)
"Obligor" means an individual, or the estate of a decedent:

(a) Who owes or is
alleged to owe a duty of support;

(b) Who is alleged but
has not been adjudicated to be a parent of a child; or

(c) Who is liable under
a support order.

(14) "Person"
means: An individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership,
limited liability company, association, joint venture, government; governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; public corporation; or any other legal
or commercial entity.

(15) "Record"
means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in
an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(16)
"Register" means to record or file a support order or judgment
determining parentage in the appropriate location for the recording or filing
of foreign judgments generally or foreign support orders specifically.

(17) "Registering
tribunal" means a tribunal in which a support order is registered.

(18) "Responding
state" means a state in which a proceeding is filed or to which a
proceeding is forwarded for filing from an initiating state under this chapter
or a law or procedure substantially similar to this chapter.

(19) "Responding
tribunal" means the authorized tribunal in a responding state.

(20) "Spousal
support order" means a support order for a spouse or former spouse of the
obligor.

(21) "State"
means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the
United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to
the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes:

(a) An Indian tribe;
and

(b) A foreign country
or political subdivision that:

(i) Has been declared
to be a foreign reciprocating country or political subdivision under federal
law;

(ii) Has established a
reciprocal arrangement for child support with this state as provided in section
308 of this act; or

(iii) Has enacted a law
or established procedures for issuance and enforcement of support orders which
are substantially similar to the procedures under this chapter.

(22) "Support
enforcement agency" means a public official or agency authorized to seek:

(a) Enforcement of
support orders or laws relating to the duty of support;

(b) Establishment or
modification of child support;

(c) Determination of
parentage;

(d) Location of
obligors or their assets; or

(e) Determination of
the controlling child support order.

(23) "Support
order" means a judgment, decree, order, or directive, whether temporary,
final, or subject to modification, issued by a tribunal for the benefit of a
child, a spouse, or a former spouse, that provides for monetary support, health
care, arrearages, or reimbursement, and may include related costs and fees,
interest, income withholding, attorneys' fees, and other relief.

(24)
"Tribunal" means a court, administrative agency, or quasi-judicial
entity authorized to establish, enforce, or modify support orders or to
determine parentage.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
103. TRIBUNAL OF THIS STATE.
The superior court is the state tribunal for judicial proceedings and the
department of social and health services division of child support is the state
tribunal for administrative proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
104. REMEDIES CUMULATIVE. (1)
Remedies provided by this chapter are cumulative and do not affect the
availability of remedies under other law, including the recognition of a
support order of a foreign country or political subdivision on the basis of
comity.

(2) This chapter does
not:

(a) Provide the
exclusive method of establishing or enforcing a support order under the law of
this state; or

(b) Grant a tribunal of
this state jurisdiction to render judgment or issue an order relating to child
custody or visitation in a proceeding under this chapter.

ARTICLE 2

JURISDICTION

PART 1

EXTENDED PERSONAL JURISDICTION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. BASES FOR JURISDICTION
OVER NONRESIDENT. (1) In a proceeding to establish or enforce a support order
or to determine parentage, a tribunal of this state may exercise personal
jurisdiction over a nonresident individual or the individual's guardian or conservator
if:

(a) The individual is
personally served with a citation, summons, or notice within this state;

(b) The individual
submits to the jurisdiction of this state by consent in a record, by entering a
general appearance, or by filing a responsive document having the effect of
waiving any contest to personal jurisdiction;

(c) The individual
resided with the child in this state;

(d) The individual
resided in this state and provided prenatal expenses or support for the child;

(e) The child resides
in this state as a result of the acts or directives of the individual;

(f) The individual
engaged in sexual intercourse in this state and the child may have been
conceived by that act of intercourse;

(g) The individual
asserted parentage in the putative father registry maintained in this state by
the state registrar of vital statistics; or

(h) There is any other
basis consistent with the Constitutions of this state and the United States for
the exercise of personal jurisdiction.

(2) The bases of
personal jurisdiction set forth in subsection (1) of this section or in any
other law of this state may not be used to acquire personal jurisdiction for a
tribunal of the state to modify a child support order of another state unless
the requirements of section 611 or 615 of this act are met.

(3) Personal
jurisdiction acquired under subsection (1) of this section continues so long as
the tribunal of this state that acquired personal jurisdiction has continuing,
exclusive jurisdiction to enforce or modify its order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. PROCEDURE WHEN EXERCISING
JURISDICTION OVER NONRESIDENT. A tribunal of this state exercising personal
jurisdiction over a nonresident under section 201 of this act or recognizing a
support order of a foreign country or political subdivision on the basis of
comity, may receive evidence from another state, pursuant to section 316 of
this act, communicate with a tribunal of another state pursuant to section 317
of this act, and obtain discovery through a tribunal of another state pursuant
to section 318 of this act. In all other respects, Articles 3 through 7 do not
apply and the tribunal shall apply the procedural and substantive law of this
state.

PART
2

PROCEEDINGS INVOLVING TWO OR MORE
STATES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
203. INITIATING AND RESPONDING
TRIBUNAL OF THIS STATE. Under this chapter, a tribunal of this state may serve
as an initiating tribunal to forward proceedings to another state and as a
responding tribunal for proceedings initiated in another state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
204. SIMULTANEOUS PROCEEDINGS.
(1) A tribunal of this state may exercise jurisdiction to establish a support
order if the petition or comparable pleading is filed after a petition or
comparable pleading is filed in another state only if:

(a) The petition or
comparable pleading in this state is filed before the expiration of the time
allowed in the other state for filing a responsive pleading challenging the
exercise of jurisdiction by the other state;

(b) The contesting
party timely challenges the exercise of jurisdiction in the other state; and

(c) If relevant, this
state is the home state of the child.

(2) A tribunal of this
state may not exercise jurisdiction to establish a support order if the
petition or comparable pleading is filed before a petition or comparable
pleading is filed in another state if:

(a) The petition or
comparable pleading in the other state is filed before the expiration of the
time allowed in this state for filing a responsive pleading challenging the
exercise of jurisdiction by this state;

(b) The contesting
party timely challenges the exercise of jurisdiction in this state; and

(c) If relevant, the
other state is the home state of the child.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
205. CONTINUING, EXCLUSIVE
JURISDICTION TO MODIFY CHILD SUPPORT ORDER. (1) A tribunal of this state that
has issued a child support order consistent with the law of this state has and
shall exercise continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify its child support
order if the order is the controlling order and:

(a) At the time of the
filing of a request for modification this state is the residence of the
obligor, the individual obligee, or the child for whose benefit the support
order is issued; or

(b) Even if this state
is not the residence of the obligor, the individual obligee, or the child for
whose benefit the support order is issued, the parties consent in a record or
in open court that the tribunal of this state may continue to exercise
jurisdiction to modify its order.

(2) A tribunal of this
state that has issued a child support order consistent with the law of this
state shall not exercise continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify the order
if:

(a) All of the parties
who are individuals file consent in a record with the tribunal of this state
that a tribunal of another state that has jurisdiction over at least one of the
parties who is an individual or that is located in the state of residence of
the child may modify the order and assume continuing, exclusive jurisdiction;
or

(b) Its order is not
the controlling order.

(3) If a tribunal of
another state has issued a child support order pursuant to the uniform
interstate family support act or a law substantially similar to that act which
modifies a child support order of a tribunal of this state, tribunals of this
state shall recognize the continuing, exclusive jurisdiction of the tribunal of
the other state.

(4) A tribunal of this
state that lacks continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify a child support
order may serve as an initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another
state to modify a support order issued in that state.

(5) A temporary support
order issued ex parte or pending resolution of a jurisdictional conflict does
not create continuing, exclusive jurisdiction in the issuing tribunal.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
206. CONTINUING JURISDICTION
TO ENFORCE CHILD SUPPORT ORDER. (1) A tribunal of this state that has issued a
child support order consistent with the law of this state may serve as an
initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to enforce:

(a) The order if the
order is the controlling order and has not been modified by a tribunal of
another state that assumed jurisdiction pursuant to the uniform interstate
family support act; or

(b) A money judgment
for arrears of support and interest on the order accrued before a determination
that an order of other state is the controlling order.

(2) A tribunal of this
state having continuing jurisdiction over a support order may act as a
responding tribunal to enforce the order.

PART
3

RECONCILIATION OF TWO OR MORE
ORDERS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
207. DETERMINATION OF
CONTROLLING CHILD SUPPORT ORDER. (1) If a proceeding is brought under this
chapter and only one tribunal has issued a child support order, the order of
that tribunal controls and must be so recognized.

(2) If a proceeding is
brought under this chapter, and two or more child support orders have been
issued by tribunals of this state or another state with regard to the same
obligor and same child, a tribunal of this state having personal jurisdiction
over both the obligor and individual obligee shall apply the following rules
and by order shall determine which order controls:

(a) If only one of the
tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter, the
order of that tribunal controls and must be so recognized.

(b) If more than one of
the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter,
an order issued by a tribunal in the current home state of the child controls.
However, if an order has not been issued in the current home state of the child,
the order most recently issued controls.

(c) If none of the
tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter, the
tribunal of this state shall issue a child support order, which controls.

(3) If two or more
child support orders have been issued for the same obligor and same child, upon
request of a party who is an individual or a support enforcement agency, a
tribunal of this state having personal jurisdiction over both the obligor and
the obligee who is an individual shall determine which order controls under
subsection (2) of this section. The request may be filed with a registration
for enforcement or registration for modification pursuant to Article 6 of this
chapter, or may be filed as a separate proceeding.

(4) A request to
determine which is the controlling order must be accompanied by a copy of every
child support order in effect and the applicable record of payments. The
requesting party shall give notice of the request to each party whose rights
may be affected by the determination.

(5) The tribunal that
issued the controlling order under subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section
has continuing jurisdiction to the extent provided in section 205 or 206 of
this act.

(6) A tribunal of this
state that determines by order which is the controlling order under subsection
(2)(a) or (b) or (3) of this section or that issues a new controlling order
under subsection (2)(c) of this section shall state in that order:

(a) The basis upon
which the tribunal made its determination;

(b) The amount of
prospective support, if any; and

(c) The total amount of
consolidated arrears and accrued interest, if any, under all of the orders
after all payments made are credited as provided by section 209 of this act.

(7) Within thirty days
after issuance of an order determining which is the controlling order, the
party obtaining the order shall file a certified copy of it in each tribunal
that issued or registered an earlier order of child support. A party or
support enforcement agency obtaining the order that fails to file a certified
copy is subject to appropriate sanctions by a tribunal in which the issue of
failure to file arises. The failure to file does not affect the validity or
enforceability of the controlling order.

(8) An order that has
been determined to be the controlling order, or a judgment for consolidated
arrears of support and interest, if any, made pursuant to this section must be
recognized in proceedings under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
208. CHILD SUPPORT ORDERS FOR
TWO OR MORE OBLIGEES. In responding to registrations or petitions for
enforcement of two or more child support orders in effect at the same time with
regard to the same obligor and different individual obligees, at least one of
which was issued by a tribunal of another state, a tribunal of this state shall
enforce those orders in the same manner as if the orders had been issued by a
tribunal of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
209. CREDIT FOR PAYMENTS. A
tribunal of this state shall credit amounts collected for a particular period
pursuant to any child support order against the amounts owed for the same
period under any other child support order for support of the same child issued
by a tribunal of this or another state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
210. CONTINUING, EXCLUSIVE
JURISDICTION OVER NONRESIDENT PARTY. If a party to a proceeding subject to the
continuing, exclusive jurisdiction of a tribunal of this state no longer
resides in the issuing state, in subsequent proceedings the tribunal may receive
evidence from another state pursuant to section 316 of this act, to communicate
with a tribunal of another state pursuant to section 317 of this act, and
obtain discovery through a tribunal of another state pursuant to section 318 of
this act. In all other respects, Articles 3 through 7 of this chapter do not
apply and the tribunal shall apply the procedural and substantive law of this
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
211. CONTINUING, EXCLUSIVE
JURISDICTION TO MODIFY SPOUSAL SUPPORT ORDER. (1) A tribunal of this state
issuing a spousal support order consistent with the law of this state has
continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify the spousal support order
throughout the existence of the support obligation.

(2) A tribunal of this
state may not modify a spousal support order issued by a tribunal of another
state having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over that order under the law
of that state.

(3) A tribunal of this
state that has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over a spousal support order
may serve as:

(a) An initiating
tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to enforce the spousal support
order issued in this state; or

(b) A responding
tribunal to enforce or modify its own spousal support order.

ARTICLE
3

CIVIL PROVISIONS OF GENERAL
APPLICATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. PROCEEDINGS UNDER THIS
CHAPTER. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, this article
applies to all proceedings under this chapter.

(2) An individual petitioner
or a support enforcement agency may initiate a proceeding authorized under this
chapter by filing a petition in an initiating tribunal for forwarding to a
responding tribunal or by filing a petition or a comparable pleading directly
in a tribunal of another state which has or can obtain personal jurisdiction
over the respondent.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. PROCEEDING BY MINOR
PARENT. A minor parent, or a guardian or other legal representative of a minor
parent, may maintain a proceeding on behalf of or for the benefit of the
minor's child.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
303. APPLICATION OF LAW OF
THIS STATE. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, a responding
tribunal of this state shall:

(1) Apply the
procedural and substantive law generally applicable to similar proceedings
originating in this state and may exercise all powers and provide all remedies
available in those proceedings; and

(2) Determine the duty
of support and the amount payable in accordance with the law and support
guidelines of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
304. DUTIES OF INITIATING
TRIBUNAL. (1) Upon the filing of a petition authorized by this chapter, an
initiating tribunal of this state shall forward the petition and its
accompanying documents:

(a) To the responding
tribunal or appropriate support enforcement agency in the responding state; or

(b) If the identity of
the responding tribunal is unknown, to the state information agency of the
responding state with a request that they be forwarded to the appropriate
tribunal and that receipt be acknowledged.

(2) If requested by the
responding tribunal, a tribunal of this state shall issue a certificate or
other document and make findings required by the law of the responding state.
If the responding state is a foreign country or political subdivision, upon
request the tribunal shall specify the amount of support sought, convert that
amount into the equivalent amount in the foreign currency under applicable
official exchange rates as publicly reported, and provide any other documents
necessary to satisfy the requirements of the responding state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
305. DUTIES AND POWERS OF
RESPONDING TRIBUNAL. (1) When a responding tribunal of this state receives a
petition or comparable pleading from an initiating tribunal or directly
pursuant to section 301(2) of this act, it shall cause the petition or pleading
to be filed and notify the petitioner where and when it was filed.

(2) A responding
tribunal of this state, to the extent not prohibited by other law, may do one
or more of the following:

(a) Issue or enforce a
support order, modify a child support order, determine the controlling child
support order, or determine parentage;

(b) Order an obligor to
comply with a support order, specifying the amount and the manner of
compliance;

(c) Order income
withholding;

(d) Determine the
amount of any arrearages, and specify a method of payment;

(e) Enforce orders by
civil or criminal contempt, or both;

(f) Set aside property
for satisfaction of the support order;

(g) Place liens and
order execution on the obligor's property;

(h) Order an obligor to
keep the tribunal informed of the obligor's current residential address,
telephone number, employer, address of employment, and telephone number at the
place of employment;

(i) Issue a bench
warrant or writ of arrest for an obligor who has failed after proper notice to
appear at a hearing ordered by the tribunal and enter the bench warrant or writ
of arrest in any local and state computer systems for criminal warrants;

(j) Order the obligor
to seek appropriate employment by specified methods;

(k) Award reasonable
attorneys' fees and other fees and costs; and

(l) Grant any other
available remedy.

(3) A responding
tribunal of this state shall include in a support order issued under this
chapter, or in the documents accompanying the order, the calculations on which
the support order is based.

(4) A responding
tribunal of this state may not condition the payment of a support order issued
under this chapter upon compliance by a party with provisions for visitation.

(5) If a responding
tribunal of this state issues an order under this chapter, the tribunal shall
send a copy of the order to the petitioner and the respondent and to the
initiating tribunal, if any.

(6) If requested to
enforce a support order, arrears, or judgment or modify a support order stated
in a foreign currency, a responding tribunal of this state shall convert the
amount stated in the foreign currency to the equivalent amount in dollars under
applicable official exchange rates as publicly reported.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
306. INAPPROPRIATE TRIBUNAL.
If a petition or comparable pleading is received by an inappropriate tribunal
of this state, the tribunal shall forward the pleading and accompanying
documents to an appropriate tribunal in this state or another state and notify
the petitioner where and when the pleading was sent.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
307. DUTIES OF SUPPORT
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY. (1) A support enforcement agency of this state, upon
request, shall provide services to a petitioner in a proceeding under this
chapter.

(2) A support
enforcement agency of this state that is providing services to the petitioner
shall:

(a) Take all steps
necessary to enable an appropriate tribunal in this state or another state to
obtain jurisdiction over the respondent;

(b) Request an
appropriate tribunal to set a date, time, and place for a hearing;

(c) Make a reasonable
effort to obtain all relevant information, including information as to income
and property of the parties;

(d) Within two days,
exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after receipt of a written
notice in a record from an initiating, responding, or registering tribunal,
send a copy of the notice to the petitioner;

(e) Within two days,
exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after receipt of a written
communication in a record from the respondent or the respondent's attorney,
send a copy of the communication to the petitioner; and

(f) Notify the
petitioner if jurisdiction over the respondent cannot be obtained.

(3) A support
enforcement agency of this state that requests registration of a child support
order in this state for enforcement or for modification shall make reasonable
efforts:

(a) To ensure that the
order to be registered is the controlling order; or

(b) If two or more
child support orders exist and the identity of the controlling order has not
been determined, to ensure that a request for such a determination is made in a
tribunal having jurisdiction to do so.

(4) A support
enforcement agency of this state that requests registration and enforcement of
a support order, arrears, or judgment stated in a foreign currency shall
convert the amounts stated in the foreign currency into the equivalent amounts
in dollars under applicable official exchange rates as publicly reported.

(5) A support
enforcement agency of this state shall issue or request a tribunal of this
state to issue a child support order and an income-withholding order that
redirect payment of current support, arrears, and interest if requested to do
so by a support enforcement agency of another state pursuant to section 319 of
this chapter.

(6) This chapter does
not create or negate a relationship of attorney and client or other fiduciary
relationship between a support enforcement agency or the attorney for the
agency and the individual being assisted by the agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
308. DUTY OF STATE OFFICIAL OR
AGENCY. (1) If the appropriate state official or agency determines that the
support enforcement agency is neglecting or refusing to provide services to an
individual, the state official or agency may order the agency to perform its
duties under this chapter or may provide those services directly to the
individual.

(2) The appropriate
state official or agency may determine that a foreign country or political
subdivision has established a reciprocal arrangement for child support with
this state and take appropriate action for notification of the determination.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
309. PRIVATE COUNSEL. An
individual may employ private counsel to represent the individual in
proceedings authorized by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
310. DUTIES OF STATE
INFORMATION AGENCY. (1) The Washington state support registry under chapter
26.23 RCW is the state information agency under this chapter.

(2) The state
information agency shall:

(a) Compile and
maintain a current list, including addresses, of the tribunals in this state
that have jurisdiction under this chapter and any support enforcement agencies
in this state and transmit a copy to the state information agency of every
other state;

(b) Maintain a register
of names and addresses of tribunals and support enforcement agencies received
from other states;

(c) Forward to the
appropriate tribunal in the county in this state in which the obligee who is an
individual or the obligor resides, or in which the obligor's property is
believed to be located, all documents concerning a proceeding under this
chapter received from an initiating tribunal or the state information agency of
the initiating state; and

(d) Obtain information
concerning the location of the obligor and the obligor's property within this
state not exempt from execution, by such means as postal verification and
federal or state locator services, examination of telephone directories,
requests for the obligor's address from employers, and examination of
governmental records, including, to the extent not prohibited by other law,
those relating to real property, vital statistics, law enforcement, taxation,
motor vehicles, driver's licenses, and social security.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
311. PLEADINGS AND
ACCOMPANYING DOCUMENTS. (1) In a proceeding under this chapter, a petitioner
seeking to establish a support order, to determine parentage, or to register
and modify a support order of another state must file a petition. Unless
otherwise ordered under section 312 of this act, the petition or accompanying
documents must provide, so far as known, the name, residential address, and
social security numbers of the obligor and the obligee or the parent and
alleged parent, and the name, sex, residential address, social security number,
and date of birth of each child for whose benefit support is sought or whose
parentage is to be determined. Unless filed at the time of registration, the
petition must be accompanied by a copy of any support order known to have been
issued by another tribunal. The petition may include any other information
that may assist in locating or identifying the respondent.

(2) The petition must
specify the relief sought. The petition and accompanying documents must
conform substantially with the requirements imposed by the forms mandated by
federal law for use in cases filed by a support enforcement agency.

(3) A petitioner
seeking to establish or modify a support order or to determine parentage in a
proceeding under this chapter shall file a properly completed confidential
information form or equivalent as described in RCW 26.23.050 to satisfy the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section. A completed confidential
information form shall be deemed an "accompanying document" under
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
312. NONDISCLOSURE OF
INFORMATION IN EXCEPTIONAL CIRCUMSTANCES. If a party alleges in an affidavit
or a pleading under oath that the health, safety, or liberty of a party or
child would be jeopardized by disclosure of specific identifying information,
that information must be sealed and may not be disclosed to the other party or
the public. After a hearing in which a tribunal takes into consideration the
health, safety, or liberty of the party or child, the tribunal may order
disclosure of information that the tribunal determines to be in the interest of
justice.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
313. COSTS AND FEES. (1) The
petitioner may not be required to pay a filing fee or other costs.

(2) If an obligee
prevails, a responding tribunal may assess against an obligor filing fees,
reasonable attorneys' fees, other costs, and necessary travel and other
reasonable expenses incurred by the obligee and the obligee's witnesses. The
tribunal may not assess fees, costs, or expenses against the obligee or the
support enforcement agency of either the initiating or the responding state,
except as provided by other law. Attorneys' fees may be taxed as costs, and
may be ordered paid directly to the attorney, who may enforce the order in the
attorney's own name. Payment of support owed to the obligee has priority over
fees, costs, and expenses.

(3) The tribunal shall
order the payment of costs and reasonable attorneys' fees if it determines that
a hearing was requested primarily for delay. In a proceeding under Article 6
of this chapter, a hearing is presumed to have been requested primarily for
delay if a registered support order is confirmed or enforced without change.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
314. LIMITED IMMUNITY OF
PETITIONER. (1) Participation by a petitioner in a proceeding under this
chapter before a responding tribunal, whether in person, by private attorney,
or through services provided by the support enforcement agency, does not confer
personal jurisdiction over the petitioner in another proceeding.

(2) A petitioner is not
amenable to service of civil process while physically present in this state to
participate in a proceeding under this chapter.

(3) The immunity
granted by this section does not extend to civil litigation based on acts
unrelated to a proceeding under this chapter committed by a party while
physically present in this state to participate in the proceeding.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
315. NONPARENTAGE AS DEFENSE.
A party whose parentage of a child has been previously determined by or
pursuant to law may not plead nonparentage as a defense to a proceeding under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
316. SPECIAL RULES OF EVIDENCE
AND PROCEDURES. (1) The physical presence of a nonresident party who is an
individual in a tribunal of this state is not required for the establishment,
enforcement, or modification of a support order or the rendition of a judgment
determining parentage.

(2) An affidavit, a
document substantially complying with federally mandated forms, or a document
incorporated by reference in any of them, that would not be excluded under the
hearsay rule if given in person, is admissible in evidence if given under
penalty of perjury by a party or witness residing in another state.

(3) A copy of the
record of child support payments certified as a true copy of the original by
the custodian of the record may be forwarded to a responding tribunal. The
copy is evidence of facts asserted in it, and is admissible to show whether
payments were made.

(4) Copies of bills for
testing for parentage, and for prenatal and postnatal health care of the mother
and child, furnished to the adverse party at least ten days before trial, are
admissible in evidence to prove the amount of the charges billed and that the
charges were reasonable, necessary, and customary.

(5) Documentary
evidence transmitted from another state to a tribunal of this state by
telephone, telecopier, or other means that do not provide an original record
may not be excluded from evidence on an objection based on the means of
transmission.

(6) In a proceeding
under this chapter, a tribunal of this state shall permit a party or witness
residing in another state to be deposed or to testify under penalty of perjury
by telephone, audiovisual means, or other electronic means at a designated
tribunal or other location in that state. A tribunal of this state shall
cooperate with tribunals of other states in designating an appropriate location
for the deposition or testimony.

(7) If a party called
to testify at a civil hearing refuses to answer on the ground that the
testimony may be self-incriminating, the trier of fact may draw an adverse
inference from the refusal.

(8) A privilege against
disclosure of communications between spouses does not apply in a proceeding
under this chapter.

(9) The defense of
immunity based on the relationship of husband and wife or parent and child does
not apply in a proceeding under this chapter.

(10) A voluntary
acknowledgment of paternity, certified as a true copy, is admissible to
establish parentage of the child.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
317. COMMUNICATIONS BETWEEN
TRIBUNALS. A tribunal of this state may communicate with a tribunal of another
state or foreign country or political subdivision in a record, or by telephone
or other means, to obtain information concerning the laws, the legal effect of
a judgment, decree, or order of that tribunal, and the status of a proceeding
in the other state or foreign country or political subdivision. A tribunal of
this state may furnish similar information by similar means to a tribunal of
another state or foreign country or political subdivision.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
318. ASSISTANCE WITH
DISCOVERY. A tribunal of this state may:

(1) Request a tribunal
of another state to assist in obtaining discovery; and

(2) Upon request, compel
a person over whom it has jurisdiction to respond to a discovery order issued
by a tribunal of another state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
319. RECEIPT AND DISBURSEMENT
OF PAYMENTS. (1) A support enforcement agency or tribunal of this state shall
disburse promptly any amounts received pursuant to a support order, as directed
by the order. The agency or tribunal shall furnish to a requesting party or
tribunal of another state a certified statement by the custodian of the record
of the amounts and dates of all payments received.

(2) If the obligor, the
obligee who is an individual, or the child does not reside in this state, upon
request from the support enforcement agency of this state or another state, the
support enforcement agency of this state or a tribunal of this state shall:

(a) Direct that the
support payment be made to the support enforcement agency in the state in which
the obligee is receiving services; and

(b) Issue and send to
the obligor's employer a conforming income‑withholding order or an
administrative notice of change of payee, reflecting the redirected payments.

(3) The support
enforcement agency of this state receiving redirected payments from another
state pursuant to a law similar to subsection (2) of this section shall furnish
to a requesting party or tribunal of the other state a certified statement by
the custodian of the record of the amount and dates of all payments received.

ARTICLE
4

ESTABLISHMENT OF SUPPORT ORDER

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. PETITION TO ESTABLISH
SUPPORT ORDER. (1) If a support order entitled to recognition under this
chapter has not been issued, a responding tribunal of this state may issue a
support order if:

(a) The individual
seeking the order resides in another state; or

(b) The support
enforcement agency seeking the order is located in another state.

(2) The tribunal may
issue a temporary child support order if the tribunal determines that such an
order is appropriate and the individual ordered to pay is:

(a) A presumed father
of the child;

(b) Petitioning to have
his paternity adjudicated;

(c) Identified as the
father of the child through genetic testing;

(d) An alleged father
who has declined to submit to genetic testing;

(e) Shown by clear and
convincing evidence to be the father of the child;

(f) An acknowledged
father as provided by applicable state law;

(g) The mother of the
child; or

(h) An individual who
has been ordered to pay child support in a previous proceeding and the order
has not been reversed or vacated.

(3) Upon finding, after
notice and opportunity to be heard, that an obligor owes a duty of support, the
tribunal shall issue a support order directed to the obligor and may issue
other orders pursuant to section 305 of this act.

ARTICLE
5

ENFORCEMENT
OF ORDER OF

ANOTHER STATE WITHOUT
REGISTRATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
501. EMPLOYER'S RECEIPT OF
INCOME-WITHHOLDING ORDER OF ANOTHER STATE. An income-withholding order issued
in another state may be sent by or on behalf of the obligee, or by the support
enforcement agency, to the person defined as the obligor's employer under RCW
50.04.080 without first filing a petition or comparable pleading or registering
the order with a tribunal of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
502. EMPLOYER'S COMPLIANCE
WITH INCOME-WITHHOLDING ORDER OF ANOTHER STATE. (1) Upon receipt of an
income-withholding order, the obligor's employer shall immediately provide a
copy of the order to the obligor.

(2) The employer shall
treat an income-withholding order issued in another state that appears regular
on its face as if it had been issued by a tribunal of this state.

(3) Except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section and section 503 of this act, the employer
shall withhold and distribute the funds as directed in the withholding order by
complying with terms of the order which specify:

(a) The duration and
amount of periodic payments of current child support, stated as a sum certain;

(b) The person
designated to receive payments and the address to which the payments are to be
forwarded;

(c) Medical support,
whether in the form of periodic cash payment, stated as a sum certain, or
ordering the obligor to provide health insurance coverage for the child under a
policy available through the obligor's employment;

(d) The amount of
periodic payments of fees and costs for a support enforcement agency, the
issuing tribunal, and the obligee's attorney, stated as sums certain; and

(e) The amount of
periodic payments of arrearages and interest on arrearages, stated as sums
certain.

(4) An employer shall
comply with the law of the state of the obligor's principal place of employment
for withholding from income with respect to:

(a) The employer's fee
for processing an income-withholding order;

(b) The maximum amount
permitted to be withheld from the obligor's income; and

(c) The times within
which the employer must implement the withholding order and forward the child
support payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
503. EMPLOYER'S COMPLIANCE
WITH TWO OR MORE INCOME-WITHHOLDING ORDERS. If an obligor's employer receives
two or more income-withholding orders with respect to the earnings of the same
obligor, the employer satisfies the terms of the orders if the employer
complies with the law of the state of the obligor's principal place of
employment to establish the priorities for withholding and allocating income
withheld for two or more child support obligees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
504. IMMUNITY FROM CIVIL
LIABILITY. An employer who complies with an income-withholding order issued in
another state in accordance with this article is not subject to civil liability
to an individual or agency with regard to the employer's withholding of child
support from the obligor's income.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
505. PENALTIES FOR
NONCOMPLIANCE. An employer who willfully fails to comply with an
income-withholding order issued by another state and received for enforcement
is subject to the same penalties that may be imposed for noncompliance with an
order issued by a tribunal of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
506. CONTEST BY OBLIGOR. (1)
An obligor may contest the validity or enforcement of an income-withholding
order issued in another state and received directly by an employer in this
state by registering the order in a tribunal of this state and filing a contest
to that order as provided in Article 6 of this chapter, or otherwise contesting
the order in the same manner as if the order had been issued by a tribunal of
this state. Section 604 of this act applies to the contest.

(2) The obligor shall
give notice of the contest to:

(a) A support
enforcement agency providing services to the obligee;

(b) Each employer that
has directly received an income-withholding order relating to the obligor; and

(c) The person
designated to receive payments in the income-withholding order or, if no person
or agency is designated, to the obligee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
507. ADMINISTRATIVE
ENFORCEMENT OF ORDERS. (1) A party or support enforcement agency seeking to
enforce a support order or an income-withholding order, or both, issued by a
tribunal of another state may send the documents required for registering the
order to a support enforcement agency of this state.

(2) Upon receipt of the
documents, the support enforcement agency, without initially seeking to
register the order, shall consider and, if appropriate, use any administrative
procedure authorized by the law of this state to enforce a support order or an
income-withholding order, or both. If the obligor does not contest
administrative enforcement, the order need not be registered. If the obligor
contests the validity or administrative enforcement of the order, the support
enforcement agency shall register the order pursuant to this chapter.

ARTICLE
6

REGISTRATION,
ENFORCEMENT, AND

MODIFICATION
OF SUPPORT ORDER

PART
1

REGISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENT OF
SUPPORT ORDER

NEW SECTION. Sec.
601. REGISTRATION OF ORDER FOR
ENFORCEMENT. A support order or income-withholding order issued by a tribunal
of another state may be registered in this state for enforcement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
602. PROCEDURE TO REGISTER
ORDER FOR ENFORCEMENT. (1) A support order or income-withholding order of
another state may be registered in this state by sending the following records
and information to the appropriate tribunal in this state:

(a) A letter of transmittal
to the tribunal requesting registration and enforcement;

(b) Two copies,
including one certified copy, of the order to be registered, including any
modification of the order;

(c) A sworn statement
by the person requesting registration or a certified statement by the custodian
of the records showing the amount of any arrearage;

(d) The name of the
obligor and, if known:

(i) The obligor's
address and social security number;

(ii) The name and
address of the obligor's employer and any other source of income of the
obligor; and

(iii) A description and
the location of property of the obligor in this state not exempt from
execution; and

(e) Except as otherwise
provided in section 312 of this act, the name and address of the obligee and,
if applicable, the person to whom support payments are to be remitted.

(2) On receipt of a
request for registration, the registering tribunal shall cause the order to be
filed as a foreign judgment, together with one copy of the documents and
information, regardless of their form.

(3) A petition or
comparable pleading seeking a remedy that must be affirmatively sought under
other law of this state may be filed at the same time as the request for
registration or later. The pleading must specify the grounds for the remedy
sought.

(4) If two or more
orders are in effect, the person requesting registration shall:

(a) Furnish to the
tribunal a copy of every support order asserted to be in effect in addition to
the documents specified in this section;

(b) Specify the order
alleged to be the controlling order, if any; and

(c) Specify the amount
of consolidated arrears, if any.

(5) A request for a
determination of which is the controlling order may be filed separately or with
a request for registration and enforcement or for registration and
modification. The person requesting registration shall give notice of the
request to each party whose rights may be affected by the determination.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
603. EFFECT OF REGISTRATION
FOR ENFORCEMENT. (1) A support order or income-withholding order issued in
another state is registered when the order is filed in the registering tribunal
of this state.

(2) A registered order
issued in another state is enforceable in the same manner and is subject to the
same procedures as an order issued by a tribunal of this state.

(3) Except as otherwise
provided in this article, a tribunal of this state shall recognize and enforce,
but may not modify, a registered order if the issuing tribunal had jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
604. CHOICE OF LAW. (1)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, the law of the
issuing state governs:

(a) The nature, extent,
amount, and duration of current payments under a registered support order;

(b) The computation and
payment of arrearages and accrual of interest on the arrearages under the
registered support order; and

(c) The existence and
satisfaction of other obligations under the registered support order.

(2) In a proceeding for
arrears under a registered support order, the statute of limitation of this
state or of the issuing state, whichever is longer, applies.

(3) A responding
tribunal of this state shall apply the procedures and remedies of this state to
enforce current support and collect arrears and interest due on a support order
of another state registered in this state.

(4) After a tribunal of
this or another state determines which is the controlling order and issues an
order consolidating arrears, if any, a tribunal of this state shall
prospectively apply the law of the state issuing the registered controlling
order, including its law on interest on arrears, on current and future support,
and on consolidated arrears.

PART
2

CONTEST OF VALIDITY OR
ENFORCEMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec.
605. NOTICE OF REGISTRATION OF
ORDER. (1) When a support order or income-withholding order issued in another
state is registered, the registering tribunal shall notify the nonregistering
party. The notice must be accompanied by a copy of the registered order and
the documents and relevant information accompanying the order.

(2) A notice must
inform the nonregistering party:

(a) That a registered
order is enforceable as of the date of registration in the same manner as an
order issued by a tribunal of this state;

(b) That a hearing to
contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order must be requested
within twenty days after notice;

(c) That failure to
contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order in a timely manner
will result in confirmation of the order and enforcement of the order and the
alleged arrearages; and

(d) Of the amount of
any alleged arrearages.

(3) If the registering
party asserts that two or more orders are in effect, a notice must also:

(a) Identify the two or
more orders and the order alleged by the registering person to be the
controlling order and the consolidated arrears, if any;

(b) Notify the
nonregistering party of the right to a determination of which is the
controlling order;

(c) State that the
procedures provided in subsection (2) of this section apply to the
determination of which is the controlling order; and

(d) State that failure
to contest the validity or enforcement of the order alleged to be the
controlling order in a timely manner may result in confirmation that the order
is the controlling order.

(4) Upon registration
of an income-withholding order for enforcement, the registering tribunal shall
notify the obligor's employer pursuant to the income-withholding law of this
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
606. PROCEDURE TO CONTEST
VALIDITY OR ENFORCEMENT OF REGISTERED ORDER. (1) A nonregistering party
seeking to contest the validity or enforcement of a registered order in this
state shall request a hearing within twenty days after notice of the
registration. The nonregistering party may seek to vacate the registration, to
assert any defense to an allegation of noncompliance with the registered order,
or to contest the remedies being sought or the amount of any alleged arrearages
pursuant to section 607 of this act.

(2) If the
nonregistering party fails to contest the validity or enforcement of the
registered order in a timely manner, the order is confirmed by operation of
law.

(3) If a nonregistering
party requests a hearing to contest the validity or enforcement of the
registered order, the registering tribunal shall schedule the matter for
hearing and give notice to the parties of the date, time, and place of the
hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
607. CONTEST OF REGISTRATION
OR ENFORCEMENT. (1) A party contesting the validity or enforcement of a
registered order or seeking to vacate the registration has the burden of
proving one or more of the following defenses:

(a) The issuing
tribunal lacked personal jurisdiction over the contesting party;

(b) The order was
obtained by fraud;

(c) The order has been
vacated, suspended, or modified by a later order;

(d) The issuing
tribunal has stayed the order pending appeal;

(e) There is a defense
under the law of this state to the remedy sought;

(f) Full or partial
payment has been made;

(g) The statute of
limitation under section 604 of this act precludes enforcement of some or all
of the alleged arrearages; or

(h) The alleged
controlling order is not the controlling order.

(2) If a party presents
evidence establishing a full or partial defense under subsection (1) of this
section, a tribunal may stay enforcement of the registered order, continue the
proceeding to permit production of additional relevant evidence, and issue
other appropriate orders. An uncontested portion of the registered order may
be enforced by all remedies available under the law of this state.

(3) If the contesting
party does not establish a defense under subsection (1) of this section to the
validity or enforcement of the order, the registering tribunal shall issue an
order confirming the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
608. CONFIRMED ORDER.
Confirmation of a registered order, whether by operation of law or after notice
and hearing, precludes further contest of the order with respect to any matter
that could have been asserted at the time of registration.

PART
3

REGISTRATION
AND MODIFICATION OF

CHILD SUPPORT ORDER

NEW SECTION. Sec.
609. PROCEDURE TO REGISTER
CHILD SUPPORT ORDER OF ANOTHER STATE FOR MODIFICATION. A party or support
enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a child
support order issued in another state shall register that order in this state
in the same manner provided in Part 1 of this article if the order has not been
registered. A petition for modification may be filed at the same time as a
request for registration, or later. The pleading must specify the grounds for
modification.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
610. EFFECT OF REGISTRATION
FOR MODIFICATION. A tribunal of this state may enforce a child support order
of another state registered for purposes of modification, in the same manner as
if the order had been issued by a tribunal of this state, but the registered
order may be modified only if the requirements of section 611 of this act have
been met.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
611. MODIFICATION OF CHILD
SUPPORT ORDER OF ANOTHER STATE. (1) If section 613 of this act does not apply,
except as otherwise provided in section 615 of this act, upon petition a
tribunal of this state may modify a child support order issued in another state
which is registered in this state if, after notice and hearing the tribunal
finds that:

(a) The following
requirements are met:

(i) The child, the
obligee who is an individual, and the obligor do not reside in the issuing
state;

(ii) A petitioner who
is a nonresident of this state seeks modification; and

(iii) The respondent is
subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal of this state; or

(b) This state is
either the state of residence of the child or of a party who is an individual
subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal of this state, and all of
the parties who are individuals have filed consents in a record in the issuing
tribunal for a tribunal of this state to modify the support order and assume
continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

(2) Modification of a
registered child support order is subject to the same requirements, procedures,
and defenses that apply to the modification of an order issued by a tribunal of
this state and the order may be enforced and satisfied in the same manner.

(3) Except as otherwise
provided in section 615 of this act, a tribunal of this state may not modify
any aspect of a child support order that may not be modified under the law of
the issuing state. If two or more tribunals have issued child support orders
for the same obligor and same child, the order that controls and must be so
recognized under section 207 of this act establishes the aspects of the support
order that are nonmodifiable.

(4) In a proceeding to
modify a child support order, the law of the state that is determined to have
issued the initial controlling order governs the duration of the obligation of
support. The obligor's fulfillment of the duty of support established by that
order precludes imposition of a further obligation of support by a tribunal of
this state.

(5) On issuance of an
order by a tribunal of this state modifying a child support order issued in
another state, the tribunal of this state becomes the tribunal having
continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
612. RECOGNITION OF ORDER
MODIFIED IN ANOTHER STATE. If a child support order issued by a tribunal of
this state is modified by a tribunal of another state that assumed jurisdiction
pursuant to the uniform interstate family support act, a tribunal of this state:

(1) May enforce its
order that was modified only as to arrears and interest accruing before the
modification;

(2) May provide other
appropriate relief for violations of its order which occurred before the
effective date of the modification; and

(3) Shall recognize the
modifying order of the other state, upon registration, for the purpose of
enforcement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
613. JURISDICTION TO MODIFY
CHILD SUPPORT ORDER OF ANOTHER STATE WHEN INDIVIDUAL PARTIES RESIDE IN THIS
STATE. (1) If all of the parties who are individuals reside in this state and
the child does not reside in the issuing state, a tribunal of this state has
jurisdiction to enforce and to modify the issuing state's child support order
in a proceeding to register that order.

(2) A tribunal of this
state exercising jurisdiction under this section shall apply the provisions of
Articles 1 and 2 of this chapter, this article, and the procedural and
substantive law of this state to the proceeding for enforcement or
modification. Articles 3, 4, 5, 7, and 8 of this chapter do not apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
614. NOTICE TO ISSUING
TRIBUNAL OF MODIFICATION. Within thirty days after issuance of a modified
child support order, the party obtaining the modification shall file a
certified copy of the order with the issuing tribunal that had continuing,
exclusive jurisdiction over the earlier order, and in each tribunal in which
the party knows the earlier order has been registered. A party who obtains the
order and fails to file a certified copy is subject to appropriate sanctions by
a tribunal in which the issue of failure to file arises. The failure to file
does not affect the validity or enforceability of the modified order of the new
tribunal having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
615. JURISDICTION TO MODIFY
CHILD SUPPORT ORDER OF FOREIGN COUNTRY OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISION. (1) If a
foreign country or political subdivision that is a state will not or may not
modify its order pursuant to its laws, a tribunal of this state may assume
jurisdiction to modify the child support order and bind all individuals subject
to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal whether or not the consent to modification
of a child support order otherwise required of the individual pursuant to
section 611 of this act has been given or whether the individual seeking
modification is a resident of this state or of the foreign country or political
subdivision.

(2) An order issued
pursuant to this section is the controlling order.

ARTICLE
7

DETERMINATION OF PARENTAGE

NEW SECTION. Sec.
701. PROCEEDING TO DETERMINE
PARENTAGE. (1) A tribunal of this state may serve as an initiating or
responding tribunal in a proceeding brought under this chapter or a law or
procedure substantially similar to this chapter to determine whether the
petitioner is a parent of a particular child or to determine whether a
respondent is a parent of that child.

(2) In a proceeding to
determine parentage, a responding tribunal of this state shall apply the
uniform parentage act and the procedural and substantive law of this state.

ARTICLE
8

INTERSTATE RENDITION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
801. GROUNDS FOR RENDITION.
(1) For purposes of this article, "governor" includes an individual
performing the functions of governor or the executive authority of a state
covered by this chapter.

(2) The governor of
this state may:

(a) Demand that the
governor of another state surrender an individual found in the other state who
is charged criminally in this state with having failed to provide for the
support of an obligee; or

(b) On the demand by
the governor of another state, surrender an individual found in this state who
is charged criminally in the other state with having failed to provide for the
support of an obligee.

(3) A provision for
extradition of individuals not inconsistent with this chapter applies to the
demand even if the individual whose surrender is demanded was not in the
demanding state when the crime was allegedly committed and has not fled from
the demanding state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
802. CONDITIONS OF RENDITION.
(1) Before making a demand that the governor of another state surrender an
individual charged criminally in this state with having failed to provide for
the support of an obligee, the governor of this state may require a prosecutor
of this state to demonstrate that at least sixty days previously the obligee
had initiated proceedings for support pursuant to this chapter or that the
proceeding would be of no avail.

(2) If, under this
chapter or a law substantially similar to this chapter, the governor of another
state makes a demand that the governor of this state surrender an individual
charged criminally in that state with having failed to provide for the support
of a child or other individual to whom a duty of support is owed, the governor
may require a prosecutor to investigate the demand and report whether a
proceeding for support has been initiated or would be effective. If it appears
that a proceeding would be effective but has not been initiated, the governor
may delay honoring the demand for a reasonable time to permit the initiation of
a proceeding.

(3) If a proceeding for
support has been initiated and the individual whose rendition is demanded
prevails, the governor may decline to honor the demand. If the petitioner
prevails and the individual whose rendition is demanded is subject to a support
order, the governor may decline to honor the demand if the individual is
complying with the support order.

ARTICLE
9

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
901. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 26.21.005 (Definitions) and 1997 c
58 s 911 & 1993 c 318 s 101;

(2) RCW 26.21.015 (Tribunal of this state)
and 1993 c 318 s 102;

(3) RCW 26.21.025 (Remedies cumulative) and
1993 c 318 s 103;

(4) RCW 26.21.075 (Bases for jurisdiction
over nonresident) and 1993 c 318 s 201;

(5) RCW 26.21.085 (Procedure when exercising
jurisdiction over nonresident) and 1993 c 318 s 202;

(6) RCW 26.21.095 (Initiating and responding
tribunal of this state) and 1993 c 318 s 203;

(7) RCW 26.21.105 (Simultaneous proceedings
in another state) and 1993 c 318 s 204;

(8) RCW 26.21.115 (Continuing, exclusive
jurisdiction) and 1997 c 58 s 912 & 1993 c 318 s 205;

(9) RCW 26.21.127 (Enforcement and
modification of support order by tribunal having continuing jurisdiction) and
1993 c 318 s 206;

(10) RCW 26.21.135 (Recognition of child
support orders--Controlling order--Filing certified copy of order) and 1997 c
58 s 913 & 1993 c 318 s 207;

(11) RCW 26.21.145 (Multiple child support
orders for two or more obligees) and 1993 c 318 s 208;

(12) RCW 26.21.155 (Credit for payments) and
1993 c 318 s 209;

(13) RCW 26.21.205 (Proceedings under this
chapter) and 1993 c 318 s 301;

(14) RCW 26.21.215 (Action by minor parent)
and 1993 c 318 s 302;

(15) RCW 26.21.225 (Application of law of
this state) and 1993 c 318 s 303;

(16) RCW 26.21.235 (Duties of initiating
tribunal) and 1997 c 58 s 914 & 1993 c 318 s 304;

(17) RCW 26.21.245 (Duties and powers of
responding tribunal) and 1997 c 58 s 915 & 1993 c 318 s 305;

(18) RCW 26.21.255 (Inappropriate tribunal)
and 1997 c 58 s 916 & 1993 c 318 s 306;

(19) RCW 26.21.265 (Duties of support
enforcement agency) and 1997 c 58 s 917 & 1993 c 318 s 307;

(20) RCW 26.21.275 (Duty of attorney general)
and 1993 c 318 s 308;

(21) RCW 26.21.285 (Private counsel) and 1993
c 318 s 309;

(22) RCW 26.21.295 (Duties of department as
state information agency) and 1993 c 318 s 310;

(23) RCW 26.21.305 (Pleadings and
accompanying documents) and 2001 c 42 s 2 & 1993 c 318 s 311;

(24) RCW 26.21.315 (Nondisclosure of
information--Circumstances) and 1993 c 318 s 312;

(25) RCW 26.21.325 (Costs--Fees) and 1993 c
318 s 313;

(26) RCW 26.21.335 (Limited immunity of
petitioner) and 1993 c 318 s 314;

(27) RCW 26.21.345 (Nonparentage as defense)
and 1993 c 318 s 315;

(28) RCW 26.21.355 (Special rules of evidence
and procedure) and 1993 c 318 s 316;

(29) RCW 26.21.365 (Communications between
tribunals) and 1993 c 318 s 317;

(30) RCW 26.21.375 (Assistance with
discovery) and 1993 c 318 s 318;

(31) RCW 26.21.385 (Receipt and disbursement
of payments) and 1993 c 318 s 319;

(32) RCW 26.21.420 (Petition to establish
support order--Notice--Hearing--Orders) and 1993 c 318 s 401;

(33) RCW 26.21.450 (Recognition of
income-withholding order of another state) and 1997 c 58 s 918 & 1993 c 318
s 501;

(34) RCW 26.21.452 (Employer's compliance
with income-withholding order of another state) and 1997 c 58 s 919;

(35) RCW 26.21.453 (Compliance with multiple
income-withholding orders) and 1997 c 58 s 920;

(36) RCW 26.21.455 (Immunity from civil
liability) and 1997 c 58 s 921;

(37) RCW 26.21.456 (Penalties for
noncompliance) and 1997 c 58 s 922;

(38) RCW 26.21.458 (Contest by obligor) and
1997 c 58 s 923;

(39) RCW 26.21.460 (Administrative
enforcement of orders) and 1993 c 318 s 502;

(40) RCW 26.21.480 (Registration of order for
enforcement) and 1993 c 318 s 601;

(41) RCW 26.21.490 (Procedure to register
order for enforcement) and 1997 c 58 s 924 & 1993 c 318 s 602;

(42) RCW 26.21.500 (Effect of registration
for enforcement) and 1993 c 318 s 603;

(43) RCW 26.21.510 (Choice of law--Statute of
limitations for arrearages) and 1993 c 318 s 604;

(44) RCW 26.21.520 (Notice of registration of
order) and 1997 c 58 s 925 & 1993 c 318 s 605;

(45) RCW 26.21.530 (Procedure to contest
validity or enforcement of registered order) and 1997 c 58 s 926 & 1993 c
318 s 606;

(46) RCW 26.21.540 (Contest of registration
or enforcement) and 1993 c 318 s 607;

(47) RCW 26.21.550 (Confirmed order) and 1993
c 318 s 608;

(48) RCW 26.21.560 (Procedure to register
child support order of another state for modification) and 1993 c 318 s 609;

(49) RCW 26.21.570 (Effect of registration
for modification--Authority to enforce registered order) and 1993 c 318 s 610;

(50) RCW 26.21.580 (Modification of child
support order of another state) and 1997 c 58 s 927 & 1993 c 318 s 611;

(51) RCW 26.21.590 (Recognition of order
modified in another state‑-Enforcement) and 1997 c 58 s 928 & 1993 c
318 s 612;

(52) RCW 26.21.595 (Jurisdiction to modify
child support order of another state if individual parties reside in this
state--Application of chapter) and 1997 c 58 s 929;

(53) RCW 26.21.600 (Notice to issuing
tribunal of modification) and 1997 c 58 s 930;

(54) RCW 26.21.620 (Proceeding to determine
parentage) and 1997 c 58 s 931 & 1993 c 318 s 701;

(55) RCW 26.21.640 (Grounds for rendition)
and 1993 c 318 s 801;

(56) RCW 26.21.650 (Surrender of individual
charged criminally with failure to support an obligee--Conditions of rendition)
and 1993 c 318 s 802;

(57) RCW 26.21.912 (Uniformity of application
and construction) and 1993 c 318 s 901;

(58) RCW 26.21.913 (Short title) and 1993 c
318 s 902;

(59) RCW 26.21.914 (Severability--1993 c 318)
and 1993 c 318 s 903;

(60) RCW 26.21.915 (Captions, part headings,
articles not law‑-1993 c 318) and 1993 c 318 s 906; and

(61) RCW 26.21.916 (Effective date--1993 c
318) and 1993 c 318 s 907.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
902. Captions, part headings,
and articles used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
903. UNIFORMITY OF APPLICATION
AND CONSTRUCTION. In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must
be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its
subject matter among states that enact it.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
904. SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 905. Sections 101 through 802
and 902 through 904 of this act are each added to chapter 26.21 RCW.

---
END ---