BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Temporary services
agencies shall:

(a) For each new job
assignment offered to an employee, give that employee complete and accurate
information concerning any health or safety hazards they may face; and

(b) Provide, or require
that the third party client provide, without charge, safety training
appropriate to the job assignment and whatever safety equipment is required at
or on the job assignment.

(2) Employees of
temporary services agencies have a right to refuse a job assignment, without
reprisal, or discrimination if:

(a) The job will expose
them to dangerous conditions or hazardous materials; or

(b) They are
inadequately trained or prepared for the job.

(3) For the purposes of
this section, "temporary services agency" means any individual or
entity that is engaged in the business of furnishing individuals to perform
services on a part-time or temporary basis for a third party.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

The
director shall prescribe rules as necessary to enforce section 1 of this act.

---
END ---