BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.80.390 and 1985
c 370 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall consist
of nine members who are representative of the public, including women and the
racial minority community. All members shall be appointed at large by the
governor and approved by the senate. ((The governor shall appoint the
chair, who shall serve at the governor's pleasure.)) Following the term
of the chair serving on the effective date of this section, the board shall
select from its membership a chair and a vice-chair who shall each serve a
one-year term.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.80.400 and 1985
c 370 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
members of the board((, except the chair,)) shall serve for terms of
four years, the terms expiring on June 30th of the fourth year of the term ((except
that in the case of initial members, two shall be appointed to two-year terms,
three shall be appointed to three-year terms, and three shall be appointed to
four-year terms)).

---
END ---