BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 53.36 RCW to read as follows:

A port
district that acts as its own treasurer as provided in RCW 53.36.010, may by
resolution adopt a policy for the payment of claims or other obligations of the
port district, which are payable out of solvent funds, electing either to pay
obligations by warrant or by check. However, no check shall be issued when the
applicable fund is not solvent at the time payment is ordered, but a warrant
shall be issued instead. When checks are to be used, the port commission shall
designate the qualified public depository where checks are to be drawn, and the
officers authorized or required to sign checks. Wherever in this title
reference is made to warrants, the term includes checks where authorized by
this section.

--- END ---