BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 67.70.010 and 1994 c
218 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter:

(1)
"Commission" means the state lottery commission established by this
chapter;

(2)
"Director" means the director of the state lottery established by
this chapter;

(3) "Lottery"
or "state lottery" means the lottery established and operated
pursuant to this chapter;

(4) "On-line
game" means a lottery game in which a player pays a fee to a lottery
retailer and selects a combination of digits, numbers, or symbols, type and
amount of play, and receives a computer-generated ticket with those selections,
and the lottery separately draws or selects the winning combination or
combinations;

(5) "Shared
game lottery" means any lottery activity in which the commission
participates under written agreement between the commission, on behalf of the
state, and any other state or states.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Pursuant to RCW
67.70.040(1)(a), the commission may enter into the multistate agreement
establishing a shared game lottery known as "The Big Game," that was
entered into by party state lotteries in August 1996 and subsequently amended.

(2) The shared game
lottery account is created as a separate account outside the state treasury.
The account is managed, maintained, and controlled by the commission and
consists of all revenues received from the sale of shared game lottery tickets
or shares, and all other moneys credited or transferred to it from any other
fund or source under law. The account is allotted according to chapter 43.88 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
recognizes that creating a shared game lottery could result in less revenue
being raised by the existing state lottery ticket sales. The legislature
further recognizes that the two funds most impacted by this potential event are
the student achievement fund and the education construction account.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to use some of the proceeds from
the shared game lottery to make up the difference that the potential state
lottery revenue loss would have on the student achievement fund and the
education construction account.

(2) The student
achievement fund and the education construction account are expected to
collectively receive one hundred two million dollars annually from state
lottery games other than the shared game lottery. For fiscal year 2003 and
thereafter, if the amount of lottery revenues earmarked for the student
achievement fund and the education construction account are less than one
hundred two million dollars, the commission must transfer sufficient moneys
from revenues derived from the shared game lottery into the student achievement
fund and the education construction account to bring the total revenue up to
one hundred two million dollars. The funds transferred from the shared game
lottery account under this subsection must be divided between the student
achievement fund and the education construction account in a manner consistent
with RCW 67.70.240(3).

(3) For fiscal year
2003, the commission shall transfer from revenues derived from the shared game
lottery to the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under RCW
69.50.520 five hundred thousand dollars exclusively for the treatment of
pathological gambling as prescribed by section 4 of this act.

(4) The remaining net
revenues, if any, in the shared game lottery account after the transfers shall
be deposited into the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A program for the
treatment of pathological gambling is established within the department of
social and health services, to be administered by a qualified person who has
training and experience in handling pathological gambling problems or the
organization and administration of treatment services for persons suffering
from pathological gambling problems. The department shall track program
participation and client outcomes.

(2) To receive
treatment under subsection (1) of this section, a person must:

(a) Need treatment for
pathological gambling, but be unable to afford treatment; and

(b) Be targeted by the
department of social and health services as to be most amenable to treatment.

(3) Treatment under
this section is limited to the funds available to the department of social and
health services.

(4) The department of
social and health services shall report to the legislature by September 1,
2002, with a plan for implementing this section.

(5) The
department of social and health services shall report to the legislature by
November 1, 2003, on program participation and client outcomes.

---
END ---