BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.46.070 and 1999 c
143 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall
have the following powers and duties:

(1) To authorize and
issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to bona fide charitable or
nonprofit organizations approved by the commission meeting the requirements of
this chapter and any rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto
permitting said organizations to conduct bingo games, raffles, amusement games,
and social card games, to utilize punch boards and pull-tabs in accordance with
the provisions of this chapter and any rules ((and regulations)) adopted
pursuant thereto and to revoke or suspend said licenses for violation of any
provisions of this chapter or any rules ((and regulations)) adopted
pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That the commission shall not deny a license to an
otherwise qualified applicant in an effort to limit the number of licenses to
be issued: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission or director shall not issue,
deny, suspend, or revoke any license because of considerations of race, sex,
creed, color, or national origin: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission
may authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to
final action by the commission;

(2) To authorize and
issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to any person, association,
or organization operating a business primarily engaged in the selling of items
of food or drink for consumption on the premises, approved by the commission
meeting the requirements of this chapter and any rules ((and regulations))
adopted pursuant thereto permitting said person, association, or organization
to utilize punch boards and pull-tabs and to conduct social card games as a
commercial stimulant in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and any
rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto and to revoke or
suspend said licenses for violation of any provisions of this chapter and any
rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That the
commission shall not deny a license to an otherwise qualified applicant in an
effort to limit the number of licenses to be issued: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
the commission may authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend
licenses subject to final action by the commission;

(3) To authorize and
issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to any person, association,
or organization approved by the commission meeting the requirements of this
chapter and meeting the requirements of any rules ((and regulations))
adopted by the commission pursuant to this chapter as now or hereafter amended,
permitting said person, association, or organization to conduct or operate
amusement games in such manner and at such locations as the commission may
determine;

(4) To authorize,
require, and issue, for a period not to exceed one year, such licenses as the
commission may by rule provide, to any person, association, or organization to
engage in the selling, distributing, or otherwise supplying or in the
manufacturing of devices for use within this state for those activities
authorized by this chapter;

(5) To establish a
schedule of annual license fees for carrying on specific gambling activities
upon the premises, and for such other activities as may be licensed by the
commission, which fees shall provide to the commission not less than an amount
of money adequate to cover all costs incurred by the commission relative to
licensing under this chapter and the enforcement by the commission of the
provisions of this chapter and rules ((and regulations)) adopted
pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That all licensing fees shall be submitted with an
application therefor and such portion of said fee as the commission may
determine, based upon its cost of processing and investigation, shall be
retained by the commission upon the withdrawal or denial of any such license
application as its reasonable expense for processing the application and
investigation into the granting thereof: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if in a
particular case the basic license fee established by the commission for a
particular class of license is less than the commission's actual expenses to
investigate that particular application, the commission may at any time charge
to that applicant such additional fees as are necessary to pay the commission
for those costs. The commission may decline to proceed with its investigation
and no license shall be issued until the commission has been fully paid
therefor by the applicant: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may
establish fees for the furnishing by it to licensees of identification stamps
to be affixed to such devices and equipment as required by the commission and
for such other special services or programs required or offered by the
commission, the amount of each of these fees to be not less than is adequate to
offset the cost to the commission of the stamps and of administering their
dispersal to licensees or the cost of administering such other special
services, requirements or programs;

(6) To prescribe the
manner and method of payment of taxes, fees and penalties to be paid to or
collected by the commission;

(7) To require that
applications for all licenses contain such information as may be required by
the commission: PROVIDED, That all persons (a) having a managerial or ownership
interest in any gambling activity, or the building in which any gambling
activity occurs, or the equipment to be used for any gambling activity, or (b)
participating as an employee in the operation of any gambling activity, shall
be listed on the application for the license and the applicant shall certify on
the application, under oath, that the persons named on the application are all
of the persons known to have an interest in any gambling activity, building, or
equipment by the person making such application: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
commission may require fingerprinting and background checks on any persons
seeking licenses under this chapter or of any person holding an interest in any
gambling activity, building, or equipment to be used therefor, or of any person
participating as an employee in the operation of any gambling activity;

(8) To require that any
license holder maintain records as directed by the commission and submit such
reports as the commission may deem necessary;

(9) To require that all
income from bingo games, raffles, and amusement games be recorded and reported
as established by rule ((or regulation)) of the commission to the extent
deemed necessary by considering the scope and character of the gambling
activity in such a manner that will disclose gross income from any gambling
activity, amounts received from each player, the nature and value of prizes,
and the fact of distributions of such prizes to the winners thereof;

(10) To regulate and
establish maximum limitations on income derived from bingo. In establishing
limitations pursuant to this subsection the commission shall take into account
(i) the nature, character, and scope of the activities of the licensee; (ii)
the source of all other income of the licensee; and (iii) the percentage or
extent to which income derived from bingo is used for charitable, as
distinguished from nonprofit, purposes. However, the commission's powers and
duties granted by this subsection are discretionary and not mandatory;

(11) To regulate and establish
the type and scope of and manner of conducting the gambling activities
authorized by this chapter, including but not limited to, the extent of wager,
money, or other thing of value which may be wagered or contributed or won by a
player in any such activities, except that the maximum single wager for
Phase II house-banked card games shall be three hundred dollars;

(12) To regulate the
collection of and the accounting for the fee which may be imposed by an
organization, corporation, or person licensed to conduct a social card game on
a person desiring to become a player in a social card game in accordance with
RCW 9.46.0282;

(13) To cooperate with
and secure the cooperation of county, city, and other local or state agencies
in investigating any matter within the scope of its duties and
responsibilities;

(14) In accordance with
RCW 9.46.080, to adopt such rules ((and regulations)) as are deemed
necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter. All rules
((and regulations)) shall be adopted pursuant to the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW;

(15) To set forth for
the perusal of counties, city-counties, cities and towns, model ordinances by
which any legislative authority thereof may enter into the taxing of any
gambling activity authorized by this chapter;

(16) To establish and
regulate a maximum limit on salaries or wages which may be paid to persons
employed in connection with activities conducted by bona fide charitable or
nonprofit organizations and authorized by this chapter, where payment of such
persons is allowed, and to regulate and establish maximum limits for other
expenses in connection with such authorized activities, including but not
limited to rent or lease payments. However, the commissioner's powers and
duties granted by this subsection are discretionary and not mandatory.

In establishing these
maximum limits the commission shall take into account the amount of income
received, or expected to be received, from the class of activities to which the
limits will apply and the amount of money the games could generate for
authorized charitable or nonprofit purposes absent such expenses. The
commission may also take into account, in its discretion, other factors,
including but not limited to, the local prevailing wage scale and whether
charitable purposes are benefited by the activities;

(17) To authorize,
require, and issue for a period not to exceed one year such licenses or
permits, for which the commission may by rule provide, to any person to work
for any operator of any gambling activity authorized by this chapter in
connection with that activity, or any manufacturer, supplier, or distributor of
devices for those activities in connection with such business. The commission
shall not require that persons working solely as volunteers in an authorized
activity conducted by a bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit
organization, who receive no compensation of any kind for any purpose from that
organization, and who have no managerial or supervisory responsibility in
connection with that activity, be licensed to do such work. The commission may
require that licensees employing such unlicensed volunteers submit to the
commission periodically a list of the names, addresses, and dates of birth of
the volunteers. If any volunteer is not approved by the commission, the
commission may require that the licensee not allow that person to work in
connection with the licensed activity;

(18) To publish and
make available at the office of the commission or elsewhere to anyone
requesting it a list of the commission licensees, including the name, address,
type of license, and license number of each licensee;

(19) To establish
guidelines for determining what constitutes active membership in bona fide
nonprofit or charitable organizations for the purposes of this chapter; and

(20) To perform all
other matters and things necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of
this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.46.110 and 1999 c
221 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of any county, city-county, city, or town, by local law and
ordinance, and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and rules
adopted under this chapter, may provide for the taxing of any gambling activity
authorized by this chapter within its jurisdiction, the tax receipts to go to
the county, city-county, city, or town so taxing the activity. Any such tax
imposed by a county alone shall not apply to any gambling activity within a
city or town located in the county but the tax rate established by a county, if
any, shall constitute the tax rate throughout the unincorporated areas of such
county.

(2) The operation of
punch boards and pull-tabs are subject to the following conditions:

(a) Chances may only be
sold to adults;

(b) The price of a
single chance may not exceed one dollar;

(c) No punch board or
pull-tab license may award as a prize upon a winning number or symbol being
drawn the opportunity of taking a chance upon any other punch board or
pull-tab;

(d) All prizes
available to be won must be described on an information flare. All merchandise
prizes must be on display within the immediate area of the premises in which
any such punch board or pull-tab is located. Upon a winning number or symbol
being drawn, a merchandise prize must be immediately removed from the display
and awarded to the winner. All references to cash or merchandise prizes, with
a value over twenty dollars, must be removed immediately from the information
flare when won, or such omission shall be deemed a fraud for the purposes of
this chapter; and

(e) When any person
wins money or merchandise from any punch board or pull-tab over an amount
determined by the commission, every licensee shall keep a public record of the
award for at least ninety days containing such information as the commission
shall deem necessary.

(3)(a) Taxation of
bingo and raffles shall never be in an amount greater than five percent of the
gross receipts from a bingo game or raffle less the amount awarded as cash or
merchandise prizes.

(b) Taxation of
amusement games shall only be in an amount sufficient to pay the actual costs
of enforcement of the provisions of this chapter by the county, city or town
law enforcement agency and in no event shall such taxation exceed two percent
of the gross receipts from the amusement game less the amount awarded as
prizes.

(c) No tax shall be
imposed under the authority of this chapter on bingo or amusement games when
such activities or any combination thereof are conducted by any bona fide
charitable or nonprofit organization as defined in this chapter, which
organization has no paid operating or management personnel and has gross
receipts from bingo or amusement games, or a combination thereof, not exceeding
five thousand dollars per year, less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise
prizes.

(d) No tax shall be
imposed on the first ten thousand dollars of gross receipts less the amount
awarded as cash or merchandise prizes from raffles conducted by any bona fide
charitable or nonprofit organization as defined in this chapter.

(e) Taxation of punch
boards and pull-tabs for bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations is
based on gross receipts from the operation of the games less the amount awarded
as cash or merchandise prizes, and shall not exceed a rate of ten percent. At
the option of the county, city-county, city, or town, the taxation of punch
boards and pull-tabs for commercial stimulant operators may be based on gross
receipts from the operation of the games, and may not exceed a rate of five
percent, or may be based on gross receipts from the operation of the games less
the amount awarded as cash or merchandise prizes, and may not exceed a rate of
ten percent.

(f) Subject to section
3 of this act, taxation of social card games may not exceed ((twenty))
fifteen percent of the gross ((revenue)) receipts from
such games.

(4) Taxes imposed under
this chapter become a lien upon personal and real property used in the gambling
activity in the same manner as provided for under RCW 84.60.010. The lien
shall attach on the date the tax becomes due and shall relate back and have
priority against real and personal property to the same extent as ad valorem
taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning January 1,
2002:

(1) Any ordinance
adopted under RCW 9.46.110 that imposes a tax on social card games at a rate
less than fifteen percent may not increase the rate of tax above fifteen
percent.

(2) Any ordinance
adopted under RCW 9.46.110 that imposes a tax on social card games at a rate of
tax above fifteen percent may remain in effect until such time as the rate of
tax is changed through the repeal or amendment of such ordinance, in which case
any new rate shall not exceed fifteen percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any
tax imposed by a county, city-county, city, or town under the authority of this
chapter, there is imposed by the state of Washington an excise tax upon every
person engaging within this state in the business of operating punch boards,
pull-tabs, or social card games.

(2)(a) The amount of
tax on punch boards and pull-tabs shall be equal to the gross receipts from the
operation of punch boards and pull-tabs without any deduction on account of
amounts awarded as cash or merchandise prizes, multiplied by the rate of ten
percent.

(b) The amount of tax
on social card games shall be equal to the gross receipts from the social card
games, multiplied by the rate of ten percent, or a lesser rate under subsection
(3) of this section.

(c) As used in this
subsection (2), "gross receipts" means the same as gross gambling
receipts in WAC 230-02-110.

(3) The combined rate
of tax imposed by the state of Washington under this section and any county,
city-county, city, or town under RCW 9.46.110 on social card games shall not
exceed a rate of twenty-five percent. If the county, city-county, city, or
town is authorized to exceed fifteen percent, the state rate shall be set so
that the combined rate does not exceed twenty-five percent.

(4) The tax imposed by
the state of Washington under this chapter shall be in addition to any tax
imposed under Title 82 RCW on the business of operating punch boards,
pull-tabs, or social card games.

(5) Chapter 82.32 RCW,
with the exception of RCW 82.32.030(2), applies to the administration of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Sections 1, 2, and 4 of this
act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect June 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) Section 3 of this act
applies retroactively to January 1, 2002.

(2)
Section 3 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---