BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. FINDINGS AND PURPOSE. The legislature finds
that it is in the public interest to adopt a voting system in which all
successful candidates would win by a majority vote rather than a plurality of
effective votes and that allows voters to rank candidates according to
preference. A system known as instant runoff voting (or IRV) best achieves
that purpose. The legislature further finds that voter interest and
participation in elections will increase under IRV because voters have more
choices and all votes will be more meaningful than under the present plurality
system. It is in the interest of participatory democracy that voters be given
the opportunity to vote their true beliefs with their first choice votes, yet
still being able to make effective alternative choices among the remaining
candidates in case their favorite candidate is not elected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Instant
runoff voting" (or IRV) means a system of voting in which voters may rank
candidates for the same office in order of preference, so that voters can rank
candidates as follows: First choice, second choice, and so on for as many of
the candidates for such office as they wish, up to the maximum choices allowed.

(2) "Choice"
means an indication on a ballot of a voter's ranking of candidates for a
particular office in order of preference.

(3) "Vote"
means a ballot choice that is counted toward election of a candidate under
rules and procedures of this chapter. All first choices are initially counted
as votes. Lower ranked choices are potential votes that may, according to the procedures
of this chapter, be credited to a candidate as votes for the election of that
candidate. Choices made for a candidate who has been eliminated are no longer
considered to be votes.

(4) "Stage"
or "stage in the counting" means a given phase in the vote counting
process where votes for all remaining candidates are counted to determine
whether a candidate has achieved a majority and, if not, which candidate or
candidates are eliminated.

(5)
"Eliminate" or "eliminated candidate" refers to a situation
where a candidate has not received sufficient votes under IRV rules and who is
accordingly dropped from the field of candidates.

(6) "Remaining
candidate" means a candidate who, at a particular stage, has not been
eliminated. "Candidates who remain" are all those who have not been
eliminated at the stage referred to.

(7) "Next
choice" means the highest ranked choice for a remaining candidate that has
not yet been credited to the candidate indicated in that choice.

(8) "Last-place
candidate" means a candidate who has received the fewest choices among the
candidates who remain at any stage. Two or more candidates simultaneously
become last-place candidates where the combined choices for all such candidates
add up to less than all choices for the candidate with the next fewest number
of votes.

(9) "Exhausted
ballot" means a ballot on which there are no choices for remaining
candidates.

(10) "Continuing
ballot" means a ballot that is not exhausted.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. INSTANT RUNOFF VOTING.
The instant runoff voting system is adopted in Washington in the manner
specified in this chapter for all general elections.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. COUNTING OF BALLOTS. (1)
General description. In general, instant runoff vote counting proceeds in the
following manner: In the first stage all first choice votes are counted. If a
candidate receives a majority of votes he or she is elected. If no candidate
receives a majority on the first or a subsequent stage then the last-place
candidate at that stage is eliminated. The next choices on ballots for an
eliminated candidate become votes for the candidates indicated in those
choices, and that process continues until all but one candidate has been eliminated.

(2) Specific rules and
procedures. The following specific rules and procedures, subject to the
conditions of section 5 of this act, govern how votes are counted for each
office that is subject to instant runoff voting:

(a) All first choices
are counted in the first stage, and if a candidate has obtained a majority of
those votes that candidate is elected and counting ends.

(b) If no candidate
receives a majority of votes at the first stage, then second stage counting
begins by eliminating the last-place candidate, and the second choices made on
ballots for the eliminated candidate become votes for the second choice
candidate indicated on each of those ballots. A candidate who has a majority
of votes at that stage is elected.

(c) If no candidate receives
a majority at a previous stage, then the last-place candidate among the
remaining candidates is eliminated, and the next choices made on ballots for an
eliminated candidate become votes for the candidate indicated by that choice.
A candidate who has a majority of votes at that stage is elected.

(d) The counting
process continues in this manner with successive last-place candidates being
eliminated. The next choices made on continuing ballots on which votes were
cast for eliminated candidates are counted for the remaining candidate or
candidates indicated by those choices until all but one candidate has been
eliminated. That candidate is then elected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. VOTING CONDITIONS AND
LIMITATIONS. (1) Exhausted ballots. (a) Once a ballot is exhausted it is
disregarded and no longer counted.

(b) A ballot indicating
duplicate choices, i.e. giving the same ranking to more than one candidate for
the same office, is exhausted when the duplicate choice is reached, and in that
case no vote is recorded for any candidate who received a duplicate choice.

(2) Skipped ranking.
If a ballot choice skips a ranking, then the next ranking below the skipped
choice is moved up and counted as though it were the rank of the skipped
choice.

(3) Tie votes. Ties
between candidates occurring at any stage are resolved according to the general
election laws of the state of Washington.

(4) Maximum effective
choices. Only the first five choices for any one office on a ballot are counted.

(5) Write-in votes.
Voters may write in one candidate for each office and assign a ranking to the
write-in candidate along with candidates whose names are already on the ballot.

(6) Insufficient choice
votes made. If all the ballots cast do not contain sufficient effective second
and lower choices for a particular office so that at the last stage of counting
no candidate has achieved a majority, then the candidate with the most votes
credited to him or her is elected.

(7) Votes for
eliminated candidates. No votes may be counted for a candidate who has been
eliminated no matter how many second and lower ranked choices might otherwise
have become votes for such candidate in a later stage.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. APPLICABILITY. (1)
Offices covered. This chapter applies to elections for the following offices:

(a) The governor and
all other statewide elected officials of the state of Washington;

(b) Members of the
Washington legislature;

(c) Judges of the
supreme court, court of appeals, the superior courts, and district courts of
this state;

(d) President and vice
president of the United States; and

(e) Members of the
United States senate and United States house of representatives.

(2) Types of elections
covered. This chapter applies to and governs voting in all general elections
where three or more candidates are running for the same office.

(3) Application to
local government. All general elections for offices of county, city, town,
special purpose district, school district, port district, or any other local
governmental unit or subdivision having elected officers are governed by IRV
under this chapter unless the local governmental unit opts out of this system
by appropriate action of its governing body.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. BALLOT SPECIFICATIONS AND
DIRECTIONS TO VOTERS. Ballots should be simple and easy to understand. Sample
ballots illustrating voting procedures must be posted in or near the voting
booth, and included in the instruction packet of absentee ballots. Directions
provided to voters must conform substantially to the following specifications:

"You may vote for candidates for each office in order of preference.
Indicate your first choice by marking the number "1" beside a
candidate's name (or by marking in the column labeled "First
Choice"), your second choice by marking the number "2" (or by
marking in the column labeled "Second Choice"), your third choice by
the number "3" (or marking the "Third Choice" column) and
so on, for as many or as few choices as you wish from one up to a total of
five. You are under no obligation to rank more than one candidate for each
office, but ranking additional candidates will not affect your first-choice
candidate. Do not mark the same number beside more than one candidate (or put
more than one mark in each column for the office you are voting on) per
office. Do not skip numbers."

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. CHANGES IN VOTING DEVICES
AND COUNTING METHODS. Appropriate election officials of the state may provide
for the use of electronic, computerized, or other devices for marking, sorting,
and counting the ballots and tabulating the results, and may modify the design
and form of the ballots, the directions to voters, and the details with respect
to the method of marking, sorting, invalidating, and retaining of ballots, and
the counting of votes. No change may be made inconsistent with provisions,
purposes, or principles of this chapter. Election officials should provide
voters with a ballot that has a special design, format, or layout for offices
to which IRV applies, but the parts of ballots for contests that have only one
or two candidates for the same office may differ from the parts of a ballot to
which IRV applies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. CONSTRUCTION. (1)
Construction of other election statutes. All statutes and parts of statutes
relating to elections to which this chapter applies are to be construed
consistent with this chapter and must be interpreted to the greatest reasonable
extent to harmonize with this chapter.

(2)
Interpretation of the term "votes." A statute that refers to
"votes" in an election to which this chapter applies should be
construed so that votes are counted and treated as set forth in this chapter,
and the term "votes" or the phrase "greatest number of
votes" or "highest number of votes" in any such statute must be
interpreted to mean "votes" as defined in this chapter.

Sec. 10. RCW 29.65.050 and 1965 c
9 s 29.65.050 are each amended to read as follows:

The clerk shall issue
subpoenas for witnesses in such contested election at the request of either
party, which shall be served by the sheriff or constable, as other subpoenas,
and the superior court shall have full power to issue attachments to compel the
attendance of witnesses who shall have been duly subpoenaed to attend if they
fail to do so.

The court shall meet at
the time and place designated to determine such contested election by the rules
of law and evidence governing the determination of questions of law and fact,
so far as the same may be applicable, and may dismiss the proceedings if the
statement of the cause or causes of contest is insufficient, or for want of
prosecution. After hearing the proofs and allegations of the parties, the
court shall pronounce judgment in the premises, either confirming or annulling
and setting aside such election, according to the law and right of the case.

If in any such case it
((shall)) appears that another person than the one returned has
the highest number of legal votes, ((said)) the court shall
declare such person duly elected, consistent with the requirements of
instant runoff voting contained in chapter 29.-- RCW (sections 1 through 9 of
this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. SECTION CAPTIONS.
Captions used in this act are not part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. SEVERABILITY. If any
provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 1 through 9 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 29 RCW.

---
END ---