BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that Washington's transportation system is in crisis, and that part of the
reason for the state's infrastructure problem is the failure of the motor
vehicle fuel tax rate to keep up with the rising costs attributable to
inflation. The legislature desires that the gas tax keep pace with inflation
to better meet the transportation needs of the state.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.36.025 and 1999 c
269 s 16 and 1999 c 94 s 29 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Until July 1,
2003, a motor vehicle fuel tax rate of ((twenty-three)) twenty-six
cents per gallon ((shall apply)) applies to the sale,
distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.

(2) July 1, 2003,
through June 30, 2004, a motor vehicle fuel tax rate of twenty-nine cents per
gallon applies to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.

(3) Beginning July
1, 2004, a motor vehicle fuel tax rate of thirty-two cents per gallon applies
to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.

(4) Beginning July
1, 2005, and every biennium thereafter, the motor vehicle fuel tax rate under
subsection (3) of this section may be adjusted by the legislature to reflect
increases in the implicit price deflator for the United States as defined and
officially reported by the United States department of labor. The adjustment
shall not exceed the rate of inflation as indicated by the implicit price
deflator, unless an adjustment in excess of the rate of inflation is approved
by a majority of voters voting on a proposition to do so.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The secretary of state
shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or
rejection, at the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance
with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---