BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A well‑trained
workforce is critical to the economic and social vitality of the state of
Washington. Studies of the state's workforce highlight population trends that,
without a concerted effort to offset them, will lead to an inadequate supply of
skilled workers in the construction industry. Apprenticeship training programs
are particularly effective in providing training and experience to individuals
seeking to enter or advance in the work force. Public works contracts can
provide training and experience as a means to increase the skills of the
state's workforce and to help apprentices become journeyworkers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout sections 1 through 3 of this act unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Apprentice" means an apprentice enrolled in a state‑approved
apprenticeship training program.

(2) "Apprentice
utilization requirement" means the requirement that the appropriate
percentage of labor hours within each separate craft or trade be performed by
apprentices of that craft or trade.

(3) "Labor
hours" means the total hours of workers receiving an hourly wage who are
directly employed on the site of the public works project. "Labor
hours" includes hours performed by workers employed by the contractor and
all subcontractors working on the project. "Labor hours" does not
include hours worked by foremen, superintendents, owners, and workers who are
not subject to prevailing wage requirements.

(4) "State‑approved
apprenticeship training program" means an apprenticeship training program
approved by the Washington state apprenticeship council.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) From July 1, 2002,
through December 31, 2002, all contracts for public works estimated to cost two
million dollars or more shall require that no less than ten percent of the
labor hours within each craft or trade be performed by apprentices of that craft
or trade.

(2) From January 1,
2003, through December 31, 2003, all contracts for public works estimated to
cost two million dollars or more shall require that no less than twelve percent
of the labor hours within each craft or trade be performed by apprentices of
that craft or trade.

(3) From January 1,
2004, and thereafter, all contracts for public works estimated to cost one
million dollars or more shall require that no less than fifteen percent of the
labor hours within each craft or trade be performed by apprentices of that
craft or trade.

(4) Awarding agency
directors may adjust the requirements of this section for a specific project
for the following reasons:

(a) The demonstrated
lack of availability of apprentices in specific geographic areas;

(b) A
disproportionately high ratio of material costs to labor hours, which does not
make feasible the required minimum levels of apprentice participation; or

(c) Other criteria the
awarding agency director deems appropriate, which is subject to prior review by
the apprenticeship program manager of the department of labor and industries.

(5) The failure by a
contractor to comply with the apprentice utilization requirement shall be
deemed a breach of contract for which the state or the municipality is entitled
to all remedies allowed by law and under the contract. Failure to comply with
the apprentice utilization requirement may be considered evidence bearing on a
contractor's qualification for award of future contracts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of
this act are each added to chapter 39.04 RCW.

---
END ---