BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 60.13.060 and 1987 c
148 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The processor lien
shall terminate ((six)) twenty-four months after, and the
preparer lien shall terminate fifty days after, the later of the date of
attachment or filing, unless a suit to foreclose the lien has been filed before
that time as provided in RCW 60.13.070.

(2) If a
statement has been filed as provided in RCW 60.13.040 and the producer or
commercial ((fisherman)) fisher has received payment for the
obligation secured by the lien, the producer or ((fisherman)) fisher
shall promptly file with the department of licensing a statement declaring that
full payment has been received and that the lien is discharged. If, after
payment, the producer or ((fisherman)) fisher fails to file such
statement of discharge within ten days following a request to do so, the
producer or ((fisherman)) fisher shall be liable to the
processor, conditioner, or preparer in the sum of one hundred dollars plus
actual damages caused by the failure.

--- END ---