BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature makes
the following findings:

(a) Some health care
services can be safely and effectively delivered or assisted by new and older,
proven forms of telecommunications;

(b) The role of the
internet in making some health care services and information available is
growing and constructive;

(c) Telecommunications
can help to deliver health care services in the state, especially to
underserved areas and populations; and

(d) Health care
teleservices have been used for thirty years and health care teleservice
projects currently exist in at least forty states.

(2) The legislature
intends to remove barriers to the development of the delivery of health care
teleservices.

Sec. 2. RCW 48.43.005 and 2001 c
196 s 5 and 2001 c 147 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless otherwise
specifically provided, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.

(1) "Adjusted
community rate" means the rating method used to establish the premium for
health plans adjusted to reflect actuarially demonstrated differences in
utilization or cost attributable to geographic region, age, family size, and
use of wellness activities.

(2) "Basic health
plan" means the plan described under chapter 70.47 RCW, as revised from
time to time.

(3) "Basic health
plan model plan" means a health plan as required in RCW 70.47.060(2)(d).

(4) "Basic health
plan services" means that schedule of covered health services, including the
description of how those benefits are to be administered, that are required to
be delivered to an enrollee under the basic health plan, as revised from time
to time.

(5) "Catastrophic
health plan" means:

(a) In the case of a
contract, agreement, or policy covering a single enrollee, a health benefit
plan requiring a calendar year deductible of, at a minimum, one thousand five
hundred dollars and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the
plan (other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least three thousand
dollars; and

(b) In the case of a
contract, agreement, or policy covering more than one enrollee, a health
benefit plan requiring a calendar year deductible of, at a minimum, three
thousand dollars and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under
the plan (other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least five
thousand five hundred dollars; or

(c) Any health benefit
plan that provides benefits for hospital inpatient and outpatient services,
professional and prescription drugs provided in conjunction with such hospital
inpatient and outpatient services, and excludes or substantially limits
outpatient physician services and those services usually provided in an office
setting.

(6)
"Certification" means a determination by a review organization that
an admission, extension of stay, or other health care service or procedure has
been reviewed and, based on the information provided, meets the clinical
requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness, level of care, or
effectiveness under the auspices of the applicable health benefit plan.

(7) "Concurrent
review" means utilization review conducted during a patient's hospital
stay or course of treatment.

(8) "Covered
person" or "enrollee" means a person covered by a health plan
including an enrollee, subscriber, policyholder, beneficiary of a group plan,
or individual covered by any other health plan.

(9)
"Dependent" means, at a minimum, the enrollee's legal spouse and
unmarried dependent children who qualify for coverage under the enrollee's
health benefit plan.

(10) "Eligible
employee" means an employee who works on a full-time basis with a normal
work week of thirty or more hours. The term includes a self-employed
individual, including a sole proprietor, a partner of a partnership, and may
include an independent contractor, if the self-employed individual, sole
proprietor, partner, or independent contractor is included as an employee under
a health benefit plan of a small employer, but does not work less than thirty
hours per week and derives at least seventy-five percent of his or her income
from a trade or business through which he or she has attempted to earn taxable
income and for which he or she has filed the appropriate internal revenue
service form. Persons covered under a health benefit plan pursuant to the
consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1986 shall not be considered
eligible employees for purposes of minimum participation requirements of
chapter 265, Laws of 1995.

(11) "Emergency
medical condition" means the emergent and acute onset of a symptom or
symptoms, including severe pain, that would lead a prudent layperson acting
reasonably to believe that a health condition exists that requires immediate
medical attention, if failure to provide medical attention would result in
serious impairment to bodily functions or serious dysfunction of a bodily organ
or part, or would place the person's health in serious jeopardy.

(12) "Emergency
services" means otherwise covered health care services medically necessary
to evaluate and treat an emergency medical condition, provided in a hospital
emergency department.

(13) "Enrollee
point-of-service cost-sharing" means amounts paid to health carriers directly
providing services, health care providers, or health care facilities by
enrollees and may include copayments, coinsurance, or deductibles.

(14)
"Grievance" means a written complaint submitted by or on behalf of a
covered person regarding: (a) Denial of payment for medical services or
nonprovision of medical services included in the covered person's health
benefit plan, or (b) service delivery issues other than denial of payment for
medical services or nonprovision of medical services, including dissatisfaction
with medical care, waiting time for medical services, provider or staff
attitude or demeanor, or dissatisfaction with service provided by the health
carrier.

(15) "Health care
facility" or "facility" means hospices licensed under chapter 70.127
RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, rural health care facilities
as defined in RCW 70.175.020, psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter
71.12 RCW, nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, community mental
health centers licensed under chapter 71.05 or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease
treatment centers licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, ambulatory diagnostic,
treatment, or surgical facilities licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, drug and
alcohol treatment facilities licensed under chapter 70.96A RCW, and home health
agencies licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and includes such facilities if
owned and operated by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the state
and such other facilities as required by federal law and implementing regulations.

(16) "Health care
provider" or "provider" means:

(a) A person regulated
under Title 18 or chapter 70.127 RCW, to practice health or health-related
services or otherwise practicing health care services in this state consistent
with state law; or

(b) An employee or
agent of a person described in (a) of this subsection, acting in the course and
scope of his or her employment.

(17) "Health care
service" means that service offered or provided by health care facilities
and health care providers relating to the prevention, cure, or treatment of
illness, injury, or disease.

(18) "Health
care teleservices" means the use of any information technology to deliver
or assist in the delivery of health care services and information from one
location to another.

(19)
"Health carrier" or "carrier" means a disability insurer
regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care service contractor as
defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a health maintenance organization as defined in
RCW 48.46.020.

(((19))) (20)
"Health plan" or "health benefit plan" means any policy,
contract, or agreement offered by a health carrier to provide, arrange,
reimburse, or pay for health care services except the following:

(a) Long-term care
insurance governed by chapter 48.84 RCW;

(b) Medicare
supplemental health insurance governed by chapter 48.66 RCW;

(c) Limited health care
services offered by limited health care service contractors in accordance with
RCW 48.44.035;

(d) Disability income;

(e) Coverage incidental
to a property/casualty liability insurance policy such as automobile personal
injury protection coverage and homeowner guest medical;

(f) Workers'
compensation coverage;

(g) Accident only
coverage;

(h) Specified disease
and hospital confinement indemnity when marketed solely as a supplement to a
health plan;

(i) Employer-sponsored
self-funded health plans;

(j) Dental only and
vision only coverage; and

(k) Plans deemed by the
insurance commissioner to have a short-term limited purpose or duration, or to
be a student-only plan that is guaranteed renewable while the covered person is
enrolled as a regular full-time undergraduate or graduate student at an
accredited higher education institution, after a written request for such
classification by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the insurance
commissioner.

(((20))) (21)
"Material modification" means a change in the actuarial value of the
health plan as modified of more than five percent but less than fifteen
percent.

(((21))) (22)
"Preexisting condition" means any medical condition, illness, or
injury that existed any time prior to the effective date of coverage.

(((22))) (23)
"Premium" means all sums charged, received, or deposited by a health
carrier as consideration for a health plan or the continuance of a health
plan. Any assessment or any "membership," "policy,"
"contract," "service," or similar fee or charge made by a
health carrier in consideration for a health plan is deemed part of the
premium. "Premium" shall not include amounts paid as enrollee
point-of-service cost-sharing.

(((23))) (24)
"Review organization" means a disability insurer regulated under
chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care service contractor as defined in RCW
48.44.010, or health maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020, and
entities affiliated with, under contract with, or acting on behalf of a health
carrier to perform a utilization review.

(((24))) (25)
"Small employer" or "small group" means any person, firm,
corporation, partnership, association, political subdivision, or self-employed
individual that is actively engaged in business that, on at least fifty percent
of its working days during the preceding calendar quarter, employed no more than
fifty eligible employees, with a normal work week of thirty or more hours, the
majority of whom were employed within this state, and is not formed primarily
for purposes of buying health insurance and in which a bona fide
employer-employee relationship exists. In determining the number of eligible
employees, companies that are affiliated companies, or that are eligible to
file a combined tax return for purposes of taxation by this state, shall be
considered an employer. Subsequent to the issuance of a health plan to a small
employer and for the purpose of determining eligibility, the size of a small
employer shall be determined annually. Except as otherwise specifically
provided, a small employer shall continue to be considered a small employer
until the plan anniversary following the date the small employer no longer
meets the requirements of this definition. The term "small employer"
includes a self-employed individual or sole proprietor. The term "small
employer" also includes a self-employed individual or sole proprietor who
derives at least seventy-five percent of his or her income from a trade or
business through which the individual or sole proprietor has attempted to earn
taxable income and for which he or she has filed the appropriate internal
revenue service form 1040, schedule C or F, for the previous taxable year.

(((25))) (26)
"Utilization review" means the prospective, concurrent, or
retrospective assessment of the necessity and appropriateness of the allocation
of health care resources and services of a provider or facility, given or
proposed to be given to an enrollee or group of enrollees.

(((26))) (27)
"Wellness activity" means an explicit program of an activity
consistent with department of health guidelines, such as, smoking cessation,
injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse, appropriate weight
reduction, exercise, automobile and motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol
reduction, and nutrition education for the purpose of improving enrollee health
status and reducing health service costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No health carrier
may discriminate against the use of health care teleservices by health care
providers to provide covered health care services to enrollees.

(2) Health carriers
may:

(a) Restrict enrollees
to obtaining covered services only from health care practitioners who have
signed participating provider agreements; or

(b) Use other managed
care and cost-containment techniques.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Section 3 of this
act does not increase the scope of practice of any health care profession.

(2) Section 3 of this
act does not apply to any health care services being provided to patients who
are incarcerated or otherwise in involuntary custodial arrangements.

(3) Section 3 of this
act does not apply to any state programs if, according to the attorney general,
compliance would jeopardize federal funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

The commissioner may
adopt rules necessary to implement sections 3 and 4 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003.

---
END ---