BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.190.020 and 1999
c 289 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person may
initiate the transmission, conspire with another to initiate the transmission,
or assist the transmission, of a commercial electronic mail message from a
computer located in Washington or to an electronic mail address that the sender
knows, or has reason to know, is held by a Washington resident that:

(a) Uses a third
party's internet domain name without permission of the third party, or
otherwise misrepresents or obscures any information in identifying the point of
origin or the transmission path of a commercial electronic mail message; or

(b) Contains false or
misleading information in the subject line.

(2) For purposes of
this section, a person knows that the intended recipient of a commercial
electronic mail message is a Washington resident if that information is
available, upon request, from the registrant of the internet domain name
contained in the recipient's electronic mail address or from directories of
Washington residents that are readily available on-line and reasonably reliable.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 19.190 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No person may
initiate the transmission, conspire with another to initiate the transmission,
or assist the transmission, of a commercial electronic mail message from a
computer located in Washington or to an electronic mail address that the sender
knows, or has reason to know, is held by a Washington resident that fails to
include "ADV:" as the first four characters in the subject line.

(2) For purposes of
this section:

(a) "Commercial
electronic mail message" does not mean an electronic mail message sent by
a person with whom the recipient has a current or prior business relationship.

(b) "Current or
prior business relationship" means:

(i) The recipient has
clearly and affirmatively indicated a willingness to receive commercial
electronic mail messages from that sender;

(ii) The recipient has
purchased or leased real property, goods, or services from the sender of the
unsolicited commercial electronic mail message, the message from the sender
directly concerns the purchase or lease, and the message is sent within the
warranty period or within thirteen months after the date of purchase or lease,
whichever period is a greater length of time; or

(iii) The recipient has
an ongoing contract with the sender of the unsolicited commercial electronic
mail message, and the message from the sender directly concerns the ongoing
contract.

(3) The legislature
finds that the practices covered by this section are matters vitally affecting
the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this section is not reasonable in relation
to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If any section,
subsection, or other provision of this act or its application to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of
the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---