BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.165 and 1999 c
206 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state
department of transportation and the local authorities are authorized to
reserve all or any portion of any highway under their respective jurisdictions,
including any designated lane or ramp, for the exclusive or preferential use of
public transportation vehicles or private motor vehicles carrying no fewer than
a specified number of passengers when such limitation will increase the
efficient utilization of the highway or will aid in the conservation of energy
resources.

(2) The state
department of transportation and the local authorities may designate all or any
portion of any highway under their respective jurisdictions, or any lanes
restricted under subsection (1) of this section, including any designated lane
or ramp, as green lanes. Green lanes will be for the exclusive or preferential
use of green vehicles when the limitations will increase the efficient use of
the highway, will aid in the conservation of energy resources, or will improve
air quality. For purposes of this section, "green vehicles" means:

(a) Public
transportation vehicles;

(b) Private motor
vehicles carrying no fewer than a specified number of passengers;

(c) Private motor
vehicles whose average gasoline mileage is at least twice the national average
for passenger cars, as that figure is determined by the United States
Environmental Protection Agency; and

(d) Private motor
vehicles that are permanently mitigating the greenhouse gas emissions emitted
by paying a mitigation fee under subsection (3) of this section.

(3) The department
of licensing shall set a mitigation fee, or a schedule of fees based on the age
or relative emissions of a vehicle, for green vehicles under subsection (2)(d)
of this section of no more than three thousand six hundred dollars annually.
In setting this fee, the department may consult with any public or private
institution, including, but not limited to, the department of ecology, the
office of trade and economic development, the utilities and transportation
commission, and the Washington state energy program.

(a) One-half of this
fee must be transferred to the Washington State University energy program for
the study of the climate and rural energy development, which shall use this fee
for air pollution mitigation within the boundaries of the air pollution control
authorities for the counties in which a green vehicle paying a mitigation fee
is used; and

(b) One-half of this
fee must be used to purchase mass transit passes for low-income riders within
the boundaries of a transit authority in which a green vehicle paying a
mitigation fee is used.

Fees under this
subsection (3) may be collected annually, at the time of vehicle registration
or renewal, or they may be collected monthly.

(4) The department
of licensing, in consultation with the state patrol, shall issue a highly
visible green decal to be attached near the license plate or in the rear window
of vehicles that qualify under subsection (2)(c) or (d) of this section. This
decal will be issued annually at the time of the vehicle's license renewal if
that vehicle meets the requirements for the upcoming registration year.
Presence of this decal is necessary for the vehicle to use a green lane.
Vehicles that otherwise meet the requirements of subsection (2)(c) or (d) of
this section that fail to display the decal may be cited for a traffic
infraction under subsection (6) of this section. The department shall provide
to appropriate law enforcement agencies the names and license numbers of
qualifying green vehicles to which a green decal has been issued.

(5) Regulations
authorizing ((such)) exclusive or preferential use of a highway facility
under this section may be declared to be effective at all times or at
specified times of day or on specified days.

(6)
Violation of a restriction of highway usage prescribed by the appropriate
authority under this section is a traffic infraction.

--- END ---