BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.09.340 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 224 are each amended to read as follows:

An
employer who hires a person who has been conditionally released to a less
restrictive alternative must notify ((all other employees)) coworkers
with whom the person is likely to have contact on a regular basis of the
conditionally released person's status. Notification for conditionally
released persons who enroll in an institution of higher education shall be made
pursuant to the provisions of RCW 9A.44.130 related to sex offenders enrolled
in institutions of higher education and RCW 4.24.550. This section applies
only to conditionally released persons whose court‑approved treatment
plan includes permission or a requirement for the person to obtain education or
employment and to employment positions or educational programs that meet the
requirements of the court-approved treatment plan.

--- END ---