BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.79 RCW to read as follows:

The office of financial
management, in consultation with the secretary of state, the attorney general,
and any other appropriate state or local agency, shall prepare a fiscal impact
statement for each of the following state ballot measures: (1) An initiative
to the people that is certified to the ballot; (2) an initiative to the
legislature that will appear on the ballot; (3) an alternative measure
appearing on the ballot that the legislature proposes to an initiative to the
legislature; (4) a referendum bill referred to voters by the legislature; and
(5) a referendum measure appearing on the ballot. Fiscal impact statements
must be written in clear and concise language and avoid legal and technical
terms when possible, and may include easily understood graphics.

A fiscal impact
statement must describe any projected increase or decrease in revenues, costs,
expenditures, or indebtedness that the state or local governments will
experience if the ballot measure were approved by state voters. Where
appropriate, a fiscal impact statement may include both estimated dollar
amounts and a description placing the estimated dollar amounts into context. A
fiscal impact statement must include both a summary of not to exceed one hundred
words and a more detailed statement that includes the assumptions that were
made to develop the fiscal impacts.

Fiscal impact
statements must be available online from the secretary of state's web site and
included in the state voters' pamphlet.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.81.250 and 1999 c
260 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state
shall determine the format and layout of the voters' pamphlet. The secretary
of state shall print the pamphlet in clear, readable type on a size, quality,
and weight of paper that in the judgment of the secretary of state best serves
the voters. The pamphlet must contain a table of contents. Federal and state
offices must appear in the pamphlet in the same sequence as they appear on the
ballot. Measures and arguments must be printed in the order specified by RCW
29.79.300.

The voters' pamphlet
must provide the following information for each statewide issue on the ballot:

(1) The legal
identification of the measure by serial designation or number;

(2) The official ballot
title of the measure;

(3) A statement
prepared by the attorney general explaining the law as it presently exists;

(4) A statement
prepared by the attorney general explaining the effect of the proposed measure
if it becomes law;

(5) The fiscal
impact statement prepared under section 1 of this act;

(6) The total
number of votes cast for and against the measure in the senate and house of
representatives, if the measure has been passed by the legislature;

(((6))) (7)
An argument advocating the voters' approval of the measure together with any
statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;

(((7))) (8)
An argument advocating the voters' rejection of the measure together with any
statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;

(((8))) (9)
Each argument or rebuttal statement must be followed by the names of the
committee members who submitted them, and may be followed by a telephone number
that citizens may call to obtain information on the ballot measure;

(((9)))
(10) The full text of each measure.

---
END ---