BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that there are conflicting interpretations as to the intent of the legislature
in the enactment of chapter 305, Laws of 1999. The purpose of this act is to
make statutory changes that further clarify this intent.

It is the intent of the
legislature that elections of conservation district supervisors continue to be
conducted under procedures in the conservation district statutes, chapter 89.08
RCW, and that such elections not be conducted under the general election laws
contained in Title 29 RCW. Further, it is the intent of the legislature that
there be no change made with regard to applicability of the public disclosure
act, chapter 42.17 RCW, to conservation district supervisors from those that
existed before the enactment of chapter 305, Laws of 1999.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.13.020 and 1994 c
142 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All city, town, and
district general elections shall be held throughout the state of Washington on
the first Tuesday following the first Monday in November in the odd-numbered
years.

This section shall not
apply to:

(a) Elections for the
recall of any elective public officer;

(b) Public utility
districts, conservation districts, or district elections at which the
ownership of property within those districts is a prerequisite to voting, all
of which elections shall be held at the times prescribed in the laws
specifically applicable thereto;

(c) Consolidation
proposals as provided for in RCW 28A.315.280 and nonhigh capital fund aid
proposals as provided for in chapter 28A.540 RCW.

(2) The county auditor,
as ex officio supervisor of elections, upon request in the form of a resolution
of the governing body of a city, town, or district, presented to the auditor at
least forty-five days prior to the proposed election date, may, if the county
auditor deems an emergency to exist, call a special election in such city,
town, or district, and for the purpose of such special election he or she may
combine, unite, or divide precincts. Except as provided in subsection (3) of
this section, such a special election shall be held on one of the following
dates as decided by the governing body:

(a) The first Tuesday
after the first Monday in February;

(b) The second Tuesday
in March;

(c) The fourth Tuesday
in April;

(d) The third Tuesday
in May;

(e) The day of the
primary election as specified by RCW 29.13.070; or

(f) The first Tuesday
after the first Monday in November.

(3) In a presidential
election year, if a presidential preference primary is conducted in February,
March, April, or May under chapter 29.19 RCW, the date on which a special
election may be called under subsection (2) of this section during the month of
that primary is the date of the presidential primary.

(4) In addition to
subsection (2)(a) through (f) of this section, a special election to validate
an excess levy or bond issue may be called at any time to meet the needs
resulting from fire, flood, earthquake, or other act of God, except that no
special election may be held between the first day for candidates to file for
public office and the last day to certify the returns of the general election
other than as provided in subsection (2)(e) and (f) of this section. Such
special election shall be conducted and notice thereof given in the manner
provided by law.

(5) This section shall
supersede the provisions of any and all other statutes, whether general or
special in nature, having different dates for such city, town, and district
elections, the purpose of this section being to establish mandatory dates for
holding elections.

Sec. 3. RCW 89.08.190 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 184 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty days
after the issuance of the certificate of organization, unless the time is
extended by the commission, petitions shall be filed with the commission to
nominate candidates for the three elected supervisors. The petition shall be
signed by not less than twenty-five district electors, and a district elector
may sign petitions nominating more than one person.

In the case of a new
district, the commission shall give due notice to elect the three supervisors.
All provisions pertaining to elections on the creation of a district shall
govern this election so far as applicable. The names of all nominees shall
appear on the ballot in alphabetical order, together with instructions to vote
for three. The three candidates receiving the most votes shall be declared
elected supervisors, the one receiving the most being elected for a three-year
term, the next for two and the last for one year. An alternate method of
dividing the district into three zones may be used when requested by the board
of supervisors and approved by the commission. In such case, instructions will
be to vote for one in each zone. The candidate receiving the most votes in a
zone shall be declared elected.

Each year after the
creation of the first board of supervisors, the board shall by resolution and
by giving due notice, set a date during the first quarter of each calendar year
at which time it shall conduct an election, except that for elections in
2002 only, the board shall set the date during the second quarter of the
calendar year at which time it shall conduct an election. Names of
candidates nominated by petition shall appear in alphabetical order on the
ballots, together with an extra line wherein may be written in the name of any
other candidate. The commission shall establish procedures for elections,
canvass the returns and announce the official results thereof. Election
results may be announced by polling officials at the close of the election
subject to official canvass of ballots by the commission. Supervisors elected shall
take office at the first board meeting following the election.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

Elections of
conservation district supervisors held pursuant to chapter 89.08 RCW shall not
be considered general or special elections for purposes of the campaign
disclosure and personal financial affairs reporting requirements of this
chapter. Elected conservation district supervisors are not considered elected
officials for purposes of the annual personal financial affairs reporting
requirement of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) A work group on
conservation district elections is created, comprised of seven members who are
appointed as follows:

(a) The chair who shall
be a person with expertise and experience in local elections, to be named by
the president of a statewide organization of county auditors; and

(b) Six members
appointed by agreement of the president of the senate and the speaker of the
house of representatives with the following qualifications:

(i) Two persons who are
landowners and are currently conservation district supervisors selected from a
list nominated by a statewide association representing conservation district supervisors;

(ii) Two persons who
are landowners and are not currently conservation district supervisors, one
whom is selected from a list nominated by a statewide dairy organization and
the other whom is selected from a list nominated by a statewide agricultural
organization;

(iii) One person who is
selected from a list nominated by a statewide environmental organization and is
knowledgeable about conservation district operations; and

(iv) One person
representing county governments selected from a list nominated by the
Washington association of counties.

(2) The work group
shall conduct a review of conservation district election procedures and prepare
recommendations for changes and improvements to the procedures including but
not limited to:

(a) Defining
eligibility requirements for holding the office of conservation district
supervisor;

(b) Determining what
public agency should be responsible for overseeing and certifying conservation
district elections;

(c) Determining whether
or not conservation district supervisors should be required to report under
chapter 42.17 RCW;

(d) Determining the
cost of proposed changes and how the costs of conservation district elections
should be paid; and

(e) Determining what
actions the conservation commission should take in response to implementing the
recommendations of the work group for any elections conducted under chapter
89.08 RCW.

(3) The work group
shall convene as soon as possible upon the appointment of its members. The
work group shall provide progress reports as requested by the house of
representatives committee on agriculture and ecology and the senate committee
on agriculture and international trade during scheduled legislative committee assemblies
or at other meetings of these committees.

(4) The work group may
conduct town hall meetings in different regions of the state before submitting
the recommendations to the legislature. The open public meetings act, chapter
42.30 RCW, applies to meetings conducted under this section. The work group
shall announce the location and time of meetings.

(5) The work group
shall provide a report of its findings and recommendations to the secretary of
the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives by December 15,
2002.

(6) No additional funds
may be appropriated for the purposes of the work group or the report in this
section.

(7) This section
expires April 15, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---