BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.05.075 and 1994
sp.s. c 9 s 724, 1994 c 309 s 3, and 1994 c 153 s 6 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1) The administrator
shall provide benefit plans designed by the board through a contract or
contracts with insuring entities, through self-funding, self-insurance, or
other methods of providing insurance coverage authorized by RCW 41.05.140.

(2) The administrator
shall establish a contract bidding process that:

(a) Encourages
competition among insuring entities;

(b) Maintains an
equitable relationship between premiums charged for similar benefits and
between risk pools including premiums charged for retired state and school
district employees under the separate risk pools established by RCW 41.05.022
and 41.05.080 such that insuring entities may not avoid risk when establishing
the premium rates for retirees eligible for medicare;

(c) Is timely to the
state budgetary process; and

(d) Sets conditions for
awarding contracts to any insuring entity.

(3) The administrator
shall establish a requirement for review of utilization and financial data from
participating insuring entities on a quarterly basis.

(4) The administrator
shall centralize the enrollment files for all employee and retired or disabled
school employee health plans offered under chapter 41.05 RCW and develop
enrollment demographics on a plan-specific basis.

(5) All claims data
shall be the property of the state. The administrator may require of any
insuring entity that submits a bid to contract for coverage all information
deemed necessary including subscriber or member demographic and claims data
necessary for risk assessment and adjustment calculations in order to fulfill
the administrator's duties as set forth in this chapter.

(6) All contracts with
insuring entities for the provision of health care benefits shall provide that
the beneficiaries of such benefit plans may use on an equal participation basis
the services of practitioners licensed pursuant to chapters 18.22, 18.25,
18.32, 18.53, 18.57, 18.71, 18.74, 18.83, and 18.79 RCW, as it applies to
registered nurses and advanced registered nurse practitioners. However,
nothing in this subsection may preclude the administrator from establishing
appropriate utilization controls approved pursuant to RCW 41.05.065(2) (a),
(b), and (d).

(7) Beginning in
January 1990, and each January thereafter ((until January 1996)), the
administrator shall publish and distribute to each school district a
description of health care benefit plans available through the authority ((and
the estimated cost if school district employees were enrolled)). Beginning
January 1, 2003, school districts and employees of school district bargaining
units who enroll in an insurance or self-insurance program administered under
this chapter shall be charged the same composite rate amount as state agencies
and state agency employees for the same plans. If a school district and
employees of school district bargaining units choose to purchase medical-only
insurance coverage from the authority, they shall be similarly charged a
composite rate, less the composite rate costs for dental, life, and long-term
disability.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.05.011 and 2001 c
165 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.

(2) "State
purchased health care" or "health care" means medical and health
care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with state and federal
funds by the department of social and health services, the department of
health, the basic health plan, the state health care authority, the department
of labor and industries, the department of corrections, the department of
veterans affairs, and local school districts.

(3)
"Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(4) "Insuring entity"
means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01 RCW, a health care service
contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.

(5) "Flexible
benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows employees to choose the
level of health care coverage provided and the amount of employee contributions
from among a range of choices offered by the authority.

(6)
"Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees of
the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and appointed
officials of the executive branch of government, including full-time members of
boards, commissions, or committees; and includes any or all part-time and
temporary employees under the terms and conditions established under this
chapter by the authority; justices of the supreme court and judges of the court
of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state legislature or of
the legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to office
after February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a) Employees of
a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state if the
legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other political
subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of the authority to
provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the authority, as
provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee organizations representing
state civil service employees, at the option of each such employee
organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees of employee
organizations currently pooled with employees of school districts for the
purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at the option of each such employee
organization; and (c) employees of a school district ((if the authority
agrees to provide any of the school districts' insurance programs)) by
contract with the authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350.

(7) "Board"
means the public employees' benefits board established under RCW 41.05.055.

(8) "Retired or
disabled school employee" means:

(a) Persons who
separated from employment with a school district or educational service
district and are receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40
RCW as of September 30, 1993;

(b) Persons who
separate from employment with a school district or educational service district
on or after October 1, 1993, and immediately upon separation receive a
retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;

(c) Persons who
separate from employment with a school district or educational service district
due to a total and permanent disability, and are eligible to receive a deferred
retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.

(9) "Benefits
contribution plan" means a premium only contribution plan, a medical
flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan whereby state and public
employees may agree to a contribution to benefit costs which will allow the
employee to participate in benefits offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or
other sections of the internal revenue code.

(10) "Salary"
means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.

(11)
"Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility and
enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.

(12) "Plan
year" means the time period established by the authority.

(13) "Separated
employees" means persons who separate from employment with an employer as
defined in:

(a) RCW 41.32.010(11)
on or after July 1, 1996; or

(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or
after September 1, 2000; or

(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or
after March 1, 2002;

and who are at least age
fifty-five and have at least ten years of service under the teachers'
retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.32.010(40), the Washington school
employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public
employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.

(14)
"Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means law
enforcement officers and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030, and reserve
officers and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.24.010 who die as a result of
injuries sustained in the course of employment as determined consistent with
Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries.

---
END ---