BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79.70.030 and 1994 c
264 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to set aside,
preserve, and protect natural areas within the state, the department is
authorized, in addition to any other powers, to:

(1) Establish ((by
rule and regulation)) the criteria for selection, acquisition, management,
protection, and use of such natural areas, including:

(a) Limiting public
access to natural area preserves consistent with the purposes of this chapter.
Where appropriate, and on a case-by-case basis, a buffer zone with an increased
low level of public access may be created around the environmentally sensitive
areas;

(b) Developing a
management plan for each designated natural area preserve. The plan must
identify the significant resources to be conserved consistent with the purposes
of this chapter and identify the areas with potential for low-impact public and
environmental educational uses. The plan must specify the types of management
activities and public uses that are permitted, consistent with the purposes of
this chapter. The department must make the plans available for review and
comment by the public, and state, tribal, and local agencies, prior to final
approval;

(2) Cooperate or
contract with any federal, state, or local governmental agency, private
organizations, or individuals in carrying out the purpose of this
chapter;

(3) Consistent with the
plan, acquire by gift, devise, purchase, grant, dedication, or means other than
eminent domain, the fee or any lesser right or interest in real property which
shall be held and managed as a natural area;

(4) Acquire by gift,
devise, grant, or donation any personal property to be used in the
acquisition and/or management of natural areas;

(5) Inventory existing
public, state, and private lands in cooperation with the council to
assess possible natural areas to be preserved within the state;

(6) Maintain a natural
heritage program to provide assistance in the selection and nomination of areas
containing natural heritage resources for registration or dedication. The
program shall maintain a classification of natural heritage resources, an
inventory of their locations, and a data bank for such information. The
department of natural resources shall cooperate with the department of fish and
wildlife in the selection and nomination of areas from the data bank that
relate to critical wildlife habitats. Information from the data bank shall be
made available to public and private agencies and individuals for environmental
assessment and proprietary land management purposes. Usage of the
classification, inventory, or data bank of natural heritage resources
for any purpose inconsistent with the natural heritage program is not
authorized;

(7) Prepare a natural
heritage plan which shall govern the natural heritage program in the conduct of
activities to create and manage a system of natural areas ((which)) that
includes natural resource conservation areas, and may include areas
designated under the research natural area program on federal lands in the state;

(a) The plan shall list
the natural heritage resources to be considered for registration and shall
provide criteria for the selection and approval of natural areas under this
chapter;

(b) The department
shall provide opportunities for input, comment, and review to the public, other
public agencies, and private groups with special interests in natural heritage
resources during preparation of the plan;

(c) Upon approval by
the council and adoption by the department, the plan shall be updated and submitted
biennially to the appropriate committees of the legislature for their
information and review. The plan shall take effect ninety days after the
adjournment of the legislative session in which it is submitted unless the
reviewing committees suggest changes or reject the plan; and

(8) Maintain a state
register of natural areas containing significant natural heritage resources to
be called the Washington register of natural area preserves. Selection of
natural areas for registration shall be in accordance with criteria listed in
the natural heritage plan and accomplished through voluntary agreement between
the owner of the natural area and the department. No privately owned lands may
be proposed to the council for registration without prior notice to the owner
or registered without voluntary consent of the owner. No state or local
governmental agency may require such consent as a condition of any permit or
approval of or settlement of any civil or criminal proceeding or to penalize
any landowner in any way for failure to give, or for withdrawal of, such
consent.

(a) The department
shall adopt rules and regulations as authorized by RCW 43.30.310 and
79.70.030(1) and chapter 34.05 RCW relating to voluntary natural area
registration.

(b) After approval by
the council, the department may place sites onto the register or remove sites
from the register.

(c) The responsibility
for management of registered natural area preserves shall be with the preserve
owner. A voluntary management agreement may be developed between the
department and the owners of the sites on the register.

(d) Any public agency
may register lands under provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 79.70.060 and 1981 c
189 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds:

(1) That it is
necessary to establish a process and means for public and private sector
cooperation in the development of a system of natural areas. Private and
public landowners should be encouraged to participate in a program of natural
area establishment which will benefit all citizens of the state;

(2) That there is a
need for a systematic and accessible means for providing information concerning
the locations of the state's natural heritage resources; and

(3) That the natural
heritage advisory council should utilize a specific framework for natural
heritage resource conservation decision making through a classification,
inventory, priority establishment, acquisition, and management process known as
the natural heritage program. Future natural areas should avoid unnecessary
duplication of already protected natural heritage resources including those
which may already be protected in existing publicly owned or privately
dedicated lands such as nature preserves, natural areas, natural resource
conservation areas, parks, or wilderness.

Sec. 3. RCW 79.70.080 and 1994 c
264 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The council shall:

(a) Meet at least
annually and more frequently at the request of the chairperson;

(b) Recommend policy
for the natural heritage program through the review and approval of the natural
heritage plan;

(c) Advise the
department, the department of fish and wildlife, the state parks and recreation
commission, and other state agencies managing state-owned land or natural
resources regarding areas under their respective jurisdictions which are
appropriate for natural area registration or dedication;

(d) Advise the
department of rules and regulations that the council considers necessary in
carrying out this chapter; ((and))

(e) Review and approve
area nominations by the department or other agencies for registration and
review and comment on legal documents for the voluntary dedication of such
areas;

(f) Recommend
whether new areas proposed for protection be established as natural area
preserves, natural resource conservation areas, a combination of both, or by
some other protected status; and

(g) Review and
comment on management plans proposed for individual natural area preserves.

(2) From
time to time, the council shall identify areas from the natural heritage data
bank which qualify for registration. Priority shall be based on the natural
heritage plan and shall generally be given to those resources which are rarest,
most threatened, or under-represented in the heritage conservation system on a
statewide basis. After qualifying areas have been identified, the department
shall advise the owners of such areas of the opportunities for acquisition or
voluntary registration or dedication.

---
END ---