BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 13.40.210 and 2001 c
137 s 2 and 2001 c 51 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall
set a release date for each juvenile committed to its custody. The release
date shall be within the prescribed range to which a juvenile has been
committed under RCW 13.40.0357 or 13.40.030 except as provided in RCW 13.40.320
concerning offenders the department determines are eligible for the juvenile
offender basic training camp program. Such dates shall be determined prior to
the expiration of sixty percent of a juvenile's minimum term of confinement
included within the prescribed range to which the juvenile has been committed.
The secretary shall release any juvenile committed to the custody of the
department within four calendar days prior to the juvenile's release date or on
the release date set under this chapter. Days spent in the custody of the
department shall be tolled by any period of time during which a juvenile has
absented himself or herself from the department's supervision without the prior
approval of the secretary or the secretary's designee.

(2) The secretary shall
monitor the average daily population of the state's juvenile residential
facilities. When the secretary concludes that in-residence population of
residential facilities exceeds one hundred five percent of the rated bed
capacity specified in statute, or in absence of such specification, as
specified by the department in rule, the secretary may recommend reductions to
the governor. On certification by the governor that the recommended reductions
are necessary, the secretary has authority to administratively release a
sufficient number of offenders to reduce in-residence population to one hundred
percent of rated bed capacity. The secretary shall release those offenders who
have served the greatest proportion of their sentence. However, the secretary
may deny release in a particular case at the request of an offender, or if the
secretary finds that there is no responsible custodian, as determined by the
department, to whom to release the offender, or if the release of the offender
would pose a clear danger to society. The department shall notify the committing
court of the release at the time of release if any such early releases have
occurred as a result of excessive in-residence population. In no event shall
an offender adjudicated of a violent offense be granted release under the
provisions of this subsection.

(3)(a) Following the
release of any juvenile under subsection (1) of this section, the ((secretary
may)) sentencing court shall require the juvenile to comply with a
program of parole to be administered by the county's juvenile community
supervision program or the department in his or her community which shall
last no longer than ((eighteen)) twelve months, except that in
the case of a juvenile sentenced for rape in the first or second degree, rape
of a child in the first or second degree, child molestation in the first
degree, or indecent liberties with forcible compulsion, the period of parole
shall be twenty-four months and, in the discretion of the ((secretary)) juvenile
court, may be up to thirty-six months when the ((secretary)) juvenile
court finds that an additional period of parole is necessary and
appropriate in the interests of public safety or to meet the ongoing needs of
the juvenile. A parole program is mandatory for offenders released under
subsection (2) of this section. The decision to place an offender on parole
shall be based on an assessment by the ((department)) juvenile court
of the offender's risk for reoffending upon release. ((The department shall
prioritize available parole resources to provide supervision and services to offenders
at moderate to high risk for reoffending.)) Prior pending probation
sentences shall run concurrent with the parole supervision period.

(b) The ((secretary))
sentencing court shall, for the period of parole, facilitate the
juvenile's reintegration into his or her community and to further this goal
shall require the juvenile to refrain from possessing a firearm or using a
deadly weapon and refrain from committing new offenses and may require the
juvenile to: (i) Undergo available medical, psychiatric, drug and alcohol, sex
offender, mental health, and other offense-related treatment services; (ii)
report as directed to a parole/juvenile community supervision officer ((and/or
designee)); (iii) pursue a course of study, vocational training, or
employment; (iv) notify the parole officer of the current address where he or
she resides; (v) be present at a particular address during specified hours;
(vi) remain within prescribed geographical boundaries; (vii) submit to
electronic monitoring; (viii) refrain from using illegal drugs and alcohol, and
submit to random urinalysis when requested by the assigned parole officer; (ix)
refrain from contact with specific individuals or a specified class of
individuals; (x) meet other conditions determined by the parole officer to
further enhance the juvenile's reintegration into the community; (xi) pay any
court-ordered fines or restitution; and (xii) perform community service.
Community service for the purpose of this section means compulsory service,
without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender. Community service may be performed through public or private
organizations or through work crews.

(c) ((The secretary
may further require up to twenty-five percent of the highest risk juvenile
offenders who are placed on parole to participate in an intensive supervision
program. Offenders participating in an intensive supervision program shall be
required to comply with all terms and conditions listed in (b) of this
subsection and shall also be required to comply with the following additional
terms and conditions: (i) Obey all laws and refrain from any conduct that
threatens public safety; (ii) report at least once a week to an assigned
community case manager; and (iii) meet all other requirements imposed by the
community case manager related to participating in the intensive supervision
program. As a part of the intensive supervision program, the secretary may
require day reporting.

(d))) After termination of the parole period, the
juvenile shall be discharged from the ((department's)) juvenile
court's supervision.

(4)(a) The ((department))
juvenile court may also modify parole for violation thereof. If, after
affording a juvenile all of the due process rights to which he or she would be
entitled if the juvenile were an adult, the ((secretary)) juvenile
court finds that a juvenile has violated a condition of his or her parole,
the ((secretary shall)) juvenile court may order one of the
following which is reasonably likely to effectuate the purpose of the parole
and to protect the public: (i) Continued supervision under the same conditions
previously imposed; (ii) intensified supervision with increased reporting requirements;
(iii) additional conditions of supervision authorized by this chapter; (iv)
except as provided in (a)(v) and (vi) of this subsection, imposition of a
period of confinement not to exceed thirty days in a facility operated by or
pursuant to a contract with the state of Washington or any city or county for a
portion of each day or for a certain number of days each week with the balance
of the days or weeks spent under supervision; (v) the ((secretary)) juvenile
court may order any of the conditions or may return the offender to
confinement for the remainder of the sentence range if the offense for which
the offender was sentenced is rape in the first or second degree, rape of a
child in the first or second degree, child molestation in the first degree,
indecent liberties with forcible compulsion, or a sex offense that is also a
serious violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030; and (vi) the ((secretary))
juvenile court may order any of the conditions or may return the
offender to confinement for the remainder of the sentence range if the youth
has completed the basic training camp program as described in RCW 13.40.320.

(b) If the ((department))
juvenile court finds that any juvenile in a program of parole has
possessed a firearm or used a deadly weapon during the program of parole, the
((department)) juvenile court shall modify the parole under (a)
of this subsection and confine the juvenile for at least thirty days.
Confinement shall be in a facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with
the state or any county.

(5) A parole/juvenile
community supervision officer of the ((department of social and health
services)) juvenile court shall have the power to arrest a juvenile
under his or her supervision on the same grounds as a law enforcement officer
would be authorized to arrest the person.

(6) ((If so
requested and approved under chapter 13.06 RCW, the secretary shall permit a
county or group of counties to perform functions under subsections (3) through
(5) of this section)) The responsibility for providing parole/juvenile
community supervision services shall be that of the state, unless individual
counties choose to contract with the state to provide parole/juvenile community
supervision services. In the event that a county chooses to provide these
services, the county shall follow the parole standards established by the state
and being used as of January 1, 2002. The state may change the standards of parole
only after consultation and consideration from the counties.

(7) So long as the
county follows the state parole standards, and in the absence of gross
negligence, the state shall indemnify the county from liability from any
action, claim, or proceeding instituted against the county or its employees
arising out of the performance or failure of performance of the parole/juvenile
community supervision services.

(8) Until July 1,
2002, all juvenile offenders released from a state commitment institution and
subject to parole supervision shall remain under the jurisdiction of the
state. On and after July 1, 2002, juvenile offenders released from a state
commitment institution and subject to parole supervision shall come under the
jurisdiction of the counties who have chosen to contract with the state for
those services as described in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:

In recognizing the
legislature's intent to provide community services to juvenile offenders
through consolidation of service delivery systems, counties choosing not to
provide parole/juvenile community supervision services may contract with
adjoining counties to provide these services, and shall be indemnified by the
state to the same degree as the county providing the services.

Sec. 3. RCW 13.40.020 and 1997 c
338 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter:

(1)
"Community-based rehabilitation" means one or more of the following:
Employment; attendance of information classes; literacy classes; counseling,
outpatient substance abuse treatment programs, outpatient mental health
programs, anger management classes, education or outpatient treatment programs
to prevent animal cruelty, or other services; or attendance at school or other
educational programs appropriate for the juvenile as determined by the school
district. Placement in community-based rehabilitation programs is subject to available
funds;

(2) Community-based
sanctions may include one or more of the following:

(a) A fine, not to
exceed five hundred dollars;

(b) Community service
not to exceed one hundred fifty hours of service;

(3) "Community
service" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the
benefit of the community by the offender as punishment for committing an
offense. Community service may be performed through public or private
organizations or through work crews;

(4) "Community
supervision" means an order of disposition by the court of an adjudicated
youth not committed to the department or an order granting a deferred
disposition. A community supervision order for a single offense may be for a
period of up to two years for a sex offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030 and up
to one year for other offenses. As a mandatory condition of any term of
community supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to refrain from
committing new offenses. As a mandatory condition of community supervision, the
court shall order the juvenile to comply with the mandatory school attendance
provisions of chapter 28A.225 RCW and to inform the school of the existence of
this requirement. Community supervision is an individualized program comprised
of one or more of the following:

(a) Community-based
sanctions;

(b) Community-based
rehabilitation;

(c) Monitoring and
reporting requirements;

(d) Posting of a
probation bond;

(5)
"Confinement" means physical custody by the department of social and
health services in a facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the
state, or physical custody in a detention facility operated by or pursuant to a
contract with any county. The county may operate or contract with vendors to
operate county detention facilities. The department may operate or contract to
operate detention facilities for juveniles committed to the department.
Pretrial confinement or confinement of less than thirty-one days imposed as
part of a disposition or modification order may be served consecutively or
intermittently, in the discretion of the court;

(6) "Court,"
when used without further qualification, means the juvenile court judge(s) or
commissioner(s);

(7) "Criminal
history" includes all criminal complaints against the respondent for
which, prior to the commission of a current offense:

(a) The allegations
were found correct by a court. If a respondent is convicted of two or more
charges arising out of the same course of conduct, only the highest charge from
among these shall count as an offense for the purposes of this chapter; or

(b) The criminal
complaint was diverted by a prosecutor pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter on agreement of the respondent and after an advisement to the
respondent that the criminal complaint would be considered as part of the
respondent's criminal history. A successfully completed deferred adjudication
that was entered before July 1, 1998, or a deferred disposition shall not be
considered part of the respondent's criminal history;

(8)
"Department" means the department of social and health services;

(9) "Detention
facility" means a county facility, paid for by the county, for the
physical confinement of a juvenile alleged to have committed an offense or an
adjudicated offender subject to a disposition or modification order.
"Detention facility" includes county group homes, inpatient substance
abuse programs, juvenile basic training camps, and electronic monitoring;

(10) "Diversion
unit" means any probation counselor who enters into a diversion agreement
with an alleged youthful offender, or any other person, community
accountability board, or other entity except a law enforcement official or
entity, with whom the juvenile court administrator has contracted to arrange
and supervise such agreements pursuant to RCW 13.40.080, or any person,
community accountability board, or other entity specially funded by the
legislature to arrange and supervise diversion agreements in accordance with
the requirements of this chapter. For purposes of this subsection,
"community accountability board" means a board comprised of members
of the local community in which the juvenile offender resides. The superior
court shall appoint the members. The boards shall consist of at least three
and not more than seven members. If possible, the board should include a
variety of representatives from the community, such as a law enforcement
officer, teacher or school administrator, high school student, parent, and
business owner, and should represent the cultural diversity of the local
community;

(11) "Foster
care" means temporary physical care in a foster family home or group care
facility as defined in RCW 74.15.020 and licensed by the department, or other
legally authorized care;

(12)
"Institution" means a juvenile facility established pursuant to
chapters 72.05 and 72.16 through 72.20 RCW;

(13) (("Intensive
supervision program" means a parole program that requires intensive
supervision and monitoring, offers an array of individualized treatment and
transitional services, and emphasizes community involvement and support in
order to reduce the likelihood a juvenile offender will commit further
offenses;

(14))) "Juvenile," "youth," and
"child" mean any individual who is under the chronological age of
eighteen years and who has not been previously transferred to adult court
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 or who is otherwise under adult court jurisdiction;

(((15))) (14)
"Juvenile offender" means any juvenile who has been found by the
juvenile court to have committed an offense, including a person eighteen years
of age or older over whom jurisdiction has been extended under RCW 13.40.300;

(((16))) (15)
"Local sanctions" means one or more of the following: (a) 0‑30
days of confinement; (b) 0‑12 months of community supervision; (c) 0‑150
hours of community service; or (d) $0‑$500 fine;

(((17))) (16)
"Manifest injustice" means a disposition that would either impose an
excessive penalty on the juvenile or would impose a serious, and clear danger
to society in light of the purposes of this chapter;

(((18))) (17)
"Monitoring and reporting requirements" means one or more of the
following: Curfews; requirements to remain at home, school, work, or
court-ordered treatment programs during specified hours; restrictions from
leaving or entering specified geographical areas; requirements to report to the
probation officer as directed and to remain under the probation officer's
supervision; and other conditions or limitations as the court may require which
may not include confinement;

(((19))) (18)
"Offense" means an act designated a violation or a crime if committed
by an adult under the law of this state, under any ordinance of any city or
county of this state, under any federal law, or under the law of another state
if the act occurred in that state;

(((20))) (19)
"Probation bond" means a bond, posted with sufficient security by a
surety justified and approved by the court, to secure the offender's appearance
at required court proceedings and compliance with court-ordered community
supervision or conditions of release ordered pursuant to RCW 13.40.040 or
13.40.050. It also means a deposit of cash or posting of other collateral in
lieu of a bond if approved by the court;

(((21))) (20)
"Respondent" means a juvenile who is alleged or proven to have
committed an offense;

(((22))) (21)
"Restitution" means financial reimbursement by the offender to the
victim, and shall be limited to easily ascertainable damages for injury to or
loss of property, actual expenses incurred for medical treatment for physical
injury to persons, lost wages resulting from physical injury, and costs of the
victim's counseling reasonably related to the offense if the offense is a sex
offense. Restitution shall not include reimbursement for damages for mental
anguish, pain and suffering, or other intangible losses. Nothing in this
chapter shall limit or replace civil remedies or defenses available to the
victim or offender;

(((23))) (22)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services. "Assistant secretary" means the assistant secretary
for juvenile rehabilitation for the department;

(((24))) (23)
"Services" means services which provide alternatives to incarceration
for those juveniles who have pleaded or been adjudicated guilty of an offense
or have signed a diversion agreement pursuant to this chapter;

(((25))) (24)
"Sex offense" means an offense defined as a sex offense in RCW
9.94A.030;

(((26))) (25)
"Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the
respondent committed the offense was for the purpose of his or her sexual
gratification;

(((27))) (26)
"Surety" means an entity licensed under state insurance laws or by
the state department of licensing, to write corporate, property, or probation
bonds within the state, and justified and approved by the superior court of the
county having jurisdiction of the case;

(((28))) (27)
"Violation" means an act or omission, which if committed by an adult,
must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt, and is punishable by sanctions which
do not include incarceration;

(((29))) (28)
"Violent offense" means a violent offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. RCW 13.40.212 (Intensive supervision
program--Elements--Report) and 1997 c 338 s 34 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2002, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

---
END ---