BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The director, in
consultation with the WISHA advisory committee established by RCW 49.17.055,
shall establish a program to provide safety and health impact grants to prevent
injuries and illnesses, save lives, and educate Washington employees and
employers about workplace hazards and safe workplace practices. The intent of
this act is to benefit, in the broadest sense possible, Washington workers and
employers, especially those who are in small business and may lack the injury
and illness prevention resources that larger companies may possess. The
department may use industrial insurance funds appropriated to accomplish the
purpose of this act. Funding for this program will be taken from the medical
aid fund reserves which are in excess of actuarial needs.

(2) Using a competitive
application process, the department shall award safety and health impact grants
to trade associations, business associations, employers, employee
organizations, labor unions, and groups of employees. Educational institutions
and self-insured employers shall not directly receive grants but may
participate in partnership with other eligible grantees if the product of the
grant will significantly benefit employees and employers who belong to the
state industrial insurance fund. Grants may include:

(a) Education and
training grants to implement safety and health and to provide practical
information, curricula, materials, and methods intended for use by employers
and employees in reducing workplace hazards;

(b) Technical
innovation grants to develop engineering and other technical solutions to
injury and illness problems; or

(c) Grants for the
application of hazard control.

(3) The department
shall make significant efforts to ensure that not less than twenty percent of
available grant funds are used for grants whose activities or products are
intended to assist and benefit employers and employees in small businesses.

(4) Any materials,
designs, or equipment developed under these grants will be in the public domain
and may not be copyrighted or patented. Any materials or designs developed
under these grants must be provided to the department at no charge as a
condition of grant receipt.

(5) Grant funds may not
be used to support or develop specific legislative or regulatory initiatives.

(6) The department
shall not use information in a grant application or developed as a result of
grant activities as the primary basis for developing a new rule or revising an
existing rule. This grant program does not change any of the rule-making
requirements of the administrative procedure act.

(7) The department
shall not use information in a grant application or developed as a result of
grant activities to initiate department activity at a grantee's worksite other
than monitoring or evaluation visits intended to review the grant itself. To
the extent a worksite is directly affected by a grant, the worksite must be
treated the same as a worksite having a consultation visit under this chapter.

(8) The department
shall not use information in a grant application or developed as a result of
grant activities to establish the existence of a recognized hazard.

(9) To ensure
accountability, each grant must include methods by which to measure progress
toward completion of the grant and at least one appropriate measurable outcome
related to injury and illness reduction, hazard reduction, or safety and health
awareness that will be the result of the grant award. The evaluation shall
address both positive and negative impacts and costs. The department may
assist grant recipients by providing available data needed to measure
accountability.

(10) No grant
application may be approved that proposes work that cannot be completed during
the current application year or biennium. Grant recipients may apply for
funding for continuation of grant work in subsequent years only if they have
successfully completed the work for which they were previously funded as
determined by the department.

(11) During the biennium
ending June 30, 2003, no grant may be awarded that exceeds two hundred fifty
thousand dollars per fiscal year. The WISHA advisory committee and the safety
and health impact grant review committee may recommend future increases or
decreases to the funding level.

(12) No grant may be
used to fund a grantee's on-going business operations including routine
expenses of a grantee.

(13) No grant recipient
may charge more than ten percent of the total grant award for administrative
expenses or indirect costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The director shall
appoint a safety and health impact grant review committee that will be a
subcommittee of the WISHA advisory committee. The review committee is composed
of nine members: Four members representing employees, each appointed from a
list of at least three names per position, submitted by recognized statewide
organizations of employees; four members representing employers, including at
least one representing small employers, each appointed from a list of at least
three names per position, submitted by recognized statewide organizations of
employers; and one ex officio member, without a vote, who shall represent the
department. The committee chair shall be chosen by the review committee and
shall alternate between employer and employee representatives. The committee
members shall serve three-year renewable terms.

(2) Employer and
employee members of the safety and health impact grant review committee are
entitled to expenses as provided under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3) The safety and
health impact grant review committee with assistance from department staff
shall:

(a) Prepare requests
for proposals;

(b) Receive, review,
and process grant applications;

(c) Identify, by
two-thirds majority vote, grant applications that merit funding and forward
those applications to the director; and

(d) Identify, by
two-thirds majority vote, funded grants that meet criteria for suspension or
revocation and forward those recommendations to the director. The director
shall ensure that the safety and health impact grant review committee receives
appropriate administrative support.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The safety and health
impact grant review committee, in cooperation with the director, shall develop
grant application procedures and approval criteria. The director shall ensure
the proper administrative support to successfully monitor grant recipients for
compliance with grant criteria and all other procedures and requirements of the
grant program. The director in cooperation with the safety and health impact
grant review committee shall implement procedures and criteria for grant
approval, including procedures for suspension or revocation of grants to
recipients failing to comply with grant criteria established under the
authority of this section or other legal requirements.

(2) The director shall
approve only those grant applications and their recommended acceptance
conditions as forwarded by the safety and health impact grant review committee,
unless the director has a compelling and substantive reason to reject an
application, whereupon the director shall provide written explanation for the
denial to the review committee. The safety and health impact grant review
committee shall review any grant applications rejected by the director and may
advise the director to reconsider. The director shall consider the advice, if
given, and shall approve the grant application with any conditions presented by
the safety and health impact grant review committee. The director may reject
that advice only for a compelling and substantive reason. If the director
rejects that advice, the safety and health impact grant review committee may
refer the application to the WISHA advisory committee. The WISHA advisory
committee shall review the application and may advise the director to
reconsider.

(3) The director may
revoke or suspend an issued grant if advised by the safety and health impact
grant review committee that the recipient is not in compliance with grant
criteria or procedures. The director may suspend an issued grant without the
advice of the safety and health impact grant review committee only for a
compelling and substantive reason and the suspension recommendation shall be
presented to the safety and health impact grant review committee for its
consideration.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The department and the
safety and health impact grant review committee will present an annual review
regarding the activities of the safety and health impact grant program to the
WISHA advisory committee and the workers' compensation advisory committee, and
make it available to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature.
Based on a recommendation of the WISHA advisory committee, the workers'
compensation advisory committee shall make a biennial recommendation to the
director concerning an appropriate budget for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The director and
representatives from the WISHA advisory committee shall perform a comprehensive
review of the grant program that shall include, but not be limited to,
measurable outcomes related to injury and illness reduction, hazard reduction,
and safety and health awareness and shall issue a report to the appropriate
legislative committees by December 31, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective July 1, 2008:

(1) Section 1 of this
act;

(2) Section 2 of this
act;

(3) Section 3 of this
act;

(4) Section 4 of this
act; and

(5) Section 5 of this
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act are each added to chapter 49.17 RCW.

---
END ---