BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.17.350 and 1998 c
30 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
established a "public disclosure commission" which shall be composed
of five members who shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the
senate. All appointees shall be persons of the highest integrity and
qualifications. No more than three members shall have an identification with
the same political party.

(2) The term of each
member shall be five years. No member is eligible for appointment to more than
one full term. Any member may be removed by the governor, but only upon
grounds of neglect of duty or misconduct in office.

(3) No person may
serve on the commission who is not a registered voter of the state at the time
of selection.

(4) During his
or her tenure, a member of the commission is prohibited from engaging in any of
the following activities, either within or outside the state of Washington:

(a) ((Holding or
campaigning for elective office;

(b))) Serving as an officer of any political party
or political committee;

(((c))) (b)
Permitting his or her name to be used in support of or in opposition to a
candidate or proposition;

(((d))) (c)
Soliciting or making contributions to a candidate or in support of or in
opposition to any candidate or proposition;

(((e))) (d)
Participating in any way in any election campaign; or

(((f))) (e)
Lobbying, employing, or assisting a lobbyist, except that a member or the staff
of the commission may lobby to the limited extent permitted by RCW 42.17.190 on
matters directly affecting this chapter.

(((4))) (5)
No member of the commission may hold, seek, or campaign for elective or
appointive office while a member of the commission or for a period of two years
after leaving the commission.

(6) A vacancy on
the commission shall be filled within thirty days of the vacancy by the
governor, with the consent of the senate, and the appointee shall serve for the
remaining term of his or her predecessor. A vacancy shall not impair the
powers of the remaining members to exercise all of the powers of the
commission.

(((5))) (7)
Three members of the commission shall constitute a quorum. The commission
shall elect its own chair and adopt its own rules of procedure in the manner
provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

(((6))) (8)
Members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and in addition
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred while engaged in the business
of the commission as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The compensation
provided pursuant to this section shall not be considered salary for purposes
of the provisions of any retirement system created pursuant to the general laws
of this state.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.17.370 and 1995 c
397 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission is
empowered to:

(1) Adopt, promulgate,
amend, and rescind suitable administrative rules to carry out the policies and
purposes of this chapter, which rules shall be adopted under chapter 34.05
RCW. Any rule relating to campaign finance, political advertising, or related
forms that would otherwise take effect after June 30th of a general election
year shall take effect no earlier than the day following the general election
in that year;

(2) Appoint and set,
within the limits established by the committee on agency officials' salaries
under RCW 43.03.028, the compensation of an executive director who shall
perform such duties and have such powers as the commission may prescribe and
delegate to implement and enforce this chapter efficiently and effectively.
The commission shall not delegate its authority to adopt, amend, or rescind
rules nor shall it delegate authority to determine whether an actual violation
of this chapter has occurred or to assess penalties for such violations;

(3) Prepare and publish
such reports and technical studies as in its judgment will tend to promote the
purposes of this chapter, including reports and statistics concerning campaign
financing, lobbying, financial interests of elected officials, and enforcement
of this chapter;

(4) Make from time to
time, on its own motion, audits and field investigations;

(5) Make public the
time and date of any formal hearing set to determine whether a violation has
occurred, the question or questions to be considered, and the results thereof.
In order to prevent the creation of an appearance of bias the commission shall
not, however, make unsolicited disseminations of complaints before scheduling
the formal hearing, without a formal public records request;

(6) Administer oaths
and affirmations, issue subpoenas, and compel attendance, take evidence and
require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memorandums, or
other records relevant or material for the purpose of any investigation
authorized under this chapter, or any other proceeding under this chapter;

(7) Adopt and
promulgate a code of fair campaign practices;

(8) Relieve, by rule,
candidates or political committees of obligations to comply with the provisions
of this chapter relating to election campaigns, if they have not received
contributions nor made expenditures in connection with any election campaign of
more than one thousand dollars;

(9) Adopt rules
prescribing reasonable requirements for keeping accounts of and reporting on a
quarterly basis costs incurred by state agencies, counties, cities, and other
municipalities and political subdivisions in preparing, publishing, and
distributing legislative information. The term "legislative
information," for the purposes of this subsection, means books, pamphlets,
reports, and other materials prepared, published, or distributed at substantial
cost, a substantial purpose of which is to influence the passage or defeat of
any legislation. The state auditor in his or her regular examination of each
agency under chapter 43.09 RCW shall review the rules, accounts, and reports
and make appropriate findings, comments, and recommendations in his or her
examination reports concerning those agencies;

(10) After hearing, by
order approved and ratified by a majority of the membership of the commission,
suspend or modify any of the reporting requirements of this chapter in a
particular case if it finds that literal application of this chapter works a
manifestly unreasonable hardship and if it also finds that the suspension or
modification will not frustrate the purposes of the chapter. The commission
shall find that a manifestly unreasonable hardship exists if reporting the name
of an entity required to be reported under RCW 42.17.241(1)(g)(ii) would be
likely to adversely affect the competitive position of any entity in which the
person filing the report or any member of his or her immediate family holds any
office, directorship, general partnership interest, or an ownership interest of
ten percent or more. Any suspension or modification shall be only to the
extent necessary to substantially relieve the hardship. The commission shall
act to suspend or modify any reporting requirements only if it determines that
facts exist that are clear and convincing proof of the findings required under
this section. Requests for renewals of reporting modifications may be heard in
a brief adjudicative proceeding as set forth in RCW 34.05.482 through 34.05.494
and in accordance with the standards established in this section. No initial
request may be heard in a brief adjudicative proceeding and no request for
renewal may be heard in a brief adjudicative proceeding if the initial request
was granted more than three years previously or if the applicant is holding an
office or position of employment different from the office or position held
when the initial request was granted. The commission shall adopt
administrative rules governing the proceedings. Any citizen has standing to
bring an action in Thurston county superior court to contest the propriety of
any order entered under this section within one year from the date of the entry
of the order; and

(11) Revise, at least
once every five years but no more often than every two years, the monetary
reporting thresholds and reporting code values of this chapter. The revisions
shall be only for the purpose of recognizing economic changes as reflected by
an inflationary index recommended by the office of financial management. The
revisions shall be guided by the change in the index for the period commencing
with the month of December preceding the last revision and concluding with the
month of December preceding the month the revision is adopted. As to each of
the three general categories of this chapter (reports of campaign finance, reports
of lobbyist activity, and reports of the financial affairs of elected and
appointed officials), the revisions shall equally affect all thresholds within
each category. Revisions shall be adopted as rules under chapter 34.05 RCW.
The first revision authorized by this subsection shall reflect economic changes
from the time of the last legislative enactment affecting the respective code
or threshold through December 1985;

(12) Develop and
provide to filers a system for certification of reports required under this
chapter which are transmitted by facsimile or electronically to the
commission. Implementation of the program is contingent on the availability of
funds.

Sec. 3. RCW 42.17.410 and 1982 c
147 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In all
complaints in which the commission has jurisdiction, the commission must issue
charges within one hundred twenty days from the date the complaint was first
received, unless extended as provided in this subsection, or the complaint is
deemed dismissed with prejudice. An extension may be permitted if agreed to by
the complaining party, the accused, and the commission. The commission may
also grant a single sixty-day extension upon a showing of just cause.

(2)
Any legal action brought under the provisions of this chapter must be
commenced within five years after the date when the violation occurred.

---
END ---