BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that revenue for the state general fund has declined and will not
meet anticipated needs during current and future biennia. The legislature also
finds that the cost of the resident and nonresident personal use temporary
fishing license and the resident and nonresident personal use shellfish and
seaweed license are undervalued, and are not properly aligned with neighboring
states and provinces. Therefore, the legislature intends to increase personal
use temporary fishing and personal use shellfish and seaweed licenses fees.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.32.470 and 1998 c
191 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A personal use
saltwater, freshwater, combination, temporary, or family fishing weekend
license is required for all persons fifteen years of age or older to fish for
or possess fish taken for personal use from state waters or offshore waters.

(2) The fees for annual
personal use saltwater, freshwater, or combination licenses are as follows:

(a) A combination
license allows the holder to fish for or possess fish, shellfish, and seaweed
from state waters or offshore waters. The fee for this license is thirty-six
dollars for residents, seventy-two dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars
for youth.

(b) A saltwater license
allows the holder to fish for or possess fish taken from saltwater areas. The
fee for this license is eighteen dollars for residents, thirty-six dollars for
nonresidents, and five dollars for resident seniors.

(c) A freshwater
license allows the holder to fish for, take, or possess food fish or game fish
species in all freshwater areas. The fee for this license is twenty dollars
for residents, forty dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for resident
seniors.

(3) A temporary fishing
license is valid for two consecutive days and allows the holder to fish for or
possess fish taken from state waters or offshore waters. The fee for this
temporary fishing license is ((six)) twelve dollars for both
residents and nonresidents. This license is not valid on game fish species for
an eight-consecutive-day period beginning on the opening day of the lowland
lake fishing season.

(4) A family fishing
weekend license allows for a maximum of six anglers: One resident and five
youth; two residents and four youth; or one resident, one nonresident, and four
youth. This license allows the holders to fish for or possess fish taken from
state waters or offshore waters. The fee for this license is twenty dollars.
This license is only valid during periods as specified by rule of the
department.

(5) The
commission may adopt rules to create and sell combination licenses for all
hunting and fishing activities at or below a fee equal to the total cost of the
individual license contained within any combination.

Sec. 3. RCW 77.32.520 and 2000 c
107 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A personal use
shellfish and seaweed license is required for all persons other than residents
or nonresidents under fifteen years of age to fish for, take, dig for, or
possess seaweed or shellfish for personal use from state waters or offshore
waters including national park beaches.

(2) The fees for annual
personal use shellfish and seaweed licenses are:

(a) For a resident
fifteen years of age or older, seven dollars;

(b) For a nonresident
fifteen years of age or older, ((twenty)) twenty-eight dollars;
and

(c) For a senior, five
dollars.

(3) The license fee for
a two-day personal use shellfish and seaweed license is ((six)) twelve
dollars for residents or nonresidents fifteen years of age or older.

(4) The personal use
shellfish and seaweed license shall be visible on the licensee while harvesting
shellfish or seaweed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The fee increases
proposed in RCW 77.32.470 and 77.32.520 must be implemented in the department
of fish and wildlife's license fee structure for the license year beginning
April 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
March 15, 2002.

---
END ---