BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 13.34.160 and 1997 c
58 s 505 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In an action
brought under this chapter, the court may inquire into the ability of the
parent or parents of the child to pay child support and may enter an order of
child support as set forth in chapter 26.19 RCW. The court may enforce the
same by execution, or in any way in which a court of equity may enforce its
decrees. All child support orders entered pursuant to this chapter shall be in
compliance with the provisions of RCW 26.23.050.

(2) For purposes of
this section, if a dependent child's parent is an unmarried minor parent or
pregnant minor applicant, then the parent or parents of the minor shall also be
deemed a parent or parents of the dependent child. However, liability for
child support under this subsection only exists if the parent or parents of the
unmarried minor parent or pregnant minor applicant are provided the opportunity
for a hearing on their ability to provide support. Any child support order
requiring such a parent or parents to provide support for the minor parent's
child may be effective only until the minor parent reaches eighteen years of
age.

(3) In the absence
of a court order setting support, the department may establish an
administrative order for support upon receipt of a referral pursuant to RCW
13.34.270(7) or 74.13.031(11).

Sec. 2. RCW 13.34.270 and 2000 c
122 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the
department places a child with a developmental disability in out-of-home care
pursuant to RCW 74.13.350, the department shall obtain a judicial determination
within one hundred eighty days of the placement that continued placement is in
the best interests of the child. If the child's out-of-home placement ends
before one hundred eighty days have elapsed, no judicial determination is
required.

(2) To obtain the
judicial determination, the department shall file a petition alleging that
there is located or residing within the county a child who has a developmental
disability and that the child has been placed in out-of-home care pursuant to
RCW 74.13.350. The petition shall request that the court review the child's
placement, make a determination whether continued placement is in the best
interests of the child, and take other necessary action as provided in this
section. The petition shall contain the name, date of birth, and residence of
the child and the names and residences of the child's parent or legal guardian
who has agreed to the child's placement in out-of-home care. Reasonable
attempts shall be made by the department to ascertain and set forth in the
petition the identity, location, and custodial status of any parent who is not
a party to the placement agreement and why that parent cannot assume custody of
the child.

(3) Upon filing of the
petition, the clerk of the court shall schedule the petition for a hearing to
be held no later than fourteen calendar days after the petition has been
filed. The department shall provide notification of the time, date, and
purpose of the hearing to the parent or legal guardian who has agreed to the
child's placement in out-of-home care. The department shall also make
reasonable attempts to notify any parent who is not a party to the placement
agreement, if the parent's identity and location is known. Notification under
this section may be given by the most expedient means, including but not
limited to, mail, personal service, and telephone.

(4) The court shall
appoint a guardian ad litem for the child as provided in RCW 13.34.100, unless
the court for good cause finds the appointment unnecessary.

(5) Permanency planning
hearings shall be held as provided in this section. At the hearing, the court
shall review whether the child's best interests are served by continued
out-of-home placement and determine the future legal status of the child.

(a) For children age
ten and under, a permanency planning hearing shall be held in all cases where
the child has remained in out-of-home care for at least nine months and an
adoption decree or guardianship order under chapter 11.88 RCW has not
previously been entered. The hearing shall take place no later than twelve
months following commencement of the child's current placement episode.

(b) For children over
age ten, a permanency planning hearing shall be held in all cases where the
child has remained in out-of-home care for at least fifteen months and an
adoption decree or guardianship order under chapter 11.88 RCW has not
previously been entered. The hearing shall take place no later than eighteen
months following commencement of the current placement episode.

(c) No later than ten
working days before the permanency planning hearing, the department shall
submit a written permanency plan to the court and shall mail a copy of the plan
to all parties. The plan shall be directed toward securing a safe, stable, and
permanent home for the child as soon as possible. The plan shall identify one
of the following outcomes as the primary goal and may also identify additional
outcomes as alternative goals: Return of the child to the home of the child's
parent or legal guardian; adoption; guardianship; or long-term out-of-home
care, until the child is age eighteen, with a written agreement between the
parties and the child's care provider.

(d) If a goal of
long-term out-of-home care has been achieved before the permanency planning
hearing, the court shall review the child's status to determine whether the
placement and the plan for the child's care remains appropriate. In cases
where the primary permanency planning goal has not been achieved, the court
shall inquire regarding the reasons why the primary goal has not been achieved
and determine what needs to be done to make it possible to achieve the primary
goal.

(e) Following the first
permanency planning hearing, the court shall hold a further permanency planning
hearing in accordance with this section at least once every twelve months until
a permanency planning goal is achieved or the voluntary placement agreement is
terminated.

(6) Any party to the
voluntary placement agreement may terminate the agreement at any time. Upon
termination of the agreement, the child shall be returned to the care of the
child's parent or legal guardian, unless the child has been taken into custody
pursuant to RCW 13.34.050 or 26.44.050, placed in shelter care pursuant to RCW
13.34.060, or placed in foster care pursuant to RCW 13.34.130. The department
shall notify the court upon termination of the voluntary placement agreement
and return of the child to the care of the child's parent or legal guardian.
Whenever a voluntary placement agreement is terminated, an action under this
section shall be dismissed.

(7) When state or
federal funds are expended for the care and maintenance of a developmentally
disabled child, whether placed in care as a result of an action under this
chapter or a voluntary placement agreement, the department shall refer the case
to the division of child support, unless the department finds that there is
good cause not to pursue collection of child support against the parent or
parents of the child.

(8) This section
does not prevent the department from filing a dependency petition if there is
reason to believe that the child is a dependent child as defined in RCW
13.34.030. An action filed under this section shall be dismissed upon the
filing of a dependency petition regarding a child who is the subject of the
action under this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 74.13.031 and 2001 c
192 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
have the duty to provide child welfare services and shall:

(1) Develop,
administer, supervise, and monitor a coordinated and comprehensive plan that
establishes, aids, and strengthens services for the protection and care of
runaway, dependent, or neglected children.

(2) Within available
resources, recruit an adequate number of prospective adoptive and foster homes,
both regular and specialized, i.e. homes for children of ethnic minority,
including Indian homes for Indian children, sibling groups, handicapped and emotionally
disturbed, teens, pregnant and parenting teens, and annually report to the
governor and the legislature concerning the department's success in: (a)
Meeting the need for adoptive and foster home placements; (b) reducing the
foster parent turnover rate; (c) completing home studies for legally free
children; and (d) implementing and operating the passport program required by
RCW 74.13.285. The report shall include a section entitled "Foster Home
Turn-Over, Causes and Recommendations."

(3) Investigate
complaints of any recent act or failure to act on the part of a parent or
caretaker that results in death, serious physical or emotional harm, or sexual
abuse or exploitation, or that presents an imminent risk of serious harm, and
on the basis of the findings of such investigation, offer child welfare
services in relation to the problem to such parents, legal custodians, or
persons serving in loco parentis, and/or bring the situation to the attention
of an appropriate court, or another community agency: PROVIDED, That an
investigation is not required of nonaccidental injuries which are clearly not
the result of a lack of care or supervision by the child's parents, legal
custodians, or persons serving in loco parentis. If the investigation reveals
that a crime against a child may have been committed, the department shall
notify the appropriate law enforcement agency.

(4) Offer, on a
voluntary basis, family reconciliation services to families who are in
conflict.

(5) Monitor out-of-home
placements, on a timely and routine basis, to assure the safety, well-being,
and quality of care being provided is within the scope of the intent of the
legislature as defined in RCW 74.13.010 and 74.15.010, and annually submit a
report measuring the extent to which the department achieved the specified
goals to the governor and the legislature.

(6) Have authority to
accept custody of children from parents and to accept custody of children from
juvenile courts, where authorized to do so under law, to provide child welfare
services including placement for adoption, and to provide for the physical care
of such children and make payment of maintenance costs if needed. Except where
required by Public Law 95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915), no private adoption agency
which receives children for adoption from the department shall discriminate on
the basis of race, creed, or color when considering applications in their
placement for adoption.

(7) Have authority to
provide temporary shelter to children who have run away from home and who are
admitted to crisis residential centers.

(8) Have authority to
purchase care for children; and shall follow in general the policy of using
properly approved private agency services for the actual care and supervision
of such children insofar as they are available, paying for care of such
children as are accepted by the department as eligible for support at
reasonable rates established by the department.

(9) Establish a
children's services advisory committee which shall assist the secretary in the
development of a partnership plan for utilizing resources of the public and
private sectors, and advise on all matters pertaining to child welfare,
licensing of child care agencies, adoption, and services related thereto. At
least one member shall represent the adoption community.

(10) Have authority to
provide continued foster care or group care for individuals from eighteen
through twenty years of age to enable them to complete their high school or
vocational school program.

(11) Refer cases to
the division of child support whenever state or federal funds are expended for
the care and maintenance of a child, including a developmentally disabled
child, whether placed as a result of an action under chapter 13.34 RCW or a
voluntary placement agreement, unless the department finds that there is good
cause not to pursue collection of child support against the parent or parents
of the child.

(12) Have
authority within funds appropriated for foster care services to purchase care
for Indian children who are in the custody of a federally recognized Indian
tribe or tribally licensed child-placing agency pursuant to parental consent,
tribal court order, or state juvenile court order; and the purchase of such
care shall be subject to the same eligibility standards and rates of support
applicable to other children for whom the department purchases care.

Notwithstanding any
other provision of RCW 13.32A.170 through 13.32A.200 and 74.13.032 through
74.13.036, or of this section all services to be provided by the department of
social and health services under subsections (4), (6), and (7) of this section,
subject to the limitations of these subsections, may be provided by any program
offering such services funded pursuant to Titles II and III of the federal
juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of 1974.

(((12))) (13)
Within amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, provide preventive
services to families with children that prevent or shorten the duration of an
out-of-home placement.

(((13)))
(14) Have authority to provide independent living services to youths,
including individuals eighteen through twenty years of age, who are or have
been in foster care.

Sec. 4. RCW 74.13.350 and 1998 c
229 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature that parents are responsible for the care and support of children
with developmental disabilities. The legislature recognizes that, because of
the intense support required to care for a child with developmental
disabilities, the help of an out-of-home placement may be needed. It is the
intent of the legislature that, when the sole reason for the out-of-home
placement is the child's developmental disability, such services be offered by
the department to these children and their families through a voluntary
placement agreement. In these cases, the parents shall retain legal custody of
the child.

As used in this
section, "voluntary placement agreement" means a written agreement
between the department and a child's parent or legal guardian authorizing the
department to place the child in a licensed facility. Under the terms of this
agreement, the parent or legal guardian shall retain legal custody and the
department shall be responsible for the child's placement and care. The
agreement shall at a minimum specify the legal status of the child and the
rights and obligations of the parent or legal guardian, the child, and the
department while the child is in placement. The agreement must be signed by
the child's parent or legal guardian and the department to be in effect, except
that an agreement regarding an Indian child shall not be valid unless executed
in writing before the court and filed with the court as provided in RCW
13.34.245. Any party to a voluntary placement agreement may terminate the
agreement at any time. Upon termination of the agreement, the child shall be
returned to the care of the child's parent or legal guardian unless the child
has been taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.050 or 26.44.050, placed in
shelter care pursuant to RCW 13.34.060, or placed in foster care pursuant to
RCW 13.34.130.

As used in this section,
"out-of-home placement" and "out-of-home care" mean the
placement of a child in a foster family home or group care facility licensed
under chapter 74.15 RCW.

Whenever the department
places a child in out-of-home care under a voluntary placement pursuant to this
section, the department shall have the responsibility for the child's placement
and care. The department shall develop a permanency plan of care for the child
no later than sixty days from the date that the department assumes
responsibility for the child's placement and care. Within the first one
hundred eighty days of the placement, the department shall obtain a judicial
determination pursuant to RCW 13.04.030(1)(j) and 13.34.270 that the placement
is in the best interests of the child. If the child's out-of-home placement
ends before one hundred eighty days have elapsed, no judicial determination
under RCW 13.04.030(1)(b) is required. The permanency planning hearings shall
review whether the child's best interests are served by continued out-of-home
placement and determine the future legal status of the child.

The department shall
provide for periodic administrative reviews as required by federal law. A
review may be called at any time by either the department, the parent, or the
legal guardian.

Nothing in this section
shall prevent the department from filing a dependency petition if there is
reason to believe that the child is a dependent child as defined in RCW
13.34.030.

The department shall
adopt rules providing for the implementation of chapter 386, Laws of 1997 and
the transfer of responsibility for out-of-home placements from the dependency
process under chapter 13.34 RCW to the process under this chapter.

It is the intent of the
legislature that the department undertake voluntary out-of-home placement in
cases where the child's developmental disability is such that the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian is unable to provide the necessary care for the
child, and the parent, guardian, or legal custodian has determined that the child
would benefit from placement outside of the home. If the department does not
accept a voluntary placement agreement signed by the parent, a petition may be
filed and an action pursued under chapter 13.34 RCW. The department shall
inform the parent, guardian, or legal custodian in writing of their right to
civil action under chapter 13.34 RCW.

Nothing in this
section prohibits the department from seeking support from parents of a child
when state or federal funds are expended for the care and maintenance of that
child, including a developmentally disabled child, or when the department
receives an application for services from the physical custodian of the child,
unless the department finds that there is good cause not to pursue collection
of child support against the parent or parents.

Sec. 5. RCW 74.20A.030 and 2000
c 86 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall be subrogated to the right of any dependent child or children or person
having the care, custody, and control of said child or children, if public
assistance money is paid to or for the benefit of the child, or for the care
and maintenance of a child, including a developmentally disabled child,
under a state-funded program, or a program funded under Title IV-A or IV-E of
the federal social security act as amended by the personal responsibility and
work opportunity reconciliation act of 1996, to prosecute or maintain any
support action or execute any administrative remedy existing under the laws of
the state of Washington to obtain reimbursement of moneys expended, based on
the support obligation of the responsible parent established by a child support
order. Distribution of any support moneys shall be made in accordance with RCW
26.23.035.

(2) The department may
initiate, continue, maintain, or execute an action to establish, enforce, and
collect a support obligation, including establishing paternity and performing
related services, under this chapter and chapter 74.20 RCW, or through the attorney
general or prosecuting attorney under chapter 26.09, 26.18, 26.20, 26.21,
26.23, or 26.26 RCW or other appropriate statutes or the common law of this
state, for so long as and under such conditions as the department may establish
by regulation.

(3) Public assistance
moneys shall be exempt from collection action under this chapter except as
provided in RCW 74.20A.270.

(4) ((No
collection action shall be taken against parents of children eligible for
admission to, or children who have been discharged from a residential
habilitation center as defined by RCW 71A.10.020(8). For the period July 1,
1993, through June 30, 1995, a collection action may be taken against parents
of children with developmental disabilities who are placed in community-based
residential care. The amount of support the department may collect from the
parents shall not exceed one-half of the parents' support obligation accrued
while the child was in community-based residential care.)) The child
support obligation shall be calculated pursuant to chapter 26.19 RCW.

---
END ---