BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that the public health interest requires that there be uniform state food
service rules for food service establishments to assure that food will be pure,
safe, and unadulterated and to facilitate effective training of food service
handlers. The legislature also finds that the federal food and drug
administration has recently developed an updated model food code to serve as a
guide to states to provide protection of consumers and consistency among states
with regard to food safety and food service. In addition, the legislature
finds that chapter 246-215 WAC has not been comprehensively reviewed and
updated since 1992.

(2) Effective December
31, 2004, the state board has the sole rule-making authority to adopt food
service rules for food service establishments, and the standards and rules
adopted by the state board shall be exclusive for food service establishments.
The department has the exclusive authority to interpret the rules. Local
health departments shall administer the state food service rules and
interpretations, except as provided for in subsection (3) of this section.

(3) This section does
not prohibit a local board of health from adopting a temporary deviation from
the state food service rules for a limited period of time to respond to an
emergency that threatens the public health or safety of the citizens of its
community. A temporary deviation shall not be in force for more than one
hundred eighty days unless the state board of health grants a further temporary
or permanent extension based on demonstrated need. The state board shall
review the local emergency administrative action within one hundred twenty days
after the action is taken to determine if the state board should adopt a
statewide rule under the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(4) No
later than December 31, 2004, the state board shall adopt updated food service
rules and periodically review and update the rules in consultation with local
boards of health and the regulated community. The state board shall report its
progress to the appropriate standing committees of the senate and house of
representatives by January 31, 2003.

--- END ---