BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature declares
that a person with capacity has the ability to control decisions relating to
his or her own mental health care. The legislature recognizes that a mental
health advance directive can be an essential tool for a person to express his
or her choices before the effects of mental illness deprive the person of the
power to express his or her instructions and preferences for mental health
treatment. The legislature affirms that, pursuant to other provisions of law,
a mental health advance directive created under this chapter is to be respected
by health care providers and mental health professionals, guardians,
attorneys-in-fact, and other surrogate decision makers acting on behalf of the
person who created it.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Adult"
means any person who has attained the age of majority as defined in RCW
26.28.010 or an emancipated minor.

(2) "Agent"
means an attorney-in-fact or agent as provided in chapter 11.94 RCW and shall
include any alternative agent appointed.

(3) "Court" means
a superior court under chapter 2.08 RCW.

(4) "Health care
information" has the meaning in RCW 70.02.010 and includes mental health,
sexually transmitted diseases and human immunodeficiency virus/AIDS, and
alcohol and substance abuse information.

(5) "Health care
provider" means a person licensed under chapter 18.57, 18.57A, 18.71, or
18.71A RCW or RCW 18.79.050.

(6) "Incapacitated
person" or "incapacitated" means a person who is not a person
with capacity.

(7) "Informed
consent" means consent that conforms to the elements of RCW 7.70.060.

(8) "Mental
disorder" has the meaning given in RCW 71.05.020.

(9) "Mental health
advance directive" or "directive" means a written document in
which the person makes a declaration of instructions or preferences or appoints
an agent to make decisions on behalf of the person regarding the person's
mental health treatment and that is consistent with the provisions of this
chapter.

(10) "Mental
health professional" has the meaning given in RCW 71.05.020.

(11) "Person with
capacity" means an adult who is able to give informed consent under RCW
7.70.065.

(12) "Professional
person" has the meaning given in RCW 71.05.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) For the purposes of
this chapter, an adult is presumed to be a person with capacity.

(2) For the purposes of
this chapter, no adult may be declared an incapacitated person except by:

(a) A court order;

(b) One mental health
professional and one health care provider; or

(c) Two health care
providers.

(3) When a court has
found that the person is a person with capacity and there is a subsequent
change in the person's condition, subsequent determinations whether the person
is incapacitated may be made by any of the provisions of subsection (2) of this
section.

(4)(a) A principal,
agent, professional person, or health care provider may seek a determination
whether the principal is incapacitated.

(b) The determination
shall be made within forty-eight hours of the request for a determination. If
no determination has been made within forty-eight hours, the principal shall be
considered to have been a person with capacity at the time in question.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) A person with
capacity may create a mental health advance directive.

(2) A declaration
executed in accordance with this chapter is presumed to be valid. The
inability to honor one or more provisions of a directive does not affect the
validity of the remaining conditions.

(3) A directive may
include any provision relating to mental health treatment or the care of the
person or the person's personal affairs. Without limitation, a directive may
include:

(a) The person's
preferences and instructions for mental health treatment;

(b) Consent to specific
types of mental health treatment;

(c) Refusal to consent
to specific types of mental health treatment;

(d) Consent to
admission to and retention in a facility for mental health treatment;

(e) Descriptions of
situations that may cause the person to experience a mental health crisis;

(f) Suggested
alternative responses that may supplement or be in lieu of direct mental health
treatment, such as treatment approaches from other providers;

(g) Appointment of an
agent to make mental health treatment decisions on the person's behalf,
including authorizing the agent to provide consent on the person's behalf to
voluntary admission to inpatient mental health treatment consistent with
section 8 of this act and to consent to or authorize the uses and disclosures
in (h) and (i) of this subsection;

(h) Consent to release
of the person's health care information used for purposes of treatment,
payment, and operations;

(i) Authorization to
have the person's health care information released to third parties; and

(j) The person's
nomination of a guardian or limited guardian for consideration by the court if
guardianship proceedings are commenced.

(4)(a) A directive may
be combined with or be independent of the power of attorney authorized in
chapter 11.94 RCW or guardianship authorized in chapter 11.88 RCW, so long as
the processes for each are executed in accordance with its own statutes.

(b) Unless provided
otherwise in either document, the directive or power of attorney most recently
created shall be construed to be the person's mental health treatment
preferences and instructions.

(c) Where a directive
executed under this chapter is inconsistent with a directive executed under
chapter 70.122 RCW, the most recently created directive controls as to the
inconsistent provisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) A directive shall:

(a) Be in writing;

(b) Contain language
that clearly indicates that the person intends to create a directive;

(c) Be dated and signed
by the person; and

(d) Be witnessed in
writing by at least two adults, each of whom shall certify that he or she
personally knows the person, was present when the person dated and signed the
directive, and that the person did not appear to be an incapacitated person or
acting under fraud, undue influence, or duress.

(2) A witness may not
be any of the following:

(a) A person designated
to make health care decisions on the person's behalf;

(b) A health care
provider or professional person directly involved with the provision of care to
the person at the time the directive is executed;

(c) An owner, operator,
employee, or relative of an owner or operator of a health care facility or
long-term care facility in which the person is a patient or resident;

(d) A person who is
related by blood, marriage, or adoption to the person or with whom the person
has a dating relationship, as defined in RCW 26.50.010;

(e) A person who is
declared to be an incapacitated person;

(f) A person who would
benefit financially if the person making the directive undergoes mental health
treatment; or

(g) A minor.

(3) A directive may:

(a) Become operative
upon execution or at a later time as designated in the directive;

(b) Be revoked, in
whole or in part, by the person who created it;

(c) Be revoked, in
whole or in part, expressly or to the extent of any inconsistency, by a
subsequent directive;

(d) Expire under its
own terms;

(e) Be superseded or
revoked by a court order, including a criminal sentence. To the extent a
directive is not in conflict with a court order, the directive remains
effective. A declaration shall not be interpreted in a manner that interferes
with incarceration or detention by the department of corrections, a city or
county jail, or the juvenile rehabilitation administration or with supervision
of a person who is subject to involuntary treatment pursuant to chapter 10.77,
70.96A, 71.05, 71.09, or 71.34 RCW.

(4) A directive may
not:

(a) Create an
entitlement to treatment;

(b) Obligate any health
care provider to pay the costs associated with the treatment requested; or

(c) Obligate any health
care provider to be responsible for the nontreatment personal care of the
person or the person's personal affairs; or

(d) Be revoked by an
incapacitated person.

(5) A directive that
would have otherwise expired but is operative because the person is an
incapacitated person remains operative until the person is no longer an
incapacitated person.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) If a directive
authorizes the appointment of an agent, the provisions of chapter 11.94 RCW and
RCW 7.70.065 shall apply unless otherwise stated in this chapter.

(2) An agent must act
in good faith.

(3) An agent who has
accepted the appointment in writing may make decisions on behalf of the
principal only pursuant to the terms of the directive. The decisions must be
consistent with the instructions and preferences the principal has expressed in
the directive, or if not expressed, as otherwise known to the agent. If the
principal's instructions or preferences are not known, the agent shall make the
decision he or she, in good faith, determines the principal would make if
capable to do so.

(4) The agent has the
same right as the person to receive, review, and authorize the release of the
person's health care information when the agent is acting on behalf of the
principal and to the extent required for the agent to carry out his or her
duties. This subsection shall be construed to be consistent with chapters
70.02, 70.24, 70.96A, 71.05, and 71.34 RCW, and with federal law regarding
health care information.

(5) Unless otherwise
provided in the directive and agreed to in writing by the agent, the agent is
not, as a result of acting in the capacity of agent, personally liable for the
cost of treatment provided to the principal.

(6) An agent may not
use or threaten physical force, abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or
abandonment of the principal, as those terms are defined in RCW 74.34.020, to
enforce or carry out the directive.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1)(a) Upon receiving a
directive, a health care provider or professional person treating the person,
or personnel acting under the direction of the health care provider or
professional person, shall make the directive a part of the person's medical
record and shall be deemed to have actual knowledge of the directive's
contents. Whenever possible, the health care provider or professional person
shall inform a person or the person's agent if he or she may be precluded from
honoring all or part of the directive based on the reasons in subsection (2) of
this section.

(b) If no
physician-patient relationship has previously been established, nothing in this
statute requires the establishment of a physician-patient relationship.

(2)(a) A health care
provider or professional person who has been presented with or has obtained a
person's directive and who is treating the person shall act in accordance with
the provisions of the directive to the fullest extent possible unless, in the
determination of the health care provider or professional person:

(i) Compliance with the
provision would violate the accepted standard of care established in RCW
7.70.040;

(ii) The requested
treatment is not available;

(iii) Compliance with
the provision would violate applicable law;

(iv) It is an emergency
situation and compliance would endanger any person's life or health; or

(v) The principal,
without the benefit of the specific treatment measure, is incapable of
participating in any available treatment plan that will give the principal a
realistic opportunity of improving his or her condition.

If the health care
provider or professional person is at any time unable to comply, the health
care provider or professional person shall offer to withdraw from treating the
person unless no other treatment provider is reasonably available. A health
care provider or professional person who withdraws shall promptly notify the
principal and the agent, if any, and shall document the notification in the
principal's medical record.

(b) If the person
consents in the directive to having his or her health care information released
to other providers or third parties, or provides for an agent who authorizes
such disclosure, the professional person's disclosure of health care
information shall not be a violation of chapter 70.02 RCW.

(3) The health care
provider or professional person shall obtain the person's informed consent
regarding all mental health treatment decisions unless the person has waived
the right to informed consent.

(4) Treatment under
chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW shall be provided pursuant to the provisions of
those chapters. A professional person who is treating a person involuntarily
detained or committed under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW shall act in accordance
with the provisions of the person's directive to the fullest extent possible
and as permitted by the applicable involuntary treatment laws, consistent with
accepted standard of care and the availability of treatment.

(5) For purposes of
this section, "accepted standard of care" is the standard established
in RCW 7.70.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) If a principal
consents in his or her directive, or authorizes an agent to consent on the
principal's behalf, to voluntary admission to inpatient mental health
treatment, and at the time of admission the principal refuses treatment, the
principal may only be admitted to inpatient psychiatric treatment if a
physician member of the treating facility's professional staff:

(a) Evaluates the
principal's mental condition, including a review of reasonably available
psychiatric and psychological history, diagnosis, and treatment needs, and
determines, in conjunction with another health care provider or mental health
professional, that the principal is incapacitated;

(b) Obtains the
informed consent of the agent, if any, designated in the directive;

(c) Makes a written
determination that the principal needs an inpatient evaluation or is in need of
inpatient treatment and that the evaluation or treatment cannot be accomplished
in a less restrictive setting; and

(d) Documents in the
principal's medical chart a summary of the physician's findings and
recommendations for treatment.

(2) In the event the
admitting physician is not a psychiatrist, the principal shall receive a
complete psychological assessment by a mental health professional within
twenty-four hours of admission to determine the continued need for inpatient
evaluation or treatment.

(3)(a) A person
authorized in section 3 of this act may seek a determination of the person's
capacity to revoke. If it is determined that the person has the capacity to
revoke, then the person's refusal of voluntary admission shall be a revocation
of that provision of the directive.

(b) If a person who is
determined by two health care providers or one mental health professional and
one health care provider to lack the capacity to revoke the directive, the
person may immediately seek injunctive relief for release from the facility.
The sole issue to be decided is the person's capacity to revoke the directive.

(4) If, after a
seventy-two hour period, the principal has not regained capacity or has
regained capacity but refuses to consent to remain for additional treatment,
the principal must be released during reasonable daylight hours, unless
detained under chapter 70.96A, 71.05, or 71.34 RCW.

(5) Any principal who
is voluntarily admitted to inpatient mental health treatment under this
chapter, or who consents to remain for additional treatment after the initial
seventy-two hour period, shall have all the rights provided to individuals who
are voluntarily admitted to inpatient treatment under chapter 71.05, 71.34, or
72.23 RCW. The continuing need for treatment of a principal who consents to
remain for additional treatment under this chapter shall be reviewed by the
professional staff of the treating facility, and the person's agent if any, at
least as frequently as set forth for voluntary patients under chapter 71.05,
71.34, or 72.23 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A person with capacity
may revoke a directive in whole or in part by written statement at any time.
The notice need not follow any specific form so long as it is written and the
intent of the principal can be discerned. The written statement of revocation
is effective when signed by the person and delivered to the agent, if one is
appointed, and the health care provider or professional person who is
responsible for the delivery of mental health treatment to the person. The
health care provider or professional person shall make the revocation part of
the person's medical record.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) For the purposes of
this section, "provider" means a private or public agency, government
entity, health care provider, professional person, person acting under the
direction of a health care provider or professional person, health care
facility, or long-term care facility.

(2) A provider is not
subject to civil liability or professional conduct sanctions when, in good
faith:

(a) The provider provides
treatment to a principal in the absence of actual knowledge of the existence of
a directive, or provides treatment pursuant to a directive in the absence of
actual knowledge of the revocation of the directive, unless the absence of
actual knowledge resulted from the negligence of the provider;

(b) A health care
provider or mental health professional determines in good faith that the
principal is or is not incapacitated for the purpose of deciding whether to
proceed or not to proceed according to a directive, and acts upon that
determination;

(c) The provider
administers or does not administer mental health treatment according to the
principal's directive in good faith reliance upon the validity of the directive
and the directive is subsequently found to be invalid;

(d) The provider does
not provide treatment according to the directive for one of the reasons
authorized under section 7 of this act; or

(e) The provider
provides treatment according to the principal's directive.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. Any person with good
reason to believe that a directive has been created or revoked under
circumstances amounting to fraud, duress, or undue influence, may petition the
court for appointment of a guardian for the person or to review the actions of
the agent or person alleged to be involved in the improper conduct under RCW
11.94.090 or 74.34.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. The fact that a person
has executed a directive does not constitute an indication of mental disorder
or that the person is not capable of providing informed consent.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A person shall not be
required to execute or to refrain from executing a directive as a criterion for
insurance, as a condition for receiving mental or physical health services, or
as a condition of admission or discharge from a health care facility or
long-term care facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A directive does not
limit any authority otherwise provided in Title 71 or 10 RCW, or any other
applicable state or federal laws to detain a person, take a person into
custody, or to admit, retain, or treat a person in a health care facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. Where a person consents
in a directive, or authorizes his or her agent to consent to electroconvulsive
therapy, the professional person must document, in the person's medical record,
the reasons the professional person elected to use electroconvulsive therapy.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. The directive may, but is
not required to, be in the following form:

"PART I. STATEMENT
OF INTENT TO CREATE A MENTAL HEALTH ADVANCE DIRECTIVE

I,
. . . . . ., being a person with capacity, willfully
and voluntarily execute this mental health advance directive so that my choices
regarding my mental health care will be carried out in circumstances when I am
unable to express my intent regarding my mental health care. If a guardian or
other decision maker is appointed by a court to make mental health decisions
for me, I intend this document to take precedence over all other means of
ascertaining my intent.

The fact that I may have
left blanks in this mental health advance directive should not affect its
validity in any way. I intend that all completed sections be followed. If I
have not expressed a choice, my agent should make the decision that he or she
determines is the decision I would make if I were capable to do so.

I intend this mental health
advance directive to take precedence over any and all durable powers of
attorney for health care documents and/or other mental health advance
directives I have previously executed, to the extent that they are inconsistent
with this document, or unless I expressly state otherwise in this mental health
advance directive.

I understand that I may
revoke this mental health advance directive in whole or in part only if I am a
person with capacity. I understand that I cannot revoke this mental health
advance directive if a court, two health care providers, or one mental health
professional and one health care provider find that I am an incapacitated
person. I understand that, except as otherwise provided in law, revocation
must be in writing.

I understand that nothing
in this mental health advance directive, or in my refusal of treatment to which
I consent in this mental health advance directive, authorizes any agent
designated by this mental health advance directive to use or threaten to use
physical force, abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or abandonment to
enforce or carry out my mental health advance directive.

PART II. STATEMENT OF
INTENT REGARDING WHEN THIS MENTAL HEALTH ADVANCE DIRECTIVE BECOMES OPERATIVE

I intend that this mental
health advance directive become operative (initial only one):

. . . Immediately
upon my signing of this mental health advance directive

. . . When the
following circumstances, symptoms, or behaviors occur:

.................................................................

. . . If I become
incapacitated.

PART III. STATEMENT OF
INTENT REGARDING PREFERENCES OR INSTRUCTIONS ABOUT TREATMENT, FACILITIES, AND
PHYSICIANS

A. Preferences or
Instructions About Physician(s) to Be Involved in My Treatment

I would like the physician
named below to be involved in my treatment decisions: Dr. ...................... Telephone
...............

Dr. ....................... Telephone
...............

I do not wish to be treated
by: .................................

B. Preferences or
Instructions About Other Providers

I am receiving other
treatment or care from providers who I feel have an impact on my mental health
care. I would like the following additional service provider(s) to be
contacted when this mental health advance directive is operative:

Name .............. Profession
........... Telephone ..........

Name .............. Profession
........... Telephone ..........

Name .............. Profession
........... Telephone ..........

C. Preferences or
Instructions About Medications for Psychiatric Treatment (initial all that
apply):

. . . I consent, and
authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent, to the following medications: ..........................................

.................................................................

. . . I
specifically do not consent and I do not authorize my agent (if appointed) to
consent to the administration of the following medications: ................................................................

.................................................................

. . . I am willing to
take the medications excluded above if my only reason for excluding them is the
side effects which include . . . . . . and these side
effects can be eliminated by dosage adjustment or other means.

. . . I am
willing to try any new medication the hospital doctor recommends.

. . . I am
willing to try any new medications my outpatient doctor recommends.

. . . I do not
want to try any new medications.

Medication Allergies

I have allergies to, or
severe side effects from, the following medications: ....................................................

.................................................................

Other Medication Preferences or Instructions

I have the following other
preferences or instructions about medications: .................................................................

.................................................................

.................................................................

D. Preferences or
Instructions About Hospitalization and Alternatives (initial all that apply
and, if desired, rank "1" for first choice, "2" for second
choice, and so on):

. . . In the
event my psychiatric condition is serious enough to require 24-hour care and I
have no physical conditions that require immediate access to emergency medical
care, I prefer to receive this care in programs/facilities designed as
alternatives to psychiatric hospitalizations.

I would also like the
interventions below to be tried before hospitalization is considered:

. . . Calling
someone or having someone call you when needed

. . . Staying
overnight with someone

Name:
. . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Telephone: .............

. . . Having a
mental health service provider come to see you

. . . Going to a
crisis triage center or emergency room

. . . Staying
overnight at a crisis respite (temporary) bed

. . . Seeing a
service provider for help with psychiatric medications

. . . Other,
specify.............................................

Authority to Consent to Inpatient Treatment

I consent, and authorize my
agent (if appointed) to consent, to voluntary admission to inpatient mental
health treatment for a period not to exceed 72 hours (initial one if desired):

. . . If deemed
appropriate by my agent (if appointed) and treating physician

. . . Under the
following circumstances (specify symptoms, behaviors, or circumstances that
indicate the need for hospitalization)

.................................................................

. . . I do not
consent, or authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent to inpatient
treatment.

Hospital Preferences or Instructions

If hospitalization is
required, I prefer the following hospitals:

.................................................................

I do not wish to be
admitted to the following hospitals:

.................................................................

E. Preferences or
Instructions About Pre-Emergency Interventions

I would like the
interventions below to be tried before use of seclusion or restraint is
considered (initial all that apply):

. . . "Talk
me down" one-on-one

. . . More
medication

. . . Time
out/privacy

. . . Show of
authority/force

. . . Shift my
attention to something else

. . . Set firm
limits

. . . Help me to
discuss/vent feelings

. . . Decrease
stimulation

. . . Offer to
have neutral person settle dispute

. . . Other,
specify ............................................

F. Preferences or
Instructions About Seclusion, Restraint, and Emergency Medications

If it is determined that I
am engaging in behavior that requires seclusion, physical restraint, and/or
emergency use of medication, I prefer these interventions in the following
order (rank "1" for first choice, "2" for second choice,
and so on):

. . . Seclusion

. . . Physical
restraints

. . . Seclusion
and physical restraint (combined)

. . . Medication
by injection

. . . Medication
in pill or liquid form

In the event that my
attending physician decides to use medication in response to an emergency
situation after due consideration of my preferences or instructions for
emergency treatments stated above, I expect the choice of medication to reflect
any preferences or instructions I have expressed in Part III C of this form.
The preferences or instructions I express in this section regarding medication
in emergency situations do not constitute consent to use of the medication for
nonemergency treatment.

G. Preferences or
Instructions About Electroconvulsive Therapy (ECT or Shock Therapy)

My wishes regarding
electroconvulsive therapy are (initial one):

. . . I do not
consent, nor authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent, to the
administration of electroconvulsive therapy

. . . I consent,
and authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent, to the administration of
electroconvulsive therapy

. . . I consent,
and authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent, to the administration of
electroconvulsive therapy, but only under the following conditions: .....................................................

H. Additional Instructions
About My Mental Health Care

Other instructions about my
mental health care: .................

.................................................................

In case of emergency,
please contact:

Name: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

Address: .......................................................

.................................................................

Work telephone:
. . . . . . . . . . . .

Home telephone:
. . . . . . . . . . . .

Relationship:
. . . . . . . . . . . . .

Physician:
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

Address: .......................................................

.................................................................

Telephone:
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

The following may help me
to avoid a hospitalization:

.................................................................

I generally react to being
hospitalized as follows:

.................................................................

Staff of the hospital or
crisis unit can help me by doing the following:

.................................................................

PART IV. STATEMENT OF
INTENT TO APPOINT AN AGENT

I authorize an agent to
make mental health treatment decisions on my behalf. The authority granted to
my agent includes the right to consent, refuse consent, or withdraw consent to
any mental health care, treatment, service, or procedure, and to obtain and to
authorize disclosure of health care information, as defined in section 2 of
this act, and other information relevant to such health care, treatment,
service, or procedure consistent with any instructions and/or limitations I
have set forth in this mental health advance directive. I intend that those
decisions should be made in accordance with my expressed wishes as set forth in
this document. If I have not expressed a choice in this document, I authorize
my agent to make the decision that my agent determines is the decision I would
make if I were capable to do so.

A. Designation of an Agent

I hereby appoint the
following person as my agent to make mental health treatment decisions for me
as authorized in this document and request that this person to be notified
immediately when this mental health advance directive becomes operative:

Name: ....................... Relationship:
.................

Address: ........................................................

Day Telephone: .............. Evening
Telephone: ............

Agent's Acceptance

I hereby accept the
designation as the agent for purposes described in this document (agent's
signature) ...............................

B. Designation of
Alternate Agent

If the person named above
is unavailable, unable, or refuses to serve as my agent, or I revoke that
person's authority to serve as my agent, I hereby appoint the following person
as my alternate agent and request that this person be notified immediately when
this mental health advance directive becomes operative:

Name: ....................... Relationship:
.................

Address: ........................................................

Day Telephone: .............. Evening
Telephone: ............

Alternate Agent's
Acceptance

I hereby accept the
designation as the alternate agent for purposes described in this document
(alternate's signature) ..............

C. When My Spouse is My
Agent (initial if desired)

. . . If my
spouse is my agent, I desire that person to remain as my agent even if we
become legally separated or our marriage is dissolved.

D. Limitations on My
Agent's Authority

I do not grant my agent the
authority to consent on my behalf to the following: ......................................................

E. Agent Authorized During
Principal's Incapacity (initial if desired)

. . . This agency
shall not be affected by the disability or incapacity of the principal.

F. Preference as to
Court-Appointed Guardian

In the event a court
decides to appoint a guardian who will make decisions regarding my mental
health treatment, I desire the following person to be appointed:

Name: ....................... Relationship:
.................

Address: ........................................................

Day Telephone: .............. Evening
Telephone: ............

The appointment of a
guardian of my estate or my person or any other decision maker shall not give
the guardian or decision maker the power to revoke, suspend, or terminate this
mental health advance directive or the powers of my agent, except as authorized
by law.

PART V. OTHER DOCUMENTS

(Initial all that apply):

. . . I have
executed the following documents that include the power to make decisions
regarding health care services for myself:

. . . Health care
power of attorney (chapter 11.94 RCW)

. . . Advance
directive or "living will" (chapter 70.122 RCW)

. . . I authorize
my agent appointed under this directive and the agent appointed under the other
documents to serve:

. . . Jointly
with consent of each other as to my mental health treatment

. . . Separately
without each other's consent as to my mental health treatment

In the event a decision
about health care treatment impacts both mental health and physical health
treatment and the agents appointed under my health care power of attorney,
advance directive, and mental health advance directive cannot reach a
consensus, the agent appointed under the following document will control (check
only one):

. . . Health care
power of attorney (chapter 11.94 RCW)

. . . Advance
directive or "living will" (chapter 70.122 RCW)

. . . Mental
health advance directive (chapter 71.-- RCW (sections 1 through 16 of this
act))

. . . I have also
executed a general or financial power of attorney that does not include
the power to make decisions regarding health care services for me.

PART VI. PREFERENCES OR
INSTRUCTIONS ABOUT NOTIFICATION OF OTHERS, CARE OF PERSONAL AFFAIRS, AND
CONSENTS TO RELEASE TREATMENT INFORMATION

I acknowledge that state
and federal law may require that I be notified of my rights to limit disclosure
of health information. I hereby waive any specific type of notification of
such rights and authorize disclosure as set forth in detail herein or as authorized
by my agent.

A. Who Should Be Notified

I desire staff to notify
the following individuals, in addition to my agent (if appointed) immediately
when this mental health advance directive becomes operative:

Name: ....................... Relationship:
.................

Address: ........................................................

Day Telephone: .............. Evening
Telephone: ............

Name: ....................... Relationship:
.................

Address: ........................................................

Day Telephone: .............. Evening
Telephone: ............

Name: ....................... Relationship:
.................

Address: ........................................................

Day Telephone: .............. Evening
Telephone: ............

B. Who May Not be
Permitted to Visit

If I have been admitted to
a mental health treatment facility, the following people may not be permitted
to visit me there:

Name: ....................... Relationship:
.................

Name: ....................... Relationship:
.................

Name: ....................... Relationship:
.................

C. Authorization to
Release Previous Treatment Records

I authorize the release of
health care information, as defined in section 2 of this act, from the
following previous treatment providers upon request by treatment providers
acting under this mental health advance directive:

Provider(s): ....................................................

D. Authorization to
Release Treatment Information

I authorize the release of
relevant health care information, as defined in section 2 of this act, to the
following individuals in addition to my agent and current treatment providers:

Name: ....................... Relationship:
.................

Address: ........................................................

Day Telephone: .............. Evening
Telephone: ............

E. Preferences or
Instructions About Personal Affairs

I have the following
preferences or instructions about my personal affairs (e.g., care of
dependents, pets, household) if I am admitted to a mental health treatment
facility: ......................................

F. Additional Preferences
and Instructions:.....................

.................................................................

PART VII. DURATION OF
MY MENTAL HEALTH ADVANCE DIRECTIVE

(Initial one):

. . . I want this
mental health advance directive to remain valid and in effect for an indefinite
period of time.

. . . I want this
mental health advance directive to automatically expire . . . years
from the date it was created.

PART VIII. SIGNATURE

By signing here, I indicate
that I understand the purpose and effect of this document and that I am giving
my informed consent to the treatments and/or admission to which I have consented
or authorized my agent to consent in this directive. I intend that my consent
in this directive be construed as being consistent with the elements required
under RCW 7.70.060.

.................................................................

Signature Date

The mental health advance
directive above was signed and declared by the "Declarant,"
. . . . . . to be his or her mental health advance
directive, in our presence who, at his or her request, have signed names below
as witness. We declare that, at the time of the creation of this instrument,
the Declarant is personally known to us, and, according to our best knowledge
and belief, was a person with capacity at the time and did not appear to be
acting under duress, undue influence, or fraud. We further declare that none
of us is: (1) A person designated to make medical decisions on the person's
behalf; (2) a health care provider or professional person directly involved
with the provision of care to the person at the time the mental health advance
directive is executed; (3) an owner, operator, employee, or relative of an
owner or operator of a health care facility or long-term care facility in which
the person is a patient or resident; (4) a person who is related by blood,
marriage, or adoption to the person, or with whom the person has a dating relationship
as defined in RCW 26.50.010; (5) an incapacitated person; (6) a person who
would benefit financially if the principal undergoes mental health treatment;
or (7) a minor.

Dated at
. . . . . . . . . . .
(county, state),

this
. . . . . . day of . . . . . . of
. . . ..

Witness 1 Witness
2

........................ .......................

Signature............... Signature

................... .......................

Printed Name....... Printed
Name

................... .......................

................... .......................

Address............ Address

................... .......................

Telephone.......... Telephone

PART IX. RECORD OF
MENTAL HEALTH ADVANCE DIRECTIVE

I have given a copy of this
mental health advance directive to the following persons: ..............................................

PART X. REVOCATION OF
MY MENTAL HEALTH ADVANCE DIRECTIVE

(Initial any that apply):

. . . I am
revoking the following part(s) of this mental health advance directive
(specify):

.................................................................

. . . I am
revoking all of this mental health advance directive.

By signing here, I indicate
that I understand the purpose and effect of my revocation and that no person is
bound by any revoked provision(s).

.................................................................

Signature Date"

Sec. 17. RCW 11.94.010 and 1995 c
297 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a
principal designates another as his or her attorney in fact or agent, by a
power of attorney in writing, and the writing contains the words "This
power of attorney shall not be affected by disability of the principal,"
or "This power of attorney shall become effective upon the disability of
the principal," or similar words showing the intent of the principal that
the authority conferred shall be exercisable notwithstanding the principal's
disability, the authority of the attorney in fact or agent is exercisable on
behalf of the principal as provided notwithstanding later disability or
incapacity of the principal at law or later uncertainty as to whether the
principal is dead or alive. All acts done by the attorney in fact or agent
pursuant to the power during any period of disability or incompetence or
uncertainty as to whether the principal is dead or alive have the same effect
and inure to the benefit of and bind the principal or the principal's guardian
or heirs, devisees, and personal representative as if the principal were alive,
competent, and not disabled. A principal may nominate, by a durable power of
attorney, the guardian or limited guardian of his or her estate or person for
consideration by the court if protective proceedings for the principal's person
or estate are thereafter commenced. The court shall make its appointment in
accordance with the principal's most recent nomination in a durable power of
attorney except for good cause or disqualification. If a guardian thereafter
is appointed for the principal, the attorney in fact or agent, during the
continuance of the appointment, shall account to the guardian rather than the
principal. The guardian has the same power the principal would have had if the
principal were not disabled or incompetent, to revoke, suspend or terminate all
or any part of the power of attorney, mental health advance directive,
or agency.

(2) Persons shall place
reasonable reliance on any determination of disability or incompetence as
provided in the instrument that specifies the time and the circumstances under
which the power of attorney document becomes effective.

(3)(a) A
principal may authorize his or her attorney-in-fact to provide informed consent
for health care decisions on the principal's behalf. If a principal has
created both a power of attorney and a mental health advance directive,
pursuant to chapter 71.-- RCW (sections 1 through 16 of this act), authorizing
an agent to make mental health care decisions on the person's behalf, the
mental health advance directive or power of attorney most recently created
shall be construed to contain the person's mental health treatment preferences
and instructions, unless provided otherwise in either document. An agent
appointed under a mental health advance directive has the same right as the
principal to receive and review the principal's health care information,
including mental health, sexually transmitted diseases and human
immunodeficiency virus/AIDS, and alcohol and substance abuse information. If
the principal so states in the mental health advance directive, an agent may
provide consent on behalf of the principal to voluntary admission to inpatient
mental health treatment for a period not to exceed seventy-two hours.

(b) Unless he or
she is the spouse, or adult child or brother or sister of the principal, none
of the following persons may act as the attorney-in-fact for the principal or
as an agent in a mental health advance directive: Any of the principal's
physicians, the physicians' employees, or the owners, administrators, or
employees of the health care facility or long-term care facility where
the principal resides or receives care. Except as provided in (a) of this
subsection, this authorization is subject to the same limitations as those
that apply to a guardian under RCW 11.92.043(5) (a) through (c).

Sec. 18. RCW 11.88.010 and 1991 c
289 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superior court
of each county shall have power to appoint guardians for the persons and/or
estates of incapacitated persons, and guardians for the estates of nonresidents
of the state who have property in the county needing care and attention.

(a) For purposes of
this chapter, a person may be deemed incapacitated as to person when the
superior court determines the individual has a significant risk of personal
harm based upon a demonstrated inability to adequately provide for nutrition,
health, housing, or physical safety.

(b) For purposes of
this chapter, a person may be deemed incapacitated as to the person's estate
when the superior court determines the individual is at significant risk of
financial harm based upon a demonstrated inability to adequately manage
property or financial affairs.

(c) A determination of
incapacity is a legal not a medical decision, based upon a demonstration of
management insufficiencies over time in the area of person or estate. Age,
eccentricity, poverty, or medical diagnosis alone shall not be sufficient to
justify a finding of incapacity.

(d) A person may also
be determined incapacitated if he or she is under the age of majority as
defined in RCW 26.28.010.

(e) For purposes of
giving informed consent for health care pursuant to RCW 7.70.050 and 7.70.065,
an "incompetent" person is any person who is (i) incompetent by
reason of mental illness, developmental disability, senility, habitual
drunkenness, excessive use of drugs, or other mental incapacity, of either
managing his or her property or caring for himself or herself, or both, or (ii)
incapacitated as defined in (a), (b), or (d) of this subsection.

(f) For purposes of the
terms "incompetent," "disabled," or "not legally
competent," as those terms are used in the Revised Code of Washington to
apply to persons incapacitated under this chapter, those terms shall be
interpreted to mean "incapacitated" persons for purposes of this
chapter.

(2) The superior court
for each county shall have power to appoint limited guardians for the persons
and estates, or either thereof, of incapacitated persons, who by reason of
their incapacity have need for protection and assistance, but who are capable
of managing some of their personal and financial affairs. After considering
all evidence presented as a result of such investigation, the court shall
impose, by order, only such specific limitations and restrictions on an
incapacitated person to be placed under a limited guardianship as the court
finds necessary for such person's protection and assistance. A person shall
not be presumed to be incapacitated nor shall a person lose any legal rights or
suffer any legal disabilities as the result of being placed under a limited
guardianship, except as to those rights and disabilities specifically set forth
in the court order establishing such a limited guardianship. In addition, the
court order shall state the period of time for which it shall be applicable.

(3) Venue for petitions
for guardianship or limited guardianship shall lie in the county wherein the
alleged incapacitated person is domiciled, or if such person resides in a
facility supported in whole or in part by local, state, or federal funding
sources, in either the county where the facility is located, the county of
domicile prior to residence in the supported facility, or the county where a parent
or spouse of the alleged incapacitated person is domiciled.

If the alleged
incapacitated person's residency has changed within one year of the filing of
the petition, any interested person may move for a change of venue for any
proceedings seeking the appointment of a guardian or a limited guardian under
this chapter to the county of the alleged incapacitated person's last place of
residence of one year or more. The motion shall be granted when it appears to
the court that such venue would be in the best interests of the alleged
incapacitated person and would promote more complete consideration of all
relevant matters.

(4) Under RCW 11.94.010
or chapter 71.-- RCW (sections 1 through 16 of this act), a principal
may nominate, by a durable power of attorney or the mental health advance
directive, the guardian or limited guardian of his or her estate or person
for consideration by the court if guardianship proceedings for the principal's
person or estate are thereafter commenced. The court shall make its
appointment in accordance with the principal's most recent nomination in a
durable power of attorney or mental health advance directive except for
good cause or disqualification.

(5) When a court
imposes a full guardianship for an incapacitated person, the person shall be
considered incompetent for purposes of rationally exercising the right to vote
and shall lose the right to vote, unless the court specifically finds that the
person is rationally capable of exercising the franchise. Imposition of a limited
guardianship for an incapacitated person shall not result in the loss of the
right to vote unless the court determines that the person is incompetent for
purposes of rationally exercising the franchise.

Sec. 19. RCW 11.88.030 and 1996 c
249 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person or
entity may petition for the appointment of a qualified person, trust company,
national bank, or nonprofit corporation authorized in RCW 11.88.020 as the
guardian or limited guardian of an incapacitated person. No liability for
filing a petition for guardianship or limited guardianship shall attach to a
petitioner acting in good faith and upon reasonable basis. A petition for
guardianship or limited guardianship shall state:

(a) The name, age,
residence, and post office address of the alleged incapacitated person;

(b) The nature of the
alleged incapacity in accordance with RCW 11.88.010;

(c) The approximate
value and description of property, including any compensation, pension,
insurance, or allowance, to which the alleged incapacitated person may be
entitled;

(d) Whether there is,
in any state, a guardian or limited guardian, or pending guardianship action
for the person or estate of the alleged incapacitated person;

(e) The residence and
post office address of the person whom petitioner asks to be appointed guardian
or limited guardian;

(f) The names and
addresses, and nature of the relationship, so far as known or can be reasonably
ascertained, of the persons most closely related by blood or marriage to the
alleged incapacitated person;

(g) The name and
address of the person or facility having the care and custody of the alleged
incapacitated person;

(h) The reason why the
appointment of a guardian or limited guardian is sought and the interest of the
petitioner in the appointment, and whether the appointment is sought as
guardian or limited guardian of the person, the estate, or both;

(i) A description of
any alternate arrangements previously made by the alleged incapacitated person,
such as trusts, mental health advance directives, or powers of attorney,
including identifying any guardianship nominations contained in a power of
attorney, and why a guardianship is nevertheless necessary;

(j) The nature and
degree of the alleged incapacity and the specific areas of protection and
assistance requested and the limitation of rights requested to be included in
the court's order of appointment;

(k) The requested term
of the limited guardianship to be included in the court's order of appointment;

(l) Whether the
petitioner is proposing a specific individual to act as guardian ad litem and,
if so, the individual's knowledge of or relationship to any of the parties, and
why the individual is proposed.

(2)(a) The attorney
general may petition for the appointment of a guardian or limited guardian in
any case in which there is cause to believe that a guardianship is necessary
and no private party is able and willing to petition.

(b) Prepayment of a
filing fee shall not be required in any guardianship or limited guardianship
brought by the attorney general. Payment of the filing fee shall be ordered
from the estate of the incapacitated person at the hearing on the merits of the
petition, unless in the judgment of the court, such payment would impose a
hardship upon the incapacitated person, in which case the filing shall be
waived.

(3) No filing fee shall
be charged by the court for filing either a petition for guardianship or a
petition for limited guardianship if the petition alleges that the alleged
incapacitated person has total assets of a value of less than three thousand
dollars.

(4)(a) Notice that a
guardianship proceeding has been commenced shall be personally served upon the
alleged incapacitated person and the guardian ad litem along with a copy of the
petition for appointment of a guardian. Such notice shall be served not more
than five court days after the petition has been filed.

(b) Notice under this
subsection shall include a clear and easily readable statement of the legal
rights of the alleged incapacitated person that could be restricted or
transferred to a guardian by a guardianship order as well as the right to
counsel of choice and to a jury trial on the issue of incapacity. Such notice
shall be in substantially the following form and shall be in capital letters,
double-spaced, and in a type size not smaller than ten-point type:

IMPORTANT
NOTICE

PLEASE
READ CAREFULLY

A PETITION TO HAVE A
GUARDIAN APPOINTED FOR YOU HAS BEEN FILED IN THE
. . . . . . COUNTY SUPERIOR COURT BY
. . . . . . IF A GUARDIAN IS APPOINTED, YOU COULD
LOSE ONE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING RIGHTS:

(1) TO MARRY OR
DIVORCE;

(2) TO VOTE OR HOLD AN
ELECTED OFFICE;

(3) TO ENTER INTO A
CONTRACT OR MAKE OR REVOKE A WILL;

(4) TO APPOINT SOMEONE
TO ACT ON YOUR BEHALF;

(5) TO SUE AND BE SUED
OTHER THAN THROUGH A GUARDIAN;

(6) TO POSSESS A
LICENSE TO DRIVE;

(7) TO BUY, SELL, OWN,
MORTGAGE, OR LEASE PROPERTY;

(8) TO CONSENT TO OR
REFUSE MEDICAL TREATMENT;

(9) TO DECIDE WHO SHALL
PROVIDE CARE AND ASSISTANCE;

(10) TO MAKE DECISIONS
REGARDING SOCIAL ASPECTS OF YOUR LIFE.

UNDER THE LAW, YOU HAVE
CERTAIN RIGHTS.

YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO BE
REPRESENTED BY A LAWYER OF YOUR OWN CHOOSING. THE COURT WILL APPOINT A LAWYER
TO REPRESENT YOU IF YOU ARE UNABLE TO PAY OR PAYMENT WOULD RESULT IN A
SUBSTANTIAL HARDSHIP TO YOU.

YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO ASK
FOR A JURY TO DECIDE WHETHER OR NOT YOU NEED A GUARDIAN TO HELP YOU.

YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO BE
PRESENT IN COURT AND TESTIFY WHEN THE HEARING IS HELD TO DECIDE WHETHER OR NOT
YOU NEED A GUARDIAN. IF A GUARDIAN AD LITEM IS APPOINTED, YOU HAVE THE RIGHT
TO REQUEST THE COURT TO REPLACE THAT PERSON.

(5) All petitions filed
under the provisions of this section shall be heard within sixty days unless an
extension of time is requested by a party or the guardian ad litem within such
sixty day period and granted for good cause shown. If an extension is granted,
the court shall set a new hearing date.

Sec. 20. RCW 7.70.065 and 1987 c
162 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Informed consent
for health care for a patient who is not competent, as defined in RCW 11.88.010(1)(((b)))
(e), to consent may be obtained from a person authorized to consent on
behalf of such patient. Persons authorized to provide informed consent to
health care on behalf of a patient who is not competent to consent shall be a
member of one of the following classes of persons in the following order of
priority:

(a) The appointed
guardian of the patient, if any;

(b) The individual, if
any, to whom the patient has given a durable power of attorney that encompasses
the authority to make health care decisions;

(c) The patient's
spouse;

(d) Children of the
patient who are at least eighteen years of age;

(e) Parents of the
patient; and

(f) Adult brothers and
sisters of the patient.

(2) If the physician
seeking informed consent for proposed health care of the patient who is not
competent to consent makes reasonable efforts to locate and secure
authorization from a competent person in the first or succeeding class and
finds no such person available, authorization may be given by any person in the
next class in the order of descending priority. However, no person under this
section may provide informed consent to health care:

(a) If a person of
higher priority under this section has refused to give such authorization; or

(b) If there are two or
more individuals in the same class and the decision is not unanimous among all
available members of that class.

(3) Before any person
authorized to provide informed consent on behalf of a patient not competent to
consent exercises that authority, the person must first determine in good faith
that that patient, if competent, would consent to the proposed health care. If
such a determination cannot be made, the decision to consent to the proposed
health care may be made only after determining that the proposed health care is
in the patient's best interests.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. Nothing in this act
creates a legal right or cause of action. Nothing in this act denies or alters
any existing legal right or cause of action nor may it be relied upon to compel
the establishment of any program or special entitlement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. Sections 1 through 16 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 71 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 23. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---