BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that dental problems impede children's success in school and affect their
overall health by undermining their nutrition, speech development,
concentration, and school attendance. Lack of treatment for dental health
issues is estimated to result nationally in a loss of one million six hundred
thousand school days annually, according to the national center for health statistics.

(2) The legislature
recognizes that, according to a United States Surgeon General Report of
2000: Oral Health in America, dental disease is the most common chronic
infectious disease facing our children today and is five times more common than
asthma in children ages five to seventeen.

(3) The legislature
recognizes that dental disease begins early, with fourteen percent of one and
two year olds studied by the state department of health experiencing dental
decay. Dental decay prevalence increases with age, affecting fifty-four
percent of Washington second graders. Decay in this age group increased
between the 1994 and 2000 surveys.

(4) The legislature
declares that measures such as oral health screenings and access to oral health
disease prevention methods should be readily available to children in a variety
of health care settings, including dental, medical clinic, and family physician
settings. If prevention methods are employed, there will be substantial
savings to the state's overburdened health care system.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

The superintendent of
public instruction, the department of health, and the department of social and
health services are encouraged to collectively and collaboratively develop a
plan that promotes age appropriate oral health screenings and preventive
services at age one and at age five, or before entering a public or private
school setting. The departments may report to the legislature on their
findings and recommendations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.20A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The secretary is
encouraged to design and implement a program of oral health prevention training
sessions for physicians, physician assistants, and advanced registered nurse
practitioners in each county no less than once per year, or at appropriate
intervals in counties with lower numbers of resident physicians. This training
should be modeled to complement existing mandates for oral cavity exams and be
consistent with existing reimbursement for fluoride varnish applications by
primary care providers.

(2) Physicians
participating in the department training program under subsection (1) of this
section shall receive continuing medical education credits for their completion
in the program. Credits shall be awarded on a continuing medical education
level 1 basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

The
department is encouraged to develop methods for promoting the use of oral
health coordinators in local health jurisdictions that currently function
without these resources.

---
END ---