BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.26.010 and 1995 c
278 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Tobacco
products" means cigars, cheroots, stogies, periques, granulated, plug cut,
crimp cut, ready rubbed, and other smoking tobacco, snuff, snuff flour,
cavendish, plug and twist tobacco, fine-cut and other chewing tobaccos, shorts,
refuse scraps, clippings, cuttings and sweepings of tobacco, and other kinds
and forms of tobacco, prepared in such manner as to be suitable for chewing or
smoking in a pipe or otherwise, or both for chewing and smoking, but shall not
include cigarettes as defined in RCW 82.24.010;

(2)
"Manufacturer" means a person who manufactures and sells tobacco
products;

(3)
"Distributor" means (a) any person engaged in the business of selling
tobacco products in this state who brings, or causes to be brought, into this
state from without the state any tobacco products for sale, (b) any person who
makes, manufactures, or fabricates tobacco products in this state for sale in
this state, (c) any person engaged in the business of selling tobacco products
without this state who ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in
this state, to be sold by those retailers, (d) any person engaged in the
business of selling tobacco products in this state who handles for sale any
tobacco products that are within this state but upon which tax has not been
imposed;

(4)
"Subjobber" means any person, other than a manufacturer or distributor,
who buys tobacco products from a distributor and sells them to persons other
than the ultimate consumers;

(5)
"Retailer" means any person engaged in the business of selling
tobacco products to ultimate consumers;

(6) "Sale"
means any transfer, exchange, or barter, in any manner or by any means
whatsoever, for a consideration, and includes and means all sales made by any
person. It includes a gift by a person engaged in the business of selling
tobacco products, for advertising, as a means of evading the provisions of this
chapter, or for any other purposes whatsoever;

(7) "Wholesale
sales price" means the established price for which a manufacturer sells a
tobacco product to a distributor, exclusive of any discount or other reduction;

(8) "Business"
means any trade, occupation, activity, or enterprise engaged in for the purpose
of selling or distributing tobacco products in this state;

(9) "Place of
business" means any place where tobacco products are sold or where tobacco
products are manufactured, stored, or kept for the purpose of sale or
consumption, including any vessel, vehicle, airplane, train, or vending
machine;

(10) "Retail
outlet" means each place of business from which tobacco products are sold
to consumers;

(11)
"Department" means the state department of revenue;

(12)
"Person" means any individual, receiver, administrator, executor,
assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint
venture, club, company, joint stock company, business trust, municipal corporation,
the state and its departments and institutions, political subdivision of the
state of Washington, corporation, limited liability company, association,
society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual,
cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise. The term excludes any person
immune from state taxation, including the United States or its
instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes and enrolled tribal
members, conducting business within Indian country;

(13) "Indian
country" means the same as defined in chapter 82.24 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.26.020 and 1993 c
492 s 309 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and
there shall be collected a tax upon the sale, use, consumption, handling, or
distribution of all tobacco products in this state at the rate of forty-five
percent of the wholesale sales price of such tobacco products.

(2) Taxes under this
section shall be imposed at the time the distributor (a) brings, or causes to be
brought, into this state from without the state tobacco products for sale, (b)
makes, manufactures, or fabricates tobacco products in this state for sale in
this state, ((or)) (c) ships or transports tobacco products to retailers
in this state, to be sold by those retailers, or (d) handles for sale any
tobacco products that are within this state but upon which tax has not been
imposed.

(3) An additional tax
is imposed equal to seven percent multiplied by the tax payable under
subsection (1) of this section.

(4) An additional tax
is imposed equal to ten percent of the wholesale sales price of tobacco
products. The moneys collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the
health services account created under RCW 43.72.900.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.26.025 and 1999 c
309 s 926 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the
taxes imposed under RCW 82.26.020, there is levied and there shall be collected
a tax upon the sale, use, consumption, handling, or distribution of all tobacco
products in this state at the rate of sixteen and three-fourths percent of the
wholesale sales price of such tobacco products. Such tax shall be imposed at
the time the distributor (a) brings, or causes to be brought, into this state
from without the state tobacco products for sale, (b) makes, manufactures, or
fabricates tobacco products in this state for sale in this state, ((or))
(c) ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this state, to be sold
by those retailers, or (d) handles for sale any tobacco products that are
within this state but upon which tax has not been imposed.

(2) The moneys
collected under this section shall be deposited as follows:

(a) For the period
ending July 1, 1999, in the water quality account under RCW 70.146.030;

(b) For the period
beginning July 1, 1999, through June 30, 2001, fifty percent into the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520 and fifty percent
into the salmon recovery account;

(c) For the period
beginning July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2021, into the water quality account
under RCW 70.146.030; and

(d) For the period
beginning July 1, 2021, in the general fund.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.26.030 and 1961 c
15 s 82.26.030 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent and
purpose of this chapter to levy a tax on all tobacco products sold, used,
consumed, handled, or distributed within this state and to collect the tax from
the distributor as defined in RCW 82.26.010. It is the further intent and
purpose of this chapter to impose the tax once, and only once, on all
tobacco products for sale in this state, but nothing in this chapter shall
be construed to exempt any person taxable under any other law or under any
other tax imposed under Title 82 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---