BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purpose of this act
is to enable the legislature to act upon the recommendations of the joint
select committee on the equitable distribution of secure community transition
facilities established in section 225, chapter 12, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.70A.200 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The comprehensive
plan of each county and city that is planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall
include a process for identifying and siting essential public facilities.
Essential public facilities include those facilities that are typically
difficult to site, such as airports, state education facilities and state or
regional transportation facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140, state and local
correctional facilities, solid waste handling facilities, and in-patient
facilities including substance abuse facilities, mental health facilities,
group homes, and secure community transition facilities as defined in RCW
71.09.020.

(2) Each county and
city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not later than ((the deadline
specified in RCW 36.70A.130)) September 1, 2002, establish a
process, or amend its existing process, for identifying and siting essential
public facilities, and adopt or amend its development regulations as necessary
to provide for the siting of secure community transition facilities consistent
with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.

(3) Any city or county
not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not later than ((the deadline
specified in RCW 36.70A.130)) September 1, 2002, establish a process
for siting secure community transition facilities and adopt or amend its
development regulations as necessary to provide for the siting of such
facilities consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these
facilities.

(4) The office of
financial management shall maintain a list of those essential state public
facilities that are required or likely to be built within the next six years.
The office of financial management may at any time add facilities to the list.

(5) No local
comprehensive plan or development regulation may preclude the siting of
essential public facilities.

(6) No person may
bring a cause of action for civil damages based on the good faith actions of
any county or city to provide for the siting of secure community transition
facilities in accordance with this section and with the requirements of chapter
12, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess. For purposes of this subsection,
"person" includes, but is not limited to, any individual, agency as
defined in RCW 42.17.020, corporation, partnership, association, and limited
liability entity.

(7) Counties or
cities siting facilities pursuant to subsection (2) or (3) of this section
shall comply with section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Law enforcement
shall respond to a call regarding a resident of a secure community transition
facility as a high priority call.

(2) No law enforcement
officer responding reasonably and in good faith to a call regarding a resident
of a secure community transition facility shall be held liable nor shall the
city or county employing the officer be held liable, in any cause of action for
civil damages based on the acts of the resident or the actions of the officer
during the response.

Sec. 4. RCW 71.09.020 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(2) "Less
restrictive alternative" means court‑ordered treatment in a setting
less restrictive than total confinement which satisfies the conditions set
forth in RCW 71.09.092.

(3) "Likely to
engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not confined in a secure
facility" means that the person more probably than not will engage in such
acts if released unconditionally from detention on the sexually violent
predator petition. Such likelihood must be evidenced by a recent overt act if
the person is not totally confined at the time the petition is filed under RCW
71.09.030.

(4) "Mental
abnormality" means a congenital or acquired condition affecting the
emotional or volitional capacity which predisposes the person to the commission
of criminal sexual acts in a degree constituting such person a menace to the
health and safety of others.

(5)
"Predatory" means acts directed towards: (a) Strangers; (b)
individuals with whom a relationship has been established or promoted for the
primary purpose of victimization; or (c) persons of casual acquaintance with
whom no substantial personal relationship exists.

(6) "Recent overt
act" means any act or threat that has either caused harm of a sexually
violent nature or creates a reasonable apprehension of such harm in the mind of
an objective person who knows of the history and mental condition of the person
engaging in the act.

(7) "Risk
potential activity" or "risk potential facility" means an
activity or facility that provides a higher incidence of risk to the public
from persons conditionally released from the special commitment center. Risk
potential activities and facilities include: Public and private schools,
school bus stops, licensed day care and licensed preschool facilities, public
parks, publicly dedicated trails, sports fields, playgrounds, recreational and
community centers, churches, synagogues, temples, mosques, ((and))
public libraries, and others identified by the department following the
hearings on a potential site required in RCW 71.09.315. For purposes of this
chapter, "school bus stops" does not include bus stops established
primarily for public transit.

(8)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services or the
secretary's designee.

(9) "Secure
facility" means a residential facility for persons civilly confined under
the provisions of this chapter that includes security measures sufficient to
protect the community. Such facilities include total confinement facilities,
secure community transition facilities, and any residence used as a
court-ordered placement under RCW 71.09.096.

(10) "Secure
community transition facility" means a residential facility for persons
civilly committed and conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative
under this chapter. A secure community transition facility has supervision and
security, and either provides or ensures the provision of sex offender
treatment services. Secure community transition facilities include but are not
limited to the facilities established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250 and any
community‑based facilities established under this chapter and operated by
the secretary or under contract with the secretary.

(11) "Sexually
violent offense" means an act committed on, before, or after July 1, 1990,
that is: (a) An act defined in Title 9A RCW as rape in the first degree, rape
in the second degree by forcible compulsion, rape of a child in the first or
second degree, statutory rape in the first or second degree, indecent liberties
by forcible compulsion, indecent liberties against a child under age fourteen,
incest against a child under age fourteen, or child molestation in the first or
second degree; (b) a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1,
1990, that is comparable to a sexually violent offense as defined in (a) of
this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for a felony offense
that under the laws of this state would be a sexually violent offense as
defined in this subsection; (c) an act of murder in the first or second degree,
assault in the first or second degree, assault of a child in the first or
second degree, kidnapping in the first or second degree, burglary in the first
degree, residential burglary, or unlawful imprisonment, which act, either at
the time of sentencing for the offense or subsequently during civil commitment
proceedings pursuant to this chapter, has been determined beyond a reasonable
doubt to have been sexually motivated, as that term is defined in RCW
9.94A.030; or (d) an act as described in chapter 9A.28 RCW, that is an attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of the felonies
designated in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection.

(12) "Sexually
violent predator" means any person who has been convicted of or charged
with a crime of sexual violence and who suffers from a mental abnormality or
personality disorder which makes the person likely to engage in predatory acts
of sexual violence if not confined in a secure facility.

(13) "Total
confinement facility" means a facility that provides supervision and sex
offender treatment services in a total confinement setting. Total confinement
facilities include the special commitment center and any similar facility
designated as a secure facility by the secretary.

Sec. 5. RCW 71.09.285 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 213 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except with respect
to the secure community transition facility established pursuant to RCW
71.09.250, the secretary shall develop policy guidelines that balance the
average response time of emergency services to the general area of a proposed
secure community transition facility against the proximity of the proposed site
to risk potential activities and facilities in existence at the time the site
is listed for consideration.

(2) In ((balancing
the competing criteria of proximity and response time the policy guidelines
shall endeavor to achieve an average law enforcement response time not greater
than five minutes and in)) no case shall the policy guidelines permit
location of a facility adjacent to, immediately across a street or parking lot
from, or within the line of sight of a risk potential activity or facility in
existence at the time a site is listed for consideration. "Within the
line of sight" means that it is possible to reasonably visually
distinguish and recognize individuals.

(3) The policy
guidelines shall require that great weight be given to sites that are the
farthest removed from any risk potential activity.

(4) The policy
guidelines shall specify how distance from the location is measured and any
variations in the measurement based on the size of the property within which a
proposed facility is to be located.

(5) The policy
guidelines shall establish a method to analyze and compare the criteria for
each site in terms of public safety and security, site characteristics, and
program components. In making a decision regarding a site following the
analysis and comparison, the secretary shall give priority to public safety and
security considerations. The analysis and comparison of the criteria are to be
documented and made available at the public hearings prescribed in RCW
71.09.315.

(6) Policy guidelines
adopted by the secretary under this section shall be considered by counties and
cities when providing for the siting of secure community transition facilities
as required under RCW 36.70A.200.

Sec. 6. RCW 71.09.305 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 217 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless otherwise
ordered by the court:

(a) Residents of a
secure community transition facility shall wear electronic monitoring devices
at all times. To the extent that electronic monitoring devices that employ
global positioning system technology are available and funds for this purpose
are appropriated by the legislature, the department shall use these devices.

(b) At least one staff
member, or other court‑authorized and department‑approved person
must escort each resident when the resident leaves the secure community
transition facility for appointments, employment, or other approved
activities. Escorting persons must supervise the resident closely and maintain
close proximity to the resident. The escort must immediately notify the
department of any serious violation, as defined in RCW 71.09.325, by the resident
and must immediately notify law enforcement of any violation of law by the
resident. The escort may not be a relative of the resident or a person with
whom the resident has, or has had, a dating relationship as defined in RCW
26.50.010.

(2) Staff members of
the special commitment center and any other total confinement facility and any
secure community transition facility must be trained in self-defense and
appropriate crisis responses including incident de-escalation. Prior to
escorting a person outside of a facility, staff members must also have training
in the offense pattern of the offender they are escorting. ((The escort may
not be a relative of the resident.))

(3) Any escort must
carry a cellular telephone or a similar device at all times when escorting a
resident of a secure community transition facility.

(4) The department
shall require training in offender pattern, self-defense, and incident response
for all court-authorized escorts who are not employed by the department or the
department of corrections.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

The minimum
requirements set out in RCW 71.09.285 through 71.09.340 are minimum
requirements to be applied by the department. Nothing in this section is
intended to prevent a city or county from adopting development regulations, as
defined in RCW 36.70A.030, unless the proposed regulation imposes requirements
more restrictive than those specifically addressed in RCW 71.09.285 through
71.09.340. Regulations that impose requirements more restrictive than those
specifically addressed in these sections are void. Nothing in these sections
prevents the department from adding requirements to enhance public safety.

Sec. 8. RCW 71.09.255 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon receiving the
notification required by RCW 71.09.250, counties must promptly notify the
cities within the county of the maximum number of secure community transition
facility beds that may be required and the projected number of beds to be
needed in that county.

(2) The incentive
grants and payments provided under this section are subject to the
following provisions:

(a) Counties and the
cities within the county must notify each other of siting plans to promote the
establishment and equitable distribution of secure community transition
facilities;

(b) Development
regulations, ordinances, plans, laws, and criteria established for siting must
be consistent with statutory requirements and rules applicable to siting and
operating secure community transition facilities;

(c) The minimum size
for any facility is three beds; and

(d) The department must
approve any sites selected.

(3) Any county or city
that makes a commitment to initiate the process to site one or more secure
community transition facilities by ((February 1, 2002)) one hundred
twenty days after the effective date of this act, shall receive a planning
grant as proposed and approved by the department of community, trade, and
economic development.

(4) Any county or city
that has issued all necessary permits by May 1, 2003, for one or more secure
community transition facilities that comply with the requirements of this
section shall receive an incentive grant in the amount of fifty thousand
dollars for each bed sited.

(5) To encourage the
rapid permitting of sites, any county or city that has issued all necessary
permits by January 1, 2003, for one or more secure community transition
facilities that comply with the requirements of this section shall receive a
bonus in the amount of twenty percent of the amount provided under subsection
(4) of this section.

(6) Any county or city
that establishes secure community transition facility beds in excess of the
maximum number that could be required to be sited in that county shall receive
a bonus payment of one hundred thousand dollars for each bed established in
excess of the maximum requirement.

(7) No payment shall be
made under subsection (4), (5), or (6) of this section until all necessary
permits have been issued.

(8) The funds
available to counties and cities under this section are contingent upon funds
being appropriated by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) After October 1,
2002, notwithstanding RCW 36.70A.103 or any other law, this section preempts
and supersedes local plans, development regulations, permitting requirements,
inspection requirements, and all other laws as necessary to enable the
department to site, construct, renovate, occupy, and operate secure community
transition facilities within the borders of the following:

(a) Chelan, Clark,
Cowlitz, Franklin, Grays Harbor, King, Kitsap, Snohomish, Spokane, Thurston,
Whatcom, and Yakima counties, if the department determines that the county has
not met the requirements of RCW 36.70A.200 with respect to secure community
transition facilities; and

(b) Any city located
within a county listed in (a) of this subsection that the department determines
has not met the requirements of RCW 36.70A.200 with respect to secure community
transition facilities.

(2) The department's
determination under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section is final and is
not subject to appeal under chapter 34.05 or 36.70A RCW.

(3) When siting a
facility in a county or city that has been preempted under this section, the
department shall consider the policy guidelines established under RCW 71.09.275
and 71.09.290 and shall hold the hearings required in RCW 71.09.315.

(4) Nothing in this
section prohibits the department from:

(a) Siting a secure
community transition facility in a city or county that has complied with the
requirements of RCW 36.70A.200 with respect to secure community transition
facilities, including a city that is located within a county that has been
preempted. If the department sites a secure community transition facility in
such a city or county, the department shall use the process established by the
city or county for siting such facilities; or

(b) Consulting with a
city or county that has been preempted under this section regarding the siting of
a secure community transition facility.

(5)(a) A preempted city
or county may propose public safety measures specific to any finalist site to
the department. The measures must be consistent with the location of the
facility at that finalist site. The proposal must be made in writing by the
date of:

(i) The second hearing
under RCW 71.09.315(2)(a) when there are three finalist sites; or

(ii) The first hearing
under RCW 71.09.315(2)(b) when there is only one site under consideration.

(b) The department
shall respond to the city or county in writing within fifteen business days of
receiving the proposed measures. The response shall address all proposed
measures.

(c) If the city or
county finds that the department's response is inadequate, the city or county
may notify the department in writing within fifteen business days of the
specific items which it finds inadequate. If the city or county does not
notify the department of a finding that the response is inadequate within
fifteen business days, the department's response shall be final.

(d) If the city or
county notifies the department that it finds the response inadequate and the
department does not revise its response to the satisfaction of the city or
county within seven business days, the city or county may petition the governor
to designate a person with law enforcement expertise to review the response
under RCW 34.05.479.

(e) The governor's
designee shall hear a petition filed under this subsection and shall make a
determination within thirty days of hearing the petition. The governor's
designee shall consider the department's response, and the effectiveness and
cost of the proposed measures, in relation to the purposes of this chapter.
The determination by the governor's designee shall be final and may not be the
basis for any cause of action in civil court.

(f) The city or county
shall bear the cost of the petition to the governor's designee. If the city or
county prevails on all issues, the department shall reimburse the city or
county costs incurred, as provided under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(g) Neither the
department's consideration and response to public safety conditions proposed by
a city or county nor the decision of the governor's designee shall affect the
preemption under this section or the department's authority to site, construct,
renovate, occupy, and operate the secure community transition facility at that
finalist site or at any finalist site.

(6) This section does
not apply to the secure community transition facility established pursuant to
RCW 71.09.250(1).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

A petition brought
pursuant to section 9(5) of this act shall be heard under the provisions of RCW
34.05.479 except that the decision of the Washington state patrol shall be
final and is not subject to judicial review.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

For purposes of RCW
71.09.250 and section 9 of this act, "all other laws" means the state
environmental policy act, the shoreline management act, the hydraulics code,
and all other state laws regulating the protection and use of the water, land,
and air.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

Secure community
transition facilities sited pursuant to the preemption provisions of section 9
of this act and secure facilities sited pursuant to the preemption provisions
of RCW 71.09.250 are not subject to the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

Secure community
transition facilities sited pursuant to the preemption provisions of section 9
of this act and secure facilities sited pursuant to the preemption provisions
of RCW 71.09.250 are not subject to the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 77.55 RCW to read as follows:

Secure community
transition facilities sited pursuant to the preemption provisions of section 9
of this act and secure facilities sited pursuant to the preemption provisions
of RCW 71.09.250 are not subject to the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 15. RCW 36.70A.103 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

State agencies shall
comply with the local comprehensive plans and development regulations and
amendments thereto adopted pursuant to this chapter except as otherwise
provided in RCW 71.09.250 (1) through (3), section 9 of this act, and
72.09.333.

The provisions of
chapter 12, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess. do not affect the state's authority to
site any other essential public facility under RCW 36.70A.200 in conformance
with local comprehensive plans and development regulations adopted pursuant to
chapter 36.70A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) At the request of
the local government of the city or county in which a secure community
transition facility is initially sited after January 1, 2002, the department
shall enter into a long-term contract memorializing the agreements between the
state and the city or county for the operation of the facility. This contract
shall be separate from any contract regarding mitigation due to the facility.
The contract shall include a clause that states:

(a) The contract does
not obligate the state to continue operating any aspect of the civil commitment
program under this chapter;

(b) The operation of
any secure community transition facility is contingent upon sufficient
appropriation by the legislature. If sufficient funds are not appropriated,
the department is not obligated to operate the secure community transition
facility and may close it; and

(c) This contract does
not obligate the city or county to operate a secure community transition
facility.

(2) Any city or county
may, at their option, contract with the department to operate a secure
community transition facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to funds
appropriated by the legislature, the department may enter into negotiation for
a mitigation agreement with:

(a) The county and/or
city in which a secure community transition facility sited after January 1,
2002, is located;

(b) Each community in
which the persons from those facilities will reside or regularly spend time,
pursuant to court orders, for regular work or education, or to receive social
services, or through which the person or persons will regularly be transported
to reach other communities; and

(c) Educational
institutions in the communities identified in (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(2) Mitigation
agreements are limited to the following:

(a) One-time training
for local law enforcement and administrative staff, upon the establishment of a
secure community transition facility.

(i) Training between
local government staff and the department includes training in coordination,
emergency procedures, program and facility information, legal requirements, and
resident profiles.

(ii) Reimbursement for
training under this subsection is limited to:

(A) The salaries or
hourly wages and benefits of those persons who receive training directly from
the department; and

(B) Costs associated
with preparation for, and delivery of, training to the department or its
contracted staff by local government staff or contractors;

(b) Information
coordination:

(i) Information
coordination includes data base infrastructure establishment and programming
for the dissemination of information among law enforcement and the department
related to facility residents.

(ii) Reimbursement for
information coordination is limited to start-up costs;

(c) One-time capital
costs:

(i) One-time capital
costs are off-site costs associated with the need for increased security in
specific locations.

(ii) Reimbursement for
one-time capital costs is limited to actual costs; and

(d) Incident response:

(i) Incident response
costs are law enforcement and criminal justice costs associated with violations
of conditions of release or crimes by residents of the secure community transition
facility.

(ii) Reimbursement for
incident response does not include private causes of action.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---