BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.64.020 and 1989 c
367 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission shall consist of eleven members. One member shall be a judge
selected by and from the court of appeals judges; one member shall be a judge
selected by and from the superior court judges; one member shall be a judge
selected by and from the ((district)) limited jurisdiction court
judges; two members shall be selected by the state bar association and be
admitted to the practice of law in this state; and six members shall be
nonlawyers appointed by the governor. The term of each member of the
commission shall be four years.

--- END ---