BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 3.34.010 and 1998 c
64 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The number
of district judges to be elected in each county shall be: Adams, two; Asotin,
one; Benton, three; Chelan, two; Clallam, two; Clark, five; Columbia, one;
Cowlitz, two; Douglas, one; Ferry, one; Franklin, one; Garfield, one; Grant,
two; Grays Harbor, two; Island, one; Jefferson, one; King, twenty-six; Kitsap,
three; Kittitas, two; Klickitat, two; Lewis, two; Lincoln, one; Mason, one;
Okanogan, two; Pacific, two; Pend Oreille, one; Pierce, eleven; San Juan, one;
Skagit, two; Skamania, one; Snohomish, eight; Spokane, ((nine)) ten;
Stevens, one; Thurston, two; Wahkiakum, one; Walla Walla, two; Whatcom, two;
Whitman, one; Yakima, four. This number may be increased only as provided in
RCW 3.34.020.

--- END ---