BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.10.051 and 2001 c
328 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, and after complying with RCW 39.10.030, the following
public bodies may utilize the design-build procedure of public works
contracting for public works projects authorized under this section: The state
department of general administration; the University of Washington; Washington
State University; every city with a population greater than seventy thousand
and any public authority chartered by such city under RCW 35.21.730 through
35.21.755 and specifically authorized as provided in RCW 39.10.120(4); every
county with a population greater than four hundred fifty thousand; every public
utility district with revenues from energy sales greater than twenty-three
million dollars per year; and every port district with total revenues greater
than fifteen million dollars per year. The authority granted to port districts
in this section is in addition to and does not affect existing contracting
authority under RCW 53.08.120 and 53.08.130. For the purposes of this section,
"design-build procedure" means a contract between a public body and
another party in which the party agrees to both design and build the facility,
portion of the facility, or other item specified in the contract.

(2) Public bodies
authorized under this section may utilize the design-build procedure for public
works projects valued over ((twelve)) ten million dollars where:

(a) The construction
activities or technologies to be used are highly specialized and a design-build
approach is critical in developing the construction methodology or implementing
the proposed technology; or

(b) The project design
is repetitive in nature and is an incidental part of the installation or
construction; or

(c) Regular interaction
with and feedback from facilities users and operators during design is not
critical to an effective facility design.

(3) Public bodies
authorized under this section may also use the design-build procedure for the
following projects that meet the criteria in subsection (2)(b) and (c) of this
section:

(a) The construction or
erection of preengineered metal buildings or prefabricated modular buildings,
regardless of cost; or

(b) The construction of
new student housing projects valued over five million dollars.

(4) Contracts for
design-build services shall be awarded through a competitive process utilizing
public solicitation of proposals for design-build services. The public body
shall publish at least once in a legal newspaper of general circulation
published in or as near as possible to that part of the county in which the
public work will be done, a notice of its request for proposals for
design-build services and the availability and location of the request for
proposal documents. The request for proposal documents shall include:

(a) A detailed
description of the project including programmatic, performance, and technical
requirements and specifications, functional and operational elements, minimum
and maximum net and gross areas of any building, and, at the discretion of the
public body, preliminary engineering and architectural drawings;

(b) The reasons for
using the design-build procedure;

(c) A description of
the qualifications to be required of the proposer including, but not limited
to, submission of the proposer's accident prevention program;

(d) A description of
the process the public body will use to evaluate qualifications and proposals,
including evaluation factors and the relative weight of factors. Evaluation
factors shall include, but not be limited to: Proposal price; ability of
professional personnel; past performance on similar projects; ability to meet
time and budget requirements; ability to provide a performance and payment bond
for the project; recent, current, and projected work loads of the firm;
location; and the concept of the proposal;

(e) The form of the
contract to be awarded;

(f) The amount to be
paid to finalists submitting best and final proposals who are not awarded a
design-build contract; and

(g) Other information
relevant to the project.

(5) The public body
shall establish a committee to evaluate the proposals based on the factors,
weighting, and process identified in the request for proposals. Based on its
evaluation, the public body shall select not fewer than three nor more than
five finalists to submit best and final proposals. The public body may, in its
sole discretion, reject all proposals. Design-build contracts shall be awarded
using the procedures in (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(a) Best and final
proposals shall be evaluated and scored based on the factors, weighting, and
process identified in the initial request for proposals. The public body may
score the proposals using a system that measures the quality and technical
merits of the proposal on a unit price basis. Final proposals may not be
considered if the proposal cost is greater than the maximum allowable
construction cost identified in the initial request for proposals. The public
body shall initiate negotiations with the firm submitting the highest scored
best and final proposal. If the public body is unable to execute a contract
with the firm submitting the highest scored best and final proposal,
negotiations with that firm may be suspended or terminated and the public body
may proceed to negotiate with the next highest scored firm. Public bodies
shall continue in accordance with this procedure until a contract agreement is
reached or the selection process is terminated.

(b) If the public body
determines that all finalists are capable of producing plans and specifications
that adequately meet project requirements, the public body may award the
contract to the firm that submits the responsive best and final proposal with
the lowest price.

(6) The
firm awarded the contract shall provide a performance and payment bond for the
contracted amount. The public body shall provide appropriate honorarium
payments to finalists submitting best and final proposals who are not awarded a
design-build contract. Honorarium payments shall be sufficient to generate
meaningful competition among potential proposers on design-build projects.

Sec. 2. RCW 39.10.061 and 2001 c
328 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, and after complying with RCW 39.10.030, a public body
may utilize the general contractor/construction manager procedure of public
works contracting for public works projects authorized under subsection (2) of
this section. For the purposes of this section, "general
contractor/construction manager" means a firm with which a public body has
selected and negotiated a maximum allowable construction cost to be guaranteed
by the firm, after competitive selection through formal advertisement and
competitive bids, to provide services during the design phase that may include
life-cycle cost design considerations, value engineering, scheduling, cost
estimating, constructability, alternative construction options for cost
savings, and sequencing of work, and to act as the construction manager and
general contractor during the construction phase.

(2) Except those school
districts proposing projects that are considered and approved by the school
district project review board, public bodies authorized under this section may
utilize the general contractor/construction manager procedure for public works
projects valued over ((twelve)) ten million dollars where:

(a) Implementation of
the project involves complex scheduling requirements; or

(b) The project
involves construction at an existing facility which must continue to operate
during construction; or

(c) The involvement of
the general contractor/construction manager during the design stage is critical
to the success of the project.

(3) Public bodies
should select general contractor/construction managers early in the life of
public works projects, and in most situations no later than the completion of
schematic design.

(4) Contracts for the
services of a general contractor/construction manager under this section shall
be awarded through a competitive process requiring the public solicitation of
proposals for general contractor/construction manager services. The public
solicitation of proposals shall include: A description of the project,
including programmatic, performance, and technical requirements and
specifications when available; the reasons for using the general
contractor/construction manager procedure; a description of the qualifications
to be required of the proposer, including submission of the proposer's accident
prevention program; a description of the process the public body will use to
evaluate qualifications and proposals, including evaluation factors and the
relative weight of factors; the form of the contract to be awarded; the
estimated maximum allowable construction cost; and the bid instructions to be
used by the general contractor/construction manager finalists. Evaluation
factors shall include, but not be limited to: Ability of professional personnel,
past performance in negotiated and complex projects, and ability to meet time
and budget requirements; the scope of work the general contractor/construction
manager proposes to self-perform and its ability to perform it; location;
recent, current, and projected work loads of the firm; and the concept of their
proposal. A public body shall establish a committee to evaluate the
proposals. After the committee has selected the most qualified finalists,
these finalists shall submit final proposals, including sealed bids for the
percent fee, which is the percentage amount to be earned by the general
contractor/construction manager as overhead and profit, on the estimated
maximum allowable construction cost and the fixed amount for the detailed
specified general conditions work. The public body shall select the firm
submitting the highest scored final proposal using the evaluation factors and
the relative weight of factors published in the public solicitation of
proposals.

(5) The maximum
allowable construction cost may be negotiated between the public body and the
selected firm after the scope of the project is adequately determined to
establish a guaranteed contract cost for which the general
contractor/construction manager will provide a performance and payment bond.
The guaranteed contract cost includes the fixed amount for the detailed
specified general conditions work, the negotiated maximum allowable
construction cost, the percent fee on the negotiated maximum allowable
construction cost, and sales tax. If the public body is unable to negotiate a
satisfactory maximum allowable construction cost with the firm selected that
the public body determines to be fair, reasonable, and within the available
funds, negotiations with that firm shall be formally terminated and the public
body shall negotiate with the next highest scored firm and continue until an
agreement is reached or the process is terminated. If the maximum allowable
construction cost varies more than fifteen percent from the bid estimated
maximum allowable construction cost due to requested and approved changes in
the scope by the public body, the percent fee shall be renegotiated.

(6) All subcontract
work shall be competitively bid with public bid openings. When critical to the
successful completion of a subcontractor bid package and after publication of
notice of intent to determine bidder eligibility in a legal newspaper of
general circulation published in or as near as possible to that part of the
county in which the public work will be done at least twenty days before
requesting qualifications from interested subcontract bidders, the owner and
general contractor/construction manager may determine subcontractor bidding
eligibility using the following evaluation criteria:

(a) Adequate financial
resources or the ability to secure such resources;

(b) History of
successful completion of a contract of similar type and scope;

(c) Project management
and project supervision personnel with experience on similar projects and the
availability of such personnel for the project;

(d) Current and
projected workload and the impact the project will have on the subcontractor's
current and projected workload;

(e) Ability to
accurately estimate the subcontract bid package scope of work;

(f) Ability to meet
subcontract bid package shop drawing and other coordination procedures;

(g) Eligibility to
receive an award under applicable laws and regulations; and

(h) Ability to meet
subcontract bid package scheduling requirements.

The owner and general
contractor/construction manager shall weigh the evaluation criteria and
determine a minimum acceptable score to be considered an eligible subcontract
bidder.

After publication of
notice of intent to determine bidder eligibility, subcontractors requesting
eligibility shall be provided the evaluation criteria and weighting to be used
by the owner and general contractor/construction manager to determine eligible
subcontract bidders. After the owner and general contractor/construction
manager determine eligible subcontract bidders, subcontractors requesting
eligibility shall be provided the results and scoring of the subcontract bidder
eligibility determination.

Subcontract bid
packages shall be awarded to the responsible bidder submitting the low responsive
bid. The requirements of RCW 39.30.060 apply to each subcontract bid package.
All subcontractors who bid work over three hundred thousand dollars shall post
a bid bond and all subcontractors who are awarded a contract over three hundred
thousand dollars shall provide a performance and payment bond for their
contract amount. All other subcontractors shall provide a performance and
payment bond if required by the general contractor/construction manager. A low
bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from
bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is made for
the project. Except as provided for under subsection (7) of this section,
bidding on subcontract work by the general contractor/construction manager or
its subsidiaries is prohibited. The general contractor/construction manager
may negotiate with the low-responsive bidder in accordance with RCW 39.10.080
or, if unsuccessful in such negotiations, rebid.

(7) The general
contractor/construction manager, or its subsidiaries, may bid on subcontract
work if:

(a) The work within the
subcontract bid package is customarily performed by the general
contractor/construction manager;

(b) The bid opening is
managed by the public body; and

(c) Notification of the
general contractor/construction manager's intention to bid is included in the
public solicitation of bids for the bid package.

In no event may the
value of subcontract work performed by the general contractor/construction
manager exceed thirty percent of the negotiated maximum allowable construction
cost.

(8) A
public body may include an incentive clause in any contract awarded under this
section for savings of either time or cost or both from that originally
negotiated. No incentives granted may exceed five percent of the maximum
allowable construction cost. If the project is completed for less than the
agreed upon maximum allowable construction cost, any savings not otherwise
negotiated as part of an incentive clause shall accrue to the public body. If
the project is completed for more than the agreed upon maximum allowable
construction cost, excepting increases due to any contract change orders
approved by the public body, the additional cost shall be the responsibility of
the general contractor/construction manager.

Sec. 3. RCW 39.10.067 and 2000 c
209 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
projects authorized in RCW ((39.10.060)) 39.10.061, public bodies
may also use the general contractor/construction manager contracting procedure
for the construction of school district capital demonstration projects, subject
to the following conditions:

(1) The project must
receive approval from the school district project review board established under
RCW 39.10.115.

(2) The school district
project review board may not authorize more than ((two)) ten
demonstration projects valued over ((ten)) five million dollars
((and)), of which at least two demonstration projects must be
valued between five and ten million dollars.

(((3) The school
district project review board may not approve more than one demonstration
project under this section for each school district.))

Sec. 4. RCW 39.10.902 and 2001 c
328 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective July 1, 2007:

(1) RCW 39.10.010 and
1994 c 132 s 1;

(2) RCW 39.10.020 and
2001 c 328 s 1, 2000 c 209 s 1, 1997 c 376 s 1, & 1994 c 132 s 2;

(3) RCW 39.10.030 and
1997 c 376 s 2 & 1994 c 132 s 3;

(4) RCW 39.10.040 and
1994 c 132 s 4;

(5) RCW 39.10.051 and
2001 c 328 s 2 and section 1 of this act;

(6) RCW 39.10.061 and
2001 c 328 s 3 and section 2 of this act;

(7) RCW 39.10.065 and
1997 c 376 s 5;

(8) RCW 39.10.067 and
2000 c 209 s 3 and section 3 of this act;

(9) RCW 39.10.070 and
1994 c 132 s 7;

(10) RCW 39.10.080 and
1994 c 132 s 8;

(11) RCW 39.10.090 and
1994 c 132 s 9;

(12) RCW 39.10.100 and
1994 c 132 s 10;

(13) RCW 39.10.115 and
2001 c 328 s 4 & 2000 c 209 s 4;

(14) RCW 39.10.900 and
1994 c 132 s 13; and

(15) RCW 39.10.901 and
1994 c 132 s 14.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---