BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) Effective, integrated
natural science and wildlife education programs provide the foundation for the
development of literate children and adults, setting the stage for lifelong
learning. Furthermore, integrated natural science and wildlife education
offers many opportunities for achieving excellence in our schools.
Well-designed programs, integrated with the state's essential academic learning
requirements, can contribute to the state's educational reform goals.

(2) Washington is
fortunate to have institutions and programs that currently provide quality
natural science and wildlife education and teacher training that is already
integrated with the state's essential academic learning requirements.

(3) Therefore, the
purpose of the natural science and wildlife education partnership trust fund is
to further the development of natural science and wildlife education in the
state by:

(a) Providing state
funds, to the extent that those funds are appropriated, to match moneys or the
value of in-kind services to fund proven natural science and wildlife education
programs that are fully integrated with the state's essential academic learning
requirements; and

(b) Disbursing money
through a competitive grant-making process.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

The Washington natural
science and wildlife education partnership fund is hereby created to provide
natural science and wildlife education opportunities for teachers and students
to help achieve the highest quality of excellence in education through
compliance with the essential academic learning requirements. The fund shall be
in the custody of the state treasurer. Receipts from appropriations must be
deposited into the fund. Expenditures from the fund shall be made by grants by
the superintendent of public instruction. Only the superintendent of public
instruction or the superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from
the fund. The fund is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent
of public instruction shall establish and publish funding criteria for natural
science and wildlife education grants. These criteria shall be based on
compliance with the essential academic learning requirements. The criteria
must also include natural science and wildlife education programs with one or
more of the following features:

(a) Methods that
encourage critical thinking;

(b) Integrated,
interdisciplinary approaches to natural science and wildlife conservation
issues;

(c) Programs that
target underserved, disadvantaged, and multicultural populations;

(d) Programs that reach
out to schools across the state that would otherwise not have access to
specialized natural science or wildlife conservation programs.

(2) Eligible uses of
grants include, but are not limited to:

(a) Continuing
in-service and preservice training for educators with materials specifically
developed to enable educators to teach integrated essential academic learning
requirements in a compelling and effective manner;

(b) Proven, innovative
programs that teach integrated essential academic learning requirements,
especially those that emphasize natural science and wildlife conservation and
meet the needs of varying learning styles; and

(c) Support and
equipment needed for the implementation of the programs in this section.

(3) Funds
may only be disbursed to nonprofit organizations that can provide matching
funds or in-kind services.

---
END ---