BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The classified
civil service and provisions of this chapter include all certified police
officers and other employees of the police department in each city or town
except the chief and an additional number of positions, designated the
unclassified service, in every city or town determined as follows:

Unclassified

Department Personnel Position
Appointments

1 through 10 2

11 through 20 3

21 through 50 4

51 through 100 5

101 through
250 6

251 through
500 8

501 and over 10

(2) The unclassified
position appointments authorized by this section must include selections from the
following positions up to the limit of the number of positions authorized:
Assistant chief, deputy chief, bureau commander, and administrative assistant
or administrative secretary. The initial selection of specific positions to be
exempt shall be made by the appointing authority, who shall notify the civil
service commission of his or her selection. Subsequent changes in the
designation of which positions are to be exempt may be made only with the
concurrence of the appointing authority, and the mayor or the city
administrator, and the civil service commission, and then only after the civil
service commission has heard the issue in open meeting. Should the position or
positions initially selected by the chief to be exempt, as unclassified under
this section, be under the classified civil service at the time of the
selection, and should the position be occupied, the employee occupying the
position has the right to return to the next highest position or a like
position under classified civil service.

(3) The classified
civil service and provisions of this chapter include all full paid employees of
the police department of each city, town, or municipality coming within its
purview, except those individuals appointed as police chief and the executive staff
personnel, including the assistant chief, deputy chief, bureau commander, and
administrative assistant or administrative secretary to a department with six
or more commissioned officers, including the police chief. All appointments to
and promotions in the department shall be made solely on merit, efficiency, and
fitness except as provided in RCW 35.13.360 through 35.13.400, which shall be
ascertained by open competitive examination and impartial investigation. No
person shall be reinstated in or transferred, suspended, or discharged from any
such place, position, or employment contrary to the provisions of this chapter
except those exempted positions.

(4) This
section does not apply to cities and towns in which the police chief is a
mandated civil service position.

--- END ---