BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to revise the crime of extortion in the second degree in response to the
holding in State v. Pauling, 108 Wn. App. 445 (2001), by adding a
requirement that the threat required for conviction of the offense be wrongful.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.56.130 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.130 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of extortion in the second degree if he or she commits extortion by
means of a wrongful threat as defined in RCW 9A.04.110(25) (d) through
(j).

(2) In any prosecution
under this section based on a threat to accuse any person of a crime or cause
criminal charges to be instituted against any person, it is a defense that the
actor reasonably believed the threatened criminal charge to be true and that
his or her sole purpose was to compel or induce the person threatened to
take reasonable action to make good the wrong which was the subject of such
threatened criminal charge.

(3)
Extortion in the second degree is a class C felony.

---
END ---