BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The department of
health shall develop a state plan for prevention and treatment of hepatitis C.
The plan must include strategies for prevention and treatment of hepatitis C in
specific demographic groups that are disproportionately affected by hepatitis
C, including persons infected with HIV, veterans, racial or ethnic minorities
that suffer a higher incidence of hepatitis C, and persons who engage in high
risk behavior, such as intravenous drug use.

(2) In developing the
plan, the department shall seek the input of:

(a) The public,
including members of the public that have hepatitis C;

(b) Each state agency
that provides services to persons with hepatitis C or the functions of which
otherwise involve hepatitis C;

(c) Any advisory body
that addresses issues related to hepatitis C;

(d) Public advocates
concerned with issues related to hepatitis C; and

(e) Providers of
services to persons with hepatitis C.

(3) The department
shall update the state plan developed under this section biennially and shall,
not later than October 1st of each even-numbered year, file the state plan with
the governor, lieutenant governor, and speaker of the house of representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The department shall
develop a program to heighten awareness and enhance knowledge and understanding
of hepatitis C. The department shall:

(a) Conduct a
seroprevalence study to estimate the current and future impact of hepatitis C
on the state;

(b) Conduct health
education, public awareness, and community outreach activities to promote
public awareness and knowledge about the risk factors, the value of early
detection, available screening services, and the options available for the
treatment of hepatitis C;

(c) Provide training to
public health clinic staff regarding the treatment, detection, and methods of
transmission of hepatitis C;

(d) Identify to health
care providers and employers the benefits of disease awareness and prevention;
and

(e) Develop a
prevention program to reduce the risk of transmission of hepatitis C.

(2) In developing the
prevention program required by subsection (1)(e) of this section, the
department may forecast the economic and clinical impacts of hepatitis C and
the impact of hepatitis C on quality of life. The department may develop the
forecasts in conjunction with an academic medical center or a nonprofit
institution with experience using disease management prospective modeling and
simulation techniques.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The department shall
establish voluntary hepatitis C testing programs to be performed at facilities
providing voluntary HIV testing under chapter 70.24 RCW to make confidential
counseling and testing available.

(2) The department may
contract with public and private entities to perform the testing as necessary
according to local circumstances.

(3) The results of a
test conducted by a testing program or department program under this section
may not be used for insurance purposes, to screen or determine suitability for
employment, or to discharge a person from employment.

(4) A person who
intentionally violates subsection (3) of this section is liable to a person
injured by the violation. The injured person may bring a civil action for
damages and may recover for each violation from a person who violates
subsection (3) of this section:

(a) The greater of one
thousand dollars or actual damages; and

(b) Reasonable
attorneys' fees.

(5) In addition to the
remedies provided by subsection (4) of this section, the person may bring an
action to restrain a violation or threatened violation of subsection (3) of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The department shall
develop and offer a training course for persons providing hepatitis C
counseling. The training course must include information relating to the
special needs of persons with positive hepatitis C test results, including the
importance of early intervention and treatment and recognition of psychosocial
needs.

(2) The department
shall maintain a registry of persons who successfully complete the training
course.

(3) The department may
charge a fee for the course to persons other than employees of entities
receiving state or federal funds for hepatitis C counseling and testing
programs through a contract with the department. The department shall set the
fee in an amount necessary to cover the costs of providing the course.

(4) The department may
contract for the training of counselors.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The secretary of health
shall adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 18.79 RCW to read as follows:

As part of the
continuing competency requirements established by the commission under RCW
18.79.010, a license holder shall participate in not less than two hours of
continuing education relating to hepatitis C. This subsection applies only to
a license holder who renews a license on or after June 1, 2003. The commission
shall recognize, prepare, or administer a hepatitis C training component for
use in continuing education for license holders under this section. The
training component must provide information relating to the prevention,
assessment, and treatment of hepatitis C.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 18.205 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The continuing
competency requirements established by the secretary under RCW 18.205.060 must
include six hours of training relating to hepatitis C during each two-year
licensing period.

(2) The secretary shall
recognize, prepare, or administer a training component that satisfies the
requirement of subsection (1) of this section for use in continuing education
for chemical dependency professionals.

(3) The training
component must address hepatitis C in the context of chemical dependency
counseling and must provide information relating to the special needs of persons
with positive test results, including the importance of prevention, early
intervention, and treatment and recognition of psychosocial needs. The
training component must prepare a chemical dependency counselor to provide
appropriate information to educate clients about hepatitis C.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. Sections 1 through 5 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

---
END ---