BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.14.010 and 2000 c
242 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "City"
means either (a) a city or town with a population of at least ((fifty)) thirty
thousand or (b) the largest city or town, if there is no city or town with a
population of at least ((fifty)) thirty thousand, located in a
county planning under the growth management act.

(2) "Governing
authority" means the local legislative authority of a city having
jurisdiction over the property for which an exemption may be applied for under
this chapter.

(3) "Growth
management act" means chapter 36.70A RCW.

(4) "Multiple-unit
housing" means a building having four or more dwelling units not designed
or used as transient accommodations and not including hotels and motels.
Multifamily units may result from new construction or rehabilitated or
conversion of vacant, underutilized, or substandard buildings to multifamily
housing.

(5) "Owner"
means the property owner of record.

(6) "Permanent
residential occupancy" means multiunit housing that provides either rental
or owner occupancy on a nontransient basis. This includes owner-occupied or
rental accommodation that is leased for a period of at least one month. This
excludes hotels and motels that predominately offer rental accommodation on a
daily or weekly basis.

(7)
"Rehabilitation improvements" means modifications to existing
structures, that are vacant for twelve months or longer, that are made to
achieve a condition of substantial compliance with existing building codes or
modification to existing occupied structures which increase the number of
multifamily housing units.

(8) "Residential
targeted area" means an area within an urban center that has been
designated by the governing authority as a residential targeted area in
accordance with this chapter.

(9) "Substantial
compliance" means compliance with local building or housing code
requirements that are typically required for rehabilitation as opposed to new
construction.

(10) "Urban
center" means a compact identifiable district where urban residents may
obtain a variety of products and services. An urban center must contain:

(a) Several existing or
previous, or both, business establishments that may include but are not limited
to shops, offices, banks, restaurants, governmental agencies;

(b) Adequate public
facilities including streets, sidewalks, lighting, transit, domestic water, and
sanitary sewer systems; and

(c) A mixture
of uses and activities that may include housing, recreation, and cultural
activities in association with either commercial or office, or both, use.

--- END ---