BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The administrator,
in concert with other state agencies involved in state purchased health care
and other interested parties designated by the administrator, will begin
implementation of consolidated health care services purchasing and
administration by January 1, 2003.

(2) The authority, in concert
with the other state agencies that purchase health care, must develop and
implement strategies to:

(a) Promote greater
value and cost-effectiveness in health care delivery through consolidated state
purchasing and contracting;

(b) Promote effective
use of health care, patient safety, and health outcomes;

(c) Enhance the state's
ability to manage the rate of health care inflation by leveraging state
purchasing;

(d) Streamline and
consolidate state health care administrative processes to promote greater
efficiencies;

(e) Reduce the
administrative burden for health care providers and patients;

(f) Consolidate state
purchasing and administrative activities;

(g) Improve consumer
education and achieve meaningful cost sharing; and

(h) Improve accountability
of contractors, health plans, and providers through evaluation and monitoring
of quality, service utilization, costs, access, and customer satisfaction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

The administrator has
the following powers and duties:

(1) To implement
consolidated health care services purchasing and administration directly, by
contract, by interagency agreement, by necessary federal waivers, or by any
combination thereof;

(2) To manage in the
most cost-effective manner consolidated health care services purchasing and
administration to include all state agencies that provide state purchased
health care. The administrator will consolidate the various state agency
administrative functions, data, and information systems, and operational
activities related to the purchase and procurement of health care services
necessary to implement this act. This may include, but is not limited to,
purchasing and contracting, information systems for claims processing and
program administration, program eligibility determinations, member benefit and
provider relations services, provider credentialing, contract monitoring, and
provider utilization review activities;

(3) To develop and
implement strategies to encourage school districts, educational service
districts, counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions to
participate in consolidated health care purchasing;

(4) To design and
implement public-private cooperative purchasing strategies that encourage the
participation of private purchasers in consolidated health care services
purchasing and promote greater value in health care delivery and cost
efficiencies for state agencies and private purchasers; and

(5) To adopt all rules
necessary to implement the provisions of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By October 1, 2002,
the administrator must submit to the governor and the health care and fiscal
committees of the legislature an initial report on the feasibility of requiring
all school districts and educational service districts to participate in
consolidated purchasing under this act beginning with the 2003-04 school year.
By December 1, 2002, the administrator must submit to the governor and the
health care and fiscal committees of the legislature a final report on the
study provided under this subsection. All school districts and educational
service districts must cooperate with the authority in conducting the study
required by this subsection.

(2) By January 1, 2003,
the administrator must submit to the governor and the health care and fiscal
committees of the legislature a progress report regarding the implementation of
this act.

(3) By January 1, 2005,
the administrator must submit to the governor and the health care and fiscal
committees of the legislature a report on the impacts of consolidated
purchasing and administration and any recommendations for modifications and
improvements.

(4) This section
expires January 1, 2005.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---