BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the department of ecology conducted a total maximum daily load study for
the Willapa river. Local representatives from Pacific county, the cities of
South Bend and Raymond, and the Port of Willapa believed that the department's
conclusions were incorrect and the resulting regulatory impacts would be
inappropriate and expensive. The legislature further finds that the local
representatives were unable to negotiate with the department of ecology in
regards to the study and hired a consultant to review the study. The
consultant supported the view of the local representatives and the department
of ecology agreed to problems with their study.

The legislature finds
that the costs of hiring a consultant to review disputed studies of the
department of ecology depletes the money available to necessary services for
local governments and should be reimbursed by the department.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.21A.130 and 1987
c 505 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition
to any other powers granted the director, the director may undertake studies
dealing with all aspects of environmental problems involving land, water, or
air: PROVIDED, That in the absence of specific legislative authority, such
studies shall be limited to investigations of particular problems, and shall
not be implemented by positive action.

(2)
Local governments that are affected by the studies under this section must be
allowed to discuss the findings with the director and, if necessary, dispute
the findings. If the department does not respond to the affected parties'
concerns, the parties may hire a consultant to review the studies. If the
consultant finds the studies to be flawed or conducted in an unprofessional
manner, the local government may bring an action in a court of competent
jurisdiction to have the study disregarded and costs awarded to the local
government. Costs under this subsection include consultant fees and court
costs.

---
END ---