BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 51.32 RCW to read as follows:

An injured worker is
entitled to time-loss payments, if any are authorized by the department, in an
amount fifteen percent larger than would otherwise be allowed if:

(1) The injured worker
claims and can show to the director's satisfaction that the injury suffered is
the result of the employer's failure to follow a safety rule issued or enforced
under Title 49 RCW; and

(2) The
director finds that the employer has engaged in a consistent pattern or
practice of serious, willful, or nonabated safety violations.

--- END ---