BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.27.015 and 1996 c
157 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "City"
means a city or town;

(2) "Multifamily
residential building" means common wall residential buildings that ((consist
of four or fewer units, that do not exceed two)) are less than three
stories in height, as defined by the International Building Code, that
are less than ((five)) ten thousand square feet in area and
consist of ten units or less, and ((that)) have a one-hour
fire-resistive occupancy separation between units; and

(3) "Temporary
growing structure" means a structure that has the sides and roof covered
with polyethylene, polyvinyl, or similar flexible synthetic material and is
used to provide plants with either frost protection or increased heat
retention.

Sec. 2. RCW 19.27.031 and 1995 c
343 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((Except as
otherwise provided in this chapter,)) There shall be in effect in
all counties and cities the state building code which shall consist of the
following codes which are hereby adopted by reference:

(1) ((Uniform)) The
International Building Code and ((Uniform Building Code Standards)) the
International Residential Code, published by the International ((Conference
of Building Officials)) Code Council, Inc.;

(2) ((Uniform)) The
International Mechanical Code and International Fuel Gas Code, ((including
Chapter 13, Fuel Gas Piping, Appendix B,)) published by the International
((Conference of Building Officials)) Code Council, Inc.;

(3) The ((Uniform))
International Fire Code ((and Uniform Fire Code Standards)),
published by the International ((Fire Code Institute)) Code Council,
Inc.: PROVIDED, That, notwithstanding any wording in this code,
participants in religious ceremonies shall not be precluded from carrying
hand-held candles;

(4) Except as provided
in RCW 19.27.170, the Uniform Plumbing Code and Uniform Plumbing Code
Standards, published by the International Association of Plumbing and
Mechanical Officials: PROVIDED, That chapters 11 and 12 of such code are not
adopted; and

(5) The rules ((and
regulations)) adopted by the council establishing standards for making
buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by the physically handicapped
or elderly persons as provided in RCW 70.92.100 through 70.92.160.

In case of conflict
among the codes enumerated in subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this
section, the first named code shall govern over those following.

The codes and the
objectives enumerated in RCW 19.27.020 and this section affecting single-family
and multifamily residences shall not be increased by any state, county, or city
amendments without adoption by the International Code Council, Inc.

The codes enumerated in
this section shall be adopted by the council as provided in RCW 19.27.074.

The
council may issue opinions relating to the codes at the request of a local
official charged with the duty to enforce the enumerated codes.

Sec. 3. RCW 19.27.040 and 1990 c
2 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The governing body of
each county or city is authorized to amend the state building code as it
applies within the jurisdiction of the county or city. The ((minimum))
performance standards of the codes and the objectives enumerated in RCW
19.27.020 affecting single-family and multifamily residences shall not
be ((diminished)) increased by any county or city amendments without
adoption by the International Code Council, Inc.

Nothing in this chapter
shall authorize any modifications of the requirements of chapter 70.92 RCW.

Sec. 4. RCW 19.27.060 and 1989 c
266 s 2 and 1989 c 246 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The governing
bodies of counties and cities may amend the codes enumerated in RCW 19.27.031
as ((amended and)) adopted by the state building code council as they
apply within their respective jurisdictions, ((but the amendments shall not
result in a code that is less than the minimum performance standards and
objectives contained in the state building code.)) subject to the
following:

(a) No amendment increasing
performance and prescriptive codes and standards to a code enumerated in
RCW 19.27.031 as amended and adopted by the state building code council that
affects single-family or multifamily residential buildings shall be
effective unless the amendment is ((approved)) adopted by the ((building))
International Code Council, Inc. under RCW
19.27.074(1)(b).

(b) ((Any county or
city amendment to a code enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 which is approved under
RCW 19.27.074(1)(b) shall continue to be effective after any action is taken
under RCW 19.27.074(1)(a) without necessity of reapproval under RCW
19.27.074(1)(b) unless the amendment is declared null and void by the council
at the time any action is taken under RCW 19.27.074(1)(a) because such action
in any way altered the impact of the amendment.)) After the effective
date of this act, all local amendments of a county or city and all state
amendments that increase the performance and prescriptive codes and standards
for single-family or multifamily residential buildings beyond those contained
in the state building code shall be adopted by the International Code Council,
Inc. If the local amendment or state amendment affecting single-family and
multifamily residences is not adopted by the International Code Council, Inc.
the proposed amendment is null and void as against public policy.

(2) Except as permitted
or provided otherwise under this section, the state building code shall be
applicable to all buildings and structures including those owned by the state
or by any governmental subdivision or unit of local government.

(3) The governing body
of each county or city may limit the application of any portion of the state
building code to exclude specified classes or types of buildings or structures
according to use other than single-family or multifamily residential
buildings: PROVIDED, That in no event shall fruits or vegetables of the tree
or vine stored in buildings or warehouses constitute combustible stock for the
purposes of application of the uniform fire code.

(4) The provisions of
this chapter shall not apply to any building four or more stories high ((with
a B occupancy as defined by the uniform building code, 1982 edition,)) and
with a city fire insurance rating of 1, 2, or 3 as defined by a recognized fire
rating bureau or organization.

(5) No provision of the
uniform fire code concerning roadways shall be part of the state building
code: PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not limit the authority of a county
or city to adopt street, road, or access standards.

(6) The provisions of
the state building code may be preempted by any city or county to the extent
that the code provisions relating to the installation or use of sprinklers in
jail cells conflict with the secure and humane operation of jails.

(7)(a) Effective one
year after July 23, 1989, the governing bodies of counties and cities may adopt
an ordinance or resolution to exempt from permit requirements certain
construction or alteration of either group R, division 3, or group M, division
1 occupancies, or both, as defined in the uniform building code, 1988 edition,
for which the total cost of fair market value of the construction or alteration
does not exceed fifteen hundred dollars. The permit exemption shall not
otherwise exempt the construction or alteration from the substantive standards
of the codes enumerated in RCW 19.27.031, as amended and maintained by the
state building code council under RCW 19.27.070.

(b) Prior to July 23,
1989, the state building code council shall adopt by rule, guidelines exempting
from permit requirements certain construction and alteration activities under
(a) of this subsection.

Sec. 5. RCW 19.27.074 and 1989 c
266 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state building
code council shall:

(a) Adopt and maintain
the codes to which reference is made in RCW 19.27.031 in a status which is
consistent with the state's interest as set forth in RCW 19.27.020. In
maintaining these codes, the council shall regularly review updated versions of
the codes referred to in RCW 19.27.031 and other pertinent information and
shall amend the codes ((as deemed appropriate by the council)) consistent
with the provisions of RCW 19.27.060;

(b) ((Approve or
deny all county or city amendments to any code referred to in RCW 19.27.031 to
the degree the amendments apply to single family or multifamily residential
buildings;

(c))) As required by the legislature, develop and
adopt any codes relating to buildings; and

(((d))) (c)
Propose a budget for the operation of the state building code council to be
submitted to the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 43.88.090.

(2) The state building
code council may:

(a) Appoint technical
advisory committees which may include members of the council;

(b) Employ permanent
and temporary staff and contract for services; and

(c) Conduct research
into matters relating to any code or codes referred to in RCW 19.27.031 or any
related matter.

All meetings of the
state building code council shall be open to the public under the open public
meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW. All actions of the state building code council
which adopt or amend any code of statewide applicability shall be pursuant to
the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

All council decisions
relating to the codes enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 shall require approval by at
least a majority of the members of the council.

All
decisions to adopt or amend codes of statewide application shall be made prior
to December 1 of any year and shall not take effect before the end of the
regular legislative session in the next year.

---
END ---