BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that hydraulic project approvals required under chapter 77.55 RCW are currently
processed by the department of fish and wildlife at no cost to the applicant.
The work necessary to process these applications ranges from a simple review to
an extensive negotiated mitigation, and may result in an administrative appeal
if a hydraulic project approvals application is denied or conditioned.

The legislature finds
that the department of fish and wildlife should be authorized to charge a fee
for processing and issuing decisions on hydraulic project approvals
applications in order to defray the cost incurred by the department. The fee
system will be based on the scale and complexity of the proposed project or
activity, and whether the application is an original or a time extension,
renewal, or alteration. Fish habitat enhancement projects conducted under RCW
77.55.290 are exempt.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 77.55 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must
charge a fee for processing and issuing decisions on hydraulic project
approvals applications. The fee must be based on the scale and complexity of
the project. By July 31, 2002, the commission, in collaboration with
interested and affected parties, must adopt rules that set forth the fee
criteria and amount for these various categories of approvals. The criteria
and amounts must be based on a workload analysis conducted by the department as
part of the rule development process. The fee criteria may include the capital
cost of the project.

(2) Habitat enhancement
projects conducted pursuant to RCW 77.55.290 are exempted from fees.

(3) Revenue generated
by these fees must be dedicated to fund hydraulic project approvals processing
and issuing decisions conducted by the department.

(4) A fee established
under this section is exempt from the fee restriction provisions found under
RCW 43.135.055.

(5) Fees charged under
this section for processing and issuing decisions on hydraulic project
approvals applications must be deposited in the general fund.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.135.055 and 2001
c 314 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No fee may increase
in any fiscal year by a percentage in excess of the fiscal growth factor for
that fiscal year without prior legislative approval.

(2) This section does
not apply to an assessment made by an agricultural commodity commission or
board created by state statute or created under a marketing agreement or order
under chapter 15.65 or 15.66 RCW, or to the forest products commission, if the
assessment is approved by referendum in accordance with the provisions of the
statutes creating the commission or board or chapter 15.65 or 15.66 RCW for
approving such assessments.

(3) This section
does not apply to fees charged by the department of fish and wildlife to
process hydraulic project approvals applications under section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---