BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

I. CREATION OF REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION PLANNING ORGANIZATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. FINDINGS. The legislature finds
that:

(1) The capacity of
many of Washington state's transportation facilities have failed to keep up
with the state's growth, particularly in major urban regions;

(2) The state cannot by
itself fund, in a timely way, many of the major capacity and other improvements
required on highways of statewide significance and for other regional
transportation projects in the state's largest urbanized areas;

(3) Providing a
transportation system that maintains efficient mobility for persons and freight
requires a partnership between the state, local, and regional governments and
the private sector;

(4) Timely construction
and development of significant transportation improvement projects can best be
achieved through enhanced funding options for governments at the city, county,
and regional levels. The legislature intends to use existing governments,
existing tax authority with enhancements, and existing authority for interlocal
cooperation among governments to address critical local, regional, and
statewide roadway and multimodal needs; and

(5) Voters must be
assured that locally generated moneys to address transportation projects will
remain within the taxing jurisdiction and that the tax revenues will be used to
address an identified list of projects and activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Lead
agency" means a public agency designated by the county to plan, design,
and build a project.

(2)
"Transportation improvement projects" or "projects" means
projects contained in the transportation plan of the state or a regional
transportation planning organization. Projects may include new or existing
highways of statewide significance or local principal arterials of regional
significance, rail facilities, public transportation investments, ferry system
capital improvements, and transportation demand management programs.

(3) "Regional
transportation investment plan" or "plan" means a plan to
develop, construct, and finance a transportation project or projects.

(4) "Regional
transportation planning organization" means that organization as defined
in chapter 47.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
103. RTPO PLANNING DUTIES.
(1) A county or counties may request that a regional transportation planning
organization of which they are a member develop a regional transportation investment
plan. The organization must adopt the plan within ninety days of the county
request.

(2) In developing the
plan the organization:

(a) Should consider
regional transportation equity and land use planning;

(b) May coordinate its
activities with the department of transportation, which shall provide services,
data, and personnel to assist in this planning as desired by the organization;

(c) Shall coordinate
with local government entities within the boundaries of the requesting county
that engage in transportation planning;

(d) Shall develop
accurate cost forecasts for each project included in the plan with assistance
from the department and the lead agency. This project costing methodology must
include but not be limited to:

(i) Integration with a
range of revenue forecasts;

(ii) Estimated project
costs in constant dollars and year of expenditure dollars;

(iii) A range of
project costs reflected by the level of project design;

(iv) Project
contingencies;

(v) Identification of
mitigation costs; and

(vi) Project and plan
cash flow and bond analysis;

(e) Shall conduct
public meetings that are needed to assure active public participation in the
development of the plan.

(3) The plan adopted by
the organization must include provisions:

(a) Providing for the
selection, development, construction, and financing of transportation
improvement projects;

(b) Providing for
improvements in mobility based on addressing transportation improvement
projects;

(c) Recommending the
appropriate mix of transportation investment choices to address the mobility
needs of the county. Unless otherwise specifically required by law, there is
no state fund matching requirement for a project under this chapter;

(d) Providing that the
maximum amount possible of the funds raised will be used to fund projects in
the plan. Allowable costs include environmental improvements and mitigation.
The plan must minimize administrative costs; and

(e) Recommending
sources of revenue authorized by section 106 of this act and a financing plan
to fund transportation projects included in the plan.

(4) Once adopted, the
plan must be forwarded to the county legislative authority or authorities for
consideration and possible revision to initiate the election process of section
104 of this act. Before a county initiates the election process, the county
shall provide notice of the plan to each city and town within the district, the
governor, the chairs of the transportation committees of the legislature, the
secretary of transportation, and each legislator whose legislative district is
partially or wholly within the boundaries of the county.

(5) If the plan fails
under section 104 of this act the regional transportation planning organization
may redefine the selected projects and the project and financing plan. The
county or counties may approve the new plan and certify a ballot measure, and may
then submit the revised proposition to the voters at the next election or a
special election.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
104. SUBMISSION OF PLAN TO THE
VOTERS. (1) Within thirty days of receipt of a transportation investment plan
under section 103 of this act, cities and towns within the county may act to
disapprove the plan. The plan is disapproved if:

(a) The legislative
authority of fifty percent or more of the cities and towns within the county
vote to reject the plan; and

(b) The cities or towns
voting to reject represent a minimum of fifty percent of the population of the
cities and towns within the county.

(2) If the plan is not
disapproved under subsection (1) of this section, a county legislative
authority shall:

(a) Draft a ballot
title;

(b) Give notice as
required by law for ballot measures; and

(c) Perform other
duties as required to put the plan before the voters of the county for their
approval or rejection as a single ballot proposition that approves the plan.

(3) The electorate will
be the voters voting within the boundaries of the county. A simple majority of
those voting on a single proposition to approve the plan and impose the taxes
and fees within each county is required for approval.

(4) If the plan is
approved by the voters and involves more than one county, the counties must
negotiate interlocal agreements necessary to implement the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
105. PROJECT IMPLEMENTATION.
(1) After voter approval of the plan, the county or counties shall enter into
agreements with lead agencies as to who will acquire, construct, or develop
projects approved by the voters. The county or counties shall negotiate
reasonable terms and conditions to assist project sponsors in funding
projects. The overall plan of the county or counties must leverage the
county's or counties' financial contributions so that the state and other
revenue sources continue to fund major state‑owned congestion relief and
transportation capacity improvement projects.

(2) A county may, after
consultation with the regional transportation planning organization, amend
projects in the plan as warranted without voter approval. However, increases
in the cost of a project, including a member county's share of the cost, that
exceeds twenty percent requires voter approval.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
106. TAXES AND FEES. (1) In
order to fund a regional transportation investment plan, a county may, upon
approval of the voters as provided in this chapter, impose some or all of the
following taxes:

(a) A regional sales
and use tax, as specified in section 206 of this act, of up to 0.5 percent of
the selling price, in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in
the case of a use tax, upon the occurrence of any taxable event in the county;

(b) A local option
vehicle license fee, as specified under section 211 of this act, of up to one
hundred dollars per vehicle registered in the county. As used in this
subsection, "vehicle" means motor vehicle as defined in RCW
46.04.320. Certain classes of vehicles, as defined under chapter 46.04 RCW,
may be exempted from this fee;

(c) A parking tax under
RCW 82.80.030;

(d) A local motor
vehicle excise tax under RCW 81.100.060 and chapter 81.104 RCW;

(e) A local option fuel
tax under RCW 82.80.010;

(f) An employer excise
tax under RCW 81.100.030;

(g) A sales and use tax
under RCW 82.14.045;

(h) A sales and use tax
under RCW 81.104.170; and

(i) Vehicle tolls, but
only on new or expanded facilities. Unless otherwise specified by law, the
department of transportation shall administer the collection of vehicle tolls
on designated facilities, and the state transportation commission, or its
successor, shall be the tolling authority.

(2) Taxes, fees, and
tolls may not be imposed without an affirmative vote of the majority of the
voters within the boundaries of the county voting on a ballot proposition as
set forth in section 104 of this act. Revenues from these taxes and fees may
be used only to implement this chapter. A county may contract with the state
department of revenue or other appropriate entities for administration and
collection of any of the taxes or fees authorized in this section.

(3) Existing statewide
motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes, at the distribution rates in effect
on January 1, 2001, are not intended to be altered by this chapter.

(4)(a) The state sales
tax imposed and collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, less any credits
allowed under chapter 82.14 RCW, on initial construction for any project to be
constructed under this chapter must be transferred to the project or identified
as a credit on the project to defray costs or pay debt service on that
project. In the case of a toll project, the transfer or credit must be used to
lower the overall cost of the project and thereby the amount or term of the
tolls.

(b) This transaction is
exempt from the requirements in RCW 43.135.035(4).

(c) Government entities
constructing projects under this chapter shall report the amount of state sales
or use tax covered under this subsection (4) to the department of revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
107. REVENUE DISTRIBUTION.
The revenues generated under section 106 of this act must be distributed in the
following manner:

(1) Tolls collected on
state routes must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund for the use of the
department of transportation. Tolls on other facilities must be used to pay
for those facilities.

(2) Of the remaining
amount:

(a) Seventy percent
must be deposited in the regional transportation investment account. The
department of transportation and the transportation improvement board must use
the funds to implement projects identified in the regional transportation
investment plan;

(b) Fifteen percent must
be distributed to the county for transportation uses consistent with the ballot
proposition and adopted transportation and land use plans of the jurisdiction
spending the funds and consistent with any applicable and adopted regional
transportation plan for regional transportation planning areas;

(c) Fifteen percent
must be distributed to cities and towns within the county for transportation
uses consistent with the ballot proposition and with the adopted transportation
and land use plans of the jurisdiction spending the funds and consistent with
any applicable and adopted regional transportation plan for regional
transportation planning areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
108. DESIGN-BUILD. A county
may use the design‑build procedure defined in RCW 47.20.780 for projects
funded by it under this chapter. The requirements and limitations of RCW
47.20.780 and 47.20.785 do not apply to the projects under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
109. PERFORMANCE CRITERIA FOR
REGIONAL PROJECT SELECTION. (1) The regional transportation planning
organization shall consider the following criteria for selecting projects to
improve corridor performance:

(a) Reduced level of
congestion and safety;

(b) Improved travel
time;

(c) Improved air
quality;

(d) Increases in daily
and peak period person and vehicle trip capacity;

(e) Reductions in
person and vehicle delay;

(f) Improved freight
mobility; and

(g) Cost-effectiveness
of the investment.

(2) These criteria
represent only minimum standards that must be considered in selecting
transportation improvement projects.

(3) The county shall
monitor and audit the progress and execution of projects to protect the
investment of the public and annually make public its findings.

(4) The department of
transportation shall issue a report to assure accountability to the public for
the timely construction of the transportation improvement project or projects
within cost projections. The report must be issued at least annually to the
public and to the legislature. The department shall send copies of the report
to newspapers of record in each county that has adopted a plan. In the report,
the district shall indicate the status of project costs, project expenditures,
revenues, and construction schedules on projects funded under this chapter.
The report must also include the use of moneys distributed to cities and
counties receiving revenues from taxes imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
110. WASHINGTON STATE
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION ROLE. (1) The department shall designate an
office of dedicated staff and services to assist counties under this chapter.
The primary responsibility of the dedicated staff is to coordinate the design,
preliminary engineering, permitting, financing, and construction of projects
under consideration by a county or counties.

(2) All of the powers
granted the department under Title 47 RCW relating to highway construction may,
at the request of a member county, be used to implement a regional
transportation investment plan and construct transportation projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
111. DISSOLUTION. The county
legislative authority may terminate any taxes, fees, or tolls imposed under an
approved plan if it finds that the financing or debt service on the project or
series of projects constructed under this plan has been completed and paid.

II. FINANCE

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
INVESTMENT ACCOUNT. A regional transportation investment account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer for each county funding projects under
chapter 36.-- RCW (sections 101 through 111 of this act). All money deposited
in a regional transportation investment account by each county will be used for
design, right of way acquisition, capital acquisition, and construction, or for
the payment of debt service associated with these activities, for county funded
projects developed under chapter 36.-- RCW (sections 101 through 111 of this
act). The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW
and the department of transportation is the administering agency for the
account. The county must approve the allotments before any expenditures may be
made from the account. An appropriation is not required for expenditures from
this account.

Sec. 202. RCW 43.84.092 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 14 s 608, 2001 c 273 s 6, 2001 c 141 s 3, and 2001 c 80 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

INTEREST EARNINGS. (1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the
drinking water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account,
the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account,
the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve
land account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public health supplemental
account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the regional transportation
investment account, the resource management cost account, the site closure
account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account,
the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account,
the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the Washington
judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account,
the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol
retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control
revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects
account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 203. RCW 81.104.140 and 1992
c 101 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

HCT TAXES FOR REGIONAL
TRANSIT. (1) Agencies authorized ((to provide high capacity transportation
service, including transit agencies and regional transit authorities,)) under
this section are hereby granted dedicated funding sources for ((such))
high capacity transportation systems. These dedicated funding sources,
as set forth in RCW 81.104.150, 81.104.160, and 81.104.170, are authorized ((only))
for:

(a) Transit
agencies located in (((a) each county with a population of two hundred ten
thousand or more and (b) each county with a population of from one hundred
twenty‑five thousand to less than two hundred ten thousand except for
those counties that do not border a county with a population as described under
(a) of this subsection. In any county with a population of one million or more
or in any county having a population of four hundred thousand or more bordering
a county with a population of one million or more, these funding sources may be
imposed only by a regional transit authority)) a county that neither
participates in nor is eligible to participate in a regional transit authority;

(b) Regional transit
authorities;

(c) Counties that
dedicate the funds to developing capital facilities for high capacity
transportation systems as part of a transportation investment plan and meet the
following requirements:

(i) Counties that
participate in a regional transit authority must obtain the approval of the
authority;

(ii) Counties that
do not participate in a regional transit authority must obtain the approval of
the affected transit authority or authorities;

(iii) A county may
only impose a tax authorized by this section to the extent that the maximum
amount of taxes authorized under this chapter have not been imposed.

(2) Agencies planning
to construct and operate a high capacity transportation system should also seek
other funds, including federal, state, local, and private sector assistance.

(3) Funding sources
should satisfy each of the following criteria to the greatest extent possible:

(a) Acceptability;

(b) Ease of
administration;

(c) Equity;

(d) Implementation
feasibility;

(e) Revenue
reliability; and

(f) Revenue yield.

(4) Agencies
participating in regional high capacity transportation system development are
authorized to levy and collect the following voter‑approved local option
funding sources:

(a) Employer tax as
provided in RCW 81.104.150;

(b) Special motor
vehicle excise tax as provided in RCW 81.104.160; and

(c) Sales and use tax
as provided in RCW 81.104.170.

Revenues from these
taxes may be used only to support those purposes prescribed in subsection (10)
of this section. Before the date of an election authorizing an agency to
impose any of the taxes enumerated in this section and authorized in RCW
81.104.150, 81.104.160, and 81.104.170, the agency must comply with the process
prescribed in RCW 81.104.100 (1) and (2) and 81.104.110. No construction on
exclusive right of way may occur before the requirements of RCW 81.104.100(3)
are met.

(5) Authorization in
subsection (4) of this section shall not adversely affect the funding authority
of transit agencies not provided for in this chapter. Local option funds may
be used to support implementation of interlocal agreements with respect to the
establishment of regional high capacity transportation service. Except when a
regional transit authority exists, local jurisdictions shall retain control
over moneys generated within their boundaries, although funds may be commingled
with those generated in other areas for planning, construction, and operation
of high capacity transportation systems as set forth in the agreements.

(6) Agencies planning
to construct ((and)) or operate high capacity transportation
systems may contract with the state for collection and transference of voter‑approved
local option revenue.

(7) Dedicated high
capacity transportation funding sources authorized in RCW 81.104.150,
81.104.160, and 81.104.170 shall be subject to voter approval by a simple
majority. A single ballot proposition may seek approval for one or more of the
authorized taxing sources. The ballot title shall reference the document
identified in subsection (8) of this section.

(8) Agencies shall
provide to the registered voters in the area a document describing the systems
plan and the financing plan set forth in RCW 81.104.100. It shall also
describe the relationship of the system to regional issues such as development
density at station locations and activity centers, and the interrelationship of
the system to adopted land use and transportation demand management goals
within the region. This document shall be provided to the voters at least
twenty days prior to the date of the election.

(9) For any election in
which voter approval is sought for a high capacity transportation system plan
and financing plan pursuant to RCW 81.104.040, a local voter's pamphlet shall
be produced as provided in chapter 29.81A RCW.

(10) Agencies providing
high capacity transportation service shall retain responsibility for revenue
encumbrance, disbursement, and bonding. Funds may be used for any purpose
relating to planning, construction, and operation of high capacity
transportation systems and commuter rail systems, personal rapid transit,
busways, bus sets, and entrained and linked buses.

(11) Eligible
transit agencies or counties may choose to implement high capacity
transportation service as a joint effort across their respective
jurisdictions. Eligible entities may coordinate efforts to implement some or
all of the dedicated funding sources set forth in RCW 81.104.150, 81.104.160,
and 81.104.170 to accomplish this goal. Entities electing to coordinate
efforts shall enter into interlocal agreements specifying the terms of the
coordination. The respective county legislative authorities may choose to set
forth a common ballot measure and vote to authorize the dedicated funding
sources. Eligible entities include:

(a) Transit agencies
located in a county that is neither participating in, nor is eligible to
participate in, a regional transit authority; and

(b) Counties
implementing a transportation investment plan as defined in section 102 of this
act.

Sec. 204. RCW 81.104.160 and 1998
c 321 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

HCT‑-MVET. (1)
Cities that operate transit systems, county transportation authorities,
metropolitan municipal corporations, public transportation benefit areas, ((and))
regional transit authorities, and counties, as part of a regional
transportation plan, may submit an authorizing proposition to the voters,
and if approved, may levy and collect ((an)) a motor vehicle
excise tax, at a rate approved by the voters, but not exceeding eighty
one-hundredths of one percent ((on)) of the value((, under
chapter 82.44 RCW,)) of every motor vehicle owned by a resident of the
taxing district, solely for the purpose of providing high capacity
transportation service, and for counties, as part of a regional transportation
plan, solely for the purpose of providing high capacity transportation capital
facilities or improvements. In any county imposing a motor vehicle excise
tax surcharge pursuant to RCW 81.100.060, the maximum tax rate under this
section shall be reduced to a rate equal to eighty one-hundredths of one
percent on the value less the equivalent motor vehicle excise tax rate of the
surcharge imposed pursuant to RCW 81.100.060. This rate shall not apply to
vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 except vehicles with an unladen weight of
six thousand pounds or less, RCW 46.16.079, 46.16.085, or 46.16.090.

(2) An agency imposing
a tax under subsection (1) of this section may also impose a sales and use tax
solely for the purpose of providing high capacity transportation service, in
addition to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030, upon retail car rentals within
the agency's jurisdiction that are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW. The rate of tax shall not exceed 2.172 percent. The rate of
tax imposed under this subsection shall bear the same ratio to the 2.172
percent rate authorized that the rate imposed under subsection (1) of this
section bears to the rate authorized under subsection (1) of this section. The
base of the tax shall be the selling price in the case of a sales tax or the
rental value of the vehicle used in the case of a use tax. The revenue
collected under this subsection shall be used in the same manner as excise
taxes under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The total
cumulative rate of tax that may be imposed under subsection (1) of this section
shall not exceed the maximum rate authorized under that subsection.

Sec. 205. RCW 81.104.170 and 1997
c 450 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

HCT SALES TAX. (1)
Cities that operate transit systems, county transportation authorities,
metropolitan municipal corporations, public transportation benefit areas, ((and))
regional transit authorities, and counties, as part of a regional
transportation plan, may submit an authorizing proposition to the voters
and if approved by a majority of persons voting, fix and impose a sales and use
tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter, solely for the purpose of
providing high capacity transportation service, and for counties, as part of
a regional transportation plan, solely for the purpose of providing high
capacity transportation capital facilities or improvements.

(2) The tax
authorized pursuant to this section shall be in addition to the tax authorized
by RCW 82.14.030 and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by
the state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within the taxing district. The maximum rate of such tax shall
be approved by the voters and shall not exceed one percent of the selling price
(in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use
tax). The maximum rate of such tax that may be imposed shall not exceed nine‑tenths
of one percent in any county that imposes a tax under RCW 82.14.340, or within
a regional transit authority if any county within the authority imposes a tax
under RCW 82.14.340. The total cumulative rate that may be imposed under
this subsection (2) may not exceed the maximum rate authorized under this
subsection. The exemptions in RCW 82.08.820 and 82.12.820 are for the
state portion of the sales and use tax and do not extend to the tax authorized
in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
206. A new section is added
to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

SALES AND USE TAX. (1)
If approved by the majority of the voters within its boundaries voting on the
ballot proposition, a county, as part of a regional transportation plan, may
impose a sales and use tax of up to 0.5 percent of the selling price or value
of the article used in the case of a use tax.

(2) The tax authorized
by this section is in addition to all other taxes imposed under this chapter
and must be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within
the boundaries of the region.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
207. A new section is added
to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

PROJECT SALES AND USE
TAX CREDIT SHIFT. Any transfer or credit from the general fund of sales and
use tax paid on a transportation project being constructed by a county under a
regional transportation investment plan shall not require a corresponding
lowering of the state expenditure limit to reflect this shift for purposes of
RCW 43.135.035(4).

Sec. 208. RCW 82.14.045 and 2001 c
89 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

TRANSIT SALES TAX. (1)
The legislative body of any city pursuant to RCW 35.92.060, of any county which
has created an unincorporated transportation benefit area pursuant to RCW
36.57.100 and 36.57.110, of any public transportation benefit area pursuant to
RCW 36.57A.080 and 36.57A.090, of any county transportation authority
established pursuant to chapter 36.57 RCW, and of any metropolitan municipal
corporation within a county with a population of one million or more pursuant
to chapter 35.58 RCW, and the legislative body of a county as part of a
regional transportation investment plan for the purposes of implementing the
plan and with the permission of each municipality operating a public
transportation system within the county, may, by resolution or ordinance
for the sole purpose of providing funds for the operation, maintenance, or
capital needs of public transportation systems or public transportation limited
to persons with special needs under RCW 36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, and in lieu
of the excise taxes authorized by RCW 35.95.040, submit an authorizing
proposition to the voters or include such authorization in a proposition to
perform the function of public transportation or public transportation limited
to persons with special needs under RCW 36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, and if
approved by a majority of persons voting thereon, fix and impose a sales and
use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter: PROVIDED, That no such
legislative body shall impose such a sales and use tax without submitting such
an authorizing proposition to the voters and obtaining the approval of a
majority of persons voting thereon: PROVIDED FURTHER, That where such a
proposition is submitted by a county on behalf of an unincorporated
transportation benefit area, it shall be voted upon by the voters residing
within the boundaries of such unincorporated transportation benefit area and,
if approved, the sales and use tax shall be imposed only within such area.
Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, any county in
which a county public transportation plan has been adopted pursuant to RCW
36.57.070 and the voters of such county have authorized the imposition of a
sales and use tax pursuant to the provisions of section 10, chapter 167, Laws
of 1974 ex. sess., prior to July 1, 1975, shall be authorized to fix and impose
a sales and use tax as provided in this section at not to exceed the rate so
authorized without additional approval of the voters of such county as
otherwise required by this section.

The tax authorized
pursuant to this section shall be in addition to the tax authorized by RCW
82.14.030 and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the
state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within such city, public transportation benefit area, county, or
metropolitan municipal corporation as the case may be. The rate of such tax
shall be one-tenth, two-tenths, three-tenths, four-tenths, five-tenths,
six-tenths, seven-tenths, eight-tenths, or nine-tenths of one percent of the
selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the
case of a use tax). The rate of such tax shall not exceed the rate authorized
by the voters unless such increase shall be similarly approved.

(2)(a) In the event a
metropolitan municipal corporation shall impose a sales and use tax pursuant to
this chapter no city, county which has created an unincorporated transportation
benefit area, public transportation benefit area authority, or county transportation
authority wholly within such metropolitan municipal corporation shall be
empowered to levy and/or collect taxes pursuant to RCW 35.58.273, 35.95.040,
and/or 82.14.045, but nothing herein shall prevent such city or county from
imposing sales and use taxes pursuant to any other authorization.

(b) In the event a
county transportation authority shall impose a sales and use tax pursuant to
this section, no city, county which has created an unincorporated
transportation benefit area, public transportation benefit area, or
metropolitan municipal corporation, located within the territory of the
authority, shall be empowered to levy or collect taxes pursuant to RCW
35.58.273, 35.95.040, or 82.14.045.

(c) In the event a
public transportation benefit area shall impose a sales and use tax pursuant to
this section, no city, county which has created an unincorporated
transportation benefit area, or metropolitan municipal corporation, located
wholly or partly within the territory of the public transportation benefit
area, shall be empowered to levy or collect taxes pursuant to RCW 35.58.273,
35.95.040, or 82.14.045.

(d) The total
cumulative rate of tax that may be imposed under subsection (1) of this section
shall not exceed the maximum rate authorized under that subsection.

(3) Any local sales and
use tax revenue collected pursuant to this section by any city or by any county
for transportation purposes pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110 shall not
be counted as locally generated tax revenues for the purposes of apportionment
and distribution, in the manner prescribed by chapter 82.44 RCW, of the
proceeds of the motor vehicle excise tax authorized pursuant to RCW 35.58.273,
except that the local sales and use tax revenue collected under this section by
a city with a population greater than sixty thousand that as of January 1,
1998, owns and operates a municipal public transportation system shall be
counted as locally generated tax revenues for the purposes of apportionment and
distribution, in the manner prescribed by chapter 82.44 RCW, of the proceeds of
the motor vehicle excise tax authorized under RCW 35.58.273 as follows:

(a) For fiscal year
2000, revenues collected under this section shall be counted as locally
generated tax revenues for up to 25 percent of the tax collected under RCW
35.58.273;

(b) For fiscal year
2001, revenues collected under this section shall be counted as locally
generated tax revenues for up to 50 percent of the tax collected under RCW
35.58.273;

(c) For fiscal year
2002, revenues collected under this section shall be counted as locally
generated tax revenues for up to 75 percent of the tax collected under RCW
35.58.273; and

(d) For fiscal year
2003 and thereafter, revenues collected under this section shall be counted as
locally generated tax revenues for up to 100 percent of the tax collected under
RCW 35.58.273.

Sec. 209. RCW 82.14.050 and 1999 c
165 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

CONTRACTS FOR
COLLECTION OF SALES AND USE TAX. The counties, cities, and transportation
authorities under RCW 82.14.045 ((and)), public facilities
districts under chapter 36.100 and 35.57 RCW, and counties, under a regional
transportation investment plan shall contract, prior to the effective date
of a resolution or ordinance imposing a sales and use tax, the administration
and collection to the state department of revenue, which shall deduct a
percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent of the
taxes collected for administration and collection expenses incurred by the
department. The remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this chapter
which is collected by the department of revenue shall be deposited by the state
department of revenue in the local sales and use tax account hereby created in
the state treasury. Moneys in the local sales and use tax account may be spent
only for distribution to counties, cities, transportation authorities, and
public facilities districts imposing a sales and use tax. All administrative
provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW, as they now exist or
may hereafter be amended, shall, insofar as they are applicable to state sales
and use taxes, be applicable to taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter. Except
as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of investments of balances in the
local sales and use tax account shall be credited to the local sales and use
tax account and distributed to the counties, cities, transportation
authorities, and public facilities districts monthly.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
210. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

CREDIT ON SALES TAX ON
PROJECTS. (1) The tax imposed and collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW, less any credits allowed under chapter 82.14 RCW, on initial construction
for a project to be constructed under chapter 36.-- RCW (sections 101 through
111 of this act), must be transferred to the project or identified as a credit
on the project to defray costs or pay debt service on that project. In the
case of a toll project, this transfer or credit must be used to lower the
overall cost of the project and thereby the corresponding tolls.

(2) This transaction is
exempt from the requirements in RCW 43.135.035(4).

(3) Government entities
constructing projects under chapter 36.-- RCW (sections 101 through 111 of this
act) shall report to the department the amount of state sales or use tax
covered under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
211. A new section is added
to chapter 82.80 RCW to read as follows:

LOCAL OPTION VEHICLE
LICENSE FEE. (1) Upon approval of a majority of the voters within its
boundaries voting on the ballot proposition, a county, as part of a regional
transportation plan, may set and impose an annual local option vehicle license
fee of a uniform amount of up to one hundred dollars per motor vehicle
registered within the boundaries of the region on every motor vehicle, as
defined in RCW 46.04.320. Vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW and the
international registration plan are exempt from the annual local option vehicle
license fee set forth in this section. The department of licensing shall
administer and collect this fee on behalf of counties and remit this fee to the
county to implement the regional transportation plan.

(2) The local option
vehicle license fee applies only when establishing or renewing a vehicle
registration. This fee is effective with the registration expiration date as
provided by the department of licensing.

(3) A county imposing
the local option vehicle license fee or initiating an exemption process shall
enter into a contract with the department of licensing. The contract must
contain provisions that fully recover the costs to the department of licensing
for collection and administration of the fee.

(4) A county imposing
the local option fee shall delay the effective date of the local option vehicle
license fee imposed by this section at least six months from the date of the
final certification of the approval election to allow the department of
licensing to implement the administration and collection of or exemption from
the fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
212. A new section is added
to chapter 47.56 RCW to read as follows:

AUTHORIZATION FOR
DISTRICT TO IMPOSE TOLLS. Upon approval of a majority of the voters within its
boundaries voting on the ballot proposition, and only for the purposes
authorized in section 106(1)(i) of this act, a county may impose vehicle tolls
on state routes where improvements financed in whole or in part by a county
under a regional transportation investment plan add additional lanes to a
highway of statewide significance. The department shall administer the
collection of vehicle tolls on designated facilities unless otherwise specified
in law, and the state transportation commission, or its successor, shall be the
tolling authority.

Sec. 213. RCW 81.100.030 and 1991
c 363 s 153 are each amended to read as follows:

HIGH-OCCUPANCY VEHICLE
EMPLOYER TAX. (1) A county with a population of one million or more, or a
county with a population of from two hundred ten thousand to less than one
million that is adjoining a county with a population of one million or more,
and having within its boundaries existing or planned high-occupancy
vehicle lanes on the state highway system, or those same counties, as part
of a regional transportation plan, may, with voter approval impose an
excise tax of up to two dollars per employee per month on all employers or any
class or classes of employers, public and private, including the state located
in the agency's jurisdiction, measured by the number of full-time equivalent
employees. In no event may the total taxes imposed under this section
exceed two dollars per employee per month for any single employer. The
county imposing the tax authorized in this section may provide for exemptions
from the tax to such educational, cultural, health, charitable, or religious
organizations as it deems appropriate.

Counties may contract
with the state department of revenue or other appropriate entities for
administration and collection of the tax. Such contract shall provide for
deduction of an amount for administration and collection expenses.

(2) The tax shall not
apply to employment of a person when the employer has paid for at least half of
the cost of a transit pass issued by a transit agency for that employee, valid
for the period for which the tax would otherwise be owed.

(3) A county shall
adopt rules which exempt from all or a portion of the tax any employer that has
entered into an agreement with the county that is designed to reduce the
proportion of employees who drive in single-occupant vehicles during peak
commuting periods in proportion to the degree that the agreement is designed to
meet the goals for the employer's location adopted under RCW 81.100.040.

The agreement shall
include a list of specific actions that the employer will undertake to be
entitled to the exemption. Employers having an exemption from all or part of
the tax through this subsection shall annually certify to the county that the
employer is fulfilling the terms of the agreement. The exemption continues as
long as the employer is in compliance with the agreement.

If the tax authorized
in RCW 81.100.060 is also imposed ((by the county)), the total proceeds
from both tax sources each year shall not exceed the maximum amount which could
be collected under RCW 81.100.060.

Sec. 214. RCW 81.100.060 and 1998
c 321 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

HIGH-OCCUPANCY VEHICLE
MOTOR VEHICLE EXCISE TAX. A county with a population of one million or more
and a county with a population of from two hundred ten thousand to less than
one million that is adjoining a county with a population of one million or
more, having within their boundaries existing or planned high‑occupancy
vehicle lanes on the state highway system, and those same counties, as part
of a regional transportation plan, may, with voter approval, impose a local
surcharge of not more than ((13.64 percent on the state motor vehicle excise
tax paid under RCW 82.44.020(1))) three-tenths of one percent of the
value on vehicles registered to a person residing within the county and not
more than 13.64 percent on the state sales and use taxes paid under the
rate in RCW 82.08.020(2) on retail car rentals within the county. No surcharge
may be imposed on vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 except vehicles with an
unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less, RCW 46.16.079, 46.16.085, or
46.16.090.

Counties imposing a tax
under this section shall contract, before the effective date of the resolution
or ordinance imposing a surcharge, administration and collection to the state
department of licensing, and department of revenue, as appropriate, which shall
deduct an amount, as provided by contract, for administration and collection
expenses incurred by the department. All administrative provisions in chapters
82.03, 82.32, and 82.44 RCW shall, insofar as they are applicable to ((state))
motor vehicle excise taxes, be applicable to surcharges imposed under this
section. All administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and
82.32 RCW shall, insofar as they are applicable to state sales and use taxes,
be applicable to surcharges imposed under this section.

If the tax authorized
in RCW 81.100.030 is also imposed ((by the county)), the total proceeds
from tax sources imposed under this section and RCW 81.100.030 each year shall
not exceed the maximum amount which could be collected under this section.

Sec. 215. RCW 82.80.010 and 1998 c
176 s 86 are each amended to read as follows:

LOCAL OPTION FUEL TAX.
(1) Subject to the conditions of this section, any county may levy, by approval
of its legislative body and a majority of the registered voters of the county
voting on the proposition at a general or special election, additional excise
taxes equal to ten percent of the statewide motor vehicle fuel tax rate under
RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010
and on each gallon of special fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the
boundaries of the county. Vehicles paying an annual license fee under RCW
82.38.075 are exempt from the county fuel excise tax. An election held under
this section must be held not more than twelve months before the date on which
the proposed tax is to be levied. The ballot setting forth the proposition
shall state the tax rate that is proposed. The county's authority to levy
additional excise taxes under this section includes the incorporated and
unincorporated areas of the county. The additional excise taxes are subject to
the same exceptions and rights of refund as applicable to other motor vehicle
fuel and special fuel excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW.
The proposed tax shall not be levied less than one month from the date the
election results are certified by the county election officer. The
commencement date for the levy of any tax under this section shall be the first
day of January, April, July, or October.

(2) Every person
subject to the tax shall pay, in addition to any other taxes provided by law,
an additional excise tax to the director of licensing at the rate levied by a
county exercising its authority under this section.

(3) The state treasurer
shall distribute monthly to the levying county and cities contained therein the
proceeds of the additional excise taxes collected under this section, or to
the county levying the tax as part of a regional transportation plan after
the deductions for payments and expenditures as provided in RCW 46.68.090(1) ((and
(2))) and under the conditions and limitations provided in RCW 82.80.080.

(4) The proceeds of the
additional excise taxes levied under this section shall be used strictly for
transportation purposes in accordance with RCW 82.80.070. The proceeds of
the additional taxes levied by a county, as part of a regional transportation
plan, shall be used as provided in chapter 36.-- RCW (sections 101 through 111
of this act).

(5) The department of
licensing shall administer and collect the county fuel taxes. The department
shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by contract, for administrative,
collection, refund, and audit expenses incurred. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer for monthly distribution
under RCW 82.80.080.

Sec. 216. RCW 82.80.020 and 2001 c
64 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

VEHICLE LICENSE FEE‑-EXEMPTIONS‑-LIMITATIONS.
(1) The legislative authority of a county, or subject to subsection (7) of this
section, a qualifying city or town located in a county that has not imposed a
fifteen-dollar fee under this section, may fix and impose an additional fee,
not to exceed fifteen dollars per vehicle, for each vehicle that is subject to
license fees under RCW 46.16.0621 and for each vehicle that is subject to RCW
46.16.070 with an unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less, and that is
determined by the department of licensing to be registered within the
boundaries of the county.

(2) The department of
licensing shall administer and collect the fee. The department shall deduct a
percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent of the
taxes collected, for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer
for monthly distribution under RCW 82.80.080.

(3) The proceeds of
this fee shall be used strictly for transportation purposes in accordance with
RCW 82.80.070.

(4) A county or
qualifying city or town imposing this fee or initiating an exemption process
shall delay the effective date at least six months from the date the ordinance
is enacted to allow the department of licensing to implement administration and
collection of or exemption from the fee.

(5) The legislative
authority of a county or qualifying city or town may develop and initiate an
exemption process of the fifteen dollar fee for the registered owners of
vehicles residing within the boundaries of the county or qualifying city or
town: (a) Who are sixty-one years old or older at the time payment of the fee
is due and whose household income for the previous calendar year is less than
an amount prescribed by the county or qualifying city or town legislative
authority; or (b) who have a physical disability.

(6) The legislative
authority of a county or qualifying city or town shall develop and initiate an
exemption process of the fifteen-dollar fee for vehicles registered within the
boundaries of the county that are licensed under RCW 46.16.374.

(7) For purposes of
this section, a "qualifying city or town" means a city or town ((residing
within a county having a population of greater than seventy-five thousand in
which is located all or part of a national monument)) whose legislative
authority has imposed by ordinance a vehicle license fee. A qualifying
city or town may impose the fee authorized in subsection (1) of this section
subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The city or town
may impose the fee only if authorized to do so by a majority of voters voting
at a general or special election on a proposition for that purpose. At a
minimum, the ballot measure shall contain: (i) A description of the
transportation project proposed for funding, properly identified by mileposts
or other designations that specify the project parameters; (ii) the proposed
number of months or years necessary to fund the city or town's share of the
project cost; and (iii) the amount of fee to be imposed for the project.

(b) The city or town
may not impose a fee that, if combined with the county fee, exceeds fifteen
dollars. If a county imposes or increases a fee under this section that, if
combined with the fee imposed by a city or town, exceeds fifteen dollars, the
city or town fee shall be reduced or eliminated as needed so that in no city or
town does the combined fee exceed fifteen dollars. All revenues from
county-imposed fees shall be distributed as called for in RCW 82.80.080.

(c) Any fee imposed by
a city or town under this section shall expire at the end of the term of months
or years provided in the ballot measure, or when the city or town's bonded
indebtedness on the project is retired, whichever is sooner.

(8) The fee imposed
under subsection (7) of this section shall apply only to renewals and shall not
apply to ownership transfer transactions.

Sec. 217. RCW 82.80.030 and 1990 c
42 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:

PARKING TAX. (1)
Subject to the conditions of this section, the legislative authority of a
county or city may fix and impose a parking tax on all persons engaged in a
commercial parking business within its respective jurisdiction. The
jurisdiction of a county, for purposes of this section, includes only the
unincorporated area of the county. The jurisdiction of a city includes only
the area within its ((incorporated)) boundaries.

(2) In lieu of the tax
in subsection (1) of this section, a city or a county in its unincorporated
area may fix and impose a tax for the act or privilege of parking a motor
vehicle in a facility operated by a commercial parking business.

The city or county may
provide that:

(a) The tax is paid by
the operator or owner of the motor vehicle;

(b) The tax applies to
all parking for which a fee is paid, whether paid or leased, including parking
supplied with a lease of nonresidential space;

(c) The tax is collected
by the operator of the facility and remitted to the city or county;

(d) The tax is a fee
per vehicle or is measured by the parking charge;

(e) The tax rate varies
with zoning or location of the facility, the duration of the parking, the time
of entry or exit, the type or use of the vehicle, or other reasonable factors;
and

(f) Tax exempt
carpools, vehicles with handicapped decals, or government vehicles are exempt
from the tax.

(3) "Commercial
parking business" as used in this section, means the ownership, lease,
operation, or management of a commercial parking lot in which fees are
charged. "Commercial parking lot" means a covered or uncovered area
with stalls for the purpose of parking motor vehicles.

(4) The rate of the tax
under subsection (1) of this section may be based either upon gross proceeds or
the number of vehicle stalls available for commercial parking use. The rates
charged must be uniform for the same class or type of commercial parking
business.

(5) The county or city
levying the tax provided for in subsection (1) or (2) of this section may
provide for its payment on a monthly, quarterly, or annual basis. Each local
government may develop by ordinance or resolution rules for administering the
tax, including provisions for reporting by commercial parking businesses,
collection, and enforcement.

(6) The proceeds of the
commercial parking tax fixed and imposed by a city or county, not part of a
regional transportation plan, under subsection (1) or (2) of this section
shall be used strictly for transportation purposes in accordance with RCW
82.80.070. The proceeds of the parking tax imposed by a county, as part of
a regional transportation plan, shall be used as provided in chapter 36.-- RCW
(sections 101 through 111 of this act).

Sec. 218. RCW 82.80.070 and 1991 c
141 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

REQUIRES THAT LOCAL
OPTION TAXES IMPOSED BY DISTRICT BE USED FOR DISTRICT PROJECTS. (1) The
proceeds collected pursuant to the exercise of the local option authority of
RCW 82.80.010, 82.80.020, 82.80.030, and 82.80.050 and sections 206, 211,
and 212 of this act, (hereafter called "local option transportation
revenues") shall be used for transportation purposes only, including but
not limited to the following: The operation and preservation of roads,
streets, and other transportation improvements; new construction,
reconstruction, and expansion of city streets, county roads, and state highways
and other transportation improvements; development and implementation of public
transportation and high-capacity transit improvements and programs; and
planning, design, and acquisition of right of way and sites for such
transportation purposes. The proceeds collected from excise taxes on the sale,
distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel under RCW 82.80.010
shall be used exclusively for "highway purposes" as that term is
construed in Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution.

(2) The local option
transportation revenues shall be expended for transportation uses consistent
with the adopted transportation and land use plans of the jurisdiction
expending the funds and consistent with any applicable and adopted regional
transportation plan for metropolitan planning areas.

(3) Each local government
with a population greater than eight thousand that levies or expends local
option transportation funds, is also required to develop and adopt a specific
transportation program that contains the following elements:

(a) The program shall
identify the geographic boundaries of the entire area or areas within which
local option transportation revenues will be levied and expended.

(b) The program shall
be based on an adopted transportation plan for the geographic areas covered and
shall identify the proposed operation and construction of transportation
improvements and services in the designated plan area intended to be funded in
whole or in part by local option transportation revenues and shall identify the
annual costs applicable to the program.

(c) The program shall
indicate how the local transportation plan is coordinated with applicable
transportation plans for the region and for adjacent jurisdictions.

(d) The program shall
include at least a six-year funding plan, updated annually, identifying the
specific public and private sources and amounts of revenue necessary to fund
the program. The program shall include a proposed schedule for construction of
projects and expenditure of revenues. The funding plan shall consider the
additional local tax revenue estimated to be generated by new development
within the plan area if all or a portion of the additional revenue is proposed
to be earmarked as future appropriations for transportation improvements in the
program.

(4) Local governments
with a population greater than eight thousand exercising the authority for
local option transportation funds shall periodically review and update their
transportation program to ensure that it is consistent with applicable local
and regional transportation and land use plans and within the means of
estimated public and private revenue available.

(5) In the case of
expenditure for new or expanded transportation facilities, improvements, and
services, priorities in the use of local option transportation revenues shall
be identified in the transportation program and expenditures shall be made
based upon the following criteria, which are stated in descending order of
weight to be attributed:

(a) First, the project
serves a multijurisdictional function;

(b) Second, it is
necessitated by existing or reasonably foreseeable congestion;

(c) Third, it has the
greatest person-carrying capacity;

(d) Fourth, it is
partially funded by other government funds, such as from the state
transportation improvement board, or by private sector contributions, such as
those from the local transportation act, chapter 39.92 RCW; and

(e) Fifth, it meets
such other criteria as the local government determines is appropriate.

(6) It is the intent of
the legislature that as a condition of levying, receiving, and expending local
option transportation revenues, no local government agency use the revenues to
replace, divert, or loan any revenues currently being used for transportation
purposes to nontransportation purposes. The association of Washington cities
and the Washington state association of counties, in consultation with the
legislative transportation committee, shall study the issue of nondiversion and
make recommendations to the legislative transportation committee for language
implementing the intent of this section by December 1, 1990.

(7) Local governments
are encouraged to enter into interlocal agreements to jointly develop and adopt
with other local governments the transportation programs required by this
section for the purpose of accomplishing regional transportation planning and
development.

(8) Local governments
may use all or a part of the local option transportation revenues for the
amortization of local government general obligation and revenue bonds issued
for transportation purposes consistent with the requirements of this section.

(9) Proceeds
collected under the exercise of local option authority under this chapter by a
county, as part of a regional transportation plan, must be used in accordance
with chapter 36.-- RCW (sections 101 through 111 of this act).

Sec. 219. RCW 82.80.080 and 1998 c
281 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

LOCAL OPTION TAX
REVENUE DISTRIBUTION. (1) The state treasurer shall distribute revenues, less
authorized deductions, generated by the local option taxes authorized in RCW
82.80.010 and 82.80.020, levied by counties to the levying counties, and cities
contained in those counties, based on the relative per capita population.
County population for purposes of this section is equal to one and one-half of
the unincorporated population of the county. In calculating the distributions,
the state treasurer shall use the population estimates prepared by the state
office of financial management and shall further calculate the distribution
based on information supplied by the departments of licensing and revenue, as
appropriate.

(2) The state treasurer
shall distribute revenues, less authorized deductions, generated by the local
option taxes authorized in RCW 82.80.010 and 82.80.020 levied by qualifying
cities and towns to the levying cities and towns.

(3) The state
treasurer shall distribute revenues to a county, as part of a regional
transportation plan, less authorized deductions, generated by the local option
taxes under RCW 82.80.010 or fees under section 211 of this act.

Sec. 220. RCW 47.56.030 and 2001 c
59 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

EXCEPTION FOR COUNTY
TOLL FACILITIES. (1) Except as provided in section 222 of this act, the
department of transportation shall have full charge of the construction of all
toll bridges and other toll facilities including the Washington state ferries,
and the operation and maintenance thereof. The transportation commission shall
determine and establish the tolls and charges thereon, and shall perform all
duties and exercise all powers relating to the financing, refinancing, and
fiscal management of all toll bridges and other toll facilities including the
Washington state ferries, and bonded indebtedness in the manner provided by
law. The department shall have full charge of design of all toll facilities.
Except as provided in this section, the department shall proceed with the
construction of such toll bridges and other facilities and the approaches
thereto by contract in the manner of state highway construction immediately
upon there being made available funds for such work and shall prosecute such
work to completion as rapidly as practicable. The department is authorized to
negotiate contracts for any amount without bid under (a) and (b) of this
subsection:

(a) Emergency
contracts, in order to make repairs to ferries or ferry terminal facilities or
removal of such facilities whenever continued use of ferries or ferry terminal
facilities constitutes a real or immediate danger to the traveling public or
precludes prudent use of such ferries or facilities; and

(b) Single source
contracts for vessel dry dockings, when there is clearly and legitimately only
one available bidder to conduct dry dock-related work for a specific class or
classes of vessels. The contracts may be entered into for a single vessel dry
docking or for multiple vessel dry dockings for a period not to exceed two
years.

(2) The department
shall proceed with the procurement of materials, supplies, services, and
equipment needed for the support, maintenance, and use of a ferry, ferry
terminal, or other facility operated by Washington state ferries, in accordance
with chapter 43.19 RCW except as follows:

(a) Except as provided
in (d) of this subsection, when the secretary of the department of
transportation determines in writing that the use of invitation for bid is
either not practicable or not advantageous to the state and it may be necessary
to make competitive evaluations, including technical or performance evaluations
among acceptable proposals to complete the contract award, a contract may be
entered into by use of a competitive sealed proposals method, and a formal
request for proposals solicitation. Such formal request for proposals
solicitation shall include a functional description of the needs and
requirements of the state and the significant factors.

(b) When purchases are
made through a formal request for proposals solicitation the contract shall be
awarded to the responsible proposer whose competitive sealed proposal is
determined in writing to be the most advantageous to the state taking into
consideration price and other evaluation factors set forth in the request for
proposals. No significant factors may be used in evaluating a proposal that
are not specified in the request for proposals. Factors that may be considered
in evaluating proposals include but are not limited to: Price;
maintainability; reliability; commonality; performance levels; life cycle cost
if applicable under this section; cost of transportation or delivery; delivery
schedule offered; installation cost; cost of spare parts; availability of parts
and service offered; and the following:

(i) The ability,
capacity, and skill of the proposer to perform the contract or provide the
service required;

(ii) The character,
integrity, reputation, judgment, experience, and efficiency of the proposer;

(iii) Whether the
proposer can perform the contract within the time specified;

(iv) The quality of
performance of previous contracts or services;

(v) The previous and
existing compliance by the proposer with laws relating to the contract or
services;

(vi) Objective,
measurable criteria defined in the request for proposal. These criteria may
include but are not limited to items such as discounts, delivery costs,
maintenance services costs, installation costs, and transportation costs; and

(vii) Such other
information as may be secured having a bearing on the decision to award the
contract.

(c) When purchases are
made through a request for proposal process, proposals received shall be
evaluated based on the evaluation factors set forth in the request for
proposal. When issuing a request for proposal for the procurement of
propulsion equipment or systems that include an engine, the request for
proposal must specify the use of a life cycle cost analysis that includes an
evaluation of fuel efficiency. When a life cycle cost analysis is used, the
life cycle cost of a proposal shall be given at least the same relative
importance as the initial price element specified in the request of proposal
documents. The department may reject any and all proposals received. If the
proposals are not rejected, the award shall be made to the proposer whose
proposal is most advantageous to the department, considering price and the
other evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposal.

(d) If the department
is procuring large equipment or systems (e.g., electrical, propulsion) needed
for the support, maintenance, and use of a ferry operated by Washington state
ferries, the department shall proceed with a formal request for proposal
solicitation under this subsection (2) without a determination of necessity by
the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
221. DESIGNATION OF STATE
ROUTE NUMBER 509. The legislature designates that portion of state route
number 509 that runs or will run from state route number 518 in the north to
the intersection with interstate 5 in the south as a state highway of statewide
significance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
222. A new section is added
to chapter 47.56 RCW to read as follows:

COUNTY DESIGNATION OF
TOLL FACILITY. A county may designate a highway within the county's
jurisdiction as a toll bridge or a toll road under this chapter. In that
event, the county shall enter into an interlocal agreement with the state
providing for the state to administer the toll facility under this chapter,
including the issuance, sale, and redemption of bonds under this chapter.

III. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. CAPTIONS. Captions used
in this act are not part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. CODIFICATION. Sections
101 through 111 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
303. SEVERABILITY. If any
provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 304. CONTINGENT EFFECT. This
act is contingent upon a transportation revenue act (. . . . . .
Bill No. . . .) becoming law in 2002.

---
END ---