BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 31.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A licensee making a
residential mortgage loan to a resident of this state must have reasonable
grounds for believing that the loan is suitable for the customer upon the basis
of the facts, if any, disclosed by the customer as to his or her financial circumstances,
needs, and objectives.

(2) Before making a
residential mortgage loan a licensee shall make reasonable efforts to obtain
information concerning:

(a) The customer's
financial status;

(b) The customer's tax
status;

(c) The customer's
sophistication and expertise in mortgage financing;

(d) The condition,
appraised value, and equity of the property to be mortgaged;

(e) The customer's
capacity to meet the terms of any proposed loan; and

(f) Other
information used or considered to be reasonable by the licensee in making
recommendations to the customer.

--- END ---