BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 31.04 RCW to read as follows:

A resident of this
state who has obtained a residential mortgage loan from a licensee may not, as
a result of a default in the performance of any condition contained in the
mortgage, have a foreclosure action instituted against them by a licensee or a
licensee's successor in interest pursuant to RCW 61.12.040 unless:

(1) The licensee or the
licensee's successor in interest holding the mortgage has submitted the loan
documents to the department of financial institutions for review;

(2) The director or his
or her designee has contacted the borrower and requested information about the
loan; and

(3) The
director has determined that the loan did not violate any of the requirements
of this chapter and was suitable for the customer at the time of its
initiation, given the customer's financial circumstances, needs, and
objectives.

--- END ---