BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that many consumers may not be eligible for home loans under traditional
standards used by banks and they may borrow from subprime lenders at terms that
are disadvantageous to them and are not justified by the slight increase in
risk they might represent to a lender. The legislature further finds that some
of the problems with subprime and predatory lending in the mortgage lending
market include: High-interest rate loans; excessive closing costs and fees;
prepayment penalties; single-premium credit insurance; negative amortization
and balloon payments; steering and using bait and switch tactics; financing of
fees; making loans based only upon the equity in the property and not the
ability to pay; servicing loans in a deceptive manner; and failing to include
payment of homeowners' insurance and property taxes without telling the
borrower.

(2) To review methods
for removing unnecessary and unfair burdens from borrowers in the home mortgage
market, a legislative joint task force shall review and make recommendations
for legislation. Issues that should be reviewed include: (a) The adequacy of
notice requirements; (b) methods to encourage greater participation by prime
lenders in low and moderate-income mortgage lending; (c) the application of a
suitability standard in residential mortgage loans; (d) the use of residential
mortgage foreclosure by subprime lenders; (e) methods of improving compliance
with lenders' responsibilities under state and federal law; and (f) any other
issues considered relevant by the task force.

(3) The joint task
force shall consist of eight members, two members from each caucus of the
senate labor, commerce, and financial institutions committee, appointed by the
chair of the committee, and two members from each caucus of the house of
representatives financial institutions and insurance committee, appointed by
the chair of the committee. In addition, the department of financial
institutions shall cooperate with the task force and maintain a liaison with
the task force. The task force shall choose its chair or cochairs from among
its membership.

(4) The task force
shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2002.

(5) This
section expires June 1, 2003.

---
END ---