BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 26.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must
investigate referrals of alleged child abuse or neglect occurring at the state
school for the deaf, including alleged incidents involving students abusing
other students; determine whether there is a finding of abuse or neglect; and
determine whether a referral to law enforcement is appropriate under this
chapter.

(2) The department must
send a copy of the investigation report, including the finding, regarding any
incidents of alleged child abuse or neglect at the state school for the deaf to
the school's superintendent. The department may include recommendations to the
superintendent and the board of trustees or its successor board for increasing
the safety of the school's students.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 72.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
social and health services must periodically monitor the residential program at
the state school for the deaf, including but not limited to examining the
residential-related policies and procedures as well as the residential
facilities. The department of social and health services must make
recommendations to the school's superintendent and the board of trustees or its
successor board on health and safety improvements related to child safety and
well-being. The department of social and health services must conduct the
monitoring reviews at least quarterly until December 1, 2006.

(2) The department of social
and health services must conduct a comprehensive child health and safety
review, as defined in rule, of the residential program at the state school for
the deaf every three years. The department of social and health services must
deliver the first health and safety review to the governor, the legislature,
the school's superintendent, and the school's board of trustees or successor
board by December 1, 2004.

(3) The state school
for the deaf must provide the department of social and health services' staff
with full and complete access to all records and documents that the department
staff may request to carry out the requirements of this section. The
department of social and health services must have full and complete access to
all students and staff of the state school for the deaf to conduct interviews
to carry out the requirements of this section.

(4) For
the purposes of this section, the department of social and health services must
use the safety standards established in this chapter when conducting the
reviews.

---
END ---