BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. In 1989, the legislature
created a system of branch campuses to meet the upper division and graduate
education needs of individuals, businesses, and urban communities. Over a
decade later it is time to review the system and to determine whether or not the
original intent is being met as well as to determine whether the original goals
are appropriate in the economic and educational climate of today.

The lack of sufficient
educational opportunities in urban areas caused the 1989 legislature to endorse
the creation of branch campuses for the University of Washington and Washington
State University. The new campuses were expected to meet the upper-division
and graduate needs of place-bound individuals who were unable to relocate due
to financial difficulties, family commitments, or job responsibilities. The
branch campuses were to be operated as models of a two-plus-two educational
system. In addition, the new campuses were expected to provide the educational
opportunities that are beneficial to the economy of the state's urban centers
not previously served by a four-year institution. The new campuses were also
expected to address the issue of baccalaureate degree production in Washington
falling behind other states in the nation.

The Washington state
institute for public policy shall review and evaluate the following questions
that surround the branch campuses of the University of Washington and
Washington State University: (1) What evidence is there to support that the
branch campuses fulfilled the original intent of the legislature; (2) to what
extent do key factors such as student demographics; demand for and availability
of upper division and graduate higher education; and local and state labor
markets indicate a need to modify the role, mission, or structure of the branch
campuses; (3) what has been the experience of other states with upper division
branch campuses; (4) what is the relationship of the branch campuses to their
local community colleges; and (5) what are some policy options the legislature
could consider regarding the future of branch campuses? In completing the
report, the institute may request information from appropriate outside
resources such as the western interstate commission for higher education, the
national conference of state legislatures, the education commission of the
states, or the national center for higher education management systems.

The
institute shall submit a report to the appropriate legislative committees by
December 12, 2002.

---
END ---