BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 7.80.130 and 1987 c
456 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An order entered
after the receipt of a response which does not contest the determination, or
after it has been established at a hearing that the civil infraction was
committed, or after a hearing for the purpose of explaining mitigating
circumstances is civil in nature.

(2) The court may
waive, reduce, or suspend the monetary penalty prescribed for the civil
infraction. If the court determines that a person has insufficient funds to
pay the monetary penalty, the court may order performance of a number of hours
of community ((service)) restitution in lieu of a monetary
penalty, at the rate of the then state minimum wage per hour.

Sec. 2. RCW 7.80.160 and 1989 c
373 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who fails
to sign a notice of civil infraction is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) Any person
willfully violating his or her written and signed promise to appear in court or
his or her written and signed promise to respond to a notice of civil
infraction is guilty of a misdemeanor regardless of the disposition of the
notice of civil infraction. A written promise to appear in court or a written
promise to respond to a notice of civil infraction may be complied with by an
appearance by counsel.

(3) A
person who willfully fails to pay a monetary penalty or to perform community ((service))
restitution as required by a court under this chapter may be found in
contempt of court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 7.84.110 and 1987 c
380 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An order entered
after the receipt of a response which does not contest the determination, or
after it has been established at a hearing that the infraction was committed,
or after a hearing for the purpose of explaining mitigating circumstances, is
civil in nature.

(2) The court may, in
its discretion, waive, reduce, or suspend the monetary penalty prescribed for
the infraction. At the person's request, the court may order performance of a
number of hours of community ((service)) restitution in lieu of a
monetary penalty, at the rate of the then state minimum wage per hour.

Sec. 4. RCW 7.84.130 and 1987 c
380 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Failure to pay a
monetary penalty assessed by a court under the provisions of this chapter is a
misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) Failure to complete
community ((service)) restitution ordered by a court under the
provisions of this chapter is a misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 5. RCW 9.94A.030 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 301, 2001 c 300 s 3, and 2001 c 7 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Board"
means the indeterminate sentence review board created under chapter 9.95 RCW.

(2)
"Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit,"
or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection agreement
authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring and enforcing the
offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial obligation, receiving
payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with current law, delivering
daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk without depositing it in a
departmental account.

(3)
"Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(4) "Community
corrections officer" means an employee of the department who is responsible
for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced offenders and
monitoring of sentence conditions.

(5) "Community
custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence of confinement in
lieu of earned release time or imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b),
9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670, 9.94A.690, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or
9.94A.545, served in the community subject to controls placed on the offender's
movement and activities by the department. For offenders placed on community
custody for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department shall
assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and modify conditions
of community custody, in addition to those imposed by the court, based upon the
risk to community safety.

(6) "Community
custody range" means the minimum and maximum period of community custody
included as part of a sentence under RCW 9.94A.715, as established by the
commission or the legislature under RCW 9.94A.850, for crimes committed on or
after July 1, 2000.

(7) "Community
placement" means that period during which the offender is subject to the
conditions of community custody and/or postrelease supervision, which begins
either upon completion of the term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or at
such time as the offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned
release. Community placement may consist of entirely community custody,
entirely postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.

(8) "Community ((service))
restitution" means compulsory service, without compensation,
performed for the benefit of the community by the offender.

(9) "Community
supervision" means a period of time during which a convicted offender is
subject to crime-related prohibitions and other sentence conditions imposed by
a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW 16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the
court finds that any offender has a chemical dependency that has contributed to
his or her offense, the conditions of supervision may, subject to available resources,
include treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for out-of-state
supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community supervision
is the functional equivalent of probation and should be considered the same as
probation by other states.

(10)
"Confinement" means total or partial confinement.

(11)
"Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles 10 or
13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of
a plea of guilty.

(12) "Crime-related
prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting conduct that directly
relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the offender has been
convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders directing an offender
affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor compliance
with the order of a court may be required by the department.

(13) "Criminal
history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions and juvenile
adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or elsewhere. The
history shall include, where known, for each conviction (a) whether the
defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms thereof; and
(b) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of
incarceration.

(14) "Day
fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that equals the
difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable
obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any
dependents.

(15) "Day
reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to monitor the
offender's daily activities and compliance with sentence conditions, and in
which the offender is required to report daily to a specific location
designated by the department or the sentencing court.

(16)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(17) "Determinate
sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude the number of
actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial confinement, of
community supervision, the number of actual hours or days of community ((service))
restitution work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation.
The fact that an offender through earned release can reduce the actual period
of confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a
determinate sentence.

(18) "Disposable
earnings" means that part of the earnings of an offender remaining after
the deduction from those earnings of any amount required by law to be
withheld. For the purposes of this definition, "earnings" means
compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as
wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and, notwithstanding any
other provision of law making the payments exempt from garnishment, attachment,
or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation,
specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement
programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050, or Title
74 RCW.

(19) "Drug
offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option available to
persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent offense or a sex
offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW 9.94A.660.

(20) "Drug
offense" means:

(a) Any felony
violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(d)) or forged prescription for a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.403);

(b) Any offense defined
as a felony under federal law that relates to the possession, manufacture,
distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance; or

(c) Any out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(21) "Earned
release" means earned release from confinement as provided in RCW
9.94A.728.

(22) "Escape"
means:

(a) Sexually violent
predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110),
escape in the second degree (RCW 9A.76.120), willful failure to return from
furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful failure to return from work release (RCW
72.65.070), or willful failure to be available for supervision by the
department while in community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this subsection.

(23) "Felony
traffic offense" means:

(a) Vehicular homicide
(RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding a police officer
(RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(24) "Fine"
means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the
offender to the court over a specific period of time.

(25) "First-time
offender" means any person who has no prior convictions for a felony and
is eligible for the first-time offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.

(26) "Home detention"
means a program of partial confinement available to offenders wherein the
offender is confined in a private residence subject to electronic surveillance.

(27) "Legal
financial obligation" means a sum of money that is ordered by a superior
court of the state of Washington for legal financial obligations which may
include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed crime victims'
compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or
interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense,
fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a
result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or
vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial obligations may also include payment
to a public agency of the expense of an emergency response to the incident resulting
in the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.

(28) "Most serious
offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit
any of the following felonies:

(a) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation of or criminal
conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b) Assault in the
second degree;

(c) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(d) Child molestation
in the second degree;

(e) Controlled
substance homicide;

(f) Extortion in the
first degree;

(g) Incest when
committed against a child under age fourteen;

(h) Indecent liberties;

(i) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(j) Leading organized
crime;

(k) Manslaughter in the
first degree;

(l) Manslaughter in the
second degree;

(m) Promoting prostitution
in the first degree;

(n) Rape in the third
degree;

(o) Robbery in the
second degree;

(p) Sexual
exploitation;

(q) Vehicular assault,
when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving
of a vehicle in a reckless manner;

(r) Vehicular homicide,
when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502,
or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(s) Any other class B
felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation;

(t) Any other felony
with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.602;

(u) Any felony offense
in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is comparable to a most
serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(v)(i) A prior
conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c),
chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW
9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11,
1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986,
until July 1, 1988;

(ii) A prior conviction
for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11,
1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was committed against a child
under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and
perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997, or RCW
9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993, through July 27,
1997.

(29) "Nonviolent
offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.

(30)
"Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by
state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is less than eighteen years
of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030
or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms
"offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.

(31) "Partial
confinement" means confinement for no more than one year in a facility or
institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit
of government, or, if home detention or work crew has been ordered by the
court, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the
balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work
release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and home
detention.

(32) "Persistent
offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i) Has been
convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious offense; and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this state or
elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be considered
most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score under RCW
9.94A.525; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one
conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i) Has been
convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the first
degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible compulsion;
(B) any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder
in the first degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping
in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first degree,
or burglary in the first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed
in this subsection (32)(b)(i); and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or elsewhere, of an
offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection or any federal or out-of-state
offense or offense under prior Washington law that is comparable to the
offenses listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child
in the first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the offender
committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second degree
constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender
was eighteen years of age or older when the offender committed the offense.

(33) "Postrelease
supervision" is that portion of an offender's community placement that is
not community custody.

(34)
"Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specified period of time
as payment of damages. The sum may include both public and private costs.

(35) "Risk
assessment" means the application of an objective instrument supported by
research and adopted by the department for the purpose of assessing an
offender's risk of reoffense, taking into consideration the nature of the harm
done by the offender, place and circumstances of the offender related to risk,
the offender's relationship to any victim, and any information provided to the
department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not be based on
unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

(36) "Serious
traffic offense" means:

(a) Driving while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), actual
physical control while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended
vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or

(b) Any federal,
out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the
laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(37) "Serious
violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and means:

(a)(i) Murder in the
first degree;

(ii) Homicide by abuse;

(iii) Murder in the
second degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(v) Assault in the
first degree;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
first degree;

(vii) Rape in the first
degree;

(viii) Assault of a
child in the first degree; or

(ix) An attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of these felonies;
or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(38) "Sex
offense" means:

(a)(i) A felony that is
a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than RCW 9A.44.130(11);

(ii) A violation of RCW
9A.64.020;

(iii) A felony that is
a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than RCW 9.68A.070 or 9.68A.080; or

(iv) A felony that is,
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal
conspiracy to commit such crimes;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this subsection;

(c) A felony with a
finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or

(d) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this subsection.

(39) "Sexual
motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the defendant
committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification.

(40) "Standard
sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in
imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(41) "Statutory
maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time for which an offender
may be confined as punishment for a crime as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW,
RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the crime, or other statute defining the
maximum penalty for a crime.

(42) "Total
confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries of a
facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any
other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW
72.64.050 and 72.64.060.

(43) "Transition
training" means written and verbal instructions and assistance provided by
the department to the offender during the two weeks prior to the offender's
successful completion of the work ethic camp program. The transition training
shall include instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations
during the offender's period of community custody.

(44) "Victim"
means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or
financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the crime charged.

(45) "Violent
offense" means:

(a) Any of the
following felonies:

(i) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony;

(ii) Criminal
solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(iii) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the second degree;

(v) Indecent liberties
if committed by forcible compulsion;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(vii) Arson in the
second degree;

(viii) Assault in the
second degree;

(ix) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(x) Extortion in the
first degree;

(xi) Robbery in the
second degree;

(xii) Drive-by shooting;

(xiii) Vehicular
assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner; and

(xiv) Vehicular
homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of this
subsection; and

(c) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b) of this
subsection.

(46) "Work
crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of civic
improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that complies with RCW
9.94A.725.

(47) "Work ethic
camp" means an alternative incarceration program as provided in RCW
9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by
requiring offenders to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and
vocational experiences, character-building work ethics training, life
management skills development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling,
literacy training, and basic adult education.

(48) "Work
release" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders who
are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study at school.

Sec. 6. RCW 9.94A.505 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 312 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a person is
convicted of a felony, the court shall impose punishment as provided in this
chapter.

(2)(a) The court shall
impose a sentence as provided in the following sections and as applicable in
the case:

(i) Unless another term
of confinement applies, the court shall impose a sentence within the standard
sentence range established in RCW 9.94A.510;

(ii) RCW 9.94A.700 and
9.94A.705, relating to community placement;

(iii) RCW 9.94A.710 and
9.94A.715, relating to community custody;

(iv) RCW 9.94A.545,
relating to community custody for offenders whose term of confinement is one
year or less;

(v) RCW 9.94A.570,
relating to persistent offenders;

(vi) RCW 9.94A.540,
relating to mandatory minimum terms;

(vii) RCW 9.94A.650,
relating to the first-time offender waiver;

(viii) RCW 9.94A.660,
relating to the drug offender sentencing alternative;

(ix) RCW 9.94A.670,
relating to the special sex offender sentencing alternative;

(x) RCW 9.94A.712,
relating to certain sex offenses;

(xi) RCW 9.94A.535,
relating to exceptional sentences;

(xii) RCW 9.94A.589, relating
to consecutive and concurrent sentences.

(b) If a standard
sentence range has not been established for the offender's crime, the court
shall impose a determinate sentence which may include not more than one year of
confinement; community ((service)) restitution work; until July
1, 2000, a term of community supervision not to exceed one year and on and
after July 1, 2000, a term of community custody not to exceed one year, subject
to conditions and sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.710 (2) and (3); and/or
other legal financial obligations. The court may impose a sentence which
provides more than one year of confinement if the court finds reasons
justifying an exceptional sentence as provided in RCW 9.94A.535.

(3) If the court
imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty days or less, the court may,
in its discretion, specify that the sentence be served on consecutive or
intermittent days. A sentence requiring more than thirty days of confinement
shall be served on consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule
court-ordered intermittent sentences as space permits.

(4) If a sentence
imposed includes payment of a legal financial obligation, it shall be imposed
as provided in RCW 9.94A.750, 9.94A.753, and 9.94A.760.

(5) Except as provided
under RCW 9.94A.750(4) and 9.94A.753(4), a court may not impose a sentence
providing for a term of confinement or community supervision, community
placement, or community custody which exceeds the statutory maximum for the
crime as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(6) The sentencing
court shall give the offender credit for all confinement time served before the
sentencing if that confinement was solely in regard to the offense for which
the offender is being sentenced.

(7) The court shall
order restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.750 and 9.94A.753.

(8) As a part of any
sentence, the court may impose and enforce crime-related prohibitions and
affirmative conditions as provided in this chapter.

(9) The court may order
an offender whose sentence includes community placement or community
supervision to undergo a mental status evaluation and to participate in
available outpatient mental health treatment, if the court finds that
reasonable grounds exist to believe that the offender is a mentally ill person
as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and that this condition is likely to have
influenced the offense. An order requiring mental status evaluation or
treatment must be based on a presentence report and, if applicable, mental
status evaluations that have been filed with the court to determine the
offender's competency or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may
order additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.

(10) In any sentence of
partial confinement, the court may require the offender to serve the partial
confinement in work release, in a program of home detention, on work crew, or
in a combined program of work crew and home detention.

(11) In sentencing an
offender convicted of a crime of domestic violence, as defined in RCW
10.99.020, if the offender has a minor child, or if the victim of the offense
for which the offender was convicted has a minor child, the court may, as part
of any term of community supervision, community placement, or community
custody, order the offender to participate in a domestic violence perpetrator
program approved under RCW 26.50.150.

Sec. 7. RCW 9.94A.589 and 2000 c
28 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as
provided in (b) or (c) of this subsection, whenever a person is to be sentenced
for two or more current offenses, the sentence range for each current offense
shall be determined by using all other current and prior convictions as if they
were prior convictions for the purpose of the offender score: PROVIDED, That
if the court enters a finding that some or all of the current offenses
encompass the same criminal conduct then those current offenses shall be
counted as one crime. Sentences imposed under this subsection shall be served
concurrently. Consecutive sentences may only be imposed under the exceptional
sentence provisions of RCW 9.94A.535. "Same criminal conduct," as
used in this subsection, means two or more crimes that require the same
criminal intent, are committed at the same time and place, and involve the same
victim. This definition applies in cases involving vehicular assault or
vehicular homicide even if the victims occupied the same vehicle.

(b) Whenever a person
is convicted of two or more serious violent offenses arising from separate and
distinct criminal conduct, the standard sentence range for the offense with the
highest seriousness level under RCW 9.94A.515 shall be determined using the
offender's prior convictions and other current convictions that are not serious
violent offenses in the offender score and the standard sentence range for
other serious violent offenses shall be determined by using an offender score
of zero. The standard sentence range for any offenses that are not serious
violent offenses shall be determined according to (a) of this subsection. All
sentences imposed under (b) of this subsection shall be served consecutively to
each other and concurrently with sentences imposed under (a) of this
subsection.

(c) If an offender is
convicted under RCW 9.41.040 for unlawful possession of a firearm in the first
or second degree and for the felony crimes of theft of a firearm or possession
of a stolen firearm, or both, the standard sentence range for each of these
current offenses shall be determined by using all other current and prior
convictions, except other current convictions for the felony crimes listed in
this subsection (1)(c), as if they were prior convictions. The offender shall
serve consecutive sentences for each conviction of the felony crimes listed in
this subsection (1)(c), and for each firearm unlawfully possessed.

(2)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, whenever a person while under sentence for
conviction of a felony commits another felony and is sentenced to another term
of confinement, the latter term shall not begin until expiration of all prior
terms.

(b) Whenever a second
or later felony conviction results in community supervision with conditions not
currently in effect, under the prior sentence or sentences of community
supervision the court may require that the conditions of community supervision
contained in the second or later sentence begin during the immediate term of
community supervision and continue throughout the duration of the consecutive
term of community supervision.

(3) Subject to
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, whenever a person is sentenced for a
felony that was committed while the person was not under sentence for
conviction of a felony, the sentence shall run concurrently with any felony
sentence which has been imposed by any court in this or another state or by a
federal court subsequent to the commission of the crime being sentenced unless
the court pronouncing the current sentence expressly orders that they be served
consecutively.

(4) Whenever any person
granted probation under RCW 9.95.210 or 9.92.060, or both, has the probationary
sentence revoked and a prison sentence imposed, that sentence shall run
consecutively to any sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter, unless the court
pronouncing the subsequent sentence expressly orders that they be served
concurrently.

(5) In the case of
consecutive sentences, all periods of total confinement shall be served before
any partial confinement, community ((service)) restitution,
community supervision, or any other requirement or conditions of any of the
sentences. Except for exceptional sentences as authorized under RCW 9.94A.535,
if two or more sentences that run consecutively include periods of community
supervision, the aggregate of the community supervision period shall not exceed
twenty-four months.

Sec. 8. RCW 9.94A.634 and 1998 c
260 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If an offender
violates any condition or requirement of a sentence, the court may modify its
order of judgment and sentence and impose further punishment in accordance with
this section.

(2) In cases where
conditions from a second or later sentence of community supervision begin prior
to the term of the second or later sentence, the court shall treat a violation
of such conditions as a violation of the sentence of community supervision
currently being served.

(3) If an offender
fails to comply with any of the requirements or conditions of a sentence the
following provisions apply:

(a)(i) Following the
violation, if the offender and the department make a stipulated agreement, the
department may impose sanctions such as work release, home detention with
electronic monitoring, work crew, community ((service)) restitution,
inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling
sessions, supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, jail time, or
other sanctions available in the community.

(ii) Within seventy-two
hours of signing the stipulated agreement, the department shall submit a report
to the court and the prosecuting attorney outlining the violation or
violations, and sanctions imposed. Within fifteen days of receipt of the report,
if the court is not satisfied with the sanctions, the court may schedule a
hearing and may modify the department's sanctions. If this occurs, the
offender may withdraw from the stipulated agreement.

(iii) If the offender
fails to comply with the sanction administratively imposed by the department,
the court may take action regarding the original noncompliance. Offender
failure to comply with the sanction administratively imposed by the department
may be considered an additional violation.

(b) In the absence of a
stipulated agreement, or where the court is not satisfied with the department's
sanctions as provided in (a) of this subsection, the court, upon the motion of
the state, or upon its own motion, shall require the offender to show cause why
the offender should not be punished for the noncompliance. The court may issue
a summons or a warrant of arrest for the offender's appearance;

(c) The state has the
burden of showing noncompliance by a preponderance of the evidence. If the
court finds that the violation has occurred, it may order the offender to be
confined for a period not to exceed sixty days for each violation, and may (i)
convert a term of partial confinement to total confinement, (ii) convert
community ((service)) restitution obligation to total or partial
confinement, (iii) convert monetary obligations, except restitution and the
crime victim penalty assessment, to community ((service)) restitution
hours at the rate of the state minimum wage as established in RCW 49.46.020 for
each hour of community ((service)) restitution, or (iv) order one
or more of the penalties authorized in (a)(i) of this subsection. Any time
served in confinement awaiting a hearing on noncompliance shall be credited
against any confinement order by the court;

(d) If the court finds
that the violation was not willful, the court may modify its previous order
regarding payment of legal financial obligations and regarding community ((service))
restitution obligations; and

(e) If the violation
involves a failure to undergo or comply with mental status evaluation and/or
outpatient mental health treatment, the community corrections officer shall
consult with the treatment provider or proposed treatment provider.
Enforcement of orders concerning outpatient mental health treatment must
reflect the availability of treatment and must pursue the least restrictive
means of promoting participation in treatment. If the offender's failure to
receive care essential for health and safety presents a risk of serious physical
harm or probable harmful consequences, the civil detention and commitment
procedures of chapter 71.05 RCW shall be considered in preference to
incarceration in a local or state correctional facility.

(4) The community
corrections officer may obtain information from the offender's mental health
treatment provider on the offender's status with respect to evaluation,
application for services, registration for services, and compliance with the
supervision plan, without the offender's consent, as described under RCW
71.05.630.

(5) An offender under
community placement or community supervision who is civilly detained under
chapter 71.05 RCW, and subsequently discharged or conditionally released to the
community, shall be under the supervision of the department of corrections for
the duration of his or her period of community placement or community
supervision. During any period of inpatient mental health treatment that falls
within the period of community placement or community supervision, the
inpatient treatment provider and the supervising community corrections officer
shall notify each other about the offender's discharge, release, and legal
status, and shall share other relevant information.

(6) Nothing in this
section prohibits the filing of escape charges if appropriate.

Sec. 9. RCW 9.94A.650 and 2000 c
28 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section
applies to offenders who have never been previously convicted of a felony in
this state, federal court, or another state, and who have never participated in
a program of deferred prosecution for a felony, and who are convicted of a
felony that is not:

(a) Classified as a
violent offense or a sex offense under this chapter;

(b) Manufacture,
delivery, or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled
substance classified in Schedule I or II that is a narcotic drug or
flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV;

(c) Manufacture,
delivery, or possession with intent to deliver a methamphetamine, its salts,
isomers, and salts of its isomers as defined in RCW 69.50.206(d)(2); or

(d) The selling for
profit of any controlled substance or counterfeit substance classified in
Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of marihuana.

(2) In sentencing a
first-time offender the court may waive the imposition of a sentence within the
standard sentence range and impose a sentence which may include up to ninety
days of confinement in a facility operated or utilized under contract by the
county and a requirement that the offender refrain from committing new
offenses. The sentence may also include a term of community supervision or
community custody as specified in subsection (3) of this section, which, in
addition to crime-related prohibitions, may include requirements that the
offender perform any one or more of the following:

(a) Devote time to a
specific employment or occupation;

(b) Undergo available
outpatient treatment for up to the period specified in subsection (3) of this
section, or inpatient treatment not to exceed the standard range of confinement
for that offense;

(c) Pursue a
prescribed, secular course of study or vocational training;

(d) Remain within
prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the community corrections officer
prior to any change in the offender's address or employment;

(e) Report as directed
to a community corrections officer; or

(f) Pay all
court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030 and/or
perform community ((service)) restitution work.

(3) The terms and
statuses applicable to sentences under subsection (2) of this section are:

(a) For sentences
imposed on or after July 25, 1999, for crimes committed before July 1, 2000, up
to one year of community supervision. If treatment is ordered, the period of
community supervision may include up to the period of treatment, but shall not
exceed two years; and

(b) For crimes
committed on or after July 1, 2000, up to one year of community custody unless
treatment is ordered, in which case the period of community custody may include
up to the period of treatment, but shall not exceed two years. Any term of
community custody imposed under this section is subject to conditions and
sanctions as authorized in this section and in RCW 9.94A.715 (2) and (3).

(4) The department
shall discharge from community supervision any offender sentenced under this
section before July 25, 1999, who has served at least one year of community
supervision and has completed any treatment ordered by the court.

Sec. 10. RCW 9.94A.660 and 2001 c
10 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An offender is
eligible for the special drug offender sentencing alternative if:

(a) The offender is
convicted of a felony that is not a violent offense or sex offense and the
violation does not involve a sentence enhancement under RCW 9.94A.510 (3) or
(4);

(b) The offender has no
current or prior convictions for a sex offense or violent offense in this
state, another state, or the United States;

(c) For a violation of
the Uniform Controlled Substances Act under chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal
solicitation to commit such a violation under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the offense
involved only a small quantity of the particular controlled substance as
determined by the judge upon consideration of such factors as the weight,
purity, packaging, sale price, and street value of the controlled substance;
and

(d) The offender has
not been found by the United States attorney general to be subject to a
deportation detainer or order and does not become subject to a deportation
order during the period of the sentence.

(2) If the standard
sentence range is greater than one year and the sentencing court determines
that the offender is eligible for this alternative and that the offender and
the community will benefit from the use of the alternative, the judge may waive
imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range and impose a
sentence that must include a period of total confinement in a state facility
for one-half of the midpoint of the standard sentence range. During
incarceration in the state facility, offenders sentenced under this subsection
shall undergo a comprehensive substance abuse assessment and receive, within
available resources, treatment services appropriate for the offender. The
treatment services shall be designed by the division of alcohol and substance
abuse of the department of social and health services, in cooperation with the
department of corrections.

The court shall also
impose:

(a) The remainder of
the midpoint of the standard range as a term of community custody which must
include appropriate substance abuse treatment in a program that has been
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of
social and health services;

(b) Crime-related
prohibitions including a condition not to use illegal controlled substances;

(c) A requirement to
submit to urinalysis or other testing to monitor that status; and

(d) A term of community
custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.715 to be imposed upon failure to complete or
administrative termination from the special drug offender sentencing
alternative program.

The court may prohibit
the offender from using alcohol or controlled substances and may require that
the monitoring for controlled substances be conducted by the department or by a
treatment alternatives to street crime program or a comparable court or
agency-referred program. The offender may be required to pay thirty dollars
per month while on community custody to offset the cost of monitoring. In
addition, the court shall impose three or more of the following conditions:

(i) Devote time to a
specific employment or training;

(ii) Remain within
prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the community corrections
officer before any change in the offender's address or employment;

(iii) Report as
directed to a community corrections officer;

(iv) Pay all
court-ordered legal financial obligations;

(v) Perform community
((service)) restitution work;

(vi) Stay out of areas
designated by the sentencing court;

(vii) Such other
conditions as the court may require such as affirmative conditions.

(3) If the offender
violates any of the sentence conditions in subsection (2) of this section or is
found by the United States attorney general to be subject to a deportation
order, a violation hearing shall be held by the department unless waived by the
offender.

(a) If the department
finds that conditions have been willfully violated, the offender may be
reclassified to serve the remaining balance of the original sentence.

(b) If the department
finds that the offender is subject to a valid deportation order, the department
may administratively terminate the offender from the program and reclassify the
offender to serve the remaining balance of the original sentence.

(4) The department
shall determine the rules for calculating the value of a day fine based on the
offender's income and reasonable obligations which the offender has for the
support of the offender and any dependents. These rules shall be developed in
consultation with the administrator for the courts, the office of financial
management, and the commission.

(5) An offender who
fails to complete the special drug offender sentencing alternative program or
who is administratively terminated from the program shall be reclassified to
serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence as ordered by the sentencing court
and shall be subject to all rules relating to earned release time. An offender
who violates any conditions of supervision as defined by the department shall
be sanctioned. Sanctions may include, but are not limited to, reclassifying
the offender to serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence as ordered by
the sentencing court. If an offender is reclassified to serve the unexpired
term of his or her sentence, the offender shall be subject to all rules
relating to earned release time.

Sec. 11. RCW 9.94A.670 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 316 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply to this
section only.

(a) "Sex offender
treatment provider" or "treatment provider" means a certified
sex offender treatment provider as defined in RCW 18.155.020.

(b) "Victim"
means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or
financial injury to person or property as a result of the crime charged.
"Victim" also means a parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor
child unless the parent or guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.

(2) An offender is
eligible for the special sex offender sentencing alternative if:

(a) The offender has
been convicted of a sex offense other than a violation of RCW 9A.44.050 or a
sex offense that is also a serious violent offense;

(b) The offender has no
prior convictions for a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 or any other
felony sex offenses in this or any other state; and

(c) The offender's
standard sentence range for the offense includes the possibility of confinement
for less than eleven years.

(3) If the court finds
the offender is eligible for this alternative, the court, on its own motion or
the motion of the state or the offender, may order an examination to determine
whether the offender is amenable to treatment.

(a) The report of the
examination shall include at a minimum the following:

(i) The offender's
version of the facts and the official version of the facts;

(ii) The offender's
offense history;

(iii) An assessment of
problems in addition to alleged deviant behaviors;

(iv) The offender's
social and employment situation; and

(v) Other evaluation
measures used.

The report shall set forth
the sources of the examiner's information.

(b) The examiner shall
assess and report regarding the offender's amenability to treatment and
relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall be provided
and shall include, at a minimum:

(i) Frequency and type
of contact between offender and therapist;

(ii) Specific issues to
be addressed in the treatment and description of planned treatment modalities;

(iii) Monitoring plans,
including any requirements regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements,
and monitoring by family members and others;

(iv) Anticipated length
of treatment; and

(v) Recommended
crime-related prohibitions.

(c) The court on its
own motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order, a second examination
regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The examiner shall be
selected by the party making the motion. The offender shall pay the cost of
any second examination ordered unless the court finds the defendant to be
indigent in which case the state shall pay the cost.

(4) After receipt of
the reports, the court shall consider whether the offender and the community
will benefit from use of this alternative and consider the victim's opinion
whether the offender should receive a treatment disposition under this
section. If the court determines that this alternative is appropriate, the
court shall then impose a sentence or, pursuant to RCW 9.94A.712, a minimum
term of sentence, within the standard sentence range. If the sentence imposed
is less than eleven years of confinement, the court may suspend the execution
of the sentence and impose the following conditions of suspension:

(a) The court shall
place the offender on community custody for the length of the suspended
sentence, the length of the maximum term imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.712, or
three years, whichever is greater, and require the offender to comply with any
conditions imposed by the department under RCW 9.94A.720.

(b) The court shall
order treatment for any period up to three years in duration. The court, in
its discretion, shall order outpatient sex offender treatment or inpatient sex
offender treatment, if available. A community mental health center may not be
used for such treatment unless it has an appropriate program designed for sex
offender treatment. The offender shall not change sex offender treatment
providers or treatment conditions without first notifying the prosecutor, the
community corrections officer, and the court. If any party or the court
objects to a proposed change, the offender shall not change providers or
conditions without court approval after a hearing.

(5) As conditions of
the suspended sentence, the court may impose one or more of the following:

(a) Up to six months of
confinement, not to exceed the sentence range of confinement for that offense;

(b) Crime-related
prohibitions;

(c) Require the
offender to devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(d) Remain within
prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the community
corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(e) Report as directed
to the court and a community corrections officer;

(f) Pay all
court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030;

(g) Perform community
((service)) restitution work; or

(h) Reimburse the
victim for the cost of any counseling required as a result of the offender's
crime.

(6) At the time of
sentencing, the court shall set a treatment termination hearing for three
months prior to the anticipated date for completion of treatment.

(7) The sex offender
treatment provider shall submit quarterly reports on the offender's progress in
treatment to the court and the parties. The report shall reference the
treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of attendance,
offender's compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the offender's
relative progress in treatment, and any other material specified by the court
at sentencing.

(8) Prior to the
treatment termination hearing, the treatment provider and community corrections
officer shall submit written reports to the court and parties regarding the
offender's compliance with treatment and monitoring requirements, and
recommendations regarding termination from treatment, including proposed
community custody conditions. Either party may request, and the court may
order, another evaluation regarding the advisability of termination from
treatment. The offender shall pay the cost of any additional evaluation
ordered unless the court finds the offender to be indigent in which case the
state shall pay the cost. At the treatment termination hearing the court may:
(a) Modify conditions of community custody, and either (b) terminate treatment,
or (c) extend treatment for up to the remaining period of community custody.

(9) If a violation of
conditions occurs during community custody, the department shall either impose
sanctions as provided for in RCW 9.94A.737(2)(a) or refer the violation to the
court and recommend revocation of the suspended sentence as provided for in
subsections (6) and (8) of this section.

(10) The court may
revoke the suspended sentence at any time during the period of community
custody and order execution of the sentence if: (a) The offender violates the
conditions of the suspended sentence, or (b) the court finds that the offender
is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment. All confinement time
served during the period of community custody shall be credited to the offender
if the suspended sentence is revoked.

(11) Examinations and
treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall only be conducted by sex
offender treatment providers certified by the department of health pursuant to
chapter 18.155 RCW unless the court finds that:

(a) The offender has
already moved to another state or plans to move to another state for reasons
other than circumventing the certification requirements; or

(b)(i) No certified
providers are available for treatment within a reasonable geographical distance
of the offender's home; and

(ii) The evaluation and
treatment plan comply with this section and the rules adopted by the department
of health.

(12) If the offender is
less than eighteen years of age when the charge is filed, the state shall pay
for the cost of initial evaluation and treatment.

Sec. 12. RCW 9.94A.680 and 1999 c
197 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Alternatives to total
confinement are available for offenders with sentences of one year or less.
These alternatives include the following sentence conditions that the court may
order as substitutes for total confinement:

(1) One day of partial
confinement may be substituted for one day of total confinement;

(2) In addition, for
offenders convicted of nonviolent offenses only, eight hours of community ((service))
restitution may be substituted for one day of total confinement, with a
maximum conversion limit of two hundred forty hours or thirty days. Community
((service)) restitution hours must be completed within the period
of community supervision or a time period specified by the court, which shall
not exceed twenty-four months, pursuant to a schedule determined by the
department; and

(3) For offenders convicted
of nonviolent and nonsex offenses, the court may authorize county jails to
convert jail confinement to an available county supervised community option and
may require the offender to perform affirmative conduct pursuant to RCW
9.94A.607.

For sentences of
nonviolent offenders for one year or less, the court shall consider and give
priority to available alternatives to total confinement and shall state its
reasons in writing on the judgment and sentence form if the alternatives are
not used.

Sec. 13. RCW 9.94A.700 and 2000 c
28 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

When a court sentences
an offender to a term of total confinement in the custody of the department for
any of the offenses specified in this section, the court shall also sentence
the offender to a term of community placement as provided in this section.

(1) The court shall
order a one-year term of community placement for the following:

(a) A sex offense or a
serious violent offense committed after July 1, 1988, but before July 1, 1990;
or

(b) An offense
committed on or after July 1, 1988, but before July 25, 1999, that is:

(i) Assault in the
second degree;

(ii) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(iii) A crime against
persons where it is determined in accordance with RCW 9.94A.602 that the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon at the time of
commission; or

(iv) A felony offense
under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660.

(2) The court shall
sentence the offender to a term of community placement of two years or up to
the period of earned release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728, whichever is
longer, for:

(a) An offense
categorized as a sex offense committed on or after July 1, 1990, but before
June 6, 1996, including those sex offenses also included in other offense
categories;

(b) A serious violent
offense other than a sex offense committed on or after July 1, 1990, but before
July 1, 2000; or

(c) A vehicular
homicide or vehicular assault committed on or after July 1, 1990, but before
July 1, 2000.

(3) The community
placement ordered under this section shall begin either upon completion of the
term of confinement or at such time as the offender is transferred to community
custody in lieu of earned release. When the court sentences an offender to the
statutory maximum sentence then the community placement portion of the sentence
shall consist entirely of the community custody to which the offender may
become eligible. Any period of community custody actually served shall be
credited against the community placement portion of the sentence.

(4) Unless a condition
is waived by the court, the terms of any community placement imposed under this
section shall include the following conditions:

(a) The offender shall
report to and be available for contact with the assigned community corrections
officer as directed;

(b) The offender shall
work at department-approved education, employment, or community ((service))
restitution, or any combination thereof;

(c) The offender shall
not possess or consume controlled substances except pursuant to lawfully issued
prescriptions;

(d) The offender shall
pay supervision fees as determined by the department; and

(e) The residence
location and living arrangements shall be subject to the prior approval of the
department during the period of community placement.

(5) As a part of any
terms of community placement imposed under this section, the court may also
order one or more of the following special conditions:

(a) The offender shall
remain within, or outside of, a specified geographical boundary;

(b) The offender shall
not have direct or indirect contact with the victim of the crime or a specified
class of individuals;

(c) The offender shall
participate in crime-related treatment or counseling services;

(d) The offender shall
not consume alcohol; or

(e) The offender shall
comply with any crime-related prohibitions.

(6) An offender
convicted of a felony sex offense against a minor victim after June 6, 1996, shall
comply with any terms and conditions of community placement imposed by the
department relating to contact between the sex offender and a minor victim or a
child of similar age or circumstance as a previous victim.

(7) Prior to or during
community placement, upon recommendation of the department, the sentencing
court may remove or modify any conditions of community placement so as not to
be more restrictive.

Sec. 14. RCW 9.94A.720 and 2000 c
28 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) All offenders
sentenced to terms involving community supervision, community ((service))
restitution, community placement, community custody, or legal financial
obligation shall be under the supervision of the department and shall follow
explicitly the instructions and conditions of the department. The department
may require an offender to perform affirmative acts it deems appropriate to
monitor compliance with the conditions of the sentence imposed.

(b) The instructions
shall include, at a minimum, reporting as directed to a community corrections
officer, remaining within prescribed geographical boundaries, notifying the
community corrections officer of any change in the offender's address or
employment, and paying the supervision fee assessment.

(c) For offenders
sentenced to terms involving community custody for crimes committed on or after
June 6, 1996, the department may include, in addition to the instructions in
(b) of this subsection, any appropriate conditions of supervision, including
but not limited to, prohibiting the offender from having contact with any other
specified individuals or specific class of individuals.

(d) For offenders
sentenced to terms of community custody for crimes committed on or after July
1, 2000, the department may impose conditions as specified in RCW 9.94A.715.

The conditions
authorized under (c) of this subsection may be imposed by the department prior
to or during an offender's community custody term. If a violation of
conditions imposed by the court or the department pursuant to RCW 9.94A.710
occurs during community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of community
placement for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.740 and shall authorize the department
to transfer an offender to a more restrictive confinement status as provided in
RCW 9.94A.737. At any time prior to the completion of an offender's term of
community custody, the department may recommend to the court that any or all of
the conditions imposed by the court or the department pursuant to RCW 9.94A.710
or 9.94A.715 be continued beyond the expiration of the offender's term of
community custody as authorized in RCW 9.94A.715 (3) or (5).

The department may
require offenders to pay for special services rendered on or after July 25,
1993, including electronic monitoring, day reporting, and telephone reporting,
dependent upon the offender's ability to pay. The department may pay for these
services for offenders who are not able to pay.

(2) No offender
sentenced to terms involving community supervision, community ((service))
restitution, community custody, or community placement under the
supervision of the department may own, use, or possess firearms or ammunition.
Offenders who own, use, or are found to be in actual or constructive possession
of firearms or ammunition shall be subject to the violation process and
sanctions under RCW 9.94A.634, 9.94A.737, and 9.94A.740. "Constructive
possession" as used in this subsection means the power and intent to
control the firearm or ammunition. "Firearm" as used in this
subsection has the same definition as in RCW 9.41.010.

Sec. 15. RCW 9.94A.737 and 1999 c
196 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If an offender
violates any condition or requirement of community custody, the department may
transfer the offender to a more restrictive confinement status to serve up to
the remaining portion of the sentence, less credit for any period actually
spent in community custody or in detention awaiting disposition of an alleged
violation and subject to the limitations of subsection (2) of this section.

(2)(a) For a sex
offender sentenced to a term of community custody under RCW 9.94A.505(8) who
violates any condition of community custody, the department may impose a
sanction of up to sixty days' confinement in a local correctional facility for
each violation. If the department imposes a sanction, the department shall
submit within seventy-two hours a report to the court and the prosecuting
attorney outlining the violation or violations and the sanctions imposed.

(b) For a sex offender
sentenced to a term of community custody under RCW 9.94A.505(10) who violates
any condition of community custody after having completed his or her maximum
term of total confinement, including time served on community custody in lieu
of earned release, the department may impose a sanction of up to sixty days in
a local correctional facility for each violation.

(c) For an offender
sentenced to a term of community custody under RCW 9.94A.505 (2)(b),
(5), (((7),)) or (11), or under RCW 9.94A.545, for a crime committed on
or after July 1, 2000, who violates any condition of community custody after
having completed his or her maximum term of total confinement, including time
served on community custody in lieu of earned release, the department may
impose a sanction of up to sixty days in total confinement for each violation.
The department may impose sanctions such as work release, home detention with
electronic monitoring, work crew, community ((service)) restitution,
inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling
sessions, supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any other
sanctions available in the community.

(d) For an offender
sentenced to a term of community placement under RCW 9.94A.505(9)(a)(ii) who
violates any condition of community placement after having completed his or her
maximum term of total confinement, including time served on community custody
in lieu of earned release, the department may impose a sanction of up to sixty
days in total confinement for each violation. The department may impose
sanctions such as work release, home detention with electronic monitoring, work
crew, community ((service)) restitution, inpatient treatment,
daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling sessions, supervision
enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any other sanctions available in the
community.

(3) If an offender is
accused of violating any condition or requirement of community custody, he or
she is entitled to a hearing before the department prior to the imposition of
sanctions. The hearing shall be considered as offender disciplinary
proceedings and shall not be subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The department
shall develop hearing procedures and a structure of graduated sanctions.

(4) The hearing
procedures required under subsection (3) of this section shall be developed by
rule and include the following:

(a) Hearing officers
shall report through a chain of command separate from that of community
corrections officers;

(b) The department
shall provide the offender with written notice of the violation, the evidence
relied upon, and the reasons the particular sanction was imposed. The notice
shall include a statement of the rights specified in this subsection, and the
offender's right to file a personal restraint petition under court rules after
the final decision of the department;

(c) The hearing shall
be held unless waived by the offender, and shall be electronically recorded.
For offenders not in total confinement, the hearing shall be held within
fifteen working days, but not less than twenty-four hours, after notice of the
violation. For offenders in total confinement, the hearing shall be held
within five working days, but not less than twenty-four hours, after notice of
the violation;

(d) The offender shall
have the right to: (i) Be present at the hearing; (ii) have the assistance of
a person qualified to assist the offender in the hearing, appointed by the
hearing officer if the offender has a language or communications barrier; (iii)
testify or remain silent; (iv) call witnesses and present documentary evidence;
and (v) question witnesses who appear and testify; and

(e) The sanction shall
take effect if affirmed by the hearing officer. Within seven days after the
hearing officer's decision, the offender may appeal the decision to a panel of
three reviewing officers designated by the secretary or by the secretary's
designee. The sanction shall be reversed or modified if a majority of the
panel finds that the sanction was not reasonably related to any of the
following: (i) The crime of conviction; (ii) the violation committed; (iii)
the offender's risk of reoffending; or (iv) the safety of the community.

(5) For purposes of
this section, no finding of a violation of conditions may be based on
unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

Sec. 16. RCW 9.94A.850 and 2000 c
28 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A sentencing
guidelines commission is established as an agency of state government.

(2) The legislature
finds that the commission, having accomplished its original statutory directive
to implement this chapter, and having expertise in sentencing practice and
policies, shall:

(a) Evaluate state
sentencing policy, to include whether the sentencing ranges and standards are
consistent with and further:

(i) The purposes of
this chapter as defined in RCW 9.94A.010; and

(ii) The intent of the
legislature to emphasize confinement for the violent offender and alternatives
to confinement for the nonviolent offender.

The commission shall
provide the governor and the legislature with its evaluation and
recommendations under this subsection not later than December 1, 1996, and
every two years thereafter;

(b) Recommend to the
legislature revisions or modifications to the standard sentence ranges, state
sentencing policy, prosecuting standards, and other standards. If
implementation of the revisions or modifications would result in exceeding the
capacity of correctional facilities, then the commission shall accompany its
recommendation with an additional list of standard sentence ranges which are
consistent with correction capacity;

(c) Study the existing
criminal code and from time to time make recommendations to the legislature for
modification;

(d)(i) Serve as a
clearinghouse and information center for the collection, preparation, analysis,
and dissemination of information on state and local adult and juvenile
sentencing practices; (ii) develop and maintain a computerized adult and
juvenile sentencing information system by individual superior court judge
consisting of offender, offense, history, and sentence information entered from
judgment and sentence forms for all adult felons; and (iii) conduct ongoing
research regarding adult and juvenile sentencing guidelines, use of total
confinement and alternatives to total confinement, plea bargaining, and other
matters relating to the improvement of the adult criminal justice system and
the juvenile justice system;

(e) Assume the powers
and duties of the juvenile disposition standards commission after June 30,
1996;

(f) Evaluate the
effectiveness of existing disposition standards and related statutes in
implementing policies set forth in RCW 13.40.010 generally, specifically review
the guidelines relating to the confinement of minor and first-time offenders as
well as the use of diversion, and review the application of current and
proposed juvenile sentencing standards and guidelines for potential adverse
impacts on the sentencing outcomes of racial and ethnic minority youth;

(g) Solicit the
comments and suggestions of the juvenile justice community concerning
disposition standards, and make recommendations to the legislature regarding
revisions or modifications of the standards. The evaluations shall be
submitted to the legislature on December 1 of each odd-numbered year. The
department of social and health services shall provide the commission with
available data concerning the implementation of the disposition standards and
related statutes and their effect on the performance of the department's
responsibilities relating to juvenile offenders, and with recommendations for
modification of the disposition standards. The office of the administrator for
the courts shall provide the commission with available data on diversion and
dispositions of juvenile offenders under chapter 13.40 RCW; and

(h) Not later than
December 1, 1997, and at least every two years thereafter, based on available
information, report to the governor and the legislature on:

(i) Racial
disproportionality in juvenile and adult sentencing;

(ii) The capacity of
state and local juvenile and adult facilities and resources; and

(iii) Recidivism
information on adult and juvenile offenders.

(3) Each of the
commission's recommended standard sentence ranges shall include one or more of
the following: Total confinement, partial confinement, community supervision,
community ((service)) restitution, and a fine.

(4) The standard
sentence ranges of total and partial confinement under this chapter are subject
to the following limitations:

(a) If the maximum term
in the range is one year or less, the minimum term in the range shall be no
less than one-third of the maximum term in the range, except that if the
maximum term in the range is ninety days or less, the minimum term may be less
than one-third of the maximum;

(b) If the maximum term
in the range is greater than one year, the minimum term in the range shall be
no less than seventy-five percent of the maximum term in the range, except that
for murder in the second degree in seriousness level XIV under RCW 9.94A.510,
the minimum term in the range shall be no less than fifty percent of the
maximum term in the range; and

(c) The maximum term of
confinement in a range may not exceed the statutory maximum for the crime as
provided in RCW 9A.20.021.

(5)(a) Not later than
December 31, 1999, the commission shall propose to the legislature the initial
community custody ranges to be included in sentences under RCW 9.94A.715 for
crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000. Not later than December 31 of each
year, the commission may propose modifications to the ranges. The ranges shall
be based on the principles in RCW 9.94A.010, and shall take into account the
funds available to the department for community custody. The minimum term in
each range shall not be less than one-half of the maximum term.

(b) The legislature
may, by enactment of a legislative bill, adopt or modify the community custody
ranges proposed by the commission. If the legislature fails to adopt or modify
the initial ranges in its next regular session after they are proposed, the
proposed ranges shall take effect without legislative approval for crimes
committed on or after July 1, 2000.

(c) When the commission
proposes modifications to ranges pursuant to this subsection, the legislature
may, by enactment of a bill, adopt or modify the ranges proposed by the
commission for crimes committed on or after July 1 of the year after they were proposed.
Unless the legislature adopts or modifies the commission's proposal in its next
regular session, the proposed ranges shall not take effect.

(6) The commission
shall exercise its duties under this section in conformity with chapter 34.05
RCW.

Sec. 17. RCW 9.95.435 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 309 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If an offender
released by the board under RCW 9.95.420 violates any condition or requirement
of community custody, the board may transfer the offender to a more restrictive
confinement status to serve up to the remaining portion of the sentence, less
credit for any period actually spent in community custody or in detention
awaiting disposition of an alleged violation and subject to the limitations of
subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Following the
hearing specified in subsection (3) of this section, the board may impose
sanctions such as work release, home detention with electronic monitoring, work
crew, community ((service)) restitution, inpatient treatment,
daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling sessions, supervision
enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any other sanctions available in the
community, or may suspend or revoke the release to community custody whenever
an offender released by the board under RCW 9.95.420 violates any condition or
requirement of community custody.

(3) If an offender
released by the board under RCW 9.95.420 is accused of violating any condition
or requirement of community custody, he or she is entitled to a hearing before
the board prior to the imposition of sanctions. The hearing shall be
considered as offender disciplinary proceedings and shall not be subject to
chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall develop hearing procedures and a structure
of graduated sanctions consistent with the hearing procedures and graduated
sanctions developed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.737. The board may suspend the
offender's release to community custody and confine the offender in a
correctional institution owned, operated by, or operated under contract with
the state prior to the hearing unless the offender has been arrested and
confined for a new criminal offense.

(4) The hearing
procedures required under subsection (3) of this section shall be developed by
rule and include the following:

(a) Hearings shall be
conducted by members of the board unless the board enters into an agreement
with the department to use the hearing officers established under RCW
9.94A.737;

(b) The board shall
provide the offender with written notice of the violation, the evidence relied
upon, and the reasons the particular sanction was imposed. The notice shall
include a statement of the rights specified in this subsection, and the
offender's right to file a personal restraint petition under court rules after
the final decision of the board;

(c) The hearing shall
be held unless waived by the offender, and shall be electronically recorded.
For offenders not in total confinement, the hearing shall be held within
fifteen working days, but not less than twenty-four hours after notice of the
violation. For offenders in total confinement, the hearing shall be held
within five working days, but not less than twenty-four hours after notice of
the violation;

(d) The offender shall
have the right to: (i) Be present at the hearing; (ii) have the assistance of
a person qualified to assist the offender in the hearing, appointed by the
hearing examiner if the offender has a language or communications barrier;
(iii) testify or remain silent; (iv) call witnesses and present documentary
evidence; (v) question witnesses who appear and testify; and (vi) be
represented by counsel if revocation of the release to community custody is a
possible sanction for the violation; and

(e) The sanction shall
take effect if affirmed by the hearing examiner. Within seven days after the
hearing examiner's decision, the offender may appeal the decision to a panel of
three reviewing examiners designated by the chair of the board or by the
chair's designee. The sanction shall be reversed or modified if a majority of
the panel finds that the sanction was not reasonably related to any of the
following: (i) The crime of conviction; (ii) the violation committed; (iii)
the offender's risk of reoffending; or (iv) the safety of the community.

(5) For purposes of
this section, no finding of a violation of conditions may be based on
unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

Sec. 18. RCW 10.98.040 and 1999 c
143 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Arrest and
fingerprint form" means the reporting form prescribed by the
identification, child abuse, and criminal history section to initiate compiling
arrest and identification information.

(2) "Chief law
enforcement officer" includes the sheriff or director of public safety of
a county, the chief of police of a city or town, and chief officers of other
law enforcement agencies operating within the state.

(3)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(4)
"Disposition" means the conclusion of a criminal proceeding at any
stage it occurs in the criminal justice system. Disposition includes but is
not limited to temporary or permanent outcomes such as charges dropped by
police, charges not filed by the prosecuting attorney, deferred prosecution,
defendant absconded, charges filed by the prosecuting attorney pending court
findings such as not guilty, dismissed, guilty, or guilty‑-case appealed
to higher court.

(5) "Disposition
report" means the reporting form prescribed by the identification, child
abuse, and criminal history section to report the legal procedures taken after
completing an arrest and fingerprint form. The disposition report shall
include but not be limited to the following types of information:

(a) The type of disposition;

(b) The statutory
citation for the arrests;

(c) The sentence
structure if the defendant was convicted of a felony;

(d) The state
identification number; and

(e) Identification
information and other information that is prescribed by the identification,
child abuse, and criminal history section.

(6)
"Fingerprints" means the fingerprints taken from arrested or charged
persons under the procedures prescribed by the Washington state patrol
identification, child abuse, and criminal history section.

(7) "Prosecuting
attorney" means the public or private attorney prosecuting a criminal
case.

(8) "Section"
refers to the Washington state patrol section on identification, child abuse,
and criminal history.

(9) "Sentence
structure" means itemizing the components of the felony sentence. The
sentence structure shall include but not be limited to the total or partial
confinement sentenced, and whether the sentence is prison or jail, community
supervision, fines, restitution, or community ((service)) restitution.

Sec. 19. RCW 13.40.020 and 1997 c
338 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter:

(1)
"Community-based rehabilitation" means one or more of the following:
Employment; attendance of information classes; literacy classes; counseling,
outpatient substance abuse treatment programs, outpatient mental health
programs, anger management classes, education or outpatient treatment programs
to prevent animal cruelty, or other services; or attendance at school or other
educational programs appropriate for the juvenile as determined by the school
district. Placement in community-based rehabilitation programs is subject to
available funds;

(2) Community-based
sanctions may include one or more of the following:

(a) A fine, not to
exceed five hundred dollars;

(b) Community ((service))
restitution not to exceed one hundred fifty hours of ((service)) community
restitution;

(3) "Community ((service))
restitution" means compulsory service, without compensation,
performed for the benefit of the community by the offender as punishment for
committing an offense. Community ((service)) restitution may be
performed through public or private organizations or through work crews;

(4) "Community
supervision" means an order of disposition by the court of an adjudicated
youth not committed to the department or an order granting a deferred
disposition. A community supervision order for a single offense may be for a
period of up to two years for a sex offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030 and up
to one year for other offenses. As a mandatory condition of any term of
community supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to refrain from
committing new offenses. As a mandatory condition of community supervision, the
court shall order the juvenile to comply with the mandatory school attendance
provisions of chapter 28A.225 RCW and to inform the school of the existence of
this requirement. Community supervision is an individualized program comprised
of one or more of the following:

(a) Community-based
sanctions;

(b) Community-based
rehabilitation;

(c) Monitoring and
reporting requirements;

(d) Posting of a
probation bond;

(5)
"Confinement" means physical custody by the department of social and
health services in a facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the
state, or physical custody in a detention facility operated by or pursuant to a
contract with any county. The county may operate or contract with vendors to
operate county detention facilities. The department may operate or contract to
operate detention facilities for juveniles committed to the department.
Pretrial confinement or confinement of less than thirty-one days imposed as
part of a disposition or modification order may be served consecutively or
intermittently, in the discretion of the court;

(6) "Court,"
when used without further qualification, means the juvenile court judge(s) or
commissioner(s);

(7) "Criminal
history" includes all criminal complaints against the respondent for
which, prior to the commission of a current offense:

(a) The allegations
were found correct by a court. If a respondent is convicted of two or more
charges arising out of the same course of conduct, only the highest charge from
among these shall count as an offense for the purposes of this chapter; or

(b) The criminal
complaint was diverted by a prosecutor pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter on agreement of the respondent and after an advisement to the
respondent that the criminal complaint would be considered as part of the
respondent's criminal history. A successfully completed deferred adjudication
that was entered before July 1, 1998, or a deferred disposition shall not be
considered part of the respondent's criminal history;

(8)
"Department" means the department of social and health services;

(9) "Detention
facility" means a county facility, paid for by the county, for the
physical confinement of a juvenile alleged to have committed an offense or an
adjudicated offender subject to a disposition or modification order.
"Detention facility" includes county group homes, inpatient substance
abuse programs, juvenile basic training camps, and electronic monitoring;

(10) "Diversion
unit" means any probation counselor who enters into a diversion agreement
with an alleged youthful offender, or any other person, community
accountability board, or other entity except a law enforcement official or
entity, with whom the juvenile court administrator has contracted to arrange
and supervise such agreements pursuant to RCW 13.40.080, or any person,
community accountability board, or other entity specially funded by the
legislature to arrange and supervise diversion agreements in accordance with
the requirements of this chapter. For purposes of this subsection,
"community accountability board" means a board comprised of members
of the local community in which the juvenile offender resides. The superior
court shall appoint the members. The boards shall consist of at least three
and not more than seven members. If possible, the board should include a
variety of representatives from the community, such as a law enforcement
officer, teacher or school administrator, high school student, parent, and
business owner, and should represent the cultural diversity of the local
community;

(11) "Foster
care" means temporary physical care in a foster family home or group care
facility as defined in RCW 74.15.020 and licensed by the department, or other
legally authorized care;

(12)
"Institution" means a juvenile facility established pursuant to
chapters 72.05 and 72.16 through 72.20 RCW;

(13) "Intensive
supervision program" means a parole program that requires intensive
supervision and monitoring, offers an array of individualized treatment and
transitional services, and emphasizes community involvement and support in
order to reduce the likelihood a juvenile offender will commit further
offenses;

(14)
"Juvenile," "youth," and "child" mean any
individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen years and who has not
been previously transferred to adult court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 or who is
otherwise under adult court jurisdiction;

(15) "Juvenile
offender" means any juvenile who has been found by the juvenile court to
have committed an offense, including a person eighteen years of age or older
over whom jurisdiction has been extended under RCW 13.40.300;

(16) "Local
sanctions" means one or more of the following: (a) 0‑30 days of confinement;
(b) 0‑12 months of community supervision; (c) 0‑150 hours of
community ((service)) restitution; or (d) $0‑$500 fine;

(17) "Manifest
injustice" means a disposition that would either impose an excessive
penalty on the juvenile or would impose a serious, and clear danger to society
in light of the purposes of this chapter;

(18) "Monitoring
and reporting requirements" means one or more of the following: Curfews;
requirements to remain at home, school, work, or court-ordered treatment
programs during specified hours; restrictions from leaving or entering
specified geographical areas; requirements to report to the probation officer
as directed and to remain under the probation officer's supervision; and other
conditions or limitations as the court may require which may not include
confinement;

(19)
"Offense" means an act designated a violation or a crime if committed
by an adult under the law of this state, under any ordinance of any city or
county of this state, under any federal law, or under the law of another state
if the act occurred in that state;

(20) "Probation
bond" means a bond, posted with sufficient security by a surety justified
and approved by the court, to secure the offender's appearance at required
court proceedings and compliance with court-ordered community supervision or
conditions of release ordered pursuant to RCW 13.40.040 or 13.40.050. It also
means a deposit of cash or posting of other collateral in lieu of a bond if
approved by the court;

(21)
"Respondent" means a juvenile who is alleged or proven to have
committed an offense;

(22)
"Restitution" means financial reimbursement by the offender to the
victim, and shall be limited to easily ascertainable damages for injury to or
loss of property, actual expenses incurred for medical treatment for physical
injury to persons, lost wages resulting from physical injury, and costs of the
victim's counseling reasonably related to the offense if the offense is a sex
offense. Restitution shall not include reimbursement for damages for mental
anguish, pain and suffering, or other intangible losses. Nothing in this
chapter shall limit or replace civil remedies or defenses available to the
victim or offender;

(23)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services. "Assistant secretary" means the assistant secretary
for juvenile rehabilitation for the department;

(24)
"Services" means services which provide alternatives to incarceration
for those juveniles who have pleaded or been adjudicated guilty of an offense
or have signed a diversion agreement pursuant to this chapter;

(25) "Sex
offense" means an offense defined as a sex offense in RCW 9.94A.030;

(26) "Sexual
motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the respondent
committed the offense was for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification;

(27) "Surety"
means an entity licensed under state insurance laws or by the state department
of licensing, to write corporate, property, or probation bonds within the
state, and justified and approved by the superior court of the county having jurisdiction
of the case;

(28)
"Violation" means an act or omission, which if committed by an adult,
must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt, and is punishable by sanctions which
do not include incarceration;

(29) "Violent
offense" means a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

Sec. 20. RCW 13.40.0357 and 2001
c 217 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION
AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

juvenile juvenile
disposition

disposition category
for attempt,

offense bailjump,
conspiracy,

category description (rcw citation) or
solicitation

........................................

Arson
and Malicious Mischief

A Arson
1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson
2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless
Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless
Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious
Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious
Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious Mischief 3 (<$50 is

E
class) (9A.48.090) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm

Apparatus
(9.40.100) E

A Possession of Incendiary Device

(9.40.120) B+

Assault and Other Crimes

Involving Physical Harm

A Assault
1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault
2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault
3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault
4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By Shooting

(9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless Endangerment

(9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting Suicide Attempt

(9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion
(9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial
Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary
and Trespass

B+ Burglary
1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential Burglary

(9A.52.025) C

B Burglary
2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools (Possession of)

(9A.52.060) E

D Criminal
Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Vehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle
Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption of Alcohol

(66.44.270) E

C Illegally Obtaining Legend Drug

(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery, Possession of
Legend

Drug with Intent to Sell

(69.41.030) D+

E Possession of Legend Drug

(69.41.030) E

B+ Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Narcotic,

Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam

Sale
(69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii)) B+

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Sale

(69.50.401(a)(1)(iii)) C

E Possession of Marihuana <40
grams

(69.50.401(e)) E

C Fraudulently Obtaining Controlled

Substance
(69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of Controlled Substance

for
Profit (69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful
Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Narcotic,

Methamphetamine,
or Flunitrazepam

Counterfeit Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1)
(i) or (ii)) B

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances
Act - Nonnarcotic

Counterfeit Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1)
(iii), (iv), (v)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances
Act - Possession of a

Controlled Substance

(69.50.401(d)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances
Act - Possession of a

Controlled Substance

(69.50.401(c)) C

Firearms
and Weapons

B Theft
of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of Stolen Firearm

(9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded Pistol Without

Permit
(9.41.050) E

C Possession of Firearms by Minor
(<18)

(9.41.040(1)(b)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of Dangerous Weapon

(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating Another Person by use

of
Weapon (9.41.270) E

Homicide

A+ Murder
1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder
2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter
1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter
2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular
Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap
1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap
2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful Imprisonment

(9A.40.040) D+

Obstructing Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a Law Enforcement

Officer
(9A.76.020) E

E Resisting
Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing Contraband 1

(9A.76.140) C

C Introducing Contraband 2

(9A.76.150) D

E Introducing Contraband 3

(9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a Public Servant

(9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a Witness

(9A.72.110) C+

Public Disturbance

C+ Riot
with Weapon (9A.84.010) D+

D+ Riot Without Weapon

(9A.84.010) E

E Failure to Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly
Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape
1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape
2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape
3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape
of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape
of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest
1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest
2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent Exposure

(Victim
<14) (9A.88.010) E

E Indecent
Exposure

(Victim
14 or over) (9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting
Prostitution 1

(9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting Prostitution 2

(9A.88.080) D+

E O
& A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent
Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child
Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child
Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and
Forgery

B Theft
1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft
2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft
3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft
of Livestock (9A.56.080) C

C Forgery
(9A.60.020) D

A Robbery
1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery
2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion
1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion
2 (9A.56.130) D+

C Identity
Theft 1 (9.35.020(2)(a)) D

D Identity
Theft 2 (9.35.020(2)(b)) E

D Improperly
Obtaining Financial

Information
(([(9.35.010)]))

(9.35.010) E

B Possession of Stolen Property 1

(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of Stolen Property 2

(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of Stolen Property 3

(9A.56.170) E

C Taking Motor Vehicle Without

Owner's
Permission (9A.56.070) D

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E Driving Without a License

(46.20.005) E

B+ Hit
and Run - Death

(46.52.020(4)(a)) C+

C Hit and Run - Injury

(46.52.020(4)(b)) D

D Hit and Run-Attended

(46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and Run-Unattended

(46.52.010) E

C Vehicular
Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to Elude Pursuing

Police
Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless
Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While Under the Influence

(46.61.502
and 46.61.504) E

Other

B Bomb
Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape
11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape
21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape
3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene,
Harassing, Etc.,

Phone
Calls (9.61.230) E

A Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class A Felony B+

B Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class B Felony C

C Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class C Felony D

D Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Gross Misdemeanor E

E Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Misdemeanor E

V Violation
of Order of Restitution,

Community
Supervision, or

Confinement
(13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C
offenses and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted
escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks confinement

2nd escape or attempted
escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement

3rd and subsequent
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks confinement

2If
the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order, it may impose
a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE
SENTENCING STANDARDS

This
schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may select sentencing
option A, B, or C.

OPTION
A

JUVENILE
OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID

STANDARD
RANGE

A+ 180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS|WEEKS

EXCEPT | | |

30-40 | | |

WEEKS FOR | | |

15-17 | | |

YEAR OLDS | | |

Current B+ 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

Offense WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL | |52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) |15-36 WEEKS |WEEKS

C+ LS |

|15-36 WEEKS

C LS |15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions: |

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community ((Service)) Restitution

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4 or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE: References in the
grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement.

(1) The vertical axis
of the grid is the current offense category. The current offense category is
determined by the offense of adjudication.

(2) The horizontal axis
of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included in the juvenile's
criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count as one point.
Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall
count as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.

(3) The standard range
disposition for each offense is determined by the intersection of the column
defined by the prior adjudications and the row defined by the current offense
category.

(4) RCW 13.40.180
applies if the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense.

(5) A current offense
that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of E. However, a
disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.

OR

OPTION
B

CHEMICAL
DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile
offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local sanctions or 15 to
36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+ offense, the court
may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION
C

MANIFEST
INJUSTICE

If the court
determines that a disposition under option A or B would effectuate a manifest
injustice, the court shall impose a disposition outside the standard range
under RCW 13.40.160(2).

Sec. 21. RCW 13.40.080 and 1999 c
91 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A diversion
agreement shall be a contract between a juvenile accused of an offense and a
diversionary unit whereby the juvenile agrees to fulfill certain conditions in
lieu of prosecution. Such agreements may be entered into only after the
prosecutor, or probation counselor pursuant to this chapter, has determined
that probable cause exists to believe that a crime has been committed and that
the juvenile committed it. Such agreements shall be entered into as
expeditiously as possible.

(2) A diversion
agreement shall be limited to one or more of the following:

(a) Community ((service))
restitution not to exceed one hundred fifty hours, not to be performed
during school hours if the juvenile is attending school;

(b) Restitution limited
to the amount of actual loss incurred by the victim;

(c) Attendance at up to
ten hours of counseling and/or up to twenty hours of educational or
informational sessions at a community agency. The educational or informational
sessions may include sessions relating to respect for self, others, and
authority; victim awareness; accountability; self-worth; responsibility; work
ethics; good citizenship; literacy; and life skills. For purposes of this section,
"community agency" may also mean a community-based nonprofit
organization, if approved by the diversion unit. The state shall not be liable
for costs resulting from the diversionary unit exercising the option to permit
diversion agreements to mandate attendance at up to ten hours of counseling
and/or up to twenty hours of educational or informational sessions;

(d) A fine, not to
exceed one hundred dollars. In determining the amount of the fine, the
diversion unit shall consider only the juvenile's financial resources and
whether the juvenile has the means to pay the fine. The diversion unit shall
not consider the financial resources of the juvenile's parents, guardian, or
custodian in determining the fine to be imposed;

(e) Requirements to
remain during specified hours at home, school, or work, and restrictions on
leaving or entering specified geographical areas; and

(f) Upon request of the
victim or witness, requirements to refrain from any contact with victims or
witnesses of offenses committed by the juvenile.

(3) In assessing
periods of community ((service)) restitution to be performed and
restitution to be paid by a juvenile who has entered into a diversion
agreement, the court officer to whom this task is assigned shall consult with
the juvenile's custodial parent or parents or guardian and victims who have
contacted the diversionary unit and, to the extent possible, involve members of
the community. Such members of the community shall meet with the juvenile and
advise the court officer as to the terms of the diversion agreement and shall
supervise the juvenile in carrying out its terms.

(4)(a) A diversion
agreement may not exceed a period of six months and may include a period
extending beyond the eighteenth birthday of the divertee.

(b) If additional time
is necessary for the juvenile to complete restitution to the victim, the time
period limitations of this subsection may be extended by an additional six
months.

(c) If the juvenile has
not paid the full amount of restitution by the end of the additional six-month
period, then the juvenile shall be referred to the juvenile court for entry of
an order establishing the amount of restitution still owed to the victim. In
this order, the court shall also determine the terms and conditions of the
restitution, including a payment plan extending up to ten years if the court
determines that the juvenile does not have the means to make full restitution
over a shorter period. For the purposes of this subsection (4)(c), the
juvenile shall remain under the court's jurisdiction for a maximum term of ten
years after the juvenile's eighteenth birthday. Prior to the expiration of the
initial ten-year period, the juvenile court may extend the judgment for
restitution an additional ten years. The court may not require the juvenile to
pay full or partial restitution if the juvenile reasonably satisfies the court
that he or she does not have the means to make full or partial restitution and
could not reasonably acquire the means to pay the restitution over a ten-year
period. The county clerk shall make disbursements to victims named in the
order. The restitution to victims named in the order shall be paid prior to
any payment for other penalties or monetary assessments. A juvenile under
obligation to pay restitution may petition the court for modification of the
restitution order.

(5) The juvenile shall
retain the right to be referred to the court at any time prior to the signing
of the diversion agreement.

(6) Divertees and
potential divertees shall be afforded due process in all contacts with a
diversionary unit regardless of whether the juveniles are accepted for
diversion or whether the diversion program is successfully completed. Such due
process shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) A written diversion
agreement shall be executed stating all conditions in clearly understandable
language;

(b) Violation of the
terms of the agreement shall be the only grounds for termination;

(c) No divertee may be
terminated from a diversion program without being given a court hearing, which
hearing shall be preceded by:

(i) Written notice of
alleged violations of the conditions of the diversion program; and

(ii) Disclosure of all
evidence to be offered against the divertee;

(d) The hearing shall be
conducted by the juvenile court and shall include:

(i) Opportunity to be
heard in person and to present evidence;

(ii) The right to
confront and cross-examine all adverse witnesses;

(iii) A written
statement by the court as to the evidence relied on and the reasons for
termination, should that be the decision; and

(iv) Demonstration by
evidence that the divertee has substantially violated the terms of his or her
diversion agreement.

(e) The prosecutor may
file an information on the offense for which the divertee was diverted:

(i) In juvenile court
if the divertee is under eighteen years of age; or

(ii) In superior court
or the appropriate court of limited jurisdiction if the divertee is eighteen
years of age or older.

(7) The diversion unit
shall, subject to available funds, be responsible for providing interpreters
when juveniles need interpreters to effectively communicate during diversion
unit hearings or negotiations.

(8) The diversion unit
shall be responsible for advising a divertee of his or her rights as provided
in this chapter.

(9) The diversion unit
may refer a juvenile to community-based counseling or treatment programs.

(10) The right to
counsel shall inure prior to the initial interview for purposes of advising the
juvenile as to whether he or she desires to participate in the diversion
process or to appear in the juvenile court. The juvenile may be represented by
counsel at any critical stage of the diversion process, including intake
interviews and termination hearings. The juvenile shall be fully advised at
the intake of his or her right to an attorney and of the relevant services an
attorney can provide. For the purpose of this section, intake interviews mean all
interviews regarding the diversion agreement process.

The juvenile shall be
advised that a diversion agreement shall constitute a part of the juvenile's
criminal history as defined by RCW 13.40.020(7). A signed acknowledgment of
such advisement shall be obtained from the juvenile, and the document shall be
maintained by the diversionary unit together with the diversion agreement, and
a copy of both documents shall be delivered to the prosecutor if requested by
the prosecutor. The supreme court shall promulgate rules setting forth the
content of such advisement in simple language.

(11) When a juvenile
enters into a diversion agreement, the juvenile court may receive only the
following information for dispositional purposes:

(a) The fact that a
charge or charges were made;

(b) The fact that a
diversion agreement was entered into;

(c) The juvenile's
obligations under such agreement;

(d) Whether the alleged
offender performed his or her obligations under such agreement; and

(e) The facts of the
alleged offense.

(12) A diversionary
unit may refuse to enter into a diversion agreement with a juvenile. When a
diversionary unit refuses to enter a diversion agreement with a juvenile, it
shall immediately refer such juvenile to the court for action and shall forward
to the court the criminal complaint and a detailed statement of its reasons for
refusing to enter into a diversion agreement. The diversionary unit shall also
immediately refer the case to the prosecuting attorney for action if such
juvenile violates the terms of the diversion agreement.

(13) A diversionary
unit may, in instances where it determines that the act or omission of an act
for which a juvenile has been referred to it involved no victim, or where it
determines that the juvenile referred to it has no prior criminal history and
is alleged to have committed an illegal act involving no threat of or instance
of actual physical harm and involving not more than fifty dollars in property
loss or damage and that there is no loss outstanding to the person or firm
suffering such damage or loss, counsel and release or release such a juvenile
without entering into a diversion agreement. A diversion unit's authority to
counsel and release a juvenile under this subsection shall include the
authority to refer the juvenile to community-based counseling or treatment
programs. Any juvenile released under this subsection shall be advised that
the act or omission of any act for which he or she had been referred shall
constitute a part of the juvenile's criminal history as defined by RCW
13.40.020(7). A signed acknowledgment of such advisement shall be obtained
from the juvenile, and the document shall be maintained by the unit, and a copy
of the document shall be delivered to the prosecutor if requested by the
prosecutor. The supreme court shall promulgate rules setting forth the content
of such advisement in simple language. A juvenile determined to be eligible by
a diversionary unit for release as provided in this subsection shall retain the
same right to counsel and right to have his or her case referred to the court
for formal action as any other juvenile referred to the unit.

(14) A diversion unit
may supervise the fulfillment of a diversion agreement entered into before the
juvenile's eighteenth birthday and which includes a period extending beyond the
divertee's eighteenth birthday.

(15) If a fine required
by a diversion agreement cannot reasonably be paid due to a change of
circumstance, the diversion agreement may be modified at the request of the divertee
and with the concurrence of the diversion unit to convert an unpaid fine into
community ((service)) restitution. The modification of the
diversion agreement shall be in writing and signed by the divertee and the
diversion unit. The number of hours of community ((service)) restitution
in lieu of a monetary penalty shall be converted at the rate of the prevailing
state minimum wage per hour.

(16) Fines imposed
under this section shall be collected and paid into the county general fund in
accordance with procedures established by the juvenile court administrator
under RCW 13.04.040 and may be used only for juvenile services. In the
expenditure of funds for juvenile services, there shall be a maintenance of
effort whereby counties exhaust existing resources before using amounts
collected under this section.

Sec. 22. RCW 13.40.160 and 1999 c
91 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The standard range
disposition for a juvenile adjudicated of an offense is determined according to
RCW 13.40.0357.

(a) When the court
sentences an offender to a local sanction as provided in RCW 13.40.0357 option
A, the court shall impose a determinate disposition within the standard ranges,
except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section. The
disposition may be comprised of one or more local sanctions.

(b) When the court
sentences an offender to a standard range as provided in RCW 13.40.0357 option
A that includes a term of confinement exceeding thirty days, commitment shall
be to the department for the standard range of confinement, except as provided
in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section.

(2) If the court
concludes, and enters reasons for its conclusion, that disposition within the
standard range would effectuate a manifest injustice the court shall impose a
disposition outside the standard range, as indicated in option C of RCW
13.40.0357. The court's finding of manifest injustice shall be supported by
clear and convincing evidence.

A disposition outside
the standard range shall be determinate and shall be comprised of confinement
or community supervision, or a combination thereof. When a judge finds a
manifest injustice and imposes a sentence of confinement exceeding thirty days,
the court shall sentence the juvenile to a maximum term, and the provisions of
RCW 13.40.030(2) shall be used to determine the range. A disposition outside
the standard range is appealable under RCW 13.40.230 by the state or the
respondent. A disposition within the standard range is not appealable under
RCW 13.40.230.

(3) When a juvenile
offender is found to have committed a sex offense, other than a sex offense
that is also a serious violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030, and has no
history of a prior sex offense, the court, on its own motion or the motion of
the state or the respondent, may order an examination to determine whether the
respondent is amenable to treatment.

The report of the
examination shall include at a minimum the following: The respondent's version
of the facts and the official version of the facts, the respondent's offense
history, an assessment of problems in addition to alleged deviant behaviors,
the respondent's social, educational, and employment situation, and other evaluation
measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of the evaluator's
information.

The examiner shall
assess and report regarding the respondent's amenability to treatment and
relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall be provided
and shall include, at a minimum:

(a)(i) Frequency and
type of contact between the offender and therapist;

(ii) Specific issues to
be addressed in the treatment and description of planned treatment modalities;

(iii) Monitoring plans,
including any requirements regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements,
and monitoring by family members, legal guardians, or others;

(iv) Anticipated length
of treatment; and

(v) Recommended
crime-related prohibitions.

The court on its own
motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order, a second examination
regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The evaluator shall be
selected by the party making the motion. The defendant shall pay the cost of
any second examination ordered unless the court finds the defendant to be
indigent in which case the state shall pay the cost.

After receipt of
reports of the examination, the court shall then consider whether the offender
and the community will benefit from use of this special sex offender disposition
alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the offender should
receive a treatment disposition under this section. If the court determines
that this special sex offender disposition alternative is appropriate, then the
court shall impose a determinate disposition within the standard range for the
offense, or if the court concludes, and enters reasons for its conclusions,
that such disposition would cause a manifest injustice, the court shall impose
a disposition under option C, and the court may suspend the execution of the
disposition and place the offender on community supervision for at least two
years. As a condition of the suspended disposition, the court may impose the
conditions of community supervision and other conditions, including up to
thirty days of confinement and requirements that the offender do any one or
more of the following:

(b)(i) Devote time to a
specific education, employment, or occupation;

(ii) Undergo available
outpatient sex offender treatment for up to two years, or inpatient sex
offender treatment not to exceed the standard range of confinement for that
offense. A community mental health center may not be used for such treatment
unless it has an appropriate program designed for sex offender treatment. The
respondent shall not change sex offender treatment providers or treatment
conditions without first notifying the prosecutor, the probation counselor, and
the court, and shall not change providers without court approval after a
hearing if the prosecutor or probation counselor object to the change;

(iii) Remain within
prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the probation
counselor prior to any change in the offender's address, educational program,
or employment;

(iv) Report to the
prosecutor and the probation counselor prior to any change in a sex offender
treatment provider. This change shall have prior approval by the court;

(v) Report as directed
to the court and a probation counselor;

(vi) Pay all
court-ordered legal financial obligations, perform community ((service))
restitution, or any combination thereof;

(vii) Make restitution
to the victim for the cost of any counseling reasonably related to the offense;

(viii) Comply with the
conditions of any court-ordered probation bond; or

(ix) The court shall
order that the offender may not attend the public or approved private
elementary, middle, or high school attended by the victim or the victim's
siblings. The parents or legal guardians of the offender are responsible for
transportation or other costs associated with the offender's change of school
that would otherwise be paid by the school district. The court shall send
notice of the disposition and restriction on attending the same school as the
victim or victim's siblings to the public or approved private school the
juvenile will attend, if known, or if unknown, to the approved private schools
and the public school district board of directors of the district in which the
juvenile resides or intends to reside. This notice must be sent at the
earliest possible date but not later than ten calendar days after entry of the
disposition.

The sex offender
treatment provider shall submit quarterly reports on the respondent's progress
in treatment to the court and the parties. The reports shall reference the
treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of attendance,
respondent's compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the
respondent's relative progress in treatment, and any other material specified
by the court at the time of the disposition.

At the time of the
disposition, the court may set treatment review hearings as the court considers
appropriate.

Except as provided in
this subsection (3), after July 1, 1991, examinations and treatment ordered
pursuant to this subsection shall only be conducted by sex offender treatment
providers certified by the department of health pursuant to chapter 18.155
RCW. A sex offender therapist who examines or treats a juvenile sex offender
pursuant to this subsection does not have to be certified by the department of
health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the court finds that: (A) The
offender has already moved to another state or plans to move to another state
for reasons other than circumventing the certification requirements; (B) no
certified providers are available for treatment within a reasonable
geographical distance of the offender's home; and (C) the evaluation and
treatment plan comply with this subsection (((4) [(3)])) (3) and
the rules adopted by the department of health.

If the offender
violates any condition of the disposition or the court finds that the
respondent is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment, the court may
revoke the suspension and order execution of the disposition or the court may impose
a penalty of up to thirty days' confinement for violating conditions of the
disposition. The court may order both execution of the disposition and up to
thirty days' confinement for the violation of the conditions of the
disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement time previously
served if that confinement was for the offense for which the suspension is
being revoked.

For purposes of this
section, "victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct
result of the crime charged. "Victim" may also include a known
parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or
guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.

A disposition entered
under this subsection (3) is not appealable under RCW 13.40.230.

(4) If the juvenile
offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local sanctions or 15 to
36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+ offense, the court
may impose the disposition alternative under RCW 13.40.165.

(5) RCW 13.40.193 shall
govern the disposition of any juvenile adjudicated of possessing a firearm in
violation of RCW 9.41.040(1)(b)(iii) or any crime in which a special finding is
entered that the juvenile was armed with a firearm.

(6) Whenever a juvenile
offender is entitled to credit for time spent in detention prior to a
dispositional order, the dispositional order shall specifically state the
number of days of credit for time served.

(7) Except as provided
under subsection (3) or (4) of this section or RCW 13.40.127, the court shall
not suspend or defer the imposition or the execution of the disposition.

(8) In no case shall
the term of confinement imposed by the court at disposition exceed that to
which an adult could be subjected for the same offense.

Sec. 23. RCW 13.40.165 and 2001 c
164 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The purpose of this
disposition alternative is to ensure that successful treatment options to
reduce recidivism are available to eligible youth, pursuant to RCW 70.96A.520.
The court must consider eligibility for the chemical dependency disposition
alternative when a juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition
of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A-
or B+ offense, other than a first time B+ offense under chapter 69.50 RCW. The
court, on its own motion or the motion of the state or the respondent if the
evidence shows that the offender may be chemically dependent or substance
abusing, may order an examination by a chemical dependency counselor from a
chemical dependency treatment facility approved under chapter 70.96A RCW to
determine if the youth is chemically dependent or substance abusing. The
offender shall pay the cost of any examination ordered under this subsection
unless the court finds that the offender is indigent and no third party
insurance coverage is available, in which case the state shall pay the cost.

(2) The report of the
examination shall include at a minimum the following: The respondent's version
of the facts and the official version of the facts, the respondent's offense
history, an assessment of drug-alcohol problems and previous treatment attempts,
the respondent's social, educational, and employment situation, and other
evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of the
examiner's information.

(3) The examiner shall
assess and report regarding the respondent's relative risk to the community. A
proposed treatment plan shall be provided and shall include, at a minimum:

(a) Whether inpatient
and/or outpatient treatment is recommended;

(b) Availability of
appropriate treatment;

(c) Monitoring plans,
including any requirements regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements,
and monitoring by family members, legal guardians, or others;

(d) Anticipated length
of treatment; and

(e) Recommended
crime-related prohibitions.

(4) The court on its
own motion may order, or on a motion by the state or the respondent shall
order, a second examination. The evaluator shall be selected by the party
making the motion. The requesting party shall pay the cost of any examination
ordered under this subsection unless the requesting party is the offender and
the court finds that the offender is indigent and no third party insurance
coverage is available, in which case the state shall pay the cost.

(5)(a) After receipt of
reports of the examination, the court shall then consider whether the offender
and the community will benefit from use of this chemical dependency disposition
alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the offender should
receive a treatment disposition under this section.

(b) If the court
determines that this chemical dependency disposition alternative is
appropriate, then the court shall impose the standard range for the offense,
suspend execution of the disposition, and place the offender on community
supervision for up to one year. As a condition of the suspended disposition,
the court shall require the offender to undergo available outpatient
drug/alcohol treatment and/or inpatient drug/alcohol treatment. For purposes
of this section, inpatient treatment may not exceed ninety days. As a
condition of the suspended disposition, the court may impose conditions of
community supervision and other sanctions, including up to thirty days of
confinement, one hundred fifty hours of community ((service)) restitution,
and payment of legal financial obligations and restitution.

(6) The drug/alcohol
treatment provider shall submit monthly reports on the respondent's progress in
treatment to the court and the parties. The reports shall reference the
treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of attendance,
respondent's compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the
respondent's relative progress in treatment, and any other material specified
by the court at the time of the disposition.

At the time of the
disposition, the court may set treatment review hearings as the court considers
appropriate.

If the offender
violates any condition of the disposition or the court finds that the
respondent is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment, the court may
impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or revoke the suspension and order
execution of the disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement
time previously served if that confinement was for the offense for which the
suspension is being revoked.

(7) For purposes of this
section, "victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct
result of the offense charged.

(8) Whenever a juvenile
offender is entitled to credit for time spent in detention prior to a
dispositional order, the dispositional order shall specifically state the
number of days of credit for time served.

(9) In no case shall
the term of confinement imposed by the court at disposition exceed that to
which an adult could be subjected for the same offense.

(10) A disposition
under this section is not appealable under RCW 13.40.230.

Sec. 24. RCW 13.40.180 and 1981 c
299 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Where a disposition is
imposed on a youth for two or more offenses, the terms shall run consecutively,
subject to the following limitations:

(1) Where the offenses
were committed through a single act or omission, omission, or through an act or
omission which in itself constituted one of the offenses and also was an
element of the other, the aggregate of all the terms shall not exceed one
hundred fifty percent of the term imposed for the most serious offense;

(2) The aggregate of
all consecutive terms shall not exceed three hundred percent of the term
imposed for the most serious offense; and

(3) The aggregate of
all consecutive terms of community supervision shall not exceed two years in
length, or require payment of more than two hundred dollars in fines or the
performance of more than two hundred hours of community ((service)) restitution.

Sec. 25. RCW 13.40.200 and 1997 c
338 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a respondent
fails to comply with an order of restitution, community supervision, penalty
assessments, or confinement of less than thirty days, the court upon motion of
the prosecutor or its own motion, may modify the order after a hearing on the
violation.

(2) The hearing shall
afford the respondent the same due process of law as would be afforded an adult
probationer. The court may issue a summons or a warrant to compel the
respondent's appearance. The state shall have the burden of proving by a
preponderance of the evidence the fact of the violation. The respondent shall
have the burden of showing that the violation was not a willful refusal to
comply with the terms of the order. If a respondent has failed to pay a fine,
penalty assessments, or restitution or to perform community ((service)) restitution
hours, as required by the court, it shall be the respondent's burden to show
that he or she did not have the means and could not reasonably have acquired
the means to pay the fine, penalty assessments, or restitution or perform
community ((service)) restitution.

(3) If the court finds
that a respondent has willfully violated the terms of an order pursuant to
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, it may impose a penalty of up to
thirty days' confinement. Penalties for multiple violations occurring prior to
the hearing shall not be aggregated to exceed thirty days' confinement.
Regardless of the number of times a respondent is brought to court for
violations of the terms of a single disposition order, the combined total
number of days spent by the respondent in detention shall never exceed the
maximum term to which an adult could be sentenced for the underlying offense.

(4) If a respondent has
been ordered to pay a fine or monetary penalty and due to a change of
circumstance cannot reasonably comply with the order, the court, upon motion of
the respondent, may order that the unpaid fine or monetary penalty be converted
to community ((service)) restitution. The number of hours of
community ((service)) restitution in lieu of a monetary penalty
or fine shall be converted at the rate of the prevailing state minimum wage per
hour. The monetary penalties or fines collected shall be deposited in the
county general fund. A failure to comply with an order under this subsection
shall be deemed a failure to comply with an order of community supervision and
may be proceeded against as provided in this section.

(5) When a respondent
has willfully violated the terms of a probation bond, the court may modify,
revoke, or retain the probation bond as provided in RCW 13.40.054.

Sec. 26. RCW 13.40.205 and 1990 c
3 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A juvenile
sentenced to a term of confinement to be served under the supervision of the
department shall not be released from the physical custody of the department
prior to the release date established under RCW 13.40.210 except as otherwise
provided in this section.

(2) A juvenile serving
a term of confinement under the supervision of the department may be released
on authorized leave from the physical custody of the department only if
consistent with public safety and if:

(a) Sixty percent of
the minimum term of confinement has been served; and

(b) The purpose of the
leave is to enable the juvenile:

(i) To visit the juvenile's
family for the purpose of strengthening or preserving family relationships;

(ii) To make plans for
parole or release which require the juvenile's personal appearance in the
community and which will facilitate the juvenile's reintegration into the community;
or

(iii) To make plans for
a residential placement out of the juvenile's home which requires the
juvenile's personal appearance in the community.

(3) No authorized leave
may exceed seven consecutive days. The total of all pre-minimum term authorized
leaves granted to a juvenile prior to final discharge from confinement shall
not exceed thirty days.

(4) Prior to
authorizing a leave, the secretary shall require a written leave plan, which
shall detail the purpose of the leave and how it is to be achieved, the address
at which the juvenile shall reside, the identity of the person responsible for
supervising the juvenile during the leave, and a statement by such person
acknowledging familiarity with the leave plan and agreeing to supervise the juvenile
and to notify the secretary immediately if the juvenile violates any terms or
conditions of the leave. The leave plan shall include such terms and
conditions as the secretary deems appropriate and shall be signed by the
juvenile.

(5) Upon authorizing a
leave, the secretary shall issue to the juvenile an authorized leave order
which shall contain the name of the juvenile, the fact that the juvenile is on
leave from a designated facility, the time period of the leave, and the identity
of an appropriate official of the department to contact when necessary. The
authorized leave order shall be carried by the juvenile at all times while on
leave.

(6) Prior to the
commencement of any authorized leave, the secretary shall give notice of the
leave to the appropriate law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which
the juvenile will reside during the leave period. The notice shall include the
identity of the juvenile, the time period of the leave, the residence of the
juvenile during the leave, and the identity of the person responsible for
supervising the juvenile during the leave.

(7) The secretary may
authorize a leave, which shall not exceed forty-eight hours plus travel time,
to meet an emergency situation such as a death or critical illness of a member
of the juvenile's family. The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not
exceed the period of time medically necessary, to obtain medical care not
available in a juvenile facility maintained by the department. In cases of emergency
or medical leave the secretary may waive all or any portions of subsections
(2)(a), (3), (4), (5), and (6) of this section.

(8) If requested by the
juvenile's victim or the victim's immediate family, the secretary shall give
notice of any leave to the victim or the victim's immediate family.

(9) A juvenile who
violates any condition of an authorized leave plan may be taken into custody
and returned to the department in the same manner as an adult in identical
circumstances.

(10) Notwithstanding
the provisions of this section, a juvenile placed in minimum security status
may participate in work, educational, community ((service)) restitution,
or treatment programs in the community up to twelve hours a day if approved by
the secretary. Such a release shall not be deemed a leave of absence.

(11) Subsections (6),
(7), and (8) of this section do not apply to juveniles covered by RCW
13.40.215.

Sec. 27. RCW 13.40.210 and 2001 c
137 s 2 and 2001 c 51 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall
set a release date for each juvenile committed to its custody. The release
date shall be within the prescribed range to which a juvenile has been
committed under RCW 13.40.0357 or 13.40.030 except as provided in RCW 13.40.320
concerning offenders the department determines are eligible for the juvenile
offender basic training camp program. Such dates shall be determined prior to
the expiration of sixty percent of a juvenile's minimum term of confinement
included within the prescribed range to which the juvenile has been committed.
The secretary shall release any juvenile committed to the custody of the
department within four calendar days prior to the juvenile's release date or on
the release date set under this chapter. Days spent in the custody of the
department shall be tolled by any period of time during which a juvenile has
absented himself or herself from the department's supervision without the prior
approval of the secretary or the secretary's designee.

(2) The secretary shall
monitor the average daily population of the state's juvenile residential
facilities. When the secretary concludes that in-residence population of
residential facilities exceeds one hundred five percent of the rated bed
capacity specified in statute, or in absence of such specification, as
specified by the department in rule, the secretary may recommend reductions to
the governor. On certification by the governor that the recommended reductions
are necessary, the secretary has authority to administratively release a
sufficient number of offenders to reduce in-residence population to one hundred
percent of rated bed capacity. The secretary shall release those offenders who
have served the greatest proportion of their sentence. However, the secretary
may deny release in a particular case at the request of an offender, or if the
secretary finds that there is no responsible custodian, as determined by the
department, to whom to release the offender, or if the release of the offender
would pose a clear danger to society. The department shall notify the
committing court of the release at the time of release if any such early
releases have occurred as a result of excessive in-residence population. In no
event shall an offender adjudicated of a violent offense be granted release
under the provisions of this subsection.

(3)(a) Following the
release of any juvenile under subsection (1) of this section, the secretary may
require the juvenile to comply with a program of parole to be administered by
the department in his or her community which shall last no longer than eighteen
months, except that in the case of a juvenile sentenced for rape in the first
or second degree, rape of a child in the first or second degree, child
molestation in the first degree, or indecent liberties with forcible
compulsion, the period of parole shall be twenty-four months and, in the
discretion of the secretary, may be up to thirty-six months when the secretary
finds that an additional period of parole is necessary and appropriate in the
interests of public safety or to meet the ongoing needs of the juvenile. A
parole program is mandatory for offenders released under subsection (2) of this
section. The decision to place an offender on parole shall be based on an
assessment by the department of the offender's risk for reoffending upon
release. The department shall prioritize available parole resources to provide
supervision and services to offenders at moderate to high risk for reoffending.

(b) The secretary
shall, for the period of parole, facilitate the juvenile's reintegration into
his or her community and to further this goal shall require the juvenile to
refrain from possessing a firearm or using a deadly weapon and refrain from
committing new offenses and may require the juvenile to: (i) Undergo available
medical, psychiatric, drug and alcohol, sex offender, mental health, and other
offense-related treatment services; (ii) report as directed to a parole officer
and/or designee; (iii) pursue a course of study, vocational training, or
employment; (iv) notify the parole officer of the current address where he or
she resides; (v) be present at a particular address during specified hours;
(vi) remain within prescribed geographical boundaries; (vii) submit to
electronic monitoring; (viii) refrain from using illegal drugs and alcohol, and
submit to random urinalysis when requested by the assigned parole officer; (ix)
refrain from contact with specific individuals or a specified class of
individuals; (x) meet other conditions determined by the parole officer to
further enhance the juvenile's reintegration into the community; (xi) pay any
court-ordered fines or restitution; and (xii) perform community ((service))
restitution. Community ((service)) restitution for the
purpose of this section means compulsory service, without compensation,
performed for the benefit of the community by the offender. Community ((service))
restitution may be performed through public or private organizations or
through work crews.

(c) The secretary may
further require up to twenty-five percent of the highest risk juvenile
offenders who are placed on parole to participate in an intensive supervision
program. Offenders participating in an intensive supervision program shall be
required to comply with all terms and conditions listed in (b) of this
subsection and shall also be required to comply with the following additional
terms and conditions: (i) Obey all laws and refrain from any conduct that
threatens public safety; (ii) report at least once a week to an assigned
community case manager; and (iii) meet all other requirements imposed by the
community case manager related to participating in the intensive supervision
program. As a part of the intensive supervision program, the secretary may
require day reporting.

(d) After termination
of the parole period, the juvenile shall be discharged from the department's
supervision.

(4)(a) The department
may also modify parole for violation thereof. If, after affording a juvenile
all of the due process rights to which he or she would be entitled if the
juvenile were an adult, the secretary finds that a juvenile has violated a
condition of his or her parole, the secretary shall order one of the following
which is reasonably likely to effectuate the purpose of the parole and to
protect the public: (i) Continued supervision under the same conditions
previously imposed; (ii) intensified supervision with increased reporting
requirements; (iii) additional conditions of supervision authorized by this
chapter; (iv) except as provided in (a)(v) and (vi) of this subsection,
imposition of a period of confinement not to exceed thirty days in a facility
operated by or pursuant to a contract with the state of Washington or any city
or county for a portion of each day or for a certain number of days each week
with the balance of the days or weeks spent under supervision; (v) the
secretary may order any of the conditions or may return the offender to
confinement for the remainder of the sentence range if the offense for which
the offender was sentenced is rape in the first or second degree, rape of a
child in the first or second degree, child molestation in the first degree,
indecent liberties with forcible compulsion, or a sex offense that is also a
serious violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030; and (vi) the secretary may
order any of the conditions or may return the offender to confinement for the
remainder of the sentence range if the youth has completed the basic training
camp program as described in RCW 13.40.320.

(b) If the department
finds that any juvenile in a program of parole has possessed a firearm or used
a deadly weapon during the program of parole, the department shall modify the
parole under (a) of this subsection and confine the juvenile for at least
thirty days. Confinement shall be in a facility operated by or pursuant to a
contract with the state or any county.

(5) A parole officer of
the department of social and health services shall have the power to arrest a
juvenile under his or her supervision on the same grounds as a law enforcement
officer would be authorized to arrest the person.

(6) If so requested and
approved under chapter 13.06 RCW, the secretary shall permit a county or group
of counties to perform functions under subsections (3) through (5) of this
section.

Sec. 28. RCW 13.40.250 and 1997 c
338 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

A traffic or civil
infraction case involving a juvenile under the age of sixteen may be diverted
in accordance with the provisions of this chapter or filed in juvenile court.

(1) If a notice of a
traffic or civil infraction is filed in juvenile court, the juvenile named in
the notice shall be afforded the same due process afforded to adult defendants
in traffic infraction cases.

(2) A monetary penalty
imposed upon a juvenile under the age of sixteen who is found to have committed
a traffic or civil infraction may not exceed one hundred dollars. At the
juvenile's request, the court may order performance of a number of hours of
community ((service)) restitution in lieu of a monetary penalty,
at the rate of the prevailing state minimum wage per hour.

(3) A diversion
agreement entered into by a juvenile referred pursuant to this section shall be
limited to thirty hours of community ((service)) restitution, or
educational or informational sessions.

(4) If a case involving
the commission of a traffic or civil infraction or offense by a juvenile under
the age of sixteen has been referred to a diversion unit, an abstract of the
action taken by the diversion unit may be forwarded to the department of
licensing in the manner provided for in RCW 46.20.270(2).

Sec. 29. RCW 28A.225.090 and 2000
c 162 s 15 and 2000 c 61 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) A court may order a
child subject to a petition under RCW 28A.225.035 to do one or more of the
following:

(a) Attend the child's
current school, and set forth minimum attendance requirements, including
suspensions;

(b) If there is space
available and the program can provide educational services appropriate for the
child, order the child to attend another public school, an alternative
education program, center, a skill center, dropout prevention program, or
another public educational program;

(c) Attend a private
nonsectarian school or program including an education center. Before ordering
a child to attend an approved or certified private nonsectarian school or
program, the court shall: (i) Consider the public and private programs
available; (ii) find that placement is in the best interest of the child; and
(iii) find that the private school or program is willing to accept the child
and will not charge any fees in addition to those established by contract with
the student's school district. If the court orders the child to enroll in a
private school or program, the child's school district shall contract with the
school or program to provide educational services for the child. The school
district shall not be required to contract for a weekly rate that exceeds the
state general apportionment dollars calculated on a weekly basis generated by
the child and received by the district. A school district shall not be
required to enter into a contract that is longer than the remainder of the
school year. A school district shall not be required to enter into or continue
a contract if the child is no longer enrolled in the district;

(d) Be referred to a
community truancy board, if available; or

(e) Submit to testing
for the use of controlled substances or alcohol based on a determination that
such testing is appropriate to the circumstances and behavior of the child and
will facilitate the child's compliance with the mandatory attendance law and,
if any test ordered under this subsection indicates the use of controlled
substances or alcohol, order the minor to abstain from the unlawful consumption
of controlled substances or alcohol and adhere to the recommendations of the
drug assessment at no expense to the school.

(2) If the child fails
to comply with the court order, the court may order the child to be subject to
detention, as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), or may impose alternatives to
detention such as community ((service)) restitution. Failure by
a child to comply with an order issued under this subsection shall not be
subject to detention for a period greater than that permitted pursuant to a
civil contempt proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW.

(3) Any parent violating
any of the provisions of either RCW 28A.225.010, 28A.225.015, or 28A.225.080
shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars for each day of unexcused
absence from school. It shall be a defense for a parent charged with violating
RCW 28A.225.010 to show that he or she exercised reasonable diligence in
attempting to cause a child in his or her custody to attend school or that the
child's school did not perform its duties as required in RCW 28A.225.020. The
court may order the parent to provide community ((service)) restitution
instead of imposing a fine. Any fine imposed pursuant to this section may be
suspended upon the condition that a parent charged with violating RCW
28A.225.010 shall participate with the school and the child in a supervised
plan for the child's attendance at school or upon condition that the parent
attend a conference or conferences scheduled by a school for the purpose of
analyzing the causes of a child's absence.

(4) If a child
continues to be truant after entering into a court-approved order with the
truancy board under RCW 28A.225.035, the juvenile court shall find the child in
contempt, and the court may order the child to be subject to detention, as
provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), or may impose alternatives to detention such as
meaningful community ((service)) restitution. Failure by a child
to comply with an order issued under this subsection may not subject a child to
detention for a period greater than that permitted under a civil contempt
proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW.

(5) Subsections (1),
(2), and (4) of this section shall not apply to a six or seven year-old child
required to attend public school under RCW 28A.225.015.

Sec. 30. RCW 35.21.209 and 1984 c
24 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative
authority of a city or town may purchase liability insurance in an amount it
deems reasonable to protect the city or town, its officers, and employees
against liability for the wrongful acts of offenders or injury or damage
incurred by offenders in the course of court-ordered community ((service))
restitution, and may elect to treat offenders as employees and/or
workers under Title 51 RCW.

Sec. 31. RCW 35A.21.220 and 1984
c 24 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative
authority of a code city may purchase liability insurance in an amount it deems
reasonable to protect the code city, its officers, and employees against
liability for the wrongful acts of offenders or injury or damage incurred by
offenders in the course of court-ordered community ((service)) restitution,
and may elect to treat offenders as employees and/or workers under Title 51
RCW.

Sec. 32. RCW 36.16.139 and 1984 c
24 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative
authority of a county may purchase liability insurance in an amount it deems
reasonable to protect the county, its officers, and employees against liability
for the wrongful acts of offenders or injury or damage incurred by offenders in
the course of community ((service)) restitution imposed by court
order or pursuant to RCW 13.40.080. The legislative authority of a county may
elect to treat offenders as employees and/or workers under Title 51 RCW.

Sec. 33. RCW 46.16.381 and 2001 c
67 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
grant special parking privileges to any person who has a disability that limits
or impairs the ability to walk and meets one of the following criteria, as
determined by a licensed physician:

(a) Cannot walk two
hundred feet without stopping to rest;

(b) Is severely limited
in ability to walk due to arthritic, neurological, or orthopedic condition;

(c) Is so severely
disabled, that the person cannot walk without the use of or assistance from a
brace, cane, another person, prosthetic device, wheelchair, or other assistive
device;

(d) Uses portable
oxygen;

(e) Is restricted by
lung disease to such an extent that forced expiratory respiratory volume, when
measured by spirometry is less than one liter per second or the arterial oxygen
tension is less than sixty mm/hg on room air at rest;

(f) Impairment by
cardiovascular disease or cardiac condition to the extent that the person's
functional limitations are classified as class III or IV under standards
accepted by the American Heart Association; or

(g) Has a disability
resulting from an acute sensitivity to automobile emissions which limits or
impairs the ability to walk. The personal physician of the applicant shall
document that the disability is comparable in severity to the others listed in
this subsection.

(2) The applications
for disabled parking permits and temporary disabled parking permits are
official state documents. Knowingly providing false information in conjunction
with the application is a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20
RCW. The following statement must appear on each application form immediately
below the physician's signature and immediately below the applicant's
signature: "A disabled parking permit may be issued only for a medical
necessity that severely affects mobility (RCW 46.16.381). Knowingly providing
false information on this application is a gross misdemeanor. The penalty is
up to one year in jail and a fine of up to $5,000 or both."

(3) Persons who qualify
for special parking privileges are entitled to receive from the department of
licensing a removable windshield placard bearing the international symbol of
access and an individual serial number, along with a special identification
card bearing the name and date of birth of the person to whom the placard is
issued, and the placard's serial number. The special identification card shall
be issued no later than January 1, 2000, to all persons who are issued parking
placards, including those issued for temporary disabilities, and special
disabled parking license plates. The department shall design the placard to be
displayed when the vehicle is parked by suspending it from the rearview mirror,
or in the absence of a rearview mirror the card may be displayed on the
dashboard of any vehicle used to transport the disabled person. Instead of
regular motor vehicle license plates, disabled persons are entitled to receive
special license plates bearing the international symbol of access for one
vehicle registered in the disabled person's name. Disabled persons who are not
issued the special license plates are entitled to receive a second special
placard upon submitting a written request to the department. Persons who have
been issued the parking privileges and who are using a vehicle or are riding in
a vehicle displaying the special license plates or placard may park in places
reserved for mobility disabled persons. The director shall adopt rules
providing for the issuance of special placards and license plates to public
transportation authorities, nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW,
boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, senior citizen centers,
private nonprofit agencies as defined in chapter 24.03 RCW, and vehicles
registered with the department as cabulances that regularly transport disabled
persons who have been determined eligible for special parking privileges
provided under this section. The director may issue special license plates for
a vehicle registered in the name of the public transportation authority,
nursing home, boarding homes, senior citizen center, private nonprofit agency,
or cabulance service if the vehicle is primarily used to transport persons with
disabilities described in this section. Public transportation authorities,
nursing homes, boarding homes, senior citizen centers, private nonprofit
agencies, and cabulance services are responsible for insuring that the special
placards and license plates are not used improperly and are responsible for all
fines and penalties for improper use.

(4) Whenever the
disabled person transfers or assigns his or her interest in the vehicle, the
special license plates shall be removed from the motor vehicle. If another
vehicle is acquired by the disabled person and the vehicle owner qualifies for
a special plate, the plate shall be attached to the vehicle, and the director
shall be immediately notified of the transfer of the plate. If another vehicle
is not acquired by the disabled person, the removed plate shall be immediately
surrendered to the director.

(5) The special license
plate shall be renewed in the same manner and at the time required for the
renewal of regular motor vehicle license plates under this chapter. No special
license plate may be issued to a person who is temporarily disabled. A person
who has a condition expected to improve within six months may be issued a
temporary placard for a period not to exceed six months. If the condition
exists after six months a new temporary placard shall be issued upon receipt of
a new certification from the disabled person's physician. The permanent
parking placard and identification card of a disabled person shall be renewed
at least every five years, as required by the director, by satisfactory proof
of the right to continued use of the privileges. In the event of the permit
holder's death, the parking placard and identification card must be immediately
surrendered to the department. The department shall match and purge its
disabled permit data base with available death record information at least
every twelve months.

(6) Each person who has
been issued a permanent disabled parking permit on or before July 1, 1998, must
renew the permit no later than July 1, 2003, subject to a schedule to be set by
the department, or the permit will expire.

(7) Additional fees
shall not be charged for the issuance of the special placards or the
identification cards. No additional fee may be charged for the issuance of the
special license plates except the regular motor vehicle registration fee and
any other fees and taxes required to be paid upon registration of a motor
vehicle.

(8) Any unauthorized
use of the special placard, special license plate, or identification card is a
traffic infraction with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars.

(9) It is a parking
infraction, with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars for a person
to make inaccessible the access aisle located next to a space reserved for
physically disabled persons. The clerk of the court shall report all
violations related to this subsection to the department.

(10) It is a parking
infraction, with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars for any person
to park a vehicle in a parking place provided on private property without
charge or on public property reserved for physically disabled persons without a
special license plate or placard. If a person is charged with a violation, the
person shall not be determined to have committed an infraction if the person
produces in court or before the court appearance the special license plate or
placard required under this section. A local jurisdiction providing
nonmetered, on-street parking places reserved for physically disabled persons
may impose by ordinance time restrictions of no less than four hours on the use
of these parking places. A local jurisdiction may impose by ordinance time
restrictions of no less than four hours on the use of nonreserved, on-street parking
spaces by vehicles displaying the special parking placards. All time
restrictions must be clearly posted.

(11) The penalties
imposed under subsections (9) and (10) of this section shall be used by that
local jurisdiction exclusively for law enforcement. The court may also impose
an additional penalty sufficient to reimburse the local jurisdiction for any
costs it may have incurred in removal and storage of the improperly parked
vehicle.

(12) Except as provided
by subsection (2) of this section, it is a traffic infraction with a monetary
penalty of two hundred fifty dollars for any person willfully to obtain a
special license plate, placard, or identification card in a manner other than
that established under this section.

(13)(a) A law
enforcement agency authorized to enforce parking laws may appoint volunteers,
with a limited commission, to issue notices of infractions for violations of
this section or RCW 46.61.581. Volunteers must be at least twenty-one years of
age. The law enforcement agency appointing volunteers may establish any other
qualifications the agency deems desirable.

(b) An agency
appointing volunteers under this section must provide training to the
volunteers before authorizing them to issue notices of infractions.

(c) A notice of
infraction issued by a volunteer appointed under this subsection has the same
force and effect as a notice of infraction issued by a police officer for the
same offense.

(d) A police officer or
a volunteer may request a person to show the person's identification card or
special parking placard when investigating the possibility of a violation of
this section. If the request is refused, the person in charge of the vehicle
may be issued a notice of infraction for a violation of this section.

(14) For second or
subsequent violations of this section, in addition to a monetary fine, the
violator must complete a minimum of forty hours of:

(a) Community ((service))
restitution for a nonprofit organization that serves the disabled
community or persons having disabling diseases; or

(b) Any other community
((service)) restitution that may sensitize the violator to the
needs and obstacles faced by persons who have disabilities.

(15) The court may not
suspend more than one-half of any fine imposed under subsection (8), (9), (10),
or (12) of this section.

Sec. 34. RCW 46.20.031 and 1999 c
6 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
not issue a driver's license to a person:

(1) Who is under the
age of sixteen years;

(2) Whose driving
privilege has been withheld unless and until the department may authorize the
driving privilege under RCW 46.20.311;

(3) Who has been
classified as an alcoholic, drug addict, alcohol abuser, or drug abuser by a
program approved by the department of social and health services. The
department may, however, issue a license if the person:

(a) Has been granted a
deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW; or

(b) Is satisfactorily
participating in or has successfully completed an alcohol or drug abuse
treatment program approved by the department of social and health services and
has established control of his or her alcohol or drug abuse problem;

(4) Who has previously
been adjudged to be mentally ill or insane, or to be incompetent due to a
mental disability or disease. The department shall, however, issue a license
to the person if he or she otherwise qualifies and:

(a) Has been restored
to competency by the methods provided by law; or

(b) The superior court
finds the person able to operate a motor vehicle with safety upon the highways
during such incompetency;

(5) Who has not passed
the driver's licensing examination required by RCW 46.20.120 and 46.20.305, if
applicable;

(6) Who is required
under the laws of this state to deposit proof of financial responsibility and
who has not deposited such proof;

(7) Who is unable to
safely operate a motor vehicle upon the highways due to a physical or mental
disability. The department's conclusion that a person is barred from licensing
under this subsection must be reasonable and be based upon good and substantial
evidence. This determination is subject to review by a court of competent
jurisdiction;

(8) Who has violated
his or her written promise to appear, respond, or comply regarding a notice of
infraction issued for abandonment of a vehicle in violation of RCW 46.55.105,
unless:

(a) The court has not
notified the department of the violation;

(b) The department has
received notice from the court showing that the person has been found not to
have committed the violation of RCW 46.55.105; or

(c) The person has paid
all monetary penalties owing, including completion of community ((service))
restitution, and the court is satisfied that the person has made
restitution as provided by RCW 46.55.105(2).

Sec. 35. RCW 46.30.020 and 1991
sp.s. c 25 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) No person may
operate a motor vehicle subject to registration under chapter 46.16 RCW in this
state unless the person is insured under a motor vehicle liability policy with
liability limits of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090, is
self-insured as provided in RCW 46.29.630, is covered by a certificate of
deposit in conformance with RCW 46.29.550, or is covered by a liability bond of
at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090. Written proof of financial
responsibility for motor vehicle operation must be provided on the request of a
law enforcement officer in the format specified under RCW 46.30.030.

(b) A person who drives
a motor vehicle that is required to be registered in another state that
requires drivers and owners of vehicles in that state to maintain insurance or
financial responsibility shall, when requested by a law enforcement officer,
provide evidence of financial responsibility or insurance as is required by the
laws of the state in which the vehicle is registered.

(c) When asked to do so
by a law enforcement officer, failure to display an insurance identification
card as specified under RCW 46.30.030 creates a presumption that the person
does not have motor vehicle insurance.

(d) Failure to provide
proof of motor vehicle insurance is a traffic infraction and is subject to
penalties as set by the supreme court under RCW 46.63.110 or community ((service))
restitution.

(2) If a person cited
for a violation of subsection (1) of this section appears in person before the
court and provides written evidence that at the time the person was cited, he
or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility requirements of subsection
(1) of this section, the citation shall be dismissed. In lieu of personal
appearance, a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this section
may, before the date scheduled for the person's appearance before the court,
submit by mail to the court written evidence that at the time the person was
cited, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, in which case the citation
shall be dismissed without cost, except that the court may assess court
administrative costs of twenty-five dollars at the time of dismissal.

(3) The provisions of
this chapter shall not govern:

(a) The operation of a
motor vehicle registered under RCW 46.16.305(1), governed by RCW 46.16.020, or
registered with the Washington utilities and transportation commission as
common or contract carriers; or

(b) The operation of a
motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330, a motor-driven cycle as defined in RCW
46.04.332, or a moped as defined in RCW 46.04.304.

(4) RCW 46.29.490 shall
not be deemed to govern all motor vehicle liability policies required by this
chapter but only those certified for the purposes stated in chapter 46.29 RCW.

Sec. 36. RCW 46.63.110 and 2001 c
289 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person found to
have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a monetary penalty. No
penalty may exceed two hundred and fifty dollars for each offense unless
authorized by this chapter or title.

(2) The supreme court
shall prescribe by rule a schedule of monetary penalties for designated traffic
infractions. This rule shall also specify the conditions under which local
courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic
infractions. The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust
this schedule every two years for inflation.

(3) There shall be a
penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of traffic
infraction except where the infraction relates to parking as defined by local
law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty
imposed pursuant to this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary
penalty not to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of
traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law, ordinance,
regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a municipal, police, or
district court, shall impose the monetary penalty set by the local legislative
body.

(4) Monetary penalties
provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are civil in nature and penalties which
may be assessed for violations of chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight,
and load of motor vehicles are not subject to the limitation on the amount of
monetary penalties which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.

(5) Whenever a monetary
penalty is imposed by a court under this chapter it is immediately payable. If
the person is unable to pay at that time the court may, in its discretion,
grant an extension of the period in which the penalty may be paid. If the
penalty is not paid on or before the time established for payment the court
shall notify the department of the failure to pay the penalty, and the
department shall suspend the person's driver's license or driving privilege
until the penalty has been paid and the penalty provided in subsection (3) of
this section has been paid.

(6) In addition to any
other penalties imposed under this section and not subject to the limitation of
subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have committed a traffic
infraction shall be assessed a fee of five dollars per infraction. Under no
circumstances shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall
be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical
services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040.

(7)(a) In addition to
any other penalties imposed under this section and not subject to the
limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have committed
a traffic infraction other than of RCW 46.61.527 shall be assessed an
additional penalty of ten dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend
the additional penalty unless the court finds the offender to be indigent. If
a community ((service)) restitution program for offenders is
available in the jurisdiction, the court shall allow offenders to offset all or
a part of the penalty due under this subsection (7) by participation in the
community ((service)) restitution program.

(b) Revenue
from the additional penalty must be remitted under chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50,
3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted under this subsection to the state
treasurer must be deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250. The balance of the
revenue received by the county or city treasurer under this subsection must be
deposited into the county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the
city or county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any
liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.

Sec. 37. RCW 46.63.120 and 1979
ex.s. c 136 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An order entered
after the receipt of a response which does not contest the determination, or
after it has been established at a hearing that the infraction was committed,
or after a hearing for the purpose of explaining mitigating circumstances is civil
in nature.

(2) The court may
include in the order the imposition of any penalty authorized by the provisions
of this chapter for the commission of an infraction. The court may, in its
discretion, waive, reduce, or suspend the monetary penalty prescribed for the
infraction. At the person's request the court may order performance of a
number of hours of community ((service)) restitution in lieu of a
monetary penalty, at the rate of the then state minimum wage per hour.

Sec. 38. RCW 46.64.055 and 2001 c
289 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any
other penalties imposed for conviction of a violation of this title that is a
misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor, or felony, the court shall impose an additional
penalty of fifty dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend the
additional penalty unless the court finds the offender to be indigent. If a
community ((service)) restitution program for offenders is
available in the jurisdiction, the court shall allow offenders to offset all or
a part of the penalty due under this section by participation in the community
((service)) restitution program.

(2) Revenue from the
additional penalty must be remitted under chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62,
10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted under this section to the state treasurer
must be deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250. The balance of the revenue
received by the county or city treasurer under this section must be deposited
into the county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the city or
county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any liabilities
under RCW 43.135.060.

Sec. 39. RCW 51.12.035 and 2001 c
138 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Volunteers shall be
deemed employees and/or workers, as the case may be, for all purposes relating
to medical aid benefits under chapter 51.36 RCW.

A "volunteer"
shall mean a person who performs any assigned or authorized duties for the
state or any agency thereof, except emergency services workers as described by
chapter 38.52 RCW, brought about by one's own free choice, receives no wages,
and is registered and accepted as a volunteer by the state or any agency
thereof, prior to the occurrence of the injury or the contraction of an
occupational disease, for the purpose of engaging in authorized volunteer
service: PROVIDED, That such person shall be deemed to be a volunteer although
he or she may be granted maintenance and reimbursement for actual expenses
necessarily incurred in performing his or her assigned or authorized duties.

Any and all premiums or
assessments due under this title on account of such volunteer service shall be
the obligation of and be paid by the state or any agency thereof which has
registered and accepted the services of volunteers.

(2) Except as provided
in RCW 51.12.050, volunteers may be deemed employees and/or workers, as the
case may be, for all purposes relating to medical aid benefits under chapter
51.36 RCW at the option of any city, county, town, special district, municipal
corporation, or political subdivision of any type, or any private nonprofit
charitable organization, when any such unit of local government or any such
nonprofit organization has given notice of covering all of its volunteers to
the director prior to the occurrence of the injury or contraction of an
occupational disease.

A "volunteer"
shall mean a person who performs any assigned or authorized duties for any such
unit of local government, or any such organization, except emergency services
workers as described by chapter 38.52 RCW, or fire fighters covered by chapter
41.24 RCW, brought about by one's own free choice, receives no wages, and is
registered and accepted as a volunteer by any such unit of local government, or
any such organization which has given such notice, for the purpose of engaging
in authorized volunteer services: PROVIDED, That such person shall be deemed
to be a volunteer although he or she may be granted maintenance and reimbursement
for actual expenses necessarily incurred in performing his or her assigned or
authorized duties: PROVIDED FURTHER, That juveniles performing community ((services))
restitution under chapter 13.40 RCW may not be granted coverage as
volunteers under this section.

Any and all premiums or
assessments due under this title on account of such volunteer service for any
such unit of local government, or any such organization shall be the obligation
of and be paid by such organization which has registered and accepted the
services of volunteers and exercised its option to secure the medical aid
benefits under chapter 51.36 RCW for such volunteers.

Sec. 40. RCW 51.12.045 and 1986 c
193 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Offenders performing
community ((services)) restitution pursuant to court order or
under RCW 13.40.080 may be deemed employees and/or workers under this title at
the option of the state, county, city, town, or nonprofit organization under
whose authorization the ((services are)) community restitution is
performed. Any premiums or assessments due under this title for community ((services))
restitution work shall be the obligation of and be paid for by the state
agency, county, city, town, or nonprofit organization for which the offender
performed the community ((services)) restitution. Coverage
commences when a state agency, county, city, town, or nonprofit organization
has given notice to the director that it wishes to cover offenders performing
community ((services)) restitution before the occurrence of an
injury or contraction of an occupational disease.

Sec. 41. RCW 66.20.200 and 1994 c
201 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be unlawful
for the owner of a card of identification to transfer the card to any other
person for the purpose of aiding such person to procure alcoholic beverages
from any licensee or store employee. Any person who shall permit his or her
card of identification to be used by another or transfer such card to another
for the purpose of aiding such transferee to obtain alcoholic beverages from a
licensee or store employee or gain admission to a premises or portion of a
premises classified by the board as off-limits to persons under twenty-one
years of age, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW
9A.20.021, except that a minimum fine of two hundred fifty dollars shall be
imposed and any sentence requiring community ((service)) restitution
shall require not fewer than twenty-five hours of ((such service)) community
restitution. Any person not entitled thereto who unlawfully procures or
has issued or transferred to him or her a card of identification, and any
person who possesses a card of identification not issued to him or her, and any
person who makes any false statement on any certification card required by RCW
66.20.190, as now or hereafter amended, to be signed by him or her, shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a
minimum fine of two hundred fifty dollars shall be imposed and any sentence
requiring community ((service)) restitution shall require not
fewer than twenty-five hours of ((such service)) community
restitution.

Sec. 42. RCW 66.44.291 and 1987 c
101 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every person between
the ages of eighteen and twenty, inclusive, who is convicted of a violation of
RCW 66.44.290 is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW
9A.20.021, except that a minimum fine of two hundred fifty dollars shall be
imposed and any sentence requiring community ((service)) restitution
shall require not fewer than twenty-five hours of ((such service)) community
restitution.

Sec. 43. RCW 66.44.325 and 1987 c
101 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person
who transfers in any manner an identification of age to a minor for the purpose
of permitting such minor to obtain alcoholic beverages shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a minimum fine
of two hundred fifty dollars shall be imposed and any sentence requiring
community ((service)) restitution shall require not fewer than
twenty-five hours of ((such service)) community restitution:
PROVIDED, That corroborative testimony of a witness other than the minor shall
be a condition precedent to conviction.

Sec. 44. RCW 69.50.425 and 1989 c
271 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

A person
who is convicted of a misdemeanor violation of any provision of this chapter
shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than twenty-four consecutive
hours, and by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars. On a second
or subsequent conviction, the fine shall not be less than five hundred
dollars. These fines shall be in addition to any other fine or penalty
imposed. Unless the court finds that the imposition of the minimum
imprisonment will pose a substantial risk to the defendant's physical or mental
well-being or that local jail facilities are in an overcrowded condition, the
minimum term of imprisonment shall not be suspended or deferred. If the court
finds such risk or overcrowding exists, it shall sentence the defendant to a
minimum of forty hours of community ((service)) restitution. If
a minimum term of imprisonment is suspended or deferred, the court shall state
in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts
upon which the suspension or deferral is based. Unless the court finds the
person to be indigent, the minimum fine shall not be suspended or deferred.

Sec. 45. RCW 70.93.060 and 2001 c
139 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is a violation
of this section to abandon a junk vehicle upon any property. In addition, no
person shall throw, drop, deposit, discard, or otherwise dispose of litter upon
any public property in the state or upon private property in this state not
owned by him or her or in the waters of this state whether from a vehicle or
otherwise including but not limited to any public highway, public park, beach,
campground, forest land, recreational area, trailer park, highway, road,
street, or alley except:

(a) When the property
is designated by the state or its agencies or political subdivisions for the
disposal of garbage and refuse, and the person is authorized to use such
property for that purpose;

(b) Into a litter
receptacle in a manner that will prevent litter from being carried away or
deposited by the elements upon any part of the private or public property or
waters.

(2)(a) Except as
provided in subsection (4) of this section, it is a class 3 civil infraction as
provided in RCW 7.80.120 for a person to litter in an amount less than or equal
to one cubic foot.

(b) It is a misdemeanor
for a person to litter in an amount greater than one cubic foot but less than
one cubic yard. The person shall also pay a litter cleanup restitution payment
equal to twice the actual cost of cleanup, or fifty dollars per cubic foot of
litter, whichever is greater. The court shall distribute one-half of the
restitution payment to the landowner and one-half of the restitution payment to
the law enforcement agency investigating the incident. The court may, in
addition to or in lieu of part or all of the cleanup restitution payment, order
the person to pick up and remove litter from the property, with prior
permission of the legal owner or, in the case of public property, of the agency
managing the property. The court may suspend or modify the litter cleanup restitution
payment for a first-time offender under this section, if the person cleans up
and properly disposes of the litter.

(c) It is a gross
misdemeanor for a person to litter in an amount of one cubic yard or more. The
person shall also pay a litter cleanup restitution payment equal to twice the
actual cost of cleanup, or one hundred dollars per cubic foot of litter,
whichever is greater. The court shall distribute one-half of the restitution
payment to the landowner and one-half of the restitution payment to the law
enforcement agency investigating the incident. The court may, in addition to
or in lieu of part or all of the cleanup restitution payment, order the person
to pick up and remove litter from the property, with prior permission of the legal
owner or, in the case of public property, of the agency managing the property.
The court may suspend or modify the litter cleanup restitution payment for a
first-time offender under this section, if the person cleans up and properly
disposes of the litter.

(d) If a junk vehicle
is abandoned in violation of this section, RCW 46.55.230 governs the vehicle's
removal, disposal, and sale, and the penalties that may be imposed against the
person who abandoned the vehicle.

(3) If the violation
occurs in a state park, the court shall, in addition to any other penalties
assessed, order the person to perform twenty-four hours of community ((service))
restitution in the state park where the violation occurred if the state
park has stated an intent to participate as provided in RCW 79A.05.050.

(4) It is a class 1
civil infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120 for a person to discard, in
violation of this section, a cigarette, cigar, or other tobacco product that is
capable of starting a fire.

Sec. 46. RCW 70.93.250 and 1998 c
257 s 10 and 1998 c 245 s 128 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1) The department
shall provide funding to local units of government to establish, conduct, and evaluate
community ((service)) restitution and other programs for waste
reduction, litter and illegal dump cleanup, and recycling. Programs eligible
for funding under this section shall include, but not be limited to, programs
established pursuant to RCW 72.09.260.

(2) Funds may be
offered for costs associated with community waste reduction, litter cleanup and
prevention, and recycling activities. The funding program must be flexible,
allowing local governments to use funds broadly to meet their needs to reduce
waste, control litter and illegal dumping, and promote recycling. Local
governments are required to contribute resources or in-kind services. The
department shall evaluate funding requests from local government according to
the same criteria as those developed in RCW 70.93.220, provide funds according
to the effectiveness and efficiency of local government litter control
programs, and monitor the results of all local government programs under this
section.

(3) Local governments
shall report information as requested by the department in funding agreements
entered into by the department and a local government. The department shall
report to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature by December of
even-numbered years on the effectiveness of local government waste reduction,
litter, and recycling programs funded under this section.

Sec. 47. RCW 70.155.080 and 1998
c 133 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person under the
age of eighteen who purchases or attempts to purchase, possesses, or obtains or
attempts to obtain cigarettes or tobacco products commits a class 3 civil
infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW and is subject to a fine as set out in
chapter 7.80 RCW or participation in up to four hours of community ((service))
restitution, or both. The court may also require participation in a
smoking cessation program. This provision does not apply if a person under the
age of eighteen, with parental authorization, is participating in a controlled
purchase as part of a liquor control board, law enforcement, or local health
department activity.

(2) Municipal and
district courts within the state have jurisdiction for enforcement of this
section.

Sec. 48. RCW 72.09.060 and 1989 c
185 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
corrections may be organized into such divisions or offices as the secretary
may determine, but shall include divisions for (1) correctional industries, (2)
prisons and other custodial institutions and (3) probation, parole, community
((service)) restitution, restitution, and other nonincarcerative
sanctions. The secretary shall have at least one person on his or her
staff who shall have the responsibility for developing a program which encourages
the use of volunteers, for citizen advisory groups, and for similar public
involvement programs in the corrections area. Minimum qualification for staff
assigned to public involvement responsibilities shall include previous
experience in working with volunteers or volunteer agencies.

Sec. 49. RCW 72.09.100 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 19 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature to vest in the department the power to provide for a comprehensive
inmate work program and to remove statutory and other restrictions which have
limited work programs in the past. For purposes of establishing such a
comprehensive program, the legislature recommends that the department consider
adopting any or all, or any variation of, the following classes of work
programs:

(1) CLASS I: FREE
VENTURE INDUSTRIES. The employer model industries in this class shall be
operated and managed in total or in part by any profit or nonprofit
organization pursuant to an agreement between the organization and the
department. The organization shall produce goods or services for sale to both
the public and private sector.

The customer model
industries in this class shall be operated and managed by the department to
provide Washington state manufacturers or businesses with products or services
currently produced or provided by out-of-state or foreign suppliers. The
correctional industries board of directors shall review these proposed
industries before the department contracts to provide such products or
services. The review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of the
proposed products and services on the Washington state business community and
labor market.

The department of
corrections shall supply appropriate security and custody services without
charge to the participating firms.

Inmates who work in
free venture industries shall do so at their own choice. They shall be paid a
wage comparable to the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality
in which the industry is located, as determined by the director of correctional
industries. If the director cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage,
then the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.

An inmate who is
employed in the class I program of correctional industries shall not be
eligible for unemployment compensation benefits pursuant to any of the
provisions of Title 50 RCW until released on parole or discharged.

(2) CLASS II: TAX
REDUCTION INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be state-owned and
operated enterprises designed to reduce the costs for goods and services for
tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit organizations. The industries
selected for development within this class shall, as much as possible, match
the available pool of inmate work skills and aptitudes with the work
opportunities in the free community. The industries shall be closely patterned
after private sector industries but with the objective of reducing public
support costs rather than making a profit. The products and services of this
industry, including purchased products and services necessary for a complete
product line, may be sold to public agencies, to nonprofit organizations, and
to private contractors when the goods purchased will be ultimately used by a
public agency or a nonprofit organization. Clothing manufactured by an
industry in this class may be donated to nonprofit organizations that provide
clothing free of charge to low-income persons. Correctional industries
products and services shall be reviewed by the correctional industries board of
directors before offering such products and services for sale to private
contractors. The board of directors shall conduct a yearly marketing review of
the products and services offered under this subsection. Such review shall
include an analysis of the potential impact of the proposed products and
services on the Washington state business community. To avoid waste or
spoilage and consequent loss to the state, when there is no public sector market
for such goods, byproducts and surpluses of timber, agricultural, and animal
husbandry enterprises may be sold to private persons, at private sale. Surplus
byproducts and surpluses of timber, agricultural and animal husbandry
enterprises that cannot be sold to public agencies or to private persons may be
donated to nonprofit organizations. All sales of surplus products shall be
carried out in accordance with rules prescribed by the secretary.

Security and custody
services shall be provided without charge by the department of corrections.

Inmates working in this
class of industries shall do so at their own choice and shall be paid for their
work on a gratuity scale which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a
similar nature in the locality in which the industry is located and which is
approved by the director of correctional industries.

Subject to approval of
the correctional industries board, provisions of RCW 41.06.380 prohibiting
contracting out work performed by classified employees shall not apply to
contracts with Washington state businesses entered into by the department of
corrections through class II industries.

(3) CLASS III:
INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be operated
by the department of corrections. They shall be designed and managed to
accomplish the following objectives:

(a) Whenever possible,
to provide basic work training and experience so that the inmate will be able
to qualify for better work both within correctional industries and the free
community. It is not intended that an inmate's work within this class of
industries should be his or her final and total work experience as an inmate.

(b) Whenever possible,
to provide forty hours of work or work training per week.

(c) Whenever possible,
to offset tax and other public support costs.

Supervising,
management, and custody staff shall be employees of the department.

All able and eligible
inmates who are assigned work and who are not working in other classes of
industries shall work in this class.

Except for inmates who
work in work training programs, inmates in this class shall be paid for their
work in accordance with an inmate gratuity scale. The scale shall be adopted
by the secretary of corrections.

(4) CLASS IV:
COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be operated by the
department of corrections. They shall be designed and managed to provide
services in the inmate's resident community at a reduced cost. The services
shall be provided to public agencies, to persons who are poor or infirm, or to
nonprofit organizations.

Inmates in this program
shall reside in facilities owned by, contracted for, or licensed by the
department of corrections. A unit of local government shall provide work
supervision services without charge to the state and shall pay the inmate's
wage.

The department of
corrections shall reimburse participating units of local government for
liability and workers compensation insurance costs.

Inmates who work in
this class of industries shall do so at their own choice and shall receive a gratuity
which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the
locality in which the industry is located.

(5) CLASS V: COMMUNITY
((SERVICE)) RESTITUTION PROGRAMS. Programs in this class shall
be subject to supervision by the department of corrections. The purpose of
this class of industries is to enable an inmate, placed on community
supervision, to work off all or part of a community ((service)) restitution
order as ordered by the sentencing court.

Employment shall be in
a community ((service)) restitution program operated by the
state, local units of government, or a nonprofit agency.

To the extent that
funds are specifically made available for such purposes, the department of
corrections shall reimburse nonprofit agencies for workers compensation
insurance costs.

Sec. 50. RCW 72.09.260 and 1990 c
66 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall assist local units of government in establishing community ((service))
restitution programs for litter cleanup. Community ((service)) restitution
litter cleanup programs must include the following: (a) Procedures for
documenting the number of community ((service)) restitution hours
worked in litter cleanup by each offender; (b) plans to coordinate litter
cleanup activities with local governmental entities responsible for roadside
and park maintenance; (c) insurance coverage for offenders during litter
cleanup activities pursuant to RCW 51.12.045; (d) provision of adequate safety
equipment and, if needed, weather protection gear; and (e) provision for
including felons and misdemeanants in the program.

(2) Community ((service))
restitution programs established under this section shall involve, but
not be limited to, persons convicted of nonviolent, drug-related offenses.

(3) Nothing in this
section shall diminish the department's authority to place offenders in
community ((service)) restitution programs or to determine the
suitability of offenders for specific programs.

(4) As used in this
section, "litter cleanup" includes cleanup and removal of solid waste
that is illegally dumped.

Sec. 51. 1990 c 66 s 1
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that the amount of litter along the state's roadways is increasing at an
alarming rate and that local governments often lack the human and fiscal
resources to remove litter from public roads. The legislature also finds that
persons committing nonviolent, drug-related offenses can often be productively
engaged through programs to remove litter from county and municipal roads. It
is therefore the intent of the legislature to assist local units of government
in establishing community ((service)) restitution programs for
litter cleanup and to establish a funding source for such programs.

Sec. 52. RCW 79A.05.050 and 1996
c 263 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission
shall establish a policy and procedures for supervising and evaluating
community ((service)) restitution activities that may be imposed
under RCW 70.93.060(3) including a description of what constitutes satisfactory
completion of community ((service)) restitution.

(2) The commission
shall inform each state park of the policy and procedures regarding community
((service)) restitution activities, and each state park shall
then notify the commission as to whether or not the park elects to participate
in the community ((service)) restitution program. The commission
shall transmit a list notifying the district courts of each state park that
elects to participate.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 53. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---