BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature declares
that:

(1) Strong marital
relationships result in stronger families, children, and ultimately, stronger
communities and place less of a fiscal burden on the state; and

(2) The state has a
compelling interest in providing couples, applying for a marriage license,
information with regard to marriage and, if contemplated, the effects of
divorce.

Sec. 2. RCW 2.56.030 and 1997 c
41 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The administrator for
the courts shall, under the supervision and direction of the chief justice:

(1) Examine the
administrative methods and systems employed in the offices of the judges,
clerks, stenographers, and employees of the courts and make recommendations,
through the chief justice, for the improvement of the same;

(2) Examine the state
of the dockets of the courts and determine the need for assistance by any
court;

(3) Make
recommendations to the chief justice relating to the assignment of judges where
courts are in need of assistance and carry out the direction of the chief
justice as to the assignments of judges to counties and districts where the
courts are in need of assistance;

(4) Collect and compile
statistical and other data and make reports of the business transacted by the
courts and transmit the same to the chief justice to the end that proper action
may be taken in respect thereto;

(5) Prepare and submit
budget estimates of state appropriations necessary for the maintenance and
operation of the judicial system and make recommendations in respect thereto;

(6) Collect statistical
and other data and make reports relating to the expenditure of public moneys, state
and local, for the maintenance and operation of the judicial system and the
offices connected therewith;

(7) Obtain reports from
clerks of courts in accordance with law or rules adopted by the supreme court
of this state on cases and other judicial business in which action has been
delayed beyond periods of time specified by law or rules of court and make
report thereof to supreme court of this state;

(8) Act as secretary of
the judicial conference referred to in RCW 2.56.060;

(9) Submit annually, as
of February 1st, to the chief justice, a report of the activities of the
administrator's office for the preceding calendar year including activities
related to courthouse security;

(10) Administer
programs and standards for the training and education of judicial personnel;

(11) Examine the need
for new superior court and district judge positions under a weighted caseload
analysis that takes into account the time required to hear all the cases in a
particular court and the amount of time existing judges have available to hear
cases in that court. The results of the weighted caseload analysis shall be
reviewed by the board for judicial administration which shall make
recommendations to the legislature. It is the intent of the legislature that
weighted caseload analysis become the basis for creating additional district
court positions, and recommendations should address that objective;

(12) Provide staff to
the judicial retirement account plan under chapter 2.14 RCW;

(13) Attend to such
other matters as may be assigned by the supreme court of this state;

(14) Within available
funds, develop a curriculum for a general understanding of child development,
placement, and treatment resources, as well as specific legal skills and
knowledge of relevant statutes including chapters 13.32A, 13.34, and 13.40 RCW,
cases, court rules, interviewing skills, and special needs of the abused or
neglected child. This curriculum shall be completed and made available to all
juvenile court judges, court personnel, and service providers and be updated
yearly to reflect changes in statutes, court rules, or case law;

(15) Develop, in
consultation with the entities set forth in RCW 2.56.150(3), a comprehensive
statewide curriculum for persons who act as guardians ad litem under Title 13
or 26 RCW. The curriculum shall be made available July 1, 1997, and include
specialty sections on child development, child sexual abuse, child physical
abuse, child neglect, clinical and forensic investigative and interviewing
techniques, family reconciliation and mediation services, and relevant
statutory and legal requirements. The curriculum shall be made available to
all superior court judges, court personnel, and all persons who act as
guardians ad litem;

(16) Develop a
curriculum for a general understanding of crimes of malicious harassment, as
well as specific legal skills and knowledge of RCW 9A.36.080, relevant cases,
court rules, and the special needs of malicious harassment victims. This
curriculum shall be made available to all superior court and court of appeals
judges and to all justices of the supreme court;

(17) Develop, in
consultation with the criminal justice training commission and the commissions
established under chapters 43.113, 43.115, and 43.117 RCW, a curriculum for a
general understanding of ethnic and cultural diversity and its implications for
working with youth of color and their families. The curriculum shall be
available to all superior court judges and court commissioners assigned to
juvenile court, and other court personnel. Ethnic and cultural diversity
training shall be provided annually so as to incorporate cultural sensitivity
and awareness into the daily operation of juvenile courts statewide;

(18) Authorize the use
of closed circuit television and other electronic equipment in judicial
proceedings. The administrator shall promulgate necessary standards and
procedures and shall provide technical assistance to courts as required;

(19) Develop a
Washington family law handbook in accordance with section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 2.56 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The administrator
for the courts will create a handbook explaining the sections of Washington law
pertaining to the rights and responsibilities of marital partners to each other
and to any children during a marriage and a dissolution of marriage. The
handbook may also be provided in videotape or other electronic form.

(2) The handbook
created under subsection (1) of this section will be provided by the county
auditor when an individual files a marriage certificate under RCW 26.04.090.

(3) The information
contained in the handbook created under subsection (1) of this section will be
reviewed and updated annually. The handbook must contain the following
information:

(a) Information on
prenuptial agreements as contracts and as a means of structuring financial
arrangements and other aspects of the marital relationship;

(b) Information on
shared parental responsibility for children, including establishing a
residential schedule for the child in the event of the dissolution of the
marriage;

(c) Information on
notice requirements and standards for parental relocation;

(d) Information on
child support for minor children;

(e) Information on
property rights, including equitable distribution of assets and premarital and
postmarital property rights;

(f) Information on
spousal maintenance;

(g) Information on
domestic violence, child abuse, and neglect, including penalties;

(h) Information on the
court process for dissolution;

(i) Information on the
effects of dissolution on children;

(j) Information
on community resources that are available to separating or divorcing persons
and their children.

---
END ---