BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.28.006 and 2001 c
211 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this subchapter.

(1)
"Administrator" means a person designated by an electrical contractor
to supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance with the rules
adopted under this chapter.

(2) "Board"
means the electrical board under RCW 19.28.311.

(3) "Chapter"
or "subchapter" means the subchapter, if no chapter number is
referenced.

(4) "Department"
means the department of labor and industries.

(5)
"Director" means the director of the department or the director's
designee.

(6) "Electrical
construction trade" includes but is not limited to installing or
maintaining electrical wires and equipment that are used for light, heat, or
power and installing and maintaining remote control, signaling, power limited,
or communication circuits or systems.

(7) "Electrical
contractor" means a person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity that offers to undertake, undertakes, submits a bid for, or does the
work of installing or maintaining wires or equipment that convey electrical
current.

(8)
"Equipment" means any equipment or apparatus that directly uses,
conducts, or is operated by electricity but does not mean plug-in ((household))
appliances or equipment as determined by the department by rule.

(9) "Industrial
control panel" means a factory-wired or user-wired assembly of industrial
control equipment such as motor controllers, switches, relays, power supplies,
computers, cathode ray tubes, transducers, and auxiliary devices. The panel
may include disconnect means and motor branch circuit protective devices.

(10) "Journeyman
electrician" means a person who has been issued a journeyman electrician
certificate of competency by the department.

(11) "Master
electrician" means either a master journeyman electrician or master
specialty electrician.

(12) "Master
journeyman electrician" means a person who has been issued a master
journeyman electrician certificate of competency by the department and who may
be designated by an electrical contractor to supervise electrical work and
electricians in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter.

(13) "Master
specialty electrician" means a person who has been issued a specialty
electrician certificate of competency by the department and who may be
designated by an electrical contractor to supervise electrical work and
electricians in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter.

(14)
"Specialty electrician" means a person who has been issued a
specialty electrician certificate of competency by the department.

Sec. 2. RCW 19.28.041 and 2001 c
211 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for
any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity to engage in,
conduct, or carry on the business of installing or maintaining wires or
equipment to convey electric current, or installing or maintaining equipment to
be operated by electric current as it pertains to the electrical industry,
without having an unrevoked, unsuspended, and unexpired electrical contractor
license, issued by the department in accordance with this chapter. All
electrical contractor licenses expire twenty-four calendar months following the
day of their issue. The department may issue an electrical contractors license
for a period of less than twenty-four months only for the purpose of equalizing
the number of electrical contractor licenses that expire each month.
Application for an electrical contractor license shall be made in writing to
the department, accompanied by the required fee. The application shall state:

(a) The name and
address of the applicant; in case of firms or partnerships, the names of the
individuals composing the firm or partnership; in case of corporations, the
names of the managing officials thereof;

(b) The location of the
place of business of the applicant and the name under which the business is
conducted;

(c) Employer social
security number;

(d) Evidence of
workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's employees working in
Washington, as follows:

(i) The applicant's
industrial insurance account number issued by the department;

(ii) The applicant's
self-insurer number issued by the department; or

(iii) For applicants
domiciled in a state or province of Canada subject to an agreement entered into
under RCW 51.12.120(7), as permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of
coverage issued by the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in
the applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant has
secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or province's
workers' compensation law;

(e) Employment security
department number;

(f) State excise tax
registration number;

(g) Unified business
identifier (UBI) account number may be substituted for the information required
by (d) of this subsection if the applicant will not employ employees in
Washington, and by (e) and (f) of this subsection; and

(h) Whether a general
or specialty electrical contractor license is sought and, if the latter, the
type of specialty. Electrical contractor specialties include, but are not
limited to: Residential, ((domestic appliances,)) pump and irrigation,
limited energy system, signs, nonresidential maintenance, and a combination
specialty. A general electrical contractor license shall grant to the holder
the right to engage in, conduct, or carry on the business of installing or
maintaining wires or equipment to carry electric current, and installing or
maintaining equipment, or installing or maintaining material to fasten or
insulate such wires or equipment to be operated by electric current, in the
state of Washington. A specialty electrical contractor license shall grant to
the holder a limited right to engage in, conduct, or carry on the business of
installing or maintaining wires or equipment to carry electrical current, and
installing or maintaining equipment; or installing or maintaining material to
fasten or insulate such wires or equipment to be operated by electric current
in the state of Washington as expressly allowed by the license.

(2) The department may
verify the workers' compensation coverage information provided by the applicant
under subsection (1)(d) of this section, including but not limited to
information regarding the coverage of an individual employee of the applicant.
If coverage is provided under the laws of another state, the department may
notify the other state that the applicant is employing employees in Washington.

(3) The application for
((a)) an electrical contractor license shall be accompanied by a
bond in the sum of four thousand dollars with the state of Washington named as
obligee in the bond, with good and sufficient surety, to be approved by the
department. The bond shall at all times be kept in full force and effect, and
any cancellation or revocation thereof, or withdrawal of the surety therefrom,
suspends the license issued to the principal until a new bond has been filed
and approved as provided in this section. Upon approval of a bond, the
department shall on the next business day deposit the fee accompanying the
application in the electrical license fund and shall file the bond in the
office. The department shall upon request furnish to any person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity a certified copy of the bond upon the
payment of a fee that the department shall set by rule. The fee shall cover
but not exceed the cost of furnishing the certified copy. The bond shall be
conditioned that in any installation or maintenance of wires or equipment to
convey electrical current, and equipment to be operated by electrical current,
the principal will comply with the provisions of this chapter and with any
electrical ordinance, building code, or regulation of a city or town adopted
pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3) that is in effect at the time of entering into a
contract. The bond shall be conditioned further that the principal will pay
for all labor, including employee benefits, and material furnished or used upon
the work, taxes and contributions to the state of Washington, and all damages
that may be sustained by any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity due to a failure of the principal to make the installation or
maintenance in accordance with this chapter or any applicable ordinance,
building code, or regulation of a city or town adopted pursuant to RCW
19.28.010(3). In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the license
applicant may file with the department a cash deposit or other negotiable
security acceptable to the department. If the license applicant has filed a
cash deposit, the department shall deposit the funds in a special trust savings
account in a commercial bank, mutual savings bank, or savings and loan
association and shall pay annually to the depositor the interest derived from
the account.

(4) The department
shall issue general or specialty electrical contractor licenses to applicants
meeting all of the requirements of this chapter. The provisions of this
chapter relating to the licensing of any person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity including the requirement of a bond with the state
of Washington named as obligee therein and the collection of a fee therefor,
are exclusive, and no political subdivision of the state of Washington may
require or issue any licenses or bonds or charge any fee for the same or a
similar purpose. No person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity holding
more than one specialty contractor license under this chapter may be required
to pay an annual fee for more than one such license or to post more than one
four thousand dollar bond, equivalent cash deposit, or other negotiable
security.

(5) To obtain a general
or specialty electrical contractor license the applicant must designate an
individual who currently possesses ((an)) a valid master journeyman
electrician's certificate of competency, valid master specialty electrician's
certificate of competency in the specialty for which application has been made,
valid administrator's certificate as a general electrical contractor
administrator or as a specialty electrical contractor administrator in the
specialty for which application has been made.

(6)
Administrator certificate specialties include but are not limited to:
Residential, ((domestic, appliance,)) pump and irrigation, limited
energy system, signs, nonresidential maintenance, and combination specialty.
To obtain an administrator's certificate an individual must pass an examination
as set forth in RCW 19.28.051 unless the applicant was a licensed electrical
contractor at any time during 1974. Applicants who were electrical contractors
licensed by the state of Washington at any time during 1974 are entitled to
receive a general electrical contractor administrator's certificate without
examination if the applicants apply prior to January 1, 1984. The board of
electrical examiners shall certify to the department the names of all persons who
are entitled to either a general or specialty electrical contractor
administrator's certificate.

Sec. 3. RCW 19.28.051 and 2001 c
211 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the purpose
and function of the board to establish, in addition to a general electrical
contractors' license, such classifications of specialty electrical contractors'
licenses as it deems appropriate with regard to individual sections pertaining
to state adopted codes in this chapter. In addition, it shall be the purpose
and function of the board to establish and administer written examinations for
general electrical administrators' certificates and the various specialty
electrical administrators' certificates. Examinations shall be designed to
reasonably ((insure)) ensure that general and specialty
electrical administrators' certificate holders are competent to engage in and
supervise the work covered by this statute and their respective licenses. The
examinations shall include questions from the following categories to assure
proper safety and protection for the general public: (1) Safety, (2) state
electrical code, and (3) electrical theory. The department with the consent of
the board shall be permitted to enter into a contract with a professional
testing agency to develop, administer, and score these examinations. A
person may take the administrator's examination as many times as necessary
without limit. The fee for the examination may be set by the department in
its contract with the professional testing agency. The department may direct
that the applicant pay the fee to the professional testing agency. The fee
shall cover but not exceed the costs of preparing and administering the
examination. It shall be the further purpose and function of this board to
advise the director as to the need of additional electrical inspectors and
compliance officers to be utilized by the director on either a full-time or
part-time employment basis and to carry out the duties enumerated in RCW 19.28.161
through 19.28.271 as well as generally advise the department on all matters
relative to RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271.

Sec. 4. RCW 19.28.061 and 1996 c
241 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each applicant for
an electrical contractor's license, other than an individual, shall designate a
supervisory employee or member of the firm to take the required master
electrician's or administrator's examination. Effective July 1, 1987, a
supervisory employee designated as the electrical contractor's master
electrician or administrator shall be a full-time supervisory employee.
This person shall be designated as master electrician or administrator
under the license. No person may concurrently qualify as master
electrician or administrator for more than one contractor. If the
relationship of the master electrician or administrator with the
electrical contractor is terminated, the contractor's license is void within
ninety days unless another master electrician or administrator is
qualified by the board. However, if the master electrician or
administrator dies or is otherwise incapacitated, the contractor's
license is void within one hundred eighty days unless another master
electrician or administrator is qualified by the board. ((A certificate
issued under this section is valid for two years from the nearest birthdate of
the administrator, unless revoked or suspended, and further is nontransferable.))
The contractor must notify the department in writing within ten days if the
master electrician's or administrator's relationship with the contractor
terminates due to the master electrician's or administrator's death or
incapacitation.

(2) The department
must issue an administrator's certificate to all applicants who have passed the
examination provided in RCW 19.28.051 and this section, and who have complied
with the rules adopted under this chapter. The administrator's certificate
must bear the date of issuance, expires on the holder's birthday, and is
nontransferable. The certificate must be renewed every three years, upon
application, on or before the holder's birthday.

(a) If the
certificate holder demonstrates to the department that he or she has
satisfactorily completed an annual eight-hour continuing education course, the
certificate may be renewed by appropriate application without examination
unless the certificate has been revoked, suspended, or not renewed within
ninety days after the expiration date.

(b) The contents and
requirements for satisfactory completion of the continuing education course
must be determined by the director and approved by the board.

(c) The department
must accept proof of a certificate holder's satisfactory completion of a
continuing education course offered in another state as meeting the
requirements for maintaining a current Washington state certificate if the
department is satisfied the course is comparable in nature to that required in
Washington state for maintaining a current certificate.

(3) A fee must be
assessed for each administrator's certificate and for each renewal. An
individual holding more than one administrator's certificate under this chapter
is not required to pay fees for more than one certificate. If the certificate
is not renewed before the expiration date, the individual must pay twice the
usual fee. The department must set the fees by rule for issuance and renewal
of a certificate. The fees must cover, but not exceed, the costs of issuing
the certificates and of administering and enforcing the electrician
certification requirements of this chapter.

(4) The
department may deny an application for an administrator's certificate for up to
two years if the applicant's previous administrator's certificate has been
revoked for a serious violation and all appeals concerning the revocation have
been exhausted. For the purposes of this section only, a serious violation is
a violation that presents imminent danger to the public. ((The certificate
may be renewed for a two-year period without examination by appropriate
application unless the certificate has been revoked, suspended, or not renewed
within ninety days after the expiration date. If the certificate is not
renewed before the expiration date, the individual shall pay twice the usual fee.
An individual holding more than one administrator's certificate under this
chapter shall not be required to pay annual fees for more than one
certificate. A person may take the administrator's test as many times as
necessary without limit.

(2))) (5) The designated master
electrician or administrator shall:

(a) Be a member of the
firm or a supervisory employee and shall be available during working hours to
carry out the duties of an administrator under this section;

(b) Ensure that all
electrical work complies with the electrical installation laws and rules of the
state;

(c) Ensure that the
proper electrical safety procedures are used;

(d) Ensure that all
electrical labels, permits, and licenses required to perform electrical work
are used;

(e) See that corrective
notices issued by an inspecting authority are complied with; and

(f) Notify the
department in writing within ten days if the master electrician or
administrator terminates the relationship with the electrical contractor.

(((3))) (6)
The department shall not by rule change the administrator's duties under
subsection (((2))) (5) of this section.

Sec. 5. RCW 19.28.161 and 1997 c
309 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person may
engage in the electrical construction trade without having a ((current))
valid master journeyman electrician certificate of competency,
journeyman electrician certificate of competency, master specialty
electrician certificate of competency, or a current specialty electrician certificate
of competency issued by the department in accordance with this chapter.
Electrician certificate of competency specialties include, but are not limited
to: Residential, ((domestic appliances,)) pump and irrigation, limited
energy system, signs, and nonresidential maintenance.

(2) A person who is
indentured in an apprenticeship program approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for
the electrical construction trade or who is learning the electrical
construction trade may work in the electrical construction trade if supervised
by a certified master journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician,
master specialty electrician in that electrician's specialty, or a
certified specialty electrician in that electrician's specialty. All
apprentices and individuals learning the electrical construction trade shall
obtain an electrical training certificate from the department. The certificate
shall authorize the holder to learn the electrical construction trade while
under the direct supervision of a master journeyman electrician,
journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, or a specialty electrician working in ((his or
her)) that electrician's specialty. The holder of the electrical
training certificate shall renew the certificate ((annually)) biennially.
At the time of renewal, the holder shall provide the department with an
accurate list of the holder's employers in the electrical construction industry
for the previous year and the number of hours worked for each employer. ((An
annual)) A biennial fee shall be charged for the issuance or renewal
of the certificate. The department shall set the fee by rule. The fee shall
cover but not exceed the cost of administering and enforcing the trainee
certification and supervision requirements of this chapter. Apprentices and
individuals learning the electrical construction trade shall have their
electrical training certificates in their possession at all times that they are
performing electrical work. They shall show their certificates to an
authorized representative of the department at the representative's request.

(3) Any person who has
been issued an electrical training certificate under this chapter may work if
that person is under supervision. Supervision shall consist of a person being
on the same job site and under the control of either a certified master
journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or ((an appropriate))
a specialty electrician ((who has an applicable certificate of
competency issued under this chapter. Either a journeyman electrician or an
appropriate specialty electrician shall be on the same job site as the
noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five percent of each working
day unless otherwise provided in this chapter)) working in that
electrician's specialty.

(4) The ratio of
noncertified individuals to certified master journeymen electricians,
journeymen electricians, master specialty electricians, or specialty
electricians ((working)) on ((a)) any one job site ((shall
be)) is as follows:

(a) When working as
a specialty electrician, not more than two noncertified individuals ((working
on any one job site)) for every certified master specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty, specialty electrician working
in that electrician's specialty, master journeyman electrician, or
journeyman electrician ((working as a specialty electrician)), except
that the ratio requirements are one certified master specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty, certified specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty, certified master journeyman
electrician, or certified journeyman electrician working as a specialty
electrician to no more than four students enrolled in and working as part of an
electrical construction program at public community or technical colleges, or
not-for-profit nationally accredited trade or technical schools licensed by the
work force training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW.
In meeting the ratio requirements for students enrolled in an electrical
construction program at a trade school, a trade school may receive input and
advice from the electrical board; and

(b) When working as
a journeyman electrician, not more than one noncertified individual ((working
on any one job site)) for every certified master journeyman electrician
or certified journeyman electrician, except that the ratio requirements
shall be one certified master journeyman electrician or certified
journeyman electrician to no more than four students enrolled in and working as
part of an electrical construction program at public community or technical
colleges, or not-for-profit nationally accredited trade or technical schools
licensed by the work force training and education coordinating board under
chapter 28C.10 RCW. In meeting the ratio requirements for students enrolled in
an electrical construction program at a trade school, a trade school may
receive input and advice from the electrical board.

An individual who has a
current training certificate and who has successfully completed or is currently
enrolled in an approved apprenticeship program or in an electrical construction
program at public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally
accredited technical or trade schools licensed by the work force training and
education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, may work without direct
on-site supervision during the last six months of meeting the practical
experience requirements of this chapter.

(5) For the
residential (as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(a)), pump and irrigation (as
specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(b)(i)), sign (as specified in WAC
296-46A-930(2)(c)), limited energy (as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(e)(i)),
or nonresidential maintenance (as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(f)(i))
specialties, either a master journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician,
master specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or an
appropriate specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty must
be on the same job site as the noncertified individual for a minimum of
seventy-five percent of each working day. Other specialties must meet the
requirements specified in RCW 19.28.191(1)(f)(ii). When the ratio of certified
electricians to noncertified individuals on a job site is one certified
electrician to three or four noncertified individuals the certified electrician
must:

(a) Directly
supervise and instruct the noncertified individuals and the certified
electrician may not directly make or engage in an electrical installation; and

(b) Be on the same
job site as the noncertified individual for a minimum of one hundred percent of
each working day.

(6) The
electrical contractor shall accurately verify and attest to the electrical
trainee hours worked by electrical trainees on behalf of the electrical
contractor.

Sec. 6. RCW 19.28.191 and 1997 c
309 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon receipt of the
application, the department shall review the application and determine whether
the applicant is eligible to take an examination for the master journeyman
electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician,
or specialty electrician certificate of competency.

(a) Before July 1,
2005, an applicant who possesses a valid general administrator's certificate
and possesses a valid journeyman electrician certificate of competency in
effect for the previous four years may apply for a master journeyman
electrician certificate of competency without examination.

(b) Before July 1,
2005, an applicant who possesses a valid specialty administrator's certificate,
in the specialty applied for, and possesses a valid specialty electrician
certificate of competency, in the specialty applied for, for the previous two
years may apply for a master specialty electrician certificate of competency
without examination.

(c) To be eligible
to take the examination for a master journeyman electrician certificate of
competency the applicant must have possessed a valid journeyman electrician
certificate of competency for four years.

(d) To be eligible
to take the examination for a master specialty electrician certificate of
competency the applicant must have possessed a valid specialty electrician
certificate of competency, in the specialty applied for, for two years.

(e) To be eligible
to take the examination for a journeyman certificate of competency the
applicant must have:

(i) Worked in the
electrical construction trade for a minimum of ((four years)) eight
thousand hours employed full time, of which ((two years)) four
thousand hours shall be in industrial or commercial electrical installation
under the supervision of a journeyman electrician and not more than a total of
((two years)) four thousand hours in all specialties under the
supervision of a journeyman electrician or an appropriate specialty electrician.
Specialty electricians with less than a four thousand hour work experience
requirement cannot credit the time required to obtain that specialty towards
qualifying to become a journeyman electrician; or

(ii) Successfully
completed an apprenticeship program approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the
electrical construction trade.

(((b))) (f)
To be eligible to take the examination ((to become)) for a
specialty electrician certificate of competency the applicant ((shall))
must have:

(i) Worked in ((that
specialty of the electrical construction trade, under the supervision of a
journeyman electrician or an appropriate specialty electrician, for a minimum
of two years employed full time)) the residential, pump and irrigation, sign,
limited energy, or nonresidential maintenance specialties of the electrical
construction trade under the supervision of a master journeyman electrician,
journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, or a specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty for a minimum of four thousand hours; or

(ii) Worked in other
than the designated specialties in (f)(i) of this subsection for a minimum of
two thousand hours. A minimum of the initial ninety days, or longer if set by
rule by the department, must be spent under one hundred percent supervision of
a master journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty. After the minimum full supervision
period, a person may take the specialty examination. If the person passes the
examination, the person may work unsupervised for the balance of the two
thousand hours required to attain certification; or

(iii)
Successfully completed an approved apprenticeship program under chapter 49.04
RCW for the applicant's specialty in the electrical construction trade.

(((c))) (g)
Any applicant for a journeyman electrician certificate of competency who
has successfully completed a two-year program in the electrical construction
trade at public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally
accredited technical or trade schools licensed by the work force training and
education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW may substitute up to two
years of the technical or trade school program for two years of work experience
under a master journeyman electrician or a journeyman electrician. The
applicant shall obtain the additional two years of work experience required in
industrial or commercial electrical installation prior to the beginning, or
after the completion, of the technical school program. ((Any applicant who
has received training in the electrical construction trade in the armed service
of the United States may be eligible to take the examination for the
certificate of competency.

(d))) (h) An applicant for a specialty
electrician certificate of competency who, after January 1, 2000, has
successfully completed a two-year program in the electrical construction trade
at a public community or technical college, or a not-for-profit nationally
accredited technical or trade school licensed by the work force training and
education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, may substitute up to one
year of the technical or trade school program for one year of work experience
under a master journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty.

(i) The department
must determine whether hours of training and experience in the military or
school program are in the electrical construction trade and appropriate as a
substitute for hours of work experience. The department must use the following
criteria for evaluating the equivalence of classroom electrical training programs
and work in the electrical construction trade:

(i) A two-year
electrical training program must consist of three thousand or more hours of
student/instructor contact time.

(ii) In a two-year
electrical training program, a minimum of two thousand four hundred hours of
student/instructor contact time must be technical electrical instruction
directly related to the scope of work of the electrical specialty.
Student/instructor contact time includes lecture, in-school lab, and may
include off-site instructor-supervised electrical installation.

(iii) External
intern programs must not be used to comply with the student/instructor contact
hours requirement, but will be eligible for electrical trainee work experience
credit if performed in accordance with this chapter.

(iv) The department
may not allow credit for a program that accepts more than one thousand hours
transferred from another school's program.

(v) Electrical
specialty training school programs of less than two years will have all of the
above student/instructor contact time hours proportionately reduced. Such
programs may not apply to more than fifty percent of the work experience
required to attain certification.

(vi) Electrical
training programs of less than two years may not be credited towards qualification
for journeyman electrician unless the training program is used to gain
qualification for a two-year electrical specialty.

(j) No other
requirement for eligibility may be imposed.

(2) The department
shall establish reasonable rules for the examinations to be given applicants
for certificates of competency. In establishing the rules, the department
shall consult with the board. Upon determination that the applicant is
eligible to take the examination, the department shall so notify the applicant,
indicating the time and place for taking the examination.

Sec. 7. RCW 19.28.201 and 2001 c
211 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The department, in
coordination with the board, shall prepare an examination to be administered to
applicants for master journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician,
master specialty electrician, and specialty electrician certificates
of competency.

The department, with
the consent of the board, may enter into a contract with a professional testing
agency to develop, administer, and score electrician certification
examinations. The department may set the examination fee by contract with the
professional testing agency.

The department must,
at least four times annually, administer the examination to persons eligible to
take it under RCW 19.28.191. The fee must cover, but not exceed, the costs of
preparing and administering the examination.

The department must
certify the results of the examination upon the terms and after such a period
of time as the department, in cooperation with the board, deems necessary and
proper.

(1)(a) The master
electrician's certificates of competency examinations must include questions
from the following categories to ensure proper safety and protection for the
general public: (i) Safety; (ii) the state electrical code; and (iii)
electrical theory.

(b) A person may
take the master electrician examination as many times as necessary without limit.
All applicants must, before taking the examination, pay the required
examination fee to the agency administering the examination.

(2) The journeyman
electrician and specialty electrician examinations shall be
constructed to determine:

(((1))) (a)
Whether the applicant possesses varied general knowledge of the technical
information and practical procedures that are identified with the status of
journeyman electrician or specialty electrician; and

(((2))) (b)
Whether the applicant is sufficiently familiar with the applicable electrical
codes and the rules of the department pertaining to electrical installations
and electricians.

((The department
shall, at least four times annually, administer the examination to persons
eligible to take it under RCW 19.28.191. A person may take the journeyman or
specialty test as many times as necessary without limit. All applicants shall,
before taking the examination, pay the required examination fee to the agency
administering the examination. The fee shall cover but not exceed the costs of
preparing and administering the examination.

The department shall
certify the results of the examination upon such terms and after such a period
of time as the department, in cooperation with the board, deems necessary and
proper.

(3) The department
upon the consent of the board may enter into a contract with a professional
testing agency to develop, administer, and score journeyman and/or specialty
electrician certification examinations. The department may set the examination
fee by contract with the professional testing agency.))

A person may take
the examination as many times as necessary without limit. All applicants must,
before taking the examination, pay the required examination fee to the agency
administering the examination.

Sec. 8. RCW 19.28.211 and 2001 c
211 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall issue a certificate of competency to all applicants who have passed the
examination provided in RCW 19.28.201, and who have complied with RCW 19.28.161
through 19.28.271 and the rules adopted under this chapter. The certificate
shall bear the date of issuance, and shall expire on the holder's birthday.
The certificate shall be renewed every three years, upon application, on or
before the holder's birthdate. A fee shall be assessed for each certificate
and for each annual renewal.

(2) If the certificate
holder demonstrates to the department that he or she has satisfactorily
completed an annual eight-hour continuing education course, the certificate may
be renewed without examination by appropriate application unless the
certificate has been revoked, suspended, or not renewed within ninety days
after the expiration date.

(a) The contents and
requirements for satisfactory completion of the continuing education course
shall be determined by the director and approved by the board.

(b) The department
shall accept proof of a certificate holder's satisfactory completion of a
continuing education course offered in another state as meeting the
requirements for maintaining a current Washington state certificate of
competency if the department is satisfied the course is comparable in nature to
that required in Washington state for maintaining a current certificate of
competency.

(3) If the certificate
is not renewed before the expiration date, the individual shall pay twice the
usual fee. The department shall set the fees by rule for issuance and renewal
of a certificate of competency. The fees shall cover but not exceed the costs
of issuing the certificates and of administering and enforcing the electrician
certification requirements of this chapter.

(4) The certificates of
competency and temporary permits provided for in this chapter grant the holder
the right to work in the electrical construction trade as a master
electrician, journeyman electrician, or specialty electrician in
accordance with their provisions throughout the state and within any of its
political subdivisions without additional proof of competency or any other
license, permit, or fee to engage in such work.

Sec. 9. RCW 19.28.241 and 2001 c
211 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The
department may revoke any certificate of competency upon the following grounds:

(((a))) (i)
The certificate was obtained through error or fraud;

(((b))) (ii)
The holder thereof is judged to be incompetent to work in the electrical
construction trade as a journeyman electrician or specialty electrician;

(((c))) (iii)
The holder thereof has violated any of the provisions of ((RCW 19.28.161
through 19.28.271)) or any rule adopted under this chapter;

(iv) For commission
of a serious violation that is defined as a violation that presents imminent
danger to the public or property.

(b) The department
may deny an application for a certificate of competency for up to two years if
the applicant's previous certificate of competency has been revoked.

(2) Before any
certificate of competency shall be revoked, the holder shall be given written
notice of the department's intention to do so, mailed by registered mail,
return receipt requested, to the holder's last known address. The notice shall
enumerate the allegations against the holder, and shall give the holder the
opportunity to request a hearing before the board. At the hearing, the
department and the holder may produce witnesses and give testimony. The
hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The board
shall render its decision based upon the testimony and evidence presented, and
shall notify the parties immediately upon reaching its decision. A majority of
the board shall be necessary to render a decision.

(3) The
department shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who
has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and
health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If
the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement
during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be
automatic upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the department
of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with
the order.

---
END ---