BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 19.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The licensing
provisions of RCW 19.28.161 and 19.28.271 do not apply to:

(a) Like-in-kind
replacement or repair of existing household hot water heaters, motors under one
horsepower used to recirculate hot water, or household garbage disposals,
dishwashers, dryers, washers, ranges, or similar household appliances; or

(b) Like-in-kind
replacement of existing circuit breakers, screw-in fuses, wall light switches,
existing wall receptacles, baseboard heating thermostats, baseboard heating
elements, bathroom timers, smoke detectors, household lighting fixtures, and
lighting fixture ballasts with exact same ballast.

(2) The work practices
specified in subsection (1) of this section are limited to:

(a) Appliances and
circuits of two hundred forty volts, sixty amperes, single-phase maximum; and

(b) The
disconnect and reconnect of line supply whips not over six feet in length
provided there are no modifications to the characteristics of the branch
circuit.

--- END ---