BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. International trade is an
important part of Washington's economy; Washington is the fifth largest exporting
state in the nation. World Trade Organization agreements and the North
American Free Trade Agreement have implications for Washington state laws
governing agriculture, services, environmental regulation, and economic
subsidies. In addition, future trade agreements such as the proposed Free
Trade Area of the Americas may also impact Washington state. The purpose of
the legislative committee on globalization and trade agreements is to monitor
the impact of these trade agreements on Washington state laws, and to provide a
mechanism for legislators and citizens to voice their opinions and concerns
about the potential impacts of these trade agreements to state and federal
government officials.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A legislative committee
on globalization and trade agreements is created, to consist of four senators
and four representatives from the legislature. The president of the senate
shall appoint the senate members of the committee, and the speaker of the house
shall appoint the house members of the committee. No more than two members
from each house may be from the same political party. A list of appointees
must be submitted by July 1, 2002, and before the close of each regular session
during an even-numbered year. Vacancies on the committee will be filled by
appointment by the remaining members. All such vacancies must be filled from
the same political party and from the same house as the member whose seat was
vacated.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The committee shall
appoint its own chair and other officers and make rules for orderly procedure.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The committee has the
following powers and duties:

(1) At least once a
year, hear public testimony on the impacts of international trade agreements on
Washington state and submit an annual report to the state trade
representative's office and to the legislature regarding the public testimony;

(2) Maintain active
communication with the state trade representative's office, the United States
trade representative's office, Washington's congressional delegation, and any
other bodies the committee deems appropriate regarding ongoing developments in
international trade agreements and policy;

(3) Conduct an annual
assessment of the impacts of international trade agreements upon Washington law
and submit the report to the legislature;

(4) Examine any aspects
of international trade, globalization, international economic integration, and
trade agreements that the members deem appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The committee will
receive the necessary staff support from both the senate and house staff
resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The members of the
committee shall serve without additional compensation, but will be reimbursed
for their travel expenses, in accordance with RCW 44.04.120, incurred while
attending sessions of the committee or meetings of a subcommittee of the committee,
while engaged on other committee business authorized by the committee, and
while going to and coming from committee sessions or committee meetings.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 44 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. Section 2 of this act is
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---