BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.22.360 and 1999 c
22 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Plans and
specifications of each model or production prototype of a mobile home,
commercial coach, conversion vending units, medical units, recreational
vehicle, and/or park trailer showing body and frame design, construction,
plumbing, heating and electrical specifications and data shall be submitted to
the department of labor and industries for approval and recommendations with
respect to compliance with the rules and standards of each of such agencies.
When plans have been submitted and approved as required, no changes or
alterations shall be made to body and frame design, construction, plumbing,
heating or electrical installations or specifications shown thereon in any
mobile home, commercial coach, conversion vending units, medical units,
recreational vehicle, or park trailer without prior written approval of the
department of labor and industries.

(2) The director may
adopt rules that provide for approval of a plan that is certified as meeting
state requirements or the equivalent by a professional who is licensed or
certified in a state whose licensure or certification requirements meet or
exceed Washington requirements.

(3) The provisions
of this section regarding mobile/manufactured home alterations occurring after
the first purchase of the home for purposes other than resale do not apply
within the limits of any city, town, or county that adopts and enforces an
ordinance requiring an equal, higher, or better standard of construction and of
materials, devices, appliances, and equipment than is required by this chapter
and rules adopted under this chapter.

(4) The
officials of all cities, towns, and counties where alterations are governed by
local ordinances, allowed by subsection (3) of this section, may require by
local ordinance the enforcement of this section in their respective
jurisdictions. If a city, town, or county elects to enforce this section, the
city, town, or county must enforce the provisions of this section.

--- END ---