BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 72.09.050 and 1999 c
309 s 1902 and 1999 c 309 s 924 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

The secretary shall
manage the department of corrections and shall be responsible for the
administration of adult correctional programs, including but not limited to the
operation of all state correctional institutions or facilities used for the
confinement of convicted felons. The secretary shall, in addition to
administrative duties, personally supervise adult felons through a program of
community corrections as a community corrections officer or at an adult
correctional institution as a corrections officer. In addition, the
secretary shall have broad powers to enter into agreements with any federal
agency, or any other state, or any Washington state agency or local government
providing for the operation of any correctional facility or program for persons
convicted of felonies or misdemeanors or for juvenile offenders. Such
agreements for counties with local law and justice councils shall be required
in the local law and justice plan pursuant to RCW 72.09.300. The agreements
may provide for joint operation or operation by the department of corrections,
alone, for by any of the other governmental entities, alone. Beginning
February 1, 1999, the secretary may expend funds appropriated for the 1997-1999
biennium to enter into agreements with any local government or private
organization in any other state, providing for the operation of any
correctional facility or program for persons convicted of felonies. Between
July 1, 1999, and June 30, 2001, the secretary may expend funds appropriated
for the 1999-01 biennium to enter into agreements with any local government or
private organization in any other state, providing for the operation of any
correctional facility or program for persons convicted of felonies. The
secretary may employ persons to aid in performing the functions and duties of
the department, however, all persons so employed whether or not exempt from
chapter 41.06 RCW shall in addition to other duties spend a significant portion
of their time personally supervising adult felons through a program of
community corrections as community corrections officers, or at an adult
correctional institution as corrections officers. The secretary may
delegate any of his or her functions or duties to department employees,
including the authority to certify and maintain custody of records and
documents on file with the department, excepting those duties undertaken as
a community corrections officer through a community corrections program or as a
corrections officer at an adult correctional institution. The secretary is
authorized to promulgate standards for the department of corrections within
appropriation levels authorized by the legislature.

Pursuant to the
authority granted in chapter 34.05 RCW, the secretary shall adopt rules
providing for inmate restitution when restitution is determined appropriate as
a result of a disciplinary action.

Sec. 2. RCW 72.09.210 and 1981 c
136 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

All employees of the
department of social and health services who are directly employed in
connection with the exercise of the powers and performance of the duties and
functions transferred to the department of corrections by RCW 72.09.040 shall
be transferred on July 1, 1981, to the jurisdiction of the department of
corrections.

All such
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law,
shall be assigned to the department of corrections and shall be employed to
supervise adult felons through a program of community corrections as a
community corrections officer or at an adult correctional institution as a
corrections officer. Other duties may be assigned as needed. Except as
otherwise provided, such employees shall be assigned without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance
with the laws and rules governing the state civil service law.

---
END ---