BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A county
legislative authority may submit an authorizing proposition to the county
voters and, if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, fix
and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter for
the purposes designated in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) The tax authorized
in this section shall be in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and
shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within
the county. The rate of tax shall equal one-tenth of one percent of the
selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the
case of a use tax.

(3) Money received from
any tax imposed under this section shall be used only for criminal justice or
public safety purposes.

(4) Sixty
percent of the money collected under this section shall be distributed first to
the county. The remainder shall be distributed to the county and cities within
the county ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management. In making the distribution, the county shall receive the
proportion that the unincorporated population of the county bears to the total
population of the county and each city shall receive the proportion that the
incorporated city population bears to the total county population.

--- END ---