BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.17.240 and 1995 c
397 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every elected
official and every executive state officer shall after January 1st and before
April 15th of each year file with the commission a statement of financial
affairs for the preceding calendar year. However, any local elected official
whose term of office expires immediately after December 31st shall file the
statement required to be filed by this section for the year that ended on that
December 31st.

(2) Every candidate
shall within two weeks of becoming a candidate file with the commission a
statement of financial affairs for the preceding twelve months.

(3) Every person
filing a proposed initiative or referendum measure with the secretary of state
shall within two weeks of filing the necessary signature petitions under RCW
29.79.020 file with the commission a statement of financial affairs for the
preceding twelve months.

(4) Every person
appointed to a vacancy in an elective office or executive state officer
position shall within two weeks of being so appointed file with the commission
a statement of financial affairs for the preceding twelve months.

(((4))) (5)
A statement of a candidate or appointee filed during the period from January
1st to April 15th shall cover the period from January 1st of the preceding
calendar year to the time of candidacy or appointment if the filing of the
statement would relieve the individual of a prior obligation to file a
statement covering the entire preceding calendar year.

(((5))) (6)
No individual may be required to file more than once in any calendar year.

(((6))) (7)
Each statement of financial affairs filed under this section shall be sworn as
to its truth and accuracy.

(((7))) (8)
Every elected official and every executive state officer shall file with their
statement of financial affairs a statement certifying that they have read and
are familiar with RCW 42.17.130 or 42.52.180, whichever is applicable.

(((8))) (9)
For the purposes of this section, the term "executive state officer"
includes those listed in RCW 42.17.2401.

(((9)))
(10) This section does not apply to incumbents or candidates for a
federal office or the office of precinct committee officer.

--- END ---