BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.210 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that diabetes imposes significant health risks to students enrolled in
the state's public and private schools and that providing for the medical needs
of students with diabetes is crucial to ensure both the safety of students with
diabetes and their ability to obtain the education guaranteed to all citizens
of this state.

(2) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(a) "Public or
private school" means any primary or secondary public or private school
located in the state of Washington.

(b) "School
diabetes attendant" refers to a school employee trained in accordance with
subsection (5) of this section.

(c) "Student with
diabetes" means a student enrolled in a public or private school within
the state who has been diagnosed by a health care provider as having either
type I or type II diabetes.

(3) Upon the written request
of the parent or guardian and written orders by a health care provider, a
student with diabetes shall be permitted to perform blood glucose tests,
administer insulin through the insulin delivery system the student uses, treat
hypoglycemia and hyperglycemia, and otherwise attend to the care and management
of his or her diabetes at any time and at the school or school grounds, on
school buses, and at any school-related activity, and to possess on his or her
person at all times all necessary supplies and equipment to perform these
monitoring and treatment functions.

(4)(a) Upon the written
request of the parent or guardian and written orders by a health care provider,
school diabetes attendants shall be permitted to perform functions including,
but not limited to, (i) assisting students with diabetes to test their blood
sugar levels or for the presence of ketones; (ii) testing the blood sugar
levels or the presence of ketones for a student with diabetes; (iii) treating
or preventing hypoglycemia through the use of glucose, appropriate food or
beverages, or glucagon; (iv) treating and preventing hyperglycemia by assisting
students with diabetes to take insulin or by administering insulin; and (v)
recording the result of blood sugar tests and tests for ketones, and recording
the treatment provided.

(b) A school diabetes
attendant is encouraged to be on-site and available to provide care to each
student with diabetes during regular school hours, during school-sponsored
before-school and after-school care programs, during field trips and
extracurricular activities, and on buses when the bus driver has not completed
the necessary training.

(5)(a) The Washington
state nursing commission shall develop guidelines for the training of school
diabetes attendants and may provide to the superintendent of public instruction
a list of organizations that could provide adequate training by August 31,
2002. The guidelines shall be updated every two years by the Washington state
nursing commission. School diabetes attendants shall be trained to do the
following, based on the student's individual needs and the attendant's level of
contact with the student:

(i) To recognize
hypoglycemia and hyperglycemia;

(ii) To assist students
with diabetes in performing or to perform for the student tests designed to
determine the student's blood sugar level and to determine whether ketones are
present;

(iii) To treat mild or
moderate cases of hypoglycemia through the use of glucose or by providing
appropriate food or beverages;

(iv) To treat severe
cases of hypoglycemia by administering glucagon and/or other steps ordered by
the child's health care provider in the child's individual health care plan;

(v) To treat and
prevent hyperglycemia by assisting students or administering insulin in
accordance with the orders provided by the student's health care provider; and

(vi) To record
information relating to the blood sugar and ketone levels of the student with
diabetes and the treatments provided in the patient's physician's order or
health care plan.

(b) Each public school
district and private school may provide training in the recognition and
treatment of hypoglycemia to all bus drivers responsible for the transportation
of a student with diabetes if a school diabetes attendant is not present.

(c) The superintendent
of public instruction may work in cooperation with private organizations that
have an expertise in diabetes to provide the training in (a) of this
subsection. Training for the school diabetes attendant shall take place before
the commencement of each school year.

(6) To be eligible to
be a school diabetes attendant an employee not licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW
shall file, without coercion by the employer, a voluntary written, current, and
unexpired letter of intent stating the employee's willingness to be a school diabetes
attendant. If a public school employee who is not licensed under chapter 18.79
RCW chooses not to file a letter under this section, the employee shall not be
subject to any employer reprisal or disciplinary action for refusing to file a
letter.

(7) The school diabetes
attendant shall work in cooperation with the school nurse if a school nurse is
available.

(8) Any public school
district, public school district employee, agent, or volunteer, private school,
or private school employee, agent, or volunteer who, acting in good faith,
provides assistance or services under this section is not liable for any civil
damages.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.71.030 and 1996 c
178 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter
shall be construed to apply to or interfere in any way with the practice of
religion or any kind of treatment by prayer; nor shall anything in this chapter
be construed to prohibit:

(1) The furnishing of
medical assistance in cases of emergency requiring immediate attention;

(2) The domestic
administration of family remedies;

(3) The administration
of oral medication of any nature to students by public school district
employees or private elementary or secondary school employees as provided for
in chapter 28A.210 RCW;

(4) The practice of
dentistry, osteopathic medicine and surgery, nursing, chiropractic, podiatric
medicine and surgery, optometry, naturopathy, or any other healing art licensed
under the methods or means permitted by such license;

(5) The practice of
medicine in this state by any commissioned medical officer serving in the armed
forces of the United States or public health service or any medical officer on
duty with the United States veterans administration while such medical officer
is engaged in the performance of the duties prescribed for him or her by the
laws and regulations of the United States;

(6) The practice of
medicine by any practitioner licensed by another state or territory in which he
or she resides, provided that such practitioner shall not open an office or
appoint a place of meeting patients or receiving calls within this state;

(7) The practice of
medicine by a person who is a regular student in a school of medicine approved
and accredited by the commission, however, the performance of such services be
only pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments from his or her
instructor, or that such services are performed only under the supervision and
control of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter;

(8) The practice of
medicine by a person serving a period of postgraduate medical training in a
program of clinical medical training sponsored by a college or university in
this state or by a hospital accredited in this state, however, the performance
of such services shall be only pursuant to his or her duties as a trainee;

(9) The practice of
medicine by a person who is regularly enrolled in a physician assistant program
approved by the commission, however, the performance of such services shall be
only pursuant to a regular course of instruction in said program and such
services are performed only under the supervision and control of a person
licensed pursuant to this chapter;

(10) The practice of
medicine by a licensed physician assistant which practice is performed under
the supervision and control of a physician licensed pursuant to this chapter;

(11) The practice of
medicine, in any part of this state which shares a common border with Canada
and which is surrounded on three sides by water, by a physician licensed to
practice medicine and surgery in Canada or any province or territory thereof;

(12) The administration
of nondental anesthesia by a dentist who has completed a residency in
anesthesiology at a school of medicine approved by the commission, however, a
dentist allowed to administer nondental anesthesia shall do so only under
authorization of the patient's attending surgeon, obstetrician, or
psychiatrist, and the commission has jurisdiction to discipline a dentist
practicing under this exemption and enjoin or suspend such dentist from the
practice of nondental anesthesia according to this chapter and chapter 18.130
RCW;

(13) Emergency
lifesaving service rendered by a physician's trained emergency medical service
intermediate life support technician and paramedic, as defined in RCW
18.71.200, if the emergency lifesaving service is rendered under the
responsible supervision and control of a licensed physician;

(14) The provision of
clean, intermittent bladder catheterization for students by public school
district employees or private school employees as provided for in RCW 18.79.290
and 28A.210.280;

(15) The
administration of or assistance in the administration of glucagon or insulin to
students with diabetes by public school district employees or private school
employees as provided for in the education equity for students with diabetes
act or in section 1 of this act;

(16) The testing or
assistance in the testing of students with diabetes for blood sugars and
ketones by public school district employees or private school employees as
provided for in the education equity for students with diabetes act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---