BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.72.300 and 1997 c
274 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
recognizes that competition among health care providers, facilities, payers,
and purchasers will yield the best allocation of health care resources, the
lowest prices for health care services, and the highest quality of health care
when there exists a large number of buyers and sellers, easily comparable
health plans and services, minimal barriers to entry and exit into the health
care market, and adequate information for buyers and sellers to base purchasing
and production decisions. ((However)) The legislature further
recognizes, however, that managed competition may be adversely affecting the
supply of health care providers in this state. The provision of health
services by health care providers in participating provider agreements with
health carriers, while resulting in health cost containment, is leading to a
flight of these providers to other areas of the country where bureaucratic
demands on practices are less cumbersome and reimbursement levels are
noticeably higher, causing a serious drain on the supply of health care
providers available for serving patients and otherwise threatening public
access to health care services in the state. As the marketplace of health
carriers tends to be more concentrated than the market for health care
providers, there is often a disparity of bargaining power between them,
resulting in a dramatic disadvantage of health care providers in their efforts
to negotiate the terms and conditions of their contracts with health carriers.
This inequality of bargaining power is exacerbated by the absence of a health
carrier's obligation to bargain in good faith. The prohibition under current
law to negotiate appropriate reimbursement levels forces health care providers
to either accept the contract proposals offered by health carriers or seek more
acceptable terms available in other states. The requirement of good faith
negotiations is a recognized and proven process for inducing parties in dispute
to resolve their differences professionally with accommodations resulting in
their mutual benefit. In addition, the legislature finds that purchasers
of health care services and health care coverage do not have adequate
information upon which to base purchasing decisions; that health care
facilities and providers of health care services face legal and market
disincentives to develop economies of scale or to provide the most
cost-efficient and efficacious service; that health insurers, contractors, and
health maintenance organizations face market disincentives in providing health
care coverage to those Washington residents with the most need for health care
coverage; and that potential competitors in the provision of health care
coverage bear unequal burdens in entering the market for health care coverage.

(2) The legislature
further finds that the regulation of health insurance by whatever means
authorized by state law is within the sovereign and constitutional powers of
state government to further its interests in protecting the health, safety, and
welfare of the people of the state, and includes regulating the procedures
under which health carriers negotiate the terms and conditions of contracts for
health care provider services, including reimbursement for these services.
The legislature therefore intends to exempt from state anti-trust laws, and to
provide immunity from federal anti-trust laws through the state action doctrine
for collective negotiations by health care providers with health carriers,
including customary communications between health care providers with those
negotiating for them to inform and advance the negotiations with other
activities approved under this chapter that might otherwise be constrained by
such laws and intends to displace competition in the health care market: To
contain the aggregate cost of health care services; to promote the development
of comprehensive, integrated, and cost-effective health care delivery systems
through cooperative activities among health care providers and facilities; to
promote comparability of health care coverage; to improve the
cost-effectiveness in providing health care coverage relative to health
promotion, disease prevention, and the amelioration or cure of illness; to
assure universal access to a publicly determined, uniform package of health
care benefits; and to create reasonable equity in the distribution of funds,
treatment, and medical risk among purchasers of health care coverage, payers of
health care services, providers of health care services, health care
facilities, and Washington residents. To these ends, any lawful action taken
pursuant to ((chapter 492, Laws of 1993)) this section and RCW
43.72.310 by any person or entity created or regulated ((by chapter 492,
Laws of 1993)) under these sections are declared to be taken
pursuant to state statute and in furtherance of the public purposes of the
state of Washington.

(3) The legislature
does not intend and, unless explicitly permitted in accordance with this
section and RCW 43.72.310 or under rules adopted ((pursuant to chapter
492, Laws of 1993)) under these sections, does not authorize any
person or entity to engage in activities or to conspire to engage in activities
that would constitute per se violations of state and federal anti-trust laws
including but not limited to conspiracies or agreements:

(a) Among competing
health care providers not to grant discounts, not to provide services, or to
fix the price of their services;

(b) Among health
carriers as to the price or level of reimbursement for health care services;

(c) Among health
carriers to boycott a group or class of health care service providers;

(d) Among purchasers of
health plan coverage to boycott a particular plan or class of plans;

(e) Among health
carriers to divide the market for health care coverage; or

(f) Among
health carriers and purchasers to attract or discourage enrollment of any
Washington resident or groups of residents in a health plan based upon the
perceived or actual risk of loss in including such resident or group of
residents in a health plan or purchasing group.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.72.310 and 1997 c
274 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A health carrier,
health care facility, health care provider, or other person involved in the
development, delivery, or marketing of health care or health plans may request,
in writing, that the department of health obtain an informal legal
opinion from the attorney general as to whether particular conduct is
authorized by ((chapter 492, Laws of 1993)) this section and RCW
43.72.300. Trade secret or proprietary information contained in a request
for informal opinion shall be identified as such and shall not be disclosed
other than to an authorized employee of the department of health or attorney
general without the consent of the party making the request, except that
information in summary or aggregate form and market share data may be contained
in the informal opinion issued by the attorney general. The attorney general
shall issue such opinion within thirty days of receipt of a written request for
an opinion or within thirty days of receipt of any additional information
requested by the attorney general necessary for rendering ((an)) a
legal opinion unless extended by the attorney general for good cause
shown. If the attorney general concludes that such conduct is not authorized
by ((chapter 492, Laws of 1993)) this section and RCW 43.72.300,
the person or organization making the request may petition the department of
health for review and approval of such conduct in accordance with subsection
(3) of this section.

(2) After obtaining the
written legal opinion of the attorney general and consistent with such
opinion, the department of health:

(a) May authorize
conduct by a health carrier, health care facility, health care provider, or any
other person that could tend to lessen competition in the relevant market upon
a strong showing that the conduct is likely to achieve the policy goals of ((chapter
492, Laws of 1993)) this section and RCW 43.72.300 and a more
competitive alternative is impractical;

(b) Shall adopt rules
governing conduct among providers, health care facilities, and health carriers
including rules governing provider and facility contracts with health carriers,
rules governing the use of "most favored nation" clauses and
exclusive dealing clauses in such contracts, and rules providing that health
carriers in rural areas contract with a sufficient number and type of health
care providers and facilities to ensure consumer access to local health care
services;

(c) Shall adopt rules
permitting health care providers within the service area of a plan to
collectively negotiate all the terms and conditions of contracts,
including reimbursement for provider services, with a health carrier ((including)).
The rules must include the ability of providers to meet and communicate for
the purposes of these negotiations, a requirement for representatives of
health care providers and health carriers to negotiate in good faith, and
options for voluntary mediation or arbitration in case of impasse. The rules
must provide for the exclusion of agencies and subdivisions of the state of
Washington from the requirements of this subsection. For the purpose of
collective negotiation under this act, health care providers include those
health care practitioners regulated under Title 18 RCW by the department of
health to practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing
health care services in this state consistent with state law;

(d) Shall adopt rules
governing cooperative activities among health care facilities and providers;
and

(e) Effective July 1,
1997, in addition to the rule-making authority granted to the department under
this section, the department shall have the authority to enforce and administer
rules previously adopted by the health services commission and the health care
policy board pursuant to RCW 43.72.310.

(3) A health carrier,
health care facility, health care provider, or any other person involved in the
development, delivery, and marketing of health care services or health plans
may file a written petition with the department of health requesting approval
of conduct that could tend to lessen competition in the relevant market. Such
petition shall be filed in a form and manner prescribed by rule of the
department of health.

The department of
health shall issue a written decision approving or denying a petition filed
under this section within ninety days of receipt of a properly completed
written petition unless extended by the department of health for good cause
shown. The decision shall set forth findings as to benefits and disadvantages
and conclusions as to whether the benefits outweigh the disadvantages.

(4) In authorizing
conduct and adopting rules of conduct under this section, the department of
health with the advice of the attorney general, shall consider the benefits of
such conduct in furthering the goals of health care reform including but not
limited to:

(a) Enhancement of the
quality of health services to consumers;

(b) Gains in cost
efficiency of health services;

(c) Improvements in
utilization of health services and equipment;

(d) Avoidance of
duplication of health services resources; or

(e) And as to (b) and
(c) of this subsection: (i) Facilitates the exchange of information relating
to performance expectations; (ii) simplifies the negotiation of delivery
arrangements and relationships; and (iii) reduces the transactions costs on the
part of health carriers and providers in negotiating more cost-effective
delivery arrangements.

These benefits must
outweigh disadvantages including and not limited to:

(i) Reduced competition
among health carriers, health care providers, or health care facilities;

(ii) Adverse impact on
quality, availability, or price of health care services to consumers; or

(iii) The availability
of arrangements less restrictive to competition that achieve the same benefits.

(5) Conduct authorized
by the department of health shall be deemed taken pursuant to state statute and
in the furtherance of the public purposes of the state of Washington.

(6) With the assistance
of the attorney general's office, the department of health shall actively
supervise any conduct authorized under this section to determine whether such
conduct or rules permitting certain conduct should be continued and whether a
more competitive alternative is practical. The department of health shall
periodically review petitioned conduct through, at least, annual progress
reports from petitioners, annual or more frequent reviews by the department of
health that evaluate whether the conduct is consistent with the petition, and
whether the benefits continue to outweigh any disadvantages. If the department
of health determines that the likely benefits of any conduct approved through
rule, petition, or otherwise by the department of health no longer outweigh the
disadvantages attributable to potential reduction in competition, the
department of health shall order a modification or discontinuance of such
conduct. Conduct ordered discontinued by the department of health shall no
longer be deemed to be taken pursuant to state statute and in the furtherance
of the public purposes of the state of Washington.

(7) Nothing contained
in chapter 492, Laws of 1993 is intended to in any way limit the ability of
rural hospital districts to enter into cooperative agreements and contracts
pursuant to RCW 70.44.450 and chapter 39.34 RCW.

(8) The secretary of
health shall from time to time establish fees to accompany the filing of a
petition or a written request to the department to obtain ((an)) a
legal opinion from the attorney general under this section and for the
active supervision of conduct approved under this section. Such fees may vary
according to the size of the transaction proposed in the petition or under
active supervision. In setting such fees, the secretary shall consider that
consumers and the public benefit when activities meeting the standards of this
section are permitted to proceed; the importance of assuring that persons
sponsoring beneficial activities are not foreclosed from filing a petition
under this section because of the fee; and the necessity to avoid a conflict,
or the appearance of a conflict, between the interests of the department and
the public. The total fee for a petition under this section, a written request
to the department to obtain ((an)) a legal opinion from the
attorney general, or a combination of both regarding the same conduct shall not
exceed the level that will defray the reasonable costs the department and
attorney general incur in considering a petition and in no event shall be greater
than twenty-five thousand dollars. The fee for review of approved conduct
shall not exceed the level that will defray the reasonable costs the department
and attorney general incur in conducting such a review and in no event shall be
greater than ten thousand dollars per annum. The fees shall be fixed by rule
adopted in accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW, and shall be deposited in the health professions account
established in accordance with RCW 43.70.320.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.72 RCW to read as follows:

The insurance
commissioner may, subject to a hearing if one is demanded, revoke, suspend, or
refuse to accept or renew registration from any health carrier, issue a cease
and desist order, or bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to
enjoin a health carrier from doing any further business in this state, if the
health carrier violates the provisions of RCW 43.72.310(2)(c) or any rules
promulgated under that subsection. After hearing or upon stipulation by the
registrant and in addition to or in lieu of the suspension, revocation, or
refusal to renew any registration of a health carrier, the commissioner may
levy a fine against the party involved for each offense in an amount not less
than ten thousand dollars. The order levying the fine shall specify the period
within which the fine shall be fully paid. The period shall not be less than
thirty days from the date of the order. Upon failure to pay any fine when due,
the insurance commissioner shall revoke the registration of the health carrier,
and the fine shall be recovered in a civil action brought in behalf of the
commissioner by the attorney general. Any fine collected shall be paid by the
commissioner to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is remedial in
nature and shall be construed to effect the purposes expressed in section 1 of
this act.

---
END ---