BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In computing tax
under this chapter, a credit is authorized for each person equal to ten percent
of wages paid for employment during the first six months of employment to
employees who were participating in the WorkFirst program on the date of hire.
To be eligible to take the credit, the person claiming the credit shall obtain
documentation of the employee's participation in the WorkFirst program from the
appropriate state agency.

(2) The
credit shall be taken against taxes due for the same calendar year in which the
amounts for which credit is claimed were paid. A credit must be claimed by the
due date of the last tax return for the calendar year in which the payment is
made. No credit may be carried back or forward to a different calendar year.
A person is not eligible to receive a credit under this section if the person
is receiving credit for the same position under chapter 82.62 RCW or RCW
82.04.44525 or 82.04.4456 or is taking the credit under RCW 82.04.4457.

--- END ---