BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that under existing landlord tenant laws, persons who are renting or leasing
properties, as well as their agencies and neighbors of the properties, do not
have means to immediately evict disruptive tenants involved in criminal actions
or unlawful civil disruptions.

The legislature further
finds that with the absence of an immediate legal means to remove disruptive tenants,
the property owners, their agents, and their neighbors all suffer significant
losses in the property and in the quiet enjoyment of the property. Such losses
continue to grow when a disruptive tenant is allowed to remain on the premises
pending court action.

The legislature intends
to protect property owners, agents, and neighbors from further mental anguish
and financial loss by providing for the immediate eviction of persons
participating in criminal actions or unlawful civil disruptions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A landlord, with
supporting evidence and documentation, may request a court to authorize the
immediate eviction of a tenant, if the tenant has:

(a) Violated maximum
noise levels under chapter 70.107 RCW;

(b) Committed an act
that is considered a moral nuisance under RCW 7.48A.020;

(c) Destroyed property
under a state of emergency under RCW 43.06.230;

(d) Possessed stolen
property as defined in RCW 9A.56.140;

(e) Operated a vehicle
with excessive speed while on public or private property or in any other
unlawful manner of using or operating a vehicle;

(f) Vandalized the
landlord's property or other properties. Acts of vandalism on the property
include acts of littering on the property;

(g) Committed an act of
domestic violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010;

(h) Misbranded drugs by
misleading representation under RCW 69.04.530;

(i) Committed an
alcohol or drug relation violation under RCW 66.44.365, or has a juvenile
living with the tenant who has committed such a violation;

(j) Possessed drugs in
violation of the uniform controlled substances act, chapter 69.50 RCW; or

(k) Committed a
violation involving methamphetamine under RCW 69.50.401 or 69.50.440.

(2) Following a request
under subsection (1) of this section, a court will convene a hearing to
determine whether the tenant should be immediately removed. The court will
request the sheriff and/or law enforcement personnel, as well as a
representative of the department of social and health services, to attend the
hearing to offer assistance as needed by the evicted tenants. The court may
issue a writ for the immediate eviction of the tenant and may assess costs to
the tenant.

(3)(a) Upon eviction,
the tenant as well as all persons and animals living with the tenant must be
removed from the premises. Personal property may be retrieved within three
days if parties are accompanied by a judicial representative.

(b) The eviction must
take place on the same day the writ is signed. If scheduling does not permit
for the issue of the writ the same day, it must be served by noon the following
day.

(c) To
enforce the court-ordered eviction, the landlord must be accompanied by the
sheriff.

---
END ---