BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.32.570 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 10 s 3 and 2001 c 317 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1)(a) If a retiree
enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or
her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every seven hours worked during that month. This
reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from
employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) The benefit
reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one
hundred forty hours per month. Any monthly benefit reduction over one hundred
percent will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in
subsequent months.

(2) Any retired teacher
or retired administrator who enters service in any public educational
institution in Washington state and who has satisfied the break in employment
requirement of subsection (1) of this section shall cease to receive pension
payments while engaged in such service, after the retiree has rendered service
for (a) more than one thousand five hundred hours in a school year if
employed in a position for which fewer than four nonretired members submitted
employment applications, or (b) more than eight hundred sixty-seven hours if
employed in a position for which four or more nonretired members submitted
employment applications. When a retired teacher or administrator renders
service beyond eight hundred sixty-seven hours, the department shall collect
from the employer the applicable employer retirement contributions for the
entire duration of the member's employment during that fiscal year.

(3) The department
shall collect and provide the state actuary with information relevant to the
use of this section for the joint committee on pension policy.

(4) The legislature
reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future and no member
or beneficiary has a contractual right to be employed for more than ((five
hundred twenty-five)) eight hundred sixty-seven hours per year
without a reduction of his or her pension.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.40.037 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 10 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If a retiree
enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or
her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that month. This
reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from
employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) The benefit
reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one
hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent
will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent
months.

(2)(a) A retiree from
plan 1 who has satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1)
of this section and who enters employment with an employer may continue to
receive pension payments while engaged in such service for up to (i) one
thousand five hundred hours of service in a calendar year without a reduction
of pension if employed in a position for which fewer than four nonretired
members submitted employment applications, or (ii) eight hundred sixty-seven
hours if employed in a position for which four or more nonretired members
submitted employment applications. When a plan 1 member renders service
beyond eight hundred sixty-seven hours, the department shall collect from the
employer the applicable employer retirement contributions for the entire
duration of the member's employment during that calendar year.

(b) A retiree from plan
2 or plan 3 who has satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection
(1) of this section may work up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a
calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010,
or 41.40.010, or as a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, as defined in
RCW 41.26.030, without suspension of his or her benefit.

(3) If the retiree opts
to reestablish membership under RCW 41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or
her retirement status and becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not
accrue during the period of membership and the individual shall make
contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the
right to again retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However,
if the right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has
rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and
survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous retirement
shall be reinstated.

(4) The department
shall collect and provide the state actuary with information relevant to the
use of this section for the joint committee on pension policy.

(5) The legislature
reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future and no member
or beneficiary has a contractual right to be employed for more than five months
in a calendar year without a reduction of his or her pension.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 12
is repealed.

---
END ---