BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.12.070 and 1990 c
250 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon the destruction of
any vehicle issued a certificate of ownership under this chapter or a license
registration under chapter 46.16 RCW, the registered owner and the legal owner
shall forthwith and within fifteen days thereafter forward and surrender the
certificate to the department, or the department's agent or subagent
appointed under chapter 46.01 RCW, together with a statement of the reason
for the surrender and the date and place of destruction and the fee
specified in RCW 46.01.140 (4)(a) or (5)(b). Failure to notify the
department, or the department's agent or subagent, or the possession by
any person of any such certificate for a vehicle so destroyed, after fifteen
days following its destruction, is prima facie evidence of violation of the
provisions of this chapter and constitutes a gross misdemeanor.

Any
insurance company settling an insurance claim on a vehicle that has been issued
a certificate of ownership under this chapter or a certificate of license
registration under chapter 46.16 RCW as a total loss, less salvage value, shall
notify the department ((thereof)), or the department's agent or
subagent appointed under chapter 46.01 RCW, within fifteen days after the
settlement of the claim. Notification shall be provided regardless of where or
in what jurisdiction the total loss occurred.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.80.090 and 1999 c
278 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Within
thirty days after acquiring a vehicle, the vehicle wrecker shall furnish a
written report to the department, or its agents or subagents appointed under
RCW 46.01.140, together with the fee prescribed in RCW 46.01.140(4)(c).
This report shall be in such form as the department shall prescribe and shall
be accompanied by evidence of ownership as determined by the department. No
vehicle wrecker may acquire a vehicle, including a vehicle from an interim
owner, without first obtaining evidence of ownership as determined by the
department. For a vehicle from an interim owner, the evidence of ownership may
not require that a title be issued in the name of the interim owner as required
by RCW 46.12.101. The vehicle wrecker shall furnish a monthly report of all
acquired vehicles. This report shall be made on forms prescribed by the
department and contain such information as the department may require. This
statement shall be signed by the vehicle wrecker or an authorized
representative and the facts therein sworn to before a notary public, or before
an officer or employee of the department designated by the director to
administer oaths or acknowledge signatures, pursuant to RCW 46.01.180.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.55.100 and 1999 c
398 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At the time of
impoundment the registered tow truck operator providing the towing service
shall give immediate notification, by telephone or radio, to a law enforcement
agency having jurisdiction who shall maintain a log of such reports. A law
enforcement agency, or a private communication center acting on behalf of a law
enforcement agency, shall within six to twelve hours of the impoundment,
provide to a requesting operator the name and address of the legal and registered
owners of the vehicle, and the registered owner of any personal property
registered or titled with the department that is attached to or contained in or
on the impounded vehicle, the vehicle identification number, and any other
necessary, pertinent information. The initial notice of impoundment shall be
followed by a written or electronic facsimile notice within twenty-four hours.
In the case of a vehicle from another state, time requirements of this
subsection do not apply until the requesting law enforcement agency in this
state receives the information.

(2) The operator shall
immediately send an abandoned vehicle report to the department or the
department's agent or subagent appointed under RCW 46.01.140, together with the
fee prescribed in RCW 46.01.140(4)(c) for any vehicle, and for any items of
personal property registered or titled with the department, that are in the
operator's possession after the one hundred twenty hour abandonment period.
Such report need not be sent when the impoundment is pursuant to a writ, court
order, or police hold that is not a suspended license impound. The owner
notification and abandonment process shall be initiated by the registered tow
truck operator immediately following notification by a court or law enforcement
officer that the writ, court order, or police hold that is not a suspended
license impound is no longer in effect.

(3) Following the
submittal of an abandoned vehicle report, the department or the department's
agent or subagent shall provide the registered tow truck operator with
owner information within seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays,
and state and federal holidays.

(4) Within fourteen
days of the sale of an abandoned vehicle at public auction, the towing operator
shall send a copy of the abandoned vehicle report showing the disposition of
the abandoned vehicle and any other items of personal property registered or
titled with the department to the crime information center of the Washington
state patrol.

(5) If the operator sends
an abandoned vehicle report to the department, or the department's agent or
subagent, and ((the department finds)) they find no owner
information, an operator may proceed with an inspection of the vehicle and any
other items of personal property registered or titled with the department to
determine whether owner identification is within the vehicle.

(6) If the
operator finds no owner identification, the operator shall immediately notify
the appropriate law enforcement agency, which shall search the vehicle and any
other items of personal property registered or titled with the department for
the vehicle identification number or other appropriate identification numbers
and check the necessary records to determine the vehicle's or other property's
owners.

---
END ---