BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 35.77 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that:

(1) Cities or towns
maintain their streets to provide maximum protection of the public's health,
safety, and welfare; that well-maintained streets, free from the deteriorating
effects of regular use and the encroachments of the adjacent landscape, ensure
safe and efficient travel for the public and emergency vehicles, and minimize
the likelihood of property damage, serious bodily injury, and death;

(2) Since 1980, vehicle
registration has increased by sixty percent and vehicle miles traveled on
municipal streets have increased far in excess of the rate of population
growth;

(3) Municipal streets
are deteriorating from heavy use and lack a reliable, dedicated funding
source. Failure to provide ongoing maintenance accelerates right-of-way
degradation and erodes the value and availability of this significant public
asset;

(4) Residences and
businesses contribute to the deteriorating effects on streets as a result of
automobile and pedestrian traffic generated by different types of property
uses;

(5) A street utility
created and governed by the legislative authority of a city or town provides an
appropriate and efficient means to monitor, regulate, and maintain public
streets;

(6) It is appropriate
for the legislative authorities of cities and towns to properly define a class
or classes of street users responsible for burdens created or benefits enjoyed
by these street users, in the exercise of their police power, in order to
protect the public health, safety, and welfare;

(7) In order to provide
safe and efficient travel on public streets, it is necessary for street
utilities to impose appropriate street use charges on street users, identified
by classifications such as residences and businesses, based upon the type of
uses made of each property and the estimated impact that uses have on public
streets, subject to the limitations in section 4 of this act, all of which is
necessary to protect the public's welfare.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 35.77 RCW to read as follows:

For the purposes of
sections 1 through 5 of this act, the following definitions apply unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Street"
means the traveled portion of the street right-of-way including gutters, curbs,
and sidewalks, as well as street lights, traffic control devices, and proper
drainage facilities.

(2) "Street
maintenance" means activities that keep streets in good operating
condition or that enhance public safety including, but not limited to,
preservation, resurfacing, pothole filling, restriping, additional street
lights, traffic control devices, sidewalks, proper drainage facilities, and
related facilities as may be identified by local ordinance.

(3) "Street
utility" means a separate utility generating a dedicated fund for street
maintenance, created and governed by the legislative body of a city or town,
that may levy periodic charges, consistent with section 4 of this act, for the
use of public streets.

(4) "Street user
fees or charges" means a fee or charge against residences and businesses,
based upon the expected trip generation from specific types of property uses.

(5) "Street
user" means a person or business who resides within the boundaries of the
street utility, identified by classification established by ordinance, who uses
the streets, who receives the benefit of use of the streets, or who creates a
burden or expense for maintaining the streets. There shall be no street user
associated with a vacant parcel.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 35.77 RCW to read as follows:

A city or town may
elect by action of its legislative authority to own, maintain, operate, and
preserve all or any described portion of its streets as a separate enterprise
and facility, known as a street utility, and from time to time add other
existing or new streets to that street utility, with full power to own,
maintain, operate, and preserve these streets. The legislative authority of
the city or town may include as a part of the street utility street lighting,
traffic control devices, sidewalks, curbs, gutters, parking facilities, and
drainage facilities, and any other facilities, equipment, or service directly
related to public streets as may be prescribed by ordinance. The legislative
authority of the city or town is the governing body of the street utility.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 35.77 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A city or town
electing to own, maintain, operate, and preserve its streets as a separate
street utility may levy periodic charges upon street users identified by
ordinance for the use of the streets in a total annual amount of up to fifty
percent of the actual costs for maintenance, operation, and preservation of
facilities under the jurisdiction of the street utility. These fees or charges
shall be placed in a specific fund dedicated to street maintenance.

(2) Street utility fees
and charges shall be expended only for street maintenance uses consistent with
the adopted transportation and land use plans of the jurisdiction expending the
funds and consistent with any applicable and adopted regional transportation
plan for metropolitan planning areas. Classification of street user charges
shall be consistent with the following:

(a) Fees shall be based
on the estimated number of vehicle trips generated by specific types of a
street user's property uses. Cities or towns shall calculate vehicle trips
using generally accepted traffic engineering principles or other data that
demonstrate a correlation between each type of property use and the estimated
number of automobile and pedestrian trips that each use generates;

(b) All charges shall
be uniform for each class of street user;

(c) Street user charges
shall not be computed on the basis of an ad valorem charge on real property or
improvements. This section shall not be used as a basis to directly or
indirectly charge transportation impact fees or mitigation fees of any kind
against new development. A city or town may contract to provide billing and
collection of the street utility charges;

(d) The city or town
may reduce or exempt street user charges affecting residential low-income
senior citizens, other low-income citizens as provided in RCW 74.38.070(1), and
the otherwise needy or infirm as may be further defined by ordinance;

(e) Charges imposed
pursuant to this chapter do not constitute taxes nor are they charges provided
for under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090, growth impact fees, or
transportation fees under chapter 39.92 RCW;

(f) The city or town
legislative authority shall create a means of administrative appeal by persons
desiring to contest their classification or status as street users. Persons
who are not street users as defined by this statute or local ordinance shall not
be subject to street use fees or charges.

(3) The charges
provided for in this section shall become liens and be enforced in the same
manner as rates and charges for the use of systems of sewerage under chapter
35.67 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 35.77 RCW to read as follows:

The city or town
electing to own, maintain, operate, and preserve its streets and related
facilities as a utility under this chapter may finance the operation,
maintenance, and preservation through local improvement districts, utility
local improvement districts, or with proceeds from general obligation bonds and
revenue bonds payable from the charges issued in accordance with chapter 35.41,
35.92, or 39.46 RCW, or any combination thereof. The city or town may use, in
addition to the charges authorized, funds from general taxation, money received
from the federal, state, or other local governments, and other funds made
available to it. The proceeds of the charges authorized shall be used strictly
for street maintenance purposes in accordance with this chapter.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.80.020 and 2001 c
64 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of a county, or ((subject to subsection (7) of this section, a
qualifying)) a city or town located in a county that has not imposed
((a fifteen-dollar)) the maximum fee under this section, may fix
and impose an additional fee, not to exceed ((fifteen)) fifty
dollars per vehicle, for each vehicle that is subject to license fees under RCW
46.16.0621 and for each vehicle that is subject to RCW 46.16.070 with an
unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less, and that is determined by the
department of licensing to be registered within the boundaries of the county.

(2) The department of
licensing shall administer and collect the fee. The department shall deduct a
percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent of the
taxes collected, for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer
for monthly distribution under RCW 82.80.080.

(3) The proceeds of
this fee shall be used strictly for transportation purposes in accordance with
RCW 82.80.070.

(4) A county ((or
qualifying)), city, or town imposing this fee or initiating
an exemption process shall delay the effective date at least six months from
the date the ordinance is enacted to allow the department of licensing to
implement administration and collection of or exemption from the fee.

(5) The legislative
authority of a county ((or qualifying)), city, or town may
develop and initiate an exemption process of the ((fifteen dollar)) fee
for the registered owners of vehicles residing within the boundaries of the
county ((or qualifying)), city, or town: (a) Who are
sixty-one years old or older at the time payment of the fee is due and whose
household income for the previous calendar year is less than an amount
prescribed by the county ((or qualifying)), city, or town
legislative authority; or (b) who have a physical disability.

(6) The legislative
authority of a county ((or qualifying)), city, or town
shall develop and initiate an exemption process of the ((fifteen-dollar))
fee for vehicles registered within the boundaries of the county that are
licensed under RCW 46.16.374.

(7) ((For purposes
of this section, a "qualifying city or town" means a city or town
residing within a county having a population of greater than seventy-five
thousand in which is located all or part of a national monument.)) A ((qualifying))
city or town may impose the fee authorized in subsection (1) of this section
subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The city or town
may impose the fee only if authorized to do so by a majority of registered
voters voting at a general or special election on a proposition for that
purpose. ((At a minimum, the ballot measure shall contain: (i) A
description of the transportation project proposed for funding, properly
identified by mileposts or other designations that specify the project
parameters; (ii) the proposed number of months or years necessary to fund the
city or town's share of the project cost; and (iii) the amount of fee to be
imposed for the project.))

(b) The city or town
may not impose a fee that, if combined with the county fee, exceeds ((fifteen))
fifty dollars. If a county imposes or increases a fee under this
section that, if combined with the fee imposed by a city or town, exceeds ((fifteen))
fifty dollars, the city or town fee shall be reduced or eliminated as
needed so that in no city or town does the combined fee exceed ((fifteen))
fifty dollars. All revenues from county-imposed fees shall be
distributed as called for in RCW 82.80.080.

(((c) Any fee
imposed by a city or town under this section shall expire at the end of the
term of months or years provided in the ballot measure, or when the city or
town's bonded indebtedness on the project is retired, whichever is sooner.))

(8) The fee imposed
under subsection (7) of this section shall apply only to renewals and shall not
apply to ownership transfer transactions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 82.80.040 (Street
utility--Establishment) and 1991 c 141 s 1;

(2) RCW 82.80.050 (Street utility--Charges,
credits) and 2000 c 103 s 21 & 1991 c 141 s 2; and

(3) RCW 82.80.060 (Use of other proceeds by
utility) and 1991 c 141 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The provisions of this
act are remedial and supplemental. This act shall be construed liberally to
accomplish its intended purpose. No authority extended to a city or town shall
be construed to restrict or limit any authority previously extended or
heretofore or hereafter existing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Any fee or tax increases
provided in this act do not constitute new transportation revenue for the
purposes of chapter 5, Laws of 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---