BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

School
boards of directors may adopt policies that provide for a moment of silence in
each classroom to be held annually on or around September 11th to remember the
victims of the September 11, 2001, terrorist attacks on the United States. The
policy shall encourage the creation of a student committee to consider
additional remembrance activities.

--- END ---