BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.04.4457 and 2000
c 106 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
limits and provisions of this section, a credit is authorized against the tax
otherwise due under this chapter for persons engaged in a rural county in the
business of providing information technology help desk services to third
parties.

(2) To qualify for the
credit, the help desk services must be conducted from a rural county.

(3) The amount of the
tax credit for persons engaged in the activity of providing information
technology help desk services in rural counties shall be equal to one hundred
percent of the amount of tax due under this chapter that is attributable to
providing the services from the rural county. In order to qualify for the
credit under this subsection, the county must meet the definition of rural
county at the time the person begins to conduct qualifying business in the
county.

(4) No application is
necessary for the tax credit. The person must keep records necessary for the
department to verify eligibility under this section. These records include
information relating to description of activity engaged in a rural county by
the person.

(5) If at any time the
department finds that a person is not eligible for tax credit under this
section, the amount of taxes for which a credit has been used is immediately
due. The department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the credited
taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, shall be
assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken, and shall accrue
until the taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.

(6) The credit under
this section may be used against any tax due under this chapter, but in no case
may a credit earned during one calendar year be carried over to be credited
against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year. No refunds may be
granted for credits under this section.

(7) A person taking tax
credits under this section shall make an annual report to the department. The
report shall be in a letter form and shall include the following information:
Type of activity in which the person is engaged in the county, number of
employees in the rural county, how long the person has been located in the
county, and taxpayer name and registration number. The report must be filed by
January 30th of each year for which credit was claimed during the previous
year. Failure to file a report will not result in the loss of eligibility
under this section. However, the department, through its research division,
shall contact taxpayers who have not filed the report and obtain the data from
the taxpayer or assist the taxpayer in the filing of the report, so that the
data and information necessary to measure the program's effectiveness is
maintained.

(8) Transfer of
ownership does not affect credit eligibility. However, the credit is available
to the successor only if the eligibility conditions of this section are met.

(9) As used in this
section:

(a) "Information
technology help desk services" means the following services performed
using electronic and telephonic communication:

(i) Software and
hardware maintenance;

(ii) Software and
hardware diagnostics and troubleshooting;

(iii) Software and
hardware installation;

(iv) Software and
hardware repair;

(v) Software and
hardware information and training; and

(vi) Software and
hardware upgrade.

(b) "Rural
county" means a county with a population density of less than one hundred
persons per square mile, as determined by the office of financial management
and published each year by the department for the period July 1st to June 30th.

(10) This
section expires ((December 31, 2003)) July 1, 2007.

--- END ---