BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.16.010 and 1984 c
208 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature
recognizes that the practices of cosmetology, barbering, manicuring,
and esthetics involve((s)) the use of tools and chemicals which may
be dangerous when mixed or applied improperly, and therefore finds it necessary
in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare to regulate ((the))
those practices ((of cosmetology)) in this state.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.16.020 and 1991 c
324 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context
clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "Department"
means the department of licensing.

(2)
"Board" means the cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, and manicuring
advisory board.

(((2))) (3)
"Director" means the director of the department of licensing or the
director's designee.

(((3))) (4)
"The practice of cosmetology" means ((the practice of)) arranging,
dressing, cutting, trimming, styling, shampooing, permanent waving, chemical
relaxing ((or)), straightening, curling, bleaching, ((or))
lightening, coloring, waxing, tweezing, shaving, and mustache and
beard design of the hair of the face, neck, and scalp ((and));
temporary removal of superfluous hair by use of depilatories, waxing, or
tweezing; manicuring and pedicuring, limited to cleaning, shaping,
polishing, decorating, and caring for and treatment of the cuticles and nails
of the hands and feet, excluding the application and removal of sculptured or
otherwise artificial nails; esthetics limited to toning the skin of the
scalp, stimulating the skin of the body by the use of preparations, tonics,
lotions, or creams; and tinting eyelashes and eyebrows.

(((4))) (5)
"Cosmetologist" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage
in the practice of cosmetology ((and who has completed sixteen hundred hours
of instruction at a school licensed under this chapter)).

(((5))) (6)
"The practice of barbering" means the cutting, trimming, arranging,
dressing, curling, ((waving and)) shampooing, shaving, and
mustache and beard design of the hair of the face, neck, and scalp.

(((6))) (7)
"Barber" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage in the
practice of barbering.

(((7))) (8)
"Practice of manicuring" means the cleaning, shaping, ((or))
polishing ((of)), decorating, and caring for and treatment of the
cuticles and the nails of the hands or feet, and the application and
removal of sculptured or otherwise artificial nails by hand or with
mechanical or electrical apparatus or appliances.

(((8))) (9)
"Manicurist" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage in
the practice of manicuring.

(((9))) (10)
"Practice of esthetics" means ((skin care of the face, neck, and
hands involving hot compresses, massage, or the use of approved electrical
appliances or nonabrasive chemical compounds formulated for professional
application only, and)) care of the skin by application and use of
preparations, antiseptics, tonics, essential oils, or exfoliants, or by any
device or equipment, electrical or otherwise, or by wraps, compresses,
cleansing, conditioning, stimulation, pore extraction, or product application
and removal; the temporary removal of superfluous hair by means of lotions,
creams, ((or)) mechanical or electrical apparatus ((or)),
appliance, waxing, tweezing, or depilatories; tinting of eyelashes and
eyebrows; and lightening the hair, except the scalp, on another person.

(((10))) (11)
"Esthetician" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage in
the practice of esthetics.

(((11))) (12)
"Instructor-trainee" means a person who is currently licensed in this
state as a cosmetologist, barber, manicurist, or esthetician, and is enrolled
in an ((approved instructor-trainee program)) instructor-trainee
curriculum in a school licensed under this chapter.

(((12))) (13)
"School" means any establishment ((offering)) that offers
curriculum of instruction in the practice of cosmetology, ((or))
barbering, ((or)) esthetics, ((or)) manicuring, or
instructor-trainee to students and is licensed under this chapter.

(((13))) (14)
"Student" means a person sixteen years of age or older who is
enrolled in a school licensed under this chapter and receives ((any phase))
instruction in any of the curricula of cosmetology, barbering, esthetics
((or)), manicuring ((instruction)), or
instructor-training with or without tuition, fee, or cost, and who does not
receive any wage or commission.

(((14)
"Instructor-operator-cosmetology)) (15) "Instructor"
means a person who gives instruction in ((the practice of cosmetology and
instructor-training in a school and who has the same qualifications as a
cosmetologist,)) a school in a curriculum in which he or she holds a
license under this chapter, has completed at least five hundred hours of
instruction in teaching techniques and lesson planning in a school, and has
passed ((an)) a licensing examination ((prepared or selected
by the board and)) approved or administered by the director. An applicant
who holds a degree in education from an accredited postsecondary institution ((and
who is otherwise qualified)) shall upon application be licensed as an ((instructor-operator
with a cosmetology endorsement)) instructor to give instruction in a
school in a curriculum in which he or she holds a license under this chapter.
An applicant who holds an instructional credential from an accredited community
or technical college and who has passed a licensing examination approved or
administered by the director shall upon application be licensed as an
instructor to give instruction in a school in a curriculum in which he or she
holds a license under this chapter.

(((15)
"Instructor-operator-barber" means a person who gives instruction in
the practice of barbering and instructor training in a school, has the same
qualifications as a barber, has completed at least five hundred hours of
instruction in teaching techniques and lesson planning in a school, and has
passed an examination prepared or selected by the board and administered by the
director. An applicant who holds a degree in education from an accredited
postsecondary institution and who is otherwise qualified shall upon application
be licensed as an instructor-operator with a barber endorsement.

(16) "Instructor-operator-manicure"
means a person who gives instruction in the practice of manicuring and
instructor training in a school, has the same qualifications as a manicurist,
has completed at least five hundred hours of instruction in teaching techniques
and lesson planning in a school, and has passed an examination prepared or
selected by the board and administered by the director. An applicant who holds
a degree in education from an accredited postsecondary institution and who is
otherwise qualified shall upon application be licensed as an
instructor-operator with a manicurist endorsement.

(17)
"Instructor-operator-esthetics" means a person who gives instruction
in the practice of esthetics and instructor training in a school, has the same
qualifications as an esthetician, has completed at least five hundred hours of
instruction in teaching techniques and lesson planning in a school, and has
passed an examination prepared or selected by the board and administered by the
director. An applicant who holds a degree in education from an accredited
postsecondary institution and who is otherwise qualified shall upon application
be licensed as an instructor-operator with an esthetics endorsement.

(18)
"Vocational student" is a person who in cooperation with any senior
high, vocational technical institute, community college, or prep school,
attends a cosmetology school and participates in its student course of
instruction and has the same rights and duties as a student as defined in this
chapter. The person must have academically completed the eleventh grade of
high school. Every such vocational student shall receive credit for all
creditable hours of the approved course of instruction received in the school
of cosmetology upon graduation from high school. Hours shall be credited to a
vocational student if the student graduates from an accredited high school or
receives a certificate of educational competence.

(19) "Booth
renter" means a person who performs cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or
manicuring services where the use of the salon/shop facilities is contingent
upon compensation to the owner of the salon/shop facilities and the person
receives no compensation or other consideration from the owner for the services
performed.

(20))) (16) "Person" means any
individual, partnership, professional service corporation, joint stock
association, joint venture, or any other entity authorized to do business in
this state.

(((21))) (17)
"Salon/shop" means any building, structure, ((or motor home))
or any part thereof, other than a school, where the commercial practice of
cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or manicuring is conducted; provided that
any person, except employees of a salon/shop, who operates from a salon/shop is
required to meet all salon/shop licensing requirements.

(((22))) (18)
"Crossover training" means training approved by the director as
training hours that may be credited to current licensees for similar training
received in another profession licensed under this chapter.

(((23))) (19)
"Approved security" means surety bond((, savings assignment, or
irrevocable letter of credit)).

(((24) "Mobile
operator" means any person possessing a valid cosmetology, barbering,
manicuring, or esthetician's license that provides services in a mobile
salon/shop.

(25))) (20) "Personal services ((operator))"
means ((any person possessing a valid)) a location licensed under
this chapter where the practice of cosmetology, barbering, manicuring, or
((esthetician's license that provides services)) esthetics is
performed for clients in the client's home, office, or other location that
is convenient for the client.

(21)
"Individual license" means a cosmetology, barber, manicurist,
esthetician, or instructor license issued under this chapter.

(22) "Location
license" means a license issued under this chapter for a salon/shop,
school, personal services, or mobile unit.

(23) "Mobile
unit" is a location license under this chapter where the practice of
cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or manicuring is conducted in a mobile
structure. Mobile units must conform to the health and safety standards set by
rule under this chapter.

(24)
"Curriculum" means the courses of study taught at a school, set by
rule under this chapter, and approved by the department. After consulting with
the board, the director may set by rule a percentage of hours in a curriculum,
up to a maximum of ten percent, that could include hours a student receives
while training in a salon/shop under a contract approved by the department.
Each curriculum must include at least the following required hours:

(a) Cosmetologist,
one thousand six hundred hours;

(b) Barber, one
thousand hours;

(c) Manicurist, six
hundred hours;

(d) Esthetician, six
hundred hours;

(e)
Instructor-trainee, five hundred hours.

(25) "Student
monthly report" means the student record of daily activities and the
number of hours completed in each course of a curriculum that is prepared
monthly by the school and provided to the student, audited annually by the
department, and kept on file by the school for three years.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.16.030 and 1991 c
324 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any
other duties imposed by law, the director shall have the following powers and
duties:

(1) To set all license,
examination, and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.24.086;

(2) To adopt rules
necessary to implement this chapter;

(3) To investigate
alleged violations of this chapter and consumer complaints involving the
practice under this chapter of cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, ((or))
manicuring, or instructing, and schools offering ((training)) course
curricula in these ((areas)) practices, and salons/shops ((and
booth renters offering)), personal services, or mobile units where
these ((services)) practices are conducted;

(4) To issue subpoenas,
statements of charges, statements of intent, final orders, stipulated
agreements, and any other legal remedies necessary to enforce this chapter;

(5) To issue cease and
desist ((letters)) orders and ((letters of warning)) notices
of correction for infractions of this chapter;

(6) To conduct all
disciplinary proceedings, impose sanctions, and assess fines for violations of
this chapter or any rules adopted under it;

(7) To prepare and
administer or approve the preparation and administration of licensing
examinations;

(8) To establish
minimum safety and sanitation standards for schools, instructors,
cosmetologists, barbers, manicurists, estheticians, ((and)) salons/shops,
personal services, and mobile units;

(9) To establish ((minimum
instruction guidelines)) curricula for the training of students under
this chapter;

(10) To maintain the
official department record of applicants and licensees;

(11) To delegate in
writing to a designee the authority to issue subpoenas, statements of charges, cease
and desist orders, and any other documents necessary to enforce this
chapter;

(12) To establish by
rule the procedures for an appeal of an examination failure;

(13) To employ such
administrative, investigative, inspection, audit, and clerical staff as
needed to implement this chapter;

(14) To set license
expiration dates and renewal periods for all licenses consistent with this
chapter; and

(15) To make
information available to the department of revenue to assist in collecting
taxes from persons required to be licensed under this chapter.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.16.050 and 1998 c
245 s 5 and 1998 c 20 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created a
state cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, and manicuring advisory board consisting
of nine members appointed by the director. These members of the board shall
include: A representative of ((a)) private ((cosmetology))
schools licensed under this chapter; a representative of ((a))
public vocational technical schools ((involved in cosmetology
training)) licensed under this chapter; a consumer who is
unaffiliated with the cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or manicuring
industry; and six members who are currently practicing licensees who have been
engaged in the practice of manicuring, esthetics, barbering, or cosmetology for
at least three years. Members shall serve a term of three years. Any board
member may be removed for just cause. The director may appoint a new member to
fill any vacancy on the board for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(2) Board members shall
be entitled to compensation pursuant to RCW 43.03.240 for each day spent
conducting official business and to reimbursement for travel expenses as
provided by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3) The board may seek
the advice and input of officials from the following state agencies: (a) The
work force training and education coordinating board; (b) the department of
employment security; (c) the department of labor and industries; (d) the
department of health; (e) the department of licensing; and (f) the department
of revenue.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.16.060 and 1991 c
324 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
impose a fine of one thousand dollars on any person who ((does)),
after a hearing provided for in RCW 18.16.210, has been found to have done
any of the following without first obtaining the license required by this
chapter:

(a) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, commercial practice of cosmetology,
barbering, esthetics, manicuring, or instructing;

(b) Instructs in a
school;

(c) Operates a school;
or

(d) Operates a
salon/shop, personal services, or mobile unit. ((Each booth renter
shall be considered to be operating an independent salon/shop and shall obtain
a separate salon/shop license.))

(2) A person who
receives a license((d)) as ((a cosmetology instructor-operator))
an instructor may engage in the commercial practice ((of cosmetology))
for which he or she held a license when applying for the instructor license
without ((maintaining a cosmetologist)) renewing the previously held
license. ((A person licensed as a barbering instructor-operator may engage
in the commercial practice of barbering without maintaining a barber license.
A person licensed as a manicuring instructor-operator may engage in the
commercial practice of manicuring without maintaining a manicurist license. A
person licensed as an esthetician instructor-operator may engage in the
commercial practice of esthetics without maintaining an esthetician license.))
A person whose license is not or at any time was not renewed cannot engage
in the commercial practice previously permitted under that license unless that
person renews the previously held license.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.16.090 and 1991 c
324 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Examinations for
licensure under this chapter shall be conducted ((monthly)) at such
times and places as the director determines appropriate. Examinations shall
consist of tests designed to reasonably measure the applicant's knowledge of
safe and sanitary practices and may also include the applicant's knowledge
of this chapter and rules adopted pursuant to this chapter. The
director may establish by rule a performance examination in addition to any
other examination. The director shall establish by rule the minimum
passing score for all examinations and the requirements for reexamination of
applicants who fail the examination or examinations. The director may allow
an independent person to conduct the examinations at the expense of the
applicants.

The director shall take
steps to ensure that after completion of the required course, applicants may
promptly take the examination and receive the results of the examination.

Sec. 7. RCW 18.16.100 and 1991 c
324 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon completion
of an application approved by the department and payment of the proper fee,
the director shall issue the appropriate license to any person who:

(a) Is at least
seventeen years of age or older;

(b) Has completed and
graduated from a ((course)) school licensed under this chapter in a
curriculum approved by the director of sixteen hundred hours of training in
cosmetology, one thousand hours of training in barbering, ((five)) six
hundred hours of training in manicuring, ((five)) six hundred
hours of training in esthetics, and/or five hundred hours of training as an
instructor-trainee, or has met the requirements in RCW 18.16.020 or
18.16.130; and

(c) Has received a
passing grade on the appropriate licensing examination approved or administered
by the director.

(2) A person currently
licensed under this chapter may qualify for examination and licensure, after
the required examination is passed, in another category if he or she has
completed the crossover training course ((approved by the director)).

(3) Upon completion
of an application approved by the department, certification of insurance, and
payment of the proper fee, the director shall issue a ((salon/shop)) location
license to the ((operator of a salon/shop if the salon/shop meets the other
requirements of this chapter as demonstrated by information submitted by the
operator)) applicant.

(4) The director may
consult with the state board of health and the department of labor and
industries in establishing training and examination requirements.

Sec. 8. RCW 18.16.110 and 1991 c
324 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
issue the appropriate license to any applicant who meets the requirements as
outlined in this chapter.

(2) Failure to
renew a license before its expiration date subjects the holder to a penalty fee
and payment of each year's renewal fee, at the current rate((, up to a
maximum of four years as established by the director in accordance with RCW
43.24.086)). A person whose license has not been renewed ((for four
years)) within one year after its expiration date shall have the license
canceled and shall be required to submit an application, pay the license
fee, meet current licensing requirements, and pass ((the)) any
applicable examination or examinations, in addition to the other
requirements of this chapter, before the license may be reinstated((:
PROVIDED, That the director may waive this requirement for good cause shown.
To renew a salon/shop license, the licensee shall provide proof of insurance as
required by RCW 18.16.175(1)(h))).

(((2))) (3)
Upon request and payment of an additional fee to be established by rule
by the director, the director shall issue a duplicate license to an applicant.

Sec. 9. RCW 18.16.140 and 1991 c
324 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person wishing
to operate a school shall, before opening such a school, pay the license fee
and file with the director for approval a license application ((and fee))
containing the following information:

(a) The names and
addresses of all owners, managers, and instructors;

(b) A copy of the
school's curriculum satisfying the ((training guidelines)) curriculum
requirements established by the director;

(c) A sample copy of
the school's catalog, brochure, enrollment contract, and cancellation and
refund policies that will be used or distributed by the school to students and
the public;

(d) ((A description
and floor plan of the school's physical equipment and facilities;

(e))) A surety bond((, irrevocable letter of
credit, or savings assignment)) in an amount not less than ten thousand
dollars, or ten percent of the annual gross tuition collected by the school,
whichever is greater. The approved security shall not exceed fifty thousand
dollars and shall run to the state of Washington for the protection of unearned
prepaid student tuition. The school shall attest to its gross tuition at least
annually on forms provided by the department. When a new school license is
being applied for, the applicant will estimate its annual gross tuition to
establish a bond amount. This subsection shall not apply to community colleges
and vocational technical schools.

Upon approval of the
application and documents, the director shall issue a license to operate a
school ((with the appropriate certification or certifications)).

(2) Changes to the
information provided by schools shall be submitted to the department within
fifteen days of the implementation date.

(3) A change involving
the controlling interest of the school requires a new license application and
fee. The new application shall include all required documentation, proof of
ownership change, and be approved prior to a license being issued.

(4) School and
instructor licenses issued by the department shall be posted in the reception
area of the school.

Sec. 10. RCW 18.16.170 and 1991 c
324 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to
subsection (2) of this section, licenses issued under this chapter expire as
follows:

(a) A salon/shop,
personal services, or mobile unit license expires one year from issuance or
when the insurance required by RCW 18.16.175(1)(((h))) (g)
expires, whichever occurs first;

(b) A school license
expires one year from issuance; and

(c) Cosmetologist,
barber, manicurist, esthetician, and instructor licenses expire two
years from issuance.

(2) The director may
provide for expiration dates other than those set forth in subsection (1) of
this section for the purpose of establishing staggered renewal periods.

Sec. 11. RCW 18.16.175 and 1997 c
178 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A salon/shop or
mobile unit shall meet the following minimum requirements:

(a) Maintain an outside
entrance separate from any rooms used for sleeping or residential purposes;

(b) Provide and
maintain for the use of its customers adequate toilet facilities located within
or adjacent to the salon/shop or mobile unit;

(c) ((Be operated
under the direct supervision of a licensed cosmetologist except that a
salon/shop that is limited to barbering may be directly supervised by a barber,
a salon/shop that is limited to manicuring may be directly supervised by a
manicurist, and a salon/shop that is limited to esthetics may be directly supervised
by an esthetician;

(d))) Any room used wholly or in part as a
salon/shop or mobile unit shall not be used for residential purposes,
except that toilet facilities may be used jointly for residential and business
purposes;

(((e))) (d)
Meet the zoning requirements of the county, city, or town, as appropriate;

(((f))) (e)
Provide for safe storage and labeling of chemicals used in the practices
((of cosmetology)) under this chapter;

(((g))) (f)
Meet all applicable local and state fire codes; and

(((h) Provide proof))
(g) Certify that the salon/shop or mobile unit is covered by a
public liability insurance policy in an amount not less than one hundred
thousand dollars for combined bodily injury and property damage liability((;
and)).

(((i) Other requirements
which)) (2) The director may by rule determine((s)) other
requirements that are necessary for safety and sanitation of salons/shops,
personal services, or mobile units. The director may consult with the
state board of health and the department of labor and industries in
establishing minimum salon/shop, personal services, and mobile unit
safety requirements.

(((2) A salon/shop
shall post the notice to customers described in RCW 18.16.180.))

(3) Personal
services license holders shall certify coverage of a public liability insurance
policy in an amount not less than one hundred thousand dollars for combined
bodily injury and property damage liability.

(4) Upon receipt
of a written complaint that a salon/shop or mobile unit has violated any
provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter or at least
once every two years for an existing salon/shop or mobile unit, the
director or the director's designee shall inspect each salon/shop or mobile
unit. If the director determines that any salon/shop or mobile unit
is not in compliance with this chapter, the director shall send written notice
to the salon/shop or mobile unit. A salon/shop or mobile unit
which fails to correct the conditions to the satisfaction of the director
within a reasonable time shall, upon due notice, be subject to the penalties
imposed by the director under RCW 18.16.210. The director may enter any
salon/shop or mobile unit during business hours for the purpose of
inspection. The director may contract with health authorities of local
governments to conduct the inspections under this subsection.

(((4))) (5)
A salon/shop, ((including a salon/shop operated by a booth renter,)) personal
services, or mobile unit shall obtain a certificate of registration from
the department of revenue.

(((5))) (6)
This section does not prohibit the use of motor homes as mobile ((salon/shops))
units if the motor home meets the health and safety standards of this
section.

(7) Salon/shop or
mobile unit licenses issued by the department must be posted in the salon/shop
or mobile unit's reception area.

(8) Cosmetology,
barbering, esthetics, and manicuring licenses issued by the department must be
posted at the licensed person's work station.

Sec. 12. RCW 18.16.200 and 1991 c
324 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Any applicant or
licensee under this chapter may be subject to disciplinary action by the
director if the licensee or applicant:

(1) Has been found
guilty of a crime ((related to the practice of cosmetology, barbering,
esthetics, manicuring, or instructing)) within the prior ten years
involving moral turpitude or has been found to have violated any provision of
chapter 19.86 RCW;

(2) Has made a material
misstatement or omission in connection with an original application or renewal;

(3) Has engaged in
false or misleading advertising;

(4) Has performed
services in an unsafe or unsanitary manner;

(5) Has aided and
abetted unlicensed activity;

(6) Has engaged in the
commercial practice of cosmetology, barbering, manicuring, or esthetics,
or has instructed in or operated a school, salon/shop, personal
services, or mobile unit, without first obtaining the license required by
this chapter;

(7) Has engaged in the
commercial practice of cosmetology, barbering, manicuring, or esthetics
in a school;

(8) Has not provided a
safe, sanitary, and good moral environment for students and public;

(9) Has not provided
records as required by this chapter;

(10) Has not cooperated
with the department in supplying records or assisting in an inspection,
investigation, or disciplinary procedure; ((or))

(11) Failed to
display licenses required in this chapter; or

(12) Has
violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under it.

Sec. 13. RCW 18.16.210 and 1984 c
208 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

If, following a
hearing, the director finds that any person or an applicant or licensee
has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under it, the
director may impose one or more of the following penalties:

(1) Denial of a license
or renewal;

(2) Revocation or
suspension of a license;

(3) A fine of not more
than five hundred dollars per violation;

(4) Issuance of a
reprimand or letter of censure;

(5) Placement of the
licensee on probation for a fixed period of time;

(6) Restriction of the
licensee's authorized scope of practice;

(7) Requiring the
licensee to make restitution or a refund as determined by the director to any
individual injured by the violation; or

(8) Requiring the
licensee to obtain additional training or instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 18.16 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that the practices covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the
public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in relation
to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

Sec. 15. RCW 18.16.240 and 1997 c
58 s 815 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
immediately suspend the license of a person who has been certified pursuant to
RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who
is not in compliance with a support order ((or a residential or visitation
order)). If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for
reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license shall be
automatic upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the department
of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with
the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 18.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Prior to July 1,
2003, cosmetology licensees may request a license in manicuring and esthetics.
A license renewal fee must be paid prior to issuance of each type of license
requested. After June 30, 2003, any cosmetology licensee wishing to obtain
additional licenses must meet the training and examination requirements of this
chapter.

(2) Prior to July 1,
2003, students enrolled in a licensed school in an approved cosmetology
curriculum may apply for the examination in cosmetology, manicuring, and
esthetics. An examination fee must be paid for each examination selected.
After June 30, 2003, students enrolled in a licensed school in an approved
cosmetology curriculum may not apply for examination in manicuring and
esthetics without meeting the training requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 17. RCW 18.16.900 and 1984 c
208 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

This act shall be known
and may be cited as the "Washington cosmetologists, barbers, ((and))
manicurists, and estheticians act".

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. This act takes effect
June 1, 2003.

---
END ---