BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
portions of Washington state may face significant threats from terrorism based
upon their political, symbolic, or economic significance. The state is not
currently providing funding to local emergency management agencies, while
federal funds for emergency management purposes continue to decrease.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:

The state shall provide
two million dollars each fiscal biennium to the military department to be
provided as homeland security grants to political subdivisions of the state in
the manner provided in this section.

(1) Grants shall be
awarded to up to ten jurisdictions annually, on a prioritized basis, that have established
emergency management programs. The grant priorities shall be based on existing
threat and vulnerability assessments approved by the military department.

(2) Homeland security
grants under this section may be used by political subdivisions for such
purposes as funding full-time counterterrorism coordinators, terrorism
consequence planning, training, exercises, and other resources.

(3) Funding provided
under this section shall not be used to supplant or replace existing state or
local emergency management funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The sum of two million
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the
general fund to the military department for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2003, to carry out the purposes of section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---