BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.21B.190 and 1995
c 382 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty days
after the final decision and order of the hearings board upon such an appeal
has been ((communicated)) simultaneously posted in the United States
mail to the interested parties and on the hearings board's internet site,
such interested party aggrieved by the decision and order of the hearings board
may appeal to the superior court.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.21B.230 and 1997
c 125 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person
having received notice of a denial of a petition, a notice of determination, or
a notice of or an order made by the department may appeal to the hearings
board, within thirty days from the date the notice of ((such)) that
denial, order, or determination is posted in the United States mail, properly
addressed, postage prepaid, to the appealing party. The notice of denial,
order, or determination shall include a declaration by the responsible official
at the department certifying that the notice of denial, order, or determination
was posted in the United States mail on the date certified. The appeal
shall be perfected by serving a copy of the notice of appeal upon the
department or air pollution authority established pursuant to chapter 70.94
RCW, as the case may be, within the time specified ((herein)) in this
section and by filing the original thereof with proof of service with the
clerk of the hearings board.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.21B.300 and 2001
c 36 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any civil penalty
provided in RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431, 70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090,
90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, and 90.56.330 shall be imposed by a notice in
writing, either by certified mail with return receipt requested or by personal
service, to the person incurring the penalty from the department or the local
air authority, describing the violation with reasonable particularity. Within
fifteen days after the notice is received, the person incurring the penalty may
apply in writing to the department or the authority for the remission or
mitigation of the penalty. Upon receipt of the application, the department or
authority may remit or mitigate the penalty upon whatever terms the department
or the authority in its discretion deems proper. The department or the authority
may ascertain the facts regarding all such applications in such reasonable
manner and under such rules as it may deem proper and shall remit or mitigate
the penalty only upon a demonstration of extraordinary circumstances such as
the presence of information or factors not considered in setting the original
penalty.

(2) Any penalty imposed
under this section may be appealed to the pollution control hearings board in
accordance with this chapter if the appeal is filed with the hearings board and
served on the department or authority thirty days after ((receipt by the
person penalized)) simultaneous posting in the United States mail and on
the department's or authority's internet site of the notice imposing the
penalty or thirty days after ((receipt)) simultaneous posting in the
United States mail and on the department's or authority's internet site of
the notice of disposition of the application for relief from penalty.

(3) A penalty shall
become due and payable on the later of:

(a) Thirty days after
receipt of the notice imposing the penalty;

(b) Thirty days after
receipt of the notice of disposition on application for relief from penalty, if
such an application is made; or

(c) Thirty days after
receipt of the notice of decision of the hearings board if the penalty is
appealed.

(4) If the amount of
any penalty is not paid to the department within thirty days after it becomes
due and payable, the attorney general, upon request of the department, shall
bring an action in the name of the state of Washington in the superior court of
Thurston county, or of any county in which the violator does business, to
recover the penalty. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the authority
within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the authority may bring an
action to recover the penalty in the superior court of the county of the
authority's main office or of any county in which the violator does business.
In these actions, the procedures and rules of evidence shall be the same as in
an ordinary civil action.

(5) All penalties
recovered shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the general
fund except those penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, which shall be
credited to the reclamation account as provided in RCW 18.104.155(7), RCW
70.94.431, the disposition of which shall be governed by that provision, RCW
70.105.080, which shall be credited to the hazardous waste control and
elimination account, created by RCW 70.105.180, and RCW 90.56.330, which shall
be credited to the coastal protection fund created by RCW 90.48.390.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.21B.310 and 2001
c 220 s 4 and 2001 c 36 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in RCW 90.03.210(2), any order issued by the department or local air authority
pursuant to RCW 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 43.27A.190, 86.16.020,
88.46.070, or 90.48.120(2) or any provision enacted after July 26, 1987, or any
permit, certificate, or license issued by the department may be appealed to the
pollution control hearings board if the appeal is filed with the board and
served on the department or authority within thirty days after ((receipt))
simultaneous posting of the order in the United States mail and on
the department's or local air authority's internet site. Except as
provided under chapter 70.105D RCW and RCW 90.03.210(2), this is the exclusive
means of appeal of such an order.

(2) The department or
the authority in its discretion may stay the effectiveness of an order during
the pendency of such an appeal.

(3) At any time during
the pendency of an appeal of such an order to the board, the appellant may
apply pursuant to RCW 43.21B.320 to the hearings board for a stay of the order
or for the removal thereof.

(4) Any appeal must
contain the following in accordance with the rules of the hearings board:

(a) The appellant's
name and address;

(b) The date and docket
number of the order, permit, or license appealed;

(c) A description of
the substance of the order, permit, or license that is the subject of the
appeal;

(d) A clear, separate,
and concise statement of every error alleged to have been committed;

(e) A clear and concise
statement of facts upon which the requester relies to sustain his or her
statements of error; and

(f) A statement setting
forth the relief sought.

(5) Upon failure to
comply with any final order of the department, the attorney general, on request
of the department, may bring an action in the superior court of the county
where the violation occurred or the potential violation is about to occur to
obtain such relief as necessary, including injunctive relief, to insure
compliance with the order. The air authorities may bring similar actions to
enforce their orders.

(6) An
appealable decision or order shall be identified as such and shall contain a
conspicuous notice to the recipient that it may be appealed only by filing an
appeal with the hearings board and serving it on the department within thirty
days of receipt.

---
END ---