BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that energy conservation can take many useful and cost-effective forms, and
that the types of conservation projects available to utilities and customers
evolve with time as technologies are developed and market conditions change.
In some cases, electricity conservation projects are most cost-effective when they
reduce the total amount of electricity consumed by an individual customer, and
in other cases they can be cost-effective by reducing the amount of electricity
a customer needs to purchase from an electric utility.

The legislature intends
to encourage and support a broad array of cost-effective energy conservation by
electric utilities and customers alike by clarifying that public utilities may
assist in the financing of projects that allow customers to generate their own
electricity from renewable resources that do not depend on commercial sources
of fuel thereby reducing the amount of electricity a public utility needs to
generate or acquire on their customers' behalf.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.92.360 and 1989 c
268 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any city or town
engaged in the generation, sale, or distribution of energy is hereby
authorized, within limits established by the Constitution of the state of
Washington, to assist the owners of structures or equipment in financing the
acquisition and installation of materials and equipment, for compensation or
otherwise, for the conservation or more efficient use of energy in such
structures or equipment pursuant to an energy conservation plan adopted by the
city or town if the cost per unit of energy saved or produced by the use of
such materials and equipment is less than the cost per unit of energy produced
by the next least costly new energy resource which the city or town could acquire
to meet future demand. Any financing authorized under this chapter shall only
be used for conservation purposes in existing structures, and such financing
shall not be used for any purpose which results in a conversion from one energy
source to another. For the purposes of this section, "conservation
purposes in existing structures" may include projects to allow a municipal
electric utility's customers to generate all or a portion of their own
electricity through the on-site installation of a distributed electricity
generation system that uses as its fuel solar, wind, geothermal, or hydropower,
or other renewable resource that is available on-site and not from a commercial
source. Such projects shall not be considered "a conversion from one energy
source to another" which is limited to the change or substitution of one
commercial energy supplier for another commercial energy supplier. Except
where otherwise authorized, such assistance shall be limited to:

(1) Providing an
inspection of the structure or equipment, either directly or through one or
more inspectors under contract, to determine and inform the owner of the
estimated cost of purchasing and installing conservation materials and
equipment for which financial assistance will be approved and the estimated
life cycle savings in energy costs that are likely to result from the
installation of such materials or equipment;

(2) Providing a list of
businesses who sell and install such materials and equipment within or in close
proximity to the service area of the city or town, each of which businesses
shall have requested to be included and shall have the ability to provide the
products in a workmanlike manner and to utilize such materials in accordance
with the prevailing national standards.

(3) Arranging to have
approved conservation materials and equipment installed by a private contractor
whose bid is acceptable to the owner of the residential structure and verifying
such installation; and

(4) Arranging or
providing financing for the purchase and installation of approved conservation
materials and equipment. Such materials and equipment shall be purchased from
a private business and shall be installed by a private business or the owner.

(5) Pay back shall be
in the form of incremental additions to the utility bill, billed either
together with use charge or separately. Loans shall not exceed one hundred
twenty months in length.

Sec. 3. RCW 54.16.280 and 1989 c
268 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any district is hereby
authorized, within limits established by the Constitution of the state of
Washington, to assist the owners of structures or equipment in financing the
acquisition and installation of materials and equipment, for compensation or
otherwise, for the conservation or more efficient use of energy in such
structures or equipment pursuant to an energy conservation plan adopted by the
district if the cost per unit of energy saved or produced by the use of such
materials and equipment is less than the cost per unit of energy produced by
the next least costly new energy resource which the district could acquire to
meet future demand. Any financing authorized under this chapter shall only be
used for conservation purposes in existing structures, and such financing shall
not be used for any purpose which results in a conversion from one energy
source to another. For the purposes of this section, "conservation
purposes in existing structures" may include projects to allow a
district's customers to generate all or a portion of their own electricity
through the on-site installation of a distributed electricity generation system
that uses as its fuel solar, wind, geothermal, or hydropower, or other
renewable resource that is available on-site and not from a commercial source.
Such projects shall not be considered "a conversion from one energy source
to another" which is limited to the change or substitution of one
commercial energy supplier for another commercial energy supplier. Except
where otherwise authorized, such assistance shall be limited to:

(1) Providing an
inspection of the structure or equipment, either directly or through one or
more inspectors under contract, to determine and inform the owner of the
estimated cost of purchasing and installing conservation materials and
equipment for which financial assistance will be approved and the estimated
life cycle savings in energy costs that are likely to result from the
installation of such materials or equipment;

(2) Providing a list of
businesses who sell and install such materials and equipment within or in close
proximity to the service area of the district, each of which businesses shall
have requested to be included and shall have the ability to provide the products
in a workmanlike manner and to utilize such materials in accordance with the
prevailing national standards.

(3) Arranging to have
approved conservation materials and equipment installed by a private contractor
whose bid is acceptable to the owner of the residential structure and verifying
such installation; and

(4) Arranging or
providing financing for the purchase and installation of approved conservation
materials and equipment. Such materials and equipment shall be purchased from
a private business and shall be installed by a private business or the owner.

(5) Pay
back shall be in the form of incremental additions to the utility bill, billed
either together with use charge or separately. Loans shall not exceed one
hundred twenty months in length.

---
END ---