BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.16.0621 and 2000
1st sp.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) License tab fees
shall be thirty dollars per year for motor vehicles, regardless of year, value,
make, or model, beginning January 1, 2000.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "license tab fees" are defined as the general fees paid
annually for licensing motor vehicles, including cars, sport utility vehicles, and
motorcycles((, and motor homes)).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Gross weight
portion of the current combined licensing fees" means the amounts listed
in RCW 46.16.070, Schedule A, less twenty‑five dollars and seventy‑five
cents, and the amounts listed in Schedule B, less twenty‑five dollars and
seventy‑five cents and less an additional ninety dollars if the requested
gross weight is over forty thousand pounds.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.16.070 and 1994 c
262 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In lieu of all
other vehicle licensing fees, unless specifically exempt, and in addition to ((the
excise tax prescribed in chapter 82.44 RCW and)) the mileage fees
prescribed for buses and stages in RCW 46.16.125, there shall be paid and
collected annually for each truck, motor truck, truck tractor, road tractor,
tractor, bus, auto stage, motor home, or for hire vehicle with seating
capacity of more than six, based upon the declared combined gross weight or
declared gross weight ((thereof pursuant to the provisions of)) under
chapter 46.44 RCW, the following licensing fees by such gross weight:

DECLARED GROSS WEIGHT SCHEDULE
A SCHEDULE B

4,000 lbs. $ 37.00 $ 37.00

6,000 lbs. $ 44.00 $ 44.00

8,000 lbs. $ 55.00 $ 55.00

10,000 lbs. $ 62.00 $ 62.00

12,000 lbs. $ 72.00 $ 72.00

14,000 lbs. $ 82.00 $ 82.00

16,000 lbs. $ 92.00 $ 92.00

18,000 lbs. $ 137.00 $ 137.00

20,000 lbs. $ 152.00 $ 152.00

22,000 lbs. $ 164.00 $ 164.00

24,000 lbs. $ 177.00 $ 177.00

26,000 lbs. $ 187.00 $ 187.00

28,000 lbs. $ 220.00 $ 220.00

30,000 lbs. $ 253.00 $ 253.00

32,000 lbs. $ 304.00 $ 304.00

34,000 lbs. $ 323.00 $ 323.00

36,000 lbs. $ 350.00 $ 350.00

38,000 lbs. $ 384.00 $ 384.00

40,000 lbs. $ 439.00 $ 439.00

42,000 lbs. $ 456.00 $ 546.00

44,000 lbs. $ 466.00 $ 556.00

46,000 lbs. $ 501.00 $ 591.00

48,000 lbs. $ 522.00 $ 612.00

50,000 lbs. $ 566.00 $ 656.00

52,000 lbs. $ 595.00 $ 685.00

54,000 lbs. $ 642.00 $ 732.00

56,000 lbs. $ 677.00 $ 767.00

58,000 lbs. $ 704.00 $ 794.00

60,000 lbs. $ 750.00 $ 840.00

62,000 lbs. $ 804.00 $ 894.00

64,000 lbs. $ 822.00 $ 912.00

66,000 lbs. $ 915.00 $ 1,005.00

68,000 lbs. $ 954.00 $ 1,044.00

70,000 lbs. $ 1,027.00 $ 1,117.00

72,000 lbs. $ 1,098.00 $ 1,188.00

74,000 lbs. $ 1,193.00 $ 1,283.00

76,000 lbs. $ 1,289.00 $ 1,379.00

78,000 lbs. $ 1,407.00 $ 1,497.00

80,000 lbs. $ 1,518.00 $ 1,608.00

82,000 lbs. $ 1,623.00 $ 1,713.00

84,000 lbs. $ 1,728.00 $ 1,818.00

86,000 lbs. $ 1,833.00 $ 1,923.00

88,000 lbs. $ 1,938.00 $ 2,028.00

90,000 lbs. $ 2,043.00 $ 2,133.00

92,000 lbs. $ 2,148.00 $ 2,238.00

94,000 lbs. $ 2,253.00 $ 2,343.00

96,000 lbs. $ 2,358.00 $ 2,448.00

98,000 lbs. $ 2,463.00 $ 2,553.00

100,000 lbs. $ 2,568.00 $ 2,658.00

102,000 lbs. $ 2,673.00 $ 2,763.00

104,000 lbs. $ 2,778.00 $ 2,868.00

105,500 lbs. $ 2,883.00 $ 2,973.00

Schedule A applies to
vehicles either used exclusively for hauling logs or that do not tow trailers.
Schedule B applies to vehicles that tow trailers and are not covered under
Schedule A.

(2) Every truck,
motor truck, truck tractor, and tractor exceeding 6,000 pounds empty scale
weight registered under chapter 46.16, 46.87, or 46.88 RCW shall be licensed
for not less than one hundred fifty percent of its empty weight unless the
amount would be in excess of the legal limits prescribed for such a vehicle in
RCW 46.44.041 or 46.44.042, in which event the vehicle shall be licensed for
the maximum weight authorized for such a vehicle or unless the vehicle is used
only for the purpose of transporting any well drilling machine, air compressor,
rock crusher, conveyor, hoist, donkey engine, cook house, tool house, bunk
house, or similar machine or structure attached to or made a part of such
vehicle.

(3) Beginning with
all motor vehicle registrations that are due or become due on July 1, 2002, and
thereafter, there will be paid and collected annually a twenty-percent
surcharge on the gross weight portion of the current combined licensing fees.

(4) The
following provisions apply when increasing gross or combined gross weight for a
vehicle licensed under this section:

(a) The new license fee
will be one-twelfth of the fee listed above for the new gross weight,
multiplied by the number of months remaining in the period for which licensing
fees have been paid, including the month in which the new gross weight is
effective.

(b) Upon surrender of
the current certificate of registration or cab card, the new licensing fees due
shall be reduced by the amount of the licensing fees previously paid for the
same period for which new fees are being charged.

(((2))) (5)
The proceeds from the fees collected under ((subsection (1) of)) this
section shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 46.68.035.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.68.035 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

All proceeds from
combined vehicle licensing fees received by the director for vehicles licensed
under RCW 46.16.070 and 46.16.085 shall be forwarded to the state treasurer to
be distributed into accounts according to the following method:

(1) The sum of two
dollars for each vehicle shall be deposited into the multimodal transportation
account, except that for each vehicle registered by a county auditor or agent
to a county auditor pursuant to RCW 46.01.140, the sum of two dollars shall be
credited to the current county expense fund.

(2) The proceeds
from the surcharge collected under RCW 46.16.070(3) must be deposited into the
motor vehicle fund.

(3) All fees
collected under RCW 46.16.070(1) for motor homes, less the distribution
required under subsection (1) of this section, must be deposited into the motor
vehicle fund.

(4) The
remainder shall be distributed as follows:

(a) 23.677 percent
shall be deposited into the state patrol highway account of the motor vehicle
fund;

(b) 1.521 percent shall
be deposited into the Puget Sound ferry operations account of the motor vehicle
fund; and

(c) The remaining
proceeds shall be deposited into the motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.16.071 and 1996 c
315 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the
fees set forth in RCW 46.16.070, there shall be paid and collected annually
upon registration, a fee of one dollar for each motor home, truck, motor
truck, truck tractor, road tractor, tractor, bus, auto stage, or for hire
vehicle with seating capacity of more than six, notwithstanding the provisions
of RCW 46.16.070.

(2) In addition to the
fees set forth in RCW 46.16.085, there shall be paid and collected annually
upon registration, a fee of one dollar for each trailer, semitrailer, and pole
trailer, notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 46.16.085.

(3) The proceeds from
the fees collected under subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be
deposited into the highway safety fund, except that for each vehicle registered
by a county auditor or agent to a county auditor under RCW 46.01.140, the
proceeds shall be credited to the current county expense fund.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.68.090 and 1999 c
269 s 2 and 1999 c 94 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All moneys that
have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle fund from the motor vehicle
fuel tax and special fuel tax shall be first expended for purposes enumerated
in (a) and (b) of this subsection. The remaining net tax amount shall be
distributed monthly by the state treasurer in ((the proportions set forth in
(c) through (l))) accordance with subsections (2) and (3) of this ((subsection))
section.

(a) For payment of
refunds of motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax that has been paid and
is refundable as provided by law;

(b) For payment of
amounts to be expended pursuant to appropriations for the administrative
expenses of the offices of state treasurer, state auditor, and the department
of licensing of the state of Washington in the administration of the motor
vehicle fuel tax and the special fuel tax, which sums shall be distributed
monthly((;)).

(2) All of the
remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(1) and 82.38.030(1)
shall be distributed as set forth in (a) through (j) of this subsection.

(((c))) (a)
For distribution to the motor vehicle fund ((an amount equal to 44.387
percent)) to be expended for highway purposes of the state as defined in
RCW 46.68.130, the following amounts:

(i) 44.387 percent
of the net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(1); and

(ii) 100 percent of
the net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025 (2), (3), and (4) and
82.38.030(2);

(((d))) (b)
For distribution to the special category C account, hereby created in the motor
vehicle fund, an amount equal to 3.2609 percent of the net tax amount
collected under RCW 82.36.025(1) to be expended for special category C
projects. Special category C projects are category C projects that, due to
high cost only, will require bond financing to complete construction.

The following criteria,
listed in order of priority, shall be used in determining which special
category C projects have the highest priority:

(i) Accident
experience;

(ii) Fatal accident
experience;

(iii) Capacity to move
people and goods safely and at reasonable speeds without undue congestion; and

(iv) Continuity of
development of the highway transportation network.

Moneys deposited in the
special category C account in the motor vehicle fund may be used for payment of
debt service on bonds the proceeds of which are used to finance special
category C projects under this subsection (((1)(d))) (2)(b);

(((e))) (c)
For distribution to the Puget Sound ferry operations account in the motor
vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3283 percent of the net tax amount
collected under RCW 82.36.025(1);

(((f))) (d)
For distribution to the Puget Sound capital construction account in the motor
vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3726 percent of the net tax amount collected
under RCW 82.36.025(1);

(((g))) (e)
For distribution to the urban arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund
an amount equal to 7.5597 percent of the net tax amount collected under RCW
82.36.025(1);

(((h))) (f)
For distribution to the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle
fund an amount equal to 5.6739 percent of the net tax amount collected under
RCW 82.36.025(1) and expended in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;

(((i))) (g)
For distribution to the cities and towns from the motor vehicle fund an amount
equal to 10.6961 percent of the net tax amount collected under RCW
82.36.025(1) in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;

(((j))) (h)
For distribution to the counties from the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
19.2287 percent of the net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(1):
(i) Out of which there shall be distributed from time to time, as directed by
the department of transportation, those sums as may be necessary to carry out
the provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any amounts appropriated to the
county road administration board to implement the provisions of RCW
47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be distributed monthly
as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW 46.68.120;

(((k))) (i)
For distribution to the county arterial preservation account, hereby created in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 1.9565 percent of the net tax
amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(1). These funds shall be distributed
by the county road administration board to counties in proportions
corresponding to the number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated
area of each county and shall be used for improvements to sustain the
structural, safety, and operational integrity of county arterials. The county
road administration board shall adopt reasonable rules and develop policies to
implement this program and to assure that a pavement management system is used;

(((l))) (j)
For distribution to the rural arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund
an amount equal to 2.5363 percent of the net tax amount collected under RCW
82.36.025(1) and expended in accordance with RCW 36.79.020.

(((2))) (3)
All of the remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025 (2), (3), and
(4) and 82.38.030 (2), (3), and (4) shall be deposited into the motor vehicle
fund.

(4) Nothing in
this section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so as to violate any terms or
conditions contained in any highway construction bond issues now or hereafter
authorized by statute and whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid
from any excise taxes on motor vehicle fuel and special fuels.

Sec. 7. RCW 82.08.020 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and
there shall be collected a tax on each retail sale in this state equal to six
and five-tenths percent of the selling price.

(2) There is levied and
there shall be collected an additional tax on each retail car rental,
regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal to five and
nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected under this
subsection shall be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created
in RCW 47.66.070.

(3) Beginning July
1, 2002, and through June 30, 2003, there is levied and collected an additional
tax of one percent of the selling price on each retail sale of a motor vehicle
in this state, other than retail car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this
section.

(4) Beginning July
1, 2003, there is levied and collected an additional tax of one and one‑half
percent of the selling price on each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this
state, other than car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section.

(5) For purposes of
subsections (3) and (4) of this section, "motor vehicle" has the
meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm tractors or farm
vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181, off‑road and
nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020, and snowmobiles as defined in
RCW 46.10.010.

(6) The revenue
collected under subsections (3) and (4) of this section must be deposited into
the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.

(7) The taxes
imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive retail sales of the same
property.

(((4))) (8)
The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12
RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 8. RCW 82.12.020 and 1999 c
358 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
levied and there shall be collected from every person in this state a tax or
excise for the privilege of using within this state as a consumer: (a) Any
article of tangible personal property purchased at retail, or acquired by
lease, gift, repossession, or bailment, or extracted or produced or
manufactured by the person so using the same, or otherwise furnished to a
person engaged in any business taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) or (7); or (b)
any canned software, regardless of the method of delivery, but excluding canned
software that is either provided free of charge or is provided for temporary
use in viewing information, or both.

(2) This tax shall
apply to the use of every service defined as a retail sale in RCW
82.04.050(3)(a) and the use of every article of tangible personal property,
including property acquired at a casual or isolated sale, and including
byproducts used by the manufacturer thereof, except as hereinafter provided,
irrespective of whether the article or similar articles are manufactured or are
available for purchase within this state.

(3) Except as provided
in RCW 82.12.0252, payment by one purchaser or user of tangible personal
property or service of the tax imposed by chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW shall not
have the effect of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same property
or service from the taxes imposed by such chapters.

(4) The tax shall be
levied and collected in an amount equal to the value of the article used by the
taxpayer multiplied by the rates in effect for the retail sales tax
under RCW 82.08.020.

Sec. 9. RCW 82.12.045 and 1996 c
149 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In the collection
of the use tax on motor vehicles, the department of revenue may designate the
county auditors of the several counties of the state as its collecting agents.
Upon such designation, it shall be the duty of each county auditor to collect
the tax at the time an applicant applies for the registration of, and transfer
of title to, the motor vehicle, except in the following instances:

(a) Where the applicant
exhibits a dealer's report of sale showing that the retail sales tax has been
collected by the dealer;

(b) Where the
application is for the renewal of registration;

(c) Where the applicant
presents a written statement signed by the department of revenue, or its duly
authorized agent showing that no use tax is legally due; or

(d) Where the applicant
presents satisfactory evidence showing that the retail sales tax or the use tax
has been paid by ((him)) the applicant on the vehicle in
question.

(2) The term
"motor vehicle," as used in this section means and includes all motor
vehicles, trailers and semitrailers used, or of a type designed primarily to be
used, upon the public streets and highways, for the convenience or pleasure of
the owner, or for the conveyance, for hire or otherwise, of persons or
property, including fixed loads, facilities for human habitation, and vehicles
carrying exempt licenses.

(3) It shall be the duty
of every applicant for registration and transfer of certificate of title who is
subject to payment of tax under this section to declare upon ((his)) the
application the value of the vehicle for which application is made, which shall
consist of the consideration paid or contracted to be paid therefor.

(4) Each county auditor
who acts as agent of the department of revenue shall at the time of remitting
license fee receipts on motor vehicles subject to the provisions of this
section pay over and account to the state treasurer for all use tax revenue
collected under this section, after first deducting as ((his)) a
collection fee the sum of two dollars for each motor vehicle upon which the tax
has been collected. All revenue received by the state treasurer under this
section shall be credited to the general fund. The auditor's collection fee
shall be deposited in the county current expense fund. A duplicate of the
county auditor's transmittal report to the state treasurer shall be forwarded
forthwith to the department of revenue.

(5) Any applicant who
has paid use tax to a county auditor under this section may apply to the
department of revenue for refund thereof if he or she has reason to
believe that such tax was not legally due and owing. No refund shall be
allowed unless application therefor is received by the department of revenue
within the statutory period for assessment of taxes, penalties, or interest
prescribed by RCW 82.32.050(3). Upon receipt of an application for refund the
department of revenue shall consider the same and issue its order either
granting or denying it and if refund is denied the taxpayer shall have the
right of appeal as provided in RCW 82.32.170, 82.32.180 and 82.32.190.

(6) The provisions of
this section shall be construed as cumulative of other methods prescribed in
chapters 82.04 to 82.32 RCW, inclusive, for the collection of the tax imposed
by this chapter. The department of revenue shall have power to promulgate such
rules as may be necessary to administer the provisions of this section. Any
duties required by this section to be performed by the county auditor may be
performed by the director of licensing but no collection fee shall be
deductible by said director in remitting use tax revenue to the state
treasurer.

(7) The use tax
revenue collected under RCW 82.08.020 (3) and (4) will be deposited in the
multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.

Sec. 10. RCW 82.36.025 and 1999 c
269 s 16 and 1999 c 94 s 29 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) A motor
vehicle fuel tax rate of twenty-three cents per gallon ((shall apply)) applies
to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.

(2) Beginning July
1, 2002, an additional and cumulative motor fuel tax rate of three cents per
gallon applies to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.

(3) Beginning July
1, 2003, an additional and cumulative motor vehicle fuel tax rate of three
cents per gallon applies to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle
fuel.

(4) Beginning July
1, 2004, an additional and cumulative motor vehicle fuel tax rate of three
cents per gallon applies to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle
fuel.

Sec. 11. RCW 82.38.030 and 2001 c
270 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
levied and imposed upon special fuel users a tax at the rate ((computed in
the manner provided in RCW 82.36.025 on each)) of twenty-three cents per
gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic feet of compressed natural
gas, measured at standard pressure and temperature.

(2) Beginning July
1, 2002, an additional and cumulative tax rate of six cents per gallon of
special fuel, or each one hundred cubic feet of compressed natural gas,
measured at standard pressure and temperature shall be imposed on special fuel
users.

(3) Beginning July
1, 2003, an additional and cumulative special fuel tax rate of three cents per
gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic feet of compressed natural
gas, measured at standard pressure and temperature shall be imposed on special
fuel users.

(4) Beginning July
1, 2004, an additional and cumulative special fuel tax rate of three cents per
gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic feet of compressed natural
gas, measured at standard pressure and temperature shall be imposed on special
fuel users.

(5) The tax is
imposed ((by subsection (1) of this section is imposed)) when:

(a) Special fuel is
removed in this state from a terminal if the special fuel is removed at the
rack unless the removal is to a licensed exporter for direct delivery to a
destination outside of the state, or the removal is to a special fuel
distributor for direct delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee
under RCW 82.38.320;

(b) Special fuel is
removed in this state from a refinery if either of the following applies:

(i) The removal is by
bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of the special fuel immediately
before the removal is not a licensee; or

(ii) The removal is at
the refinery rack unless the removal is to a licensed exporter for direct
delivery to a destination outside of the state, or the removal is to a special
fuel distributor for direct delivery to an international fuel tax agreement
licensee under RCW 82.38.320;

(c) Special fuel enters
into this state for sale, consumption, use, or storage if either of the
following applies:

(i) The entry is by
bulk transfer and the importer is not a licensee; or

(ii) The entry is not
by bulk transfer;

(d) Special fuel is
sold or removed in this state to an unlicensed entity unless there was a prior
taxable removal, entry, or sale of the special fuel;

(e) Blended special
fuel is removed or sold in this state by the blender of the fuel. The number
of gallons of blended special fuel subject to tax is the difference between the
total number of gallons of blended special fuel removed or sold and the number
of gallons of previously taxed special fuel used to produce the blended special
fuel;

(f) Dyed special fuel
is used on a highway, as authorized by the internal revenue code, unless the
use is exempt from the special fuel tax;

(g) Special fuel
purchased by an international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320
is used on a highway; and

(h) Special fuel is
sold by a licensed special fuel supplier to a special fuel distributor, special
fuel importer, or special fuel blender and the special fuel is not removed from
the bulk transfer-terminal system.

(((3))) (6)
The tax imposed by this chapter, if required to be collected by the licensee,
is held in trust by the licensee until paid to the department, and a licensee
who appropriates or converts the tax collected to his or her own use or to any
use other than the payment of the tax to the extent that the money required to
be collected is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this
chapter is guilty of a felony, or gross misdemeanor in accordance with the
theft and anticipatory provisions of Title 9A RCW. A person, partnership,
corporation, or corporate officer who fails to collect the tax imposed by this
section, or who has collected the tax and fails to pay it to the department in
the manner prescribed by this chapter, is personally liable to the state for
the amount of the tax.

Sec. 12. RCW 82.38.035 and 2001 c
270 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A licensed supplier
shall remit tax on special fuel to the department as provided in RCW
82.38.030(((2))) (5)(a). On a two-party exchange, or buy-sell
agreement between two licensed suppliers, the receiving exchange partner or
buyer shall remit the tax.

(2) A refiner shall
remit tax to the department on special fuel removed from a refinery as provided
in RCW 82.38.030(((2))) (5)(b).

(3) An importer shall
remit tax to the department on special fuel imported into this state as
provided in RCW 82.38.030(((2))) (5)(c).

(4) A blender shall
remit tax to the department on the removal or sale of blended special fuel as
provided in RCW 82.38.030(((2))) (5)(e).

(5) A dyed special fuel
user shall remit tax to the department on the use of dyed special fuel as
provided in RCW 82.38.030(((2))) (5)(f).

Sec. 13. RCW 82.38.045 and 1998 c
176 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

A terminal operator is
jointly and severally liable for remitting the tax imposed under RCW
82.38.030(((1))) if, at the time of removal:

(1) The position holder
with respect to the special fuel is a person other than the terminal operator
and is not a licensee;

(2) The terminal
operator is not a licensee;

(3) The position holder
has an expired internal revenue service notification certificate issued under
chapter 26, C.F.R. Part 48; or

(4) The terminal
operator had reason to believe that information on the notification certificate
was false.

Sec. 14. RCW 82.38.047 and 1998 c
176 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

A terminal operator is
jointly and severally liable for remitting the tax imposed under RCW
82.38.030(((1))) if, in connection with the removal of special fuel that
is not dyed or marked in accordance with internal revenue service requirements,
the terminal operator provides a person with a bill of lading, shipping paper,
or similar document indicating that the special fuel is dyed or marked in
accordance with internal revenue service requirements.

Sec. 15. RCW 82.38.075 and 1983 c
212 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to encourage
the use of nonpolluting fuels, an annual license fee in lieu of the tax imposed
by RCW 82.38.030 shall be imposed upon the use of natural gas as defined in
this chapter or on liquified petroleum gas, commonly called propane, which is
used in any motor vehicle, as defined in RCW 46.04.320, which shall be based
upon the following schedule as adjusted by the formula set out below:

VEHICLE
TONNAGE (GVW) FEE

0
- 6,000 $ 45

6,001 -
10,000 $ 45

10,001 -
18,000 $ 80

18,001 -
28,000 $110

28,001
- 36,000 $150

36,001 and
above $250

To determine the actual
annual license fee imposed by this section for a registration year, the
appropriate dollar amount set out in the above schedule shall be multiplied by
the ((motor vehicle)) special fuel tax rate in cents per gallon
as established by RCW ((82.36.025)) 82.38.030 effective on July
1st of the preceding calendar year and the product thereof shall be divided by
12 cents.

The department of
licensing, in addition to the foregoing fee, shall charge a further fee of five
dollars as a handling charge for each license issued.

The director of
licensing shall be authorized to prorate the vehicle tonnage fee so that the
annual license required by this section will correspond with the staggered
vehicle licensing system.

A decal or other
identifying device issued upon payment of these annual fees shall be displayed
as prescribed by the department as authority to purchase this fuel.

Persons selling or
dispensing natural gas or propane may not sell or dispense this fuel for their
own use or the use of others into tanks of vehicles powered by this fuel which
do not display a valid decal or other identifying device as provided in this
section.

Vehicles registered in
jurisdictions outside the state of Washington are exempt from this section.

Any person selling or
dispensing natural gas or propane into the tank of a motor vehicle powered by
this fuel, except as prescribed in this chapter, is subject to the penalty
provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---