BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 53.12.010 and 1994 c
223 s 81 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The powers of the
port district shall be exercised through a port commission consisting of three
or, when permitted by this title, five members. Every port district that is
not coextensive with a county having a population of five hundred thousand or
more shall be divided into the same number of commissioner districts as there
are commissioner positions, each having approximately equal population, unless
provided otherwise under subsection (2) of this section. Where a port district
with three commissioner positions is coextensive with the boundaries of a
county that has a population of less than five hundred thousand and the county
has three county legislative authority districts, the port commissioner districts
shall be the county legislative authority districts. In other instances where
a port district is divided into commissioner districts, the port commission
shall divide the port district into commissioner districts unless the
commissioner districts have been described pursuant to RCW 53.04.031. The
commissioner districts shall be altered as provided in chapter 53.16 RCW.

Commissioner districts
shall be used as follows: (a) Only a registered voter who resides in a
commissioner district may be a candidate for, or hold office as, a commissioner
of the commissioner district; and (b) only the voters of a commissioner
district may vote at a primary to nominate candidates for a commissioner of the
commissioner district. Voters of the entire port district may vote at a
general election to elect a person as a commissioner of the commissioner
district.

(2)(a) In port
districts with five commissioners, two of the commissioner districts may
include the entire port district if approved by the voters of the district
either at the time of formation or at a subsequent port district election at
which the issue is proposed pursuant to a resolution adopted by the board of
commissioners and delivered to the county auditor.

(b) In a port
district with five commissioners, where two of the commissioner districts
include the entire port district, the port district may be divided into five
commissioner districts if proposed pursuant to a resolution adopted by the
board of commissioners or pursuant to a petition by the voters and approved by
the voters of the district at the next general or special election occurring
sixty or more days after the adoption of the resolution. A petition proposing
such an increase must be submitted to the county auditor of the county in which
the port district is located and signed by voters of the port district at least
equal in number to ten percent of the number of voters in the port district who
voted at the last general election.

Upon
approval by the voters, the commissioner district boundaries shall be redrawn
into five districts within one hundred twenty days and submitted to the county
auditor pursuant to RCW 53.16.015. The new commissioner districts shall be
numbered one through five and the three incumbent commissioners representing
the three former districts shall represent commissioner districts one through
three. The two at large incumbent commissioners shall represent commissioner
districts four and five. If, as a result of redrawing the district boundaries
more than one of the incumbent commissioners resides in one of the new
commissioner districts, the commissioners who reside in the same commissioner
district shall determine by lot which of the numbered commissioner districts
they shall represent for the remainder of their respective terms.

--- END ---