BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature has
determined in RCW 9.94A.728(2) that the department of corrections may transfer
offenders to community custody status in lieu of earned release time in
accordance with a program developed by the department of corrections. It is
the legislature's intent, in response to: In re: Capello 106 Wn.App. 576
(2001), to clarify the law to reflect that the secretary of the department
has, and has had since enactment of the community placement act of 1988, the
authority to require all offenders, eligible for release to community custody
status in lieu of earned release, to provide a release plan that includes an
approved residence and living arrangement prior to any transfer to the
community.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.728 and 2000 c
28 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

No person serving a
sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and committed to the custody of the
department shall leave the confines of the correctional facility or be released
prior to the expiration of the sentence except as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided for in subsection (2) of this section, the term of the sentence of an
offender committed to a correctional facility operated by the department may be
reduced by earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and promulgated by the correctional agency having jurisdiction in
which the offender is confined. The earned release time shall be for good
behavior and good performance, as determined by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction. The correctional agency shall not credit the offender with
earned release credits in advance of the offender actually earning the
credits. Any program established pursuant to this section shall allow an
offender to earn early release credits for presentence incarceration. If an
offender is transferred from a county jail to the department, the administrator
of a county jail facility shall certify to the department the amount of time
spent in custody at the facility and the amount of earned release time. An
offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after July 23, 1995, that
involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements under RCW 9.94A.510 (3) or
(4), or both, shall not receive any good time credits or earned release time
for that portion of his or her sentence that results from any deadly weapon
enhancements. In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or after July
1, 1990, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed fifteen percent of
the sentence. In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence;

(2)(a) A person
convicted of a sex offense or an offense categorized as a serious violent
offense, assault in the second degree, vehicular homicide, vehicular assault,
assault of a child in the second degree, any crime against persons where it is
determined in accordance with RCW 9.94A.602 that the offender or an accomplice
was armed with a deadly weapon at the time of commission, or any felony offense
under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed before July 1, 2000, may become
eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the department, for
transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned release time pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section;

(b) A person convicted
of a sex offense, a violent offense, any crime against persons under RCW
9.94A.411(2), or a felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed
on or after July 1, 2000, may become eligible, in accordance with a program
developed by the department, for transfer to community custody status in lieu
of earned release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;

(c) The department
shall, as a part of its program for release to the community in lieu of earned
release, require the offender to propose a release plan that includes an
approved residence and living arrangement. All offenders with community
placement or community custody terms eligible for release to community custody
status in lieu of earned release shall provide an approved residence and living
arrangement prior to release to the community;

(d) The department
may deny transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned release time
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if the department determines an
offender's release plan, including proposed residence location and living
arrangements, may violate the conditions of the sentence or conditions of
supervision, place the offender at risk to violate the conditions of the
sentence, place the offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk to victim
safety or community safety. The department's authority under this section is
independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence or statutory provision
regarding conditions for community custody or community placement;

(3) An offender may
leave a correctional facility pursuant to an authorized furlough or leave of
absence. In addition, offenders may leave a correctional facility when in the
custody of a corrections officer or officers;

(4)(a) The secretary
may authorize an extraordinary medical placement for an offender when all of
the following conditions exist:

(i) The offender has a
medical condition that is serious enough to require costly care or treatment;

(ii) The offender poses
a low risk to the community because he or she is physically incapacitated due
to age or the medical condition; and

(iii) Granting the
extraordinary medical placement will result in a cost savings to the state.

(b) An offender
sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without the possibility of release
or parole is not eligible for an extraordinary medical placement.

(c) The secretary shall
require electronic monitoring for all offenders in extraordinary medical
placement unless the electronic monitoring equipment interferes with the
function of the offender's medical equipment or results in the loss of funding
for the offender's medical care. The secretary shall specify who shall provide
the monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be
performed.

(d) The secretary may
revoke an extraordinary medical placement under this subsection at any time.

(5) The governor, upon
recommendation from the clemency and pardons board, may grant an extraordinary
release for reasons of serious health problems, senility, advanced age,
extraordinary meritorious acts, or other extraordinary circumstances;

(6) No more than the
final six months of the sentence may be served in partial confinement designed
to aid the offender in finding work and reestablishing himself or herself in
the community;

(7) The governor may
pardon any offender;

(8) The department may
release an offender from confinement any time within ten days before a release
date calculated under this section; and

(9) An offender may
leave a correctional facility prior to completion of his or her sentence if the
sentence has been reduced as provided in RCW 9.94A.870.

Notwithstanding any
other provisions of this section, an offender sentenced for a felony crime
listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as subject to a mandatory minimum sentence of total
confinement shall not be released from total confinement before the completion
of the listed mandatory minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction
unless allowed under RCW 9.94A.540, however persistent offenders are not
eligible for extraordinary medical placement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. This act applies to all
offenders with community placement or community custody terms currently
incarcerated either before, on, or after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---