BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the expansion and realignment of state route 167, which has been
designated as a highway of statewide significance, is of vital interest to the
state's economy. To ensure the free movement of people and goods along this
corridor is a transportation priority, and the department of transportation
shall plan and design an improved and expanded corridor from its intersection
with state route 405 in the north to a new terminus at the Port of Tacoma via
proposed state route 509 in the south. At a minimum, the planning must
include:

(1) Environmental
permit processes must be conducted in accordance with the criteria, standards,
timelines, and other processes developed by the transportation permit
efficiency and accountability committee established under chapter 47.06C RCW,
and may include watershed-based mitigation;

(2) Planning must be
undertaken in preparation for the ultimate project to be designed and
constructed using the design-build processes established under RCW 47.20.780
and 47.20.785. The cost-benefit analysis process and demand modeling tools
provided in sections 401 through 406, chapter 5, Laws of 2002 may be used in
this planning;

(3) Nothing in this
section delays, restricts, or limits design, right-of-way purchase, planning,
construction, or other work associated with state route 167 improvement projects
which has already been completed or is ongoing. The design and plan process
called for in this section shall be conducted in such a way as to integrate
previous or ongoing work on projects associated with improving state route 167
to avoid delay to any such project.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is null and void
if new transportation revenues do not become law in 2002.

---
END ---