BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.52C.040 and 1997
c 392 s 528 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The nursing pool
shall document that each temporary employee or referred independent contractor
provided or referred to health care facilities currently meets the applicable
minimum state credentialing requirements.

(2) The nursing pool
shall not require, as a condition of employment or referral, that employees or
independent contractors of the nursing pool recruit new employees or
independent contractors for the nursing pool from among the permanent employees
of the health care facility to which the nursing pool employee or independent
contractor has been assigned or referred.

(3) The nursing pool
shall carry professional and general liability insurance to insure against any
loss or damage occurring, whether professional or otherwise, as the result of
the negligence of its employees, agents or independent contractors for acts
committed in the course of their employment with the nursing pool: PROVIDED,
That a nursing pool that only refers self-employed, independent contractors to
health care facilities shall carry professional and general liability insurance
to cover its own liability as a nursing pool which refers self-employed,
independent contractors to health care facilities: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That
it shall require, as a condition of referral, that self‑employed,
independent contractors carry professional and general liability insurance to
insure against loss or damage resulting from their own acts committed in the
course of their own employment by a health care facility.

(4) The uniform
disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, shall govern the issuance and denial of
registration and the discipline of persons registered under this chapter. The
secretary shall be the disciplinary authority under this chapter.

(5) The nursing pool
shall conduct a criminal background check on all employees and independent
contractors as required under RCW 43.43.842 prior to employment or referral of
the employee or independent contractor.

(6) The nursing pool
providing employees or referring independent contractors to a health care
facility shall not bill or receive payments from such a health care facility at
a rate higher than one hundred thirty-five percent of the weighted average wage
rate, in the county in which the health care facility is located, for nursing
home employees of like classification. Each county's weighted average wage
rate for employee classifications, which includes related taxes and benefits,
must be determined by the department of social and health services using nursing
home cost reports required under chapter 74.46 RCW. The department of social
and health services must report this data to the secretary on an annual basis.
The secretary will provide this data to all nursing pools registered under this
chapter. The maximum rate a nursing pool may charge a health care facility
must include all charges for administrative fees, contract fees, or other
special charges in addition to the hourly rates for the nursing pool employees
or referred independent contractors supplied to the health care facility.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.46.410 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Costs will be
unallowable if they are not documented, necessary, ordinary, and related to the
provision of care services to authorized patients.

(2) Unallowable costs
include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Costs of items or
services not covered by the medical care program. Costs of such items or
services will be unallowable even if they are indirectly reimbursed by the
department as the result of an authorized reduction in patient contribution;

(b) Costs of services
and items provided to recipients which are covered by the department's medical
care program but not included in the medicaid per-resident day payment rate
established by the department under this chapter;

(c) Costs associated
with a capital expenditure subject to section 1122 approval (part 100, Title 42
C.F.R.) if the department found it was not consistent with applicable standards,
criteria, or plans. If the department was not given timely notice of a
proposed capital expenditure, all associated costs will be unallowable up to
the date they are determined to be reimbursable under applicable federal
regulations;

(d) Costs associated
with a construction or acquisition project requiring certificate of need
approval, or exemption from the requirements for certificate of need for the
replacement of existing nursing home beds, pursuant to chapter 70.38 RCW if
such approval or exemption was not obtained;

(e) Interest costs
other than those provided by RCW 74.46.290 on and after January 1, 1985;

(f) Salaries or other
compensation of owners, officers, directors, stockholders, partners,
principals, participants, and others associated with the contractor or its home
office, including all board of directors' fees for any purpose, except
reasonable compensation paid for service related to patient care;

(g) Costs in excess of
limits or in violation of principles set forth in this chapter;

(h) Costs resulting
from transactions or the application of accounting methods which circumvent the
principles of the payment system set forth in this chapter;

(i) Costs applicable to
services, facilities, and supplies furnished by a related organization in excess
of the lower of the cost to the related organization or the price of comparable
services, facilities, or supplies purchased elsewhere;

(j) Bad debts of
non-Title XIX recipients. Bad debts of Title XIX recipients are allowable if
the debt is related to covered services, it arises from the recipient's
required contribution toward the cost of care, the provider can establish that
reasonable collection efforts were made, the debt was actually uncollectible
when claimed as worthless, and sound business judgment established that there
was no likelihood of recovery at any time in the future;

(k) Charity and
courtesy allowances;

(l) Cash, assessments,
or other contributions, excluding dues, to charitable organizations,
professional organizations, trade associations, or political parties, and costs
incurred to improve community or public relations;

(m) Vending machine
expenses;

(n) Expenses for barber
or beautician services not included in routine care;

(o) Funeral and burial
expenses;

(p) Costs of gift shop
operations and inventory;

(q) Personal items such
as cosmetics, smoking materials, newspapers and magazines, and clothing, except
those used in patient activity programs;

(r) Fund-raising
expenses, except those directly related to the patient activity program;

(s) Penalties and
fines;

(t) Expenses related to
telephones, radios, and similar appliances in patients' private accommodations;

(u) Televisions
acquired prior to July 1, 2001;

(v) Federal, state, and
other income taxes;

(w) Costs of special
care services except where authorized by the department;

(x) Expenses of an
employee benefit not in fact made available to all employees on an equal or
fair basis, for example, key-man insurance and other insurance or retirement
plans;

(y) Expenses of
profit-sharing plans;

(z) Expenses related to
the purchase and/or use of private or commercial airplanes which are in excess
of what a prudent contractor would expend for the ordinary and economic
provision of such a transportation need related to patient care;

(aa) Personal expenses
and allowances of owners or relatives;

(bb) All expenses of
maintaining professional licenses or membership in professional organizations;

(cc) Costs related to
agreements not to compete;

(dd) Amortization of
goodwill, lease acquisition, or any other intangible asset, whether related to
resident care or not, and whether recognized under generally accepted
accounting principles or not;

(ee) Expenses related
to vehicles which are in excess of what a prudent contractor would expend for
the ordinary and economic provision of transportation needs related to patient
care;

(ff) Legal and
consultant fees in connection with a fair hearing against the department where
a decision is rendered in favor of the department or where otherwise the
determination of the department stands;

(gg) Legal and
consultant fees of a contractor or contractors in connection with a lawsuit
against the department;

(hh) Lease acquisition
costs, goodwill, the cost of bed rights, or any other intangible assets;

(ii) All rental or
lease costs other than those provided in RCW 74.46.300 on and after January 1,
1985;

(jj) Postsurvey charges
incurred by the facility as a result of subsequent inspections under RCW
18.51.050 which occur beyond the first postsurvey visit during the
certification survey calendar year;

(kk) Compensation paid
for any purchased nursing care services, including registered nurse, licensed
practical nurse, and nurse assistant services, obtained through service
contract arrangement in excess of one hundred thirty-five percent of the
amount of compensation paid for such hours of nursing care service had they
been paid at the average hourly wage, including related taxes and benefits, for
in-house nursing care staff of like classification at the same nursing
facility, as reported in the most recent cost report period;

(ll) For all partial or
whole rate periods after July 17, 1984, costs of land and depreciable assets
that cannot be reimbursed under the Deficit Reduction Act of 1984 and
implementing state statutory and regulatory provisions;

(mm) Costs reported by
the contractor for a prior period to the extent such costs, due to statutory
exemption, will not be incurred by the contractor in the period to be covered
by the rate;

(nn) Costs of outside
activities, for example, costs allocated to the use of a vehicle for personal
purposes or related to the part of a facility leased out for office space;

(oo) Travel expenses
outside the states of Idaho, Oregon, and Washington and the province of British
Columbia. However, travel to or from the home or central office of a chain
organization operating a nursing facility is allowed whether inside or outside
these areas if the travel is necessary, ordinary, and related to resident care;

(pp) Moving expenses of
employees in the absence of demonstrated, good-faith effort to recruit within
the states of Idaho, Oregon, and Washington, and the province of British
Columbia;

(qq) Depreciation in
excess of four thousand dollars per year for each passenger car or other
vehicle primarily used by the administrator, facility staff, or central office
staff;

(rr) Costs for
temporary health care personnel from a nursing pool not registered with the
secretary of the department of health;

(ss) Payroll taxes
associated with compensation in excess of allowable compensation of owners,
relatives, and administrative personnel;

(tt) Costs and fees
associated with filing a petition for bankruptcy;

(uu) All advertising or
promotional costs, except reasonable costs of help wanted advertising;

(vv) Outside
consultation expenses required to meet department-required minimum data set
completion proficiency;

(ww) Interest charges
assessed by any department or agency of this state for failure to make a timely
refund of overpayments and interest expenses incurred for loans obtained to
make the refunds;

(xx) All home office or
central office costs, whether on or off the nursing facility premises, and
whether allocated or not to specific services, in excess of the median of those
adjusted costs for all facilities reporting such costs for the most recent
report period; and

(yy) Tax
expenses that a nursing facility has never incurred.

---
END ---