BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.44.100 and 1997 c
316 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After an
application to, and upon the issuance by the department of an amendment to the
appropriate permit or certificate of ground water right, the holder of a valid
right to withdraw public ground waters may, without losing the holder's
priority of right, construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new
location in substitution for or in addition to those at the original location,
or the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.

(2) An amendment to
construct replacement or a new additional well or wells at a location outside
of the location of the original well or wells or to change the manner or place
of use of the water shall be issued only after publication of notice of the
application and findings as prescribed in the case of an original application.
Such amendment shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that:
(a) The additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public ground water as the original well or wells; (b) where a replacement well
or wells is approved, the use of the original well or wells shall be discontinued
and the original well or wells shall be properly decommissioned as required
under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where an additional well or wells is constructed,
the original well or wells may continue to be used, but the combined total
withdrawal from the original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the
right conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d) other existing
rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an approved manner of
construction and shall require a showing of compliance with the terms of the
amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of an original permit.

(3) The construction of
a replacement or new additional well or wells at the location of the original
well or wells shall be allowed without application to the department for an
amendment. However, the following apply to such a replacement or new
additional well: (a) The well shall tap the same body of public ground water
as the original well or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the
use of the original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well
or wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW;
(c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or wells may
continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the original and
additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right conveyed by the original
water use permit or certificate; (d) the construction and use of the well shall
not interfere with or impair water rights with an earlier date of priority than
the water right or rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement
or additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a well
it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an approved manner of
construction of the well; and (g) the department shall require a showing of
compliance with the conditions of this subsection (3).

(4) The
construction of a replacement or new redundancy well or wells by a public water
system at a location outside of the location of the original well or wells
shall be allowed without application to the department for an amendment.
However, the following apply to such a replacement or new redundancy well:

(a) The well shall
tap the same body of public ground water as the original well or wells;

(b) If a
replacement well is constructed, the use of the original well or wells shall be
discontinued and the original well or wells shall be properly decommissioned as
required under chapter 18.104 RCW;

(c) If a new
redundancy well is constructed, the original well or wells may continue to be
used, but the combined total withdrawal from the original and redundancy well
or wells shall not enlarge the right conveyed by the original water use permit
or certificate;

(d) The
construction and use of the well shall not interfere with or impair water
rights with an earlier date of priority than the water right or rights for the
original well or wells;

(e) The replacement
or redundancy well shall be located no closer than the original well to a well
it might interfere with;

(f) The department
may specify an approved manner of construction of the well;

(g) Opportunities
at the location of the original well or wells are not available or suitable due
to land use, sanitary zone interference, or water quality problems, or poor
geologic or aquifer conditions cause inadequate or unreliable supply;

(h) The
construction and use of the well will cause no greater effect on surface waters
than full exercise of the water right at the location of the original well or
wells; and

(i) The department
shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this subsection
(4).

(5)
As used in this section, the "location of the original well or wells"
is the area described as the point of withdrawal in the original public notice
published for the application for the water right for the well.

--- END ---