BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 64.06 RCW to read as follows:

Any licensed real
estate salesperson or broker involved in a residential real property
transaction is liable under section 2 of this act if the salesperson or broker
has actual knowledge that the real property transfer disclosure statement
contains any error, inaccuracy, or omission and fails to disclose such material
information from the buyer or the buyer's agent.

Sec. 2. RCW 64.06.060 and 1994 c
200 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that the practices covered by section 1 of this act are matters vitally
affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of section 1 of this act is not
reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is
an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter
19.86 RCW.

(2)
Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the legislature finds
that the practices covered by this chapter are not matters vitally affecting
the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

---
END ---