BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to respond to the case of Schumacher v. Williams (45365-3-1 August 6,
2001) and clarify that the right of a person to recover for the wrongful death
of a family member is not contingent upon the showing that the survivor was
financially dependent upon the decedent.

Sec. 2. RCW 4.20.020 and 1985 c
139 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every such action shall
be for the benefit of the wife, husband, child or children, including
stepchildren, of the person whose death shall have been so caused. Except
as otherwise provided in RCW 74.34.210, if there be no wife or husband or
such child or children, such action may be maintained for the benefit of the
parents, sisters, or brothers, who may be dependent upon the deceased
person for support, and who are resident within the United States at the time
of his or her death.

In every such action
the jury may give such damages as, under all circumstances of the case, may to
them seem just.

Sec. 3. RCW 74.34.210 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 18 s 86 are each amended to read as follows:

A petition
for an order for protection or an action for damages under this chapter may be
brought by the plaintiff, or where necessary, by his or her family members
and/or guardian or legal fiduciary, or as otherwise provided under this
chapter. The death of the plaintiff shall not deprive the court of
jurisdiction over a petition or claim brought under this chapter. Upon
petition, after the death of the vulnerable person, the right to initiate or
maintain the action shall be transferred to the executor or administrator of
the deceased, for the benefit of the surviving spouse, child or children, or
other heirs set forth in chapter 4.20 RCW, except that a parent, sister, or
brother of the deceased person need not be dependent upon the deceased person
for support in order to maintain an action under this section.

---
END ---