BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 5.60.060 and 2001 c
286 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)(i) A
husband shall not be examined for or against his wife, without ((the)) his
consent ((of the wife)), nor a wife for or against her husband without
((the)) her consent ((of the husband; nor can either during
marriage or afterward, be without the consent of the other, examined as to any
communication made by one to the other during marriage. But this exception)).

(ii) Neither a
husband nor a wife, either during marriage or afterward, without the consent of
the other, may be examined as to any communication made by one to the other
during the marriage. But this privilege shall not apply to a criminal action
or proceeding involving an allegation of conspiracy or an allegation of a joint
criminal activity involving the spouses.

(b) The exceptions
in (a) of this subsection shall not apply to a civil action or proceeding
by one against the other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime
committed by one against the other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding
against a spouse if the marriage occurred subsequent to the filing of formal
charges against the defendant, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a
crime committed by ((said)) the husband or wife against any child
of whom ((said)) the husband or wife is the parent or guardian,
nor to a proceeding under chapter 70.96A, 71.05, or 71.09 RCW: PROVIDED, That
the spouse of a person sought to be detained under chapter 70.96A, 71.05, or
71.09 RCW may not be compelled to testify and shall be so informed by the court
prior to being called as a witness.

(2)(a) An attorney or
counselor shall not, without the consent of his or her client, be examined as
to any communication made by the client to him or her, or his or her advice
given thereon in the course of professional employment.

(b) A parent or guardian
of a minor child arrested on a criminal charge may not be examined as to a
communication between the child and his or her attorney if the communication
was made in the presence of the parent or guardian. This privilege does not
extend to communications made prior to the arrest.

(3) A member of the
clergy or a priest shall not, without the consent of a person making the
confession, be examined as to any confession made to him or her in his or her
professional character, in the course of discipline enjoined by the church to
which he or she belongs.

(4) Subject to the
limitations under RCW 70.96A.140 or 71.05.250, a physician or surgeon or
osteopathic physician or surgeon or podiatric physician or surgeon shall not,
without the consent of his or her patient, be examined in a civil action as to
any information acquired in attending such patient, which was necessary to
enable him or her to prescribe or act for the patient, except as follows:

(a) In any judicial
proceedings regarding a child's injury, neglect, or sexual abuse or the cause
thereof; and

(b) Ninety days after
filing an action for personal injuries or wrongful death, the claimant shall be
deemed to waive the physician-patient privilege. Waiver of the
physician-patient privilege for any one physician or condition constitutes a
waiver of the privilege as to all physicians or conditions, subject to such
limitations as a court may impose pursuant to court rules.

(5) A public officer
shall not be examined as a witness as to communications made to him or her in
official confidence, when the public interest would suffer by the disclosure.

(6)(a) A peer support
group counselor shall not, without consent of the law enforcement officer
making the communication, be compelled to testify about any communication made
to the counselor by the officer while receiving counseling. The counselor must
be designated as such by the sheriff, police chief, or chief of the Washington
state patrol, prior to the incident that results in counseling. The privilege
only applies when the communication was made to the counselor while acting in
his or her capacity as a peer support group counselor. The privilege does not
apply if the counselor was an initial responding officer, a witness, or a party
to the incident which prompted the delivery of peer support group counseling
services to the law enforcement officer.

(b) For purposes of
this section, "peer support group counselor" means a:

(i) Law enforcement
officer, or civilian employee of a law enforcement agency, who has received
training to provide emotional and moral support and counseling to an officer
who needs those services as a result of an incident in which the officer was
involved while acting in his or her official capacity; or

(ii) Nonemployee
counselor who has been designated by the sheriff, police chief, or chief of the
Washington state patrol to provide emotional and moral support and counseling
to an officer who needs those services as a result of an incident in which the
officer was involved while acting in his or her official capacity.

(7) A sexual assault
advocate may not, without the consent of the victim, be examined as to any
communication made by the victim to the sexual assault advocate.

(a) For purposes of
this section, "sexual assault advocate" means the employee or
volunteer from a rape crisis center, victim assistance unit, program, or
association, that provides information, medical or legal advocacy, counseling,
or support to victims of sexual assault, who is designated by the victim to
accompany the victim to the hospital or other health care facility and to
proceedings concerning the alleged assault, including police and prosecution
interviews and court proceedings.

(b) A
sexual assault advocate may disclose a confidential communication without the
consent of the victim if failure to disclose is likely to result in a clear,
imminent risk of serious physical injury or death of the victim or another
person. Any sexual assault advocate participating in good faith in the
disclosing of records and communications under this section shall have immunity
from any liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise, that might result from the
action. In any proceeding, civil or criminal, arising out of a disclosure
under this section, the good faith of the sexual assault advocate who disclosed
the confidential communication shall be presumed.

--- END ---