BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that fluoridation of municipal drinking water is a significant source of
inorganic fluoride entering the waters of the state. This source has raised
concerns about the degradation of the state's water quality and may be a factor
related to the decline and endangerment of the salmonid population, especially
within the state's freshwater.

The legislature
recognizes the actions taken by the government of British Columbia, Canada, in
establishing ambient water quality criteria for fluoride in order to protect
habitat for freshwater and marine aquatic life. The legislature finds that the
lack of a similar Washington state assessment, and associated water quality
standards, may be harmful to the state's aquatic species.

The legislature intends
that the department of ecology use the best science available to review and
assess the risks associated with the discharge of inorganic fluoride into the
waters of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall conduct a study of the effects of inorganic fluoride on the quality of
the waters of the state.

(2) In conducting the
study, the department shall: (a) Include a review of best available scientific
literature regarding the effects of inorganic fluoride in aquatic environments;
(b) include an assessment of the inorganic fluoride levels in the marine and
freshwater, focused on locations near communities that have fluoridation of
their municipal drinking water systems, and locations near known industrial or
commercial discharges of inorganic fluoride; (c) use the best available science
in determining the threshold effects of inorganic fluoride on aquatic life,
with a focus on the effects, in the migratory routes and spawning areas, of
salmonids that have been listed as threatened or endangered by the federal
government; and (d) include the consideration of factors such as low-level
stream flows, variations in water temperature, and the hardness of the waters.

(3) The department
shall include an opportunity for public comment on its draft findings and
recommendations. The opportunity for public comment shall include at least two
public hearings, with one occurring on each side of the crest of the Cascade
mountains. The period for submitting written public comment shall remain open
for at least ninety days.

(4)(a) The department
shall prepare a final report containing its comprehensive findings and
recommendations based upon its assessment.

(b) The final findings
and recommendations shall include a summary of the comments received, an
analysis of the scientific basis of the comments, and, if the comments are not
incorporated into the department's findings or recommendations, the reasons why
the comments were not included.

(c) The department
shall submit its final report to the governor, the salmon recovery office
created under chapter 77.85 RCW, and the legislature by December 15, 2003.

(5) This section
expires December 31, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of
the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---