BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that our current election-financing system:

(1) Gives incumbents an
unhealthy advantage over challengers;

(2) Hinders
communication to voters by many qualified candidates;

(3) Undermines public
confidence in the integrity of public officials;

(4) Drives up the cost
of running for state office, discouraging otherwise qualified candidates who
lack personal wealth or access to special interest funding; and

(5) Requires that
elected officials spend too much of their time raising funds rather than
representing the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. This chapter, to be known
as the Washington clean elections act, establishes an alternative campaign
financing option available to candidates running for state senator and state
representative. The alternative campaign financing program is funded entirely
through voluntary donations made by individuals. The commission shall
administer this chapter and the Washington clean elections account.
Participating candidates must also comply with all other applicable election
and campaign laws and regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Account"
means the Washington clean elections account established under section 6 of
this act.

(2)
"Commission" means the public disclosure commission.

(3) "General
election period" means the period beginning upon certification of the
primary results and ending on the day of the general election.

(4) "General
election spending limit" means the amount of distributions made to the
candidate from the account during the general election period.

(5)
"Nonparticipating candidate" means a candidate who does not become
certified as a participating candidate under this chapter.

(6) "Participating
candidate" means a candidate for state senator or state representative who
becomes certified as a participating candidate under this chapter.

(7) "Primary
election period" means the period from June 15th to the date of the
primary election during an election year.

(8) "Primary
election spending limit" means the amount of distributions made to the
candidate from the account during the primary election period.

(9) "Qualifying
contribution" means a contribution that is:

(a) Made during the
qualifying period by an elector who at the time of the contribution is
registered in the electoral district of the office the candidate is seeking and
who has not given another qualifying contribution to that candidate during the
election cycle;

(b) Made by a person
who is not given anything of value in exchange for the qualifying contribution;

(c) In the sum of five
dollars, exactly;

(d) If made by check or
money order, made payable to the candidate's campaign committee or, if in cash,
deposited in the candidate's campaign account; and

(e) Reported to the
commission in compliance with section 4 of this act.

(10) "Qualifying
period" means the period beginning April 1st and ending May 31st of an
election year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) A candidate who
wishes to be certified as a participating candidate shall submit to the
commission by May 31st of the election year:

(a) An application that
identifies the candidate, the office that the candidate plans to seek, and the
candidate's political party, if any;

(b) A report that
provides the name and other information required by the commission of at least
two hundred persons who have made qualifying contributions pursuant to this
chapter on behalf of the candidate and an amount equal to the qualifying
contributions collected by the candidate to be deposited in the account; and

(c) A statement signed by
the candidate under oath, certifying that:

(i) The candidate has
complied with the restrictions of this chapter during the election cycle to
date;

(ii) The candidate
agrees to comply with the requirements of this chapter during the remainder of
the election cycle and will not accept private campaign contributions other
than qualifying contributions as provided in this chapter; and

(iii) The candidate
agrees that all money received from the account will be used exclusively for
financing his or her primary or general election campaign.

(2) The commission
shall, within two weeks of receipt of the application, certify the candidate as
a participating candidate or notify the candidate that his or her application
has been denied including the reason for denial.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Participating candidates
may not:

(1) Accept any campaign
contributions other than qualifying contributions as specified in this chapter;

(2) Make campaign
expenditures from the candidate's personal funds;

(3) Make campaign
expenditures in the primary election period in excess of the primary election
spending limit; or

(4) Make campaign
expenditures in the general election period in excess of the general election
spending limit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) The Washington clean
elections account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from voluntary contributions from sources listed in subsection (2) of
this section must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account
may be used only for distributions under section 7 of this act. Only the
commission or the commission's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) Voluntary
contributions to the account may be made in the following manner and must be
deposited in the account:

(a) Qualifying
contributions collected by candidates and submitted to the commission under
section 4 of this act;

(b) Contributions made
to the account or the commission for the account;

(c) Contributions made
through a voluntary check off on driver's license application and renewal
forms;

(d) Contributions made
through a voluntary check off on vehicle registration and renewal forms;

(e) Contributions made
through a voluntary check off on state college and university registration
forms;

(f) Contributions made
through a voluntary check off on department of fish and wildlife license and
renewal forms;

(g) Contributions made
through a voluntary check off on department of natural resources license and
renewal forms;

(h) Contributions made
through a voluntary check off on professional license and renewal forms; and

(i) Transfer of surplus
funds under RCW 42.17.095.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) By January 1st of
each election year, the commission shall publish an estimate of revenue in the
account available for distribution to participating candidates during the
upcoming elections.

(2) The commission may
use up to ten percent of the amount in the account for reasonable and necessary
expenses of administration and enforcement. Any portion of the ten percent not
used for this purpose must remain in the account.

(3) The commission may
use up to ten percent of the amount in the account for reasonable and necessary
expenses associated with voter education. Any portion of the ten percent not
used for this purpose must remain in the account.

(4) The account, after
administrative and educational expenses are deducted, shall be divided into two
equal sections, with one-half going toward primary election distribution and
one-half going toward general election distribution.

(a) The primary
election distribution shall be distributed as follows:

(i) The primary
election distribution shall be divided by the number of participating
candidates to determine the pro rata share of each candidate.

(ii) On June 15th, the
commission shall pay from the primary election distribution to the campaign
account of each participating candidate one-half of that candidate's pro rata
share of the primary election distribution.

(iii) At the middle of
the primary election period and no later than August 1st, the commission shall
pay from the primary election distribution to each participating candidate the
remainder of his or her pro rata share of the primary election account.

(b) The general
election distribution shall be distributed as follows:

(i) The general
election distribution shall be divided by the number of participating
candidates who have been certified as winners in the primary election and are
not unopposed in the general election to determine the pro rata share of each
candidate.

(ii) No later than
three business days after the primary results have been certified by the
appropriate government agency, the commission shall distribute one-half of each
eligible participating candidate's pro rata share to the candidate.

(iii) At the middle of
the general election period and no more than thirty days before the date of the
general election, the commission shall distribute the remainder of each
eligible participating candidate's pro rata share to the candidate.

(c) Within thirty days
of the end of the appropriate election period, participating candidates shall
return to the commission any primary election distribution that has not been
expended at the end of the primary election period, and any general election
distribution that has not been expended at the end of the general election
period.

Sec. 8. RCW 42.17.095 and 1995 c
397 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

The surplus funds of a
candidate, or of a political committee supporting or opposing a candidate, may
only be disposed of in any one or more of the following ways:

(1) Return the surplus
to a contributor in an amount not to exceed that contributor's original
contribution;

(2) Transfer the
surplus to the candidate's personal account as reimbursement for lost earnings
incurred as a result of that candidate's election campaign. Such lost earnings
shall be verifiable as unpaid salary or, when the candidate is not salaried, as
an amount not to exceed income received by the candidate for services rendered
during an appropriate, corresponding time period. All lost earnings incurred
shall be documented and a record thereof shall be maintained by the candidate
or the candidate's political committee. The committee shall include a copy of
such record when its expenditure for such reimbursement is reported pursuant to
RCW 42.17.090;

(3) Transfer the
surplus without limit to a political party or to a caucus political committee;

(4) Donate the surplus
to a charitable organization registered in accordance with chapter 19.09 RCW;

(5) Transmit the
surplus to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund; ((or))

(6) Hold the surplus in
the campaign depository or depositories designated in accordance with RCW
42.17.050 for possible use in a future election campaign for the same office
last sought by the candidate and report any such disposition in accordance with
RCW 42.17.090: PROVIDED, That if the candidate subsequently announces or
publicly files for office, information as appropriate is reported to the
commission in accordance with RCW 42.17.040 through 42.17.090. If a subsequent
office is not sought the surplus held shall be disposed of in accordance with
the requirements of this section((.));

(7) Hold the surplus
campaign funds in a separate account for nonreimbursed public office-related
expenses or as provided in this section, and report any such disposition in
accordance with RCW 42.17.090. The separate account required under this
subsection shall not be used for deposits of campaign funds that are not
surplus((.));

(8) No candidate or
authorized committee may transfer funds to any other candidate or other
political committee;

(9) Transfer the
surplus to the Washington clean elections account.

The disposal of surplus
funds under this section shall not be considered a contribution for purposes of
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The commission shall
adopt rules as necessary to implement this chapter and monitor activities under
this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. Sections 1 through 7 and
9 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 42 RCW.

---
END ---