BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes the fiscal impact the proposed nuclear waste treatment and
immobilization plant at Hanford would have on local government operations from
the influx of thousands of temporary workers constructing the plant. The
legislature further recognizes that construction will take place on a federal
reservation that is exempt from property taxation. Therefore, the local
governments would recover no tax revenue to offset these increased costs.

It is the intent of the
legislature to create a special impact mitigation assistance program funded by
ten percent of the state's portion of the sales and use taxes collected on the
construction of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

An amount equal to ten
percent of the state portion of sales and use taxes paid under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW on the construction of a nuclear waste treatment and
immobilization plant shall be deposited into the nuclear waste mitigation
account under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 70.99 RCW to read as follows:

The
nuclear waste mitigation account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. Receipts from section 2 of this act must be deposited into the
account. The department of revenue will annually distribute ten percent of the
state portion of sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
collected on the construction of a nuclear waste treatment facility to the
county or counties where construction takes place. Money received by a county
or counties must be distributed by the county or counties to local governments
using a formula devised by the Hanford communities organization, created
pursuant to interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW. Only the director of
the department of revenue or the director's designee may authorize the annual
distributions from this account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

---
END ---