BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Washington state is
experiencing a critical shortage of qualified, competent health care workers.
To safeguard the health, efficiency, and general well-being of health care
workers and promote patient safety and quality of care, the legislature finds,
as a matter of public policy, that required overtime work should be limited
with reasonable safeguards in order to ensure that the public will continue to
receive safe, quality care.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this section and sections 3 and 4 of this act unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Employee" means a licensed practical nurse or a registered nurse
licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW employed by a health care facility who is
involved in direct patient care activities or clinical services and receives an
hourly wage.

(2)
"Employer" means an individual, partnership, association,
corporation, state institution, political subdivision of the state, or person
or group of persons, acting directly or indirectly in the interest of a health
care facility.

(3) "Health care
facility" means the following facilities, or any part of the facility,
that operates on a twenty-four hours per day, seven days per week basis:
Hospices licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW, rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020, and
psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, and includes such
facilities if owned and operated by a political subdivision or instrumentality
of the state. If a nursing home regulated under chapter 18.51 RCW or a home
health agency regulated under chapter 70.127 RCW is operating under the license
of a health care facility, the nursing home or home health agency is considered
part of the health care facility for the purposes of this subsection.

(4)
"Overtime" means the hours worked in excess of an agreed upon,
predetermined, regularly scheduled shift within a twenty-four hour period not
to exceed twelve hours in a twenty-four hour period or eighty hours in a
consecutive fourteen-day period.

(5) "On-call
time" means time spent by an employee who is not working on the premises
of the place of employment but who is compensated for availability or who, as a
condition of employment, has agreed to be available to return to the premises
of the place of employment on short notice if the need arises.

(6) "Reasonable
efforts" means that the employer, to the extent reasonably possible, does
all of the following but is unable to obtain staffing coverage:

(a) Seeks individuals
to volunteer to work extra time from all available qualified staff who are
working;

(b) Contacts qualified
employees who have made themselves available to work extra time;

(c) Seeks the use of
per diem staff; and

(d) Seeks personnel
from a contracted temporary agency when such staffing is permitted by law or an
applicable collective bargaining agreement, and when the employer regularly
uses a contracted temporary agency.

(7) "Unforeseeable
emergent circumstance" means (a) any unforeseen declared national, state,
or municipal emergency; (b) when a health care facility disaster plan is
activated; or (c) any unforeseen disaster or other catastrophic event which
substantially affects or increases the need for health care services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) No employee of a
health care facility may be required to work overtime. Attempts to compel or
force employees to work overtime are contrary to public policy, and any such
requirement contained in a contract, agreement, or understanding is void.

(2) The acceptance by
any employee of overtime is strictly voluntary, and the refusal of an employee
to accept such overtime work is not grounds for discrimination, dismissal, discharge,
or any other penalty, threat of reports for discipline, or employment decision
adverse to the employee.

(3) This section does
not apply to overtime work that occurs:

(a) Because of any
unforeseeable emergent circumstance;

(b) Because of prescheduled
on‑call time;

(c) When the employer
documents that the employer has used reasonable efforts to obtain staffing. An
employer has not used reasonable efforts if overtime work is used to fill
vacancies resulting from chronic staff shortages; or

(d) When an employee is
required to work overtime to complete a patient care procedure already in
progress where the absence of the employee could have an adverse effect on the
patient.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The department of labor
and industries shall investigate complaints of violations of section 3 of this
act. A violation of section 3 of this act is a class 1 civil infraction in
accordance with chapter 7.80 RCW, except that the maximum penalty is one
thousand dollars for each infraction up to three infractions. If there are
four or more violations of section 3 of this act for a health care facility,
the employer is subject to a fine of two thousand five hundred dollars for the
fourth violation, and five thousand dollars for each subsequent violation. The
department of labor and industries is authorized to issue and enforce civil
infractions according to chapter 7.80 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 2 through 4 of
this act are each added to chapter 49.28 RCW.

---
END ---