BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.46.020 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Accrual
method of accounting" means a method of accounting in which revenues are
reported in the period when they are earned, regardless of when they are
collected, and expenses are reported in the period in which they are incurred,
regardless of when they are paid.

(2)
"Appraisal" means the process of estimating the fair market value or
reconstructing the historical cost of an asset acquired in a past period as
performed by a professionally designated real estate appraiser with no
pecuniary interest in the property to be appraised. It includes a systematic,
analytic determination and the recording and analyzing of property facts,
rights, investments, and values based on a personal inspection and inventory of
the property.

(3) "Arm's-length
transaction" means a transaction resulting from good-faith bargaining between
a buyer and seller who are not related organizations and have adverse positions
in the market place. Sales or exchanges of nursing home facilities among two
or more parties in which all parties subsequently continue to own one or more
of the facilities involved in the transactions shall not be considered as
arm's-length transactions for purposes of this chapter. Sale of a nursing home
facility which is subsequently leased back to the seller within five years of
the date of sale shall not be considered as an arm's-length transaction for
purposes of this chapter.

(4) "Assets"
means economic resources of the contractor, recognized and measured in
conformity with generally accepted accounting principles.

(5) "Audit"
or "department audit" means an examination of the records of a
nursing facility participating in the medicaid payment system, including but
not limited to: The contractor's financial and statistical records, cost
reports and all supporting documentation and schedules, receivables, and resident
trust funds, to be performed as deemed necessary by the department and
according to department rule.

(6) "Bad
debts" means amounts considered to be uncollectible from accounts and
notes receivable.

(7) "Beneficial
owner" means:

(a) Any person who, directly
or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, understanding, relationship,
or otherwise has or shares:

(i) Voting power which
includes the power to vote, or to direct the voting of such ownership interest;
and/or

(ii) Investment power
which includes the power to dispose, or to direct the disposition of such
ownership interest;

(b) Any person who,
directly or indirectly, creates or uses a trust, proxy, power of attorney,
pooling arrangement, or any other contract, arrangement, or device with the
purpose or effect of divesting himself or herself of beneficial ownership of an
ownership interest or preventing the vesting of such beneficial ownership as
part of a plan or scheme to evade the reporting requirements of this chapter;

(c) Any person who,
subject to (b) of this subsection, has the right to acquire beneficial
ownership of such ownership interest within sixty days, including but not
limited to any right to acquire:

(i) Through the
exercise of any option, warrant, or right;

(ii) Through the
conversion of an ownership interest;

(iii) Pursuant to the
power to revoke a trust, discretionary account, or similar arrangement; or

(iv) Pursuant to the
automatic termination of a trust, discretionary account, or similar
arrangement;

except that, any person who
acquires an ownership interest or power specified in (c)(i), (ii), or (iii) of
this subsection with the purpose or effect of changing or influencing the
control of the contractor, or in connection with or as a participant in any
transaction having such purpose or effect, immediately upon such acquisition
shall be deemed to be the beneficial owner of the ownership interest which may
be acquired through the exercise or conversion of such ownership interest or
power;

(d) Any person who in
the ordinary course of business is a pledgee of ownership interest under a
written pledge agreement shall not be deemed to be the beneficial owner of such
pledged ownership interest until the pledgee has taken all formal steps
necessary which are required to declare a default and determines that the power
to vote or to direct the vote or to dispose or to direct the disposition of
such pledged ownership interest will be exercised; except that:

(i) The pledgee
agreement is bona fide and was not entered into with the purpose nor with the
effect of changing or influencing the control of the contractor, nor in
connection with any transaction having such purpose or effect, including
persons meeting the conditions set forth in (b) of this subsection; and

(ii) The pledgee
agreement, prior to default, does not grant to the pledgee:

(A) The power to vote
or to direct the vote of the pledged ownership interest; or

(B) The power to
dispose or direct the disposition of the pledged ownership interest, other than
the grant of such power(s) pursuant to a pledge agreement under which credit is
extended and in which the pledgee is a broker or dealer.

(8)
"Capitalization" means the recording of an expenditure as an asset.

(9) "Case
mix" means a measure of the intensity of care and services needed by the
residents of a nursing facility or a group of residents in the facility.

(10) "Case mix
index" means a number representing the average case mix of a nursing
facility.

(11) "Case mix
weight" means a numeric score that identifies the relative resources used
by a particular group of a nursing facility's residents.

(12) "Certificate
of capital authorization" means a certification from the department for an
allocation from the biennial capital financing authorization for all new or
replacement building construction, or for major renovation projects, receiving
a certificate of need or a certificate of need exemption under chapter 70.38
RCW after July 1, 2001.

(13)
"Contractor" means a person or entity licensed under chapter 18.51
RCW to operate a medicare and medicaid certified nursing facility, responsible
for operational decisions, and contracting with the department to provide
services to medicaid recipients residing in the facility.

(14) "Default
case" means no initial assessment has been completed for a resident and
transmitted to the department by the cut‑off date, or an assessment is
otherwise past due for the resident, under state and federal requirements.

(15)
"Department" means the department of social and health services
(DSHS) and its employees.

(16)
"Depreciation" means the systematic distribution of the cost or other
basis of tangible assets, less salvage, over the estimated useful life of the
assets.

(17) "Direct
care" means nursing care and related care provided to nursing facility
residents. Therapy care shall not be considered part of direct care.

(18) "Direct care
supplies" means medical, pharmaceutical, and other supplies required for
the direct care of a nursing facility's residents.

(19) "Entity"
means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or
any other association of individuals capable of entering enforceable contracts.

(20) "Equity"
means the net book value of all tangible and intangible assets less the
recorded value of all liabilities, as recognized and measured in conformity
with generally accepted accounting principles.

(21) (("Essential
community provider" means a facility which is the only nursing facility
within a commuting distance radius of at least forty minutes duration,
traveling by automobile.

(22))) "Facility" or "nursing
facility" means a nursing home licensed in accordance with chapter 18.51
RCW, excepting nursing homes certified as institutions for mental diseases, or
that portion of a multiservice facility licensed as a nursing home, or that
portion of a hospital licensed in accordance with chapter 70.41 RCW which
operates as a nursing home.

(((23))) (22)
"Fair market value" means the replacement cost of an asset less
observed physical depreciation on the date for which the market value is being
determined.

(((24))) (23)
"Financial statements" means statements prepared and presented in
conformity with generally accepted accounting principles including, but not
limited to, balance sheet, statement of operations, statement of changes in
financial position, and related notes.

(((25))) (24)
"Generally accepted accounting principles" means accounting
principles approved by the financial accounting standards board (FASB).

(((26))) (25)
"Goodwill" means the excess of the price paid for a nursing facility
business over the fair market value of all net identifiable tangible and
intangible assets acquired, as measured in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles.

(((27))) (26)
"Grouper" means a computer software product that groups individual
nursing facility residents into case mix classification groups based on
specific resident assessment data and computer logic.

(((28))) (27)
"High labor-cost county" means an urban county in which the median
allowable facility cost per case mix unit is more than ten percent higher than
the median allowable facility cost per case mix unit among all other urban
counties, excluding that county.

(((29))) (28)
"Historical cost" means the actual cost incurred in acquiring and
preparing an asset for use, including feasibility studies, architect's fees,
and engineering studies.

(((30))) (29)
"Home and central office costs" means costs that are incurred in the
support and operation of a home and central office. Home and central office
costs include centralized services that are performed in support of a nursing
facility. The department may exclude from this definition costs that are
nonduplicative, documented, ordinary, necessary, and related to the provision
of care services to authorized patients.

(((31))) (30)
"Imprest fund" means a fund which is regularly replenished in exactly
the amount expended from it.

(((32))) (31)
"Joint facility costs" means any costs which represent resources
which benefit more than one facility, or one facility and any other entity.

(((33))) (32)
"Lease agreement" means a contract between two parties for the
possession and use of real or personal property or assets for a specified
period of time in exchange for specified periodic payments. Elimination (due
to any cause other than death or divorce) or addition of any party to the
contract, expiration, or modification of any lease term in effect on January 1,
1980, or termination of the lease by either party by any means shall constitute
a termination of the lease agreement. An extension or renewal of a lease
agreement, whether or not pursuant to a renewal provision in the lease
agreement, shall be considered a new lease agreement. A strictly formal change
in the lease agreement which modifies the method, frequency, or manner in which
the lease payments are made, but does not increase the total lease payment
obligation of the lessee, shall not be considered modification of a lease term.

(((34))) (33)
"Medical care program" or "medicaid program" means medical
assistance, including nursing care, provided under RCW 74.09.500 or authorized
state medical care services.

(((35))) (34)
"Medical care recipient," "medicaid recipient," or
"recipient" means an individual determined eligible by the department
for the services provided under chapter 74.09 RCW.

(((36))) (35)
"Minimum data set" means the overall data component of the resident
assessment instrument, indicating the strengths, needs, and preferences of an
individual nursing facility resident.

(((37))) (36)
"Net book value" means the historical cost of an asset less
accumulated depreciation.

(((38))) (37)
"Net invested funds" means the net book value of tangible fixed
assets employed by a contractor to provide services under the medical care
program, including land, buildings, and equipment as recognized and measured in
conformity with generally accepted accounting principles.

(((39))) (38)
"Nonurban county" means a county which is not located in a
metropolitan statistical area as determined and defined by the United States
office of management and budget or other appropriate agency or office of the
federal government.

(((40))) (39)
"Operating lease" means a lease under which rental or lease expenses
are included in current expenses in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles.

(((41))) (40)
"Owner" means a sole proprietor, general or limited partners, members
of a limited liability company, and beneficial interest holders of five percent
or more of a corporation's outstanding stock.

(((42))) (41)
"Ownership interest" means all interests beneficially owned by a
person, calculated in the aggregate, regardless of the form which such
beneficial ownership takes.

(((43))) (42)
"Patient day" or "resident day" means a calendar day of
care provided to a nursing facility resident, regardless of payment source,
which will include the day of admission and exclude the day of discharge; except
that, when admission and discharge occur on the same day, one day of care shall
be deemed to exist. A "medicaid day" or "recipient day"
means a calendar day of care provided to a medicaid recipient determined
eligible by the department for services provided under chapter 74.09 RCW,
subject to the same conditions regarding admission and discharge applicable to
a patient day or resident day of care.

(((44))) (43)
"Professionally designated real estate appraiser" means an individual
who is regularly engaged in the business of providing real estate valuation
services for a fee, and who is deemed qualified by a nationally recognized real
estate appraisal educational organization on the basis of extensive practical
appraisal experience, including the writing of real estate valuation reports as
well as the passing of written examinations on valuation practice and theory,
and who by virtue of membership in such organization is required to subscribe
and adhere to certain standards of professional practice as such organization
prescribes.

(((45))) (44)
"Qualified therapist" means:

(a) A mental health
professional as defined by chapter 71.05 RCW;

(b) A mental
retardation professional who is a therapist approved by the department who has
had specialized training or one year's experience in treating or working with
the mentally retarded or developmentally disabled;

(c) A speech
pathologist who is eligible for a certificate of clinical competence in speech
pathology or who has the equivalent education and clinical experience;

(d) A physical
therapist as defined by chapter 18.74 RCW;

(e) An occupational
therapist who is a graduate of a program in occupational therapy, or who has
the equivalent of such education or training; and

(f) A respiratory care
practitioner certified under chapter 18.89 RCW.

(((46))) (45)
"Rate" or "rate allocation" means the medicaid
per-patient-day payment amount for medicaid patients calculated in accordance
with the allocation methodology set forth in part E of this chapter.

(((47))) (46)
"Real property," whether leased or owned by the contractor, means the
building, allowable land, land improvements, and building improvements
associated with a nursing facility.

(((48))) (47)
"Rebased rate" or "cost-rebased rate" means a
facility-specific component rate assigned to a nursing facility for a
particular rate period established on desk-reviewed, adjusted costs reported
for that facility covering at least six months of a prior calendar year
designated as a year to be used for cost-rebasing payment rate allocations
under the provisions of this chapter.

(((49))) (48)
"Records" means those data supporting all financial statements and
cost reports including, but not limited to, all general and subsidiary ledgers,
books of original entry, and transaction documentation, however such data are
maintained.

(((50))) (49)
"Related organization" means an entity which is under common
ownership and/or control with, or has control of, or is controlled by, the
contractor.

(a) "Common
ownership" exists when an entity is the beneficial owner of five percent
or more ownership interest in the contractor and any other entity.

(b) "Control"
exists where an entity has the power, directly or indirectly, significantly to
influence or direct the actions or policies of an organization or institution,
whether or not it is legally enforceable and however it is exercisable or
exercised.

(((51))) (50)
"Related care" means only those services that are directly related to
providing direct care to nursing facility residents. These services include,
but are not limited to, nursing direction and supervision, medical direction,
medical records, pharmacy services, activities, and social services.

(((52))) (51)
"Resident assessment instrument," including federally approved
modifications for use in this state, means a federally mandated, comprehensive
nursing facility resident care planning and assessment tool, consisting of the
minimum data set and resident assessment protocols.

(((53))) (52)
"Resident assessment protocols" means those components of the
resident assessment instrument that use the minimum data set to trigger or flag
a resident's potential problems and risk areas.

(((54))) (53)
"Resource utilization groups" means a case mix classification system
that identifies relative resources needed to care for an individual nursing
facility resident.

(((55))) (54)
"Restricted fund" means those funds the principal and/or income of
which is limited by agreement with or direction of the donor to a specific
purpose.

(((56))) (55)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services.

(((57))) (56)
"Support services" means food, food preparation, dietary,
housekeeping, and laundry services provided to nursing facility residents.

(((58))) (57)
"Therapy care" means those services required by a nursing facility
resident's comprehensive assessment and plan of care, that are provided by
qualified therapists, or support personnel under their supervision, including
related costs as designated by the department.

(((59))) (58)
"Title XIX" or "medicaid" means the 1965 amendments to the
social security act, P.L. 89‑07, as amended and the medicaid program
administered by the department.

(((60))) (59)
"Urban county" means a county which is located in a metropolitan
statistical area as determined and defined by the United States office of
management and budget or other appropriate agency or office of the federal
government.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.46.410 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Costs will be
unallowable if they are not documented, necessary, ordinary, and related to the
provision of care services to authorized patients.

(2) Unallowable costs
include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Costs of items or
services not covered by the medical care program. Costs of such items or
services will be unallowable even if they are indirectly reimbursed by the
department as the result of an authorized reduction in patient contribution;

(b) Costs of services
and items provided to recipients which are covered by the department's medical
care program but not included in the medicaid per-resident day payment rate
established by the department under this chapter;

(c) Costs associated
with a capital expenditure subject to section 1122 approval (part 100, Title 42
C.F.R.) if the department found it was not consistent with applicable
standards, criteria, or plans. If the department was not given timely notice
of a proposed capital expenditure, all associated costs will be unallowable up
to the date they are determined to be reimbursable under applicable federal
regulations;

(d) Costs associated
with a construction or acquisition project requiring certificate of need
approval, or exemption from the requirements for certificate of need for the
replacement of existing nursing home beds, pursuant to chapter 70.38 RCW if
such approval or exemption was not obtained;

(e) Interest costs
other than those provided by RCW 74.46.290 on and after January 1, 1985;

(f) Salaries or other
compensation of owners, officers, directors, stockholders, partners,
principals, participants, and others associated with the contractor or its home
office, including all board of directors' fees for any purpose, except
reasonable compensation paid for service related to patient care;

(g) Costs in excess of
limits or in violation of principles set forth in this chapter;

(h) Costs resulting
from transactions or the application of accounting methods which circumvent the
principles of the payment system set forth in this chapter;

(i) Costs applicable to
services, facilities, and supplies furnished by a related organization in
excess of the lower of the cost to the related organization or the price of
comparable services, facilities, or supplies purchased elsewhere;

(j) Bad debts of
non-Title XIX recipients. Bad debts of Title XIX recipients are allowable if
the debt is related to covered services, it arises from the recipient's
required contribution toward the cost of care, the provider can establish that
reasonable collection efforts were made, the debt was actually uncollectible
when claimed as worthless, and sound business judgment established that there
was no likelihood of recovery at any time in the future;

(k) Charity and
courtesy allowances;

(l) Cash, assessments,
or other contributions, excluding dues, to charitable organizations,
professional organizations, trade associations, or political parties, and costs
incurred to improve community or public relations;

(m) Vending machine
expenses;

(n) Expenses for barber
or beautician services not included in routine care;

(o) Funeral and burial
expenses;

(p) Costs of gift shop
operations and inventory;

(q) Personal items such
as cosmetics, smoking materials, newspapers and magazines, and clothing, except
those used in patient activity programs;

(r) Fund-raising
expenses, except those directly related to the patient activity program;

(s) Penalties and
fines;

(t) Expenses related to
telephones, radios, and similar appliances in patients' private accommodations;

(u) Televisions
acquired prior to July 1, 2001;

(v) Federal, state, and
other income taxes;

(w) Costs of special
care services except where authorized by the department;

(x) Expenses of an
employee benefit not in fact made available to all employees on an equal or
fair basis, for example, key-man insurance and other insurance or retirement
plans;

(y) Expenses of
profit-sharing plans;

(z) Expenses related to
the purchase and/or use of private or commercial airplanes which are in excess
of what a prudent contractor would expend for the ordinary and economic
provision of such a transportation need related to patient care;

(aa) Personal expenses
and allowances of owners or relatives;

(bb) All expenses of
maintaining professional licenses or membership in professional organizations;

(cc) Costs related to
agreements not to compete;

(dd) Amortization of
goodwill, lease acquisition, or any other intangible asset, whether related to
resident care or not, and whether recognized under generally accepted
accounting principles or not;

(ee) Expenses related
to vehicles which are in excess of what a prudent contractor would expend for
the ordinary and economic provision of transportation needs related to patient
care;

(ff) Legal and
consultant fees in connection with a fair hearing against the department where
a decision is rendered in favor of the department or where otherwise the
determination of the department stands;

(gg) Legal and
consultant fees of a contractor or contractors in connection with a lawsuit
against the department;

(hh) Lease acquisition
costs, goodwill, the cost of bed rights, or any other intangible assets;

(ii) ((All rental or
lease costs other than those provided in RCW 74.46.300 on and after January 1,
1985;

(jj))) Postsurvey charges incurred by the facility as
a result of subsequent inspections under RCW 18.51.050 which occur beyond the
first postsurvey visit during the certification survey calendar year;

(((kk))) (jj)
Compensation paid for any purchased nursing care services, including registered
nurse, licensed practical nurse, and nurse assistant services, obtained through
service contract arrangement in excess of the amount of compensation paid for
such hours of nursing care service had they been paid at the average hourly
wage, including related taxes and benefits, for in-house nursing care staff of
like classification at the same nursing facility, as reported in the most
recent cost report period;

(((ll))) (kk)
For all partial or whole rate periods after July 17, 1984, costs of land and
depreciable assets that cannot be reimbursed under the Deficit Reduction Act of
1984 and implementing state statutory and regulatory provisions;

(((mm))) (ll)
Costs reported by the contractor for a prior period to the extent such costs,
due to statutory exemption, will not be incurred by the contractor in the
period to be covered by the rate;

(((nn))) (mm)
Costs of outside activities, for example, costs allocated to the use of a
vehicle for personal purposes or related to the part of a facility leased out
for office space;

(((oo))) (nn)
Travel expenses outside the states of Idaho, Oregon, and Washington and the
province of British Columbia. However, travel to or from the home or central
office of a chain organization operating a nursing facility is allowed whether
inside or outside these areas if the travel is necessary, ordinary, and related
to resident care;

(((pp))) (oo)
Moving expenses of employees in the absence of demonstrated, good-faith effort
to recruit within the states of Idaho, Oregon, and Washington, and the province
of British Columbia;

(((qq))) (pp)
Depreciation in excess of four thousand dollars per year for each passenger car
or other vehicle primarily used by the administrator, facility staff, or
central office staff;

(((rr))) (qq)
Costs for temporary health care personnel from a nursing pool not registered
with the secretary of the department of health;

(((ss))) (rr)
Payroll taxes associated with compensation in excess of allowable compensation
of owners, relatives, and administrative personnel;

(((tt))) (ss)
Costs and fees associated with filing a petition for bankruptcy;

(((uu))) (tt)
All advertising or promotional costs, except reasonable costs of help wanted
advertising;

(((vv))) (uu)
Outside consultation expenses required to meet department-required minimum data
set completion proficiency;

(((ww))) (vv)
Interest charges assessed by any department or agency of this state for failure
to make a timely refund of overpayments and interest expenses incurred for
loans obtained to make the refunds;

(((xx))) (ww)
All home office or central office costs, whether on or off the nursing facility
premises, and whether allocated or not to specific services, in excess of the
median of those adjusted costs for all facilities reporting such costs for the
most recent report period; and

(((yy))) (xx)
Tax expenses that a nursing facility has never incurred.

Sec. 3. RCW 74.46.431 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Effective July 1,
1999, nursing facility medicaid payment rate allocations shall be
facility-specific and shall have seven components: Direct care, therapy care,
support services, operations, property, financing allowance, and variable
return. The department shall establish and adjust each of these components, as
provided in this section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid
nursing facility in this state.

(2) All component rate
allocations ((for essential community providers as defined in this chapter))
shall be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of
licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use. ((For all
facilities other than essential community providers, effective July 1, 2001,
component rate allocations in direct care, therapy care, support services,
variable return, operations, property, and financing allowance shall continue
to be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of
licensed beds. For all facilities other than essential community providers,
effective July 1, 2002, the component rate allocations in operations, property,
and financing allowance shall be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of
ninety percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in
use.))

(3) Information and
data sources used in determining medicaid payment rate allocations, including
formulas, procedures, cost report periods, resident assessment instrument
formats, resident assessment methodologies, and resident classification and
case mix weighting methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to
time as determined by the department.

(4)(a) Direct care
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 will be used
for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, direct care component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001,
through June 30, 2004, direct care component rate allocations.

(b) Direct care
component rate allocations based on 1996 cost report data shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in
the biennial appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial appropriations act
for facilities whose direct care component rate is set equal to their adjusted
June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW 74.46.506(5)(i).

(c) Direct care
component rate allocations based on 1999 cost report data shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in
the biennial appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial appropriations act
for facilities whose direct care component rate is set equal to their adjusted
June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW 74.46.506(5)(i).

(5)(a) Therapy care
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 will be used
for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, therapy care component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001,
through June 30, 2004, therapy care component rate allocations.

(b) Therapy care
component rate allocations shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act.

(6)(a) Support services
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be
used for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services component
rate allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1,
2001, through June 30, 2004, support services component rate allocations.

(b) Support services
component rate allocations shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act.

(7)(a) Operations
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be
used for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, operations component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1,
2001, through June 30, 2004, operations component rate allocations.

(b) Operations
component rate allocations shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act.

(8) For July 1, 1998,
through September 30, 1998, a facility's property and return on investment
component rates shall be the facility's June 30, 1998, property and return on
investment component rates, without increase. For October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 1999, a facility's property and return on investment component rates
shall be rebased utilizing 1997 adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months of data.

(9) Total payment rates
under the nursing facility medicaid payment system shall not exceed facility
rates charged to the general public for comparable services.

(10) Medicaid
contractors shall pay to all facility staff a minimum wage of the greater of
the state minimum wage or the federal minimum wage.

(11) The department
shall establish in rule procedures, principles, and conditions for determining
component rate allocations for facilities in circumstances not directly
addressed by this chapter, including but not limited to: The need to prorate
inflation for partial-period cost report data, newly constructed facilities,
existing facilities entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a
period of absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded new bed
capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of ownership of the
nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or converting beds back into
service, facilities temporarily reducing the number of set-up beds during a
remodel, facilities having less than six months of either resident assessment,
cost report data, or both, under the current contractor prior to rate setting,
and other circumstances.

(12) The department
shall establish in rule procedures, principles, and conditions, including
necessary threshold costs, for adjusting rates to reflect capital improvements
or new requirements imposed by the department or the federal government. Any
such rate adjustments are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.

(13) ((Effective
July 1, 2001, medicaid rates shall continue to be revised downward in all
components, in accordance with department rules, for facilities converting
banked beds to active service under chapter 70.38 RCW, by using the facility's
increased licensed bed capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate
setting. However, for facilities other than essential community providers
which bank beds under chapter 70.38 RCW, after May 25, 2001, medicaid rates
shall be revised upward, in accordance with department rules, in direct care,
therapy care, support services, and variable return components only, by using
the facility's decreased licensed bed capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy
for rate setting, but no upward revision shall be made to operations, property,
or financing allowance component rates.

(14))) Facilities obtaining a certificate of need or
a certificate of need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW after June 30, 2001,
must have a certificate of capital authorization in order for (a) the
depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be included in
calculation of the facility's property component rate allocation; and (b) the
net invested funds associated with the capitalized addition to be included in
calculation of the facility's financing allowance rate allocation.

Sec. 4. RCW 74.46.433 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall establish for each medicaid nursing facility a variable return component
rate allocation. In determining the variable return allowance:

(a) The variable return
array and percentage shall be assigned whenever rebasing of noncapital rate
allocations is scheduled under RCW ((46.46.431 [74.46.431])) 74.46.431
(4), (5), (6), and (7).

(b) To calculate the
array of facilities for the July 1, 2001, rate setting, the department, without
using peer groups, shall first rank all facilities in numerical order from
highest to lowest according to each facility's examined and documented, but
unlidded, combined direct care, therapy care, support services, and operations
per resident day cost from the 1999 cost report period. However, before being
combined with other per resident day costs and ranked, a facility's direct care
cost per resident day shall be adjusted to reflect its facility average case
mix index, to be averaged from the four calendar quarters of 1999, weighted by
the facility's resident days from each quarter, under RCW 74.46.501(7)(b)(ii).
The array shall then be divided into four quartiles, each containing, as nearly
as possible, an equal number of facilities, and four percent shall be assigned
to facilities in the lowest quartile, three percent to facilities in the next
lowest quartile, two percent to facilities in the next highest quartile, and
one percent to facilities in the highest quartile.

(c) The department
shall((, subject to (d) of this subsection,)) compute the variable
return allowance by multiplying a facility's assigned percentage by the sum of
the facility's direct care, therapy care, support services, and operations
component rates determined in accordance with this chapter and rules adopted by
the department.

(((d) Effective July
1, 2001, if a facility's examined and documented direct care cost per resident
day for the preceding report year is lower than its average direct care
component rate weighted by medicaid resident days for the same year, the
facility's direct care cost shall be substituted for its July 1, 2001, direct
care component rate, and its variable return component rate shall be determined
or adjusted each July 1st by multiplying the facility's assigned percentage by
the sum of the facility's July 1, 2001, therapy care, support services, and
operations component rates, and its direct care cost per resident day for the
preceding year.))

(2) The variable return
rate allocation calculated in accordance with this section shall be adjusted to
the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 5. RCW 74.46.435 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Effective July
1, 2001,)) The property component rate allocation for each facility
shall be determined by dividing the sum of the reported allowable prior period
actual depreciation, subject to RCW 74.46.310 through 74.46.380, adjusted for
any capitalized additions or replacements approved by the department, and the
retained savings from such cost center, by the greater of a facility's total
resident days for the facility in the prior period or resident days as
calculated on eighty-five percent facility occupancy. ((Effective July 1,
2002, the property component rate allocation for all facilities, except
essential community providers, shall be set by using the greater of a
facility's total resident days from the most recent cost report period or
resident days calculated at ninety percent facility occupancy.)) If a
capitalized addition or retirement of an asset will result in a different
licensed bed capacity during the ensuing period, the prior period total
resident days used in computing the property component rate shall be adjusted
to anticipated resident day level.

(2) A nursing
facility's property component rate allocation shall be rebased annually,
effective July 1st, in accordance with this section and this chapter.

(3) When a certificate
of need for a new facility is requested, the department, in reaching its
decision, shall take into consideration per-bed land and building construction
costs for the facility which shall not exceed a maximum to be established by
the secretary.

(4) ((Effective July
1, 2001,)) For the purpose of calculating a nursing facility's
property component rate, if a contractor ((has elected)) elects
to bank licensed beds prior to April 1, 2001, or elects to convert banked beds
to active service at any time, under chapter 70.38 RCW, the department shall
use the facility's ((new licensed bed capacity to recalculate minimum
occupancy for rate setting and revise the property component rate, as needed,
effective as of the date the beds are banked or converted to active service))
anticipated resident occupancy level subsequent to the decrease or increase in
licensed bed capacity. However, in no case shall the department use less
than eighty-five percent occupancy of the facility's licensed bed capacity
after banking or conversion. ((Effective July 1, 2002, in no case, other
than essential community providers, shall the department use less than ninety
percent occupancy of the facility's licensed bed capacity after conversion.))

(5) The property
component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section shall be
adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 6. RCW 74.46.437 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1,
1999, the department shall establish for each medicaid nursing facility a
financing allowance component rate allocation. The financing allowance
component rate shall be rebased annually, effective July 1st, in accordance
with the provisions of this section and this chapter.

(2) ((Effective July
1, 2001,)) The financing allowance shall be determined by
multiplying the net invested funds of each facility by .10, and dividing by the
greater of a nursing facility's total resident days from the most recent cost
report period or resident days calculated on eighty-five percent facility
occupancy. ((Effective July 1, 2002, the financing allowance component rate
allocation for all facilities, other than essential community providers, shall
be set by using the greater of a facility's total resident days from the most
recent cost report period or resident days calculated at ninety percent
facility occupancy.)) However, assets acquired on or after May 17, 1999,
shall be grouped in a separate financing allowance calculation that shall be
multiplied by .085. The financing allowance factor of .085 shall not be
applied to the net invested funds pertaining to new construction or major
renovations receiving certificate of need approval or an exemption from
certificate of need requirements under chapter 70.38 RCW, or to working
drawings that have been submitted to the department of health for construction
review approval, prior to May 17, 1999. If a capitalized addition, renovation,
replacement, or retirement of an asset will result in a different licensed bed
capacity during the ensuing period, the prior period total resident days used
in computing the financing allowance shall be adjusted to the greater of the
anticipated resident day level or eighty-five percent of the new licensed bed
capacity. ((Effective July 1, 2002, for all facilities, other than essential
community providers, the total resident days used to compute the financing
allowance after a capitalized addition, renovation, replacement, or retirement
of an asset shall be set by using the greater of a facility's total resident
days from the most recent cost report period or resident days calculated at
ninety percent facility occupancy.))

(3) In computing the
portion of net invested funds representing the net book value of tangible fixed
assets, the same assets, depreciation bases, lives, and methods referred to in
RCW 74.46.330, 74.46.350, 74.46.360, 74.46.370, and 74.46.380, including owned
and leased assets, shall be utilized, except that the capitalized cost of land
upon which the facility is located and such other contiguous land which is reasonable
and necessary for use in the regular course of providing resident care shall
also be included. Subject to provisions and limitations contained in this
chapter, for land purchased by owners or lessors before July 18, 1984,
capitalized cost of land shall be the buyer's capitalized cost. For all
partial or whole rate periods after July 17, 1984, if the land is purchased
after July 17, 1984, capitalized cost shall be that of the owner of record on
July 17, 1984, or buyer's capitalized cost, whichever is lower. In the case of
leased facilities where the net invested funds are unknown or the contractor is
unable to provide necessary information to determine net invested funds, the
secretary shall have the authority to determine an amount for net invested
funds based on an appraisal conducted according to RCW 74.46.360(1).

(4) ((Effective July
1, 2001,)) For the purpose of calculating a nursing facility's
financing allowance component rate, if a contractor ((has elected)) elects
to bank licensed beds ((prior to May 25, 2001,)) or elects to convert
banked beds to active service ((at any time)), under chapter 70.38 RCW,
the department shall use the facility's ((new licensed bed capacity to
recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting and revise the financing
allowance component rate, as needed, effective as of the date the beds are
banked or converted to active service)) anticipated resident occupancy
level subsequent to the decrease or increase in licensed bed capacity.
However, in no case shall the department use less than eighty-five percent
occupancy of the facility's licensed bed capacity after banking or conversion.
((Effective July 1, 2002, in no case, other than for essential community
providers, shall the department use less than ninety percent occupancy of the
facility's licensed bed capacity after conversion.))

(5) The financing
allowance rate allocation calculated in accordance with this section shall be
adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 7. RCW 74.46.506 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The direct care
component rate allocation corresponds to the provision of nursing care for one
resident of a nursing facility for one day, including direct care supplies.
Therapy services and supplies, which correspond to the therapy care component
rate, shall be excluded. The direct care component rate includes elements of
case mix determined consistent with the principles of this section and other
applicable provisions of this chapter.

(2) Beginning October
1, 1998, the department shall determine and update quarterly for each nursing
facility serving medicaid residents a facility-specific per-resident day direct
care component rate allocation, to be effective on the first day of each
calendar quarter. In determining direct care component rates the department
shall utilize, as specified in this section, minimum data set resident
assessment data for each resident of the facility, as transmitted to, and if
necessary corrected by, the department in the resident assessment instrument
format approved by federal authorities for use in this state.

(3) The department may
question the accuracy of assessment data for any resident and utilize corrected
or substitute information, however derived, in determining direct care
component rates. The department is authorized to impose civil fines and to
take adverse rate actions against a contractor, as specified by the department
in rule, in order to obtain compliance with resident assessment and data
transmission requirements and to ensure accuracy.

(4) Cost report data
used in setting direct care component rate allocations shall be 1996 and 1999,
for rate periods as specified in RCW 74.46.431(4)(a).

(5) Beginning October
1, 1998, the department shall rebase each nursing facility's direct care
component rate allocation as described in RCW 74.46.431, adjust its direct care
component rate allocation for economic trends and conditions as described in
RCW 74.46.431, and update its medicaid average case mix index, consistent with
the following:

(a) Reduce total direct
care costs reported by each nursing facility for the applicable cost report
period specified in RCW 74.46.431(4)(a) to reflect any department adjustments,
and to eliminate reported resident therapy costs and adjustments, in order to
derive the facility's total allowable direct care cost;

(b) Divide each
facility's total allowable direct care cost by its adjusted resident days for
the same report period, increased if necessary to a minimum occupancy of
eighty-five percent; that is, the greater of actual or imputed occupancy at
eighty-five percent of licensed beds, to derive the facility's allowable direct
care cost per resident day;

(c) Adjust the
facility's per resident day direct care cost by the applicable factor specified
in RCW 74.46.431(4) (b) and (c) to derive its adjusted allowable direct care
cost per resident day;

(d) Divide each
facility's adjusted allowable direct care cost per resident day by the facility
average case mix index for the applicable quarters specified by RCW
74.46.501(7)(b) to derive the facility's allowable direct care cost per case
mix unit;

(e) Effective for July
1, 2001, rate setting, divide nursing facilities into at least two and, if
applicable, three peer groups: Those located in nonurban counties; those
located in high labor-cost counties, if any; and those located in other urban
counties;

(f) Array separately
the allowable direct care cost per case mix unit for all facilities in nonurban
counties; for all facilities in high labor-cost counties, if applicable; and
for all facilities in other urban counties, including the high labor-cost
counties, and determine the median allowable direct care cost per case mix
unit for each peer group;

(g) Except as provided
in (i) of this subsection, from October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2000,
determine each facility's quarterly direct care component rate as follows:

(i) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is less than eighty-five percent of the
facility's peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be
assigned a cost per case mix unit equal to eighty-five percent of the
facility's peer group median, and shall have a direct care component rate
allocation equal to the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied
by that facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

(ii) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is greater than one hundred fifteen percent of
the peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be
assigned a cost per case mix unit equal to one hundred fifteen percent of the
peer group median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal
to the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's
medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);

(iii) Any facility
whose allowable cost per case mix unit is between eighty-five and one hundred
fifteen percent of the peer group median established under (f) of this
subsection shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's allowable cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's
medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);

(h) Except as provided
in (i) of this subsection, from July 1, 2000, forward, and for all future rate
setting, determine each facility's quarterly direct care component rate as
follows:

(i) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is less than ninety percent of the facility's
peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a
cost per case mix unit equal to ninety percent of the facility's peer group
median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's
medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);

(ii) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is greater than one hundred ten percent of the
peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a
cost per case mix unit equal to one hundred ten percent of the peer group
median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's
medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);

(iii) Any facility
whose allowable cost per case mix unit is between ninety and one hundred ten
percent of the peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall
have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable
cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

(i)(i) Between October
1, 1998, and June 30, 2000, the department shall compare each facility's direct
care component rate allocation calculated under (g) of this subsection with the
facility's nursing services component rate in effect on September 30, 1998,
less therapy costs, plus any exceptional care offsets as reported on the cost
report, adjusted for economic trends and conditions as provided in RCW
74.46.431. A facility shall receive the higher of the two rates.

(ii) Between July 1,
2000, and June 30, 2002, the department shall compare each facility's direct
care component rate allocation calculated under (h) of this subsection with the
facility's direct care component rate in effect on June 30, 2000. A facility
shall receive the higher of the two rates. Between July 1, 2001, and June 30,
2002, if during any quarter a facility whose rate paid under (h) of this
subsection is greater than either the direct care rate in effect on June 30,
2000, or than that facility's allowable direct care cost per case mix unit
calculated in (d) of this subsection multiplied by that facility's medicaid
average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c), the facility shall be paid in that and each subsequent quarter
pursuant to (h) of this subsection and shall not be entitled to the greater of
the two rates.

(iii) Effective July 1,
2002, all direct care component rate allocations shall be as determined under
(h) of this subsection.

(6) The direct care
component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section shall be
adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

(7) Payments resulting
from increases in direct care component rates, granted under authority of RCW
74.46.508(1) for a facility's exceptional care residents, shall be offset
against the facility's examined, allowable direct care costs, for each report
year or partial period such increases are paid. Such reductions in allowable
direct care costs shall be for rate setting, settlement, and other purposes
deemed appropriate by the department.

Sec. 8. RCW 74.46.521 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The operations
component rate allocation corresponds to the general operation of a nursing
facility for one resident for one day, including but not limited to management,
administration, utilities, office supplies, accounting and bookkeeping, minor building
maintenance, minor equipment repairs and replacements, and other supplies and
services, exclusive of direct care, therapy care, support services, property,
financing allowance, and variable return.

(2) Beginning October
1, 1998, the department shall determine each medicaid nursing facility's
operations component rate allocation using cost report data specified by RCW
74.46.431(7)(a). ((Effective July 1, 2002, operations component rates for
all facilities except essential community providers shall be based upon a
minimum occupancy of ninety percent of licensed beds, and no operations
component rate shall be revised in response to beds banked on or after May 25,
2001, under chapter 70.38 RCW.))

(3) To determine each
facility's operations component rate the department shall:

(a) Array facilities'
adjusted general operations costs per adjusted resident day for each facility
from facilities' cost reports from the applicable report year, for facilities
located within urban counties and for those located within nonurban counties
and determine the median adjusted cost for each peer group;

(b) Set each facility's
operations component rate at the lower of:

(i) The facility's per
resident day adjusted operations costs from the applicable cost report period
adjusted if necessary to a minimum occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed
beds ((before July 1, 2002, and ninety percent effective July 1, 2002));
or

(ii) The adjusted
median per resident day general operations cost for that facility's peer group,
urban counties or nonurban counties; and

(c) Adjust each
facility's operations component rate for economic trends and conditions as
provided in RCW 74.46.431(7)(b).

(4) The
operations component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this
section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

---
END ---