BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) There is established
a task force on mercury amalgam dental fillings to evaluate scientific and
clinical studies related to adverse health effects, if any, of mercury amalgam
dental fillings. The task force must hold public hearings and take testimony
and accept exhibits from all interested persons and entities.

(2) The task force
consists of fifteen members appointed by the governor. The membership
includes:

(a) Two members from
consumer protection organizations;

(b) Two dentists
nominated by the Washington state dental quality assurance commission;

(c) Two mercury-free
dentists;

(d) One toxicologist or
research scientist;

(e) One chemical
engineer or research scientist;

(f) Two physicians
licensed to practice in this state under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW;

(g) Two naturopaths
licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;

(h) Two members of the
general public; and

(i) One member from the
governor's office of health policy.

(3) All members must be
appointed within sixty days of the effective date of this section.

(4) The first meeting
of the task force must take place within ninety days of the effective date of
this section. The governor's office must appoint or hire a facilitator to
conduct the first meeting of the task force. The purpose of the first meeting
is for the task force members to become acquainted and to choose a chair. No
less than eleven task force members must be present in order to choose a chair.

(5) The Washington
state department of health must provide staff to the task force. If a dispute
arises as to the level of staffing, the governor must appoint an arbitrator to
determine a reasonable level of staffing for the task force to accomplish its
mission.

(6) The task force must
issue a report to the legislature and governor by June 30, 2003. The report
must include, but is not limited to:

(a) A statement of the
controversy related to the use of mercury amalgam dental restorative
materials. The statement of controversy must include a history of the issue,
the food and drug administration's approval process, and current uses of
mercury amalgam dental restorative materials;

(b) A summary of the
evidence supporting a conclusion that mercury amalgam dental restorative
materials are safe and effective;

(c) A summary of the
evidence supporting a conclusion that mercury amalgam dental fillings are
harmful to dental consumers;

(d) Conclusions of the
task force on the safety and effectiveness of mercury amalgam dental
restorative materials. The task force must consider the precautionary
principle in formulating its conclusions;

(e) An estimate of the
beneficial and adverse economic impacts in Washington of banning the use of
mercury amalgam dental restorative materials; and

(f) Recommended
legislation including, but not limited to:

(i) The proper
handling, notice, and disposal of mercury;

(ii) A modification of
dental insurance coverage to include mercury amalgam dental restorative
alternatives;

(iii) A review of
required curriculum in state-supported dental schools; and

(iv) The establishment
of an ad hoc review commission, to be in existence for up to ten years, to
ensure that legislative intent is met by the practitioners, suppliers, and
those affected by the new legislation.

(7) The
task force may issue minority reports.

---
END ---