BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to provide a process to preserve for residents of all counties the
common protections of their rights, health, safety, and property in case of
financial emergency.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.06.010 and 1994 c
223 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to those
prescribed by the Constitution, the governor may exercise the powers and
perform the duties prescribed in this and the following sections:

(1) The governor shall
supervise the conduct of all executive and ministerial offices;

(2) The governor shall
see that all offices are filled, including as provided in RCW 42.12.070, and
the duties thereof performed, or in default thereof, apply such remedy as the
law allows; and if the remedy is imperfect, acquaint the legislature therewith
at its next session;

(3) The governor shall
make the appointments and supply the vacancies mentioned in this title;

(4) The governor is the
sole official organ of communication between the government of this state and
the government of any other state or territory, or of the United States;

(5) Whenever any suit
or legal proceeding is pending against this state, or which may affect the
title of this state to any property, or which may result in any claim against
the state, the governor may direct the attorney general to appear on behalf of
the state, and report the same to the governor, or to any grand jury designated
by the governor, or to the legislature when next in session;

(6) The governor may
require the attorney general or any prosecuting attorney to inquire into the
affairs or management of any corporation existing under the laws of this state,
or doing business in this state, and report the same to the governor, or to any
grand jury designated by the governor, or to the legislature when next in
session;

(7) The governor may
require the attorney general to aid any prosecuting attorney in the discharge
of the prosecutor's duties;

(8) The governor may
offer rewards, not exceeding one thousand dollars in each case, payable out of
the state treasury, for information leading to the apprehension of any person
convicted of a felony who has escaped from a state correctional institution or
for information leading to the arrest of any person who has committed or is
charged with the commission of a felony;

(9) The governor shall
perform such duties respecting fugitives from justice as are prescribed by law;

(10) The governor shall
issue and transmit election proclamations as prescribed by law;

(11) The governor may
require any officer or board to make, upon demand, special reports to the
governor, in writing;

(12)(a) The
governor may, after finding that a public disorder, disaster, energy emergency,
or riot exists within this state or any part thereof which affects life,
health, property, or the public peace, proclaim a state of emergency in the
area affected, and the powers granted the governor during a state of emergency
shall be effective only within the area described in the proclamation.

(b) After receipt of
a declaration of revenue emergency by a county legislative authority, the
governor may proclaim a county revenue emergency in that county, draw upon the
unappropriated amount in the state treasury, and pay for the essential
government services set forth under section 3 of this act;

(13) The governor may,
after finding that there exists within this state an imminent danger of
infestation of plant pests as defined in RCW 17.24.007 or plant diseases which
seriously endangers the agricultural or horticultural industries of the state
of Washington, or which seriously threatens life, health, or economic
well-being, order emergency measures to prevent or abate the infestation or
disease situation, which measures, after thorough evaluation of all other
alternatives, may include the aerial application of pesticides;

(14) On all compacts
forwarded to the governor pursuant to RCW 9.46.360(6), the governor is
authorized and empowered to execute on behalf of the state compacts with
federally recognized Indian tribes in the state of Washington pursuant to the
federal Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq., for
conducting class III gaming, as defined in the Act, on Indian lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.06 RCW to read as follows:

A county legislative
authority may by a vote of at least sixty percent of its members declare a
revenue emergency. At a minimum the resolution must find the following:

(1) That county
revenues, including unrestricted current expense fund balances, equal less than
ninety percent of the average annual current expense budget for the previous
two years;

(2) That the county
cannot provide the required services in any or all of the following areas:
Access to civil and criminal courts, public defense, constitutionally required
translation services for non-English speakers, juvenile detention, juvenile
parole, community supervision for adult offenders, indigent defense for dependency
hearings, protection of public health, elections, timely assessment of
property, recording of legal documents and titles, maintenance of a minimal
police patrol and response function in unincorporated areas, processing of
permits for development and construction, and other services required by the
state or federal law or Constitution;

(3) That the inability
to fund required services is the result of a loss of state funds or a loss of
local funds as a result of state action; and

(4) That the county government
will be unable to meet its legal obligations to provide services without state
assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 43.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Within twenty-four
hours of making a declaration under section 3 of this act, the county
legislative authority shall transmit copies of its declaration to all of the
county government's other elected officials, the governor, the lieutenant
governor, the secretary of state, the state treasurer, the state auditor, the
state attorney general, the chief justice of the state supreme court, the
speaker and minority leader of the state house of representatives, and the
majority and minority leaders of the state senate.

(2) Upon receiving a
county's declaration of revenue emergency, the governor may direct state
officials to collect additional information from the county to assist in making
a final determination of the county's situation and requirements. The governor
shall respond within thirty days. If the governor concurs that the county has
a revenue emergency, the governor may proclaim a county revenue emergency and
provide funds under RCW 43.06.010(12)(b).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---