BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 81.112.040 and 1994
c 109 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The regional
transit authority shall be governed by a board consisting of representatives ((appointed
by the county executive and confirmed by the council or other legislative
authority of each member county. Membership shall be based on population from
that portion of each county which lies within the service area. Board members
shall be appointed initially on the basis of one for each one hundred
forty-five thousand population within the county. Such appointments shall be
made following consultation with city and town jurisdictions within the service
area)) directly elected by the public. The county legislative
authorities for each county participating in a regional transit authority shall
agree upon districts of equal population, each including a population of at
least one hundred forty-five thousand persons, and representatives must be
elected for each of these regional transit authority districts for a term of
two years at the next general election. In addition, the secretary of
transportation or the secretary's designee shall serve as a member of the board
and may have voting status with approval of a majority of the other members of
the board. Only board ((members, not including alternates or designees,))
representatives may cast votes.

Each ((member)) representative
of the board, except the secretary of transportation or the secretary's
designee, ((shall be:

(a) An elected
official who serves on the legislative authority of a city or as mayor of a
city within the boundaries of the authority;

(b) On the
legislative authority of the county, if fifty percent of the population of the
legislative official's district is within the authority boundaries; or

(c) A county
executive from a member county within the authority boundaries.

When making appointments,
each county executive shall ensure that representation on the board includes an
elected city official representing the largest city in each county and assures
proportional representation from other cities, and representation from
unincorporated areas of each county within the service area. At least one-half
of all appointees from each county shall serve on the governing authority of a
public transportation system.

Members appointed
from each county shall serve staggered four-year terms. Vacancies shall be
filled by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term of the position
being vacated.

The governing board
shall be reconstituted, with regard to the number of representatives from each
county, on a population basis, using the official office of financial
management population estimates, five years after its initial formation and, at
minimum, in the year following each official federal census. The board
membership may be reduced, maintained, or expanded to reflect population
changes but under no circumstances may the board membership exceed twenty-five)) must be a resident of the area that he or
she represents.

(2) Major decisions of
the authority ((shall)) require a favorable vote of two-thirds of the
entire membership of the voting ((members)) representatives.
"Major decisions" include at least the following: System plan
adoption and amendment; system phasing decisions; annual budget adoption;
authorization of annexations; modification of board composition; and executive
director employment.

(3) Each
((member)) representative of the board is eligible to be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060
and to receive compensation as provided in RCW 43.03.250.

--- END ---