BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.67.370 and 1998 c
61 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Cities,
towns, or counties may ((not)) require existing mobile home parks to
replace existing, functional septic systems with a sewer system within the
community ((unless)) when either the local board of health
determines that the septic system is failing or it is at least five years
after the first request to replace the septic system.

(2)
Cities, towns, counties, local improvement districts, utility local improvement
districts, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, or any other
persons, firms, or corporations are prohibited from requiring existing mobile
home parks to pay a utility connection charge until the mobile home park
connects to a utility or no longer operates as a mobile home park under chapter
59.20 RCW. This act is remedial in nature and applies retroactively.

--- END ---