BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.502 and 1998 c
213 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if the
person drives a vehicle within this state:

(a) And the person has,
within two hours after driving, an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or higher as
shown by analysis of the person's breath or blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or

(b) While the person is
under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug; or

(c) While the person is
under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor and any
drug.

(2) The fact that a
person charged with a violation of this section is or has been entitled to use
a drug under the laws of this state shall not constitute a defense against a
charge of violating this section.

(3) It is an
affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section which
the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant
consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of driving and before
the administration of an analysis of the person's breath or blood to cause the
defendant's alcohol concentration to be 0.08 or more within two hours after
driving. The court shall not admit evidence of this defense unless the
defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial hearing in
the case of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.

(4) Analyses of blood
or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the alleged driving may be
used as evidence that within two hours of the alleged driving, a person had an
alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more in violation of subsection (1)(a) of this
section, and in any case in which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration
above 0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was under the influence of or
affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug in violation of subsection (1)(b)
or (c) of this section.

(5) A violation of this
section is a gross misdemeanor punishable pursuant to RCW 46.61.5055 except
that a person is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW
if the person drives while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug as defined by this section and has previously been convicted of driving or
being in physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug on two or more prior occasions within a
ten-year period, or the person has a previous conviction of felony driving or
being in actual physical control while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug, vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), or vehicular homicide
(RCW 46.61.520).

Sec. 2. RCW 46.61.504 and 1998 c
213 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if the person has actual physical
control of a vehicle within this state:

(a) And the person has,
within two hours after being in actual physical control of the vehicle, an
alcohol concentration of 0.08 or higher as shown by analysis of the person's
breath or blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or

(b) While the person is
under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug; or

(c) While the person is
under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor and any
drug.

(2) The fact that a
person charged with a violation of this section is or has been entitled to use
a drug under the laws of this state does not constitute a defense against any
charge of violating this section. No person may be convicted under this
section if, prior to being pursued by a law enforcement officer, the person has
moved the vehicle safely off the roadway.

(3) It is an
affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section which
the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant
consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of being in actual
physical control of the vehicle and before the administration of an analysis of
the person's breath or blood to cause the defendant's alcohol concentration to
be 0.08 or more within two hours after being in such control. The court shall
not admit evidence of this defense unless the defendant notifies the
prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial hearing in the case of the
defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.

(4) Analyses of blood
or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the alleged being in
actual physical control of a vehicle may be used as evidence that within two
hours of the alleged being in such control, a person had an alcohol
concentration of 0.08 or more in violation of subsection (1)(a) of this
section, and in any case in which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration
above 0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was under the influence of or
affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug in violation of subsection (1)(b)
or (c) of this section.

(5) A violation of this
section is a gross misdemeanor punishable pursuant to RCW 46.61.5055 except
that a person is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW
if the person is in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by this section and has
been previously convicted of being in physical control of a motor vehicle or
driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug on two or more occasions within a ten-year period, or the person has a
previous conviction of felony driving or being in actual physical control while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), or vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520).

Sec. 3. RCW 46.61.5055 and 1999
c 324 s 5, 1999 c 274 s 6, and 1999 c 5 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person who is convicted of a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has no prior offense within ((seven))
ten years shall be punished as follows:

(a) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons
other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than one day nor more than one year. Twenty-four consecutive hours of
the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that
the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial
risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the
reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(a)(i), the court may order not
less than fifteen days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay
the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which
the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also
require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than three hundred fifty dollars nor more than five thousand dollars.
Three hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds the offender to be indigent; or

(b) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of
the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is
no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than two days nor more than one year. Two consecutive days of the
imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the
imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk
to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the
reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the court may order not
less than thirty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay
the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which
the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also
require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Five
hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(2) Except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person who is convicted of a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has one prior offense within ((seven))
ten years shall be punished as follows:

(a) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons
other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than thirty days nor more than one year and sixty days of electronic
home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic
monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed
shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic
home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the
offender is on electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of imprisonment and
sixty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Five
hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720; or

(b) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of
the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is
no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than forty-five days nor more than one year and ninety days of
electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer,
and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days of imprisonment
and ninety days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would
impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court
shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and
the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor more than five thousand dollars.
Seven hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(3) A person who is
convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has two or more
prior offenses within ((seven)) ten years, or who has a
previous conviction of felony driving or being in actual physical control while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), or vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), is guilty of a class C
felony and shall be punished ((as follows:

(a) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons
other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i) By imprisonment
for not less than ninety days nor more than one year and one hundred twenty
days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer,
and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Ninety days of imprisonment and
one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum
sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of
not less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. One
thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720; or

(b) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of
the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is
no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment
for not less than one hundred twenty days nor more than one year and one
hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for
the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the
penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require
the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. One hundred
twenty days of imprisonment and one hundred fifty days of electronic home
monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the
imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk
to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the
reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of
not less than one thousand five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720)) pursuant to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(4) In exercising its
discretion in setting penalties within the limits allowed by this section, the
court shall particularly consider the following:

(a) Whether the
person's driving at the time of the offense was responsible for injury or
damage to another or another's property; and

(b) Whether the person
was driving or in physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers at
the time of the offense.

(5) An offender
punishable under this section is subject to the alcohol assessment and
treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.

(6) The license,
permit, or nonresident privilege of a person convicted of driving or being in
physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or drugs must:

(a) If the person's
alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if for reasons other than the
person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test
result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) Where there has
been no prior offense within ((seven)) ten years, be suspended or
denied by the department for ninety days;

(ii) Where there has
been one prior offense within ((seven)) ten years, be revoked or
denied by the department for two years; or

(iii) Where there have
been two or more prior offenses within ((seven)) ten years, be
revoked or denied by the department for three years;

(b) If the person's
alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or if by reason of the person's
refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) Where there has
been no prior offense within ((seven)) ten years, be revoked or
denied by the department for one year;

(ii) Where there has
been one prior offense within ((seven)) ten years, be revoked or
denied by the department for nine hundred days; or

(iii) Where there have
been two or more prior offenses within ((seven)) ten years, be
revoked or denied by the department for four years.

For purposes of this
subsection, the department shall refer to the driver's record maintained under
RCW 46.52.120 when determining the existence of prior offenses.

(7) After expiration of
any period of suspension, revocation, or denial of the offender's license,
permit, or privilege to drive required by this section, the department shall
place the offender's driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to RCW
46.20.355.

(8)(a) In addition to
any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail sentence required by this section,
whenever the court imposes less than one year in jail, the court shall also
suspend but shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not exceeding five
years. The court shall impose conditions of probation that include: (i) Not
driving a motor vehicle within this state without a valid license to drive and
proof of financial responsibility for the future; (ii) not driving a motor
vehicle within this state while having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more
within two hours after driving; and (iii) not refusing to submit to a test of
his or her breath or blood to determine alcohol concentration upon request of a
law enforcement officer who has reasonable grounds to believe the person was
driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor. The court may impose
conditions of probation that include nonrepetition, installation of an ignition
interlock or other biological or technical device on the probationer's motor
vehicle, alcohol or drug treatment, supervised probation, or other conditions
that may be appropriate. The sentence may be imposed in whole or in part upon
violation of a condition of probation during the suspension period.

(b) For each violation
of mandatory conditions of probation under (a)(i) and (ii) or (a)(i) and (iii)
of this subsection, the court shall order the convicted person to be confined
for thirty days, which shall not be suspended or deferred.

(c) For each incident
involving a violation of a mandatory condition of probation imposed under this
subsection, the license, permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be
suspended by the court for thirty days or, if such license, permit, or
privilege to drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the
finding of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial
then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall notify the
department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any extension of a
suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this subsection.

(9) A court may waive
the electronic home monitoring requirements of this chapter when:

(a) The offender does
not have a dwelling, telephone service, or any other necessity to operate an
electronic home monitoring system;

(b) The offender does
not reside in the state of Washington; or

(c) The court
determines that there is reason to believe that the offender would violate the
conditions of the electronic home monitoring penalty.

Whenever the mandatory
minimum term of electronic home monitoring is waived, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the waiver and the facts upon which the waiver
is based, and shall impose an alternative sentence with similar punitive
consequences. The alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to,
additional jail time, work crew, or work camp.

Whenever the
combination of jail time and electronic home monitoring or alternative sentence
would exceed three hundred sixty-five days, the offender shall serve the jail
portion of the sentence first, and the electronic home monitoring or
alternative portion of the sentence shall be reduced so that the combination
does not exceed three hundred sixty-five days.

(10) An offender
serving a sentence under this section, whether or not a mandatory minimum term
has expired, may be granted an extraordinary medical placement by the jail
administrator subject to the standards and limitations set forth in RCW
9.94A.150(4).

(11) For purposes of
this section:

(a) A "prior
offense" means any of the following:

(i) A conviction for a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(ii) A conviction for a
violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(iii) A conviction for
a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(iv) A conviction for a
violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug;

(v) A conviction for a
violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050 or an equivalent local
ordinance, if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally
filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local
ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;

(vi) An out-of-state
conviction for a violation that would have been a violation of (a)(i), (ii),
(iii), (iv), or (v) of this subsection if committed in this state;

(vii) A deferred
prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of
RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance; or

(viii) A deferred
prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of
RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge under which the
deferred prosecution was granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520
or 46.61.522; and

(b) "Within ((seven))
ten years" means that the arrest for a prior offense occurred
within ((seven)) ten years of the arrest for the current offense.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.61.5058 and 1998
c 207 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon the arrest of
a person or upon the filing of a complaint, citation, or information in a court
of competent jurisdiction, based upon probable cause to believe that a person
has violated RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or any similar municipal ordinance, if
such person has a prior offense within ((seven)) ten years as
defined in RCW 46.61.5055, and where the person has been provided written
notice that any transfer, sale, or encumbrance of such person's interest in the
vehicle over which that person was actually driving or had physical control
when the violation occurred, is unlawful pending either acquittal, dismissal,
sixty days after conviction, or other termination of the charge, such person
shall be prohibited from encumbering, selling, or transferring his or her
interest in such vehicle, except as otherwise provided in (a), (b), and (c) of
this subsection, until either acquittal, dismissal, sixty days after
conviction, or other termination of the charge. The prohibition against
transfer of title shall not be stayed pending the determination of an appeal
from the conviction.

(a) A vehicle
encumbered by a bona fide security interest may be transferred to the secured
party or to a person designated by the secured party;

(b) A leased or rented
vehicle may be transferred to the lessor, rental agency, or to a person
designated by the lessor or rental agency; and

(c) A vehicle may be
transferred to a third party or a vehicle dealer who is a bona fide purchaser
or may be subject to a bona fide security interest in the vehicle unless it is
established that (i) in the case of a purchase by a third party or vehicle
dealer, such party or dealer had actual notice that the vehicle was subject to
the prohibition prior to the purchase, or (ii) in the case of a security
interest, the holder of the security interest had actual notice that the
vehicle was subject to the prohibition prior to the encumbrance of title.

(2) On conviction for a
violation of either RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or any similar municipal ordinance
where the person convicted has a prior offense within ((seven)) ten
years as defined in RCW 46.61.5055, the motor vehicle the person was driving or
over which the person had actual physical control at the time of the offense,
if the person has a financial interest in the vehicle, is subject to seizure
and forfeiture pursuant to this section.

(3) A vehicle subject
to forfeiture under this chapter may be seized by a law enforcement officer of
this state upon process issued by a court of competent jurisdiction. Seizure
of a vehicle may be made without process if the vehicle subject to seizure has
been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a forfeiture
proceeding based upon this section.

(4) Seizure under
subsection (3) of this section automatically commences proceedings for
forfeiture. The law enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure was
made shall cause notice of the seizure and intended forfeiture of the seized
vehicle to be served within fifteen days after the seizure on the owner of the
vehicle seized, on the person in charge of the vehicle, and on any person
having a known right or interest in the vehicle, including a community property
interest. The notice of seizure may be served by any method authorized by law or
court rule, including but not limited to service by certified mail with return
receipt requested. Service by mail is complete upon mailing within the
fifteen-day period after the seizure. Notice of seizure in the case of
property subject to a security interest that has been perfected on a
certificate of title shall be made by service upon the secured party or the
secured party's assignee at the address shown on the financing statement or the
certificate of title.

(5) If no person
notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of
ownership or right to possession of the seized vehicle within forty-five days
of the seizure, the vehicle is deemed forfeited.

(6) If a person
notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of
ownership or right to possession of the seized vehicle within forty-five days
of the seizure, the law enforcement agency shall give the person or persons a
reasonable opportunity to be heard as to the claim or right. The hearing shall
be before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or the chief
law enforcement officer's designee, except where the seizing agency is a state
agency as defined in RCW 34.12.020, the hearing shall be before the chief law
enforcement officer of the seizing agency or an administrative law judge
appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except that any person asserting a claim or
right may remove the matter to a court of competent jurisdiction. Removal may
only be accomplished according to the rules of civil procedure. The person
seeking removal of the matter must serve process against the state, county,
political subdivision, or municipality that operates the seizing agency, and
any other party of interest, in accordance with RCW 4.28.080 or 4.92.020,
within forty-five days after the person seeking removal has notified the
seizing law enforcement agency of the person's claim of ownership or right to
possession. The court to which the matter is to be removed shall be the
district court when the aggregate value of the vehicle is within the
jurisdictional limit set forth in RCW 3.66.020. A hearing before the seizing
agency and any appeal therefrom shall be under Title 34 RCW. In a court
hearing between two or more claimants to the vehicle involved, the prevailing
party shall be entitled to a judgment for costs and reasonable attorneys'
fees. The burden of producing evidence shall be upon the person claiming to be
the legal owner or the person claiming to have the lawful right to possession
of the vehicle. The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly return the
vehicle to the claimant upon a determination by the administrative law judge or
court that the claimant is the present legal owner under Title 46 RCW or is
lawfully entitled to possession of the vehicle.

(7) When a vehicle is
forfeited under this chapter the seizing law enforcement agency may sell the
vehicle, retain it for official use, or upon application by a law enforcement
agency of this state release the vehicle to that agency for the exclusive use
of enforcing this title; provided, however, that the agency shall first satisfy
any bona fide security interest to which the vehicle is subject under
subsection (1)(a) or (c) of this section.

(8) When a vehicle is
forfeited, the seizing agency shall keep a record indicating the identity of
the prior owner, if known, a description of the vehicle, the disposition of the
vehicle, the value of the vehicle at the time of seizure, and the amount of
proceeds realized from disposition of the vehicle.

(9) Each seizing agency
shall retain records of forfeited vehicles for at least ((seven)) ten
years.

(10) Each seizing
agency shall file a report including a copy of the records of forfeited
vehicles with the state treasurer each calendar quarter.

(11) The quarterly
report need not include a record of a forfeited vehicle that is still being
held for use as evidence during the investigation or prosecution of a case or
during the appeal from a conviction.

(12) By January 31st of
each year, each seizing agency shall remit to the state treasurer an amount
equal to ten percent of the net proceeds of vehicles forfeited during the
preceding calendar year. Money remitted shall be deposited in the public
safety and education account.

(13) The net proceeds
of a forfeited vehicle is the value of the forfeitable interest in the vehicle
after deducting the cost of satisfying a bona fide security interest to which
the vehicle is subject at the time of seizure; and in the case of a sold
vehicle, after deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable fees or
commissions paid to independent selling agents.

(14) The value of a
sold forfeited vehicle is the sale price. The value of a retained forfeited
vehicle is the fair market value of the vehicle at the time of seizure,
determined when possible by reference to an applicable commonly used index,
such as the index used by the department of licensing. A seizing agency may,
but need not, use an independent qualified appraiser to determine the value of
retained vehicles. If an appraiser is used, the value of the vehicle appraised
is net of the cost of the appraisal.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.61.524 and 2001 c
64 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person convicted
under RCW 46.61.520(1)(a) or 46.61.522(1)(b) or of a felony violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504 shall, as a condition of community custody imposed
under RCW 9.94A.545 or community placement imposed under RCW 9.94A.660,
complete a diagnostic evaluation by an alcohol or drug dependency agency
approved by the department of social and health services or a qualified
probation department, as defined under RCW 46.61.516 that has been approved by
the department of social and health services. This report shall be forwarded
to the department of licensing. If the person is found to have an alcohol or
drug problem that requires treatment, the person shall complete treatment in a
program approved by the department of social and health services under chapter
70.96A RCW. If the person is found not to have an alcohol or drug problem that
requires treatment, he or she shall complete a course in an information school
approved by the department of social and health services under chapter 70.96A
RCW. The convicted person shall pay all costs for any evaluation, education,
or treatment required by this section, unless the person is eligible for an
existing program offered or approved by the department of social and health
services. Nothing in chapter 348, Laws of 1991 requires the addition of new
treatment or assessment facilities nor affects the department of social and
health services use of existing programs and facilities authorized by law.

(2) As provided for
under RCW 46.20.285, the department shall revoke the license, permit to drive,
or a nonresident privilege of a person convicted of vehicular homicide under
RCW 46.61.520 or vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522. The department shall
determine the eligibility of a person convicted of vehicular homicide under RCW
46.61.520(1)(a) or vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522(1)(b) to receive a
license based upon the report provided by the designated alcoholism treatment
facility or probation department, and shall deny reinstatement until
satisfactory progress in an approved program has been established and the
person is otherwise qualified.

Sec. 6. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 361, 2001 c 300 s 4, 2001 c 217 s 12, and 2001 c 17 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Sexually
Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Felony
driving or physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.5055(3))

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity
Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(a))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by
the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Vehicular
Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety
of others (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity
Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(b))

Improperly
Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 7. RCW 9.94A.525 and 2001 c
264 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The offender score is
measured on the horizontal axis of the sentencing grid. The offender score
rules are as follows:

The offender score is
the sum of points accrued under this section rounded down to the nearest whole
number.

(1) A prior conviction
is a conviction which exists before the date of sentencing for the offense for
which the offender score is being computed. Convictions entered or sentenced
on the same date as the conviction for which the offender score is being
computed shall be deemed "other current offenses" within the meaning
of RCW 9.94A.589.

(2) Class A and sex
prior felony convictions shall always be included in the offender score. Class
B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not be included in the
offender score, if since the last date of release from confinement (including
full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or
entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent ten consecutive years in
the community without committing any crime that subsequently results in a
conviction. Class C prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not
be included in the offender score if, since the last date of release from
confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent
five consecutive years in the community without committing any crime that
subsequently results in a conviction. Serious traffic convictions shall not be
included in the offender score if, since the last date of release from
confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender spent five
years in the community without committing any crime that subsequently results
in a conviction. This subsection applies to both adult and juvenile prior
convictions.

(3) Out-of-state
convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the comparable
offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. Federal
convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the comparable
offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. If there is no
clearly comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is one that is
usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the offense shall
be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a felony under the relevant
federal statute.

(4) Score prior
convictions for felony anticipatory offenses (attempts, criminal solicitations,
and criminal conspiracies) the same as if they were convictions for completed
offenses.

(5)(a) In the case of
multiple prior convictions, for the purpose of computing the offender score,
count all convictions separately, except:

(i) Prior offenses
which were found, under RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), to encompass the same criminal
conduct, shall be counted as one offense, the offense that yields the highest
offender score. The current sentencing court shall determine with respect to
other prior adult offenses for which sentences were served concurrently or
prior juvenile offenses for which sentences were served consecutively, whether
those offenses shall be counted as one offense or as separate offenses using
the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a),
and if the court finds that they shall be counted as one offense, then the
offense that yields the highest offender score shall be used. The current
sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses were not the same
criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate dates, or in separate
counties or jurisdictions, or in separate complaints, indictments, or
informations;

(ii) In the case of
multiple prior convictions for offenses committed before July 1, 1986, for the
purpose of computing the offender score, count all adult convictions served
concurrently as one offense, and count all juvenile convictions entered on the
same date as one offense. Use the conviction for the offense that yields the
highest offender score.

(b) As used in this
subsection (5), "served concurrently" means that: (i) The latter
sentence was imposed with specific reference to the former; (ii) the concurrent
relationship of the sentences was judicially imposed; and (iii) the concurrent
timing of the sentences was not the result of a probation or parole revocation
on the former offense.

(6) If the present
conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt,
solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior conviction as if the present
conviction were for a completed offense. When these convictions are used as
criminal history, score them the same as a completed crime.

(7) If the present
conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not covered by subsection (11) or
(12) of this section, count one point for each adult prior felony conviction
and one point for each juvenile prior violent felony conviction and 1/2 point
for each juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.

(8) If the present
conviction is for a violent offense and not covered in subsection (9), (10),
(11), or (12) of this section, count two points for each prior adult and
juvenile violent felony conviction, one point for each prior adult nonviolent
felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile nonviolent felony
conviction.

(9) If the present
conviction is for a serious violent offense, count three points for prior adult
and juvenile convictions for crimes in this category, two points for each prior
adult and juvenile violent conviction (not already counted), one point for each
prior adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.

(10) If the present
conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior convictions as in subsection (8) of
this section; however count two points for each prior adult Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction, and one point for each prior juvenile Burglary
2 or residential burglary conviction.

(11) If the present
conviction is for a felony traffic offense count two points for each adult or
juvenile prior conviction for Vehicular Homicide ((or)),
Vehicular Assault, or Felony Driving or Physical Control of a Motor Vehicle
While Under the Influence of Intoxicating Liquor or any Drug; for each
felony offense count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile
prior conviction; for each serious traffic offense, other than those used for
an enhancement pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one point for each adult and
1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction.

(12) If the present
conviction is for a drug offense count three points for each adult prior felony
drug offense conviction and two points for each juvenile drug offense. All
other adult and juvenile felonies are scored as in subsection (8) of this
section if the current drug offense is violent, or as in subsection (7) of this
section if the current drug offense is nonviolent.

(13) If the present
conviction is for Escape from Community Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only
prior escape convictions in the offender score. Count adult prior escape
convictions as one point and juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.

(14) If the present
conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or Escape 2, RCW 9A.76.120, count
adult prior convictions as one point and juvenile prior convictions as 1/2
point.

(15) If the present
conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential burglary, count priors as in
subsection (7) of this section; however, count two points for each adult and
juvenile prior Burglary 1 conviction, two points for each adult prior Burglary
2 or residential burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile prior
Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.

(16) If the present
conviction is for a sex offense, count priors as in subsections (7) through
(15) of this section; however count three points for each adult and juvenile
prior sex offense conviction.

(17) If the present
conviction is for an offense committed while the offender was under community
placement, add one point.

Sec. 8. RCW 9.94A.650 and 2000 c
28 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section
applies to offenders who have never been previously convicted of a felony in
this state, federal court, or another state, and who have never participated in
a program of deferred prosecution for a felony, and who are convicted of a
felony that is not:

(a) Classified as a
violent offense or a sex offense under this chapter;

(b) Manufacture,
delivery, or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled
substance classified in Schedule I or II that is a narcotic drug or flunitrazepam
classified in Schedule IV;

(c) Manufacture,
delivery, or possession with intent to deliver a methamphetamine, its salts,
isomers, and salts of its isomers as defined in RCW 69.50.206(d)(2); ((or))

(d) The selling for
profit of any controlled substance or counterfeit substance classified in
Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of marihuana; or

(e) Felony driving
under the influence contrary to RCW 46.61.502 or felony being in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence contrary to RCW
46.61.504.

(2) In sentencing a
first-time offender the court may waive the imposition of a sentence within the
standard sentence range and impose a sentence which may include up to ninety
days of confinement in a facility operated or utilized under contract by the
county and a requirement that the offender refrain from committing new
offenses. The sentence may also include a term of community supervision or
community custody as specified in subsection (3) of this section, which, in
addition to crime-related prohibitions, may include requirements that the
offender perform any one or more of the following:

(a) Devote time to a
specific employment or occupation;

(b) Undergo available
outpatient treatment for up to the period specified in subsection (3) of this
section, or inpatient treatment not to exceed the standard range of confinement
for that offense;

(c) Pursue a
prescribed, secular course of study or vocational training;

(d) Remain within
prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the community corrections officer
prior to any change in the offender's address or employment;

(e) Report as directed
to a community corrections officer; or

(f) Pay all
court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030 and/or
perform community service work.

(3) The terms and
statuses applicable to sentences under subsection (2) of this section are:

(a) For sentences
imposed on or after July 25, 1999, for crimes committed before July 1, 2000, up
to one year of community supervision. If treatment is ordered, the period of
community supervision may include up to the period of treatment, but shall not
exceed two years; and

(b) For crimes
committed on or after July 1, 2000, up to one year of community custody unless
treatment is ordered, in which case the period of community custody may include
up to the period of treatment, but shall not exceed two years. Any term of
community custody imposed under this section is subject to conditions and
sanctions as authorized in this section and in RCW 9.94A.715 (2) and (3).

(4) The department
shall discharge from community supervision any offender sentenced under this
section before July 25, 1999, who has served at least one year of community
supervision and has completed any treatment ordered by the court.

Sec. 9. RCW 46.20.3101 and 1998
c 213 s 2, 1998 c 209 s 2, and 1998 c 207 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

Pursuant to RCW
46.20.308, the department shall suspend, revoke, or deny the arrested person's
license, permit, or privilege to drive as follows:

(1) In the case of a
person who has refused a test or tests:

(a) For a first refusal
within ((seven)) ten years, where there has not been a previous
incident within ((seven)) ten years that resulted in
administrative action under this section, revocation or denial for one year;

(b) For a second or
subsequent refusal within ((seven)) ten years, or for a first
refusal where there has been one or more previous incidents within ((seven))
ten years that have resulted in administrative action under this
section, revocation or denial for two years or until the person reaches age
twenty-one, whichever is longer. A revocation imposed under this subsection
(1)(b) shall run consecutively to the period of any suspension, revocation, or
denial imposed pursuant to a criminal conviction arising out of the same
incident.

(2) In the case of an
incident where a person has submitted to or been administered a test or tests
indicating that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was
0.08 or more:

(a) For a first
incident within ((seven)) ten years, where there has not been a
previous incident within ((seven)) ten years that resulted in
administrative action under this section, suspension for ninety days;

(b) For a second or
subsequent incident within ((seven)) ten years, revocation or
denial for two years.

(3) In the case of an
incident where a person under age twenty-one has submitted to or been
administered a test or tests indicating that the alcohol concentration of the
person's breath or blood was in violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or
46.61.504:

(a) For a first
incident within ((seven)) ten years, suspension or denial for
ninety days;

(b) For a second or
subsequent incident within ((seven)) ten years, revocation or
denial for one year or until the person reaches age twenty-one, whichever is
longer.

Sec. 10. RCW 46.20.391 and 1999 c
274 s 4 and 1999 c 272 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person licensed
under this chapter who is convicted of an offense relating to motor vehicles
for which suspension or revocation of the driver's license is mandatory, other
than vehicular homicide or vehicular assault, or who has had his or her license
suspended under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a), may submit to the department
an application for an occupational driver's license. The department, upon
receipt of the prescribed fee and upon determining that the petitioner is
engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential that the petitioner
operate a motor vehicle, may issue an occupational driver's license and may set
definite restrictions as provided in RCW 46.20.394. No person may petition
for, and the department shall not issue, an occupational driver's license that
is effective during the first thirty days of any suspension or revocation imposed
either for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or under RCW 46.20.3101
(2)(a) or (3)(a), or for both a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and
under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a) where the action arises from the same
incident. A person aggrieved by the decision of the department on the
application for an occupational driver's license may request a hearing as
provided by rule of the department.

(2)(a) A person
licensed under this chapter whose driver's license is suspended
administratively due to failure to appear or pay a traffic ticket under RCW
46.20.289; a violation of the financial responsibility laws under chapter 46.29
RCW; or for multiple violations within a specified period of time under RCW
46.20.291, may apply to the department for an occupational driver's license if
the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that one of
the following additional conditions are met:

(i) The applicant is in
an apprenticeship program or an on-the-job training program for which a
driver's license is required;

(ii) The applicant
presents evidence that he or she has applied for a position in an
apprenticeship or on-the-job training program and the program has certified
that a driver's license is required to begin the program, provided that a
license granted under this provision shall be in effect no longer than fourteen
days;

(iii) The applicant is
in a program that assists persons who are enrolled in a WorkFirst program
pursuant to chapter 74.08A RCW to become gainfully employed and the program
requires a driver's license; or

(iv) The applicant is
undergoing substance abuse treatment or is participating in meetings of a
twelve-step group such as alcoholics anonymous.

(b) If the suspension
is for failure to respond, pay, or comply with a notice of traffic infraction
or conviction, the applicant must enter into a payment plan with the court.

(c) An occupational
driver's license issued to an applicant described in (a) of this subsection
shall be valid for the period of the suspension or revocation but not more than
two years.

(d) Upon receipt of
evidence that a holder of an occupational driver's license granted under this
subsection is no longer enrolled in an apprenticeship or on-the-job training
program, the director shall give written notice by first class mail to the
driver that the occupational driver's license shall be canceled. The effective
date of cancellation shall be fifteen days from the date of mailing the
notice. If at any time before the cancellation goes into effect the driver
submits evidence of continued enrollment in the program, the cancellation shall
be stayed. If the cancellation becomes effective, the driver may obtain, at no
additional charge, a new occupational driver's license upon submittal of
evidence of enrollment in another program that meets the criteria set forth in
this subsection.

(e) The department
shall not issue an occupational driver's license under (a)(iv) of this
subsection if the applicant is able to receive transit services sufficient to
allow for the applicant's participation in the programs referenced under
(a)(iv) of this subsection.

(3) An applicant for an
occupational driver's license is eligible to receive such license only if:

(a) Within one year
immediately preceding the date of the offense that gave rise to the present
conviction, the applicant has not committed any offense relating to motor
vehicles for which suspension or revocation of a driver's license is mandatory;
and

(b) Within ((seven))
ten years immediately preceding the date of the offense that gave rise
to the present conviction or incident, the applicant has not committed any of
the following offenses: (i) Driving or being in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor; (ii) vehicular
homicide under RCW 46.61.520; or (iii) vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522;
and

(c) The applicant is
engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential that he or she
operate a motor vehicle, except as allowed under subsection (2)(a) of this
section; and

(d) The applicant files
satisfactory proof of financial responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW.

(4) The
director shall cancel an occupational driver's license upon receipt of notice
that the holder thereof has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle in
violation of its restrictions, or of a separate offense that under chapter
46.20 RCW would warrant suspension or revocation of a regular driver's
license. The cancellation is effective as of the date of the conviction, and
continues with the same force and effect as any suspension or revocation under
this title.

---
END ---