BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 3.34.010 and 1998 c
64 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The number of district
judges to be elected in each county shall be: Adams, two; Asotin, one; Benton,
three; Chelan, two; Clallam, two; Clark, five; Columbia, one; Cowlitz, two;
Douglas, one; Ferry, one; Franklin, one; Garfield, one; Grant, two; Grays
Harbor, two; Island, one; Jefferson, one; King, ((twenty-six)) twenty-three;
Kitsap, three; Kittitas, two; Klickitat, two; Lewis, two; Lincoln, one; Mason,
one; Okanogan, two; Pacific, two; Pend Oreille, one; Pierce, eleven; San Juan,
one; Skagit, two; Skamania, one; Snohomish, eight; Spokane, nine; Stevens, one;
Thurston, two; Wahkiakum, one; Walla Walla, two; Whatcom, two; Whitman, one;
Yakima, four. This number may be increased only as provided in RCW 3.34.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The district judges
holding office on the effective date of this act shall serve the remainder of
their terms, and any reduction in the number of district judges required by
section 1, chapter . . ., Laws of 2002 (this act) shall occur upon the
expiration of their terms.

---
END ---