BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.720 and 2001 c
247 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court may order
that after a period of suspension, revocation, or denial of driving privileges,
and for up to as long as the court has jurisdiction, any person convicted of
any offense involving the use, consumption, or possession of alcohol while
operating a motor vehicle may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a
functioning ignition interlock or other biological or technical device.

(2) ((If a)) The
department shall require that, after any applicable period of suspension,
revocation, or denial of driving privileges, a person may drive only a motor
vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or other biological or
technical device if the person is:

(a) Convicted of
a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance and
it is:

(((a))) (i)
The person's first conviction or a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW
and his or her alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or by reason of the
person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no
test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration; ((or (b)))

(ii) The
person's second or subsequent conviction; or (((c)))

(iii) The
person's first conviction and the person has a previous deferred prosecution
under chapter 10.05 RCW or it is a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW
and the person has a previous conviction((, the court shall order that after
any applicable period of suspension, revocation, or denial of driving
privileges, the person may drive)); or

(b) Restricted to
driving only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock
or other biological or technical device under RCW 46.20.308. ((The
requirement to drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition
interlock or other biological or technical device may not be suspended.))
The ((court)) department may waive the requirement for the use of
such a device if ((the court makes a specific finding in writing)) it
concludes that such devices are not reasonably available in the local
area. Nothing in this section may be interpreted as entitling a person to more
than one deferred prosecution.

(3) In the case of a
person under subsection (1) of this section, the court shall establish a
specific calibration setting at which the ignition interlock or other
biological or technical device will prevent the motor vehicle from being
started and the period of time that the person shall be subject to the
restriction. In the case of a person under subsection (2) of this section, the
ignition interlock or other biological or technical device shall be calibrated
to prevent the motor vehicle from being started when the breath sample provided
has an alcohol concentration of 0.025 or more, and the period of time of
the restriction will be as follows:

(a) For a person (i)
who is subject to RCW 46.61.5055 (1)(b), (2), or (3), or who is subject to a deferred
prosecution program under chapter 10.05 RCW, or who is subject to
restriction under RCW 46.20.308; and (ii) who has not previously been
restricted under this section, a period of ((not less than)) one year;

(b) For a person who
has previously been restricted under (a) of this subsection, a period of ((not
less than)) five years;

(c) For a person who
has previously been restricted under (b) of this subsection, a period of ((not
less than)) ten years.

For purposes of this
section, "convicted" means being found guilty of an offense or being
placed on a deferred prosecution program under chapter 10.05 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.20.311 and 2001 c
325 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department
shall not suspend a driver's license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on
the public highways for a fixed period of more than one year, except as
specifically permitted under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.342, or other provision of
law. Except for a suspension under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.289, 46.20.291(5),
46.61.740, or 74.20A.320, whenever the license or driving privilege of any
person is suspended by reason of a conviction, a finding that a traffic
infraction has been committed, pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, or pursuant to RCW
46.20.291 or 46.20.308, the suspension shall remain in effect until the person
gives and thereafter maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future
as provided in chapter 46.29 RCW. If the suspension is the result of a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the
person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by the
alcoholism agency or probation department designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and
shall deny reinstatement until enrollment and participation in an approved
program has been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the
suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or is
the result of administrative action under RCW 46.20.308, and the person is required
pursuant to RCW 46.20.720 to drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a
functioning ignition interlock or other biological or technical device, the
department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon
written verification by an ignition interlock company doing business in the
state of Washington of installment of the required device on a vehicle owned
and/or operated by the person seeking reinstatement. Whenever the license
or driving privilege of any person is suspended as a result of certification of
noncompliance with a child support order under chapter 74.20A RCW or a
residential or visitation order, the suspension shall remain in effect until
the person provides a release issued by the department of social and health
services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

(b)(i) The department
shall not issue to the person a new, duplicate, or renewal license until the
person pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

(ii) If the suspension
is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or is the result of
administrative action under RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee shall be one hundred
fifty dollars.

(2)(a) Any person whose
license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways has been
revoked, unless the revocation was for a cause which has been removed, is not
entitled to have the license or privilege renewed or restored until: (i) After
the expiration of one year from the date the license or privilege to drive was
revoked; (ii) after the expiration of the applicable revocation period provided
by RCW 46.20.3101 or 46.61.5055; (iii) after the expiration of two years for
persons convicted of vehicular homicide; or (iv) after the expiration of the
applicable revocation period provided by RCW 46.20.265.

(b)(i) After the
expiration of the appropriate period, the person may make application for a new
license as provided by law together with a reissue fee in the amount of twenty
dollars.

(ii) If the revocation
is the result of a violation of RCW 46.20.308, 46.61.502, or 46.61.504, the
reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars. If the revocation is the
result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall
determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports
provided by the alcoholism agency or probation department designated under RCW
46.61.5056 and shall deny reissuance of a license, permit, or privilege to
drive until enrollment and participation in an approved program has been
established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the revocation is the
result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or is the result of
administrative action under RCW 46.20.308, and the person is required pursuant
to RCW 46.20.720 to drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning
ignition interlock or other biological or technical device, the department
shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon written
verification by an ignition interlock company doing business in the state of
Washington of installment of the required device on a vehicle owned and/or
operated by the person applying for a new license.

(c) Except for a
revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not then issue a new
license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the driving ability of
the person that it will be safe to grant the privilege of driving a motor
vehicle on the public highways, and until the person gives and thereafter
maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in chapter
46.29 RCW. For a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not
issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the driving
ability of the person that it will be safe to grant that person the privilege
of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.

(3)(a) Whenever the
driver's license of any person is suspended pursuant to Article IV of the
nonresident violators compact or RCW 46.23.020 or 46.20.289 or 46.20.291(5),
the department shall not issue to the person any new or renewal license until
the person pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

(b) If the
suspension is the result of a violation of the laws of this or any other state,
province, or other jurisdiction involving (i) the operation or physical control
of a motor vehicle upon the public highways while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs, or (ii) the refusal to submit to a chemical test
of the driver's blood alcohol content, the reissue fee shall be one hundred
fifty dollars.

---
END ---