BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.720 and 2001 c
247 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court may order
that after a period of suspension, revocation, or denial of driving privileges,
and for up to as long as the court has jurisdiction, any person convicted of
any offense involving the use, consumption, or possession of alcohol while
operating a motor vehicle may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a
functioning ignition interlock or other biological or technical device.

(2) ((If a)) The
department shall require that, after any applicable period of suspension,
revocation, or denial of driving privileges, a person may drive only a motor
vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or other biological or
technical device if the person is:

(a) Convicted of
a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance and
it is:

(((a))) (i)
The person's first conviction or a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW
and his or her alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or by reason of the
person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no
test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration; ((or (b)))

(ii) The
person's second or subsequent conviction; or (((c)))

(iii) The
person's first conviction and the person has a previous deferred prosecution
under chapter 10.05 RCW or it is a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW
and the person has a previous conviction((, the court shall order that after
any applicable period of suspension, revocation, or denial of driving
privileges, the person may drive)); or

(b) Restricted to
driving only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock
or other biological or technical device under RCW 46.20.308. ((The
requirement to drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition
interlock or other biological or technical device may not be suspended.))
The ((court)) department may waive the requirement for the use of
such a device if ((the court makes a specific finding in writing)) it
concludes that such devices are not reasonably available in the local
area. Nothing in this section may be interpreted as entitling a person to more
than one deferred prosecution.

(3) In the case of a
person under subsection (1) of this section, the court shall establish a
specific calibration setting at which the ignition interlock or other
biological or technical device will prevent the motor vehicle from being
started and the period of time that the person shall be subject to the
restriction. In the case of a person under subsection (2) of this section, the
ignition interlock or other biological or technical device shall be calibrated
to prevent the motor vehicle from being started when the breath sample provided
has an alcohol concentration of 0.025 or more, and the period of time of
the restriction will be as follows:

(a) For a person (i)
who is subject to RCW 46.61.5055 (1)(b), (2), or (3), or who is subject to a
deferred prosecution program under chapter 10.05 RCW, or who is subject to
restriction under RCW 46.20.308; and (ii) who has not previously been
restricted under this section, a period of ((not less than)) one year;

(b) For a person who
has previously been restricted under (a) of this subsection, a period of ((not
less than)) five years;

(c) For a person who
has previously been restricted under (b) of this subsection, a period of ((not
less than)) ten years.

For purposes of this section,
"convicted" means being found guilty of an offense or being placed on
a deferred prosecution program under chapter 10.05 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.20.308 and 1999 c
331 s 2 and 1999 c 274 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person who
operates a motor vehicle within this state is deemed to have given consent,
subject to the provisions of RCW 46.61.506, to a test or tests of his or her
breath or blood for the purpose of determining the alcohol concentration or
presence of any drug in his or her breath or blood if arrested for any offense
where, at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has reasonable grounds
to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or
was in violation of RCW 46.61.503.

(2) The test or tests
of breath shall be administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer
having reasonable grounds to believe the person to have been driving or in
actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or the person to have been driving
or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while having alcohol in a
concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 in his or her system and being
under the age of twenty-one. However, in those instances where the person is
incapable due to physical injury, physical incapacity, or other physical
limitation, of providing a breath sample or where the person is being treated
in a hospital, clinic, doctor's office, emergency medical vehicle, ambulance,
or other similar facility in which a breath testing instrument is not present
or where the officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person is under
the influence of a drug, a blood test shall be administered by a qualified
person as provided in RCW 46.61.506(4). The officer shall inform the person of
his or her right to refuse the breath or blood test, and of his or her right to
have additional tests administered by any qualified person of his or her
choosing as provided in RCW 46.61.506. The officer shall warn the driver that:

(a) His or her license,
permit, or privilege to drive will be revoked or denied if he or she refuses to
submit to the test and, after any period of revocation or denial, he or she
will be restricted to driving only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning
ignition interlock or other biological or technical device;

(b) His or her license,
permit, or privilege to drive will be suspended, revoked, or denied and,
after any period of suspension, revocation, or denial, he or she will be
restricted to driving only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition
interlock or other biological or technical device if the test is
administered and the test indicates the alcohol concentration of the person's
breath or blood is 0.08 or more, in the case of a person age twenty-one or
over, or in violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 in the case of
a person under age twenty-one; and

(c) His or her refusal
to take the test may be used in a criminal trial.

(3) Except as provided
in this section, the test administered shall be of the breath only. If an
individual is unconscious or is under arrest for the crime of vehicular
homicide as provided in RCW 46.61.520 or vehicular assault as provided in RCW
46.61.522, or if an individual is under arrest for the crime of driving while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs as provided in RCW
46.61.502, which arrest results from an accident in which there has been
serious bodily injury to another person, a breath or blood test may be
administered without the consent of the individual so arrested.

(4) Any person who is
dead, unconscious, or who is otherwise in a condition rendering him or her
incapable of refusal, shall be deemed not to have withdrawn the consent
provided by subsection (1) of this section and the test or tests may be
administered, subject to the provisions of RCW 46.61.506, and the person shall
be deemed to have received the warnings required under subsection (2) of this
section.

(5) If, following his
or her arrest and receipt of warnings under subsection (2) of this section, the
person arrested refuses upon the request of a law enforcement officer to submit
to a test or tests of his or her breath or blood, no test shall be given except
as authorized under subsection (3) or (4) of this section.

(6) If, after arrest
and after the other applicable conditions and requirements of this section have
been satisfied, a test or tests of the person's blood or breath is administered
and the test results indicate that the alcohol concentration of the person's
breath or blood is 0.08 or more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or is
in violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 if the person is under
the age of twenty-one, or the person refuses to submit to a test, the arresting
officer or other law enforcement officer at whose direction any test has been
given, or the department, where applicable, if the arrest results in a test of
the person's blood, shall:

(a) Serve notice in
writing on the person on behalf of the department of its intention to suspend,
revoke, or deny the person's license, permit, or privilege to drive and require
the person to drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition
interlock or other biological or technical device as required by subsection
(((7))) (8) of this section;

(b) Serve notice in
writing on the person on behalf of the department of his or her right to a
hearing, specifying the steps he or she must take to obtain a hearing as
provided by subsection (((8))) (9) of this section;

(c) Mark the person's
Washington state driver's license or permit to drive, if any, in a manner authorized
by the department;

(d) Serve notice in
writing that the marked license or permit, if any, is a temporary license that
is valid for sixty days from the date of arrest or from the date notice has
been given in the event notice is given by the department following a blood
test, or until the suspension, revocation, or denial of the person's license,
permit, or privilege to drive is sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection
(((8))) (9) of this section, whichever occurs first. No
temporary license is valid to any greater degree than the license or permit
that it replaces; and

(e) Immediately notify
the department of the arrest and transmit to the department within seventy-two
hours, except as delayed as the result of a blood test, a sworn report or report
under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 that states:

(i) That the officer
had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested person had been driving or was
in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or was under the age of
twenty-one years and had been driving or was in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle while having an alcohol concentration in violation of RCW
46.61.503;

(ii) That after receipt
of the warnings required by subsection (2) of this section the person refused
to submit to a test of his or her blood or breath, or a test was administered and
the results indicated that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or
blood was 0.08 or more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or was in
violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 if the person is under the
age of twenty-one; and

(iii) Any other
information that the director may require by rule.

(7) The department of
licensing, upon the receipt of a sworn report or report under a declaration
authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 under subsection (6)(e) of this section, shall
suspend, revoke, or deny the person's license, permit, or privilege to drive or
any nonresident operating privilege, as provided in RCW 46.20.3101, such
suspension, revocation, or denial to be effective beginning sixty days from the
date of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event notice is
given by the department following a blood test, or when sustained at a hearing
pursuant to subsection (((8))) (9) of this section, whichever
occurs first.

(8) The department
of licensing, upon the receipt of a sworn report or report under a declaration
authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 under subsection (6)(e) of this section, shall
require that after any applicable period of suspension, revocation, or denial
of driving privileges, the person may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with
a functioning ignition interlock or other biological or technical device
pursuant to RCW 46.20.720(3).

(9) A person
receiving notification under subsection (6)(b) of this section may, within
thirty days after the notice has been given, request in writing a formal
hearing before the department. The person shall pay a fee of one hundred
dollars as part of the request. If the request is mailed, it must be
postmarked within thirty days after receipt of the notification. Upon timely
receipt of such a request for a formal hearing, including receipt of the
required one hundred dollar fee, the department shall afford the person an
opportunity for a hearing. The department may waive the required one hundred
dollar fee if the person is an indigent as defined in RCW 10.101.010. Except
as otherwise provided in this section, the hearing is subject to and shall be
scheduled and conducted in accordance with RCW 46.20.329 and 46.20.332. The
hearing shall be conducted in the county of the arrest, except that all or part
of the hearing may, at the discretion of the department, be conducted by
telephone or other electronic means. The hearing shall be held within sixty
days following the arrest or following the date notice has been given in the
event notice is given by the department following a blood test, unless
otherwise agreed to by the department and the person, in which case the action
by the department shall be stayed, and any valid temporary license marked under
subsection (6)(c) of this section extended, if the person is otherwise eligible
for licensing. For the purposes of this section, the scope of the hearing
shall cover the issues of whether a law enforcement officer had reasonable
grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or had been driving or was in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her
system in a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 and was under the age
of twenty-one, whether the person was placed under arrest, and (a) whether the
person refused to submit to the test or tests upon request of the officer after
having been informed that such refusal would result in the revocation of the
person's license, permit, or privilege to drive and a requirement that the
person drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition
interlock or other biological or technical device, or (b) if a test or
tests were administered, whether the applicable requirements of this section
were satisfied before the administration of the test or tests, whether the
person submitted to the test or tests, or whether a test was administered
without express consent as permitted under this section, and whether the test
or tests indicated that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or
blood was 0.08 or more if the person was age twenty-one or over at the time of
the arrest, or was in violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 if
the person was under the age of twenty-one at the time of the arrest. The
sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085
submitted by a law enforcement officer is prima facie evidence that the officer
had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or the person had been driving or was
in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while having
alcohol in his or her system in a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503
and was under the age of twenty-one and that the officer complied with the
requirements of this section.

A hearing officer shall
conduct the hearing, may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and
the production of documents, and shall administer oaths to witnesses. The
hearing officer shall not issue a subpoena for the attendance of a witness at
the request of the person unless the request is accompanied by the fee required
by RCW 5.56.010 for a witness in district court. The sworn report or report
under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 of the law enforcement officer
and any other evidence accompanying the report shall be admissible without
further evidentiary foundation and the certifications authorized by the
criminal rules for courts of limited jurisdiction shall be admissible without
further evidentiary foundation. The person may be represented by counsel, may
question witnesses, may present evidence, and may testify. The department
shall order that the suspension, revocation, or denial and requirement that
the person drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition
interlock or other biological or technical device either be rescinded or
sustained.

(((9))) (10)
If the suspension, revocation, or denial and requirement that the person
drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or
other biological or technical device is sustained after such a hearing, the
person whose license, privilege, or permit is suspended, revoked, or denied and
who is required to drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning
ignition interlock or other biological or technical device has the right to
file a petition in the superior court of the county of arrest to review the
final order of revocation by the department in the same manner as an appeal
from a decision of a court of limited jurisdiction. Notice of appeal must be filed
within thirty days after the date the final order is served or the right to
appeal is waived. Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.334, RALJ 1.1, or other statutes
or rules referencing de novo review, the appeal shall be limited to a review of
the record of the administrative hearing. The appellant must pay the costs
associated with obtaining the record of the hearing before the hearing
officer. The filing of the appeal does not stay the effective date of the
suspension, revocation, or denial. A petition filed under this subsection must
include the petitioner's grounds for requesting review. Upon granting
petitioner's request for review, the court shall review the department's final
order of suspension, revocation, or denial and requirement that the person
drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or
other biological or technical device as expeditiously as possible. The
review must be limited to a determination of whether the department has
committed any errors of law. The superior court shall accept those factual
determinations supported by substantial evidence in the record: (a) That were
expressly made by the department; or (b) that may reasonably be inferred from
the final order of the department. The superior court may reverse, affirm, or
modify the decision of the department or remand the case back to the department
for further proceedings. The decision of the superior court must be in writing
and filed in the clerk's office with the other papers in the case. The court
shall state the reasons for the decision. If judicial relief is sought for a
stay or other temporary remedy from the department's action, the court shall
not grant such relief unless the court finds that the appellant is likely to
prevail in the appeal and that without a stay the appellant will suffer
irreparable injury. If the court stays the suspension, revocation, or denial
it may impose conditions on such stay.

(((10))) (11)
If a person whose driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive has been or
will be suspended, revoked, or denied under subsection (7) of this section,
other than as a result of a breath or blood test refusal, and who has not
committed an offense for which he or she was granted a deferred prosecution
under chapter 10.05 RCW, petitions a court for a deferred prosecution on
criminal charges arising out of the arrest for which action has been or will be
taken under subsection (7) of this section, the court may direct the department
to stay any actual or proposed suspension, revocation, or denial for at least
forty-five days but not more than ninety days. If the court stays the
suspension, revocation, or denial, it may impose conditions on such stay. If
the person is otherwise eligible for licensing, the department shall issue a temporary
license, or extend any valid temporary license marked under subsection (6) of
this section, for the period of the stay. If a deferred prosecution treatment
plan is not recommended in the report made under RCW 10.05.050, or if treatment
is rejected by the court, or if the person declines to accept an offered
treatment plan, or if the person violates any condition imposed by the court,
then the court shall immediately direct the department to cancel the stay and
any temporary marked license or extension of a temporary license issued under
this subsection.

A suspension,
revocation, or denial imposed under this section, other than as a result of a
breath or blood test refusal, shall be stayed if the person is accepted for
deferred prosecution as provided in chapter 10.05 RCW for the incident upon
which the suspension, revocation, or denial is based. If the deferred
prosecution is terminated, the stay shall be lifted and the suspension,
revocation, or denial reinstated. If the deferred prosecution is completed,
the stay shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or denial canceled.

(((11))) (12)
When it has been finally determined under the procedures of this section that a
nonresident's privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state has been suspended,
revoked, or denied and, after any applicable period of suspension,
revocation, or denial of driving privileges, the person may drive only a motor
vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or other biological or
technical device pursuant to RCW 46.20.720(3), the department shall give
information in writing of the action taken to the motor vehicle administrator
of the state of the person's residence and of any state in which he or she has
a license.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.20.311 and 2001 c
325 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department
shall not suspend a driver's license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on
the public highways for a fixed period of more than one year, except as
specifically permitted under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.342, or other provision of
law. Except for a suspension under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.289, 46.20.291(5),
46.61.740, or 74.20A.320, whenever the license or driving privilege of any
person is suspended by reason of a conviction, a finding that a traffic infraction
has been committed, pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, or pursuant to RCW 46.20.291
or 46.20.308, the suspension shall remain in effect until the person gives and
thereafter maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as
provided in chapter 46.29 RCW. If the suspension is the result of a violation
of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the person's
eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by the alcoholism
agency or probation department designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny
reinstatement until enrollment and participation in an approved program has
been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the suspension
is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or is the result of
administrative action under RCW 46.20.308, and the person is required pursuant
to RCW 46.20.720 to drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning
ignition interlock or other biological or technical device, the department
shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon written
verification by an ignition interlock company doing business in the state of
Washington of installment of the required device on a vehicle owned and/or
operated by the person seeking reinstatement. Whenever the license or
driving privilege of any person is suspended as a result of certification of
noncompliance with a child support order under chapter 74.20A RCW or a
residential or visitation order, the suspension shall remain in effect until
the person provides a release issued by the department of social and health
services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

(b)(i) The department
shall not issue to the person a new, duplicate, or renewal license until the
person pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

(ii) If the suspension
is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or is the result of
administrative action under RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee shall be one hundred
fifty dollars.

(2)(a) Any person whose
license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways has been
revoked, unless the revocation was for a cause which has been removed, is not
entitled to have the license or privilege renewed or restored until: (i) After
the expiration of one year from the date the license or privilege to drive was
revoked; (ii) after the expiration of the applicable revocation period provided
by RCW 46.20.3101 or 46.61.5055; (iii) after the expiration of two years for
persons convicted of vehicular homicide; or (iv) after the expiration of the
applicable revocation period provided by RCW 46.20.265.

(b)(i) After the
expiration of the appropriate period, the person may make application for a new
license as provided by law together with a reissue fee in the amount of twenty
dollars.

(ii) If the revocation
is the result of a violation of RCW 46.20.308, 46.61.502, or 46.61.504, the
reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars. If the revocation is the
result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall
determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports
provided by the alcoholism agency or probation department designated under RCW
46.61.5056 and shall deny reissuance of a license, permit, or privilege to
drive until enrollment and participation in an approved program has been
established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the revocation is the
result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or is the result of
administrative action under RCW 46.20.308, and the person is required pursuant
to RCW 46.20.720 to drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning
ignition interlock or other biological or technical device, the department
shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon written
verification by an ignition interlock company doing business in the state of
Washington of installment of the required device on a vehicle owned and/or
operated by the person applying for a new license.

(c) Except for a
revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not then issue a new
license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the driving ability of
the person that it will be safe to grant the privilege of driving a motor
vehicle on the public highways, and until the person gives and thereafter maintains
proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in chapter 46.29
RCW. For a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not issue a
new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the driving ability
of the person that it will be safe to grant that person the privilege of
driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.

(3)(a) Whenever the
driver's license of any person is suspended pursuant to Article IV of the
nonresident violators compact or RCW 46.23.020 or 46.20.289 or 46.20.291(5),
the department shall not issue to the person any new or renewal license until
the person pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

(b) If the
suspension is the result of a violation of the laws of this or any other state,
province, or other jurisdiction involving (i) the operation or physical control
of a motor vehicle upon the public highways while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs, or (ii) the refusal to submit to a chemical test
of the driver's blood alcohol content, the reissue fee shall be one hundred
fifty dollars.

---
END ---