BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.24.035 and 1999 c
193 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No stamp may be
affixed to, or made upon, any container or package of cigarettes if:

(a) The container or
package differs in any respect with the requirements of the federal cigarette
labeling and advertising act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1331 et seq.) for the placement of
labels, warnings, or any other information upon a package of cigarettes that is
to be sold within the United States;

(b) The container or
package has been imported into the United States after January 1, 2000, in
violation of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5754;

(c) The container or
package, including a container of individually stamped containers or packages,
is labeled "For Export Only," "U.S. Tax Exempt," "For
Use Outside U.S.," or similar wording indicating that the manufacturer did
not intend that the product be sold in the United States; or

(d) The container or
package has been altered by adding or deleting the wording, labels, or warnings
described in (a) or (c) of this subsection.

(2) No stamp may be
affixed to, or made upon, any container or package of cigarettes and no tax may
be paid under chapter 82.26 RCW on roll-your-own tobacco, unless the tobacco
product manufacturer who makes or sells those cigarettes or roll-your-own
tobacco has:

(a) Become a
participating manufacturer as defined in RCW 70.157.020(a); or

(b) Made all escrow
payments required by RCW 70.157.020(b), as determined by the attorney general,
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

(3) The attorney
general shall annually, not later than May 15th of each year, post on the
attorney general's web site and transmit to all wholesalers, retailers that
affix stamps, and distributors that pay the tax under chapter 82.26 RCW, a list
of tobacco product manufacturers determined by the attorney general to have
made all escrow payments required by RCW 70.157.020(b). The department of
revenue and the attorney general may require wholesalers, retailers, or
distributors under chapter 82.26 RCW and nonparticipating tobacco product
manufacturers to submit information the attorney general may determine is
necessary to determine whether a nonparticipating manufacturer has made the
escrow payments required by RCW 70.157.020(b). Any nonparticipating
manufacturer excluded or removed from the list may challenge the decision of the
attorney general within sixty days of any decision by the attorney general to
exclude or remove a nonparticipating manufacturer from the list. The attorney
general shall include the nonparticipating tobacco product manufacturer on the
list provisionally, pending the conclusion of a hearing by the attorney general
of the challenge and the attorney general's final decision, if the manufacturer
posts a bond in an amount equal to the amount of the escrow payments that the
attorney general has determined that RCW 70.157.020(b) required the
manufacturer to make with respect to cigarettes and roll-your-own tobacco sold
during the period of the manufacturer's noncompliance as determined by the
attorney general. Any final decision of the attorney general may be appealed
in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(4) To promote
compliance with RCW 70.157.020(b), the attorney general may require
nonparticipating manufacturers to make the escrow payments required by RCW
70.157.020(b) in quarterly installments during the year in which the sales
covered by the payments are made.

(5) The department
of revenue and the attorney general may enter into a written agreement
authorizing the exchange of information reasonably necessary to the enforcement
and administration of subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

(6)
In addition to the penalty and forfeiture provisions otherwise provided for in
this chapter, a violation of this section is a deceptive act or practice under
the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

--- END ---