BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purpose of this act
is to affirm the authority of cities and towns to operate fire hydrants and
streetlights as part of their rate-based water and electric utilities,
respectively. The legislature finds that it has been the practice of most, if
not all, cities and towns, as well as water and sewer districts, since the
early days of statehood to include the operation of fire hydrants for fire and
maintenance purposes as a normal part of the water utility providing the
service, and to incorporate the cost of this operation as a normal part of the
utility's general rate structure. The legislature further finds and declares
that it has been the intent of the legislature that cities and towns, just as
water and sewer districts, have the right to operate and maintain streetlights
in the same manner as fire hydrants, that is, as a normal part of the electric
utility and a normal part of that utility's general rate structure. The
legislature therefore affirms that authority.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.92.010 and 1991 c
347 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

A city or town may
construct, condemn and purchase, purchase, acquire, add to, alter, maintain and
operate waterworks, including fire hydrants as an integral utility service
incorporated within general rates, within or without its limits, for the
purpose of furnishing the city and its inhabitants, and any other persons, with
an ample supply of water for all purposes, public and private, including water
power and other power derived therefrom, with full power to regulate and
control the use, distribution, and price thereof: PROVIDED, That the rates
charged must be uniform for the same class of customers or service. Such
waterworks may include facilities for the generation of electricity as a
byproduct and such electricity may be used by the city or town or sold to an
entity authorized by law to distribute electricity. Such electricity is a
byproduct when the electrical generation is subordinate to the primary purpose
of water supply.

In classifying
customers served or service furnished, the city or town governing body may in
its discretion consider any or all of the following factors: The difference in
cost of service to the various customers; location of the various customers
within and without the city or town; the difference in cost of maintenance,
operation, repair, and replacement of the various parts of the system; the
different character of the service furnished various customers; the quantity
and quality of the water furnished; the time of its use; the achievement of
water conservation goals and the discouragement of wasteful water use
practices; capital contributions made to the system including, but not limited
to, assessments; and any other matters which present a reasonable difference as
a ground for distinction. No rate shall be charged that is less than the cost
of the water and service to the class of customers served.

For such purposes any
city or town may take, condemn and purchase, purchase, acquire, and retain
water from any public or navigable lake or watercourse, surface or ground, and,
by means of aqueducts or pipe lines, conduct it to the city or town; and it may
erect and build dams or other works across or at the outlet of any lake or
watercourse in this state for the purpose of storing and retaining water
therein up to and above high water mark; and for all the purposes of erecting
such aqueducts, pipe lines, dams, or waterworks or other necessary structures
in storing and retaining water, or for any of the purposes provided for by this
chapter, the city or town may occupy and use the beds and shores up to the high
water mark of any such watercourse or lake, and acquire the right by purchase,
or by condemnation and purchase, or otherwise, to any water, water rights,
easements or privileges named in this chapter, or necessary for any of said
purposes, and the city or town may acquire by purchase or condemnation and
purchase any properties or privileges necessary to be had to protect its water
supply from pollution. Should private property be necessary for any such
purposes or for storing water above high water mark, the city or town may
condemn and purchase, or purchase and acquire such private property. For the
purposes of waterworks which include facilities for the generation of
electricity as a byproduct, nothing in this section may be construed to
authorize a city or town that does not own or operate an electric utility
system to condemn electric generating, transmission, or distribution rights or
facilities of entities authorized by law to distribute electricity, or to
acquire such rights or facilities without the consent of the owner.

Sec. 3. RCW 35.92.050 and 1985 c
445 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

A city or town may also
construct, condemn and purchase, purchase, acquire, add to, alter, maintain and
operate works, plants, facilities for the purpose of furnishing the city or
town and its inhabitants, and any other persons, with gas, electricity, and
other means of power and facilities for lighting, including streetlights as
an integral utility service incorporated within general rates, heating,
fuel, and power purposes, public and private, with full authority to regulate
and control the use, distribution, and price thereof, together with the right
to handle and sell or lease, any meters, lamps, motors, transformers, and
equipment or accessories of any kind, necessary and convenient for the use,
distribution, and sale thereof; authorize the construction of such plant or plants
by others for the same purpose, and purchase gas, electricity, or power from
either within or without the city or town for its own use and for the purpose
of selling to its inhabitants and to other persons doing business within the
city or town and regulate and control the use and price thereof.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---