BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.119A.060 and 1995
c 376 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to assure
safe and reliable public drinking water and to protect the public health,
public water systems shall:

(a) Protect the water
sources used for drinking water;

(b) Provide treatment
adequate to assure that the public health is protected;

(c) Provide and
effectively operate and maintain public water system facilities;

(d) Plan for future
growth and assure the availability of safe and reliable drinking water;

(e) Provide the
department with the current names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the
owners, operators, and emergency contact persons for the system, including any
changes to this information, and provide to users the name and twenty-four hour
telephone number of an emergency contact person; and

(f) Take whatever
investigative or corrective action is necessary to assure that a safe and
reliable drinking water supply is continuously available to users.

(2) No new public water
system may be approved or created unless: (a) It is owned or operated by a
satellite system management agency established under RCW 70.116.134 and the
satellite system management system complies with financial viability
requirements of the department; or (b) a satellite management system is not
available and it is determined that the new system has sufficient management
and financial resources to provide safe and reliable service. The approval of
any new system that is not owned by a satellite system management agency shall
be conditioned upon future management or ownership by a satellite system
management agency, if such management or ownership can be made with reasonable
economy and efficiency, or upon periodic review of the system's operational
history to determine its ability to meet the department's financial viability
and other operating requirements. The department and local health
jurisdictions shall enforce this requirement under authority provided under
this chapter, chapter 70.116, or 70.05 RCW, or other authority governing the
approval of new water systems by the department or a local jurisdiction.

(3) The department and
local health jurisdictions shall carry out the rules and regulations of the
state board of health adopted pursuant to RCW 43.20.050(2)(a) and
70.142.010, and other rules adopted by the department relating to public
water systems.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.20.050 and 1993 c
492 s 489 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state board of
health shall provide a forum for the development of public health policy in
Washington state. It is authorized to recommend to the secretary means for
obtaining appropriate citizen and professional involvement in all public health
policy formulation and other matters related to the powers and duties of the
department. It is further empowered to hold hearings and explore ways to
improve the health status of the citizenry.

(a) At least every five
years, the state board shall convene regional forums to gather citizen input on
public health issues.

(b) Every two years, in
coordination with the development of the state biennial budget, the state board
shall prepare the state public health report that outlines the health
priorities of the ensuing biennium. The report shall:

(i) Consider the
citizen input gathered at the forums;

(ii) Be developed with
the assistance of local health departments;

(iii) Be based on the
best available information collected and reviewed according to RCW 43.70.050 ((and
recommendations from the council));

(iv) Be developed with
the input of state health care agencies. At least the following directors of
state agencies shall provide timely recommendations to the state board on
suggested health priorities for the ensuing biennium: The secretary of social
and health services, the health care authority administrator, the insurance
commissioner, the superintendent of public instruction, the director of labor
and industries, the director of ecology, and the director of agriculture;

(v) Be used by state
health care agency administrators in preparing proposed agency budgets and
executive request legislation;

(vi) Be submitted by
the state board to the governor by January 1 of each even-numbered year for
adoption by the governor. The governor, no later than March 1 of that year,
shall approve, modify, or disapprove the state public health report.

(c) In fulfilling its
responsibilities under this subsection, the state board may create ad hoc
committees or other such committees of limited duration as necessary.

(2) In order to protect
public health, the state board of health shall:

(a) Adopt rules
necessary to assure safe and reliable public drinking water and to protect the
public health. Such rules shall establish requirements regarding:

(i) The design and
construction of public water system facilities, including proper sizing of
pipes and storage for the number and type of customers;

(ii) Drinking water
quality standards, monitoring requirements, and laboratory certification
requirements;

(iii) Products,
substances, or chemicals added to public water systems as defined in RCW 70.119A.020,
for the purpose of treating or affecting the physical or mental functions of
the body of any person, rather than to make the water safe or potable;

(iv) Public
water system management and reporting requirements;

(((iv))) (v)
Public water system planning and emergency response requirements;

(((v))) (vi)
Public water system operation and maintenance requirements;

(((vi))) (vii)
Water quality, reliability, and management of existing but inadequate public
water systems; and

(((vii))) (viii)
Quality standards for the source or supply, or both source and supply, of water
for bottled water plants.

(b) Adopt rules and
standards for prevention, control, and abatement of health hazards and
nuisances related to the disposal of wastes, solid and liquid, including but
not limited to sewage, garbage, refuse, and other environmental contaminants;
adopt standards and procedures governing the design, construction, and
operation of sewage, garbage, refuse and other solid waste collection,
treatment, and disposal facilities;

(c) Adopt rules
controlling public health related to environmental conditions including but not
limited to heating, lighting, ventilation, sanitary facilities, cleanliness and
space in all types of public facilities including but not limited to food
service establishments, schools, institutions, recreational facilities and
transient accommodations and in places of work;

(d) Adopt rules for the
imposition and use of isolation and quarantine;

(e) Adopt rules for the
prevention and control of infectious and noninfectious diseases, including food
and vector borne illness, and rules governing the receipt and conveyance of
remains of deceased persons, and such other sanitary matters as admit of and
may best be controlled by universal rule; and

(f) Adopt rules for
accessing existing data bases for the purposes of performing health related
research.

(3) The state board may
delegate any of its rule-adopting authority to the secretary and rescind such
delegated authority.

(4) All local boards of
health, health authorities and officials, officers of state institutions,
police officers, sheriffs, constables, and all other officers and employees of
the state, or any county, city, or township thereof, shall enforce all rules
adopted by the state board of health. In the event of failure or refusal on
the part of any member of such boards or any other official or person mentioned
in this section to so act, he shall be subject to a fine of not less than fifty
dollars, upon first conviction, and not less than one hundred dollars upon
second conviction.

(5) The state board may
advise the secretary on health policy issues pertaining to the department of
health and the state.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.142.010 and 1984
c 187 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to protect
public health from chemical contaminants in drinking water, the state board of
health shall conduct public hearings and, where technical data allow, establish
by rule standards for allowable concentrations. For purposes of this chapter,
the words "chemical contaminants" are limited to synthetic organic
chemical contaminants and to any other contaminants which in the opinion of the
board constitute a threat to public health. If adequate data to support setting
of a standard is available, the state board of health shall adopt by rule a
maximum contaminant level for water provided to consumers' taps. Standards set
for contaminants known to be toxic shall consider both short-term and chronic
toxicity. Standards set for contaminants known to be carcinogenic shall be
consistent with risk levels established by the state board of health.

(2) The board shall
consider the best available scientific information in establishing the
standards. The board may review and revise the standards. State and local
standards for chemical contaminants may be more strict than the federal
standards.

(3)(a) In order to
protect public health from other additives in drinking water, the state board
of health shall adopt by rule standards for any product, substance, or chemical
that is added or proposed to be added to a public water system as defined in
RCW 70.119A.020(4), for the purpose of treating or affecting the physical or
mental functions of the body of any person, rather than to make the water safe
or potable. The board shall not adopt standards for any such product,
substance, or chemical unless: (i) It has been specifically approved by the
federal food and drug administration for safety and effectiveness with a margin
of safety that is protective for all adverse health and cosmetic effects at all
ranges of unrestricted consumption; and (ii) it contains no contaminants, at
concentrations that exceed federal maximum contaminant level goals or state
public health goals, when used at maximum use levels.

(b) It is be
unlawful for any person to add a product, substance, or chemical to a public
water system for the purpose of treating or affecting the physical or mental
functions of the body of any person, unless the standards for the product,
substance, or chemical have been adopted by the state board of health. A
violation of this subsection (3) is a misdemeanor punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 4. RCW 57.08.012 and 1988 c
11 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to RCW
70.142.010, a water district by a majority vote of its board of commissioners
may fluoridate the water supply system of the water district. The
commissioners may cause the proposition of fluoridation of the water supply to
be submitted to the electors of the water district at any general election or
special election to be called for the purpose of voting on the proposition.
The proposition must be approved by a majority of the electors voting on the
proposition to become effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---