BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 60.04.031 and 1992 c
126 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided in this section, every person furnishing professional services,
materials, or equipment for the improvement of real property shall give the
owner or reputed owner notice in writing of the right to claim a lien. If the
prime contractor is in compliance with the requirements of RCW 19.27.095,
60.04.230, and 60.04.261, this notice shall also be given to the prime
contractor as described in this subsection unless the potential lien claimant
has contracted directly with the prime contractor. The notice may be given at
any time but only protects the right to claim a lien for professional services,
materials, or equipment supplied after the date which is sixty days before:

(a) Mailing the notice
by certified or registered mail to the owner or reputed owner; or

(b) Delivering or
serving the notice personally upon the owner or reputed owner and obtaining
evidence of delivery in the form of a receipt or other acknowledgement signed
by the owner or reputed owner or an affidavit of service.

In the case of new
construction, repair, alteration, or remodel of a single-family
residence, the notice of a right to claim a lien may be given at any time but
only protects the right to claim a lien for professional services, materials,
or equipment supplied after ((a date which is ten days before)) the
notice is given as described in this subsection.

(2) Notices of a right
to claim a lien shall not be required of:

(a) Persons who
contract directly with the owner or the owner's common law agent;

(b) Laborers whose
claim of lien is based solely on performing labor; or

(c) Subcontractors who
contract for the improvement of real property directly with the prime
contractor, except as provided in subsection (3)(b) of this section.

(3) Persons who furnish
professional services, materials, or equipment in connection with the repair,
alteration, or remodel of an existing owner-occupied single-family residence or
appurtenant garage or in connection with new construction of a single-family
residence for a residential owner:

(a) Who contract
directly with the ((owner-occupier)) owner or their common law
agent shall not be required to send a written notice of the right to claim a
lien and shall have a lien for the full amount due under their contract, as provided
in RCW 60.04.021; or

(b) Who do not contract
directly with the ((owner-occupier)) owner or their common law
agent shall give notice of the right to claim a lien to the ((owner-occupier))
owner. Liens of persons furnishing professional services, materials, or
equipment who do not contract directly with the ((owner-occupier)) owner
or their common law agent may only be satisfied from amounts designated in
the contract for the professional services, materials, or equipment supplied
upon which the lien claim is based and not yet paid to the prime contractor
by the owner at the time the notice described in this section is received,
regardless of whether amounts not yet paid to the prime contractor are due. For
lien claims under this subsection based on new construction, repair,
alteration, or remodel of a single-family residence, recovery is limited to the
lesser of the full amount of the claim or ten percent of the full construction
contract price. For the purposes of this subsection "received"
means actual receipt of notice by personal service, or registered or certified
mail, or three days after mailing by registered or certified mail, excluding
Saturdays, Sundays, or legal holidays.

(4) The notice of right
to claim a lien described in subsection (1) of this section, shall include but
not be limited to the following information and shall substantially be in the
following form, using lower-case and upper-case ten-point type where
appropriate.

NOTICE
TO OWNER

IMPORTANT:
READ BOTH SIDES OF THIS NOTICE

CAREFULLY.

PROTECT
YOURSELF FROM PAYING TWICE

To: ............. Date:..........................

Re: (description
of property: Street address or general location.)

From: ..........................................................

AT THE REQUEST OF: (Name of person ordering the
professional services, materials, or equipment)

THIS IS NOT A LIEN‑-THIS
NOTICE IS MEANT TO PROVIDE YOU WITH INFORMATION NECESSARY TO PROPERLY MANAGE
YOUR CONSTRUCTION PROJECT: This notice is sent to you to tell you who is
providing professional services, materials, or equipment for the improvement of
your property and to advise you of the rights of these persons and your
responsibilities. Also take note that laborers on your project may claim a
lien without sending you a notice.

OWNER/OCCUPIER
OF EXISTING

RESIDENTIAL
PROPERTY AND/OR

NEW
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY

Under Washington law, those
who furnish labor, professional services, materials, or equipment for the
repair, remodel, or alteration of your owner-occupied principal residence and
who are not paid, have a right to enforce their claim for payment against your
property. This claim is known as a construction lien.

The law limits the amount
that a lien claimant can claim against your property. If the improvement to
your property is the construction of a new single-family residence, a lien may
be claimed for all professional services, materials, or equipment furnished
after the date this notice was given to you or mailed to you. Claims may
only be made against that portion of the contract price you have not yet paid
to your prime contractor as of the time this notice was given to you or three
days after this notice was mailed to you. Review the back of this notice for
more information and ways to avoid lien claims.

COMMERCIAL
((AND/OR NEW

RESIDENTIAL)) PROPERTY

We have or will be
providing professional services, materials, or equipment for the improvement of
your commercial ((or new residential)) project. In the event you or
your contractor fail to pay us, we may file a lien against your property. A
lien may be claimed for all professional services, materials, or equipment
furnished after a date that is sixty days before this notice was given to you
or mailed to you((, unless the improvement to your property is the
construction of a new single-family residence, then ten days before this notice
was given to you or mailed to you)).

Sender: ....................................................

Address: ...................................................

Telephone: .................................................

Brief description of
professional services, materials, or equipment provided or to be provided: ....................................

IMPORTANT
INFORMATION

ON
REVERSE SIDE

IMPORTANT
INFORMATION

FOR
YOUR PROTECTION

This notice is sent to
inform you that we have or will provide professional services, materials, or
equipment for the improvement of your property. We expect to be paid by the
person who ordered our services, but if we are not paid, we have the right to
enforce our claim by filing a construction lien against your property.

LEARN more about the lien
laws and the meaning of this notice by discussing them with your contractor,
suppliers, Department of Labor and Industries, the firm sending you this
notice, your lender, or your attorney.

COMMON METHODS TO AVOID
CONSTRUCTION LIENS: There are several methods available to protect your
property from construction liens. The following are two of the more commonly
used methods.

DUAL
PAYCHECKS (Joint Checks): When paying your contractor for services or
materials, you may make checks payable jointly to the contractor and the firms
furnishing you this notice.

LIEN
RELEASES: You may require your contractor to provide lien releases signed by
all the suppliers and subcontractors from whom you have received this notice.
If they cannot obtain lien releases because you have not paid them, you may use
the dual payee check method to protect yourself.

YOU SHOULD TAKE APPROPRIATE
STEPS TO PROTECT YOUR PROPERTY FROM LIENS.

YOUR PRIME CONTRACTOR AND
YOUR CONSTRUCTION LENDER ARE REQUIRED BY LAW TO GIVE YOU WRITTEN INFORMATION
ABOUT LIEN CLAIMS. IF YOU HAVE NOT RECEIVED IT, ASK THEM FOR IT.

* * *
* * * * * * * * * *

(5) Every potential
lien claimant providing professional services where no improvement as defined
in RCW 60.04.011(5) (a) or (b) has been commenced, and the professional
services provided are not visible from an inspection of the real property may
record in the real property records of the county where the property is located
a notice which shall contain the professional service provider's name, address,
telephone number, legal description of the property, the owner or reputed
owner's name, and the general nature of the professional services provided. If
such notice is not recorded, the lien claimed shall be subordinate to the
interest of any subsequent mortgagee and invalid as to the interest of any
subsequent purchaser if the mortgagee or purchaser acts in good faith and for a
valuable consideration acquires an interest in the property prior to the
commencement of an improvement as defined in RCW 60.04.011(5) (a) or (b)
without notice of the professional services being provided. The notice
described in this subsection shall be substantially in the following form:

NOTICE
OF FURNISHING

PROFESSIONAL
SERVICES

That on the (day) day of (month and
year) , (name of
provider) began providing professional services upon or
for the improvement of real property legally described as follows:

[Legal
Description

is
mandatory]

The general nature of
the professional services provided is..

.................................................................

The owner or reputed owner
of the real property is...............

.................................................................

...................................

(Signature)

...................................

(Name
of Claimant)

...................................

(Street
Address)

...................................

(City,
State, Zip Code)

...................................

(Phone
Number)

(6) A lien authorized
by this chapter shall not be enforced unless the lien claimant has complied
with the applicable provisions of this section.

(7) For
the purposes of this section, "commercial property" includes
residential property that is not owned by a residential homeowner.

--- END ---