BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.47 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that many low-wage workers and their families are eligible for, or
receive health insurance coverage through, the basic health plan and medical
assistance programs. Some of these low-wage workers may work for employers who
do not offer health insurance or may have access to employer-sponsored health
insurance for themselves and their dependents, but that insurance may be
unaffordable for the worker. The legislature finds that pilot projects should
be established to determine whether it is appropriate to use basic health plan
and medical assistance funds to subsidize premium shares for employer-sponsored
health insurance when such a subsidy would be cost-effective for the state.

(2) Upon receipt of a
reasonable request from an entity that has received funding through the federal
health resources and services administration community access program to
develop a regional system for increased access to health services and health
insurance coverage, the administrator shall develop mechanisms to apply subsidy
payments toward premium shares for employer-sponsored health insurance for the
employees and their dependents, rather than as direct payments to managed
health care systems participating in the basic health plan. The payment
mechanisms must be developed in consultation with the requesting entity, the
department of social and health services, and other interested entities, and
must meet the following criteria:

(a) Subsidy payments
may be made only on behalf of individuals who meet the basic health plan
eligibility criteria in effect at the time the pilot project is underway; and

(b) Subsidy payments
toward premium shares for employer-sponsored health insurance must be
cost-effective. The payment amount must not exceed the subsidy payment amount
that would be made to the benchmark managed health care system participating in
the basic health plan in the counties covered by the pilot project if that
employee had enrolled directly in the basic health plan.

(3) By November 1,
2002, the administrator and the secretary of the department of social and
health services must jointly report to the health care committees of the senate
and the house of representatives on their progress in developing the payment
mechanisms authorized in this act.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.47.020 and 2000 c
79 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Washington
basic health plan" or "plan" means the system of enrollment and
payment for basic health care services, administered by the plan administrator
through participating managed health care systems, created by this chapter.

(2)
"Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan administrator,
who also holds the position of administrator of the Washington state health
care authority.

(3) "Managed
health care system" means: (a) Any health care organization, including
health care providers, insurers, health care service contractors, health
maintenance organizations, or any combination thereof, that provides directly
or by contract basic health care services, as defined by the administrator and
rendered by duly licensed providers, to a defined patient population enrolled
in the plan and in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized enrollees
provided under RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations under RCW
70.47.100(7).

(4) "Subsidized enrollee"
means an individual, or an individual plus the individual's spouse or dependent
children: (a) Who is not eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or
residing in a government-operated institution, unless he or she meets
eligibility criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who resides in an area
of the state served by a managed health care system participating in the plan;
(d) whose gross family income at the time of enrollment does not exceed two
hundred percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and
determined annually by the federal department of health and human services; and
(e) who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular managed
health care system in return for periodic payments to the plan. To the extent
that state funds are specifically appropriated for this purpose, with a
corresponding federal match, "subsidized enrollee" also means an
individual, or an individual's spouse or dependent children, who meets the
requirements in (a) through (c) and (e) of this subsection and whose gross
family income at the time of enrollment is more than two hundred percent, but
less than two hundred fifty-one percent, of the federal poverty level as
adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal department of
health and human services.

(5) "Nonsubsidized
enrollee" means an individual, or an individual plus the individual's
spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not eligible for medicare; (b) who is
not confined or residing in a government-operated institution, unless he or she
meets eligibility criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who resides in an
area of the state served by a managed health care system participating in the
plan; (d) who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular
managed health care system; and (e) who pays or on whose behalf is paid the
full costs for participation in the plan, without any subsidy from the plan.

(6) "Subsidy"
means the difference between the amount of periodic payment the administrator
makes to a managed health care system or an entity authorized in section 1
of this act on behalf of a subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost
to the plan of providing the plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the amount
determined to be the subsidized enrollee's responsibility under RCW
70.47.060(2).

(7) "Premium"
means a periodic payment, based upon gross family income which an individual,
their employer or another financial sponsor makes to the plan as consideration
for enrollment in the plan as a subsidized enrollee or a nonsubsidized
enrollee.

(8) "Rate"
means the amount, negotiated by the administrator with and paid to a
participating managed health care system, that is based upon the enrollment of
subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in the plan and in that system.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that many low-wage workers and their families are eligible for, or
receive health insurance coverage through, the basic health plan and medical
assistance programs. Some of these low-wage workers may work for employers who
do not offer health insurance or may have access to employer-sponsored health
insurance for themselves and their dependents, but that insurance may be
unaffordable for the worker. The legislature finds that pilot projects should
be established to determine whether it is appropriate to use basic health plan
and medical assistance funds to subsidize premium shares for employer-sponsored
health insurance when such a subsidy would be cost-effective for the state.

(2) Upon receipt of a
request from an entity that has received funding from the federal health
resources and services administration community access program to develop a
regional system for increased access to health services and health insurance
coverage, the secretary shall use his or her existing authority under Title XIX
of the federal social security act to pay premium shares for employer-sponsored
health insurance for the employees and their dependents. Payment mechanisms
must be developed in consultation with the requesting entity, the health care
authority, and other interested entities, and must meet the following criteria:

(a) Subsidy payments
may be made only on behalf of individuals who meet medical assistance
eligibility criteria in effect at the time the pilot project is underway; and

(b)
Payments toward premium shares for employer-sponsored health insurance must be
cost-effective, as defined in federal law.

---
END ---