BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.16.015 and 1998 c
342 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Neither the
department of licensing nor its agents may issue or renew a motor vehicle
license for any vehicle or change the registered owner of a licensed vehicle,
for any vehicle that is required to be inspected under chapter 70.120 RCW,
unless the application for issuance or renewal is: (a) Accompanied by a valid
certificate of compliance or a valid certificate of acceptance issued pursuant
to chapter 70.120 RCW; or (b) exempted from this requirement pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section. The certificates must have a date of
validation which is within six months of the date of application for the
vehicle license or license renewal. Certificates for fleet or owner tested
diesel vehicles may have a date of validation which is within twelve months of
the assigned license renewal date.

(2) Subsection (1) of
this section does not apply to the following vehicles:

(a) New motor vehicles
whose equitable or legal title has never been transferred to a person who in
good faith purchases the vehicle for purposes other than resale;

(b) Motor vehicles with
a model year of 1967 or earlier;

(c) Motor vehicles that
use propulsion units powered exclusively by electricity or
ultra-fuel-efficient fuel cell vehicles. As used in this section,
"ultra-fuel-efficient fuel cell vehicle" means a vehicle that
operates on an electrochemical reaction that generates electricity by combining
atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the presence of a catalyst;

(d) Motor vehicles
fueled by propane, compressed natural gas, or liquid petroleum gas, unless it
is determined that federal sanctions will be imposed as a result of this
exemption;

(e) Motorcycles as
defined in RCW 46.04.330 and motor-driven cycles as defined in RCW 46.04.332;

(f) Farm vehicles as
defined in RCW 46.04.181;

(g) Used vehicles which
are offered for sale by a motor vehicle dealer licensed under chapter 46.70
RCW;

(h) Classes of motor
vehicles exempted by the director of the department of ecology;

(i) Collector cars as
identified by the department of licensing under RCW 46.16.305(1); or

(j) Beginning January
1, 2000, vehicles that are less than five years old or more than twenty-five
years old.

The provisions of (a)
of this subsection may not be construed as exempting from the provisions of
subsection (1) of this section applications for the renewal of licenses for
motor vehicles that are or have been leased.

(3) The
department of ecology shall provide information to motor vehicle owners regarding
the boundaries of emission contributing areas and restrictions established
under this section that apply to vehicles registered in such areas. In
addition the department of ecology shall provide information to motor vehicle
owners on the relationship between motor vehicles and air pollution and steps
motor vehicle owners should take to reduce motor vehicle related air
pollution. The department of licensing shall send to all registered motor
vehicle owners affected by the emission testing program notice that they must
have an emission test to renew their registration.

--- END ---