BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.108.010 and 2001
c 297 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In this chapter, unless
the context otherwise requires, the following meanings shall apply:

(1) "Board"
means the Washington state board of massage.

(2) "Massage"
and "massage therapy" mean a health care service involving the
external manipulation or pressure of soft tissue for therapeutic purposes.
Massage therapy includes techniques such as tapping, compressions, friction,
Swedish gymnastics or movements, gliding, kneading, shaking, and ((facial))
fascial or connective tissue stretching, with or without the aids of
superficial heat, cold, water, lubricants, or salts. Massage therapy does not
include diagnosis or attempts to adjust or manipulate any articulations of the
body or spine or mobilization of these articulations by the use of a thrusting
force, nor does it include genital manipulation.

(3) "Massage
practitioner" means an individual licensed under this chapter.

(4)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

(5) "Massage
business" means the operation of a business where massages are given.

(6) "Animal
massage practitioner" means an individual with a license to practice
massage therapy in this state with additional training in animal therapy.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.108.050 and 1997
c 297 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter does not
apply to:

(1) An individual
giving massage to members of his or her immediate family;

(2) The practice of a
profession by individuals who are licensed, certified, or registered under
other laws of this state and who are performing services within their
authorized scope of practice;

(3) Massage practiced
at the athletic department of any institution maintained by the public funds of
the state, or any of its political subdivisions;

(4) Massage practiced
at the athletic department of any school or college approved by the department
by rule using recognized national professional standards;

(5) Students enrolled
in an approved massage school, approved program, or approved apprenticeship
program, practicing massage techniques, incidental to the massage school or
program and supervised by the approved school or program. Students must
identify themselves as a student when performing massage services on members of
the public. Students may not be compensated for the massage services they
provide;

(6) Individuals who
have completed a somatic education training program approved by the secretary;

(7) Persons who
limit their practice to reflexology. For purposes of this chapter, the
practice of reflexology is limited to the hands, feet, and outer ears. The
services provided by those who limit their practice to reflexology are not
designated or implied to be massage or massage therapy.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 18.108 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of health shall review the implementation of this act and make
recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 2005, regarding regulatory
changes to this act.

---
END ---