BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Any person or
organization who, with the intent to harm or intimidate, sells, trades, gives,
publishes, distributes, or otherwise releases the residential address,
residential telephone number, birthdate, or social security number of any law
enforcement-related, corrections officer-related, or court-related employee or
volunteer, or someone with a similar name, and categorizes them as such,
without the express written permission of the employee or volunteer must
disclose the full legal name, the full residential or business street address,
and the full residential or business telephone number of the person or
organization selling, trading, giving, publishing, distributing, or otherwise
releasing the information, unless specifically exempted by law or court order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) Whenever it appears
that any person or organization is engaged in or about to engage in any act
that constitutes or will constitute a violation of section 1 of this act, the
prosecuting attorney or any person harmed by an alleged violation of section 1
of this act may initiate a civil proceeding in superior court to enjoin such
violation, and may petition the court to issue an order for the discontinuance
of the dissemination of information in violation of section 1 of this act.

(2) An action under
this section shall be brought in the county in which the violation is alleged
to have taken place, and shall be commenced by the filing of a verified
complaint, or shall be accompanied by an affidavit.

(3) If it is shown to
the satisfaction of the court, either by verified complaint or affidavit, that
a person or organization is engaged in or about to engage in any act that
constitutes a violation of section 1 of this act, the court may issue a temporary
restraining order to abate and prevent the continuance or recurrence of the
act.

(4) The court may issue
a permanent injunction to restrain, abate, or prevent the continuance or
recurrence of the violation of section 1 of this act. The court may grant
declaratory relief, mandatory orders, or any other relief deemed necessary to
accomplish the purposes of the injunction. The court may retain jurisdiction
of the case for the purpose of enforcing its orders.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. Any law
enforcement-related, corrections officer-related, or court-related employee or
volunteer who suffers damages as a result of a person or organization selling,
trading, giving, publishing, distributing, or otherwise releasing the
residential address, residential telephone number, birthdate, or social
security number of the employee or volunteer in violation of section 1 of this
act may bring an action against the person or organization in court for actual
damages sustained, plus attorneys' fees and costs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of
this act are each added to chapter 4.24 RCW.

---
END ---