BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that it is essential that state government operate as efficiently as possible.
In an effort to accomplish this goal, the legislature further finds that it is
necessary to employ extraordinary means to ensure that waste and inefficiency
are minimized or eliminated. The legislature also finds that it is critical
that all state agencies and their employees work tirelessly to ensure that the
state has an excellent climate for business expansion and retention. The
legislature further finds that the lack of compassionate and helpful work by
state agencies and state employees can unacceptably hinder the economic health
of the state. Additionally, the legislature finds that promoting a work ethic
in which helping and serving the public is the highest priority will help
foster a friendly business climate.

Therefore, the
legislature declares that a temporary position of ombudsman for effective
government must be established to better serve the citizens of the state and to
ensure continued economic stability and vitality of the state. The ombudsman
must seek to ensure that all employees of the state treat businesses and
citizens consistently and compassionately across agencies and jurisdictions in
order to ensure certainty and consistency for planning and economic
development.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. There is created an
office of the ombudsman for effective government within the office of the
governor for the purpose of identifying system issues and responses for the
governor and the legislature to act upon. The ombudsman reports directly to
the governor and the appropriate legislative committees as determined by the
leadership of the house of representatives and the senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Subject to
confirmation by the senate, the governor must appoint an ombudsman who must be
a person of recognized judgment, independence, objectivity, and integrity, and
must be qualified by training or experience, or both, in private and public
sector management and operations. Prior to the appointment, the governor must
consult with the legislature regarding the selection of the ombudsman.

(2) The ombudsman holds
office for a term of three years and continues to hold office until reappointed
or until his or her successor is appointed. The governor may remove the
ombudsman only for neglect of duty, misconduct, or inability to perform
duties. Any vacancy must be filled by similar appointment for the remainder of
the unexpired term.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The ombudsman must
perform the following duties:

(1) Examine the
operations of each state agency responsible for issuing permits for any
activities within the state.

(2) Recommend changes,
based upon its examination under subsection (1) of this section, for statutory,
administrative code, or agency operational standards or protocols that will
streamline permitting processes and enhance customer relations.

(3) Monitor and report
on the implementation of executive orders related to increased government
efficiency and improved employee interaction with customers.

(4) Focus initially on
streamlining the environmental permit process to ensure reasonable, expeditious
permit processing.

(5) Regularly consult
with and advise the governor's business advocate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The joint legislative
audit and review committee must support the work of the ombudsman, including
providing staff and office space.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Sections 1 through 5 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 5 of
this act expire June 30, 2008.

---
END ---