BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 60.13.010 and 1991 c
174 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the terms defined in this section have the meanings indicated unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agricultural
product" means any unprocessed horticultural, vermicultural and its
byproducts, viticultural, berry, poultry, poultry product, grain, bee, or other
agricultural products, and includes mint or mint oil processed by or for the
producer thereof and hay and straw baled or prepared for market in any manner
or form and livestock. When used in RCW 60.13.020, "agricultural
product" means horticultural, viticultural, aquacultural, or berry
products, hay and straw, milk and milk products, vegetable seed, or turf
and forage seed and applies only when such products are delivered to a
processor or conditioner in an unprocessed form.

(2)
"Conditioner," "consignor," "person," and
"producer" have the meanings defined in RCW 20.01.010.

(3)
"Delivers" means that a producer completes the performance of all
contractual obligations with reference to the transfer of actual or
constructive possession or control of an agricultural product to a processor or
conditioner or preparer, regardless of whether the processor or conditioner or
preparer takes physical possession.

(4)
"Preparer" means a person engaged in the business of feeding
livestock or preparing livestock products for market.

(5)
"Processor" means any person, firm, company, or other organization
that purchases agricultural products except milk and milk products from a
consignor and that cans, freezes, dries, dehydrates, cooks, presses, powders,
or otherwise processes those crops in any manner whatsoever for eventual
resale, or that purchases or markets milk from a dairy producer and is
obligated to remit payment to such dairy producer directly.

(6) "Commercial
fisherman" means a person licensed to fish commercially for or to take
food fish or shellfish or steelhead legally caught pursuant to executive order,
treaty right, or federal statute.

(7) "Fish"
means food fish or shellfish or steelhead legally caught pursuant to executive
order, treaty right, or federal statute.

Sec. 2. RCW 60.13.040 and 2001 c
32 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A producer or
commercial fisherman claiming a processor or preparer lien may file a statement
evidencing the lien with the department of licensing after payment from the
processor, conditioner, or preparer to the producer or fisherman is due and
remains unpaid. For purposes of this subsection and RCW 60.13.050, payment is
due on the date specified in the contract, or if not specified, then within
thirty days from time of delivery.

(2) The statement shall
be in a record, authenticated by the producer or fisherman, and shall contain
in substance the following information:

(a) A true statement or
a reasonable estimate of the amount demanded after deducting all credits
and offsets;

(b) The name of the
processor, conditioner, or preparer who received the agricultural product or
fish to be charged with the lien;

(c) A description
sufficient to identify the agricultural product or fish to be charged with the
lien;

(d) A statement that the
amount claimed is a true and bona fide existing debt as of the date of the
filing of the notice evidencing the lien;

(e) The date on which
payment was due for the agricultural product or fish to be charged with the
lien; and

(f) The department of
licensing may by rule prescribe standard filing forms, fees, and uniform
procedures for filing with, and obtaining information from, filing officers.

Sec. 3. RCW 60.13.060 and 1987 c
148 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The processor lien
shall terminate ((six)) twelve months after, and the preparer
lien shall terminate fifty days after, the later of the date of attachment or
filing, unless a suit to foreclose the lien has been filed before that time as
provided in RCW 60.13.070.

(2) If a
statement has been filed as provided in RCW 60.13.040 and the producer or
commercial fisherman has received payment for the obligation secured by the
lien, the producer or fisherman shall promptly file with the department of
licensing a statement declaring that full payment has been received and that
the lien is discharged. If, after payment, the producer or fisherman fails to
file such statement of discharge within ten days following a request to do so,
the producer or fisherman shall be liable to the processor, conditioner, or
preparer in the sum of one hundred dollars plus actual damages caused by the
failure.

---
END ---