BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to provide law enforcement and judicial agencies with the capacity to prevent
and prosecute acts committed with terrorist intent. The legislature declares
that the statutes creating crimes in this act are to be construed with lenity
and in all respects to be done with deference to each person's state and
federal constitutional guarantees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. For the purposes of this
chapter, "terrorist intent" means the intent to significantly disrupt
the general civilian population or the conduct of government by committing an
act which: (1) Manifests an extreme indifference to human life; or (2) causes
or is intended to cause permanent or protracted loss of use of private or
public property.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) A person is guilty of
a hoax terrorist act if he or she knowingly and falsely:

(a) Claims to have
committed a felony with terrorist intent; or

(b) Makes any statement
or takes any other action that causes or is intended to cause a reasonable
belief that a felony with terrorist intent has been or will be committed.

(2) A hoax terrorist
act is a class A felony.

Sec. 4. RCW 9.94A.535 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 314 are each amended to read as follows:

The court may impose a
sentence outside the standard sentence range for an offense if it finds,
considering the purpose of this chapter, that there are substantial and
compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence. Whenever a sentence
outside the standard sentence range is imposed, the court shall set forth the
reasons for its decision in written findings of fact and conclusions of law. A
sentence outside the standard sentence range shall be a determinate sentence
unless it is imposed on an offender sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712. An
exceptional sentence imposed on an offender sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712 shall
be to a minimum term set by the court and a maximum term equal to the statutory
maximum sentence for the offense of conviction under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

If the sentencing court
finds that an exceptional sentence outside the standard sentence range should
be imposed, the sentence is subject to review only as provided for in RCW
9.94A.585(4).

A departure from the
standards in RCW 9.94A.589 (1) and (2) governing whether sentences are to be
served consecutively or concurrently is an exceptional sentence subject to the
limitations in this section, and may be appealed by the offender or the state
as set forth in RCW 9.94A.585 (2) through (6).

The following are
illustrative factors which the court may consider in the exercise of its
discretion to impose an exceptional sentence. The following are illustrative
only and are not intended to be exclusive reasons for exceptional sentences.

(1) Mitigating
Circumstances

(a) To a significant
degree, the victim was an initiator, willing participant, aggressor, or
provoker of the incident.

(b) Before detection,
the defendant compensated, or made a good faith effort to compensate, the
victim of the criminal conduct for any damage or injury sustained.

(c) The defendant
committed the crime under duress, coercion, threat, or compulsion insufficient
to constitute a complete defense but which significantly affected his or her
conduct.

(d) The defendant, with
no apparent predisposition to do so, was induced by others to participate in
the crime.

(e) The defendant's
capacity to appreciate the wrongfulness of his or her conduct, or to conform
his or her conduct to the requirements of the law, was significantly impaired.
Voluntary use of drugs or alcohol is excluded.

(f) The offense was
principally accomplished by another person and the defendant manifested extreme
caution or sincere concern for the safety or well-being of the victim.

(g) The operation of
the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.589 results in a presumptive sentence
that is clearly excessive in light of the purpose of this chapter, as expressed
in RCW 9.94A.010.

(h) The defendant or
the defendant's children suffered a continuing pattern of physical or sexual
abuse by the victim of the offense and the offense is a response to that abuse.

(2) Aggravating
Circumstances

(a) The defendant's
conduct during the commission of the current offense manifested deliberate
cruelty to the victim.

(b) The defendant knew
or should have known that the victim of the current offense was particularly
vulnerable or incapable of resistance due to extreme youth, advanced age,
disability, or ill health.

(c) The current offense
was a violent offense, and the defendant knew that the victim of the current
offense was pregnant.

(d) The current offense
was a major economic offense or series of offenses, so identified by a
consideration of any of the following factors:

(i) The current offense
involved multiple victims or multiple incidents per victim;

(ii) The current
offense involved attempted or actual monetary loss substantially greater than
typical for the offense;

(iii) The current
offense involved a high degree of sophistication or planning or occurred over a
lengthy period of time; or

(iv) The defendant used
his or her position of trust, confidence, or fiduciary responsibility to
facilitate the commission of the current offense.

(e) The current offense
was a major violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50
RCW (VUCSA), related to trafficking in controlled substances, which was more onerous
than the typical offense of its statutory definition: The presence of ANY of
the following may identify a current offense as a major VUCSA:

(i) The current offense
involved at least three separate transactions in which controlled substances
were sold, transferred, or possessed with intent to do so;

(ii) The current
offense involved an attempted or actual sale or transfer of controlled
substances in quantities substantially larger than for personal use;

(iii) The current
offense involved the manufacture of controlled substances for use by other
parties;

(iv) The circumstances
of the current offense reveal the offender to have occupied a high position in
the drug distribution hierarchy;

(v) The current offense
involved a high degree of sophistication or planning, occurred over a lengthy
period of time, or involved a broad geographic area of disbursement; or

(vi) The offender used
his or her position or status to facilitate the commission of the current
offense, including positions of trust, confidence or fiduciary responsibility
(e.g., pharmacist, physician, or other medical professional).

(f) The current offense
included a finding of sexual motivation pursuant to RCW 9.94A.835.

(g) The offense was
part of an ongoing pattern of sexual abuse of the same victim under the age of
eighteen years manifested by multiple incidents over a prolonged period of
time.

(h) The current offense
involved domestic violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, and one or more of the
following was present:

(i) The offense was
part of an ongoing pattern of psychological, physical, or sexual abuse of the
victim manifested by multiple incidents over a prolonged period of time;

(ii) The offense
occurred within sight or sound of the victim's or the offender's minor children
under the age of eighteen years; or

(iii) The offender's
conduct during the commission of the current offense manifested deliberate
cruelty or intimidation of the victim.

(i) The operation of
the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.589 results in a presumptive sentence
that is clearly too lenient in light of the purpose of this chapter, as
expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

(j) The defendant's
prior unscored misdemeanor or prior unscored foreign criminal history results
in a presumptive sentence that is clearly too lenient in light of the purpose
of this chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

(k) The offense
resulted in the pregnancy of a child victim of rape.

(l) The defendant knew
that the victim of the current offense was a youth who was not residing with a
legal custodian and the defendant established or promoted the relationship for
the primary purpose of victimization.

(m) The current
offense was committed with terrorist intent as defined in section 2 of this
act. This subsection (2)(m) does not apply to crimes committed under chapter
70.74 RCW or committed under section 10 or 11 of this act.

Sec. 5. RCW 9.94A.030 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 301, 2001 c 300 s 3, and 2001 c 7 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Board" means
the indeterminate sentence review board created under chapter 9.95 RCW.

(2)
"Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit,"
or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection agreement
authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring and enforcing the
offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial obligation, receiving
payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with current law, delivering
daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk without depositing it in a
departmental account.

(3)
"Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(4) "Community
corrections officer" means an employee of the department who is responsible
for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced offenders and
monitoring of sentence conditions.

(5) "Community
custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence of confinement in
lieu of earned release time or imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b),
9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670, 9.94A.690, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or
9.94A.545, served in the community subject to controls placed on the offender's
movement and activities by the department. For offenders placed on community custody
for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department shall assess the
offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and modify conditions of
community custody, in addition to those imposed by the court, based upon the
risk to community safety.

(6) "Community
custody range" means the minimum and maximum period of community custody
included as part of a sentence under RCW 9.94A.715, as established by the
commission or the legislature under RCW 9.94A.850, for crimes committed on or
after July 1, 2000.

(7) "Community
placement" means that period during which the offender is subject to the
conditions of community custody and/or postrelease supervision, which begins
either upon completion of the term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or at
such time as the offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned
release. Community placement may consist of entirely community custody,
entirely postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.

(8) "Community
service" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the
benefit of the community by the offender.

(9) "Community
supervision" means a period of time during which a convicted offender is
subject to crime-related prohibitions and other sentence conditions imposed by
a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW 16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the
court finds that any offender has a chemical dependency that has contributed to
his or her offense, the conditions of supervision may, subject to available
resources, include treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for
out-of-state supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be considered
the same as probation by other states.

(10)
"Confinement" means total or partial confinement.

(11)
"Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles 10 or
13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of
a plea of guilty.

(12)
"Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting
conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the
offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders
directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs
or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts
necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by
the department.

(13) "Criminal
history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions and juvenile
adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or elsewhere. The
history shall include, where known, for each conviction (a) whether the
defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms thereof; and
(b) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of
incarceration.

(14) "Day
fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that equals the
difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable
obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any
dependents.

(15) "Day
reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to monitor the
offender's daily activities and compliance with sentence conditions, and in
which the offender is required to report daily to a specific location
designated by the department or the sentencing court.

(16)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(17) "Determinate
sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude the number of
actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial confinement, of
community supervision, the number of actual hours or days of community service
work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement
shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate sentence.

(18) "Disposable
earnings" means that part of the earnings of an offender remaining after
the deduction from those earnings of any amount required by law to be withheld.
For the purposes of this definition, "earnings" means compensation
paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary,
commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of
law making the payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process
to satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically includes
periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs, or insurance
policies of any type, but does not include payments made under Title 50 RCW,
except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050, or Title 74 RCW.

(19) "Drug
offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option available to
persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent offense or a sex
offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW 9.94A.660.

(20) "Drug
offense" means:

(a) Any felony
violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(d)) or forged prescription for a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.403);

(b) Any offense defined
as a felony under federal law that relates to the possession, manufacture,
distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance; or

(c) Any out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(21) "Earned release"
means earned release from confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728.

(22) "Escape"
means:

(a) Sexually violent
predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110),
escape in the second degree (RCW 9A.76.120), willful failure to return from
furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful failure to return from work release (RCW
72.65.070), or willful failure to be available for supervision by the
department while in community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this subsection.

(23) "Felony
traffic offense" means:

(a) Vehicular homicide
(RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding a police officer
(RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(24) "Fine"
means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the
offender to the court over a specific period of time.

(25) "First-time
offender" means any person who has no prior convictions for a felony and
is eligible for the first-time offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.

(26) "Home
detention" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders
wherein the offender is confined in a private residence subject to electronic
surveillance.

(27) "Legal financial
obligation" means a sum of money that is ordered by a superior court of
the state of Washington for legal financial obligations which may include
restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees
as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal drug
funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines, and any
other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result of a
felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular
homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial obligations may also include payment to a
public agency of the expense of an emergency response to the incident resulting
in the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.

(28) "Most serious
offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit
any of the following felonies:

(a) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation of or criminal
conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b) Assault in the
second degree;

(c) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(d) Child molestation
in the second degree;

(e) Controlled
substance homicide;

(f) Extortion in the
first degree;

(g) Incest when
committed against a child under age fourteen;

(h) Indecent liberties;

(i) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(j) Leading organized
crime;

(k) Manslaughter in the
first degree;

(l) Manslaughter in the
second degree;

(m) Promoting
prostitution in the first degree;

(n) Rape in the third
degree;

(o) Robbery in the
second degree;

(p) Sexual
exploitation;

(q) Vehicular assault,
when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving
of a vehicle in a reckless manner;

(r) Vehicular homicide,
when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502,
or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(s) Any other class B
felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation;

(t) Any other felony
with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.602;

(u) Any felony offense
in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is comparable to a most
serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(v)(i) A prior
conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c),
chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW
9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11,
1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986,
until July 1, 1988;

(ii) A prior conviction
for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11,
1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was committed against a child
under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and
perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997, or RCW
9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993, through July 27,
1997.

(29) "Nonviolent
offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.

(30) "Offender"
means a person who has committed a felony established by state law and is
eighteen years of age or older or is less than eighteen years of age but whose
case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been
transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to
RCW 13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and
"defendant" are used interchangeably.

(31) "Partial
confinement" means confinement for no more than one year in a facility or
institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit
of government, or, if home detention or work crew has been ordered by the
court, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the
balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work
release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and home
detention.

(32) "Persistent
offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i) Has been
convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious offense; and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this state or
elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be considered
most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score under RCW
9.94A.525; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one
conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i) Has been
convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the first
degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible compulsion;
(B) any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder
in the first degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping
in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first degree,
or burglary in the first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed
in this subsection (32)(b)(i); and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or elsewhere, of an
offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection or any federal or out-of-state
offense or offense under prior Washington law that is comparable to the
offenses listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child
in the first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the offender
committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second degree
constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender
was eighteen years of age or older when the offender committed the offense.

(33) "Postrelease
supervision" is that portion of an offender's community placement that is
not community custody.

(34)
"Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specified period of time
as payment of damages. The sum may include both public and private costs.

(35) "Risk
assessment" means the application of an objective instrument supported by
research and adopted by the department for the purpose of assessing an
offender's risk of reoffense, taking into consideration the nature of the harm
done by the offender, place and circumstances of the offender related to risk,
the offender's relationship to any victim, and any information provided to the
department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not be based on
unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

(36) "Serious
traffic offense" means:

(a) Driving while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), actual
physical control while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended vehicle
(RCW 46.52.020(5)); or

(b) Any federal,
out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the
laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(37) "Serious
violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and means:

(a)(i) Murder in the
first degree;

(ii) Homicide by abuse;

(iii) Murder in the
second degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(v) Assault in the
first degree;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
first degree;

(vii) Rape in the first
degree;

(viii) Assault of a
child in the first degree; ((or))

(ix) Possession of
radioactive material for terrorist purposes;

(x) Releasing
radioactive material;

(xi) Possession of
agents for terrorist purposes;

(xii) Unlawful use
of agents for terrorist purposes; or

(xiii) An
attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of these
felonies; or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(38) "Sex
offense" means:

(a)(i) A felony that is
a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than RCW 9A.44.130(11);

(ii) A violation of RCW
9A.64.020;

(iii) A felony that is
a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than RCW 9.68A.070 or 9.68A.080; or

(iv) A felony that is,
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal
conspiracy to commit such crimes;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this subsection;

(c) A felony with a
finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or

(d) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this subsection.

(39) "Sexual
motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the defendant committed
the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification.

(40) "Standard
sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in
imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(41) "Statutory
maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time for which an offender
may be confined as punishment for a crime as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW,
RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the crime, or other statute defining the
maximum penalty for a crime.

(42) "Total
confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries of a
facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any
other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW
72.64.050 and 72.64.060.

(43) "Transition
training" means written and verbal instructions and assistance provided by
the department to the offender during the two weeks prior to the offender's
successful completion of the work ethic camp program. The transition training
shall include instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations
during the offender's period of community custody.

(44) "Victim"
means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or
financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the crime charged.

(45) "Violent offense"
means:

(a) Any of the
following felonies:

(i) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony;

(ii) Criminal
solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(iii) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the second degree;

(v) Indecent liberties
if committed by forcible compulsion;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(vii) Arson in the
second degree;

(viii) Assault in the
second degree;

(ix) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(x) Extortion in the
first degree;

(xi) Robbery in the
second degree;

(xii) Drive-by
shooting;

(xiii) Vehicular
assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner; and

(xiv) Vehicular
homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of this
subsection; and

(c) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b) of this
subsection.

(46) "Work
crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of civic
improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that complies with RCW
9.94A.725.

(47) "Work ethic
camp" means an alternative incarceration program as provided in RCW
9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by
requiring offenders to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and
vocational experiences, character-building work ethics training, life
management skills development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling,
literacy training, and basic adult education.

(48) "Work
release" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders who
are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study at school.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 10.95 RCW to read as follows:

A person is guilty of
aggravated murder in the first degree if he or she is a terrorist offender and
shall be punished in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. For the
purposes of this section, "terrorist offender" means an offender who
commits a felony that results in the death of one or more persons and for which
a special allegation of terrorist intent has been filed and proven beyond a
reasonable doubt under section 13 of this act.

Sec. 7. RCW 10.95.040 and 1981 c
138 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a person is
charged with aggravated first degree murder as defined by RCW 10.95.020 or
section 6 of this act, the prosecuting attorney shall file written notice
of a special sentencing proceeding to determine whether or not the death
penalty should be imposed when there is reason to believe that there are not
sufficient mitigating circumstances to merit leniency.

(2) The notice of
special sentencing proceeding shall be filed and served on the defendant or the
defendant's attorney within thirty days after the defendant's arraignment upon
the charge of aggravated first degree murder unless the court, for good cause
shown, extends or reopens the period for filing and service of the notice.
Except with the consent of the prosecuting attorney, during the period in which
the prosecuting attorney may file the notice of special sentencing proceeding,
the defendant may not tender a plea of guilty to the charge of aggravated first
degree murder nor may the court accept a plea of guilty to the charge of
aggravated first degree murder or any lesser included offense.

(3) If a notice of
special sentencing proceeding is not filed and served as provided in this
section, the prosecuting attorney may not request the death penalty.

Sec. 8. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 361, 2001 c 300 s 4, 2001 c 217 s 12, and 2001 c 17 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

Releasing
radioactive material (section 11(1) of this act)

Unlawful
use of agents for terrorist purposes (section 10(1) of this act)

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

Possession
of agents for terrorist purposes (section 10(2) of this act)

Possession
of radioactive material for terrorist purposes (section 11(2) of this act)

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Sexually
Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Hoax
terrorist act (section 3 of this act)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity
Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(a))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by
the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Vehicular
Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety
of others (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity
Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(b))

Improperly
Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 9. RCW 9A.04.080 and 1998 c
221 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Prosecutions for
criminal offenses shall not be commenced after the periods prescribed in this
section.

(a) The following
offenses may be prosecuted at any time after their commission:

(i) Murder;

(ii) Homicide by abuse;

(iii) Arson if a death
results;

(iv) Vehicular
homicide;

(v) Vehicular assault
if a death results;

(vi) Hit-and-run
injury-accident if a death results (RCW 46.52.020(4));

(vii) Any felony
committed with terrorist intent, as defined in section 2 of this act.

(b) The following
offenses shall not be prosecuted more than ten years after their commission:

(i) Any felony
committed by a public officer if the commission is in connection with the
duties of his or her office or constitutes a breach of his or her public duty
or a violation of the oath of office;

(ii) Arson if no death
results; or

(iii) Violations of RCW
9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 if the rape is reported to a law enforcement agency
within one year of its commission; except that if the victim is under fourteen
years of age when the rape is committed and the rape is reported to a law
enforcement agency within one year of its commission, the violation may be
prosecuted up to three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or up to
ten years after the rape's commission, whichever is later. If a violation of
RCW 9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 is not reported within one year, the rape may not be
prosecuted: (A) More than three years after its commission if the violation
was committed against a victim fourteen years of age or older; or (B) more than
three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or more than seven years
after the rape's commission, whichever is later, if the violation was committed
against a victim under fourteen years of age.

(c) Violations of the
following statutes shall not be prosecuted more than three years after the
victim's eighteenth birthday or more than seven years after their commission,
whichever is later: RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, 9A.44.070,
9A.44.080, 9A.44.100(1)(b), or 9A.64.020.

(d) The following
offenses shall not be prosecuted more than six years after their commission:
Violations of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.

(e) The following
offenses shall not be prosecuted more than five years after their commission:
Any class C felony under chapter 74.09, 82.36, or 82.38 RCW.

(f) Bigamy shall not be
prosecuted more than three years after the time specified in RCW 9A.64.010.

(g) A violation of RCW
9A.56.030 must not be prosecuted more than three years after the discovery of
the offense when the victim is a tax exempt corporation under 26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3).

(h) No other felony may
be prosecuted more than three years after its commission; except that in a
prosecution under RCW 9A.44.115, if the person who was viewed, photographed, or
filmed did not realize at the time that he or she was being viewed,
photographed, or filmed, the prosecution must be commenced within two years of
the time the person who was viewed or in the photograph or film first learns that
he or she was viewed, photographed, or filmed.

(i) No gross
misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than two years after its commission.

(j) No misdemeanor may
be prosecuted more than one year after its commission.

(2) The periods of
limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section do not run during any
time when the person charged is not usually and publicly resident within this
state.

(3) If, before the end
of a period of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, an
indictment has been found or a complaint or an information has been filed, and
the indictment, complaint, or information is set aside, then the period of
limitation is extended by a period equal to the length of time from the finding
or filing to the setting aside.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) A person is guilty of
unlawful use of agents for terrorist purposes if the person willfully and with
terrorist intent uses, places, introduces, broadcasts, disseminates, or
releases any biological agent, chemical agent, or toxin.

(2) A person is guilty
of possession of agents for terrorist purposes if the person knowingly and with
terrorist intent possesses any biological agent, chemical agent, or toxin.

(3) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Biological
agent" means any microorganism, virus, infectious substance, or biological
product that may be engineered as a result of biotechnology, or any naturally
occurring microorganism, virus, infectious substance, biological product, or
toxin or vector, or any naturally occurring or bioengineered component thereof,
capable of causing:

(i) Death, disease, or
other biological malfunction in a human, an animal, a plant, or another living
organism;

(ii) Deterioration of
food, water equipment, supplies, or material of any kind; or

(iii) Significant
deterioration of the environment.

(b) "Chemical
agent" means any weapon, device, material, or substance that is designed
or intended to cause widespread death or physical injury through the release,
dissemination, or impact of toxic or poisonous chemicals or precursors of toxic
or poisonous chemicals.

(c) "Habitable
building" means any building in which persons may reside or assemble for
recreational or employment purposes.

(d) "Toxin"
means the toxic material of plants, animals, microorganisms, viruses, fungi, or
infectious substances, or a recombinant molecule, whatever its origin or method
of production, including:

(i) Any poisonous
substance or biological product that may be engineered as a result of
biotechnology produced by a living organism; or

(ii) Any poisonous
isomer or biological product, homolog, or derivative of such a substance.

(4)(a) Unlawful use of
agents for terrorist purposes is a class A felony.

(b) Unlawful possession
of agents for terrorist purposes is a class A felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. (1) A person is guilty of
releasing radioactive material with terrorist intent if the person releases,
broadcasts, or disseminates ionizing radiation with terrorist intent.

(2) A person is guilty
of possession of radioactive material with terrorist intent if the person
knowingly possesses a source of ionizing radiation with terrorist intent.

(3)(a) Releasing
radioactive material with terrorist intent is a class A felony.

(b) Possession of
radioactive material with terrorist intent is a class A felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 9A.82 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The prosecuting
attorney may file a special allegation of terrorist intent in any criminal
case, other than violations of the Washington state explosives act, chapter
70.74 RCW, or section 10 or 11 of this act, when sufficient admissible evidence
exists that would justify a finding of terrorist intent by a reasonable and
objective fact finder.

(2) If the special
allegation is filed, the state shall prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the
accused committed the crime with terrorist intent, as defined in section 2 of
this act. The court shall make a finding of fact of whether or not terrorist
intent was present at the time of the commission of the crime, or if a jury
trial is had, the jury shall, if it finds the defendant guilty, also find a
special verdict as to whether or not the defendant committed the crime with
terrorist intent. This finding shall not be applied to violations of the Washington
state explosives act, chapter 70.74 RCW, or section 10 or 11 of this act.

(3) The prosecuting
attorney shall not withdraw the special allegation of terrorist intent without
approval of the court through an order of dismissal of the special allegation.
The court shall not dismiss the special allegation unless it finds that such an
order is necessary to correct an error in the initial charging decision or
unless there are evidentiary problems that make proving the special allegation
doubtful.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 10.95 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The prosecuting
attorney may file a special allegation of terrorist intent in any criminal
case, other than violations of the Washington state explosives act, chapter
70.74 RCW, or section 10 or 11 of this act, when sufficient admissible evidence
exists that would justify a finding of terrorist intent by a reasonable and
objective fact finder.

(2) If the special
allegation is filed, the state shall prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the
accused committed the crime with terrorist intent, as defined in section 2 of
this act. The court shall make a finding of fact of whether or not terrorist
intent was present at the time of the commission of the crime, or if a jury
trial is had, the jury shall, if it finds the defendant guilty, also find a
special verdict as to whether or not the defendant committed the crime with
terrorist intent. This finding shall not be applied to violations of the Washington
state explosives act, chapter 70.74 RCW, or section 10 or 11 of this act.

(3) The prosecuting
attorney shall not withdraw the special allegation of terrorist intent without
approval of the court through an order of dismissal of the special allegation.
The court shall not dismiss the special allegation unless it finds that such an
order is necessary to correct an error in the initial charging decision or
unless there are evidentiary problems that make proving the special allegation
doubtful.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 9A.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 9A.20.021, no person convicted of a classified felony with a
finding of terrorist intent as provided under section 12 of this act shall be
punished by confinement or fine exceeding the following:

(a) For a class B
felony, by confinement in a state correctional institution for a term of life
imprisonment, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of fifty thousand
dollars, or by both such confinement and fine; or

(b) For a class C
felony, by confinement in a state correctional institution for a term of ten
years, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of ten thousand dollars, or
by both such confinement and fine.

(2) This section
applies to only those crimes committed on or after the effective date of this
act.

Sec. 15. RCW 9A.20.021 and 1982 c
192 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Felony. Except
when section 14 of this act applies, no person convicted of a classified
felony shall be punished by confinement or fine exceeding the following:

(a) For a class A
felony, by confinement in a state correctional institution for a term of life
imprisonment, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of fifty thousand
dollars, or by both such confinement and fine;

(b) For a class B
felony, by confinement in a state correctional institution for a term of ten
years, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of twenty thousand dollars,
or by both such confinement and fine;

(c) For a class C
felony, by confinement in a state correctional institution for five years, or
by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of ten thousand dollars, or by both
such confinement and fine.

(2) Gross misdemeanor.
Every person convicted of a gross misdemeanor defined in Title 9A RCW shall be
punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a maximum term fixed by the
court of not more than one year, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court
of not more than five thousand dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine.

(3) Misdemeanor. Every
person convicted of a misdemeanor defined in Title 9A RCW shall be punished by
imprisonment in the county jail for a maximum term fixed by the court of not
more than ninety days, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more
than one thousand dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine.

(4) This section
applies to only those crimes committed on or after July 1, 1984.

Sec. 16. RCW 70.74.285 and 1997 c
120 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW
70.74.270, 70.74.272, and 70.74.280 "terrorist act" means an act ((that
is intended to: (1) Intimidate or coerce a civilian population; (2) influence
the policy of a branch or level of government by intimidation or coercion; (3)
affect the conduct of a branch or level of government by intimidation or
coercion; or (4) retaliate against a branch or level of government for a policy
or conduct of the government)) committed with the intent to
significantly disrupt the general civilian population or the conduct of
government by committing an act which: (1) Manifests an extreme indifference
to human life; or (2) causes or is intended to cause permanent or protracted
loss of use of private or public property.

Sec. 17. RCW 9A.82.010 and 2001 c
222 s 3 and 2001 c 217 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
requires the contrary, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.

(1)(a) "Beneficial
interest" means:

(i) The interest of a
person as a beneficiary under a trust established under Title 11 RCW in which
the trustee for the trust holds legal or record title to real property;

(ii) The interest of a
person as a beneficiary under any other trust arrangement under which a trustee
holds legal or record title to real property for the benefit of the
beneficiary; or

(iii) The interest of a
person under any other form of express fiduciary arrangement under which one
person holds legal or record title to real property for the benefit of the
other person.

(b) "Beneficial
interest" does not include the interest of a stockholder in a corporation
or the interest of a partner in a general partnership or limited partnership.

(c) A beneficial
interest is considered to be located where the real property owned by the
trustee is located.

(2) "Control"
means the possession of a sufficient interest to permit substantial direction
over the affairs of an enterprise.

(3)
"Creditor" means a person making an extension of credit or a person
claiming by, under, or through a person making an extension of credit.

(4) "Criminal
profiteering" means any act, including any anticipatory or completed
offense, committed for financial gain, that is chargeable or indictable under
the laws of the state in which the act occurred and, if the act occurred in a
state other than this state, would be chargeable or indictable under the laws
of this state had the act occurred in this state and punishable as a felony and
by imprisonment for more than one year, regardless of whether the act is
charged or indicted, as any of the following:

(a) Murder, as defined
in RCW 9A.32.030 and 9A.32.050;

(b) Robbery, as defined
in RCW 9A.56.200 and 9A.56.210;

(c) Kidnapping, as
defined in RCW 9A.40.020 and 9A.40.030;

(d) Forgery, as defined
in RCW 9A.60.020 and 9A.60.030;

(e) Theft, as defined
in RCW 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, 9A.56.060, and 9A.56.080;

(f) Unlawful sale of
subscription television services, as defined in RCW 9A.56.230;

(g) Theft of
telecommunication services or unlawful manufacture of a telecommunication
device, as defined in RCW 9A.56.262 and 9A.56.264;

(h) Child selling or
child buying, as defined in RCW 9A.64.030;

(i) Bribery, as defined
in RCW 9A.68.010, 9A.68.020, 9A.68.040, and 9A.68.050;

(j) Gambling, as
defined in RCW 9.46.220 and 9.46.215 and 9.46.217;

(k) Extortion, as
defined in RCW 9A.56.120 and 9A.56.130;

(l) Extortionate
extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.020;

(m) Advancing money for
use in an extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.030;

(n) Collection of an
extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.040;

(o) Collection of an
unlawful debt, as defined in RCW 9A.82.045;

(p) Delivery or
manufacture of controlled substances or possession with intent to deliver or
manufacture controlled substances under chapter 69.50 RCW;

(q) Trafficking in
stolen property, as defined in RCW 9A.82.050;

(r) Leading organized
crime, as defined in RCW 9A.82.060;

(s) Money laundering,
as defined in RCW 9A.83.020;

(t) Obstructing
criminal investigations or prosecutions in violation of RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100, 9A.72.110, 9A.72.120, 9A.72.130, 9A.76.070, or 9A.76.180;

(u) Fraud in the
purchase or sale of securities, as defined in RCW 21.20.010;

(v) Promoting
pornography, as defined in RCW 9.68.140;

(w) Sexual exploitation
of children, as defined in RCW 9.68A.040, 9.68A.050, and 9.68A.060;

(x) Promoting
prostitution, as defined in RCW 9A.88.070 and 9A.88.080;

(y) Arson, as defined
in RCW 9A.48.020 and 9A.48.030;

(z) Assault, as defined
in RCW 9A.36.011 and 9A.36.021;

(aa) Assault of a
child, as defined in RCW 9A.36.120 and 9A.36.130;

(bb) A pattern of
equity skimming, as defined in RCW 61.34.020;

(cc) Commercial
telephone solicitation in violation of RCW 19.158.040(1);

(dd) Trafficking in
insurance claims, as defined in RCW 48.30A.015;

(ee) Unlawful practice
of law, as defined in RCW 2.48.180;

(ff) Commercial
bribery, as defined in RCW 9A.68.060;

(gg) Health care false
claims, as defined in RCW 48.80.030;

(hh) Unlicensed
practice of a profession or business, as defined in RCW 18.130.190(7);

(ii) Improperly
obtaining financial information, as defined in RCW 9.35.010; ((or))

(jj) Identity theft, as
defined in RCW 9.35.020; or

(kk) Any felony or
any anticipatory crime whose object is a felony, committed with terrorist
intent, whether or not committed for financial gain.

(5) "Dealer in
property" means a person who buys and sells property as a business.

(6) "Debtor"
means a person to whom an extension of credit is made or a person who guarantees
the repayment of an extension of credit or in any manner undertakes to
indemnify the creditor against loss resulting from the failure of a person to
whom an extension is made to repay the same.

(7) "Documentary
material" means any book, paper, document, writing, drawing, graph, chart,
photograph, phonograph record, magnetic tape, computer printout, other data
compilation from which information can be obtained or from which information
can be translated into usable form, or other tangible item.

(8) "Enterprise"
includes any individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation,
business trust, or other profit or nonprofit legal entity, and includes any
union, association, or group of individuals associated in fact although not a
legal entity, and both illicit and licit enterprises and governmental and
nongovernmental entities.

(9) "Extortionate
extension of credit" means an extension of credit with respect to which it
is the understanding of the creditor and the debtor at the time the extension
is made that delay in making repayment or failure to make repayment could
result in the use of violence or other criminal means to cause harm to the
person, reputation, or property of any person.

(10) "Extortionate
means" means the use, or an express or implicit threat of use, of violence
or other criminal means to cause harm to the person, reputation, or property of
any person.

(11) "Financial
institution" means any bank, trust company, savings and loan association,
savings bank, mutual savings bank, credit union, or loan company under the
jurisdiction of the state or an agency of the United States.

(12) "Pattern of
criminal profiteering activity" means engaging in at least three acts of
criminal profiteering, one of which occurred after July 1, 1985, and the last
of which occurred within five years, excluding any period of imprisonment,
after the commission of the earliest act of criminal profiteering. In order to
constitute a pattern, the three acts must have the same or similar intent,
results, accomplices, principals, victims, or methods of commission, or be
otherwise interrelated by distinguishing characteristics including a nexus to
the same enterprise, and must not be isolated events. However, in any civil
proceedings brought pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100 by any person other than the
attorney general or county prosecuting attorney in which one or more acts of
fraud in the purchase or sale of securities are asserted as acts of criminal
profiteering activity, it is a condition to civil liability under RCW 9A.82.100
that the defendant has been convicted in a criminal proceeding of fraud in the
purchase or sale of securities under RCW 21.20.400 or under the laws of another
state or of the United States requiring the same elements of proof, but such
conviction need not relate to any act or acts asserted as acts of criminal
profiteering activity in such civil action under RCW 9A.82.100.

(13) "Real
property" means any real property or interest in real property, including
but not limited to a land sale contract, lease, or mortgage of real property.

(14)
"Records" means any book, paper, writing, record, computer program,
or other material.

(15) "Repayment of
an extension of credit" means the repayment, satisfaction, or discharge in
whole or in part of a debt or claim, acknowledged or disputed, valid or
invalid, resulting from or in connection with that extension of credit.

(16) "Stolen property"
means property that has been obtained by theft, robbery, or extortion.

(17) "Terrorist
intent" means "terrorist intent" as defined in section 2 of this
act or RCW 70.74.285 and for which a special allegation of terrorist intent has
been proven under section 12 of this act.

(18) "To
collect an extension of credit" means to induce in any way a person to
make repayment thereof.

(((18))) (19)
"To extend credit" means to make or renew a loan or to enter into an
agreement, tacit or express, whereby the repayment or satisfaction of a debt or
claim, whether acknowledged or disputed, valid or invalid, and however arising,
may or shall be deferred.

(((19))) (20)
"Traffic" means to sell, transfer, distribute, dispense, or otherwise
dispose of stolen property to another person, or to buy, receive, possess, or
obtain control of stolen property, with intent to sell, transfer, distribute,
dispense, or otherwise dispose of the property to another person.

(((20))) (21)(a)
"Trustee" means:

(i) A person acting as
a trustee under a trust established under Title 11 RCW in which the trustee
holds legal or record title to real property;

(ii) A person who holds
legal or record title to real property in which another person has a beneficial
interest; or

(iii) A successor
trustee to a person who is a trustee under (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection.

(b) "Trustee"
does not mean a person appointed or acting as:

(i) A personal
representative under Title 11 RCW;

(ii) A trustee of any
testamentary trust;

(iii) A trustee of any
indenture of trust under which a bond is issued; or

(iv) A trustee under a
deed of trust.

(((21))) (22)
"Unlawful debt" means any money or other thing of value constituting
principal or interest of a debt that is legally unenforceable in the state in
full or in part because the debt was incurred or contracted:

(a) In violation of any
one of the following:

(i) Chapter 67.16 RCW
relating to horse racing;

(ii) Chapter 9.46 RCW
relating to gambling;

(b) In a gambling
activity in violation of federal law; or

(c) In connection with
the business of lending money or a thing of value at a rate that is at least
twice the permitted rate under the applicable state or federal law relating to
usury.

Sec. 18. RCW 9A.82.090 and 2001 c
222 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

During the pendency of
any criminal case charging a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or a violation of RCW
9A.82.080, or any offense committed with terrorist intent whether or not
committed for financial gain, the superior court may, in addition to its
other powers, issue an order pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100 (2) or (3). Upon
conviction of a person for a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or a violation of RCW
9A.82.080, or any offense committed with terrorist intent whether or not
committed for financial gain, the superior court may, in addition to its
other powers of disposition, issue an order pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100.

Sec. 19. RCW 9A.82.100 and 2001 c
222 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A person who
sustains injury to his or her person, business, or property by an act of
criminal profiteering that is part of a pattern of criminal profiteering
activity, or any offense committed with terrorist intent whether or not
committed for financial gain, or by a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or
9A.82.080 may file an action in superior court for the recovery of damages and
the costs of the suit, including reasonable investigative and attorney's fees.

(b) The attorney
general or county prosecuting attorney may file an action: (i) On behalf of
those persons injured or, respectively, on behalf of the state or county if the
entity has sustained damages, or (ii) to prevent, restrain, or remedy a pattern
of criminal profiteering activity, or any offense committed with terrorist
intent whether or not committed for financial gain, or a violation of RCW
9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.

(c) An action for
damages filed by or on behalf of an injured person, the state, or the county
shall be for the recovery of damages and the costs of the suit, including
reasonable investigative and attorney's fees.

(d) In an action filed
to prevent, restrain, or remedy a pattern of criminal profiteering activity,
or any offense committed with terrorist intent whether or not committed for
financial gain, or a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080, the court,
upon proof of the violation, may impose a civil penalty not exceeding two
hundred fifty thousand dollars, in addition to awarding the cost of the suit,
including reasonable investigative and attorney's fees.

(2) The superior court
has jurisdiction to prevent, restrain, and remedy a pattern of criminal
profiteering, or any offense committed with terrorist intent whether or not
committed for financial gain, or a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080
after making provision for the rights of all innocent persons affected by the
violation and after hearing or trial, as appropriate, by issuing appropriate
orders.

(3) Prior to a
determination of liability, orders issued under subsection (2) of this section
may include, but are not limited to, entering restraining orders or
prohibitions or taking such other actions, including the acceptance of
satisfactory performance bonds, in connection with any property or other
interest subject to damages, forfeiture, or other restraints pursuant to this
section as the court deems proper. The orders may also include attachment,
receivership, or injunctive relief in regard to personal or real property
pursuant to Title 7 RCW. In shaping the reach or scope of receivership,
attachment, or injunctive relief, the superior court shall provide for the
protection of bona fide interests in property, including community property, of
persons who were not involved in the violation of this chapter, except to the
extent that such interests or property were acquired or used in such a way as
to be subject to forfeiture under RCW 9A.82.100(4)(f).

(4) Following a
determination of liability, orders may include, but are not limited to:

(a) Ordering any person
to divest himself or herself of any interest, direct or indirect, in any
enterprise.

(b) Imposing reasonable
restrictions on the future activities or investments of any person, including
prohibiting any person from engaging in the same type of endeavor as the enterprise
engaged in, the activities of which affect the laws of this state, to the
extent the Constitutions of the United States and this state permit.

(c) Ordering
dissolution or reorganization of any enterprise.

(d) Ordering the
payment of actual damages sustained to those persons injured by a violation of
RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080, or any offense committed with terrorist intent
whether or not committed for financial gain, or an act of criminal
profiteering that is part of a pattern of criminal profiteering, and in the
court's discretion, increasing the payment to an amount not exceeding three
times the actual damages sustained.

(e) Ordering the
payment of all costs and expenses of the prosecution and investigation of a
pattern of criminal profiteering activity, or any offense committed with
terrorist intent whether or not committed for financial gain, or a
violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080, civil and criminal, incurred by the
state or county, including any costs of defense provided at public expense, as
appropriate to the state general fund or the antiprofiteering revolving fund of
the county.

(f) Ordering forfeiture
first as restitution to any person damaged by an act of criminal profiteering,
or any offense committed with terrorist intent whether or not committed for
financial gain, that is part of a pattern of criminal profiteering then to
the state general fund or antiprofiteering revolving fund of the county, as
appropriate, to the extent not already ordered to be paid in other damages, of
the following:

(i) Any property or
other interest acquired or maintained in violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or
9A.82.080 to the extent of the investment of funds, and any appreciation or
income attributable to the investment, from a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.

(ii) Any property,
contractual right, or claim against property used to influence any enterprise
that a person has established, operated, controlled, conducted, or participated
in the conduct of, in violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.

(iii) All proceeds
traceable to or derived from an offense included in the pattern of criminal
profiteering activity, or any offense committed with terrorist intent
whether or not committed for financial gain, and all moneys, negotiable
instruments, securities, and other things of value significantly used or
intended to be used significantly to facilitate commission of the offense.

(g) Ordering payment to
the state general fund or antiprofiteering revolving fund of the county, as
appropriate, of an amount equal to the gain a person has acquired or maintained
through an offense included in the definition of criminal profiteering.

(5) In addition to or
in lieu of an action under this section, the attorney general or county
prosecuting attorney may file an action for forfeiture to the state general
fund or antiprofiteering revolving fund of the county, as appropriate, to the
extent not already ordered paid pursuant to this section, of the following:

(a) Any interest
acquired or maintained by a person in violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080
to the extent of the investment of funds obtained from a violation of RCW
9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 and any appreciation or income attributable to the
investment.

(b) Any property,
contractual right, or claim against property used to influence any enterprise
that a person has established, operated, controlled, conducted, or participated
in the conduct of, in violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.

(c) All proceeds
traceable to or derived from an offense included in the pattern of criminal
profiteering activity, or any offense committed with terrorist intent
whether or not committed for financial gain, and all moneys, negotiable
instruments, securities, and other things of value significantly used or
intended to be used significantly to facilitate the commission of the offense.

(6) A defendant
convicted in any criminal proceeding is precluded in any civil proceeding from
denying the essential allegations of the criminal offense proven in the
criminal trial in which the defendant was convicted. For the purposes of this
subsection, a conviction shall be deemed to have occurred upon a verdict,
finding, or plea of guilty, notwithstanding the fact that appellate review of
the conviction and sentence has been or may be sought. If a subsequent
reversal of the conviction occurs, any judgment that was based upon that
conviction may be reopened upon motion of the defendant.

(7) The initiation of
civil proceedings under this section shall be commenced within three years
after discovery of the pattern of criminal profiteering activity or after the
pattern should reasonably have been discovered, or in the case of any
offense committed with terrorist intent, within three years after final
disposition of any criminal charges relating to the offense, whichever is later.

(8) The attorney
general or county prosecuting attorney may, in a civil action brought pursuant
to this section, file with the clerk of the superior court a certificate
stating that the case is of special public importance. A copy of that
certificate shall be furnished immediately by the clerk to the presiding chief
judge of the superior court in which the action is pending and, upon receipt of
the copy, the judge shall immediately designate a judge to hear and determine
the action. The judge so designated shall promptly assign the action for
hearing, participate in the hearings and determination, and cause the action to
be expedited.

(9) The standard of
proof in actions brought pursuant to this section is the preponderance of the
evidence test.

(10) A person other
than the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney who files an action
under this section shall serve notice and one copy of the pleading on the
attorney general within thirty days after the action is filed with the superior
court. The notice shall identify the action, the person, and the person's
attorney. Service of the notice does not limit or otherwise affect the right
of the state to maintain an action under this section or intervene in a pending
action nor does it authorize the person to name the state or the attorney
general as a party to the action.

(11) Except in cases
filed by a county prosecuting attorney, the attorney general may, upon timely
application, intervene in any civil action or proceeding brought under this
section if the attorney general certifies that in the attorney general's
opinion the action is of special public importance. Upon intervention, the
attorney general may assert any available claim and is entitled to the same
relief as if the attorney general had instituted a separate action.

(12) In addition to the
attorney general's right to intervene as a party in any action under this
section, the attorney general may appear as amicus curiae in any proceeding in
which a claim under this section has been asserted or in which a court is
interpreting RCW 9A.82.010, 9A.82.080, 9A.82.090, 9A.82.110, or 9A.82.120, or
this section.

(13) A private civil
action under this section does not limit any other civil or criminal action
under this chapter or any other provision. Private civil remedies provided
under this section are supplemental and not mutually exclusive.

(14) Upon motion by the
defendant, the court may authorize the sale or transfer of assets subject to an
order or lien authorized by this chapter for the purpose of paying actual
attorney's fees and costs of defense. The motion shall specify the assets for
which sale or transfer is sought and shall be accompanied by the defendant's
sworn statement that the defendant has no other assets available for such purposes.
No order authorizing such sale or transfer may be entered unless the court
finds that the assets involved are not subject to possible forfeiture under RCW
9A.82.100(4)(f). Prior to disposition of the motion, the court shall notify
the state of the assets sought to be sold or transferred and shall hear
argument on the issue of whether the assets are subject to forfeiture under RCW
9A.82.100(4)(f). Such a motion may be made from time to time and shall be
heard by the court on an expedited basis.

(15) In an action
brought under subsection (1)(a) and (b)(i) of this section, either party has
the right to a jury trial.

Sec. 20. RCW 9A.82.120 and 2001 c
222 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state, upon
filing a criminal action under RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080, or alleging any
offense committed with terrorist intent whether or not committed for financial
gain, or a civil action under RCW 9A.82.100, may file in accordance with
this section a criminal profiteering lien. A filing fee or other charge is not
required for filing a criminal profiteering lien.

(2) A criminal
profiteering lien shall be signed by the attorney general or the county
prosecuting attorney representing the state in the action and shall set forth
the following information:

(a) The name of the
defendant whose property or other interests are to be subject to the lien;

(b) In the discretion
of the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the lien, any
aliases or fictitious names of the defendant named in the lien;

(c) If known to the
attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the lien, the present
residence or principal place of business of the person named in the lien;

(d) A reference to the
proceeding pursuant to which the lien is filed, including the name of the
court, the title of the action, and the court's file number for the proceeding;

(e) The name and
address of the attorney representing the state in the proceeding pursuant to
which the lien is filed;

(f) A statement that
the notice is being filed pursuant to this section;

(g) The amount that the
state claims in the action or, with respect to property or other interests that
the state has requested forfeiture to the state or county, a description of the
property or interests sought to be paid or forfeited;

(h) If known to the
attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the lien, a description
of property that is subject to forfeiture to the state or property in which the
defendant has an interest that is available to satisfy a judgment entered in
favor of the state; and

(i) Such other
information as the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the
lien deems appropriate.

(3) The attorney
general or the county prosecuting attorney filing the lien may amend a lien
filed under this section at any time by filing an amended criminal profiteering
lien in accordance with this section that identifies the prior lien amended.

(4) The attorney
general or the county prosecuting attorney filing the lien shall, as soon as
practical after filing a criminal profiteering lien, furnish to any person
named in the lien a notice of the filing of the lien. Failure to furnish
notice under this subsection does not invalidate or otherwise affect a criminal
profiteering lien filed in accordance with this section.

(5)(a) A criminal
profiteering lien is perfected against interests in personal property in the
same manner as a security interest in like property pursuant to RCW 62A.9-302,
62A.9-303, 62A.9-304, 62A.9-305, and 62A.9-306 or as otherwise required to
perfect a security interest in like property under applicable law. In the case
of perfection by filing, the state shall file, in lieu of a financing statement
in the form prescribed by RCW 62A.9-402, a notice of lien in substantially the
following form:

NOTICE
OF LIEN

Pursuant to RCW
9A.82.120, the state of Washington claims a criminal profiteering lien on all
real and personal property of:

Name:

. . . . . . . . . . .

Address:

. . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . .

State
of Washington

...................................

By
(authorized signature)

On receipt of such a
notice from the state, a filing officer shall, without payment of filing fee,
file and index the notice as if it were a financing statement naming the state
as secured party and the defendant as debtor.

(b) A criminal
profiteering lien is perfected against interests in real property by filing the
lien in the office where a mortgage on the real estate would be filed or
recorded. The filing officer shall file and index the criminal profiteering
lien, without payment of a filing fee, in the same manner as a mortgage.

(6) The filing of a
criminal profiteering lien in accordance with this section creates a lien in
favor of the state in:

(a) Any interest of the
defendant, in real property situated in the county in which the lien is filed, then
maintained, or thereafter acquired in the name of the defendant identified in
the lien;

(b) Any interest of the
defendant, in personal property situated in this state, then maintained or
thereafter acquired in the name of the defendant identified in the lien; and

(c) Any property
identified in the lien to the extent of the defendant's interest therein.

(7) The lien created in
favor of the state in accordance with this section, when filed or otherwise
perfected as provided in subsection (5) of this section, has, with respect to
any of the property described in subsection (6) of this section, the same priority
determined pursuant to the laws of this state as a mortgage or security
interest given for value (but not a purchase money security interest) and
perfected in the same manner with respect to such property; except that any
lien perfected pursuant to Title 60 RCW by any person who, in the ordinary
course of his business, furnishes labor, services, or materials, or rents,
leases, or otherwise supplies equipment, without knowledge of the criminal
profiteering lien, is superior to the criminal profiteering lien.

(8) Upon entry of
judgment in favor of the state, the state may proceed to execute thereon as in
the case of any other judgment, except that in order to preserve the state's
lien priority as provided in this section the state shall, in addition to such
other notice as is required by law, give at least thirty days' notice of the
execution to any person possessing at the time the notice is given, an interest
recorded subsequent to the date the state's lien was perfected.

(9) Upon the entry of a
final judgment in favor of the state providing for forfeiture of property to
the state, the title of the state to the property:

(a) In the case of real
property or a beneficial interest in real property, relates back to the date of
filing the criminal profiteering lien or, if no criminal profiteering lien is
filed, then to the date of recording of the final judgment or the abstract
thereof; or

(b) In the case of
personal property or a beneficial interest in personal property, relates back
to the date the personal property was seized by the state, or the date of
filing of a criminal profiteering lien in accordance with this section,
whichever is earlier, but if the property was not seized and no criminal
profiteering lien was filed then to the date the final judgment was filed with
the department of licensing and, if the personal property is an aircraft, with
the federal aviation administration.

(10) This section does
not limit the right of the state to obtain any order or injunction,
receivership, writ, attachment, garnishment, or other remedy authorized under
RCW 9A.82.100 or appropriate to protect the interests of the state or available
under other applicable law.

(11) In a civil or
criminal action under this chapter, the superior court shall provide for the protection
of bona fide interests in property, including community property, subject to
liens of persons who were not involved in the violation of this chapter, except
to the extent that such interests or property were acquired or used in such a
way as to be subject to forfeiture pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100(4)(f).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21. Sections 2, 3, 10, and 11
of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 9A RCW.

---
END ---