BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Public higher education
funding is a shared responsibility between the state, students, and the public
colleges and universities. Periodic increases in state funding, state
financial aid, and tuition must be authorized to provide quality higher
education for the citizens of Washington. It is the intent of the legislature
to authorize the governing boards to establish tuition rates, to make colleges
and universities responsible to provide quality programs, and to provide state
fund appropriations so that tuition increases can support program improvements.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.15.031 and 1996
c 142 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The term
"operating fees" as used in this chapter shall include the fees,
other than building fees, charged all students registering at the state's
colleges and universities but shall not include fees for short courses,
self-supporting degree credit programs and courses, marine station work,
experimental station work, correspondence or extension courses, and individual
instruction and student deposits or rentals, disciplinary and library fines,
which colleges and universities shall have the right to impose, laboratory,
gymnasium, health, technology and student activity fees, or fees, charges,
rentals, and other income derived from any or all revenue producing lands,
buildings and facilities of the colleges or universities heretofore or
hereafter acquired, constructed or installed, including but not limited to
income from rooms, dormitories, dining rooms, hospitals, infirmaries, housing
or student activity buildings, vehicular parking facilities, land, or the
appurtenances thereon, or such other special fees as may be established by any
college or university board of trustees or regents from time to time. All
moneys received as operating fees at any institution of higher education shall
be deposited in a local account containing only operating fees revenue and
related interest: PROVIDED, That a minimum of three and one-half percent of
operating fees shall be retained by the institutions((, except the technical
colleges,)) for the purposes of RCW 28B.15.820. Local operating fee
accounts shall not be subject to appropriation by the legislature or allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.15.066 and 2000
c 152 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature that:

In making appropriations
from the state's general fund to institutions of higher education, each
appropriation shall conform to the following:

(1) The appropriation
shall not be reduced by the amount of operating fees revenue estimated to be
collected from students enrolled at the state-funded enrollment level specified
in the omnibus biennial operating appropriations act;

(2) The appropriation
shall not be reduced by the amount of operating fees revenue collected from
students enrolled above the state-funded level((, but within the
over-enrollment limitations,)) specified in the omnibus biennial operating
appropriations act; and

(3) The general fund
state appropriation shall not be reduced by the amount of operating fees
revenue collected as a result of waiving less operating fees revenue than the
amounts authorized under RCW 28B.15.910. State general fund appropriations
shall not be provided for revenue foregone as a result of or for waivers
granted under RCW 28B.15.915.

Sec. 4. RCW 28B.15.067 and 1997
c 403 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Tuition fees shall
be established under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) ((Academic year
tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions of higher education
for the 1997-98 academic year, other than the summer term, shall be as provided
in this subsection.

(a) At the
University of Washington and Washington State University:

(i) For resident
undergraduate students and other resident students not in graduate, law, or
first professional programs, two thousand nine hundred eighty-eight dollars;

(ii)(A) For
nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at the
University of Washington not in graduate, law, or first professional programs,
ten thousand two hundred seventy-eight dollars;

(B) For nonresident
undergraduate students and other nonresident students at Washington State
University not in graduate or first professional programs, nine thousand eight
hundred seventy dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, four thousand eight hundred fifty-four dollars;

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, twelve thousand five hundred eighty-eight dollars;

(v) For resident law
students, five thousand ten dollars;

(vi) For nonresident
law students, twelve thousand nine hundred fifteen dollars;

(vii) For resident
first professional students, eight thousand one hundred twelve dollars; and

(viii) For nonresident
first professional students, twenty-one thousand twenty-four dollars.

(b) At the regional
universities and The Evergreen State College:

(i) For resident
undergraduate and all other resident students not in graduate programs, two
thousand two hundred eleven dollars;

(ii) For nonresident
undergraduate and all other nonresident students not in graduate programs,
eight thousand six hundred forty-six dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, three thousand seven hundred twenty-six dollars; and

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, eleven thousand nine hundred seventy-six dollars.

(c) At the community
colleges:

(i) For resident
students, one thousand three hundred eleven dollars; and

(ii) For nonresident
students, five thousand five hundred eighty-six dollars.

(3) Academic year
tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions of higher education
beginning with the 1998-99 academic year, other than the summer term, shall be
as provided in this subsection unless different rates are adopted in the
omnibus appropriations act.

(a) At the
University of Washington and Washington State University:

(i) For resident
undergraduate students and other resident students not in graduate, law, or
first professional programs, three thousand one hundred eight dollars;

(ii)(A) For
nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at the
University of Washington not in graduate, law, or first professional programs,
eleven thousand one hundred thirty dollars;

(B) For nonresident
undergraduate students and other nonresident students at Washington State
University not in graduate or first professional programs, ten thousand two
hundred sixty-six dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, five thousand forty-six dollars;

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, thirteen thousand ninety-two dollars;

(v) For resident law
students, five thousand three hundred seventy-six dollars;

(vi) For nonresident
law students, thirteen thousand seven hundred eighty-two dollars;

(vii) For resident
first professional students, eight thousand four hundred thirty-six dollars;
and

(viii) For
nonresident first professional students, twenty-one thousand eight hundred
sixty-four dollars.

(b) At the regional
universities and The Evergreen State College:

(i) For resident
undergraduate and all other resident students not in graduate programs, two
thousand two hundred ninety-eight dollars;

(ii) For nonresident
undergraduate and all other nonresident students not in graduate programs,
eight thousand nine hundred ninety-one dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, three thousand eight hundred seventy-six dollars; and

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, twelve thousand four hundred fifty-six dollars.

(c) At the community
colleges:

(i) For resident
students, one thousand three hundred sixty-two dollars; and

(ii) For nonresident
students, five thousand eight hundred eight dollars.

(4) For the 1997-98
and 1998-99 academic years, the University of Washington shall use at least ten
percent of the revenue received from the difference between a four percent
increase in tuition fees and the actual increase charged to law students to
assist needy low and middle-income resident law students. For the 1997-98 and
1998-99 academic years, the University of Washington shall use at least ten
percent of the revenue received from the difference between a four percent
increase in tuition fees and the actual increase charged to nonresident
undergraduate students and all other nonresident students not in graduate, law,
or first professional programs to assist needy low and middle-income resident
undergraduate students and all other resident students not enrolled in
graduate, law, or first professional programs. This requirement is in addition
to the deposit requirements of the institutional aid fund under RCW 28B.15.820.

(5))) (a) For the 2003-04 academic year and each
academic year thereafter, the governing boards of the state universities, the
regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state board for
community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees
for resident undergraduate students, including summer school students.
Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may exceed the fiscal growth
factor. Reductions or increases may be made for all or portions of an
institution's programs, campuses, courses, or students. Reductions and
increases for resident undergraduate students at the community and technical
colleges are limited to no more than ten percent per year starting with the
2003-04 academic year.

(b) For the 2003-04
academic year and each academic year thereafter, the governing boards of the
state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and
the state board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase
full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including summer school students. Percentage increases in full-time tuition
fees may exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students.

(3) The legislature
shall continue to fund the state need grant program to support changes in
overall program eligibility, increases in enrollments, and changes in tuition.
The legislature shall increase funding for the state need grant program to
support annual tuition increases of up to ten percent. If any undergraduate
resident tuition rate is increased in excess of ten percent, the state universities,
the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College are responsible for
providing funds from local revenues to state need grant recipients to cover the
increased costs in tuition and fees resulting from the tuition increase above
ten percent. The amount provided per student shall be at the same proportion
as the increase in the underlying state need grant for the tuition and fees
increase up to ten percent. This amount of local need grant support shall be
carried forward into following years and adjusted for any future tuition and
state need grant program changes. The state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall submit a report to the
office of financial management and the higher education coordinating board at
the conclusion of each academic year, describing how state and institutional
funds were awarded to state need grant recipients.

(4) The tuition
fees established under this chapter shall not apply to high school students
enrolling in participating institutions of higher education under RCW
28A.600.300 through ((28A.600.395)) 28A.600.400.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In recognition of
increasing authority at the state universities, the regional universities, and
The Evergreen State College, to promote accountability these institutions shall
permit entering freshmen and resident students enrolled in one hundred twenty
semester hour or one hundred eighty quarter hour programs to enter into an
agreement with the institution to guarantee that the student will be able to
graduate in four years. Resident students transferring from other institutions
of higher education may have an individual agreement developed by an academic
advisor establishing a guaranteed graduation date based on the degree program
to be undertaken, credits accepted toward program requirements, and term of
arrival at the four-year institution of higher education.

(2)(a) The state
universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall
guarantee that a student enrolled in a four-year course of study will be able
to graduate in four years if they meet the requirements of this subsection.
Guarantees for students transferring from other institutions of higher
education shall be individually developed and a guaranteed graduation date
established based on the student meeting the requirements of this subsection
(2).

(b) To secure the
guarantee in this subsection (2), each student and an academic advisor of that
institution of higher education must enter an agreement establishing a
graduation action plan for an approved course of study before enrollment.

(c) Students are
responsible to complete courses successfully and in a timely manner to maintain
progress required by the graduation action plan. Students with agreements
under this section, however, are not restricted any differently than other
students from attending, enrolling in courses, or graduating.

(d) Students are
responsible for gaining acceptance into the degree program specified in their
graduation action plan. Degree program admissions policies and procedures are
not affected by the provisions of this section.

(e) The state
universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College are
responsible for providing students with access to courses, or approved
substitute courses, necessary for students to meet the requirements of their
graduation action plans. Four-year institutions of higher education may
provide priority enrollment to students with guaranteed graduation dates under
the provisions of this section.

(3) If a student with
an existing guarantee under a graduation action plan desires to change degree
programs, the four-year institution of higher education shall determine if the
existing guarantee can remain in force and, if so, will develop a new
graduation action plan. If the four-year institution of higher education
cannot accommodate a student's change of degree program made after the student
completes more than fifteen credit hours, the institution is not under an
obligation to change the guarantee or the graduation action plan under which it
was established.

(4) Should a four-year
institution of higher education be unable to provide the necessary courses,
preventing a student from graduating in the quarter established in the
graduation action plan, the institution shall waive all tuition and fees for
additional courses necessary to meet the requirements of the graduation action
plan that must be taken after the guaranteed graduation date. Enrollment in
required courses without charging any tuition or any fees is the full extent of
the remedy available to a student under the guarantee.

(5) The state
universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall
report annually, by December 15th, to the office of financial management, the
higher education coordinating board, and the fiscal committees and the higher
education committees of the legislature, the number of students who have
approved graduation action plans, the number of students who have graduated by
the guaranteed graduation date, and waivers provided under this section during
the prior academic year.

Sec. 6. RCW 28B.15.069 and 1997 c 403 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:

(1) ((As used in
this section, each of the following subsections is a separate tuition category:

(a) Resident
undergraduate students and all other resident students not in first
professional, graduate, or law programs;

(b) Nonresident
undergraduate students and all other nonresident students not in first
professional graduate or law programs;

(c) Resident
graduate students;

(d) Resident law
students;

(e) Nonresident
graduate students;

(f) Nonresident law
students;

(g) Resident first
professional students; and

(h) Nonresident
first professional students.

(2) Unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this section "first
professional programs" means programs leading to one of the following
degrees: Doctor of medicine, doctor of dental surgery, or doctor of veterinary
medicine.

(3))) The building fee for each academic year shall
be a percentage of total tuition fees. This percentage shall be calculated by
the higher education coordinating board and be based on the actual percentage
the building fee is of total tuition for each tuition category in the 1994-95
academic year, rounded up to the nearest half percent.

(((4))) (2)
The governing boards of each institution of higher education, except for the
technical colleges, shall charge to and collect from each student a services
and activities fee. A governing board may increase the existing fee annually,
consistent with budgeting procedures set forth in RCW 28B.15.045, by a
percentage not to exceed the annual percentage increase in student tuition fees
for ((the applicable tuition category)) resident undergraduate
students: PROVIDED, That such percentage increase shall not apply to that
portion of the services and activities fee previously committed to the
repayment of bonded debt. These rate adjustments may exceed the fiscal
growth factor. For the 2003-04 academic year, the services and activities fee
shall be based upon the resident undergraduate services and activities fee in
2002-03. The services and activities fee committee provided for in RCW
28B.15.045 may initiate a request to the governing board for a fee increase.

(((5))) (3)
Tuition and services and activities fees consistent with subsection (((4)))
(2) of this section shall be set by the state board for community and
technical colleges for community college summer school students unless the
community college charges fees in accordance with RCW 28B.15.515.

(((6))) (4)
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, each governing board of a
community college may charge such fees for ungraded courses, noncredit courses,
community services courses, and self‑supporting courses as it, in its
discretion, may determine, consistent with the rules of the state board for
community and technical colleges.

Sec. 7. RCW 28B.15.100 and 1999
c 321 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen
State College, and the community colleges shall charge to and collect from each
of the students registering at the particular institution for any quarter or
semester such tuition fees and services and activities fees, and other fees as
such board shall in its discretion determine. The total of all fees shall be
rounded to the nearest whole dollar amount: PROVIDED, That such tuition fees
((for other than the summer term)) shall be ((in the amounts for the
respective institutions as otherwise set forth in)) established in
accordance with RCW 28B.15.067.

(2) Part-time students
shall be charged tuition and services and activities fees proportionate to
full-time student rates established for residents and nonresidents: PROVIDED,
That except for students registered at community colleges, students registered
for fewer than two credit hours shall be charged tuition and services and
activities fees at the rate established for two credit hours: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That, subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, residents of Idaho
or Oregon who are enrolled in community college district number twenty for six
or fewer credits during any quarter or semester may be exempted from payment of
all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential upon a
declaration by the higher education coordinating board that it finds Washington
residents from the community college district are afforded substantially
equivalent treatment by such other states.

(3)
Full-time students registered for more than eighteen credit hours shall be
charged an additional operating fee for each credit hour in excess of eighteen
hours at the applicable established per credit hour tuition fee rate for
part-time students: PROVIDED, That, subject to the limitations of RCW
28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities and the community
colleges may exempt all or a portion of the additional charge, for students who
are registered exclusively in first professional programs in medicine, dental
medicine, veterinary medicine, doctor of pharmacy, or law, or who are
registered exclusively in required courses in vocational preparatory programs.

---
END ---