BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.14.050 and 1999 c
165 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
counties, cities, and transportation authorities under RCW 82.14.045 and public
facilities districts under chapter 36.100 and 35.57 RCW shall contract, prior
to the effective date of a resolution or ordinance imposing a sales and use
tax, the administration and collection to the state department of revenue,
which shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed
two percent of the taxes collected for administration and collection expenses
incurred by the department. No amount may be deducted for taxes collected
on behalf of rural counties or the cities therein. The remainder of any
portion of any tax authorized by this chapter which is collected by the
department of revenue shall be deposited by the state department of revenue in
the local sales and use tax account hereby created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the local sales and use tax account may be spent only for
distribution to counties, cities, transportation authorities, and public
facilities districts imposing a sales and use tax. All administrative
provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW, as they now exist or
may hereafter be amended, shall, insofar as they are applicable to state sales
and use taxes, be applicable to taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter. Except
as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of investments of balances in the
local sales and use tax account shall be credited to the local sales and use
tax account and distributed to the counties, cities, transportation
authorities, and public facilities districts monthly.

(2) As used in this
section, "rural county" means a county with a population density of
less than one hundred persons per square mile, as determined by the office of
financial management and published each year by the department for the period
July 1st to June 30th.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002, and shall apply to collections made after July 1, 2002.

---
END ---