BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department, in
cooperation with the office of superintendent of public instruction, shall
prepare a proposal for consideration by the legislature to address the issue of
educational stability and continuity for children who are in short‑term
out‑of‑home placement. For the purposes of this proposal,
"short-term out-of-home placement" means a placement of fewer than
seventy-five days. The department shall also consult with representatives of
school districts and entities that regularly advocate on behalf of persons who
are foster children and foster parents.

(2) The proposal shall
address the best interests of children in short‑term out‑of‑home
care and recommend options for reducing adverse impacts on learning stability
and educational continuity of those children. The proposal shall consider:
(a) When, and under what circumstances, efforts should be made to maintain
children in short‑term out‑of‑home care as enrolled students
in the district in which they were enrolled prior to placement in out‑of‑home
care; (b) upon whom any costs associated with transportation from their out‑of‑home
care residence to the school should be placed; (c) what arrangements should be
made regarding children who had been in private school or receiving home-based
instruction; (d) appropriate coordination of departmental and judicial scheduling
and decision making to reduce the adverse impacts on the educational status of
children in short‑term out‑of‑home care; (e) any needed
regulatory and statutory changes needed to implement the proposal; and (f) the
circumstances under which it would be appropriate to transfer the child's
enrolled status to a district other than that in which she or he had been
enrolled.

(3) The proposal shall
be submitted to the governor and the legislature not later than October 1,
2002.

(4) This
section expires January 1, 2003.

--- END ---