BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the legislature's
intent to clarify the law to reflect that boarding homes licensed under chapter
18.20 RCW are engaged in the renting or leasing of real property to consumers
and, accordingly, are exempt from taxation under chapter 82.04 RCW.

---
END ---