BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.36.030 and 1996 c
54 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
following limitations and conditions, the owner, the owner's immediate family
member, the owner's documented employee, or a tenant of real property may trap
or kill on that property, without the licenses required under RCW 77.32.010 or
authorization from the director under RCW 77.12.240, wild animals or wild birds
that are damaging crops, domestic animals, or fowl:

(a) Threatened or
endangered species shall not be hunted, trapped, or killed;

(b) Except in an
emergency situation, deer, elk, and protected wildlife shall not be killed
without a permit issued and conditioned by the director or the director's
designee. In an emergency, the department may give verbal permission followed
by written permission to trap or kill any deer, elk, or protected wildlife that
is damaging crops, domestic animals, or fowl; ((and))

(c) On privately owned
cattle ranching lands, the land owner or lessee may declare an emergency only
when the department has not responded within forty-eight hours after having
been contacted by the land owner or lessee regarding damage caused by wild
animals or wild birds. In such an emergency, the owner or lessee may trap or
kill any deer, elk, or other protected wildlife that is causing the damage but
deer and elk may only be killed if such lands were open to public hunting
during the previous hunting season, or the closure to public hunting was
coordinated with the department to protect property and livestock; and

(d) A bear, bobcat,
cougar, or coyote may be killed if one of those species damages cattle, horses,
llama, sheep, or goats within the immediately preceding twelve-month period.

(2) Except
for coyotes and Columbian ground squirrels, wildlife trapped or killed under this
section remain the property of the state, and the person trapping or killing
the wildlife shall notify the department immediately. The department shall
dispose of wildlife so taken within three days of receiving such a notification
and in a manner determined by the director to be in the best interest of the
state.

--- END ---