BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.17.680 and 1993 c
2 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No employer or
labor organization may increase the salary of an officer or employee, or give
an emolument to an officer, employee, or other person or entity, with the
intention that the increase in salary, or the emolument, or a part of it, be
contributed or spent to support or oppose a candidate, state official against
whom recall charges have been filed, political party, or political committee.

(2) No employer or
labor organization may discriminate against an officer or employee in the terms
or conditions of employment for (a) the failure to contribute to, (b) the
failure in any way to support or oppose, or (c) in any way supporting or
opposing a candidate, ballot proposition, political party, or political
committee. At least annually, an employee from whom wages or salary are
withheld under subsection (3) of this section shall be notified of the
provisions of this subsection.

(3) No employer or
other person or entity responsible for the disbursement of funds in payment of
wages or salaries may withhold or divert a portion of an employee's wages or
salaries for contributions to political committees or for use as political
contributions except upon the written request of the employee. The request
must be made on a form prescribed by the commission informing the employee of
the prohibition against employer and labor organization discrimination
described in subsection (2) of this section. ((The request is valid for no
more than twelve months from the date it is made by the employee.)) The
employee may revoke the request at any time. At least annually, the employee
shall be notified about the right to revoke the request.

(4) Each person or
entity who withholds contributions under subsection (3) of this section shall
maintain open for public inspection for a period of no less than three years,
during normal business hours, documents and books of accounts that shall include
a copy of each employee's request, the amounts and dates funds were actually
withheld, and the amounts and dates funds were transferred to a political
committee. Copies of such information shall be delivered to the commission
upon request.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---