BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.04.230 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 6 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

Any official of the
state authorized to disburse funds in payment of salaries and wages of public
officers ((or)), employees, or individual providers as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240(4) is authorized, upon written request of the officer ((or)),
employee, or individual provider to deduct from the salaries ((or)),
wages, or payments of the officers ((or)), employees, or
individual providers the amount or amounts of subscription payments,
premiums, contributions, or continuation thereof, for payment of the following:

(1) Credit union
deductions: PROVIDED, That twenty-five or more employees or individual
providers of a single state agency or a total of one hundred or more state
employees or individual providers of several agencies have authorized
such a deduction for payment to the same credit union. An agency may, in its
own discretion, establish a minimum participation requirement of fewer than
twenty-five employees or individual providers.

(2) Parking fee
deductions: PROVIDED, That payment is made for parking facilities furnished by
the agency or by the department of general administration.

(3) U.S. savings bond
deductions: PROVIDED, That a person within the particular agency shall be
appointed to act as trustee. The trustee will receive all contributions; purchase
and deliver all bond certificates; and keep such records and furnish such bond
or security as will render full accountability for all bond contributions.

(4) Board, lodging or
uniform deductions when such board, lodging and uniforms are furnished by the
state, or deductions for academic tuitions or fees or scholarship contributions
payable to the employing institution.

(5) Dues and other fees
deductions: PROVIDED, That the deduction is for payment of membership dues to
any professional organization formed primarily for public employees,
individual providers, or college and university professors: AND PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That twenty-five or more employees or individual providers of a
single state agency, or a total of one hundred or more state employees or
individual providers of several agencies have authorized such a deduction
for payment to the same professional organization.

(6) Labor or employee
organization dues may be deducted in the event that a payroll deduction is not
provided under a collective bargaining agreement under ((the provisions of))
RCW 41.06.150 or, for individual providers, under RCW 41.56.110:
PROVIDED, That twenty-five or more officers ((or)), employees,
or individual providers of a single agency, or a total of one hundred or
more officers ((or)), employees, or individual providers
of several agencies have authorized such a deduction for payment to the same
labor or employee organization: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That labor or employee
organizations with five hundred or more members in state government or under
the home care quality authority may have payroll deduction for employee or
individual provider benefit programs.

(7) Insurance
contributions to the authority for payment of premiums under contracts
authorized by the state health care authority. However, enrollment or
assignment by the state health care authority to participate in a health care
benefit plan, as required by RCW 41.05.065(5), shall authorize a payroll
deduction of premium contributions without a written consent under the terms
and conditions established by the public employees' benefits board.

(8) Deductions to a
bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association if (a) the bank, savings
bank, or savings and loan association is authorized to do business in this
state; and (b) twenty-five or more employees or individual providers of
a single agency, or fewer, if a lesser number is established by such agency, or
a total of one hundred or more state employees or individual providers
of several agencies have authorized a deduction for payment to the same bank,
savings bank, or savings and loan association.

(9) Voluntary
deductions for political committees registered with the public disclosure
commission, federal election commission, or both. However, if twenty-five or
more officers, employees, or individual providers of a single agency or a total
of one hundred or more officers, employees, or individual providers of several
agencies have authorized such a deduction for payment to the same political
committee. The political committee, or the sponsor of the political committee,
shall reimburse the state for the additional costs incurred in making the
deductions authorized in this subsection in order to ensure that no state funds
are used for political purposes.

Deductions from
salaries and wages of public officers ((and)), employees, and
individual providers other than those enumerated in this section or by
other law, may be authorized by the director of financial management for
purposes clearly related to state employment or goals and objectives of the
agency and for plans authorized by the state health care authority.

The authority to make
deductions from the salaries and wages of public officers ((and)),
employees, and individual providers as provided for in this section
shall be in addition to such other authority as may be provided by law:
PROVIDED, That the state or any department, division, or separate agency of the
state shall not be liable to any insurance carrier or contractor for the
failure to make or transmit any such deduction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---