BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that the state is aggressively pursuing nursing home proshare revenue from the
federal government that is based upon the state's supplemental payments to
nursing homes operated by rural public hospital districts. Supplemental
payment amounts are determined by a calculation that involves aggregating
medicaid payments to all nursing homes. Over ninety-five percent of the
supplemental payment amounts have been directly attributable to medicaid
payment data for privately owned nursing homes. The state has contractually
required participating rural public hospital districts to return to the state
treasurer in the form of intergovernmental transfer an amount equal to at least
ninety-eight percent of the supplemental payments. Thus no more than two
percent of the supplemental payments can be retained by rural public hospital
district nursing homes for long-term care spending, and none of the federal
proshare revenue generated through these supplemental payments has been spent
directly on the state's long-term care needs.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature that a significant share of federal proshare medicaid
reimbursement received by the state should be dedicated to improving the
adequacy of state medicaid payments for long-term care and the quality of life
for all of the state's clients receiving long-term care services.

(3) It is the further
intent of the legislature that existing state funding for long-term care,
including all sources of such funding, will not be reduced, supplanted, or
otherwise adversely impacted by appropriations from the long-term care quality
fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 74.39A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The long-term care
quality fund is established in the state treasury. During each fiscal year,
the state treasurer shall deposit in the long-term care quality account half of
all proshare reimbursement received from the federal government based upon
state supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by rural public hospital
districts.

(2) The
legislature may appropriate moneys from the long-term care quality fund only to
enhance payments to those contracting with the state to provide long-term care
under this chapter and chapter 74.46 RCW.

---
END ---