BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.20A RCW to read as follows:

(1) For section 1115
federal demonstration waiver requests that were submitted to the federal
government prior to the effective date of this act, the department shall submit
any approved waivers to the senate committee on health and long-term care and
the house of representatives committee on health care for their consideration.
The department shall provide the legislative committees with all necessary
information to ensure a full public discussion of the implications and
potential impacts of the waiver. The department shall include full details
regarding the applicants and recipients to be affected by the proposed changes,
the proposed changes in benefits, services, eligibility, enrollment and
application processing, and cost-sharing, preexisting conditions and penalties,
and an anticipated implementation date of the proposed changes.

(2) The
department shall request legislative approval prior to implementing any section
1115 federal demonstration waivers modifying the medical assistance program
that have been approved by the federal government.

--- END ---