BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 90.82 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature
reaffirms the intent of chapter 237, Laws of 2001 to meet the needs of fish and
healthy watersheds statewide and the finding of chapter 237, Laws of 2001 that
clarifying the authorities for instream flows is an important step to providing
a better future for our state. The legislature also reaffirms the policy
enacted in chapter 90.22 RCW and RCW 90.54.020(3)(a) and 77.55.050 for state
protection of instream flows. By this act, the legislature intends to clarify
amendatory language of chapter 237, Laws of 2001 to assure implementation of
the intent and findings of that act.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.82.040 and 2001 c
237 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Once a WRIA
planning unit has been initiated under RCW 90.82.060 and a lead agency has been
designated, it shall notify the department and may apply to the department for
funding assistance for conducting the planning. Funds shall be provided from
and to the extent of appropriations made by the legislature to the department
expressly for this purpose.

(2)(a) Each planning
unit that has complied with subsection (1) of this section is eligible to
receive watershed planning grants in the following amounts for three phases of
watershed planning:

(i) Initiating
governments may apply for an initial organizing grant of up to fifty thousand
dollars for a single WRIA or up to seventy-five thousand dollars for a multi-WRIA
management area in accordance with RCW 90.82.060(4);

(ii)(A) A planning unit
may apply for up to two hundred thousand dollars for each WRIA in the
management area for conducting watershed assessments in accordance with RCW
90.82.070, except that a planning unit that chooses to conduct a detailed
assessment or studies under (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection or whose initiating
governments choose or have chosen to include an instream flow or water quality
component in accordance with RCW 90.82.080 or 90.82.090 may apply for up to one
hundred thousand additional dollars for each instream flow and up to one
hundred thousand additional dollars for each water quality component included
for each WRIA to conduct an assessment on that optional component and for each WRIA
in which the assessments or studies under (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection are
conducted.

(B) A planning unit may
elect to apply for up to one hundred thousand additional dollars to conduct a
detailed assessment of multipurpose water storage opportunities or for studies
of specific multipurpose storage projects which opportunities or projects are
consistent with and support the other elements of the planning unit's watershed
plan developed under this chapter; and

(iii) A planning unit
may apply for up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars for each WRIA in the
management area for developing a watershed plan and making recommendations for
actions by local, state, and federal agencies, tribes, private property owners,
private organizations, and individual citizens, including a recommended list of
strategies and projects that would further the purpose of the plan in
accordance with RCW 90.82.060 through 90.82.100.

(b) A planning unit may
request a different amount for phase two or phase three of watershed planning
than is specified in (a) of this subsection, provided that the total amount of
funds awarded do not exceed the maximum amount the planning unit is eligible
for under (a) of this subsection. The department shall approve such an
alternative allocation of funds if the planning unit identifies how the
proposed alternative will meet the goals of this chapter and provides a ((proposed))
timeline for ((the completion of)) completing planning in
accordance with RCW 90.82.130. However, the up to one hundred thousand
additional dollars in funding for instream flow and water quality components
and for water storage assessments or studies that a planning unit may apply for
under (a)(ii)(A) of this subsection may be used only for those instream flow,
water quality, and water storage purposes.

(c) By December 1,
2001, or within one year of initiating phase one of watershed planning,
whichever occurs later, the initiating governments for each planning unit must
inform the department whether they ((intend to have the planning unit
establish or amend instream flows as part of its planning process)) choose
to include an instream flow component in accordance with RCW 90.82.080. If
they ((elect to have the planning unit establish or amend instream flows))
choose to include an instream flow component in accordance with RCW
90.82.080, the planning unit is eligible to receive one hundred thousand
dollars for that purpose in accordance with (a)(ii) of this subsection. If the
initiating governments for a planning unit ((elect not to establish or amend
instream flows as part of the unit's planning process)) choose to
include an instream flow component in accordance with RCW 90.82.080, the
department shall retain one hundred thousand dollars to carry out an assessment
to support establishment of instream flows and to establish such flows in
accordance with RCW 90.54.020(3)(a) and chapter 90.22 RCW. Except as
provided in RCW 90.82.080, the department shall not use these funds to
amend an existing instream flow unless requested to do so by the initiating
governments for a planning unit.

(d) In administering
funds appropriated for supplemental funding for optional plan components under
(a)(ii) of this subsection, the department shall give priority in granting the
available funds to ((proposals for setting or amending)) instream flows components.

(3)(a) The department
shall use the eligibility criteria in this subsection (3) instead of rules,
policies, or guidelines when evaluating grant applications at each stage of the
grants program.

(b) In reviewing grant
applications under this subsection (3), the department shall evaluate whether:

(i) The planning unit
meets all of the requirements of this chapter;

(ii) The application
demonstrates a need for state planning funds to accomplish the objectives of
the planning process; and

(iii) The application
and supporting information evidences a readiness to proceed.

(c) In ranking grant
applications submitted at each stage of the grants program, the department
shall give preference to applications in the following order of priority:

(i) Applications from
existing planning groups that have been in existence for at least one year;

(ii) Applications that
address protection and enhancement of fish habitat in watersheds that have
aquatic fish species listed or proposed to be listed as endangered or
threatened under the federal endangered species act, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et
seq. and for which there is evidence of an inability to supply adequate water
for population and economic growth from:

(A) First, multi-WRIA
planning; and

(B) Second, single WRIA
planning;

(iii) Applications that
address protection and enhancement of fish habitat in watersheds or for which
there is evidence of an inability to supply adequate water for population and
economic growth from:

(A) First, multi-WRIA
planning; and

(B) Second, single WRIA
planning.

(d) The department may
not impose any local matching fund requirement as a condition for grant
eligibility or as a preference for receiving a grant.

(4) The department may
retain up to one percent of funds allocated under this section to defray
administrative costs.

(5) Planning under this
chapter should be completed as expeditiously as possible, with the focus being
on local stakeholders cooperating to meet local needs.

(6) Funding provided
under this section shall be considered a contractual obligation against the
moneys appropriated for this purpose.

Sec. 3. RCW 90.82.085 and 2001 c
237 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

By October 1, 2001, the
department of ecology shall complete a final nonproject environmental impact
statement that evaluates stream flows to meet the alternative goals of
maintaining, preserving, or enhancing instream resources and the technically
defensible methodologies for determining these stream flows. Planning units engaged
in a collaborative effort with the department under RCW 90.82.080 and state
agencies assessing and setting or amending instream flows must, as a minimum,
consider the goals and methodologies addressed in the nonproject environmental
impact statement. A planning unit engaged in a collaborative effort with
the department under RCW 90.82.080 or state agency may assess, set, or
amend instream flows in a manner that varies from the final nonproject
environmental impact statement if consistent with applicable instream flow
laws.

Sec. 4. RCW 90.03.380 and 2001 c
237 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right to the
use of water which has been applied to a beneficial use in the state shall be
and remain appurtenant to the land or place upon which the same is used:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the right may be transferred to another or to others
and become appurtenant to any other land or place of use without loss of
priority of right theretofore established if such change can be made without
detriment or injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in the place of use,
point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water right to enable irrigation
of additional acreage or the addition of new uses may be permitted if such
change results in no increase in the annual consumptive quantity of water used
under the water right. For purposes of this section, "annual consumptive
quantity" means the estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted
pursuant to the water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return
flows, averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most recent
five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right. Before any
transfer of such right to use water or change of the point of diversion of
water or change of purpose of use can be made, any person having an interest in
the transfer or change, shall file a written application therefor with the
department, and the application shall not be granted until notice of the
application is published as provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it shall appear that
such transfer or such change may be made without injury or detriment to
existing rights, the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate in
duplicate granting the right for such transfer or for such change of point of
diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be filed and be made a
record with the department and the duplicate certificate issued to the
applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner and with the same
effect as provided in the original certificate or permit to divert water.

(2) If an application
for change proposes to transfer water rights from one irrigation district to
another, the department shall, before publication of notice, receive
concurrence from each of the irrigation districts that such transfer or change
will not adversely affect the ability to deliver water to other landowners or
impair the financial integrity of either of the districts.

(3) A change in place
of use by an individual water user or users of water provided by an irrigation
district need only receive approval for the change from the board of directors
of the district if the use of water continues within the irrigation district,
and when water is provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board
of joint control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be
received from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made without
detriment or injury to existing rights.

(4) This section shall
not apply to trust water rights acquired by the state through the funding of
water conservation projects under chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through
90.42.070.

(5)(a) Pending
applications for new water rights are not entitled to protection from
impairment, injury, or detriment when an application relating to an existing
surface or ground water right is considered.

(b) Applications
relating to existing surface or ground water rights may be processed and
decisions on them rendered independently of processing and rendering decisions
on pending applications for new water rights within the same source of supply
without regard to the date of filing of the pending applications for new water
rights.

(c) Notwithstanding any
other existing authority to process applications, including but not limited to
the authority to process applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on
January 1, 2001, an application relating to an existing surface or ground water
right may be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the previously
filed application is not available and the applicant for the previously filed
application is sent written notice that explains what information is not
available and informs the applicant that processing of the next application
will begin. The previously filed application does not lose its priority date
and if the information is provided by the applicant within sixty days, the
previously filed application shall be processed at that time. This subsection
(5)(c) does not affect any other existing authority to process applications.

(d) Nothing in this
subsection (5) is intended to stop the processing of applications for new water
rights.

(6) No applicant for a
change, transfer, or amendment of a water right may be required to give up any
part of the applicant's valid water right or claim to a state agency, the trust
water rights program, or to other persons as a ((condition)) precondition
of obtaining processing of the application.

(7) In
revising the provisions of this section and adding provisions to this section
by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the legislature does not intend to imply
legislative approval or disapproval of any existing administrative policy
regarding, or any existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the
provisions of this section not expressly added or revised.

---
END ---