BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that:

(a) As a significant
consumer of energy resources and a committed steward of public health and
environmental quality, Washington state government is well-positioned to be a
leader in promoting and using clean energy;

(b) State government
actions to promote and use clean energy are consistent with the state's
environmental commitments, including addressing the potential impact to
Washington's quality of life due to global climate changes and improving local
and regional air quality;

(c) State government actions
to promote and use clean energy are also consistent with the state's high
priority policy objectives to maintain competitive energy costs and a reliable
and secure supply of energy resources; and

(d) State government
actions to promote and use clean energy are also consistent with the state's
goals to support economic development opportunities by reducing traffic
congestion and stimulating new and emerging energy technologies within the
clean energy industry of the state's high-technology sector.

(2) The legislature
intends state government to adopt a strategy to meet its energy needs by
relying on clean energy to the greatest extent practicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.21F RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout RCW 43.21F.015, 43.21F.045, and section 4 of this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Energy
conservation measures" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 43.19.670(3)
(a) through (j) and (l).

(2) "Clean energy
resources" or "qualified alternative energy resources" means the
electricity produced from generation facilities that are fueled by: (a) Wind;
(b) solar energy; (c) geothermal energy; (d) landfill gas; (e) wave or tidal
action; (f) fuel cells; (g) gas produced during the treatment of wastewater;
(h) qualified hydropower; or (i) biomass energy based on solid organic fuels
from wood, forest, or field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not
include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as
creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper‑chrome‑arsenic.

(3)
"State" and "state government" means the executive branch
agencies of the state of Washington that are managed by governor-appointed
executives and state institutions of higher education.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.21F.045 and 1996
c 186 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall supervise and administer energy-related activities as specified in RCW
43.330.904 and shall advise the governor and the legislature with respect to
energy matters affecting the state.

(2) In addition to
other powers and duties granted to the department, the department shall have
the following powers and duties:

(a) Prepare and update
contingency plans for implementation in the event of energy shortages or
emergencies. The plans shall conform to chapter 43.21G RCW and shall include
procedures for determining when these shortages or emergencies exist, the state
officers and agencies to participate in the determination, and actions to be
taken by various agencies and officers of state government in order to reduce
hardship and maintain the general welfare during these emergencies. The
department shall coordinate the activities undertaken pursuant to this
subsection with other persons. The components of plans that require
legislation for their implementation shall be presented to the legislature in
the form of proposed legislation at the earliest practicable date. The
department shall report to the governor and the legislature on probable,
imminent, and existing energy shortages, and shall administer energy allocation
and curtailment programs in accordance with chapter 43.21G RCW.

(b) Establish and
maintain a central repository in state government for collection of existing
data on energy resources, including:

(i) Supply, demand,
costs, utilization technology, projections, and forecasts;

(ii) Comparative costs
of alternative energy sources, uses, and applications; and

(iii) Inventory data on
energy research projects in the state conducted under public and/or private
auspices, and the results thereof.

(c) Coordinate federal
energy programs appropriate for state-level implementation, carry out such
energy programs as are assigned to it by the governor or the legislature, and
monitor federally funded local energy programs as required by federal or state
regulations.

(d) Develop energy
policy recommendations for consideration by the governor and the legislature,
including but not limited to strategies and options to encourage state agencies
to rely on clean energy resources to the greatest extent practicable.

(e) Provide assistance,
space, and other support as may be necessary for the activities of the state's
two representatives to the Pacific northwest electric power and conservation
planning council. To the extent consistent with federal law, the director
shall request that Washington's council members request the administrator of
the Bonneville power administration to reimburse the state for the expenses
associated with the support as provided in the Pacific Northwest Electric Power
Planning and Conservation Act (P.L. 96-501).

(f) Cooperate with
state agencies, other governmental units, and private interests in the
prioritization and implementation of the state energy strategy elements and on
other energy matters.

(g) Serve as the
official state agency responsible for coordinating implementation of the state
energy strategy.

(h) No later than
December 1, 1982, and by December 1st of each even-numbered year thereafter,
prepare and transmit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature a report on the implementation of the state energy strategy and
other important energy issues, as appropriate.

(i) Provide support for
increasing cost-effective energy conservation, including assisting in the
removal of impediments to timely implementation.

(j) Provide support for
the development of cost-effective energy resources including assisting in the
removal of impediments to timely construction.

(k) Adopt rules, under
chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to carry out the powers and duties enumerated in
this chapter.

(l) Provide administrative
assistance, space, and other support as may be necessary for the activities of
the energy facility site evaluation council, as provided for in RCW 80.50.030.

(m) Appoint staff as
may be needed to administer energy policy functions and manage energy facility
site evaluation council activities. These employees are exempt from the
provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW.

(3) To the extent the
powers and duties set out under this section relate to energy education,
applied research, and technology transfer programs they are transferred to
Washington State University.

(4) To the extent the
powers and duties set out under this section relate to energy efficiency in
public buildings they are transferred to the department of general
administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 43.19 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
general administration shall encourage each agency of state government to use
clean energy resources as defined in section 2 of this act. Each agency of
state government shall determine the amount of clean energy resources that
should be purchased and all such purchases shall be made within existing
resources.

(2) Each agency is
encouraged to obtain at least two percent per biennium of its energy
consumption from clean energy resources or a reduction in consumption of at
least two percent through energy conservation and energy efficiency measures,
or a combination thereof. The goal is to reach a cumulative total of ten percent
by June 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 43.21F RCW to read as follows:

In preparing the
biennial energy report required under RCW 43.21F.045(2)(h) to be transmitted to
the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2002, the department must
include the following information:

(1) An estimate of the
current and potential future contributions to global climate change as a result
of state government's current and projected energy consumption;

(2) Identification of
specific strategies and options to reduce or offset the contributions to global
climate change attributable to the state's energy consumption. Strategies and
options may include:

(a) Reducing the state's
consumption of electricity through aggressive pursuit of cost-effective energy
conservation and efficiency opportunities;

(b) Increasing the
proportion of electricity the state generates for its own use or purchases
through an electric utility from clean energy resources; and

(c) Addressing
transportation-related energy challenges such as improving the fuel efficiency
of the state's vehicle fleet, using alternative fuels in the state's vehicle
fleet, changing the ways state employees and contractors travel, and developing
transportation substitutes for state employees and contractors; and

(3) A
status report on the planning and progress related to implementing section 4 of
this act. The status report shall also include an analysis of the projected
costs and projected benefits to the state from pursuing the goals set in
section 4 of this act.

---
END ---