BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 3.46.063 and 1993 c
317 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding RCW
3.46.050 and 3.46.060, judicial positions may be filled only by election under
the following circumstances:

(1) Each full-time
equivalent judicial position shall be filled by election. This requirement
applies regardless of how many judges are employed to fill the position. For
purposes of this section, a full-time equivalent position is thirty-five or
more hours per week of compensated time.

(2) In any city with
one or more full-time equivalent judicial positions, an additional judicial
position or positions that is or are in combination more than one-half of a
full-time equivalent position shall be filled by election.

Cities with
populations exceeding fifty thousand that have established municipal
departments shall provide for at least one full-time elected municipal judge.

Sec. 2. RCW 3.50.055 and 1993 c
317 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding RCW
3.50.040 and 3.50.050, judicial positions may be filled only by election under
the following circumstances:

(1) Each full-time
equivalent judicial position shall be filled by election. This requirement
applies regardless of how many judges are employed to fill the position. For
purposes of this section, a full-time equivalent position is thirty-five or
more hours per week of compensated time.

(2) In any city with
one or more full-time equivalent judicial positions, an additional judicial
position or positions that is or are in combination more than one-half of a
full-time equivalent position shall also be filled by election.

Cities
with populations exceeding fifty thousand that have established municipal
courts shall provide for at least one full-time elected municipal judge. If
such a city does not have a full-time elected municipal court judge on the
effective date of this act, then a full-time elected municipal court judge
shall be elected in the first judicial election cycle that occurs at the
expiration of contracts for appointed municipal court judges entered into and
in place prior to February 1, 2002.

---
END ---