BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.39A.230 and 2002
c 3 s 2 (Initiative Measure No. 775) are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The home care
quality authority is established to regulate and improve the quality of
long-term in-home care services by recruiting, training, and stabilizing the
work force of individual providers.

(2) The authority
consists of a board of nine members appointed by the governor. Five board
members shall be current and/or former consumers of long-term in-home care
services provided for functionally disabled persons, at least one of whom shall
be a person with a developmental disability; one board member shall be a
representative of the developmental disabilities planning council; one board
member shall be a representative of the governor's committee on disability
issues and employment; one board member shall be a representative of the state
council on aging; and one board member shall be a representative of the Washington
state association of area agencies on aging. In making appointments, the
governor shall consider any nominations or recommendations made by the groups
or agencies represented.

(3) The initial
appointments to the board will be as follows: Three board members will be
appointed for a one-year term, three board members will be appointed for a
two-year term, and three board members will be appointed to a three-year term.
Thereafter, each board member ((serves)) will be appointed to
serve a term of three years. If a vacancy occurs, the governor will make
an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term. Each
board member is eligible for reappointment and may serve no more than two
consecutive terms. ((In making appointments, the governor will take into
consideration any nominations or recommendations made by the groups or agencies
represented.)) A board member whose term has expired will continue to
serve until his or her successor is appointed.

(4) Members of the
home care quality authority board will be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.250, 43.03.050, and 43.03.060.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.39A.250 and 2002
c 3 s 4 (Initiative Measure No. 775) are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within funds
appropriated specifically for this purpose, the authority must carry out
the following duties:

(a) Establish
qualifications and reasonable standards for accountability for and investigate
the background of individual providers and prospective individual providers,
except in cases where, after the department has sought approval of any
appropriate amendments or waivers under RCW 74.09.740, federal law or
regulation requires that such qualifications and standards for accountability
be established by another entity in order to preserve eligibility for federal
funding. Qualifications established must include compliance with the minimum
requirements for training and satisfactory criminal background checks as
provided in RCW 74.39A.050 and confirmation that the individual provider or
prospective individual provider is not currently listed on any long-term care
abuse and neglect registry used by the department at the time of the
investigation;

(b) Undertake
recruiting activities to identify and recruit individual providers and
prospective individual providers;

(c) Provide training
opportunities, either directly or through contract, for individual providers,
prospective individual providers, consumers, and prospective consumers;

(d) Provide assistance
to consumers and prospective consumers in finding individual providers and
prospective individual providers through the establishment of a referral
registry of individual providers and prospective individual providers. Before
placing an individual provider or prospective individual provider on the
referral registry, the authority shall determine that:

(i) The individual
provider or prospective individual provider has met the minimum requirements
for training set forth in RCW 74.39A.050;

(ii) The individual
provider or prospective individual provider has satisfactorily undergone a
criminal background check conducted within the prior twelve months; and

(iii) The individual
provider or prospective individual provider is not listed on any long-term care
abuse and neglect registry used by the department;

(e) Remove from the
referral registry any individual provider or prospective individual provider
the authority determines not to meet the qualifications set forth in (d) of
this subsection or to have committed misfeasance or malfeasance in the
performance of his or her duties as an individual provider. The individual
provider or prospective individual provider, or the consumer to which the
individual provider is providing services, may request a fair hearing to
contest the removal from the referral registry, as provided in chapter 34.05
RCW;

(f) Provide routine,
emergency, and respite referrals of individual providers and prospective
individual providers to consumers and prospective consumers who are authorized
to receive long-term in-home care services through an individual provider;

(g) Give preference in
the recruiting, training, referral, and employment of individual providers and
prospective individual providers to recipients of public assistance or other
low-income persons who would qualify for public assistance in the absence of
such employment; and

(h) Cooperate with the
department, area agencies on aging, and other federal, state, and local
agencies to provide the services described and set forth in this section. If,
in the course of carrying out its duties, the authority identifies concerns
regarding the services being provided by an individual provider, the authority
must notify the relevant area agency or department case manager regarding such
concerns.

(2) In determining how
best to carry out its duties, the authority must identify existing individual
provider recruitment, training, and referral resources made available to
consumers by other state and local public, private, and nonprofit agencies.
The authority may coordinate with the agencies to provide a local presence for
the authority and to provide consumers greater access to individual provider
recruitment, training, and referral resources in a cost-effective manner. Using
requests for proposals or similar processes, the authority may contract with
the agencies to provide recruitment, training, and referral services if the
authority determines the agencies can provide the services according to
reasonable standards of performance determined by the authority. The authority
must provide an opportunity for consumer participation in the determination of
the standards.

Sec. 3. RCW 74.39A.270 and 2002
c 3 s 6 (Initiative Measure No. 775) are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Solely for the
purposes of collective bargaining, the authority is the public employer, as
defined in chapter 41.56 RCW, of individual providers, who are public
employees, as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW, of the authority.

(2) Chapter 41.56 RCW
governs the employment relationship between the authority and individual
providers, except as otherwise expressly provided in chapter 3, Laws of 2002
and except as follows:

(a) The only unit
appropriate for the purpose of collective bargaining under RCW 41.56.060 is a
statewide unit of all individual providers;

(b) The showing of
interest required to request an election under RCW 41.56.060 is ten percent of
the unit, and any intervener seeking to appear on the ballot must make the same
showing of interest;

(c) The mediation and
interest arbitration provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and
41.56.480 apply;

(d) Individual
providers do not have the right to strike; and

(e) Individual
providers who are related to, or family members of, consumers or prospective
consumers are not, for that reason, exempt from chapter 3, Laws of 2002 or
chapter 41.56 RCW.

(3) Individual
providers who are employees of the authority under subsection (1) of this
section are not, for that reason, employees of the state for any purpose.

(4) Consumers and
prospective consumers retain the right to select, hire, supervise the work of,
and terminate any individual provider providing services to them. Consumers
may elect to receive long-term in-home care services from individual providers
who are not referred to them by the authority.

(5) In implementing and
administering chapter 3, Laws of 2002, neither the authority nor any of its
contractors may reduce or increase the hours of service for any consumer below
or above the amount determined to be necessary under any assessment prepared by
the department or an area agency on aging.

(6)(a) The authority,
the area agencies on aging, or their contractors under chapter 3, Laws of 2002
may not be held vicariously liable for the action or inaction of any individual
provider or prospective individual provider, whether or not that individual
provider or prospective individual provider was included on the authority's
referral registry or referred to a consumer or prospective consumer.

(b) The members of the
board are immune from any liability resulting from implementation of chapter 3,
Laws of 2002.

(c) The authority,
acting in good faith in recruiting providers, listing providers on the referral
registry, referring providers, and training consumers and providers, is immune
from civil or criminal liability for such action. However, this does not limit
the rights of an exclusive bargaining representative as defined in chapter
41.56 RCW or the public employee relations commission to enforce the provisions
of any collective bargaining agreement between an exclusive bargaining
representative and the authority or to enforce chapter 41.56 RCW.

(7) Nothing in this
section affects the state's responsibility with respect to the state payroll
system or unemployment insurance for individual providers.

(8) The authority,
in the course of performing its collective bargaining responsibilities under
chapter 41.56 RCW, must cooperate with the director of the office of financial
management to establish that the fiscal costs of any collective bargaining
agreement are financially feasible for the state.

Sec. 4. RCW 74.39A.280 and 2002
c 3 s 7 (Initiative Measure No. 775) are each amended to read as follows:

In carrying out its
duties under chapter 3, Laws of 2002, the authority may:

(1) Make and execute
contracts and all other instruments necessary or convenient for the performance
of its duties or exercise of its powers, including contracts with public and
private agencies, organizations, corporations, and individuals to pay them for
services rendered or furnished;

(2) Offer and provide
recruitment, training, and referral services to providers of long-term in-home
care services other than individual providers and prospective individual
providers, for a fee to be determined by the authority;

(3) Issue rules under
the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as necessary for the
purpose and policies of chapter 3, Laws of 2002;

(4) Establish offices,
employ and discharge employees, agents, and contractors as necessary, and
prescribe their duties and powers and fix their compensation, incur expenses,
and create such liabilities as are reasonable and proper for the administration
of chapter 3, Laws of 2002;

(5)(a) Appoint an
executive director of the home care quality authority who is exempt from
chapter 41.06 RCW, and who will be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of
the home care quality authority board. The salary of the executive director
will be fixed by the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.

(b) The executive
director may appoint and discharge other personnel who are exempt from chapter
41.06 RCW. Such personnel will serve at the pleasure of the executive director
who will prescribe their duties and powers and fix their compensation;

(6) Solicit and
accept for use any grant of money, services, or property from the federal
government, the state, or any political subdivision or agency thereof,
including federal matching funds under Title XIX of the federal social security
act, and do all things necessary to cooperate with the federal government, the
state, or any political subdivision or agency thereof in making an application
for any grant;

(((6))) (7)
Coordinate its activities and cooperate with similar agencies in other states;

(((7))) (8)
Establish technical advisory committees to assist the board;

(((8))) (9)
Keep records and engage in research and the gathering of relevant statistics;

(((9))) (10)
Acquire, hold, or dispose of real or personal property or any interest therein,
and construct, lease, or otherwise provide facilities for the activities
conducted under this chapter, provided that the authority may not exercise any
power of eminent domain;

(((10))) (11)
Sue and be sued in its own name;

(((11))) (12)
Delegate to the appropriate persons the power to execute contracts and other
instruments on its behalf and delegate any of its powers and duties if
consistent with the purposes of this chapter; and

(((12))) (13)
Do other acts necessary or convenient to execute the powers expressly granted
to it.

Sec. 5. RCW 74.39A.300 and 2002
c 3 s 9 (Initiative Measure No. 775) are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governor must
submit a request for funds necessary to administer chapter 3, Laws of 2002 ((and)).

(2) The governor must
also submit a biennial request for funds necessary to implement any
collective bargaining agreement entered into under RCW 74.39A.270 or for
legislation necessary to implement any such agreement within ten days of the
date on which the agreement is ratified or, if the legislature is not in
session, within ten days after the next legislative session convenes. Requests
for funds necessary to implement bargaining agreements will not be submitted to
the legislature by the governor unless such requests have been submitted to the
director of financial management on or before October 1st of the year preceding
the next ensuing biennium.

(3) The
legislature must approve or reject the submission of the request for funds as a
whole. If the legislature rejects or fails to act on the submission, any such
agreement will be reopened solely for the purpose of renegotiating the funds
necessary to implement the agreement.

(((2))) (4)
When any increase in individual provider wages or benefits is negotiated or
agreed to by the authority, no increase in wages or benefits negotiated or
agreed to under chapter 3, Laws of 2002 will take effect unless and until,
before its implementation, the department has determined that the increase is
consistent with federal law and federal financial participation in the
provision of services under Title XIX of the federal social security act.

(((3))) (5)
After the expiration date of any collective bargaining agreement entered into
under RCW 74.39A.270, all of the terms and conditions specified in any such
agreement remain in effect until the effective date of a subsequent agreement,
not to exceed one year from the expiration date stated in the agreement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Section 5 of this act
takes effect July 1, 2003.

---
END ---