BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 51.14.077 and 1986 c
57 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A self-insurers'
insolvency trust is established to provide for the unsecured benefits paid to
the injured workers of self-insured employers under this title for insolvent or
defaulting self-insured employers and for the department's associated
administrative costs, including attorneys' fees. The self-insurers' insolvency
trust shall be funded by an insolvency assessment which shall be levied on a
post-insolvency basis and after the defaulting self-insured employer's security
deposit, assets, and reinsurance, if any, have been exhausted. Insolvency
assessments shall be imposed on all self-insured employers, except school
districts, cities, and counties. The manner of imposing and collecting
assessments to the insolvency fund shall be set forth in rules adopted by the
department to ensure that self-insured employers pay into the fund in proportion
to their claim costs. The department's rules shall provide that self-insured
employers who have surrendered their certification shall be assessed for a
period of not more than three calendar years following the termination date of
their certification.

(2) The director shall
adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this section, including but not
limited to:

(a) Governing the
formation of the self-insurers' insolvency trust for the purpose of this
chapter;

(b) Governing the
organization and operation of the self-insurers' insolvency trust to assure
compliance with the requirements of this chapter;

(c) Requiring adequate
accountability of the collection and disbursement of funds in the
self-insurers' insolvency trust; and

(d) Any other
provisions necessary to carry out the requirements of this chapter.

(3) The department
shall contract with a service organization or third-party administrator with a
certified Washington claims administrator to manage the claims of insolvent
self-insured employers. The director shall select the service organization or
third-party administrator through a competitive bidding process in which at
least two service organizations or third-party administrators submit bids. If
an insufficient number of bids is submitted, the claims shall be managed by the
self-insurance section of the department. The service organization or
third-party administrator has authority to make all decisions regarding claims
of an insolvent self-insured employer.

(4) The
self-insurers' insolvency trust board has the right to audit the claim files of
any claim of an insolvent self-insured employer for which benefits are or may
be payable to determine whether the claims are being properly managed, to make
recommendations for handling of any claim, to improve the program, and to
ensure compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(5) The
department shall perform an annual audit at the office of each service
organization or third-party administrator of the claims of insolvent
self-insured employers that are being managed by that service organization or
third-party administrator.

--- END ---