BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 51.04.030 and 1998 c
230 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
supervise the providing of prompt and efficient care and treatment, including
care provided by physician assistants governed by the provisions of chapters
18.57A and 18.71A RCW, acting under a supervising physician, ((and))
including chiropractic care, and care provided by a mental health
professional licensed under Title 18 RCW upon referral by an attending
physician, to workers injured during the course of their employment at the
least cost consistent with promptness and efficiency, without discrimination or
favoritism, and with as great uniformity as the various and diverse surrounding
circumstances and locations of industries will permit and to that end shall,
from time to time, establish and adopt and supervise the administration of
printed forms, rules, regulations, and practices for the furnishing of such
care and treatment: PROVIDED, That the medical coverage decisions of the
department do not constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16),
nor are such decisions subject to the rule-making provisions of chapter 34.05
RCW except that criteria for establishing medical coverage decisions shall be
adopted by rule after consultation with the workers' compensation advisory
committee established in RCW 51.04.110: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the department
may recommend to an injured worker particular health care services and
providers where specialized treatment is indicated or where cost effective
payment levels or rates are obtained by the department: AND PROVIDED FURTHER,
That the department may enter into contracts for goods and services including,
but not limited to, durable medical equipment so long as state-wide access to
quality service is maintained for injured workers.

(2) The director shall,
in consultation with interested persons, establish and, in his or her
discretion, periodically change as may be necessary, and make available a fee
schedule of the maximum charges to be made by any physician, surgeon,
chiropractor, hospital, druggist, physicians' assistants as defined in chapters
18.57A and 18.71A RCW, acting under a supervising physician, mental health
professional licensed under Title 18 RCW, or other agency or person
rendering services to injured workers. The department shall coordinate with
other state purchasers of health care services to establish as much consistency
and uniformity in billing and coding practices as possible, taking into account
the unique requirements and differences between programs. No service covered
under this title, including services provided to injured workers, whether
aliens or other injured workers, who are not residing in the United States at
the time of receiving the services, shall be charged or paid at a rate or rates
exceeding those specified in such fee schedule, and no contract providing for
greater fees shall be valid as to the excess. The establishment of such a
schedule, exclusive of conversion factors, does not constitute "agency
action" as used in RCW 34.05.010(3), nor does such a fee schedule
constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16).

(3) The director or
self-insurer, as the case may be, shall make a record of the commencement of
every disability and the termination thereof and, when bills are rendered for
the care and treatment of injured workers, shall approve and pay those which
conform to the adopted rules, regulations, established fee schedules, and
practices of the director and may reject any bill or item thereof incurred in
violation of the principles laid down in this section or the rules,
regulations, or the established fee schedules and rules and regulations adopted
under it.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---