BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Agricultural research
facilities and agricultural production facilities have become targets of
terrorist and violent activities. Campaigns of violence using intimidation,
obstruction, and terrorism are aimed at closing these facilities. Actions are
not only illegal, but this violence imposes extreme suffering and loss to
individuals and poses a threat to property and human life.

Sec. 2. RCW 4.24.630 and 1999 c
248 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person who
goes onto the land of another and who removes timber, crops, minerals, or other
similar valuable property from the land, or wrongfully causes waste or injury
to the land, or wrongfully injures personal property or improvements to real
estate on the land, is liable to the injured party for treble the amount of the
damages caused by the removal, waste, or injury.

(2) Every person who
wrongfully injures, interferes with, interrupts, intimidates, obstructs, or
threatens to injure, interfere with, interrupt, intimidate, or obstruct an
agricultural research facility or agricultural production facility is liable to
the injured party for treble the amount of damages caused by the injury,
interference, interruption, intimidation, obstruction, or threat. As used in
this subsection, "agricultural research facility" and
"agricultural production facility" refer to facilities conducting
research on or involved in the production of products subject to Title 15 RCW.

(3) For purposes
of this section, a person acts "wrongfully" if the person
intentionally and unreasonably commits the act or acts while knowing, or having
reason to know, that he or she lacks authorization to so act. Damages
recoverable under this section include, but are not limited to, damages for the
market value of the property removed or injured, and for injury to the land,
including the costs of restoration. In addition, the person is liable for
reimbursing the injured party for the party's reasonable costs, including but
not limited to investigative costs and reasonable attorneys' fees and other
litigation-related costs.

(((2)))
(4) This section does not apply in any case where liability for damages
is provided under RCW 64.12.030, 79.01.756, 79.01.760, 79.40.070, or where
there is immunity from liability under RCW 64.12.035.

---
END ---