BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 77.95 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department
must prohibit activities that harm or disturb the spawning beds of salmon
during periods when nests of eggs are incubating. These activities include,
but are not limited to, wading in or standing on, driving vehicles or motorized
boats over, dragging of boat anchors through, digging in or removing spawning
gravel, scuba diving, or any other physical disturbance of the salmon spawning
beds.

(b) During egg
incubation periods, fishing is allowed only from shore or from a nonpowered
boat that is free floating or tethered to an above water appurtenance. A
violation of this subsection (1)(b) is an infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW and
is subject to a penalty of not less than one hundred dollars per violation.

(2) The department must
adopt rules to implement subsection (1) of this section and must include the
information in brochures that are normally disseminated to persons applying for
hunting, fishing, and boating licenses in retail outlets that cater to outdoor
recreation.

(3) The department, at
its discretion, may allow specific activities such as bridge construction and
repair, flood control, bank restoration, and other necessary activities. The
department may also allow specified recreational activities, such as swimming
and wading in specified areas such as forest service camps, public parks, and
private resorts.

(4) The
department must work cooperatively with native American tribal comanagers for
fish resources in implementing and enforcing the requirements of this section.

--- END ---