BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.19.534 and 1993
sp.s. c 20 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

State
agencies, the legislature, and departments shall purchase for their use all
goods and services required by the legislature, agencies, or departments that
are produced or provided in whole or in part from class II inmate work programs
operated by the department of corrections through state contract. These goods
and services shall not be purchased from any other source ((unless, upon
application by the department or agency: (1) The department of general
administration finds that the articles or products do not meet the reasonable
requirements of the agency or department, (2) are not of equal or better
quality, or (3) the price of the product or service is higher than that produced
by the private sector. However, the criteria contained in (1), (2), and (3) of
this section for purchasing goods and services from sources other than
correctional industries do not apply to goods and services produced by
correctional industries that primarily replace goods manufactured or services
obtained from outside the state)). The department of corrections and
department of general administration shall adopt administrative rules that
implement this section.

--- END ---