BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 4.92 RCW to read as follows:

In the
event that the state incurs civil or tort liability resulting from the
negligence or intentional action of a state agency funded under the omnibus
appropriations act, any damages awarded by a court of competent jurisdiction
shall be paid from the appropriation made in the omnibus appropriations act to
the state agency whose action or inaction was a basis for the judgment.

--- END ---