BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS‑-INTENT. The legislature finds
that the events of September 11, 2001, have focused our nation's attention on
the importance of preparedness in preventing, investigating, and prosecuting
acts of terrorism against its citizens. The legislature further finds that, to
be effective, this effort requires a partnership between the federal and state
and local governments. In furtherance of this partnership, it is the
legislature's intent to strengthen the laws of the state of Washington to
better protect the health and safety of Washington state and its residents from
acts of terrorism. It is also the intent of the legislature that this act be
interpreted to provide the greatest measure of protection and safety for the
people of this state and to preserve and protect their constitutional rights,
including the right to petition their governments and to exercise their rights
under the First Amendment to the United States Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Biological
agent" means any microorganism, virus, infectious substance, or biological
product that may be engineered as a result of biotechnology, or any naturally
occurring or bioengineered component of any such microorganism, virus,
infectious substance, or biological product, capable of causing:

(a) Death, disease, or
other biological malfunction in a human, an animal, a plant, or another living
organism; or

(b) Deterioration of
food, water equipment, supplies, or material of any kind; or

(c) Deleterious
alteration of the environment.

(2) "Chemical
agent" means any weapon, device, material, or substance that is designed
or intended to cause widespread death or physical injury through the release,
dissemination, or impact of toxic or poisonous chemicals or precursors of toxic
or poisonous chemicals.

(3) "Imitation
weapon of mass destruction" means any device or substance that is not a
weapon of mass destruction, but which by appearance or representation would
lead a reasonable person to believe that the device or substance is a weapon of
mass destruction.

(4) "Material
support or resources" means currency or other financial securities,
financial services, lodging, training, safehouses, false documentation or
identification, intelligence information, communications equipment, facilities,
weapons, lethal substances, explosives, personnel, transportation, and other
assets.

(5) "Physical
damage" has the meaning given in RCW 9A.48.100.

(6) "Public water
system" means any publicly or privately owned system, including a system
serving only one single-family residence, providing piped water for human
consumption, including any collection, treatment, storage, or distribution
facilities.

(7) "Radioactive
material" means any material containing, emitting, or otherwise releasing
radiation or radioactivity at a level dangerous to human life.

(8) "Terroristic
intent" means the intent to use a weapon of mass destruction, or to cause
substantial damage to a habitable structure or to critical infrastructure with
the intent to intimidate or coerce a civilian population or to affect the
conduct of a government or unit of government.

(9) "Toxin"
means the toxic material of plants, animals, microorganisms, viruses, fungi, or
infectious substances, or a recombinant molecule, whatever its origin or method
of production, including:

(a) Any poisonous
substance or biological product that may be engineered as a result of
biotechnology produced by a living organism; or

(b) Any poisonous
isomer or biological product, homolog, or derivative of such a substance.

(10) "Vector"
means a living organism, or molecule, including a recombinant molecule, or
biological product that may be engineered as a result of biotechnology, capable
of carrying a biological agent or toxin to a host.

(11) "Weapon of
mass destruction" means any device, object, or substance that is designed,
or that the defendant intends to use, to cause multiple human deaths or serious
physical injuries, or the intentional unlawful release, or dissemination of a
biological agent, radioactive material, or chemical agent.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. TERRORISM IN THE FIRST
DEGREE. (1) A person is guilty of terrorism in the first degree if such person
acts with terroristic intent and thereby causes the death of another person.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "another person," in addition to its ordinary meaning,
includes, but is not limited to, any emergency services personnel or a member
of the civilian population responding, at any point in time, to render aid in
response to the act of terrorism.

(3) Terrorism in the
first degree is a class A felony and, any other provision of law
notwithstanding, is punishable as provided in RCW 10.95.010, 10.95.030 through
10.95.900, and section 13 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. TERRORISM IN THE SECOND
DEGREE. (1) A person is guilty of terrorism in the second degree if such
person acts with terroristic intent and thereby:

(a) Causes substantial
bodily harm to more than one person; or

(b) Causes substantial
damage to a habitable building or structure, whether or not occupied,
sufficient to create a substantial risk of death to another person if the
building or structure had been occupied by any such person; or

(c) Causes substantial
physical damage sufficient to disrupt the normal functioning of a critical
public or private infrastructure system including, but not limited to, a public
water system, or an emergency, governmental, medical, fire, or law enforcement
response system.

(2) Terrorism in the
second degree is a class A felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. UNLAWFUL USE OR
POSSESSION OF A WEAPON OF MASS DESTRUCTION. (1) Any person who with
terroristic intent uses, manufactures, transports, possesses, spills, disposes,
or otherwise releases a weapon of mass destruction is guilty of unlawful use or
possession of a weapon of mass destruction.

(2) Unlawful use or
possession of a weapon of mass destruction is a class A felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. THREATENING ACTS OF
TERRORISM. (1) Any person who knowingly threatens to commit, falsely claims to
have committed, or takes any other action intended to cause a reasonable belief
that a violation of section 5 of this act has been committed or will be committed,
including placement of an imitation weapon of mass destruction in an area open
to or frequented by the public is guilty of threatening an act of terrorism.

(2) It is not a defense
to any prosecution under this section that the defendant did not have the
intent or capability of committing the terrorist act.

(3) Threatening an act
of terrorism is a class B felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. PROVIDING MATERIAL
SUPPORT OR RESOURCES TO TERRORISTS. (1) Any person who knowingly provides
material support or resources or conceals or disguises the nature, location,
source, or ownership of material support or resources, intending that the
material support or resources are to be used in planning, preparation, or
carrying out a crime defined in this chapter, or in planning, preparation, or
carrying out the concealment or an escape from the commission of any such
offense, is guilty of providing material support or resources to terrorists.

(2) Providing material
support or resources to terrorists is a class B felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. UNLAWFUL POSSESSION OF
FALSE IDENTIFICATION FOR TERRORIST. (1) A person is guilty of unlawful
possession of false identification for terrorist purposes if he or she, with the
intent to commit or facilitate the commission of a crime defined in this
chapter, possesses or uses any document or record that contains false
information relating to the person who is the subject of such document or
record.

(2) Unlawful possession
of false identification for terrorist purposes is a class B felony.

Sec. 9. RCW 9A.82.010 and 2001 c
222 s 3 and 2001 c 217 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
requires the contrary, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.

(1)(a) "Beneficial
interest" means:

(i) The interest of a
person as a beneficiary under a trust established under Title 11 RCW in which
the trustee for the trust holds legal or record title to real property;

(ii) The interest of a
person as a beneficiary under any other trust arrangement under which a trustee
holds legal or record title to real property for the benefit of the
beneficiary; or

(iii) The interest of a
person under any other form of express fiduciary arrangement under which one
person holds legal or record title to real property for the benefit of the
other person.

(b) "Beneficial
interest" does not include the interest of a stockholder in a corporation
or the interest of a partner in a general partnership or limited partnership.

(c) A beneficial
interest is considered to be located where the real property owned by the
trustee is located.

(2) "Control"
means the possession of a sufficient interest to permit substantial direction
over the affairs of an enterprise.

(3)
"Creditor" means a person making an extension of credit or a person
claiming by, under, or through a person making an extension of credit.

(4) "Criminal
profiteering" means any act, including any anticipatory or completed
offense, committed for financial gain, or any offense, including any
anticipatory or completed offense, which is defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW
(sections 1 through 8 and 17 through 23 of this act), whether or not committed
for financial gain, that is chargeable or indictable under the laws of the
state in which the act occurred and, if the act occurred in a state other than
this state, would be chargeable or indictable under the laws of this state had
the act occurred in this state and punishable as a felony and by imprisonment
for more than one year, regardless of whether the act is charged or indicted,
as any of the following:

(a) Murder, as defined
in RCW 9A.32.030 and 9A.32.050;

(b) Robbery, as defined
in RCW 9A.56.200 and 9A.56.210;

(c) Kidnapping, as
defined in RCW 9A.40.020 and 9A.40.030;

(d) Forgery, as defined
in RCW 9A.60.020 and 9A.60.030;

(e) Theft, as defined
in RCW 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, 9A.56.060, and 9A.56.080;

(f) Unlawful sale of
subscription television services, as defined in RCW 9A.56.230;

(g) Theft of
telecommunication services or unlawful manufacture of a telecommunication
device, as defined in RCW 9A.56.262 and 9A.56.264;

(h) Child selling or
child buying, as defined in RCW 9A.64.030;

(i) Bribery, as defined
in RCW 9A.68.010, 9A.68.020, 9A.68.040, and 9A.68.050;

(j) Gambling, as
defined in RCW 9.46.220 and 9.46.215 and 9.46.217;

(k) Extortion, as
defined in RCW 9A.56.120 and 9A.56.130;

(l) Extortionate
extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.020;

(m) Advancing money for
use in an extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.030;

(n) Collection of an
extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.040;

(o) Collection of an
unlawful debt, as defined in RCW 9A.82.045;

(p) Delivery or
manufacture of controlled substances or possession with intent to deliver or
manufacture controlled substances under chapter 69.50 RCW;

(q) Trafficking in
stolen property, as defined in RCW 9A.82.050;

(r) Leading organized
crime, as defined in RCW 9A.82.060;

(s) Money laundering,
as defined in RCW 9A.83.020;

(t) Obstructing
criminal investigations or prosecutions in violation of RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100, 9A.72.110, 9A.72.120, 9A.72.130, 9A.76.070, or 9A.76.180;

(u) Fraud in the
purchase or sale of securities, as defined in RCW 21.20.010;

(v) Promoting
pornography, as defined in RCW 9.68.140;

(w) Sexual exploitation
of children, as defined in RCW 9.68A.040, 9.68A.050, and 9.68A.060;

(x) Promoting
prostitution, as defined in RCW 9A.88.070 and 9A.88.080;

(y) Arson, as defined
in RCW 9A.48.020 and 9A.48.030;

(z) Assault, as defined
in RCW 9A.36.011 and 9A.36.021;

(aa) Assault of a
child, as defined in RCW 9A.36.120 and 9A.36.130;

(bb) A pattern of
equity skimming, as defined in RCW 61.34.020;

(cc) Commercial
telephone solicitation in violation of RCW 19.158.040(1);

(dd) Trafficking in
insurance claims, as defined in RCW 48.30A.015;

(ee) Unlawful practice
of law, as defined in RCW 2.48.180;

(ff) Commercial
bribery, as defined in RCW 9A.68.060;

(gg) Health care false
claims, as defined in RCW 48.80.030;

(hh) Unlicensed
practice of a profession or business, as defined in RCW 18.130.190(7);

(ii) Improperly
obtaining financial information, as defined in RCW 9.35.010; ((or))

(jj) Identity theft, as
defined in RCW 9.35.020;

(kk) Terrorism in
the first degree, as defined in section 3 of this act;

(ll) Terrorism in
the second degree, as defined in section 4 of this act;

(mm) Unlawful use or
possession of a weapon of mass destruction, as defined in section 5 of this
act;

(nn) Threatening
acts of terrorism, as defined in section 6 of this act;

(oo) Providing
material support or resources to terrorists, as defined in section 7 of this
act; or

(pp) Unlawful
possession of false identification for terrorist purposes, as defined in
section 8 of this act.

(5) "Dealer in
property" means a person who buys and sells property as a business.

(6) "Debtor"
means a person to whom an extension of credit is made or a person who
guarantees the repayment of an extension of credit or in any manner undertakes
to indemnify the creditor against loss resulting from the failure of a person
to whom an extension is made to repay the same.

(7) "Documentary
material" means any book, paper, document, writing, drawing, graph, chart,
photograph, phonograph record, magnetic tape, computer printout, other data
compilation from which information can be obtained or from which information
can be translated into usable form, or other tangible item.

(8)
"Enterprise" includes any individual, sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation, business trust, or other profit or nonprofit legal
entity, and includes any union, association, or group of individuals associated
in fact although not a legal entity, and both illicit and licit enterprises and
governmental and nongovernmental entities.

(9) "Extortionate
extension of credit" means an extension of credit with respect to which it
is the understanding of the creditor and the debtor at the time the extension
is made that delay in making repayment or failure to make repayment could
result in the use of violence or other criminal means to cause harm to the
person, reputation, or property of any person.

(10) "Extortionate
means" means the use, or an express or implicit threat of use, of violence
or other criminal means to cause harm to the person, reputation, or property of
any person.

(11) "Financial
institution" means any bank, trust company, savings and loan association,
savings bank, mutual savings bank, credit union, or loan company under the
jurisdiction of the state or an agency of the United States.

(12) "Pattern of
criminal profiteering activity" means engaging in at least three acts of
criminal profiteering, one of which occurred after July 1, 1985, and the last
of which occurred within five years, excluding any period of imprisonment,
after the commission of the earliest act of criminal profiteering. In order to
constitute a pattern, the three acts must have the same or similar intent,
results, accomplices, principals, victims, or methods of commission, or be
otherwise interrelated by distinguishing characteristics including a nexus to
the same enterprise, and must not be isolated events. However, in any civil
proceedings brought pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100 by any person other than the
attorney general or county prosecuting attorney in which one or more acts of
fraud in the purchase or sale of securities are asserted as acts of criminal
profiteering activity, it is a condition to civil liability under RCW 9A.82.100
that the defendant has been convicted in a criminal proceeding of fraud in the
purchase or sale of securities under RCW 21.20.400 or under the laws of another
state or of the United States requiring the same elements of proof, but such
conviction need not relate to any act or acts asserted as acts of criminal
profiteering activity in such civil action under RCW 9A.82.100.

(13) "Real
property" means any real property or interest in real property, including
but not limited to a land sale contract, lease, or mortgage of real property.

(14)
"Records" means any book, paper, writing, record, computer program,
or other material.

(15) "Repayment of
an extension of credit" means the repayment, satisfaction, or discharge in
whole or in part of a debt or claim, acknowledged or disputed, valid or
invalid, resulting from or in connection with that extension of credit.

(16) "Stolen
property" means property that has been obtained by theft, robbery, or
extortion.

(17) "To collect
an extension of credit" means to induce in any way a person to make
repayment thereof.

(18) "To extend
credit" means to make or renew a loan or to enter into an agreement, tacit
or express, whereby the repayment or satisfaction of a debt or claim, whether
acknowledged or disputed, valid or invalid, and however arising, may or shall
be deferred.

(19)
"Traffic" means to sell, transfer, distribute, dispense, or otherwise
dispose of stolen property to another person, or to buy, receive, possess, or
obtain control of stolen property, with intent to sell, transfer, distribute,
dispense, or otherwise dispose of the property to another person.

(20)(a)
"Trustee" means:

(i) A person acting as
a trustee under a trust established under Title 11 RCW in which the trustee
holds legal or record title to real property;

(ii) A person who holds
legal or record title to real property in which another person has a beneficial
interest; or

(iii) A successor
trustee to a person who is a trustee under (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection.

(b) "Trustee"
does not mean a person appointed or acting as:

(i) A personal
representative under Title 11 RCW;

(ii) A trustee of any
testamentary trust;

(iii) A trustee of any
indenture of trust under which a bond is issued; or

(iv) A trustee under a
deed of trust.

(21) "Unlawful
debt" means any money or other thing of value constituting principal or
interest of a debt that is legally unenforceable in the state in full or in
part because the debt was incurred or contracted:

(a) In violation of any
one of the following:

(i) Chapter 67.16 RCW
relating to horse racing;

(ii) Chapter 9.46 RCW
relating to gambling;

(b) In a gambling
activity in violation of federal law; or

(c) In connection with
the business of lending money or a thing of value at a rate that is at least
twice the permitted rate under the applicable state or federal law relating to
usury.

Sec. 10. RCW 9A.82.090 and 2001 c
222 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

During the pendency of
any criminal case charging a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or ((a violation of
RCW)) 9A.82.080, or of an offense defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW
(sections 1 through 8 and 17 through 23 of this act) whether or not committed
for financial gain, the superior court may, in addition to its other
powers, issue an order pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100 (2) or (3). Upon conviction
of a person for a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or ((a violation of RCW))
9A.82.080, or of an offense defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW (sections 1
through 8 and 17 through 23 of this act) whether or not committed for financial
gain, the superior court may, in addition to its other powers of
disposition, issue an order pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100.

Sec. 11. RCW 9A.82.100 and 2001 c
222 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A person who
sustains injury to his or her person, business, or property by an act of
criminal profiteering that is part of a pattern of criminal profiteering
activity, by an offense defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW (sections 1
through 8 and 17 through 23 of this act) whether or not committed for financial
gain, or by a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 may file an action in
superior court for the recovery of damages and the costs of the suit, including
reasonable investigative and attorney's fees.

(b) The attorney
general or county prosecuting attorney may file an action: (i) On behalf of
those persons injured or, respectively, on behalf of the state or county if the
entity has sustained damages, or (ii) to prevent, restrain, or remedy a pattern
of criminal profiteering activity, or an offense defined in chapter 9A.‑-
RCW (sections 1 through 8 and 17 through 23 of this act) whether or not
committed for financial gain, or a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.

(c) An action for
damages filed by or on behalf of an injured person, the state, or the county
shall be for the recovery of damages and the costs of the suit, including
reasonable investigative and attorney's fees.

(d) In an action filed
to prevent, restrain, or remedy a pattern of criminal profiteering activity,
or an offense defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW (sections 1 through 8 and 17
through 23 of this act) whether or not committed for financial gain, or a
violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080, the court, upon proof of the
violation, may impose a civil penalty not exceeding two hundred fifty thousand
dollars, in addition to awarding the cost of the suit, including reasonable
investigative and attorney's fees.

(2) The superior court
has jurisdiction to prevent, restrain, and remedy a pattern of criminal
profiteering, or an offense defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW (sections 1
through 8 and 17 through 23 of this act) whether or not committed for financial
gain, or a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 after making provision
for the rights of all innocent persons affected by the violation and after
hearing or trial, as appropriate, by issuing appropriate orders.

(3) Prior to a
determination of liability, orders issued under subsection (2) of this section
may include, but are not limited to, entering restraining orders or
prohibitions or taking such other actions, including the acceptance of
satisfactory performance bonds, in connection with any property or other
interest subject to damages, forfeiture, or other restraints pursuant to this
section as the court deems proper. The orders may also include attachment,
receivership, or injunctive relief in regard to personal or real property
pursuant to Title 7 RCW. In shaping the reach or scope of receivership, attachment,
or injunctive relief, the superior court shall provide for the protection of
bona fide interests in property, including community property, of persons who
were not involved in the violation of this chapter, except to the extent that
such interests or property were acquired or used in such a way as to be subject
to forfeiture under RCW 9A.82.100(4)(f).

(4) Following a
determination of liability, orders may include, but are not limited to:

(a) Ordering any person
to divest himself or herself of any interest, direct or indirect, in any
enterprise.

(b) Imposing reasonable
restrictions on the future activities or investments of any person, including
prohibiting any person from engaging in the same type of endeavor as the
enterprise engaged in, the activities of which affect the laws of this state,
to the extent the Constitutions of the United States and this state permit.

(c) Ordering
dissolution or reorganization of any enterprise.

(d) Ordering the
payment of actual damages sustained to those persons injured by a violation of
RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080, or an offense defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW
(sections 1 through 8 and 17 through 23 of this act) whether or not committed
for financial gain, or an act of criminal profiteering that is part of a
pattern of criminal profiteering, and in the court's discretion, increasing the
payment to an amount not exceeding three times the actual damages sustained.

(e) Ordering the
payment of all costs and expenses of the prosecution and investigation of a
pattern of criminal profiteering activity, or an offense defined in chapter
9A.‑- RCW (sections 1 through 8 and 17 through 23 of this act) whether or
not committed for financial gain, or a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or
9A.82.080, civil and criminal, incurred by the state or county, including any
costs of defense provided at public expense, as appropriate to the state
general fund or the antiprofiteering revolving fund of the county.

(f) Ordering forfeiture
first as restitution to any person damaged by an act of criminal profiteering
that is part of a pattern of criminal profiteering, or by an offense defined
in chapter 9A.‑- RCW (sections 1 through 8 and 17 through 23 of this act)
whether or not committed for financial gain, then to the state general fund
or antiprofiteering revolving fund of the county, as appropriate, to the extent
not already ordered to be paid in other damages, of the following:

(i) Any property or
other interest acquired or maintained in violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or
9A.82.080 to the extent of the investment of funds, and any appreciation or
income attributable to the investment, from a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or
9A.82.080.

(ii) Any property,
contractual right, or claim against property used to influence any enterprise
that a person has established, operated, controlled, conducted, or participated
in the conduct of, in violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.

(iii) All proceeds
traceable to or derived from an offense included in the pattern of criminal
profiteering activity, or an offense defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW
(sections 1 through 8 and 17 through 23 of this act) whether or not committed
for financial gain, and all moneys, negotiable instruments, securities, and
other things of value significantly used or intended to be used significantly
to facilitate commission of the offense.

(g) Ordering payment to
the state general fund or antiprofiteering revolving fund of the county, as
appropriate, of an amount equal to the gain a person has acquired or maintained
through an offense included in the definition of criminal profiteering.

(5) In addition to or
in lieu of an action under this section, the attorney general or county
prosecuting attorney may file an action for forfeiture to the state general
fund or antiprofiteering revolving fund of the county, as appropriate, to the
extent not already ordered paid pursuant to this section, of the following:

(a) Any interest
acquired or maintained by a person in violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080
to the extent of the investment of funds obtained from a violation of RCW
9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 and any appreciation or income attributable to the
investment.

(b) Any property,
contractual right, or claim against property used to influence any enterprise
that a person has established, operated, controlled, conducted, or participated
in the conduct of, in violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.

(c) All proceeds
traceable to or derived from an offense included in the pattern of criminal
profiteering activity, or an offense defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW (sections
1 through 8 and 17 through 23 of this act) whether or not committed for
financial gain, and all moneys, negotiable instruments, securities, and
other things of value significantly used or intended to be used significantly
to facilitate the commission of the offense.

(6) A defendant
convicted in any criminal proceeding is precluded in any civil proceeding from
denying the essential allegations of the criminal offense proven in the
criminal trial in which the defendant was convicted. For the purposes of this
subsection, a conviction shall be deemed to have occurred upon a verdict,
finding, or plea of guilty, notwithstanding the fact that appellate review of
the conviction and sentence has been or may be sought. If a subsequent
reversal of the conviction occurs, any judgment that was based upon that
conviction may be reopened upon motion of the defendant.

(7) The initiation of
civil proceedings under this section shall be commenced within three years
after discovery of the pattern of criminal profiteering activity or after the
pattern should reasonably have been discovered or, in the case of an offense
which is defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW (sections 1 through 8 and 17
through 23 of this act), within three years after the final disposition of any
criminal charges relating to the offense, whichever is later.

(8) The attorney
general or county prosecuting attorney may, in a civil action brought pursuant
to this section, file with the clerk of the superior court a certificate
stating that the case is of special public importance. A copy of that
certificate shall be furnished immediately by the clerk to the presiding chief
judge of the superior court in which the action is pending and, upon receipt of
the copy, the judge shall immediately designate a judge to hear and determine
the action. The judge so designated shall promptly assign the action for
hearing, participate in the hearings and determination, and cause the action to
be expedited.

(9) The standard of
proof in actions brought pursuant to this section is the preponderance of the
evidence test.

(10) A person other
than the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney who files an action
under this section shall serve notice and one copy of the pleading on the
attorney general within thirty days after the action is filed with the superior
court. The notice shall identify the action, the person, and the person's
attorney. Service of the notice does not limit or otherwise affect the right
of the state to maintain an action under this section or intervene in a pending
action nor does it authorize the person to name the state or the attorney
general as a party to the action.

(11) Except in cases
filed by a county prosecuting attorney, the attorney general may, upon timely
application, intervene in any civil action or proceeding brought under this
section if the attorney general certifies that in the attorney general's
opinion the action is of special public importance. Upon intervention, the
attorney general may assert any available claim and is entitled to the same
relief as if the attorney general had instituted a separate action.

(12) In addition to the
attorney general's right to intervene as a party in any action under this
section, the attorney general may appear as amicus curiae in any proceeding in
which a claim under this section has been asserted or in which a court is
interpreting RCW 9A.82.010, 9A.82.080, 9A.82.090, 9A.82.110, or 9A.82.120, or
this section.

(13) A private civil
action under this section does not limit any other civil or criminal action
under this chapter or any other provision. Private civil remedies provided
under this section are supplemental and not mutually exclusive.

(14) Upon motion by the
defendant, the court may authorize the sale or transfer of assets subject to an
order or lien authorized by this chapter for the purpose of paying actual
attorney's fees and costs of defense. The motion shall specify the assets for
which sale or transfer is sought and shall be accompanied by the defendant's
sworn statement that the defendant has no other assets available for such
purposes. No order authorizing such sale or transfer may be entered unless the
court finds that the assets involved are not subject to possible forfeiture
under RCW 9A.82.100(4)(f). Prior to disposition of the motion, the court shall
notify the state of the assets sought to be sold or transferred and shall hear
argument on the issue of whether the assets are subject to forfeiture under RCW
9A.82.100(4)(f). Such a motion may be made from time to time and shall be
heard by the court on an expedited basis.

(15) In an action
brought under subsection (1)(a) and (b)(i) of this section, either party has
the right to a jury trial.

Sec. 12. RCW 9A.82.120 and 2001 c
222 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state, upon
filing a criminal action under RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 or for an offense
defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW (sections 1 through 8 and 17 through 23 of
this act) whether or not committed for financial gain, or a civil action
under RCW 9A.82.100, may file in accordance with this section a criminal
profiteering lien. A filing fee or other charge is not required for filing a
criminal profiteering lien.

(2) A criminal
profiteering lien shall be signed by the attorney general or the county
prosecuting attorney representing the state in the action and shall set forth
the following information:

(a) The name of the
defendant whose property or other interests are to be subject to the lien;

(b) In the discretion
of the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the lien, any
aliases or fictitious names of the defendant named in the lien;

(c) If known to the
attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the lien, the present
residence or principal place of business of the person named in the lien;

(d) A reference to the
proceeding pursuant to which the lien is filed, including the name of the
court, the title of the action, and the court's file number for the proceeding;

(e) The name and
address of the attorney representing the state in the proceeding pursuant to
which the lien is filed;

(f) A statement that
the notice is being filed pursuant to this section;

(g) The amount that the
state claims in the action or, with respect to property or other interests that
the state has requested forfeiture to the state or county, a description of the
property or interests sought to be paid or forfeited;

(h) If known to the
attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the lien, a description
of property that is subject to forfeiture to the state or property in which the
defendant has an interest that is available to satisfy a judgment entered in
favor of the state; and

(i) Such other
information as the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the
lien deems appropriate.

(3) The attorney
general or the county prosecuting attorney filing the lien may amend a lien
filed under this section at any time by filing an amended criminal profiteering
lien in accordance with this section that identifies the prior lien amended.

(4) The attorney
general or the county prosecuting attorney filing the lien shall, as soon as
practical after filing a criminal profiteering lien, furnish to any person named
in the lien a notice of the filing of the lien. Failure to furnish notice
under this subsection does not invalidate or otherwise affect a criminal
profiteering lien filed in accordance with this section.

(5)(a) A criminal
profiteering lien is perfected against interests in personal property in the
same manner as a security interest in like property pursuant to RCW 62A.9-302,
62A.9-303, 62A.9-304, 62A.9-305, and 62A.9-306 or as otherwise required to
perfect a security interest in like property under applicable law. In the case
of perfection by filing, the state shall file, in lieu of a financing statement
in the form prescribed by RCW 62A.9-402, a notice of lien in substantially the
following form:

NOTICE
OF LIEN

Pursuant to RCW
9A.82.120, the state of Washington claims a criminal profiteering lien on all
real and personal property of:

Name:

. . . . . . . . . . .

Address:

. . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . .

State
of Washington

...................................

By
(authorized signature)

On receipt of such a
notice from the state, a filing officer shall, without payment of filing fee,
file and index the notice as if it were a financing statement naming the state
as secured party and the defendant as debtor.

(b) A criminal
profiteering lien is perfected against interests in real property by filing the
lien in the office where a mortgage on the real estate would be filed or
recorded. The filing officer shall file and index the criminal profiteering
lien, without payment of a filing fee, in the same manner as a mortgage.

(6) The filing of a
criminal profiteering lien in accordance with this section creates a lien in
favor of the state in:

(a) Any interest of the
defendant, in real property situated in the county in which the lien is filed,
then maintained, or thereafter acquired in the name of the defendant identified
in the lien;

(b) Any interest of the
defendant, in personal property situated in this state, then maintained or
thereafter acquired in the name of the defendant identified in the lien; and

(c) Any property
identified in the lien to the extent of the defendant's interest therein.

(7) The lien created in
favor of the state in accordance with this section, when filed or otherwise
perfected as provided in subsection (5) of this section, has, with respect to
any of the property described in subsection (6) of this section, the same
priority determined pursuant to the laws of this state as a mortgage or
security interest given for value (but not a purchase money security interest)
and perfected in the same manner with respect to such property; except that any
lien perfected pursuant to Title 60 RCW by any person who, in the ordinary
course of his business, furnishes labor, services, or materials, or rents,
leases, or otherwise supplies equipment, without knowledge of the criminal
profiteering lien, is superior to the criminal profiteering lien.

(8) Upon entry of
judgment in favor of the state, the state may proceed to execute thereon as in
the case of any other judgment, except that in order to preserve the state's
lien priority as provided in this section the state shall, in addition to such
other notice as is required by law, give at least thirty days' notice of the
execution to any person possessing at the time the notice is given, an interest
recorded subsequent to the date the state's lien was perfected.

(9) Upon the entry of a
final judgment in favor of the state providing for forfeiture of property to
the state, the title of the state to the property:

(a) In the case of real
property or a beneficial interest in real property, relates back to the date of
filing the criminal profiteering lien or, if no criminal profiteering lien is
filed, then to the date of recording of the final judgment or the abstract
thereof; or

(b) In the case of
personal property or a beneficial interest in personal property, relates back
to the date the personal property was seized by the state, or the date of
filing of a criminal profiteering lien in accordance with this section,
whichever is earlier, but if the property was not seized and no criminal
profiteering lien was filed then to the date the final judgment was filed with
the department of licensing and, if the personal property is an aircraft, with
the federal aviation administration.

(10) This section does
not limit the right of the state to obtain any order or injunction,
receivership, writ, attachment, garnishment, or other remedy authorized under
RCW 9A.82.100 or appropriate to protect the interests of the state or available
under other applicable law.

(11) In a civil or
criminal action under this chapter, the superior court shall provide for the
protection of bona fide interests in property, including community property,
subject to liens of persons who were not involved in the violation of this
chapter, except to the extent that such interests or property were acquired or
used in such a way as to be subject to forfeiture pursuant to RCW
9A.82.100(4)(f).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 10.95 RCW to read as follows:

AGGRAVATED FIRST DEGREE
MURDER‑-DEFINITION‑-ALTERNATIVE MEANS OF COMMISSION‑-TERRORISM
IN THE FIRST DEGREE. A person is guilty of aggravated murder in the first degree if he or
she commits terrorism in the first degree as defined by section 3 of this act
and shall be punished in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 14. RCW 10.95.040 and 1981 c
138 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a person is
charged with aggravated first degree murder as defined by RCW 10.95.020 or
section 13 of this act, the prosecuting attorney shall file written notice
of a special sentencing proceeding to determine whether or not the death
penalty should be imposed when there is reason to believe that there are not
sufficient mitigating circumstances to merit leniency.

(2) The notice of
special sentencing proceeding shall be filed and served on the defendant or the
defendant's attorney within thirty days after the defendant's arraignment upon
the charge of aggravated first degree murder unless the court, for good cause
shown, extends or reopens the period for filing and service of the notice.
Except with the consent of the prosecuting attorney, during the period in which
the prosecuting attorney may file the notice of special sentencing proceeding,
the defendant may not tender a plea of guilty to the charge of aggravated first
degree murder nor may the court accept a plea of guilty to the charge of
aggravated first degree murder or any lesser included offense.

(3) If a notice of
special sentencing proceeding is not filed and served as provided in this
section, the prosecuting attorney may not request the death penalty.

Sec. 15. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 361, 2001 c 300 s 4, 2001 c 217 s 12, and 2001 c 17 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

Terrorism
1 (RCW 9A.‑-.-‑- (section 3 of this act))

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

Terrorism
2 (RCW 9A.‑-.-‑- (section 4 of this act))

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Unlawful
Use or Possession of a Weapon of Mass Destruction (RCW 9A.‑-.-‑-
(section 5 of this act))

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Threatening
Acts of Terrorism (RCW 9A.‑-.-‑- (section 6 of this act))

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Providing
Material Support or Resources to Terrorists (RCW 9A.‑-.-‑- (section
7 of this act))

Sexually
Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

Unlawful
Possession of False Identification for Terrorist Purposes (RCW 9A.‑-.-‑-
(section 8 of this act))

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity
Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(a))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by
the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Vehicular
Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety
of others (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity
Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(b))

Improperly
Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 16. RCW 9A.04.080 and 1998 c
221 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Prosecutions for
criminal offenses shall not be commenced after the periods prescribed in this
section.

(a) The following
offenses may be prosecuted at any time after their commission:

(i) Murder;

(ii) Any offense
defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW (sections 1 through 8 and 17 through 23 of
this act);

(iii) Homicide
by abuse;

(((iii))) (iv)
Arson if a death results;

(((iv))) (v)
Vehicular homicide;

(((v))) (vi)
Vehicular assault if a death results;

(((vi))) (vii)
Hit-and-run injury-accident if a death results (RCW 46.52.020(4)).

(b) The following
offenses shall not be prosecuted more than ten years after their commission:

(i) Any felony
committed by a public officer if the commission is in connection with the
duties of his or her office or constitutes a breach of his or her public duty
or a violation of the oath of office;

(ii) Arson if no death
results; or

(iii) Violations of RCW
9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 if the rape is reported to a law enforcement agency
within one year of its commission; except that if the victim is under fourteen
years of age when the rape is committed and the rape is reported to a law enforcement
agency within one year of its commission, the violation may be prosecuted up to
three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or up to ten years after the
rape's commission, whichever is later. If a violation of RCW 9A.44.040 or
9A.44.050 is not reported within one year, the rape may not be prosecuted: (A)
More than three years after its commission if the violation was committed
against a victim fourteen years of age or older; or (B) more than three years
after the victim's eighteenth birthday or more than seven years after the
rape's commission, whichever is later, if the violation was committed against a
victim under fourteen years of age.

(c) Violations of the
following statutes shall not be prosecuted more than three years after the victim's
eighteenth birthday or more than seven years after their commission, whichever
is later: RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, 9A.44.070,
9A.44.080, 9A.44.100(1)(b), or 9A.64.020.

(d) The following
offenses shall not be prosecuted more than six years after their commission:
Violations of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.

(e) The following
offenses shall not be prosecuted more than five years after their commission:
Any class C felony under chapter 74.09, 82.36, or 82.38 RCW.

(f) Bigamy shall not be
prosecuted more than three years after the time specified in RCW 9A.64.010.

(g) A violation of RCW
9A.56.030 must not be prosecuted more than three years after the discovery of
the offense when the victim is a tax exempt corporation under 26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3).

(h) No other felony may
be prosecuted more than three years after its commission; except that in a
prosecution under RCW 9A.44.115, if the person who was viewed, photographed, or
filmed did not realize at the time that he or she was being viewed,
photographed, or filmed, the prosecution must be commenced within two years of
the time the person who was viewed or in the photograph or film first learns
that he or she was viewed, photographed, or filmed.

(i) No gross
misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than two years after its commission.

(j) No misdemeanor may
be prosecuted more than one year after its commission.

(2) The periods of
limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section do not run during any
time when the person charged is not usually and publicly resident within this
state.

(3) If, before the end
of a period of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, an
indictment has been found or a complaint or an information has been filed, and
the indictment, complaint, or information is set aside, then the period of
limitation is extended by a period equal to the length of time from the finding
or filing to the setting aside.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. CRIMINAL PENALTIES
ADDITIONAL TO CIVIL AND ADMINISTRATIVE SANCTIONS. The penalties imposed
pursuant to this chapter shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, all other
civil, administrative, and other penalties and remedies provided for by other
laws providing penalties or remedies for actions or conduct which also
constitutes a violation of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. ADDITIONAL PENALTIES. In
addition to all other penalties, criminal or civil, and any other provision of
law notwithstanding, any person convicted of any of the offenses described in
this chapter shall be ordered by the sentencing court to:

(1) Make restitution
for actual damages sustained to those persons or entities injured by the
commission of any of the offenses described in this chapter;

(2) Make restitution of
all costs and expenses incurred by the state or county in the investigation and
prosecution of the offense, including any costs of defense provided at public
expense.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. ANTIMERGER PROVISION.
Every person who, in the commission of an offense defined by this chapter,
commits any other crime may be punished therefor, as well as for the violation
of this chapter, and may be prosecuted for each crime separately.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. SECTION CAPTIONS.
Section captions as used in this chapter do not constitute any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. SEVERABILITY. If any
provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. SHORT TITLE. This act
shall be known as the Washington AntiTerrorism Act of 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. DECLARING AN EMERGENCY.
This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 24. CODIFICATION
INSTRUCTIONS. Sections 1 through 8 and 17 through 23 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 9A RCW.

---
END ---