BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this section and sections 2 through 4 of this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Domestic
violence" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW 26.50.010.

(2) "Sexual
assault" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW 70.125.030.

(3)
"Stalking" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW 9A.46.110.

(4) "Qualified
third party" means a police officer, licensed medical care provider, an
employee of a court of the state acting in the course of his or her duties,
member of the clergy, attorney, social worker, licensed mental health
professional or other licensed counselor, or advocate working at an agency that
assists victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) If a tenant
notifies the landlord in writing that he or she is a victim of domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking, and either (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of
this subsection applies, then subsection (2) of this section applies:

(i) The tenant has a
valid order for protection under chapter 26.50 RCW or RCW 9A.46.040, 9A.46.050,
10.14.080, or 26.09.050;

(ii) The tenant has
notified a law enforcement officer of an act or acts of domestic violence,
sexual assault, or stalking; or

(iii) The tenant has
consulted with a qualified third party and reported the domestic violence,
sexual assault, or stalking to the qualified third party.

(b) When a copy of the
order for protection, police report, or verification of consultation with or
report to a qualified third party, as required under (a) of this subsection, is
made available to the landlord, the tenant may terminate the rental agreement
and quit the premises without further obligation under the rental agreement.
However, the request to terminate the rental agreement must occur within ninety
days of the most recent acts, events, or circumstances that gave rise to the
protective order, report to a law enforcement officer, or consultation with or
report to a qualified third party. Verification of consultation with or
reporting to a qualified third party may consist of a signed statement of the
qualified third party or a form routinely provided by the qualified third party
for completion by clients. This form must be in substantially the following
form:

.................................................................

[Name of organization,
agency, clinic, professional service provider]

I am a victim of

. . .
domestic violence as defined by RCW 26.50.010.

. . .
sexual assault as defined by RCW 70.125.030.

. . .
stalking as defined by RCW 9A.46.110.

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Signature

I have been provided
with a copy of the statutes cited in section 2 of this act.

The incident(s) that I
rely on in support of this declaration occurred on the following date(s):
. . . . . . . . ..

I state under penalty
of perjury under the laws of the state of Washington that the foregoing is true
and correct. Dated at
. . . . . . .(city). ., Washington, this
. . . day of . . . ., 20. ..

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Signature

I verify that I have
provided to the person whose signature appears above a copy of the statutory
language cited above and subsequently that individual informed me of his or her
status as a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking on this . . .
day of . . . ., 20. ..

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Signature
of authorized officer/employee of (Organization, agency, clinic, professional
service provider)

(2) A tenant who
terminates a rental agreement under this section is discharged from the payment
of rent for any period following the quitting date, and is entitled to a pro
rata refund of any prepaid rent, and shall receive a full and specific
statement of the basis for retaining any of the deposit together with any
refund due in accordance with RCW 59.18.280. Other tenants who are parties to
the rental agreement are not released from their obligations under the rental
agreement or other obligations under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A landlord may not
terminate a tenancy, fail to renew a tenancy, or refuse to enter into a rental
agreement based on the tenant's or applicant's status as a victim of domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or based on the tenant or applicant
having terminated a rental agreement under section 1 of this act.

(2) A landlord who
refuses to enter into a rental agreement in violation of this section may be
liable to the tenant or applicant in a civil action for damages sustained by
the tenant or applicant. The prevailing party may also recover court costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees.

(3) It is a defense to
a wrongful detainer action under chapter 59.12 RCW that the action to remove
the tenant and recover possession of the premises is in violation of subsection
(1) of this section.

(4) This section does
not prohibit adverse housing decisions based upon other lawful factors within
the landlord's knowledge.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A tenant screening
service provider may not include information in a written or oral report to a
landlord pertaining to domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking;
pertaining to the fact that the subject of the report is a victim of domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking; or stating that the subject of the
report has terminated a rental agreement under section 2 of this act.

(2) A tenant screening
service provider who violates this section may be liable in a civil action for
damages sustained by the subject of the report. The prevailing party may
recover court costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:

A tenant who has
obtained a court order from a court of competent jurisdiction granting him or
her possession of a dwelling unit to the exclusion of one or more cotenants may
request that a lock be replaced or configured for a new key at the tenant's
expense. The landlord shall comply with the request and refuse to provide
copies of the new keys to the tenant restrained or excluded by the court's
order. This section does not release a cotenant from liability or obligations
under the rental agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. RCW 59.18.356 (Threatening
behavior--Violation of order for protection--Termination of
agreement--Financial obligations) and 1992 c 38 s 7 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---