BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 71A.20 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that caring for individuals with developmental disabilities in their own homes
dramatically reduces the cost to the state of their care. There are thirty-two
thousand state clients with developmental disabilities currently receiving
services in their own homes. The legislature recognizes that being a caregiver
is a difficult job and to provide good care, caregivers themselves need
occasional relief. Many caregivers face health and emotional problems,
including ongoing depression, frustration, and isolation. It is documented
that caregiver stress also affects the individual receiving care. Stressed
caregivers are more likely to provide inadequate care and are more likely to
eventually seek out-of-home alternatives for the family member.

The legislature finds
that respite care provides temporary, short-term relief for people whose job
otherwise never stops. Research has shown that caregivers who receive respite
care are more likely to stay healthy themselves, and continue to provide
at-home care for a loved one indefinitely.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 71A.20 RCW to read as follows:

Any vacancies that
occur in residential habilitation centers shall remain available for respite
care. Within available funding, the department shall offer respite care to any
eligible individual with developmental disabilities, including children age
thirteen and under, as these beds become available.

Sec. 3. RCW 71A.16.010 and 1998
c 216 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intention
of the legislature in this chapter to establish a single point of referral for
persons with developmental disabilities and their families so that they may
have a place of entry and continuing contact for services authorized under this
title to persons with developmental disabilities. Eligible persons with
developmental disabilities, whether they live in the community or residential
habilitation centers, should have the opportunity to choose where they live.

(2) ((Until June 30,
2003, and subject to subsection (3) of this section,)) If there is a
vacancy in a residential habilitation center, the department shall offer
admittance to the center to any eligible adult, or eligible adolescent on an
exceptional case-by-case basis, with developmental disabilities if his or her
assessed needs require the funded level of resources that are provided by the
center.

(3) ((The department
shall not offer a person admittance to a residential habilitation center under
subsection (2) of this section unless the department also offers the person
appropriate community support services listed in RCW 71A.12.040.

(4))) Community support services ((offered under
subsection (3) of this section)) may only be offered using funds
specifically designated for this purpose in the state operating budget. When
these funds are exhausted, the department may not offer admittance to a residential
habilitation center, or community support services under this section.

(((5))) (4)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to create an entitlement to state
services for persons with developmental disabilities.

(((6)
Subsections (2) through (6) of this section expire June 30, 2003.))

Sec. 4. RCW 71A.16.030 and 1998
c 216 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department will
develop an outreach program to ensure that any eligible person with
developmental disabilities services in homes, the community, and residential
habilitation centers will be made aware of these services. ((This
subsection (1) expires June 30, 2003.))

(2) The secretary shall
establish a single procedure for persons to apply for a determination of
eligibility for services provided to persons with developmental disabilities.

(3) ((Until June 30,
2003,)) The procedure set out under subsection (1) of this section
must require that all applicants and all persons with developmental
disabilities currently receiving services from the division of developmental
disabilities within the department be given notice of the existence and
availability of residential habilitation center and community support
services. For genuine choice to exist, people must know what the options are.
Available options must be clearly explained, with services customized to fit
the unique needs and circumstances of developmentally disabled clients and
their families. Choice of providers and design of services and supports will
be determined by the individual in conjunction with the department. When the
person cannot make these choices, the person's legal guardian may make them,
consistent with chapter 11.88 or 11.92 RCW. ((This subsection expires June
30, 2003.))

(4) An application may
be submitted by a person with a developmental disability, by the legal
representative of a person with a developmental disability, or by any other
person who is authorized by rule of the secretary to submit an application.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. 1998 c 216 s 9
(uncodified) is repealed.

---
END ---