BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.67.370 and 1998 c
61 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Cities,
towns, or counties may not require existing mobile home parks to replace
existing, functional septic systems with a sewer system within the community unless
the mobile home park is within an area designated under chapter 36.70A RCW as
an area with a critical recharging effect on aquifers used for potable water,
or unless the local board of health determines that the septic system is
failing.

--- END ---