BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 50.20 RCW to read as follows:

An individual receiving
benefits under this title may elect to have any payments due transferred to the
individual's account in a financial institution for either: (1) Credit to the
recipient's account in such financial institution; or (2) immediate transfer to
the recipient's account in any other financial institution. The issuance and
delivery by the disbursing officer of a warrant in accordance with the
procedure set forth in this section and proper endorsement by the financial
institution has the same legal effect as payment directly to the recipient.

For the purposes of
this section "financial institution" has the meaning given in RCW
41.04.240.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act applies to
claims effective on or after December 29, 2002.

---
END ---