BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.15.031 and 1996
c 142 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The term
"operating fees" as used in this chapter shall include the fees,
other than building fees, charged all students registering at the state's
colleges and universities but shall not include fees for short courses,
self-supporting degree credit programs and courses, marine station work,
experimental station work, correspondence or extension courses, and individual
instruction and student deposits or rentals, disciplinary and library fines,
which colleges and universities shall have the right to impose, laboratory,
gymnasium, health, technology and student activity fees, or fees, charges,
rentals, and other income derived from any or all revenue producing lands,
buildings and facilities of the colleges or universities heretofore or
hereafter acquired, constructed or installed, including but not limited to
income from rooms, dormitories, dining rooms, hospitals, infirmaries, housing
or student activity buildings, vehicular parking facilities, land, or the
appurtenances thereon, or such other special fees as may be established by any
college or university board of trustees or regents from time to time. All
moneys received as operating fees at any institution of higher education shall be
deposited in a local account containing only operating fees revenue and related
interest: PROVIDED, That a minimum of three and one-half percent of operating
fees shall be retained by the institutions((, except the technical colleges,))
for the purposes of RCW 28B.15.820. Local operating fee accounts shall not be
subject to appropriation by the legislature or allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.15.066 and 2000
c 152 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature that:

In making
appropriations from the state's general fund to institutions of higher
education, each appropriation shall conform to the following:

(1) The appropriation
shall not be reduced by the amount of operating fees revenue estimated to be
collected from students enrolled at the state-funded enrollment level specified
in the omnibus biennial operating appropriations act;

(2) The appropriation
shall not be reduced by the amount of operating fees revenue collected from
students enrolled above the state-funded level((, but within the
over-enrollment limitations,)) specified in the omnibus biennial operating
appropriations act; and

(3) The general fund
state appropriation shall not be reduced by the amount of operating fees
revenue collected as a result of waiving less operating fees revenue than the
amounts authorized under RCW 28B.15.910. State general fund appropriations
shall not be provided for revenue foregone as a result of or for waivers granted
under RCW 28B.15.915.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.15.067 and 1997
c 403 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Tuition fees shall
be established under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) ((Academic year
tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions of higher education
for the 1997-98 academic year, other than the summer term, shall be as provided
in this subsection.

(a) At the
University of Washington and Washington State University:

(i) For resident
undergraduate students and other resident students not in graduate, law, or
first professional programs, two thousand nine hundred eighty-eight dollars;

(ii)(A) For
nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at the
University of Washington not in graduate, law, or first professional programs,
ten thousand two hundred seventy-eight dollars;

(B) For nonresident
undergraduate students and other nonresident students at Washington State
University not in graduate or first professional programs, nine thousand eight
hundred seventy dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, four thousand eight hundred fifty-four dollars;

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, twelve thousand five hundred eighty-eight dollars;

(v) For resident law
students, five thousand ten dollars;

(vi) For nonresident
law students, twelve thousand nine hundred fifteen dollars;

(vii) For resident
first professional students, eight thousand one hundred twelve dollars; and

(viii) For
nonresident first professional students, twenty-one thousand twenty-four
dollars.

(b) At the regional
universities and The Evergreen State College:

(i) For resident
undergraduate and all other resident students not in graduate programs, two
thousand two hundred eleven dollars;

(ii) For nonresident
undergraduate and all other nonresident students not in graduate programs,
eight thousand six hundred forty-six dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, three thousand seven hundred twenty-six dollars; and

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, eleven thousand nine hundred seventy-six dollars.

(c) At the community
colleges:

(i) For resident
students, one thousand three hundred eleven dollars; and

(ii) For nonresident
students, five thousand five hundred eighty-six dollars.

(3) Academic year
tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions of higher education
beginning with the 1998-99 academic year, other than the summer term, shall be
as provided in this subsection unless different rates are adopted in the omnibus
appropriations act.

(a) At the
University of Washington and Washington State University:

(i) For resident
undergraduate students and other resident students not in graduate, law, or
first professional programs, three thousand one hundred eight dollars;

(ii)(A) For
nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at the
University of Washington not in graduate, law, or first professional programs,
eleven thousand one hundred thirty dollars;

(B) For nonresident
undergraduate students and other nonresident students at Washington State
University not in graduate or first professional programs, ten thousand two
hundred sixty-six dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, five thousand forty-six dollars;

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, thirteen thousand ninety-two dollars;

(v) For resident law
students, five thousand three hundred seventy-six dollars;

(vi) For nonresident
law students, thirteen thousand seven hundred eighty-two dollars;

(vii) For resident
first professional students, eight thousand four hundred thirty-six dollars;
and

(viii) For
nonresident first professional students, twenty-one thousand eight hundred
sixty-four dollars.

(b) At the regional
universities and The Evergreen State College:

(i) For resident
undergraduate and all other resident students not in graduate programs, two
thousand two hundred ninety-eight dollars;

(ii) For nonresident
undergraduate and all other nonresident students not in graduate programs,
eight thousand nine hundred ninety-one dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, three thousand eight hundred seventy-six dollars; and

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, twelve thousand four hundred fifty-six dollars.

(c) At the community
colleges:

(i) For resident
students, one thousand three hundred sixty-two dollars; and

(ii) For nonresident
students, five thousand eight hundred eight dollars.

(4) For the 1997-98
and 1998-99 academic years, the University of Washington shall use at least ten
percent of the revenue received from the difference between a four percent
increase in tuition fees and the actual increase charged to law students to
assist needy low and middle-income resident law students. For the 1997-98 and
1998-99 academic years, the University of Washington shall use at least ten
percent of the revenue received from the difference between a four percent
increase in tuition fees and the actual increase charged to nonresident
undergraduate students and all other nonresident students not in graduate, law,
or first professional programs to assist needy low and middle-income resident
undergraduate students and all other resident students not enrolled in
graduate, law, or first professional programs. This requirement is in addition
to the deposit requirements of the institutional aid fund under RCW 28B.15.820.

(5))) For the 2002-03 academic year and each
academic year thereafter, the governing boards of the state universities, the
regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state board for
community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees
charged to full-time students, including summer school students. Percentage
increases in full-time tuition fees may exceed the fiscal growth factor.
Reductions or increases may be made for all or portions of an institution's
programs, campuses, courses, or students. Reductions and increases for
full-time resident students are limited to no more than nine and two-tenths
percent per year.

(3) The legislature
shall continue to fund the state need grant program to support changes in
overall program eligibility, increases in enrollments, and changes in tuition.
The legislature shall increase funding for the state need grant program to
support annual tuition increases of up to nine and two-tenths percent.

(4) For the 2002-03
academic year and each academic year thereafter, the state board for community
and technical colleges may increase fees differentially at their discretion.

(5)
The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply to high school
students enrolling in participating institutions of higher education under RCW
28A.600.300 through ((28A.600.395)) 28A.600.400.

---
END ---