BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that each watershed in Washington is unique and requires its own management
activities and techniques to protect and enhance the quality and stability of
the watershed for the benefit of communities and residents. Such activities
and techniques are most effective and efficient when they fully integrate and
utilize the collaborative efforts of interested citizens and businesses,
nonprofit organizations, tribes, agencies of local, state, and federal
government, and state colleges and universities and coordinate the
implementation of adopted watershed plans. The skills, community support,
volunteer labor, and donations of goods and services that they generate
substantially advance protection, enhancement, and restoration of watersheds
and natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 90.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Voluntary watershed
organizations formed for the purpose of implementing adopted watershed plans
and coordinating their respective activities with other state entities and
affected local, regional, tribal, federal government, and private nonprofit
organizations are eligible for grants under this section.

(2) Voluntary watershed
organizations, including private nonprofit organizations incorporated under
Title 24 RCW, formed for the purpose of implementing adopted watershed plans
may apply to the department for administrative support grants of up to fifty
thousand dollars to maintain the organizational structure and functions
necessary to fulfill their purpose.

(3) Administrative
support grants may be used to compensate full or part-time staff, such as a
director, project manager, or volunteer coordinator, and for obtaining grants
and matching funds and in-kind donations and services, for recruiting
volunteers, for providing technical and safety training, safety equipment, and
insurance, and for maintaining required records and issuing required reports,
and the like.

(4) Administrative
support grants may be renewed annually.

(5) In addition to any
other relevant requirements established by the department, applications for
administrative support grants shall include a work plan for expenditure of the
grant funds, a description of the planned activities for which the grant funds
will provide administrative support, performance measures, and documentation of
community involvement.

(6) Preference will be
given to organizations that have completed projects successfully, have projects
pending, and have established cooperative relationships with citizens,
businesses, nonprofit organizations, tribes, agencies of local, state, and
federal government, and state colleges and universities, as appropriate for the
nature and scope of their activities.

(7) The department
shall provide administrative support grants from available grant funds
administered by the department and any appropriations made by the legislature
to the department expressly for this purpose.

(8) For purposes of
this section, adopted watershed plans include plans adopted under chapter 90.82
RCW, habitat conservation plans, requirements of federal energy regulatory
commission licenses, plans adopted pursuant to Puget Sound water quality action
grants, or legislative directives.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 90.54 RCW to read as follows:

There is hereby created
a state watershed coordinating council. The purpose of the council is to
provide information sharing and coordination among local watershed
organizations and state, federal, and tribal entities.

The state watershed
coordinating council shall consist of between fifteen and twenty-five members.
Approximately half of the members shall represent local watershed organizations
and be in proportion to the various major categories of adopted watershed plans
as contained in section 2(8) of this act. The remaining members shall
represent state, federal, and tribal entities, and scientists with expertise in
watershed health.

The
members of the state watershed coordinating council shall be appointed by the
governor, in consultation with the entities that are to be represented.

---
END ---