BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 87.03 RCW to read as follows:

Irrigation
districts that have designated their own treasurers as provided in RCW
87.03.440 may accept credit cards, charge cards, debit cards, smart cards,
stored value cards, federal wire, and automatic clearinghouse system
transactions, or other electronic communication, for any payment of any kind
including, but not limited to, assessments, fines, interest, penalties, special
assessments, fees, rates, tolls and charges, or moneys due irrigation
districts. A payer desiring to pay by a credit card, charge card, debit card,
smart card, stored value card, federal wire, automatic clearinghouse system, or
other electronic communication shall bear the cost of processing the
transaction in an amount determined by the treasurer, unless the board of
directors finds that it is in the best interests of the district to not charge
transaction processing costs for all payment transactions made for a specific
category of nonassessment payments due the district, including, but not limited
to, fines, interest not associated with assessments, penalties not associated
with assessments, special assessments, fees, rates, tolls, and charges. The
treasurer's cost determination shall be based upon costs incurred by the
treasurer and may not, in any event, exceed the additional direct costs
incurred by the district to accept the specific form of payment used by the
payer.

--- END ---