BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 80.50.010 and 2001 c
214 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that the present and predicted growth in energy demands in the state of
Washington requires the development of a procedure for the selection and
utilization of sites for energy facilities and the identification of a state
position with respect to each proposed site. The legislature recognizes that
the selection of sites will have a significant impact upon the welfare of the
population, the location and growth of industry and the use of the natural
resources of the state.

It is the policy of the
state of Washington to recognize the pressing need for increased energy
facilities, and to ensure through available and reasonable methods, that the
location and operation of such facilities will produce minimal adverse effects
on the environment, ecology of the land and its wildlife, and the ecology of
state waters and their aquatic life.

It is the intent to
seek courses of action that will balance the increasing demands for energy
facility location and operation in conjunction with the broad interests of the
public. Such action will be based on these premises:

(1) To assure
Washington state citizens that, where applicable, operational safeguards are at
least as stringent as the criteria established by the federal government and
are technically sufficient for their welfare and protection.

(2) To preserve and
protect the quality of the environment both today and into the near and
distant future; to enhance the public's opportunity to enjoy the esthetic
and recreational benefits of the air, water and land resources; to promote air
cleanliness; and to pursue beneficial changes in the environment.

(3) To provide abundant
energy at reasonable cost.

(4) To avoid costs of
complete site restoration and demolition of improvements and infrastructure at
unfinished nuclear energy sites, and to use unfinished nuclear energy
facilities for public uses, including economic development, under the
regulatory and management control of local governments and port districts.

(5) To avoid costly
duplication in the siting process and ensure that decisions are made timely and
without unnecessary delay.

Sec. 2. RCW 80.50.020 and 2001 c
214 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Applicant" means any person who makes application for a site
certification pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(2)
"Application" means any request for approval of a particular site or
sites filed in accordance with the procedures established pursuant to this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires.

(3) "Person"
means an individual, partnership, joint venture, private or public corporation,
association, firm, public service company, political subdivision, municipal
corporation, government agency, public utility district, or any other entity,
public or private, however organized.

(4) "Site"
means any proposed or approved location of an energy facility.

(5)
"Certification" means a binding agreement between an applicant and
the state which shall embody compliance to the siting guidelines, in effect as
of the date of certification, which have been adopted pursuant to RCW 80.50.040
as now or hereafter amended as conditions to be met prior to or concurrent with
the construction or operation of any energy facility.

(6) "Associated
facilities" means storage, transmission, handling, or other related and
supporting facilities connecting an energy plant with the existing energy
supply, processing, or distribution system, including, but not limited to,
communications, controls, mobilizing or maintenance equipment, instrumentation,
and other types of ancillary transmission equipment, off-line storage or
venting required for efficient operation or safety of the transmission system
and overhead, and surface or subsurface lines of physical access for the
inspection, maintenance, and safe operations of the transmission facility and
new transmission lines constructed to operate at nominal voltages in excess of
200,000 volts to connect a thermal power plant to the northwest power grid((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, common carrier railroads or motor
vehicles shall not be included.

(7) "Transmission
facility" means any of the following together with their associated
facilities:

(a) Crude or refined
petroleum or liquid petroleum product transmission pipeline of the following
dimensions: A pipeline larger than six inches minimum inside diameter between
valves for the transmission of these products with a total length of at least
fifteen miles;

(b) Natural gas,
synthetic fuel gas, or liquified petroleum gas transmission pipeline of the
following dimensions: A pipeline larger than fourteen inches minimum inside
diameter between valves, for the transmission of these products, with a total
length of at least fifteen miles for the purpose of delivering gas to a
distribution facility, except an interstate natural gas pipeline regulated by
the United States federal power commission.

(8) "Independent
consultants" means those persons who have no financial interest in the
applicant's proposals and who are retained by the council to evaluate the
applicant's proposals, supporting studies, or to conduct additional studies.

(9) "Thermal power
plant" means, for the purpose of certification, any electrical generating
facility using any fuel, including nuclear materials, for distribution of
electricity by electric utilities.

(10) "Energy
facility" means an energy plant or transmission facilities((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, the following are excluded from the
provisions of this chapter:

(a) Facilities for the
extraction, conversion, transmission or storage of water, other than water
specifically consumed or discharged by energy production or conversion for
energy purposes; and

(b) Facilities operated
by and for the armed services for military purposes or by other federal
authority for the national defense.

(11) "Council"
means the energy facility site evaluation council created by RCW 80.50.030.

(12) "Counsel for
the environment" means an assistant attorney general or a special
assistant attorney general who shall represent the public in accordance with
RCW 80.50.080.

(13)
"Construction" means on-site improvements, excluding exploratory
work, which cost in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars.

(14) "Energy
plant" means the following facilities together with their associated
facilities:

(a) Any stationary
thermal power plant with generating capacity of three hundred fifty thousand
kilowatts or more, measured using maximum continuous electric generating
capacity, less minimum auxiliary load, at average ambient temperature and
pressure, and floating thermal power plants of one hundred thousand kilowatts
or more, including associated facilities. For the purposes of this subsection,
"floating thermal power plants" means a thermal power plant that is
suspended on the surface of water by means of a barge, vessel, or other
floating platform;

(b) Facilities which
will have the capacity to receive liquified natural gas in the equivalent of
more than one hundred million standard cubic feet of natural gas per day, which
has been transported over marine waters;

(c) Facilities which
will have the capacity to receive more than an average of fifty thousand
barrels per day of crude or refined petroleum or liquified petroleum gas which
has been or will be transported over marine waters, except that the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply to storage facilities unless occasioned by such
new facility construction;

(d) Any underground
reservoir for receipt and storage of natural gas as defined in RCW 80.40.010
capable of delivering an average of more than one hundred million standard
cubic feet of natural gas per day; and

(e) Facilities capable
of processing more than twenty-five thousand barrels per day of petroleum into
refined products.

(15) "Greenhouse
gas" or "greenhouse gases" includes, but is not limited to,
carbon dioxide (CO2), methane and natural gas (CH4), and nitrous oxide (N20).

(16) "Land
use plan" means a comprehensive plan or land use element thereof adopted
by a unit of local government pursuant to chapters 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW.

(((16))) (17)
"Zoning ordinance" means an ordinance of a unit of local government
regulating the use of land and adopted pursuant to chapters 35.63, 35A.63, or
36.70 RCW or Article XI of the state Constitution.

(((17))) (18)
"Alternative energy resource" means: (a) Wind; (b) solar energy; (c)
geothermal energy; (d) landfill gas; (e) wave or tidal action; or (f) biomass
energy based on solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field residues, or
dedicated energy crops that do not include wood pieces that have been treated with
chemical preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or
copper-chrome-arsenic.

Sec. 3. RCW 80.50.040 and 2001 c
214 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The council shall have
the following powers:

(1) To adopt,
promulgate, amend, or rescind suitable rules and regulations, pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW, to carry out the provisions of this chapter, and the
policies and practices of the council in connection therewith;

(2) To develop and
apply environmental and ecological guidelines in relation to the type, design,
location, construction, and operational conditions of certification of energy
facilities subject to this chapter;

(3) To establish rules
of practice for the conduct of public hearings pursuant to the provisions of
the Administrative Procedure Act, as found in chapter 34.05 RCW;

(4) To prescribe the
form, content, and necessary supporting documentation for site certification;

(5) To receive
applications for energy facility locations and to investigate the sufficiency
thereof;

(6) To make and
contract, when applicable, for independent studies of sites proposed by the
applicant;

(7) To conduct hearings
on the proposed location of the energy facilities;

(8) To prepare written
reports to the governor which shall include: (a) A statement indicating
whether the application is in compliance with the council's guidelines, (b)
criteria specific to the site and transmission line routing, (c) a council
recommendation as to the disposition of the application, and (d) a draft
certification agreement when the council recommends approval of the
application;

(9) To prescribe the
means for monitoring of the effects arising from the construction and the
operation of energy facilities to assure continued compliance with terms of
certification and/or permits issued by the council pursuant to chapter 90.48
RCW or subsection (12) of this section: PROVIDED, That any on-site inspection
required by the council shall be performed by other state agencies pursuant to
interagency agreement: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the council may retain authority
for determining compliance relative to monitoring;

(10) To integrate its
site evaluation activity with activities of federal agencies having
jurisdiction in such matters to avoid unnecessary duplication;

(11) To present state
concerns and interests to other states, regional organizations, and the federal
government on the location, construction, and operation of any energy facility
which may affect the environment, health, or safety of the citizens of the
state of Washington;

(12) To issue permits
in compliance with applicable provisions of the federally approved state
implementation plan adopted in accordance with the Federal Clean Air Act, as
now existing or hereafter amended, for the new construction, reconstruction, or
enlargement or operation of energy facilities: PROVIDED, That such permits
shall become effective only if the governor approves an application for
certification and executes a certification agreement pursuant to this chapter:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That all such permits be conditioned upon compliance with
all provisions of the federally approved state implementation plan which apply
to energy facilities covered within the provisions of this chapter; ((and))

(13) To serve as an
interagency coordinating body for energy-related issues; and

(14) To calculate
and designate the amount of the fee to be paid by a new energy facility that
emits greenhouse gases under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 80.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every energy
facility that submits an application for an energy facility site certification
under this chapter after the effective date of this act is responsible for
permanently mitigating in Washington all of their greenhouse gas emissions at
actual market cost.

(2) The mitigation fee
will be calculated every ten years and the operator of the energy facility has
the option to pay the mitigation fee for the subsequent ten years in one lump
sum or over ten annual payments.

(3) The council will
determine the mitigation fee for every new energy facility at the time of the
initial certification and again once every ten years by the anniversary date of
the energy facility's certification. In calculating this fee, the council must
account for the actual market cost of the greenhouse gases that the energy
facility is projected to release over the upcoming ten years, taking into consideration
production capability, projected production, fossil fuels used, pollution
control equipment, and other measures taken by the facility to minimize the
releases of greenhouse gases. The initial mitigation will be calculated taking
into account the design of the facility. Subsequent calculations will account
for the historic greenhouse gas emissions from the facility.

(4) The council is not
required to exclusively issue financial mitigation. The council may require,
or make available as an option to reduce the mitigation fee, mitigation
projects that permanently mitigate in Washington greenhouse gas releases.

(5) In designating
mitigation under this section, the council may consult with any public or
private entity or individual, or commission an independent consultant. A
portion of any fees collected under this section may be used to reimburse the
council for any reasonable expenses incurred in the calculation of mitigation,
including fees for an independent consultant.

(6) The council is
encouraged to develop a standard formula for the calculation of mitigation that
can be applied to all new energy facility applications. This formula should
include a monetary value that is equivalent to a ton of emitted greenhouse
gas. In developing the formula, the council is encouraged, but not required,
to study the mitigation models of other states in the country.

(7) Mitigation
designated under this section becomes part of the certification document
developed under this chapter.

(8) All mitigation
calculated and designated by the council under this section must be verified
and approved by the Washington State University energy program before becoming
official. The Washington State University energy program may delegate this
responsibility to any group under its auspices.

(9) Five percent of any
fees collected under this section must be transferred to the Washington State
University energy program to be used for the study of the climate and rural
energy development.

(10) All payments
required under this section are to be made to the state treasurer who will make
payments as instructed by the council from the funds submitted. All such funds
are subject to the state auditing procedures. Any unexpended portions revert
to the department of revenue under chapter 63.29 RCW.

(11) A new energy
facility that generates all of its energy without using fossil fuels is exempt
from this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---