BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.58.107 and 1997 c
223 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
department of health shall charge a fee of thirteen dollars for certified
copies of records and for copies or information provided for research,
statistical, or administrative purposes, and eight dollars for a search of the
files or records when no copy is made. The department shall ((prescribe by
regulation)) adopt by rule fees to be paid for preparing sealed
files and for opening sealed files.

(2) No fee may
be demanded or required for furnishing certified copies of a birth, death,
fetal death, marriage, divorce, annulment, or legal separation record for use
in connection with a claim for compensation or pension pending before the
veterans administration.

(3) The
department shall keep a true and correct account of all fees received and turn
the fees over to the state treasurer on a weekly basis.

(4) Local
registrars shall charge the same fees as the state as ((hereinabove))
provided in subsection (1) of this section and as prescribed by the
department ((regulation)) by rule, except that local registrars
shall charge thirteen dollars for the first copy of a death certificate and
eight dollars for each additional copy of the same death certificate when the
additional copies are ordered at the same time as the first copy. All such
fees collected, except for five dollars of each fee for the issuance of a
certified copy, shall be paid to the jurisdictional health department.

(5) All local
registrars in cities and counties shall keep a true and correct account of all
fees received under this section for the issuance of certified copies and shall
turn five dollars of the fee over to the state treasurer on or before the first
day of January, April, July, and October.

(6) Five dollars
of each fee imposed for the issuance of certified copies, except for copies
suitable for display issued under RCW 70.58.085, at both the state and local
levels shall be held by the state treasurer in the death investigations'
account established by RCW 43.79.445.

(7) The
department and all local registrars in cities and counties must charge a
surcharge of one dollar for each fee imposed for certified copies of records
and for copies or information provided for research, statistical, or
administrative purposes, or for a search of the files or records when no copy
is made. All the revenue generated through this surcharge must be transmitted
to the state treasurer on or before the first day of January, April, July, and
October. The state treasurer must distribute these funds to the department of
health's center for health statistics, for the sole purpose of implementing a
web-based electronic death certificate registration system. The web-based
electronic death certificate registration system must include a function that
automatically provides county auditors and the secretary of state with the
death certificate information in order to allow those entities to update their
voter registration records. The surcharge imposed under this subsection
expires July 1, 2006.

--- END ---