BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that advanced telecommunications services are essential to our modern,
information society. The legislature further finds that telecommunications
companies, when constructing and upgrading the networks that provide these
services, must cross state lands to reach all state residents and that, for the
benefit of these residents, the state should permit such crossings in a nondiscriminatory,
economic, and timely manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 79.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The use of state
lands for telecommunications facilities must be granted by use permit.

(2) The term of a use
permit must be at least thirty years.

(3) The total charge
for the use permit must be an amount equal to the diminution in the property
value of the land caused by the location of the telecommunications facilities.
The diminution in property value must be based on the appraised value of the
land in its current use at the time of application of the use permit.

Sec. 3. RCW 79.01.392 and 2001 c
250 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon the filing of the
plat and field notes, as provided in RCW 79.01.388, the land applied for and
the valuable materials on the right of way applied for, and the marked danger
trees to be felled off the right of way, if any, and the improvements included
in the right of way applied for, if any, shall be appraised as in the case of
an application to purchase state lands. Upon full payment of the appraised
value of the land applied for, or upon payment of an annual rental when the
department of natural resources deems a rental to be in the best interests of
the state, and upon full payment of the appraised value of the valuable
materials and improvements, if any, the commissioner of public lands shall
issue to the applicant a certificate of the grant of such right of way stating
the terms and conditions thereof and shall enter the same in the abstracts and
records in his or her office, and thereafter any sale or lease of the lands
affected by such right of way shall be subject to the easement of such right of
way. Should the corporation, company, association, individual, state agency,
political subdivision of the state, or the United States of America, securing
such right of way ever abandon the use of the same for a period of sixty months
or longer for the purposes for which it was granted, the right of way shall
revert to the state, or the state's grantee.

Use
permit payments for telecommunications facilities must be calculated according
to section 2 of this act.

---
END ---