BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. This chapter may be known
and cited as the home loan protection act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The legislature finds
that abusive mortgage lending has become an increasing problem in this state,
exacerbating the loss of equity in homes and causing the number of foreclosures
to increase in recent years. One of the most common forms of abusive lending
is the making of loans that are equity-based, rather than income-based. The
financing of points and fees in these loans provides immediate income to the
originator and encourages lenders to repeatedly refinance home loans. The
lender's ability to sell loans reduces the incentive to ensure that the
homeowner can afford the payments of the loan. As long as there is sufficient
equity in the home, an abusive lender benefits even if the borrower is unable
to make the payments and is forced to refinance. The financing of high points
and fees causes the loss of precious equity in each refinancing and often leads
to foreclosure.

Abusive lending has
threatened the viability of many communities and caused decreases in
homeownership. While the marketplace appears to operate effectively for
conventional mortgages, too many homeowners find themselves victims of
overreaching lenders who provide loans with unnecessarily high costs and terms
that are unnecessary to secure repayment of the loan. The legislature finds
that as competition and self-regulation have not eliminated the abusive terms
from home-secured loans, the consumer protection provisions of this chapter are
necessary to encourage lending at reasonable rates with reasonable terms.

(2) This chapter shall
be liberally construed to effectuate its purpose of protecting the homes and
the equity of individual borrowers. This chapter is to be construed as a
consumer protection statute for all purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Benchmark
rate" is the interest rate which the borrower can reduce by paying bona
fide discount points; this rate shall not exceed the weekly average yield of
United States treasury securities having a maturity of five years, on the
fifteenth day of the month immediately preceding the month in which the loan is
made, plus four percentage points.

(2) "Bona fide
discount points" means loan discount points which are:

(a) Knowingly paid by
the borrower;

(b) Paid for the
express purpose of lowering the benchmark rate;

(c) In fact reducing
the interest rate or time-price differential applicable to the loan from an
interest rate which does not exceed the benchmark rate; and

(d) Recouped within the
first four years of the scheduled loan payments. For purposes of assessing
compliance with this subsection (2)(d), loan discount points will be considered
to be recouped within the first four years of the scheduled loan payments if
the reduction in the interest rate that is achieved by the payment of the loan
discount points reduces the interest charged on the scheduled payments such
that the borrower's dollar amount of savings in interest over the first four
years is equal to or exceeds the dollar amount of loan discount points paid by
the borrower.

(3)
"Borrower" means any natural person obligated to repay the loan,
including a coborrower, cosigner, or guarantor.

(4)
"Creditor" means a person who extends consumer credit that is subject
to a finance charge or is payable by written agreement in more than four
installments, and to whom the obligation is payable at any time.

(5) "High-cost
home loan" means a home loan in which the terms of the loan meet or exceed
one or more of the thresholds as defined in subsection (9) of this section.

(6) "Home
loan" means a loan, including an open-end credit plan, other than a
reverse mortgage transaction, where the loan is secured by:

(a) A mortgage or deed
of trust on real estate in this state upon which there is located or there is
to be located a structure or structures designed principally for occupancy of
from one to four families which is or will be occupied by a borrower as the
borrower's principal dwelling; or

(b) A security interest
on a manufactured or mobile home in this state which is or will be occupied by
a borrower as the borrower's principal dwelling.

(7)(a) "Points and
fees" means:

(i) All items listed in
15 U.S.C. Sec. 1605(a)(1) through (4), except interest or the time-price
differential;

(ii) All charges listed
in 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1605(e);

(iii) All compensation
paid directly or indirectly to a mortgage broker, including a broker that
originates a loan in its own name in a table-funded transaction;

(iv) The cost of all
premiums financed by the creditor, directly or indirectly for any credit life,
credit disability, credit unemployment, or credit property insurance, or any
other life or health insurance, or any payments financed by the creditor
directly or indirectly for any debt cancellation or suspension agreement or
contract, except insurance premiums calculated and paid on a monthly basis
shall not be considered financed by the creditor;

(v) The maximum
prepayment fees and penalties that may be charged or collected under the terms
of the loan documents; and

(vi) All prepayment
fees or penalties that are charged the borrower if the loan refinances a
previous loan made by the same creditor or an affiliate of the creditor.

(b) For open-end loans,
the points and fees are calculated by adding the total fees charged at closing
plus the maximum additional fees which can be charged pursuant to the loan
documents during the term of the loan.

(8) "Rate"
means the interest rate charged on the home loan, based on an annual simple
interest yield.

(9)
"Threshold" means any one of the following three items:

(a) "Rate
threshold" means:

(i) For a first lien
mortgage loan, the trigger rate equals or exceeds six percentage points over
the weekly average yield on five-year United States treasury securities;

(ii) For a subordinate
mortgage lien or a mortgage secured solely by a security interest in a
manufactured or mobile home, the trigger rate equals or exceeds eight
percentage points over the weekly average yield on five-year United States
treasury securities;

(iii) The trigger rate
is calculated as follows:

(A) For fixed-rate
loans in which the interest rate will not vary during the term of the loan, the
trigger rate is the rate as of the date of closing;

(B) For loans in which
the interest varies according to an index, the trigger rate is the sum of the
index rate as of the date of loan closing plus the maximum margin permitted at
any time under the loan agreement;

(C) For all other loans
in which the rate may vary at any time during the term of the loan, the trigger
rate is the maximum rate that may be charged during the term of the loan;

(b) "Total points
and fees threshold" means the following, excluding up to two bona fide
discount points:

(i) For loans in which
the total loan amount is thirty thousand dollars or more, the total points and
fees on the loan, paid by the borrower at or before closing, exceed three
percent of the total loan amount;

(ii) For loans in which
the total loan amount is less than thirty thousand dollars, the total points
and fees on the loan, paid by the borrower at or before closing, exceed the
lesser of nine hundred dollars or six percent of the total loan amount; and

(c) "Prepayment
penalty threshold" means the home loan agreement permits the lender to
charge or collect payment penalties or penalties more than thirty months after the
loan closing or which exceed, in the aggregate, more than two percent of the
amount prepaid.

(10) "Total loan
amount" means the principal of the loan minus those points and fees as
defined in subsection (7) of this section that are included in the principal
amount of the loan. For open-end loans, the total loan amount shall be calculated
using the total line of credit allowed under the home loan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) No creditor making a
home loan shall finance, directly or indirectly, any credit life, credit
disability, credit unemployment, or credit property insurance, or any other
life or health insurance, or any payments directly or indirectly for any debt
cancellation or suspension agreement or contract, except that insurance
premiums or debt cancellation or suspension fees calculated and paid on a
monthly basis shall not be considered financed by the creditor.

(2) No creditor may
engage in the unfair act or practice of flipping a home loan. Flipping a loan
is the making of a home loan to a borrower that refinances an existing home
loan when the new loan does not have reasonable, tangible net benefit to the
borrower considering all of the circumstances, including the terms of both the
new and refinanced loans, the cost of the new loan, and the borrower's
circumstances. In addition, the following home loan refinancings are presumed
to be flippings if:

(a) The primary
tangible benefit to the borrower is an interest rate lower than the interest
rate(s) on debts satisfied or refinanced in connection with the home loan, and
it will take more than four years for the borrower to recoup the costs of the
points and fees and other closing costs through savings resulting from the
lower interest rate; or

(b) The new loan
refinances an existing home loan that is a special mortgage originated,
subsidized, or guaranteed by or through the federal government, or a state,
tribal, or local government, or nonprofit organization, which either bears a
below-market interest rate at the time the loan was originated, or has
nonstandard payment terms beneficial to the borrower, such as payments that
vary with income, are limited to a percentage of income, or where no payments
are required under specified conditions, and where, as a result of the
refinancing, the borrower will lose one or more of the benefits of the special
mortgage.

(3) No creditor shall
recommend or encourage default on an existing loan or other debt prior to and
in connection with the closing or planned closing of a home loan that
refinances all or any portion of such existing loan or debt.

(4) No creditor may
charge a late payment fee except according to the following rules:

(a) The late payment
fee may not be in excess of four percent of the amount of the payment past due.

(b) The fee may only be
assessed for a payment past due for fifteen days or more.

(c) The fee may not be
charged more than once with respect to a single late payment. If a late
payment charge is deducted from a payment made on the loan, and the deduction
causes a subsequent default on a subsequent payment, no late payment charge may
be imposed for default. If a late payment charge has been once imposed with
respect to a particular late payment, no charge shall be imposed with respect
to any future payment which would have been timely and sufficient, but for the
previous default.

(d) No fee may be
charged unless the creditor notifies the borrower within forty-five days
following the date the payment was due that a late payment charge has been
imposed for a particular late payment. No late payment charge may be collected
from any borrower if the borrower informs the creditor that nonpayment of an
installment is in dispute and presents proof of payment within forty-five days
of receipt of the creditor's notice of the late charge.

(e) The creditor shall
treat each payment as posted on the same date as it was received by the
creditor, servicer, creditor's agent, or at the address provided to the
borrower by the creditor, servicer, or the creditor's agent for making
payments.

(5) No home loan may
contain a provision that permits the creditor, in its sole discretion, to
accelerate the indebtedness. This provision does not prohibit acceleration of
the loan in good faith due to the borrower's failure to abide by the material
terms of the loan.

(6) No creditor may
charge a fee for informing or transmitting to any person the balance due to pay
off a home loan or to provide a release upon prepayment. Payoff balances shall
be provided within a reasonable time, but in any event no more than seven
business days after the request.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A high-cost home loan is
subject to the following additional limitations and prohibited practices:

(1) No creditor making
a high-cost home loan shall directly or indirectly finance any points or fees.

(2) No prepayment fees
or penalties shall be included in the loan documents for a high-cost home loan
or charged the borrower which exceed in the aggregate:

(a) In the first twelve
months after the loan closing more than two percent of the loan amount prepaid;
or

(b) In the second
twelve months after the loan closing, more than one percent of the amount
prepaid. No prepayment penalty shall be contracted for after the second year
following the loan closing.

(3) No high-cost home
loan may contain a scheduled payment that is more than twice as large as the
average of earlier scheduled payments. This provision does not apply when the
payment schedule is adjusted to the seasonal or irregular income of the
borrower.

(4) No high-cost home
loan may include payment terms under which the outstanding principal balance
will increase at any time over the course of the loan because the regular
periodic payments do not cover the full amount of interest due.

(5) No high-cost home
loan may contain a provision that increases the interest rate after default.
This provision does not apply to interest rate changes in a variable rate loan
otherwise consistent with the provisions of the loan documents, provided the
change in the interest rate is not triggered by the event of default or the
acceleration of the indebtedness.

(6) No high-cost home
loan may include terms under which more than two periodic payments required
under the loan are consolidated and paid in advance from the loan proceeds
provided to the borrower.

(7) No high-cost home
loan may be subject to a mandatory arbitration clause that limits in any way
the right of the borrower to seek relief through the judicial process for any
and all claims and defenses the borrower may have against the creditor, broker,
or other party involved in the loan transaction.

(8) A creditor may not
make a high-cost home loan without first receiving certification from a
counselor approved by the United States department of housing and urban
development, a state housing financing agency, or the regulatory agency which
has jurisdiction over the creditor, that the borrower has received counseling
on the advisability of the loan transaction.

(9) A creditor may not
make a high-cost home loan without due regard to repayment ability. A creditor
who follows the debt-to-income ratio listed in 38 C.F.R. Sec. 36.4337(c)(1) and
as defined in 38 C.F.R. Sec. 36.4337(d) and follows the residual income
guidelines established in 38 C.F.R. Sec. 36.4337(e) and VA Form 26-6393 shall
benefit from a rebuttable presumption that the creditor made the loan with due
regard to repayment ability.

(10) A creditor may not
pay a contractor under a home-improvement contract from the proceeds of a
high-cost home loan, unless:

(a) The creditor is
presented with a signed and dated completion certificate showing that the home
improvements have been completed; and

(b) The instrument is
payable to the borrower or jointly to the borrower and the contractor, or at
the election of the borrower, through a third-party escrow agent in accordance
with terms established in a written agreement signed by the borrower, the
creditor, and the contractor prior to the disbursement.

(11) A creditor may not
charge a borrower any fees or other charges to modify, renew, extend, or amend
a high-cost home loan or to defer any payment due under the terms of a
high-cost home loan.

(12) Any creditor
making a high-cost home loan that has the legal right to foreclose must use
this state's judicial foreclosure procedures. The borrower has the right to
assert in the proceeding the nonexistence of a default and any other claim or
defense to acceleration and foreclosure, including any based on any violations
of this chapter, though no claim or defense shall be deemed a compulsory
counterclaim.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) If a creditor asserts
that grounds for acceleration exist and requires the payment in full of all
sums secured by the security instrument, the borrower, or anyone authorized to
act on the borrower's behalf, shall have the right at any time, up to the time
title is transferred by means of foreclosure, by judicial proceeding and sale
or otherwise, to cure the default, and reinstate the home loan by tendering the
amount or performance as specified in this section. Cure of default shall
reinstate the borrower to the same position as if the default had not occurred
and shall nullify, as of the date of the cure, any acceleration of any
obligation under the security instrument or note arising from the default.

(2) Before any action
filed to foreclose upon the home or other action is taken to seize or transfer
ownership of the home, a notice of the right to cure the default must be
delivered to the borrower informing the borrower of the following:

(a) The nature of
default claimed on the home loan, and of the borrower's right to cure the
default by paying the sum of money required to cure the default, as long as a
creditor or servicer may not refuse to accept any partial payment made or
tendered in response to the notice. If the amount necessary to cure the
default will change during the thirty-day period after the effective date of
the notice, due to the application of a daily interest rate or the addition of
late fees, as allowed by this chapter, the notice shall give sufficient
information to enable the borrower to calculate the amount at any point during
the thirty-day period;

(b) The date by which
the borrower shall cure the default to avoid acceleration and initiation of
foreclosure, or other action to seize the home, which date shall not be less
than thirty days after the date the notice is effective, and the name, address,
and telephone number of a person to whom the payment or tender shall be made;

(c) That if the
borrower does not cure the default by the date specified, the creditor may take
steps to terminate the borrower's ownership in the property by requiring
payment in full of the home loan and commencing a foreclosure proceeding or
other action to seize the home; and

(d) The name and
address of the creditor and the telephone number of a representative of the
creditor whom the borrower may contact if the borrower disagrees with the
creditor's assertion that a default has occurred or the correctness of the
creditor's calculation of the amount required to cure the default.

(3) To cure a default
under this subsection, a borrower shall not be required to pay any charge, fee,
or penalty attributable to the exercise of the right to cure a default as
provided for in this section, other than the fees specifically allowed by this
section. The borrower shall not be liable for any attorneys' fees relating to
the borrower's default that are incurred by the lender prior to or during the
thirty-day period set forth in subsection (2)(b) of this section, nor for any
fees in excess of one hundred dollars that are incurred by the lender after the
expiration of the thirty-day period, but prior to the time the lender files a
foreclosure action or takes other action to seize or transfer ownership of the
home. After the lender files a foreclosure action or takes other action to
seize or transfer ownership of the home, the borrower shall only be liable for
attorneys' fees that are reasonable and actually incurred by the lender, based
on a reasonable hourly rate and a reasonable number of hours.

(4) If a default is
cured prior to the initiation of any action to foreclose or to seize the
residence, the creditor shall not institute the foreclosure proceeding or other
action for that default. If a default is cured after the initiation of any
action to foreclose, the creditor shall take steps necessary to terminate the
foreclosure proceeding or other action. Any creditor making a home loan who
has the legal right to foreclose must use the judicial foreclosure procedures of
the state where the property securing the loan is located. The borrower shall
have the right to assert in a judicial foreclosure proceeding or other action
the nonexistence of a default and any other claim or defense to acceleration
and foreclosure, including any based on violations of this chapter, though no
such claim or defense shall be deemed a compulsory counterclaim.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, where a home loan was made, arranged, or assigned by a
person selling either a manufactured or mobile home, or home improvements to
the dwelling of a borrower, the borrower may assert all affirmative claims and
any defenses that the borrower may have against the seller or home improvement
contractor against the lender, any assignee, holder, or servicer, in any
capacity.

(2) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, the remedies provided in this chapter apply to the
creditor, any director, officer, employee, or controlling stockholder of, or
agent for, a creditor who personally participated in the making or approving of
a high-cost home loan, and any other persons to whom this chapter applies and
who violated the requirements of this chapter. Any person who purchases or is
otherwise assigned a high-cost home loan is subject to all affirmative claims
and any defenses with respect to the loan that the borrower could assert
against the original creditor or broker of the loan.

(3) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, a borrower in default more than sixty days or in
foreclosure may assert a violation of this chapter by way of offset:

(a) As an original
action;

(b) As a defense or
counterclaim to an action to collect amounts owed; or

(c) To obtain
possession of the home secured by the home loan.

(4) It is a violation
of this chapter for any person in bad faith to attempt to avoid the application
of this chapter by:

(a) Dividing any loan
transaction into separate parts for this purpose; or

(b) Engaging in any
other subterfuge with the intent of evading the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) Any violation of this
chapter constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the provisions
of chapter 19.86 RCW.

(2) Any person found by
a preponderance of the evidence to have violated this chapter is liable to the
borrower for the following:

(a) Actual damages,
including consequential and incidental damages; the borrower shall not be
required to demonstrate reliance in order to receive actual damages;

(b) Statutory damages
equal to the finance charges agreed to in the home loan agreement, plus ten
percent of the amount financed;

(c) Punitive damages,
when the violation was malicious or reckless; and

(d) Costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees.

(3) A borrower may be
granted injunctive, declaratory, and other equitable relief as the court deems
appropriate in an action to enforce compliance with this chapter.

(4) The intentional
violation of this chapter, or rule thereunder, renders the home loan agreement
void, and the creditor has no right to collect, receive, or retain any
principal, interest, or other charges whatsoever with respect to the loan, and
the borrower may recover any payments made under the agreement.

(5) The right of
rescission granted under 15 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. for violations of that law and
all other remedies provided in this section are available to a borrower by way
of recoupment against a party foreclosing on the home loan or collecting on the
loan, at any time during the term of the loan.

(6) The remedies
provided in this section are not intended to be the exclusive remedies
available to a borrower, nor must the borrower exhaust any administrative
remedies provided under this chapter or any other applicable law before
proceeding under this section.

(7) Any person,
including members, officers, and directors of the creditor, who knowingly
violates this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(8) A creditor in a
home loan who, when acting in good faith, fails to comply with the provisions
of this chapter, will not be deemed to have violated this section if the
creditor establishes that either:

(a) Within thirty days
of the loan closing, and prior to receiving any notice from the borrower of the
compliance failure, the creditor has made appropriate restitution to the
borrower, and appropriate adjustments are made to the loan; or

(b) Within sixty days
of the loan closing, and prior to receiving any notice from the borrower of the
compliance failure, and the compliance failure was not intentional and resulted
from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably
adapted to avoid these errors, the borrower is notified of the compliance
failure, appropriate restitution is made to the borrower, and appropriate
adjustments are made to the loan.

Examples of bona fide
errors include clerical, calculation, computer malfunction and programming, and
printing errors. An error of legal judgment with respect to a person's
obligations under this section is not a bona fide error.

(9) The remedies
provided in this section are cumulative.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The rights conferred by
this section are independent of and in addition to any other rights under other
laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The provisions of this
chapter are severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision is
declared to be invalid or is preempted by federal law or regulation, the
validity of the remainder of this chapter shall not be affected thereby. If
any provision of this chapter is declared to be inapplicable to any specific
category, type, or kind of loan or points and fees, the provisions of this
chapter shall nonetheless continue to apply with respect to all other loans and
points and fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The law of this state
shall be applied to all transactions governed by this chapter. This chapter
shall apply to all loans made or entered into after the effective date of this
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. Sections 1 through 11 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 61 RCW.

---
END ---