BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.12.101 and 1998 c
203 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

A transfer of ownership
in a motor vehicle is perfected by compliance with the requirements of this
section.

(1) If an owner
transfers his or her interest in a vehicle, other than by the creation,
deletion, or change of a security interest, the owner shall, at the time of the
delivery of the vehicle, execute an assignment to the transferee and provide an
odometer disclosure statement under RCW 46.12.124 on the certificate of
ownership or as the department otherwise prescribes, and cause the certificate
and assignment to be transmitted to the transferee. The owner shall notify the
department or its agents or subagents, in writing, on the appropriate form, of
the date of the sale or transfer, the name and address of the owner and of the
transferee, the transferee's driver's license number if available, and such
description of the vehicle, including the vehicle identification number, the
license plate number, or both, as may be required in the appropriate form
provided or approved for that purpose by the department. The report of sale
will be deemed properly filed if all information required in this section is
provided on the form and includes a department-authorized notation that the
document was received by the department, its agents, or subagents on or before
the fifth day after the sale of the vehicle, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and
state and federal holidays. Agents and subagents shall immediately
electronically transmit the seller's report of sale to the department. Reports
of sale processed and recorded by the department's agents or subagents may be
subject to fees as specified in RCW 46.01.140 (4)(a) or (5)(b). By January
1, 2003, the department shall create a system enabling the seller of a vehicle
to transmit the report of sale electronically. The system created by the
department must immediately indicate on the department's vehicle record that a
seller's report of sale has been filed.

(2) The requirements of
subsection (1) of this section to provide an odometer disclosure statement
apply to the transfer of vehicles held for lease when transferred to a lessee
and then to the lessor at the end of the leasehold and to vehicles held in a
fleet when transferred to a purchaser.

(3) Except as provided
in RCW 46.70.122 the transferee shall within fifteen days after delivery to the
transferee of the vehicle, execute the application for a new certificate of
ownership in the same space provided therefor on the certificate or as the department
prescribes, and cause the certificates and application to be transmitted to the
department.

(4) Upon request of the
owner or transferee, a secured party in possession of the certificate of
ownership shall, unless the transfer was a breach of its security agreement,
either deliver the certificate to the transferee for transmission to the
department or, when the secured party receives the owner's assignment from the
transferee, it shall transmit the transferee's application for a new
certificate, the existing certificate, and the required fee to the department.
Compliance with this section does not affect the rights of the secured party.

(5) If a security
interest is reserved or created at the time of the transfer, the certificate of
ownership shall be retained by or delivered to the person who becomes the
secured party, and the parties shall comply with the provisions of RCW
46.12.170.

(6) If the purchaser or
transferee fails or neglects to make application to transfer the certificate of
ownership and license registration within fifteen days after the date of
delivery of the vehicle, he or she shall on making application for transfer be
assessed a twenty-five dollar penalty on the sixteenth day and two dollars
additional for each day thereafter, but not to exceed one hundred dollars. The
director may by rule establish conditions under which the penalty will not be
assessed when an application for transfer is delayed for reasons beyond the
control of the purchaser. Conditions for not assessing the penalty may be
established for but not limited to delays caused by:

(a) The department
requesting additional supporting documents;

(b) Extended
hospitalization or illness of the purchaser;

(c) Failure of a legal
owner to release his or her interest;

(d) Failure,
negligence, or nonperformance of the department, auditor, or subagent.

Failure or neglect to
make application to transfer the certificate of ownership and license
registration within forty-five days after the date of delivery of the vehicle
is a misdemeanor.

(7) Upon receipt of an
application for reissue or replacement of a certificate of ownership and
transfer of license registration, accompanied by the endorsed certificate of
ownership or other documentary evidence as is deemed necessary, the department
shall, if the application is in order and if all provisions relating to the
certificate of ownership and license registration have been complied with,
issue new certificates of title and license registration as in the case of an
original issue and shall transmit the fees together with an itemized detailed
report to the state treasurer, to be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

(8) Once each quarter
the department shall report to the department of revenue a list of those
vehicles for which a seller's report has been received but no transfer of title
has taken place.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.12.102 and 1984 c
39 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An owner who
has made a bona fide sale or transfer of a vehicle and has delivered possession
of it to a purchaser shall not by reason of any of the provisions of this title
be deemed the owner of the vehicle so as to be subject to civil liability or
criminal liability for the operation of the vehicle thereafter by another person
when the owner has also fulfilled both of the following requirements:

(((1))) (a)
When ((he)) the owner has made proper endorsement and delivery of
the certificate of ownership and has delivered the certificate of registration
as provided in this chapter;

(((2))) (b)
When ((he)) the owner has delivered to the department either ((the
notice as provided in)) a properly filed report of sale that includes
all of the information required in RCW 46.12.101(1) and is delivered to
the department within five days of the sale of the vehicle excluding Saturdays,
Sundays, and state and federal holidays, or appropriate documents for
registration of the vehicle pursuant to the sale or transfer.

(2) When a
registered tow truck operator submits an abandoned vehicle report to the
department for a vehicle sold at public auction, any previous owner is relieved
of civil or criminal liability for the operation of the vehicle, and liability
is transferred to the purchaser of the vehicle as listed on the abandoned
vehicle report.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.20.031 and 1999 c
6 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
not issue a driver's license to a person:

(1) Who is under the
age of sixteen years;

(2) Whose driving
privilege has been withheld unless and until the department may authorize the
driving privilege under RCW 46.20.311;

(3) Who has been
classified as an alcoholic, drug addict, alcohol abuser, or drug abuser by a
program approved by the department of social and health services. The
department may, however, issue a license if the person:

(a) Has been granted a
deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW; or

(b) Is satisfactorily
participating in or has successfully completed an alcohol or drug abuse
treatment program approved by the department of social and health services and
has established control of his or her alcohol or drug abuse problem;

(4) Who has previously
been adjudged to be mentally ill or insane, or to be incompetent due to a
mental disability or disease. The department shall, however, issue a license
to the person if he or she otherwise qualifies and:

(a) Has been restored
to competency by the methods provided by law; or

(b) The superior court
finds the person able to operate a motor vehicle with safety upon the highways
during such incompetency;

(5) Who has not passed
the driver's licensing examination required by RCW 46.20.120 and 46.20.305, if
applicable;

(6) Who is required
under the laws of this state to deposit proof of financial responsibility and
who has not deposited such proof;

(7) Who is unable to
safely operate a motor vehicle upon the highways due to a physical or mental
disability. The department's conclusion that a person is barred from licensing
under this subsection must be reasonable and be based upon good and substantial
evidence. This determination is subject to review by a court of competent
jurisdiction((;

(8) Who has violated
his or her written promise to appear, respond, or comply regarding a notice of
infraction issued for abandonment of a vehicle in violation of RCW 46.55.105,
unless:

(a) The court has
not notified the department of the violation;

(b) The department
has received notice from the court showing that the person has been found not
to have committed the violation of RCW 46.55.105; or

(c) The person has
paid all monetary penalties owing, including completion of community service,
and the court is satisfied that the person has made restitution as provided by
RCW 46.55.105(2))).

Sec. 4. RCW 46.20.289 and 1999 c
274 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
suspend all driving privileges of a person when the department receives notice
from a court under RCW 46.63.070(((5))) (6), 46.63.110(5), or
46.64.025 that the person has failed to respond to a notice of traffic
infraction, failed to appear at a requested hearing, violated a written promise
to appear in court, or has failed to comply with the terms of a notice of
traffic infraction or citation, other than for ((a notice of a violation of
RCW 46.55.105 or)) a standing, stopping, or parking violation. A
suspension under this section takes effect thirty days after the date the
department mails notice of the suspension, and remains in effect until the
department has received a certificate from the court showing that the case has
been adjudicated, and until the person meets the requirements of RCW
46.20.311. In the case of failure to respond to a traffic infraction issued
under RCW 46.55.105, the department shall suspend all driving privileges until
the person provides evidence from the court that all penalties and restitution
have been paid. A suspension under this section does not take effect if,
prior to the effective date of the suspension, the department receives a
certificate from the court showing that the case has been adjudicated.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.55.075 and 1999 c
398 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
Washington state patrol shall provide by rule for a uniform impound
authorization and inventory form. All law enforcement agencies must use this
form for all vehicle impounds after June 30, 2001.

(2) By January 1,
2003, the Washington state patrol shall develop uniform impound procedures,
which must include but are not limited to defining an impound and a visual
inspection. Local law enforcement agencies shall adopt the procedures by July
1, 2003.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.55.085 and 1993 c
121 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A law enforcement
officer discovering an unauthorized vehicle left within a highway right of way
shall attach to the vehicle a readily visible notification sticker. The
sticker shall contain the following information:

(a) The date and time
the sticker was attached;

(b) The identity of the
officer;

(c) A statement that if
the vehicle is not removed within twenty-four hours from the time the sticker
is attached, the vehicle may be taken into custody and stored at the owner's
expense; ((and))

(d) A statement that
if the vehicle is not redeemed as provided in RCW 46.55.120, the registered
owner will have committed the traffic infraction of littering--abandoned
vehicle; and

(e) The address
and telephone number where additional information may be obtained.

(2) If the vehicle has
current Washington registration plates, the officer shall check the records to
learn the identity of the last owner of record. The officer or his department
shall make a reasonable effort to contact the owner by telephone in order to
give the owner the information on the notification sticker.

(3) If the vehicle is
not removed within twenty-four hours from the time the notification sticker is
attached, the law enforcement officer may take custody of the vehicle and
provide for the vehicle's removal to a place of safety. A vehicle that does
not pose a safety hazard may remain on the roadside for more than twenty-four
hours if the owner or operator is unable to remove it from the place where it
is located and so notifies law enforcement officials and requests assistance.

(4) For the purposes of
this section a place of safety includes the business location of a registered
tow truck operator.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The Washington state
patrol and local law enforcement agencies shall convene a task force to
consider the advantages and disadvantages of law enforcement agencies
immediately transmitting, electronically or by facsimile, the impound
authorization form to the impounding tow operator. The task force shall report
its findings and recommendations to the house of representatives and senate
transportation committees by January 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The department of licensing
shall study the feasibility of requiring the seller of a vehicle to remove the
vehicle's license plates at the time of the sale. The department shall
specifically examine the fiscal impacts of implementing this proposal, the
experiences of other states, and the advantages and disadvantages of this
proposal. The department shall report its findings and recommendations to the
house of representatives and senate transportation committees by January 1,
2003.

Sec. 9. RCW 46.55.100 and 1999 c
398 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At the time of
impoundment the registered tow truck operator providing the towing service
shall give immediate notification, by telephone or radio, to a law enforcement
agency having jurisdiction who shall maintain a log of such reports. A law
enforcement agency, or a private communication center acting on behalf of a law
enforcement agency, shall within six to twelve hours of the impoundment,
provide to a requesting operator the name and address of the legal and
registered owners of the vehicle, and the registered owner of any personal
property registered or titled with the department that is attached to or
contained in or on the impounded vehicle, the vehicle identification number,
and any other necessary, pertinent information. The initial notice of
impoundment shall be followed by a written or electronic facsimile notice
within twenty-four hours. In the case of a vehicle from another state, time
requirements of this subsection do not apply until the requesting law
enforcement agency in this state receives the information.

(2) The operator shall
immediately send an abandoned vehicle report to the department for any vehicle,
and for any items of personal property registered or titled with the
department, that are in the operator's possession after the one hundred twenty
hour abandonment period. Such report need not be sent when the impoundment is
pursuant to a writ, court order, or police hold that is not a suspended license
impound. The owner notification and abandonment process shall be initiated by
the registered tow truck operator immediately following notification by a court
or law enforcement officer that the writ, court order, or police hold that is
not a suspended license impound is no longer in effect.

(3) Following the
submittal of an abandoned vehicle report, the department shall provide the
registered tow truck operator with owner information within seventy-two hours.

(4) Within fourteen
days of the sale of an abandoned vehicle at public auction, the towing operator
shall send a copy of the abandoned vehicle report showing the disposition of
the abandoned vehicle and any other items of personal property registered or
titled with the department to the ((crime information center of the
Washington state patrol)) department. The vehicle buyer information
sent to the department on the abandoned vehicle report relieves the previous
owner of the vehicle from any civil or criminal liability for the operation of
the vehicle and transfers full liability for the vehicle to the buyer. By
January 1, 2003, the department shall create a system enabling tow truck
operators to send the portion of the abandoned vehicle report that contains the
vehicle's buyer information to the department electronically.

(5) If the operator
sends an abandoned vehicle report to the department and the department finds no
owner information, an operator may proceed with an inspection of the vehicle
and any other items of personal property registered or titled with the
department to determine whether owner identification is within the vehicle.

(6) If the operator
finds no owner identification, the operator shall immediately notify the
appropriate law enforcement agency, which shall search the vehicle and any
other items of personal property registered or titled with the department for
the vehicle identification number or other appropriate identification numbers
and check the necessary records to determine the vehicle's or other property's
owners.

Sec. 10. RCW 46.55.105 and 1999 c
86 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The abandonment of
any vehicle creates a prima facie presumption that the last registered owner of
record is responsible for the abandonment and is liable for costs incurred in
removing, storing, and disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less amounts
realized at auction.

(2) If an unauthorized
vehicle is found abandoned under subsection (1) of this section and removed at
the direction of law enforcement, the last registered owner of record is guilty
of ((a)) the traffic infraction of "littering‑-abandoned
vehicle," unless the vehicle is redeemed as provided in RCW
46.55.120. In addition to any other monetary penalty payable under chapter
46.63 RCW, the court shall not consider all monetary penalties as having been
paid until the court is satisfied that the person found to have committed the
infraction has made restitution in the amount of the deficiency remaining after
disposal of the vehicle under RCW 46.55.140.

(3) A vehicle theft
report filed with a law enforcement agency relieves the last registered owner
of liability under subsection (2) of this section for failure to redeem the
vehicle. However, the last registered owner remains liable for the costs
incurred in removing, storing, and disposing of the abandoned vehicle under
subsection (1) of this section. Nothing in this section limits in any way the
registered owner's rights in a civil action or as restitution in a criminal
action against a person responsible for the theft of the vehicle.

(4) Properly filing a
report of sale or transfer regarding the vehicle involved in accordance with
RCW 46.12.101(1) relieves the last registered owner of liability under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section. If the date of sale as indicated on
the report of sale is on or before the date of impoundment, the buyer
identified on the latest properly filed report of sale with the department is
assumed liable for the costs incurred in removing, storing, and disposing of
the abandoned vehicle, less amounts realized at auction. If the date of sale
is after the date of impoundment, the previous registered owner is assumed to
be liable for such costs. A licensed vehicle dealer is not liable under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section if the dealer, as transferee or
assignee of the last registered owner of the vehicle involved, has complied
with the requirements of RCW 46.70.122 upon selling or otherwise disposing of
the vehicle, or if the dealer has timely filed a transitional ownership record
or report of sale under RCW 46.12.103. In that case the person to whom the
licensed vehicle dealer has sold or transferred the vehicle is assumed liable
for the costs incurred in removing, storing, and disposing of the abandoned
vehicle, less amounts realized at auction.

(5) For the purposes of
reporting notices of traffic infraction to the department under RCW 46.20.270
and 46.52.101, and for purposes of reporting notices of failure to appear,
respond, or comply regarding a notice of traffic infraction to the department
under RCW 46.63.070(((5))) (6), a traffic infraction under
subsection (2) of this section is not considered to be a standing, stopping, or
parking violation.

(6) A notice of
infraction for a violation of this section may be filed with a court of limited
jurisdiction organized under Title 3, 35, or 35A RCW, or with a violations
bureau subject to the court's jurisdiction.

Sec. 11. RCW 46.55.110 and 1999 c
398 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When an
unauthorized vehicle is impounded, the impounding towing operator shall notify
the legal and registered owners of the impoundment of the unauthorized vehicle
and the owners of any other items of personal property registered or titled
with the department. The notification shall be sent by first-class mail within
twenty-four hours after the impoundment to the last known registered and legal
owners of the vehicle, and the owners of any other items of personal property
registered or titled with the department, as provided by the law enforcement
agency, and shall inform the owners of the identity of the person or agency
authorizing the impound. The notification shall include the name of the
impounding tow firm, its address, and telephone number. The notice shall also
include the location, time of the impound, and by whose authority the vehicle
was impounded. The notice shall also include the written notice of the right
of redemption and opportunity for a hearing to contest the validity of the
impoundment pursuant to RCW 46.55.120.

(2) In addition, if a
suspended license impound has been ordered, the notice must state the length of
the impound, the requirement of the posting of a security deposit to ensure
payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage, notification that if the
security deposit is not posted the vehicle will immediately be processed and
sold at auction as an abandoned vehicle, and the requirements set out in RCW
46.55.120(1)(b) regarding the payment of the costs of removal, towing, and
storage as well as providing proof of satisfaction of any penalties, fines, or
forfeitures before redemption. The notice must also state that the registered
owner is ineligible to purchase the vehicle at the abandoned vehicle auction,
if held.

(3) In the case of an
abandoned vehicle, or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, within twenty-four hours after receiving information on the
owners from the department through the abandoned vehicle report, the tow truck
operator shall send by certified mail, with return receipt requested, a notice
of custody and sale to the legal and registered owners and of the penalties
for the traffic infraction littering‑-abandoned vehicle.

(4) If the date on
which a notice required by subsection (3) of this section is to be mailed falls
upon a Saturday, Sunday, or a postal holiday, the notice may be mailed on the
next day that is neither a Saturday, Sunday, nor a postal holiday.

(5) No notices need be
sent to the legal or registered owners of an impounded vehicle or other item of
personal property registered or titled with the department, if the vehicle or
personal property has been redeemed.

Sec. 12. RCW 46.55.130 and 2000 c
193 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If, after the
expiration of fifteen days from the date of mailing of notice of custody and
sale required in RCW 46.55.110(3) to the registered and legal owners, the
vehicle remains unclaimed and has not been listed as a stolen vehicle, or a
suspended license impound has been directed, but no security paid under RCW
46.55.120, then the registered tow truck operator having custody of the vehicle
shall conduct a sale of the vehicle at public auction after having first
published a notice of the date, place, and time of the auction in a newspaper
of general circulation in the county in which the vehicle is located not less
than three days and no more than ten days before the date of the auction. The
notice shall contain a description of the vehicle including the make, model,
year, and license number and a notification that a three-hour public viewing
period will be available before the auction. The auction shall be held during
daylight hours of a normal business day.

(2) The following
procedures are required in any public auction of such abandoned vehicles:

(a) The auction shall
be held in such a manner that all persons present are given an equal time and
opportunity to bid;

(b) All bidders must be
present at the time of auction unless they have submitted to the registered tow
truck operator, who may or may not choose to use the preauction bid method, a
written bid on a specific vehicle. Written bids may be submitted up to five
days before the auction and shall clearly state which vehicle is being bid
upon, the amount of the bid, and who is submitting the bid;

(c) The open bid
process, including all written bids, shall be used so that everyone knows the
dollar value that must be exceeded;

(d) The highest two
bids received shall be recorded in written form and shall include the name,
address, and telephone number of each such bidder;

(e) In case the high
bidder defaults, the next bidder has the right to purchase the vehicle for the
amount of his or her bid;

(f) The successful
bidder shall apply for title within fifteen days;

(g) The registered tow
truck operator shall post a copy of the auction procedure at the bidding site.
If the bidding site is different from the licensed office location, the
operator shall post a clearly visible sign at the office location that
describes in detail where the auction will be held. At the bidding site a copy
of the newspaper advertisement that lists the vehicles for sale shall be
posted;

(h) All surplus moneys
derived from the auction after satisfaction of the registered tow truck
operator's lien shall be remitted within thirty days to the department for
deposit in the state motor vehicle fund. A report identifying the vehicles
resulting in any surplus shall accompany the remitted funds. If the director
subsequently receives a valid claim from the registered vehicle owner of record
as determined by the department within one year from the date of the auction,
the surplus moneys shall be remitted to such owner;

(i) If an operator
receives no bid, or if the operator is the successful bidder at auction, the
operator shall, within forty-five days, sell the vehicle to a licensed
vehicle wrecker, hulk hauler, or scrap processor by use of the abandoned
vehicle report-affidavit of sale, or the operator shall apply for title to the
vehicle.

(3) A tow truck
operator can refuse to accept a bid at an auction under this section for any of
the following reasons: (a) The bidder is currently indebted to the operator;
(b) the operator has knowledge that the bidder has previously abandoned
vehicles purchased at auction; or (c) the bidder has purchased, at auction,
more than four vehicles in the last calendar year without obtaining title to
any or all of the vehicles. In no case may an operator hold a vehicle for
longer than ninety days without holding an auction on the vehicle, except for
vehicles that are under a police or judicial hold.

(4)(a) In no case may
the accumulation of storage charges exceed fifteen days from the date of
receipt of the information by the operator from the department as provided by
RCW 46.55.110(3).

(b) The
failure of the registered tow truck operator to comply with the time limits
provided in this chapter limits the accumulation of storage charges to five
days except where delay is unavoidable. Providing incorrect or incomplete
identifying information to the department in the abandoned vehicle report shall
be considered a failure to comply with these time limits if correct information
is available. However, storage charges begin to accrue again on the date the
correct and complete information is provided to the department by the
registered tow truck operator.

Sec. 13. RCW 46.55.230 and 2001 c
139 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any law enforcement officer having
jurisdiction, or any employee or officer of a jurisdictional health department
acting pursuant to RCW 70.95.240, or any person authorized by the director
shall inspect and may authorize the disposal of an abandoned junk vehicle. The
person making the inspection shall record the make and vehicle identification
number or license number of the vehicle if available, and shall also verify
that the approximate value of the junk vehicle is equivalent only to the
approximate value of the ((scrap in it)) parts.

(b) A tow truck
operator may authorize the disposal of an abandoned junk vehicle if the vehicle
has been abandoned two or more times, the registered ownership information has
not changed since the first abandonment, and the registered owner is also the
legal owner.

(2) The law enforcement
officer or department representative shall provide information on the vehicle's
registered and legal owner to the landowner.

(3) Upon receiving
information on the vehicle's registered and legal owner, the landowner shall
mail a notice to the registered and legal owners shown on the records of the
department. The notification shall describe the redemption procedure and the
right to arrange for the removal of the vehicle.

(4) If the vehicle
remains unclaimed more than fifteen days after the landowner has mailed
notification to the registered and legal owner, the landowner may dispose of
the vehicle or sign an affidavit of sale to be used as a title document.

(5) If no information
on the vehicle's registered and legal owner is found in the records of the
department, the landowner may immediately dispose of the vehicle or sign an
affidavit of sale to be used as a title document.

(6) It is a gross misdemeanor
for a person to abandon a junk vehicle on property. If a junk vehicle is
abandoned, the vehicle's registered owner shall also pay a cleanup restitution
payment equal to twice the costs incurred in the removal of the junk vehicle.
The court shall distribute one-half of the restitution payment to the landowner
of the property upon which the junk vehicle is located, and one-half of the
restitution payment to the law enforcement agency or jurisdictional health
department investigating the incident.

(7) For the purposes of
this section, the term "landowner" includes a legal owner of private
property, a person with possession or control of private property, or a public
official having jurisdiction over public property.

(8) A
person complying in good faith with the requirements of this section is immune
from any liability arising out of an action taken or omission made in the
compliance.

Sec. 14. RCW 46.63.030 and 1995 c
219 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A law enforcement
officer has the authority to issue a notice of traffic infraction:

(a) When the infraction
is committed in the officer's presence;

(b) When the officer is
acting upon the request of a law enforcement officer in whose presence the
traffic infraction was committed; or

(c) If an officer
investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle accident has reasonable cause to
believe that the driver of a motor vehicle involved in the accident has
committed a traffic infraction.

(2) A court may issue a
notice of traffic infraction upon receipt of a written statement of the officer
that there is reasonable cause to believe that an infraction was committed.

(3) If any motor
vehicle without a driver is found parked, standing, or stopped in violation of
this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance,
regulation, or resolution, the officer finding the vehicle shall take its
registration number and may take any other information displayed on the vehicle
which may identify its user, and shall conspicuously affix to the vehicle a
notice of traffic infraction. In the case of an abandoned vehicle, the
notice must be entitled "Littering‑-Abandoned Vehicle," and
give notice of the monetary penalty.

(4) In the
case of failure to redeem an abandoned vehicle under RCW 46.55.120, upon
receiving a complaint by a registered tow truck operator that has incurred
costs in removing, storing, and disposing of an abandoned vehicle, an officer
of the law enforcement agency responsible for directing the removal of the
vehicle shall send a notice of infraction by certified mail to the last known
address of the registered owner of the vehicle. The officer shall append to
the notice of infraction, on a form prescribed by the department of licensing,
a notice indicating the amount of costs incurred as a result of removing,
storing, and disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less any amount realized at
auction, and a statement that monetary penalties for the infraction will not be
considered as having been paid until the monetary penalty payable under this
chapter has been paid and the court is satisfied that the person has made
restitution in the amount of the deficiency remaining after disposal of the
vehicle.

Sec. 15. RCW 46.63.110 and 2001 c
289 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person found to
have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a monetary penalty. No
penalty may exceed two hundred and fifty dollars for each offense unless
authorized by this chapter or title.

(2) The monetary
penalty for a violation of RCW 46.55.105(2) is two hundred fifty dollars for
each offense. No penalty assessed under this subsection (2) may be reduced.

(3) The supreme
court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of monetary penalties for designated
traffic infractions. This rule shall also specify the conditions under which
local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines and penalties for
traffic infractions. The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court
to adjust this schedule every two years for inflation.

(((3))) (4)
There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a
notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction relates to parking as
defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution or failure to pay a
monetary penalty imposed pursuant to this chapter. A local legislative body
may set a monetary penalty not to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty set by
the local legislative body.

(((4))) (5)
Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are civil in nature
and penalties which may be assessed for violations of chapter 46.44 RCW
relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles are not subject to the
limitation on the amount of monetary penalties which may be imposed pursuant to
this chapter.

(((5))) (6)
Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this chapter it is
immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at that time the court
may, in its discretion, grant an extension of the period in which the penalty
may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on or before the time established for
payment the court shall notify the department of the failure to pay the
penalty, and the department shall suspend the person's driver's license or
driving privilege until the penalty has been paid and the penalty provided in
subsection (((3))) (4) of this section has been paid.

(((6))) (7)
In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section and not subject
to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have
committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a fee of five dollars per
infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be reduced or waived.
Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in
the emergency medical services and trauma care system trust account under RCW
70.168.040.

(((7))) (8)(a)
In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section and not subject
to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have
committed a traffic infraction other than of RCW 46.61.527 shall be assessed an
additional penalty of ten dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend
the additional penalty unless the court finds the offender to be indigent. If
a community service program for offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the
court shall allow offenders to offset all or a part of the penalty due under
this subsection (((7))) (8) by participation in the community
service program.

(b) Revenue
from the additional penalty must be remitted under chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50,
3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted under this subsection to the state
treasurer must be deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250. The balance of the
revenue received by the county or city treasurer under this subsection must be
deposited into the county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the
city or county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any
liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.

---
END ---