BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the health care industry has been led by market forces and government regulation
to consolidate the pricing and billing for services performed by diverse health
care providers. The legislature further finds that one method of attempting to
control rates of growth in health care costs has been to arrange for
compensation of certain health care providers in the form of prepaid, periodic
fees measured by the number of patients in the providers' care, which is called
capitation. The legislature also finds that the public interest is enhanced by
these trends in consolidation and capitated compensation through reduction of
costs and duplicated services. The legislature also finds that, at the same
time, these trends have resulted in a risk of multiplying the business and
occupation tax burdens borne by providers in direct opposition to public
interest in reducing overall health care costs. This risk encourages providers
and health carriers to engage in elaborate tax planning efforts, such that a
single economic model of compensation can result unfairly in unequal tax
consequences. It is therefore desirable to establish that health care
providers who receive capitation are subject to tax only with respect to
compensation they retain for services provided directly by them.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of
this section, the term "capitation" means a fixed payment to a health
care provider as defined in RCW 48.43.005(16), hospital, or any other person
licensed to provide health care services in the state, or to any entity wholly
owned by one or more such persons, to cover the cost of specified health care
services without regard to the type, value, or frequency of the services
provided.

(2) In computing tax
there may be deducted from the measure of tax, by any person who is entitled by
contract or otherwise to receive capitation, amounts derived from capitation
that are paid directly or indirectly to other persons as compensation for
health care services provided by these other persons.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---