BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Motorized foot
scooter" means a device with no more than two ten-inch or smaller diameter
wheels that has handlebars, is designed to be stood or sat upon by the
operator, and is powered by an internal combustion engine or electric motor
that is capable of propelling the device with or without human propulsion.

For purposes of this
section, a motor-driven cycle, a moped, an electric-assisted bicycle, or a
motorcycle is not a motorized foot scooter.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.04.332 and 1979
ex.s. c 213 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

"Motor-driven
cycle" means every motorcycle, including every motor scooter, with a motor
((which)) that produces not to exceed five brake horsepower
(developed by a prime mover, as measured by a brake applied to the driving
shaft). A motor-driven cycle does not include a moped or a motorized foot
scooter.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.16.010 and 2000 c
229 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for
a person to operate any vehicle over and along a public highway of this state
without first having obtained and having in full force and effect a current and
proper vehicle license and display vehicle license number plates therefor as by
this chapter provided. Failure to make initial registration before operation
on the highways of this state is a misdemeanor, and any person convicted
thereof must be punished by a fine of no less than three hundred thirty
dollars, no part of which may be suspended or deferred.

Failure to renew an
expired registration before operation on the highways of this state is a
traffic infraction.

(2) The licensing of a
vehicle in another state by a resident of this state, as defined in RCW
46.16.028, evading the payment of any tax or license fee imposed in connection
with registration, is a gross misdemeanor punishable as follows:

(a) For a first
offense, up to one year in the county jail and a fine equal to twice the amount
of delinquent taxes and fees, no part of which may be suspended or deferred;

(b) For a second or
subsequent offense, up to one year in the county jail and a fine equal to four
times the amount of delinquent taxes and fees, no part of which may be
suspended or deferred;

(c) For fines levied
under (b) of this subsection, an amount equal to the avoided taxes and fees
owed will be deposited in the vehicle licensing fraud account created in the
state treasury;

(d) The avoided taxes
and fees shall be deposited and distributed in the same manner as if the taxes
and fees were properly paid in a timely fashion.

(3) These provisions
shall not apply to the following vehicles:

(a) Motorized foot
scooters;

(b)
Electric-assisted bicycles;

(((b))) (c)
Farm vehicles if operated within a radius of fifteen miles of the farm where
principally used or garaged, farm tractors and farm implements including
trailers designed as cook or bunk houses used exclusively for animal herding
temporarily operating or drawn upon the public highways, and trailers used
exclusively to transport farm implements from one farm to another during the
daylight hours or at night when such equipment has lights that comply with the
law;

(((c))) (d)
Spray or fertilizer applicator rigs designed and used exclusively for spraying
or fertilization in the conduct of agricultural operations and not primarily
for the purpose of transportation, and nurse rigs or equipment auxiliary to the
use of and designed or modified for the fueling, repairing, or loading of spray
and fertilizer applicator rigs and not used, designed, or modified primarily
for the purpose of transportation;

(((d))) (e)
Fork lifts operated during daylight hours on public highways adjacent to and
within five hundred feet of the warehouses which they serve: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That these provisions shall not apply to vehicles used by the state parks and
recreation commission exclusively for park maintenance and operations upon
public highways within state parks;

(((e))) (f)
"Special highway construction equipment" defined as follows: Any
vehicle which is designed and used primarily for grading of highways, paving of
highways, earth moving, and other construction work on highways and which is
not designed or used primarily for the transportation of persons or property on
a public highway and which is only incidentally operated or moved over the
highway. It includes, but is not limited to, road construction and maintenance
machinery so designed and used such as portable air compressors, air drills,
asphalt spreaders, bituminous mixers, bucket loaders, track laying tractors,
ditchers, leveling graders, finishing machines, motor graders, paving mixers,
road rollers, scarifiers, earth moving scrapers and carryalls, lighting plants,
welders, pumps, power shovels and draglines, self-propelled and tractor-drawn
earth moving equipment and machinery, including dump trucks and tractor-dump
trailer combinations which either (i) are in excess of the legal width, or (ii)
which, because of their length, height, or unladen weight, may not be moved on
a public highway without the permit specified in RCW 46.44.090 and which are
not operated laden except within the boundaries of the project limits as
defined by the contract, and other similar types of construction equipment, or
(iii) which are driven or moved upon a public highway only for the purpose of
crossing such highway from one property to another, provided such movement does
not exceed five hundred feet and the vehicle is equipped with wheels or pads
which will not damage the roadway surface.

Exclusions:

"Special highway
construction equipment" does not include any of the following:

Dump trucks originally
designed to comply with the legal size and weight provisions of this code
notwithstanding any subsequent modification which would require a permit, as
specified in RCW 46.44.090, to operate such vehicles on a public highway,
including trailers, truck-mounted transit mixers, cranes and shovels, or other
vehicles designed for the transportation of persons or property to which
machinery has been attached.

(4) The following
vehicles, whether operated solo or in combination, are exempt from license
registration and displaying license plates as required by this chapter:

(a) A converter gear
used to convert a semitrailer into a trailer or a two-axle truck or tractor
into a three or more axle truck or tractor or used in any other manner to increase
the number of axles of a vehicle. Converter gear includes an auxiliary axle,
booster axle, dolly, and jeep axle.

(b) A tow dolly that is
used for towing a motor vehicle behind another motor vehicle. The front or
rear wheels of the towed vehicle are secured to and rest on the tow dolly that
is attached to the towing vehicle by a tow bar.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.20.500 and 1999 c
274 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

No person may drive a
motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle unless such person has a valid driver's
license specially endorsed by the director to enable the holder to drive such
vehicles. However, a person sixteen years of age or older, holding a valid
driver's license of any class issued by the state of the person's residence,
may operate a moped without taking any special examination for the operation of
a moped. No driver's license is required for operation of an electric-assisted
bicycle if the operator is at least sixteen years of age. Persons under sixteen
years of age may not operate an electric-assisted bicycle. No driver's
license is required to operate a motorized foot scooter. Motorized foot
scooters may not be operated at any time from a half hour after sunset to a
half hour before sunrise without reflectors of a type approved by the state
patrol.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.61.710 and 1997 c
328 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person shall
operate a moped upon the highways of this state unless the moped has been assigned
a moped registration number and displays a moped permit in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 46.16.630.

(2) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, a moped may not be operated on a bicycle path or trail,
bikeway, equestrian trail, or hiking or recreational trail.

(3) Operation of a
moped or an electric-assisted bicycle on a fully controlled limited access
highway or on a sidewalk is unlawful.

(4) Removal of any
muffling device or pollution control device from a moped is unlawful.

(5) Subsections (1),
(2), and (4) of this section do not apply to electric-assisted bicycles and
motorized foot scooters. Electric-assisted bicycles and motorized foot
scooters may have access to highways of the state to the same extent as
bicycles. Electric-assisted bicycles and motorized foot scooters may be
operated on a multipurpose trail or bicycle lane, but local jurisdictions may
restrict or otherwise limit the access of electric-assisted bicycles, and
state parks may regulate the use of motorized scooters within boundaries of the
parks.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.81A.010 and 1988
c 227 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Motorcycle
skills education program" means a motorcycle rider skills training program
to be administered by the department.

(2)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(3)
"Director" means the director of licensing.

(4)
"Motorcycle" means a motorcycle licensed under chapter 46.16 RCW, and
does not include motorized bicycles, mopeds, scooters, motorized foot
scooters, off-road motorcycles, motorized tricycles, side-car equipped
motorcycles, or four-wheel all-terrain vehicles.

---
END ---