BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding
home rule charter provisions to the contrary, any reference in a home rule
charter to grants of authority to a legislative authority must be construed to
mean grants of authority to the county.

(2) This
section only applies to counties with a population in excess of one million
five hundred thousand.

--- END ---