BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 50.20.120 and 1993 c
483 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Subject
to the other provisions of this title, benefits shall be payable to any
eligible individual during the individual's benefit year in a maximum amount
equal to the lesser of thirty times the weekly benefit amount (determined
hereinafter) or one-third of the individual's base year wages under this
title((: PROVIDED, That as to)). However, maximum benefits may
exceed this amount if the eligible individual's unemployment is due to a
lockout by his or her employer, in which case benefits shall be payable in a
maximum amount equal to sixty times the weekly benefit amount or until the
lockout is terminated, whichever occurs first.

(b) For any week
beginning on and after March 31, 1981, which falls in an extended benefit
period as defined in RCW 50.22.010(1), ((as now or hereafter amended,))
an individual's eligibility for maximum benefits in excess of twenty-six times
his or her weekly benefit amount will be subject to the terms and conditions
set forth in RCW 50.22.020((, as now or hereafter amended)).

(2) An individual's
weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal to one twenty-fifth of the
average quarterly wages of the individual's total wages during the two quarters
of the individual's base year in which such total wages were highest. The
maximum and minimum amounts payable weekly shall be determined as of each June
30th to apply to benefit years beginning in the twelve-month period immediately
following such June 30th. The maximum amount payable weekly shall be seventy
percent of the "average weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding
such June 30th. The minimum amount payable weekly shall be fifteen percent of
the "average weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding such June
30th. If any weekly benefit, maximum benefit, or minimum benefit amount
computed herein is not a multiple of one dollar, it shall be reduced to the
next lower multiple of one dollar.

Sec. 2. RCW 50.04.030 and 1991 c
117 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Benefit year" with respect to each individual, means the fifty-two
consecutive week period beginning with the first day of the calendar week in
which the individual files an application for an initial determination and
thereafter the fifty-two consecutive week period beginning with the first day
of the calendar week in which the individual next files an application for an
initial determination after the expiration of the individual's last preceding benefit
year: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the foregoing limitation shall not be deemed to
preclude the establishment of a new benefit year under the laws of another
state pursuant to any agreement providing for the interstate combining of
employment and wages and the interstate payment of benefits nor shall this
limitation be deemed to preclude the commissioner from backdating an initial
application at the request of the claimant either for the convenience of the
department of employment security or for any other reason deemed by the
commissioner to be good cause.

(2) An
individual's benefit year shall be extended to:

(a) Be
fifty-three weeks when at the expiration of fifty-two weeks the establishment
of a new benefit year would result in the use of a quarter of wages in the new
base year that had been included in the individual's prior base year; or

(b) The termination
of the lockout or until benefits in a maximum amount of sixty times the weekly
benefit amount are paid, whichever occurs first, if, at the expiration of the
fifty-two weeks, the individual's benefits continue to be payable under RCW
50.20.120(1)(a) due to a lockout.

(3)(a) No
benefit year will be established unless it is determined that the individual
earned wages in "employment" in not less than six hundred eighty
hours of the individual's base year: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a benefit year
cannot be established if the base year wages include wages earned prior to the
establishment of a prior benefit year unless the individual worked and earned wages
since the last separation from employment immediately before the application
for initial determination in the previous benefit year if the applicant was an
unemployed individual at the time of application, or since the initial
separation in the previous benefit year if the applicant was not an unemployed
individual at the time of filing an application for initial determination for
the previous benefit year, of not less than six times the weekly benefit amount
computed for the individual's new benefit year.

(b) If an
individual's prior benefit year was based on the last four completed calendar
quarters, a new benefit year shall not be established until the new base year
does not include any hours used in the establishment of the prior benefit year.

(4) If the wages
of an individual are not based upon a fixed duration of time or if the
individual's wages are paid at irregular intervals or in such manner as not to
extend regularly over the period of employment, the wages for any week shall be
determined in such manner as the commissioner may by regulation prescribe.
Such regulation shall, so far as possible, secure results reasonably similar to
those which would prevail if the individual were paid his or her wages at
regular intervals.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added to
chapter 50.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with rate
year 2002, if unemployment benefits are paid to claimants in any calendar
quarter that exceed the maximum benefit amount under RCW 50.20.120(1)(a) due to
a lockout by the employer, and the employer is assigned the contribution rate
of rate class 20 under RCW 50.29.025, or is assigned the contribution rate
under RCW 50.29.025(6)(a), for the rate year that includes that calendar
quarter, the employer's contributions for that calendar quarter under RCW
50.24.010 shall equal the total of the following:

(a) The amount of
contributions determined under RCW 50.29.025;

(b) An amount equal to
the full amount of benefits paid in the calendar quarter to the locked out
claimants less the amount paid under (a) of this subsection; and

(c) The amount of the
costs related to administering the benefits paid to the locked out claimants
not otherwise paid or payable from federal funds.

(2) At the end of each
calendar quarter, the commissioner shall notify employers subject to this
section, and shall include in each employer's contribution notice for the
calendar quarter a billing for the amount determined under this section.
Contributions shall become due and be paid as prescribed by the commissioner
for contributions under RCW 50.24.010.

(3) RCW 50.29.062 shall
not apply to employers subject to this section. For purposes of RCW 50.24.010,
the contribution rate of a successor employer to an employer subject to this
section shall be the contribution rate of the rate class assigned to the
predecessor employer at the time of the transfer for the remainder of that rate
year. Any experience relating to the assignment of that rate class attributable
to the predecessor is transferred to the successor. Beginning on the January
1st following the transfer, the successor's assigned contribution rate for
purposes of RCW 50.24.010 shall be based on the transferred experience of the
acquired business and the successor's experience after the transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. If any part of this act
is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the conflicting
part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and the
finding or determination does not affect the operation of the remainder of this
act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a
necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state or the
granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act applies to
claimants who were locked out by their employers after January 1, 2002. A
claimant who exhausted benefits before the effective date of this section has
the option of remaining on the original claim or filing a new claim.

---
END ---