BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 26.09.120 and 1994 c
230 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court shall
order support payments, including spousal maintenance if child support is
ordered, to be made to the Washington state support registry, ((or)) unless
the responsible parent petitions the court to make the payment to the
person entitled to receive the payments under an order approved by the court as
provided in RCW 26.23.050.

(2) Maintenance
payments, when ordered in an action where there is no dependent child, may be
ordered to be paid to the person entitled to receive the payments, or the clerk
of the court as trustee for remittance to the persons entitled to receive the
payments.

(3) If support or
maintenance payments are made to the clerk of court, the clerk:

(a) Shall maintain
records listing the amount of payments, the date when payments are required to
be made, and the names and addresses of the parties affected by the order;

(b) May by local court
rule accept only certified funds or cash as payment; and

(c) Shall accept only
certified funds or cash for five years in all cases after one check has been
returned for nonsufficient funds or account closure.

(4) The parties
affected by the order shall inform the registry through which the payments are
ordered to be paid of any change of address or of other conditions that may
affect the administration of the order.

Sec. 2. RCW 26.23.050 and 2001 c
42 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the division of
child support is providing support enforcement services under RCW 26.23.045, or
if a party is applying for support enforcement services by signing the
application form on the bottom of the support order, the superior court shall
include in all court orders that establish or modify a support obligation:

(a) A provision that orders
and directs the responsible parent to make all support payments to the
Washington state support registry;

(b) A statement that
withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits,
and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support
statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the responsible
parent at any time after entry of the court order, unless:

(i) One of the parties
demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require
immediate income withholding and that withholding should be delayed until a
payment is past due; or

(ii) The parties reach
a written agreement that is approved by the court that provides for an
alternate arrangement;

(c) A statement that the
receiving parent ((might be required to)) shall submit an
accounting each month to the division of child support, including receipts,
of how the support is being spent to benefit the child; and

(d) A statement that
the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and maintain a license, as
defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the
parent is not in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320.

As used in this
subsection and subsection (3) of this section, "good cause not to require
immediate income withholding" means a written determination of why
implementing immediate wage withholding would not be in the child's best
interests and, in modification cases, proof of timely payment of previously
ordered support.

(2) In all other cases
not under subsection (1) of this section, the court may order the responsible
parent to make payments directly to the person entitled to receive the
payments, to the Washington state support registry, or may order that payments
be made in accordance with an alternate arrangement agreed upon by the parties.

(a) The superior court
shall include in all orders under this subsection that establish or modify a
support obligation:

(i) A statement that
withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits,
and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support
statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the responsible
parent at any time after entry of the court order, unless:

(A) One of the parties
demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require
immediate income withholding and that withholding should be delayed until a
payment is past due; or

(B) The parties reach a
written agreement that is approved by the court that provides for an alternate
arrangement; and

(ii) A statement that
the receiving parent may be required to submit an accounting of how the support
is being spent to benefit the child.

As used in this
subsection, "good cause not to require immediate income withholding"
is any reason that the court finds appropriate.

(b) The superior court
may order immediate or delayed income withholding as follows:

(i) Immediate income
withholding may be ordered if the responsible parent has earnings. If
immediate income withholding is ordered under this subsection, all support
payments shall be paid to the Washington state support registry. The superior
court shall issue a mandatory wage assignment order as set forth in chapter
26.18 RCW when the support order is signed by the court. The parent entitled
to receive the transfer payment is responsible for serving the employer with
the order and for its enforcement as set forth in chapter 26.18 RCW.

(ii) If immediate
income withholding is not ordered, the court shall require that income
withholding be delayed until a payment is past due. The support order shall
contain a statement that withholding action may be taken against wages,
earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal
property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without
further notice to the responsible parent, after a payment is past due.

(c) If a mandatory wage
withholding order under chapter 26.18 RCW is issued under this subsection and
the division of child support provides support enforcement services under RCW
26.23.045, the existing wage withholding assignment is prospectively superseded
upon the division of child support's subsequent service of an income
withholding notice.

(3) The office of
administrative hearings and the department of social and health services shall
require that all support obligations established as administrative orders
include a provision which orders and directs that the responsible parent shall
make all support payments to the Washington state support registry. All
administrative orders shall also state that the responsible parent's privileges
to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be
renewed, or may be suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a support
order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320. All administrative orders shall also
state that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or
benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child
support statutes of this or any other state without further notice to the
responsible parent at any time after entry of the order, unless:

(a) One of the parties
demonstrates, and the presiding officer finds, that there is good cause not to
require immediate income withholding; or

(b) The parties reach a
written agreement that is approved by the presiding officer that provides for
an alternate agreement.

(4) If the support
order does not include the provision ordering and directing that all payments
be made to the Washington state support registry and a statement that
withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits if
a support payment is past due or at any time after the entry of the order, or
that a parent's licensing privileges may not be renewed, or may be suspended,
the division of child support may serve a notice on the responsible parent
stating such requirements and authorizations. Service may be by personal service
or any form of mail requiring a return receipt.

(5) Every support order
shall state:

(a) The address where
the support payment is to be sent;

(b) That withholding
action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens
enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of
this or any other state, without further notice to the responsible parent at
any time after entry of a support order, unless:

(i) One of the parties
demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require
immediate income withholding; or

(ii) The parties reach
a written agreement that is approved by the court that provides for an
alternate arrangement;

(c) The income of the
parties, if known, or that their income is unknown and the income upon which
the support award is based;

(d) The support award
as a sum certain amount;

(e) The specific day or
date on which the support payment is due;

(f) The names and ages
of the dependent children;

(g) A provision
requiring the responsible parent to keep the Washington state support registry
informed of whether he or she has access to health insurance coverage at
reasonable cost and, if so, the health insurance policy information;

(h) That any parent
owing a duty of child support shall be obligated to provide health insurance
coverage for his or her child if coverage that can be extended to cover the
child is or becomes available to that parent through employment or is
union-related as provided under RCW 26.09.105;

(i) That if proof of
health insurance coverage or proof that the coverage is unavailable is not
provided within twenty days, the obligee or the department may seek direct
enforcement of the coverage through the obligor's employer or union without
further notice to the obligor as provided under chapter 26.18 RCW;

(j) The reasons for not
ordering health insurance coverage if the order fails to require such coverage;

(k) That the
responsible parent's privileges to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in
RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the parent is not in
compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320;

(l) That each parent
must:

(i) Promptly file with
the court and update as necessary the confidential information form required by
subsection (7) of this section; and

(ii) Provide the state
case registry and update as necessary the information required by subsection
(7) of this section; and

(m) That parties to
administrative support orders shall provide to the state case registry and
update as necessary their residential addresses and the address of the
responsible parent's employer. The division of child support may adopt rules
that govern the collection of parties' current residence and mailing addresses,
telephone numbers, dates of birth, social security numbers, the names of the
children, social security numbers of the children, dates of birth of the
children, driver's license numbers, and the names, addresses, and telephone
numbers of the parties' employers to enforce an administrative support order.
The division of child support shall not release this information if the
division of child support determines that there is reason to believe that
release of the information may result in physical or emotional harm to the
party or to the child, or a restraining order or protective order is in effect
to protect one party from the other party.

(6) After the
responsible parent has been ordered or notified to make payments to the
Washington state support registry under this section, the responsible parent
shall be fully responsible for making all payments to the Washington state
support registry and shall be subject to payroll deduction or other income‑withholding
action. The responsible parent shall not be entitled to credit against a
support obligation for any payments made to a person or agency other than to
the Washington state support registry except as provided under RCW 74.20.101.
A civil action may be brought by the payor to recover payments made to persons
or agencies who have received and retained support moneys paid contrary to the
provisions of this section.

(7) All petitioners and
parties to all court actions under chapters 26.09, 26.10, 26.12, 26.18, 26.21,
26.23, 26.26, and 26.27 RCW shall complete to the best of their knowledge a
verified and signed confidential information form or equivalent that provides
the parties' current residence and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, dates
of birth, social security numbers, driver's license numbers, and the names,
addresses, and telephone numbers of the parties' employers. The clerk of the
court shall not accept petitions, except in parentage actions initiated by the
state, orders of child support, decrees of dissolution, or paternity orders for
filing in such actions unless accompanied by the confidential information form
or equivalent, or unless the confidential information form or equivalent is
already on file with the court clerk. In lieu of or in addition to requiring
the parties to complete a separate confidential information form, the clerk may
collect the information in electronic form. The clerk of the court shall
transmit the confidential information form or its data to the division of child
support with a copy of the order of child support or paternity order, and may
provide copies of the confidential information form or its data and any related
findings, decrees, parenting plans, orders, or other documents to the state
administrative agency that administers Title IV‑A, IV‑D, or IV‑E
of the federal social security act. In state initiated paternity actions, the
parties adjudicated the parents of the child or children shall complete the
confidential information form or equivalent or the state's attorney of record
may complete that form to the best of the attorney's knowledge.

Sec. 3. RCW 26.23.120 and 1998 c
160 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any information or
records concerning individuals who owe a support obligation or for whom support
enforcement services are being provided which are obtained or maintained by the
Washington state support registry, the division of child support, or under
chapter 74.20 RCW shall be private and confidential and shall only be subject
to public disclosure as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The secretary of
the department of social and health services may adopt rules:

(a) That specify what
information is confidential;

(b) That specify the
individuals or agencies to whom this information and these records may be
disclosed;

(c) Limiting the
purposes for which the information may be disclosed;

(d) Establishing
procedures to obtain the information or records; or

(e) Establishing
safeguards necessary to comply with federal law requiring safeguarding of
information.

(3) The rules adopted
under subsection (2) of this section shall provide for disclosure of the
information and records, under appropriate circumstances, which shall include,
but not be limited to:

(a) The division of
child support shall send the responsible parent, upon written request, copies
of all receipts every six months;

(b) When
authorized or required by federal statute or regulation governing the support
enforcement program;

(((b))) (c)
To the person the subject of the records or information, unless the information
is exempt from disclosure under RCW 42.17.310;

(((c))) (d)
To government agencies, whether state, local, or federal, and including
federally recognized tribes, law enforcement agencies, prosecuting agencies,
and the executive branch, if the disclosure is necessary for child support
enforcement purposes or required under Title IV-D of the federal social
security act;

(((d))) (e)
To the parties in a judicial or adjudicative proceeding upon a specific written
finding by the presiding officer that the need for the information outweighs
any reason for maintaining the privacy and confidentiality of the information
or records;

(((e))) (f)
To private persons, federally recognized tribes, or organizations if the
disclosure is necessary to permit private contracting parties to assist in the
management and operation of the department;

(((f))) (g)
Disclosure of address and employment information to the parties to an action
for purposes relating to a child support order, subject to the limitations in
subsections (4) and (5) of this section;

(((g))) (h)
Disclosure of information or records when necessary to the efficient
administration of the support enforcement program or to the performance of
functions and responsibilities of the support registry and the division of
child support as set forth in state and federal statutes; or

(((h))) (i)
Disclosure of the information or records when authorized under RCW 74.04.060.

(4) Prior to disclosing
the whereabouts of a physical custodian, custodial parent or a child to the
other parent or party, a notice shall be mailed, if appropriate under the
circumstances, to the parent or physical custodian whose whereabouts are to be
disclosed, at that person's last known address. The notice shall advise the
parent or physical custodian that a request for disclosure has been made and
will be complied with unless the department:

(a) Receives a copy of
a court order within thirty days which enjoins the disclosure of the
information or restricts or limits the requesting party's right to contact or
visit the parent or party whose address is to be disclosed or the child;

(b) Receives a hearing
request within thirty days under subsection (5) of this section; or

(c) Has reason to
believe that the release of the information may result in physical or emotional
harm to the physical custodian whose whereabouts are to be released, or to the
child.

(5) A person receiving
notice under subsection (4) of this section may request an adjudicative
proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW, at which the person may show that there is
reason to believe that release of the information may result in physical or
emotional harm to the person or the child. The administrative law judge shall
determine whether the whereabouts of the person or child should be disclosed
based on subsection (4)(c) of this section, however no hearing is necessary if
the department has in its possession a protective order or an order limiting
visitation or contact.

(6) The notice and
hearing process in subsections (4) and (5) of this section do not apply to
protect the whereabouts of a noncustodial parent, unless that parent has
requested notice before whereabouts information is released. A noncustodial
parent may request such notice by submitting a written request to the division
of child support.

(7) Nothing in this
section shall be construed as limiting or restricting the effect of RCW
42.17.260(9). Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the
disclosure of information and records if all details identifying an individual
are deleted or the individual consents to the disclosure.

(8) It
shall be unlawful for any person or agency in violation of this section to
solicit, publish, disclose, receive, make use of, or to authorize, knowingly
permit, participate in or acquiesce in the use of any lists of names for commercial
or political purposes or the use of any information for purposes other than
those purposes specified in this section. A violation of this section shall be
a gross misdemeanor as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

---
END ---