BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.88A.020 and 1994
c 219 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office
of financial management shall, in cooperation with appropriate legislative
committees and legislative staff, establish a procedure for the provision of
fiscal notes ((on)) which analyze:

(a) The expected
impact of bills and resolutions ((which)) that increase or
decrease or tend to increase or decrease state government revenues or
expenditures. ((Such)) These fiscal notes shall indicate by
fiscal year the impact for the remainder of the biennium in which the bill or
resolution will first take effect as well as a cumulative forecast of the
fiscal impact for the succeeding four fiscal years. Fiscal notes shall
separately identify the fiscal impacts on the operating and capital budgets.
Estimates of fiscal impacts shall be calculated using the procedures contained
in the fiscal note instructions issued by the office of financial management;
and

(b) The expected
impact of bills and resolutions that increase or decrease or tend to increase
or decrease Washington business revenues or expenditures. "Washington
business" means a sole proprietorship or business organization doing
business in Washington, regardless of where it is domiciled. The competitive
impact analysis shall include the following:

(i) The office's
determination of whether the bill or resolution may have an economic impact on
Washington business;

(ii) To the extent
practicable, the office's determination of whether, and to what amount, the
bill or resolution may increase or decrease the revenues or expenditures of
Washington business in general, including a narrative identifying the source of
the effect;

(iii) To the extent
practicable, the office's determination of which segments of Washington
business may be affected in particular; and

(iv) Any other
information the office considers relevant to fully explaining the economic
impact the bill or resolution may have on Washington business.

(2)
In establishing the fiscal impact called for pursuant to this chapter, the
office of financial management shall coordinate the development of fiscal notes
with all state agencies affected.

--- END ---