BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.135.025 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 2 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state shall not
expend from the general fund during any fiscal year state moneys in excess of
the state expenditure limit established under this chapter.

(2) Except pursuant to
a declaration of emergency under RCW 43.135.035 or pursuant to an appropriation
under RCW 43.135.045(4)(b), the state treasurer shall not issue or redeem any
check, warrant, or voucher that will result in a state general fund expenditure
for any fiscal year in excess of the state expenditure limit established under
this chapter. A violation of this subsection constitutes a violation of RCW
43.88.290 and shall subject the state treasurer to the penalties provided in
RCW 43.88.300.

(3) The state
expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the previous fiscal year's state
expenditure limit increased by a percentage rate that equals the fiscal growth
factor.

(4) For purposes of
computing the state expenditure limit for the fiscal year beginning July 1,
1995, the phrase "the previous fiscal year's state expenditure limit"
means the total state expenditures from the state general fund, not including
federal funds, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1989, plus the fiscal
growth factor. This calculation is then computed for the state expenditure
limit for fiscal years 1992, 1993, 1994, and 1995, and as required under RCW
43.135.035(4).

(5) A state expenditure
limit committee is established for the purpose of determining and adjusting the
state expenditure limit as provided in this chapter. The six members of
the state expenditure limit committee are the director of financial management,
the attorney general or the attorney general's designee, and the chairs and
ranking minority members of the senate committee on ways and means and the
house of representatives committee on appropriations. All actions of the state
expenditure limit committee taken pursuant to this chapter require an
affirmative vote of at least ((three)) four members.

(6) Each November, the
state expenditure limit committee shall adjust the expenditure limit for the
preceding fiscal year based on actual expenditures and known changes in the
fiscal growth factor and then project an expenditure limit for the next two
fiscal years. If, by November 30th, the state expenditure limit committee has
not adopted the expenditure limit adjustment and projected expenditure limit as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, the attorney general or his or her
designee shall adjust or project the expenditure limit, as necessary.

(7) "Fiscal growth
factor" means the average of the sum of inflation and population change
for each of the prior three fiscal years.

(8)
"Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for the United States for each fiscal year as published by the federal
bureau of labor statistics.

(9) "Population
change" means the percentage change in state population for each fiscal
year as reported by the office of financial management.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.135.035 and 2001
c 3 s 8 (Initiative Measure No. 728) and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) After July 1, 1995,
any action or combination of actions by the legislature that raises state tax
revenue to any fund or account or requires revenue-neutral tax shifts
may be taken only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each house, and then only
if state expenditures in any fiscal year, including the new revenue, will not
exceed the state expenditure limits established under this chapter.

(2)(a) If the
legislative action under subsection (1) of this section will result in
expenditures in excess of the state expenditure limit, then the action of the
legislature shall not take effect until approved by a vote of the people at a
November general election. The office of financial management shall adjust the
state expenditure limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the
voters under this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of
revenue generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year in
which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be adjusted downward
upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.

(b) The ballot title
for any vote of the people required under this section shall be substantially
as follows:

"Shall taxes be
imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for inflation
and population increases?"

(3)(a) The state
expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration of an emergency for a period
not to exceed twenty-four months by a law approved by a two-thirds vote of each
house of the legislature and signed by the governor. The law shall set forth
the nature of the emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require
immediate government action to alleviate human suffering and provide
humanitarian assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded for no
more than twenty-four months following the declaration of the emergency and
only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.

(b) Additional taxes
required for an emergency under this section may be imposed only until thirty
days following the next general election, unless an extension is approved at
that general election. The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of
the declaration of emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional
taxes for emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the
education construction fund have been exhausted.

(c) The state or any
political subdivision of the state shall not impose any tax on intangible
property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that statute exists on January 1, 1993.

(4) If the cost of any
state program or function is shifted from the state general fund on or after
January 1, 1993, to another source of funding, or if moneys are transferred
from the state general fund to another fund or account, the state expenditure
limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state
expenditure limit to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a
transfer of money from the state general fund to another fund or account
includes any state legislative action taken after July 1, 2000, that has the
effect of reducing revenues from a particular source, where such revenues would
otherwise be deposited into the state general fund, while increasing the
revenues from that particular source to another state or local government
account. For the purposes of this section, a shift of state program costs
includes the shift of any portion of the program's cost, including the shift of
the cost of any future growth in the program. This subsection does not
apply to the dedication or use of lottery revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3) or
property taxes under RCW 84.52.068, in support of education or education
expenditures.

(5) If the cost of any
state program or function ((is)) and the ongoing revenue necessary to
fund the program or function are shifted to the state general fund on or
after January 1, ((2000, from another source of funding, or if moneys are
transferred to the state general fund from another fund or account)) 2002,
the state expenditure limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5),
shall increase the state expenditure limit to reflect the shift.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.135.045 and 2001
c 3 s 9 (Initiative Measure No. 728), 2000 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 1, and 2000 2nd
sp.s. c 2 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The emergency
reserve fund is established in the state treasury. During each fiscal year,
the state treasurer shall deposit in the emergency reserve fund all general
fund‑-state revenues in excess of the state expenditure limit for that
fiscal year. Deposits shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter based on
projections of state revenues and the state expenditure limit. The treasurer
shall make transfers between these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual
annual revenues and the expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and thereafter.

(2) The legislature may
appropriate moneys from the emergency reserve fund only with approval of at
least two-thirds of the members of each house of the legislature, and then only
if the appropriation does not cause total expenditures to exceed the state
expenditure limit under this chapter. However, the legislature may
appropriate moneys from the emergency reserve fund with the approval of a
majority of the members of each house of the legislature if, for the fiscal
biennium for which the appropriation is made, the general fund‑-state
revenues are forecasted under chapter 82.33 RCW to be more than one percent
less than general fund‑-state revenues for the immediately preceding
fiscal biennium.

(3) The emergency
reserve fund balance shall not exceed five percent of ((annual)) biennial
general fund‑-state revenues as projected by the official state revenue
forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent shall be transferred on a
quarterly basis by the state treasurer as follows: Seventy-five percent to the
student achievement fund hereby created in the state treasury and twenty-five
percent to the general fund balance. The treasurer shall make transfers
between these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues for
fiscal year 2000 and thereafter. When per-student state funding for the
maintenance and operation of K-12 education meets a level of no less than
ninety percent of the national average of total funding from all sources per
student as determined by the most recent published data from the national
center for education statistics of the United States department of education,
as calculated by the office of financial management, further deposits to the
student achievement fund shall be required only to the extent necessary to
maintain the ninety-percent level. Remaining funds are part of the general
fund balance and these funds are subject to the expenditure limits of this
chapter.

(4) The education
construction fund is hereby created in the state treasury.

(a) Funds may be
appropriated from the education construction fund exclusively for common school
construction or higher education construction.

(b) Funds may be
appropriated for any other purpose only if approved by a two-thirds vote of
each house of the legislature and if approved by a vote of the people at the
next general election. An appropriation approved by the people under this
subsection shall result in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only
for the fiscal period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect
any subsequent fiscal period.

(5) Funds from the
student achievement fund shall be appropriated to the superintendent of public
instruction strictly for distribution to school districts to meet the
provisions set out in the student achievement act. Allocations shall be made
on an equal per full-time equivalent student basis to each school district.

(6) Earnings of the
emergency reserve fund under RCW 43.84.092(4)(a) shall be transferred quarterly
to the multimodal transportation account, except for those earnings that are in
excess of thirty-five million dollars each fiscal year. Within thirty days
following any fiscal year in which earnings transferred to the multimodal
transportation account under this subsection did not total thirty-five million
dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer from the emergency reserve fund an
amount necessary to bring the total deposited in the multimodal transportation
account under this subsection to thirty-five million dollars. The revenues to
the multimodal transportation account reflected in this subsection provide
ongoing support for the transportation programs of the state. However, it is
the intent of the legislature that any new long-term financial support that may
be subsequently provided for transportation programs will be used to replace and
supplant the revenues reflected in this subsection, thereby allowing those
revenues to be returned to the purposes to which they were previously
dedicated.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.135.060 and 1998
c 321 s 15 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After July 1, 1995,
the legislature shall not impose responsibility for new programs or increased
levels of service under existing programs on any political subdivision of the
state unless the subdivision is fully reimbursed by the state for the costs of
the new programs or increases in service levels. Reimbursement by the state
may be made by: (a) A specific appropriation; or (b) increases in state
distributions of revenue to political subdivisions occurring after January 1,
1998.

(2) If by order of any
court, or legislative enactment, the costs of a specifically identified
federal or local government program are transferred to or from the state, the
otherwise applicable state expenditure limit shall be increased or decreased,
as the case may be, by the dollar amount of the costs of the program.

(3) The legislature, in
consultation with the office of financial management or its successor agency,
shall determine the costs of any new programs or increased levels of service
under existing programs imposed on any political subdivision or transferred to
or from the state.

(4) Subsection (1) of
this section does not apply to the costs incurred for voting devices or
machines under RCW 29.04.200.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The secretary of state
shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or
rejection, at the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance
with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

---
END ---