BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that:

(a) City gross receipts
taxes are complicated and inconsistent from city to city;

(b) Cities whose
ordinances do not include apportionment provisions have been required to
resolve potential instances of multiple taxation on a case-by-case basis; and

(c) Cities have had and
should retain the flexibility to tailor their tax structures to meet unique
needs, but that flexibility must be balanced with predictability and ease of
administration of city taxes.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature to:

(a) Require cities that
impose a gross receipts tax to adopt a model ordinance that creates greater
uniformity and consistency among city gross receipts taxes;

(b) Make city gross
receipts business and occupation taxes simpler, more predictable, and easier to
administer;

(c) Eliminate multiple
taxation of the same gross income; and

(d) Establish methods
for fair apportionment of gross income of businesses between and among local
jurisdictions when a business is engaging in business in more than one local
jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise:

(1)
"Business" has the same meaning as that provided in RCW 82.04.140.

(2) "City"
means a city, town, or code city.

(3) "Business and
occupation tax" or "gross receipts tax" means a tax which is
imposed on or measured by the value of products, the gross income of the
business, or the gross proceeds of sales, as the case may be and which is also
not, pursuant to law or custom, separately stated from the sales price. As
used in this subsection and throughout this chapter, the terms "value of
products," "gross income of the business," and "gross
proceeds of sales" have the same meaning as those provided in chapter
82.04 RCW.

(4) "Local
jurisdiction" means any city, town, code city, county, municipal district
or corporation, political subdivision, Indian reservation, or federal area
located in the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The director of the
department of revenue shall appoint a special committee consisting of tax
administrators from a representative sampling of cities that currently apply a
gross receipts tax. The director shall ensure that the members of the special
committee are balanced between small, medium, and large cities. The director
shall seek nominations for the special committee from the largest statewide
association representing cities.

(2) The special
committee shall, by November 1, 2002, develop a model resolution and ordinance
regarding the prospective implementation of local gross receipts taxes.

(3) To ensure ease of
administration and compliance, the special committee shall draft a model
ordinance that provides for a uniform system of city gross receipts taxation.
In drafting the model ordinance, the special committee shall, at a minimum,
include:

(a) The following core
definitions from the state business and occupation tax: RCW 82.04.030
("Person," "company."); RCW 82.04.040 ("Sale,"
"casual or isolated sale."); RCW 82.04.050 ("Sale at
retail," "retail sale."); RCW 82.04.060 ("Sale at
wholesale," "wholesale price."); RCW 82.04.070 ("Gross
proceeds of sales."); RCW 82.04.080 ("Gross income of the
business."); RCW 82.04.090 ("Value proceeding or accruing.");
RCW 82.04.100 ("Extractor."); RCW 82.04.110
("Manufacturer."); RCW 82.04.120 ("To manufacture."); RCW
82.04.130 ("Commercial or industrial use."); RCW 82.04.140
("Business."); and RCW 82.04.150 ("Engaging in business.")
The incorporation of these core definitions in the model ordinance shall be
construed to include, as an extension of each definition, any state level
determination, regulation, interpretation, or court opinion pertaining to any
one of these definitions. In addition, if the model ordinance or an individual
city uses a classification, exemption, deduction or credit substantially
similar to one set forth in the state's gross receipts tax system, the
definitions used for the classification, exemption, deduction, or credit shall
be identical to those provided in the state's gross receipts tax system.
However, this subsection shall not be construed to limit any individual city's
flexibility to establish its own classifications or rate structures for gross
receipts tax purposes subject to the provisions of RCW 35.21.710 nor shall it
be construed to reduce, limit, or eliminate a city's ability to continue to tax
an activity at a rate established for an activity prior to January 1, 2002,
pursuant to either a gross receipts tax or utility tax.

(b) Uniform due dates.

(c) Reasonable rates of
interest to be applied to tax assessments, underpayments of tax, and refunds of
tax.

(d) Reasonable
penalties for the failure to timely file a tax return, the late payment of a
tax assessment, the disregard of specific, written instructions from the taxing
entity, and the intent to evade tax. However, the aggregate of penalties
imposed for the failure to timely file a tax return, the late payment of a tax
assessment, or the disregard of specific, written instructions from the taxing
entity shall not exceed thirty-five percent of the tax due, or twenty dollars,
whichever is greater. In addition, no taxing entity shall apply both the
penalty for intent to evade tax and the penalty for disregard of specific
written instructions. To the extent feasible, the penalty provisions provided
for in chapter 82.32 RCW should guide the special committee.

(e) A uniform statute
of limitation period for both assessments of additional taxes, penalties, and
interest and refunds or credits of overpaid taxes, penalties, and interest. In
establishing the uniform statute of limitation periods under this subsection,
the special committee shall not establish a statute of limitation period that
exceeds the equivalent of four years plus the current tax year. However, if it
can be shown that the taxpayer did not properly register with the taxing
authority, the special committee may provide for a statute of limitation in
this instance of no more than seven years plus the current tax year. In the
circumstance where it can be shown that the taxpayer engaged in fraudulent
activities with respect to its tax liability, the statute of limitation
provided pursuant to this subsection (3)(e) need not apply. The special
committee shall provide for the written waiver of these statutes of limitation
upon mutual agreement between the taxpayer and the taxing authority, but a
written waiver shall extend, identically, the period for making assessments and
claiming refunds.

(f) Provisions for the
fair apportionment of gross income that will eliminate any circumstance that
would result in a city or multiple cities imposing tax on greater than one
hundred percent of the gross income of the business. Upon the effective date
of this section, the model ordinance shall not contain any provisions regarding
apportionment or allocation of gross income.

(g) A uniform, minimum
small business tax exemption of at least the equivalent of twenty-five thousand
dollars in gross income. A city may elect to deviate from this requirement by
creating a higher threshold, but it shall not deviate lower than the level
required in this subsection (3)(g).

(4) Upon completion of
the model ordinance by the special committee, the department of revenue shall,
by rule, propose the formal adoption of the model ordinance in conformance with
chapter 34.05 RCW. In publishing the rule under this subsection (4), the
department shall include a section noting any instance where the model
ordinance deviates from the state gross receipts tax and for each deviation,
shall provide an explanatory statement setting forth the rationale for the
deviation.

(5) By January 1, 2003,
a city levying a gross receipts tax shall, at a minimum, adopt the provisions
of the model ordinance that were mandated by subsection (3)(a) through (g) of
this section. While it is the intent of the legislature in this subsection (5)
to allow some deviation from the nonmandatory provisions of the model
ordinance, cities are encouraged to deviate as little as possible from the
nonmandatory portions of the model ordinance to maintain the highest degree of
uniformity among the cities imposing a gross receipts tax. If deviations from
the nonmandatory provisions of the model ordinance are made by a city, the
deviation should be noted along with an explanatory statement regarding the
deviation and both the deviation and the explanatory statement shall then be
placed in a centralized depository such as the municipal research services
center to provide taxpayers with quick access to all deviations.

(6) When changes are
made to the state's gross receipts tax that would require changes to the
mandatory requirements of the model ordinance provided under subsection (3) of
this section, the department of revenue shall reconvene a special committee
using the same criteria as provided in subsection (1) of this section. The
special committee formed under this subsection shall update the model ordinance
where required to conform to the requirements of subsection (3) of this section.
The department of revenue shall then readopt, by rule, the model ordinance with
any changes required under this subsection by December 1 of each year and a
city imposing a gross receipts tax shall adopt the changes by January 1 of the
following year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) For the purposes of
apportioning or allocating gross income of the business for city gross receipts
taxes:

(a) The total tax
measure apportioned or allocated to all applicable local jurisdictions shall
not exceed the total tax measure computed for the purpose of state gross
receipts taxation.

(b) All state and
federal constitutional provisions and laws pertaining to the establishment of
nexus for the taxation of interstate commerce shall be duly applicable to the
establishment of nexus for the taxation of intrastate commerce.

(2) The following
specific guidelines shall be applied by any city that imposes a gross receipts
tax:

(a) For the purposes of
imposing a gross receipts tax on extracting, manufacturing, or processing for
hire activities, the activities are subject to tax in the local jurisdiction
where the activities occur. If the activities occur in more than one local
jurisdiction, the activities are consistently, equitably, and reasonably apportioned
between or among those local jurisdictions even though the taxpayer may not
have an office or other permanent place of business in each jurisdiction.

(b) For the purposes of
imposing a gross receipts tax on retail sales, all sales are subject to tax in
the local jurisdiction where the sales occur. For the purposes of determining
where a retail sale occurs under this subsection (2)(b), the methods provided
in RCW 82.14.020 (1) through (5) for determining where a retail sale occurs
shall be applied.

(c) For the purposes of
imposing a gross receipts tax on wholesale sales, all sales are subject to tax
in the local jurisdiction where the sales occur. For the purposes of
determining where a wholesale sale occurs under this subsection, the methods
provided in RCW 82.14.020 (1) through (5) for determining where a retail sale
occurs shall be applied as if the wholesale sale was a retail sale.

(d) For the purposes of
imposing a gross receipts tax on any person rendering services, other than
services defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050, the services are subject
to tax in the local jurisdiction where the services were primarily performed.
If the person rendering services performs substantial service activities in
more than one local jurisdiction, the person shall apportion to each local
jurisdiction that portion of the total gross income that is derived from
services rendered in each local jurisdiction. Where apportionment cannot be
accurately made by separate accounting methods, the person shall apportion to
each local jurisdiction that proportion of the total gross income which is
derived from services which the cost of performing the services within a local
jurisdiction bears to the total cost of performing the services in all local
jurisdictions. The city shall apportion the gross receipts derived from
services even though the taxpayer may not have an office or other permanent
place of business in each jurisdiction where it performs the services.

(e) Under no
circumstances may a business apportion or allocate gross receipts to a
jurisdiction in which it has no nexus for tax purposes.

(3) The following
credits are allowed for persons performing multiple activities in multiple
local jurisdictions:

(a) Every person
engaged in manufacturing activities is allowed a credit against the measure of
tax of any manufacturing gross receipts tax imposed by a local jurisdiction for
any portion of the measure of tax which has been previously subjected to a
local jurisdiction gross receipts tax on either extracting or previously
performed manufacturing activities.

(b) Every person
engaged in making retail or wholesale sales is allowed a credit against the
measure of tax of any retailing or wholesaling gross receipts tax imposed by a
local jurisdiction for any portion of the measure of tax which has been
previously subjected to a local jurisdiction gross receipts tax on either
extracting or manufacturing activities.

Sec. 5. RCW 35.21.710 and 1983
2nd ex.s. c 3 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any city
which imposes a license fee or tax upon business activities consisting of the
making of retail sales of tangible personal property which are measured by
gross receipts or gross income from such sales, shall impose such tax at a
single uniform rate upon all such business activities. The taxing authority
granted to cities for taxes upon business activities measured by gross receipts
or gross income from sales shall not exceed a rate of .0020; except that any
city with an adopted ordinance at a higher rate, as of January 1, 1982 shall be
limited to a maximum increase of ten percent of the January 1982 rate, not to
exceed an annual incremental increase of two percent of current rate:
PROVIDED, That any adopted ordinance which classifies according to different
types of business or services shall be subject to both the ten percent and the
two percent annual incremental increase limitation on each tax rate: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That all surtaxes on business and occupation classifications in effect
as of January 1, 1982, shall expire no later than December 31, 1982, or by
expiration date established by local ordinance. Cities which impose a license
fee or tax upon business activities consisting of the making of retail sales of
tangible personal property which are measured by gross receipts or gross income
from such sales shall be required to submit an annual report to the state
auditor identifying the rate established and the revenues received from each
fee or tax. This section shall not apply to any business activities subject to
the tax imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW. For purposes of this section, the
providing to consumers of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065, shall be deemed to be the retail sale of tangible personal property.

(2) Subject to the
full enactment of sections 3 and 4 of this act and notwithstanding subsection
(1) of this section, the limitations contained in this subsection shall apply
to any city imposing a gross receipts tax that fully complies with the
provisions contained in section 3 (3)(a) through (g) and (5) of this act. A
city subject to the limitations contained in this subsection shall have the
sole authority to set the rate of tax on any particular class of business
activity. However, the rate of tax on any particular class of business activity
shall not exceed a rate of 0.0020. A city imposing a gross receipts tax on a
business activity at a rate equal to or greater than 0.0020 as of January 1,
2002, may increase the rate of tax imposed on that particular business activity
by an annual increment of not more than 0.00010, not to exceed a total of
twenty-five percent of the rate in effect for that business activity on January
1, 2002.

(3) A city first
imposing a gross receipts tax and fully complying with the provisions contained
in section 3 (3)(a) through (g) and (5) of this act may do so only if the gross
receipts tax is authorized by a proposition approved by a majority of the
qualified voters of the city voting at a general election held within the city
or at a special election called by the city for the purpose of submitting the
proposition to the voters, and the initial tax rate for any particular business
activity does not exceed a rate of 0.0010. After an initial rate is
established under this subsection (3), the rate for that particular business
activity may not be increased by an annual increment of more than 0.00010 and
shall not exceed a rate of 0.0020.

(4) Any city that
classifies according to different types of business activities shall apply a
single uniform rate to substantially similar business activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Section 4 of this act
takes effect January 1, 2005.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 4 of
this act constitute a new chapter to be added to Title 35 RCW.

---
END ---