BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The owner of a public
water system, as the term public water system is defined in RCW 70.119A.020,
that is not subject to regulation or jurisdiction under Title 80 RCW and that
is not a municipal corporation or special purpose district, but who is a
purveyor, as the term purveyor is defined in RCW 70.116.030, must provide
potable water to every connection indicated in the approved subdivision, short
subdivision, or other applicable land use regulation in which the public water
system was indicated as the means of meeting requirements to provide potable
water supplies.

(2) The owner of
property that is harmed by the failure of an owner of a public water system, as
identified in subsection (1) of this section, to provide potable water supply
under subsection (1) of this section may bring a civil action for either
injunctive relief or to recover the actual damages sustained, or both, together
with reasonable costs, including but not limited to investigative costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees and other litigation-related costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The owner of a public
water system, as the term public water system is defined in RCW 70.119A.020,
that is not subject to regulation or jurisdiction under Title 80 RCW and that
is not a municipal corporation or special purpose district, but who is a purveyor,
as the term purveyor is defined in RCW 70.116.030, must comply with all
requirements imposed under chapters 43.20, 70.116, 70.119, and 70.119A RCW.

(2) The owner of
property that is harmed by the failure of an owner of a public water system, as
identified in subsection (1) of this section, to comply with the requirements
of subsection (1) of this section may bring a civil action for either
injunctive relief or to recover the actual damages sustained, or both, together
with reasonable costs including but not limited to investigative costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees and other litigation-related costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) All moneys paid to
the owner of a public water system, as identified in sections 1(1) and 2(1) of
this act, for providing potable water supply or for construction or maintenance
of the public water system must promptly be deposited by the owner in a trust
account, maintained for the purpose of holding the moneys, in a bank, savings
and loan association, mutual savings bank, or licensed escrow agent located in
Washington. Any interest paid to the trust account accrues to the account.
The owner may act as trustee. Expenditures from the account must be for
legitimate and reasonable water system expenses. Records of such expenditures
must be kept and be available for inspection by customers of the system.

(2) The owner must
provide written notice of the name, address, and location of the depository and
any subsequent change thereof. If ownership of the public water system is
transferred to another, any moneys in the trust account affected by the
transfer are simultaneously transferred to an equivalent trust account of the
successor owner, and the successor owner must promptly provide notice of the
transfer and the name, address, and location of the new depository.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The remedies provided
under this chapter are cumulative and are in addition to any other remedies
provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Every duty under this
chapter and every act that must be performed as a condition precedent to the
exercise of a right or remedy under this chapter imposes an obligation of good
faith in its performance or enforcement.

Sec. 6. RCW 90.03.040 and 1917 c
117 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The beneficial use of
water is hereby declared to be a public use, and any person may exercise the
right of eminent domain to acquire any property or rights now or hereafter
existing when found necessary for the storage of water for, or the application
of water to, any beneficial use, including the right to enlarge existing
structures employed for the public purposes mentioned in this chapter and use the
same in common with the former owner, and including the right and power to
condemn an inferior use of water for a superior use, and including operation
of a public water system upon a showing that property served by the system is
being harmed as established by sections 1 and 2 of this act. In
condemnation proceedings the court shall determine what use will be for the
greatest public benefit, and that use shall be deemed a superior one:
PROVIDED, That no property right in water or the use of water shall be acquired
hereunder by condemnation for irrigation purposes, which shall deprive any
person of such quantity of water as may be reasonably necessary for the
irrigation of his or her land then under irrigation to the full extent
of the soil, by the most economical method of artificial irrigation applicable
to such land according to the usual methods of artificial irrigation employed
in the vicinity where such land is situated. In any case, the court shall
determine what is the most economical method of irrigation. Such property or
rights shall be acquired in the manner provided by law for the taking of
private property for public use by private corporations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 5 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---