BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.31 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is created
the Washington state task force on funding for community-based services to
victims of crime.

(2) The task force
shall consist of the following members:

(a) The director of the
office of community development, or the director's designee;

(b) The secretary of
the department of social and health services, or the secretary's designee;

(c) The director of the
department of labor and industries, or the director's designee;

(d) At least eleven,
but not more than fifteen, additional members, selected by the director of the
office of community development, including: At least one representative each
of community-based organizations that focus on providing services to homicide
survivors, assault victims (other than sexual assault and domestic violence),
robbery victims, child abuse victims, and victims of drunk and drugged drivers
(vehicular assault and vehicular homicide); one representative of organizations
that provide services primarily to domestic violence victims; one
representative of organizations providing services primarily to sexual assault
victims; one representative of programs that provide services to victims who
are deaf, blind, or otherwise disabled; one representative of organizations
that provide services solely for victims to whom English is a second language;
one representative of victim service programs administered by law enforcement
agencies; and one representative of victim/witness assistance programs
administered by county prosecuting attorneys;

(e) Four legislators,
two from the senate to be chosen by the president of the senate and two from
the house of representatives to be chosen by the speaker of the house of
representatives. Not more than one member from each chamber may be a member of
the largest political party caucus.

(3) The task force
shall be chaired by the director of the office of community development, or the
director's designee.

(4) The task force
shall carry out the following activities:

(a) Measure and
evaluate the progress of the state in providing funding to community-based
programs that provide services to victims of crime, especially the underserved
victim populations identified as: Homicide survivors, physical assault victims
(nondomestic violence and nonsexual assault related), robbery victims, child
abuse victims, vehicular assault and homicide victims and survivors, and
victims of property crimes;

(b) Identify available
federal, state, and local programs that provide services to underserved victims
as defined in (a) of this subsection;

(c) Make
recommendations on methods to provide a cost-effective coordinated system of
support and assistance to persons who are victims of crime;

(d) Make
recommendations on funding necessary to provide appropriate services to the
underserved victims, with recommendations on revenue sources; and

(e) Identify statutory
and administrative barriers to improving the delivery of cost-effective and
coordinated services to crime victims.

(5) State and local
government agencies that participate in the delivery of services to crime
victims shall, upon request, provide information and technical assistance to
the task force, within existing funds.

(6) The task force
shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the
legislature by November 30, 2002.

(7) The office of
community development shall provide necessary administrative and clerical
support to the task force.

(8) The members of the
task force shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(9) The task force
expires March 1, 2003.

(10) This
section expires March 1, 2003.

--- END ---