BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.32.430 and 1998 c
191 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Catch
record cards necessary for proper management of the state's food fish and game
fish species and shellfish resources shall be administered under rules adopted
by the commission and issued at no charge for the initial catch record card
and ten dollars for each subsequent catch record card. Persons who received
their original license at a reduced rate under RCW 77.32.480 or 77.32.490 are
eligible to receive subsequent catch record cards for two dollars. An
individual sport fishing license holder may be issued a total of three catch
record cards per license year. A duplicate catch record card may be issued for
a fee of ten dollars and is considered one of the three catch record cards
allowed during the license year.

--- END ---