BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that it is in the public interest to convene a task force to investigate the
feasibility of conducting negotiations with the United States and Indian tribes
regarding federal and Indian reserved water rights.

(2) The governor shall
invite the federally recognized tribes with water-related interests in the
state of Washington and the relevant departments and agencies of the United
States government to participate on the task force through designated
representatives. The governor or the governor's designee, the attorney general
or the attorney general's designee, and a member from each caucus of the
legislature shall represent the state of Washington.

(3) The task force may
conduct its business through work groups and shall seek and consider the
recommendations of representatives of affected water users in the state.

(4) The department of
ecology shall provide staff support to the task force. In its work, the task
force shall consult with other states that have conducted such negotiations.
The task force shall report to the standing committees of the legislature
having jurisdiction over water resource and state and local government issues
before January 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The governor shall
convene a task force to investigate the feasibility of conducting negotiations
with other states and Canada with regard to water bodies they share with the
state of Washington.

(2) For the state, the
task force shall consist of the following:

(a) One member from the
house of representatives majority caucus;

(b) One member from the
house of representatives minority caucus;

(c) One member from the
senate majority caucus;

(d) One member from the
senate minority caucus;

(e) One member from the
governor's office;

(f) The director of the
department of ecology;

(g) The attorney
general or the attorney general's designee;

(h) The director of the
department of fish and wildlife;

(i) One member
representing cities;

(j) One member
representing counties;

(k) One member
representing water utilities;

(l) One member
representing irrigation districts;

(m) One member
representing private irrigation development;

(n) One member
representing federally licensed hydropower project owners; and

(o) Two members
representing environmental interests.

(3) The governor shall
invite the federally recognized tribes with water-related interests in the
state of Washington and the relevant departments and agencies of the United
States government to participate on the task force through designated
representatives.

(4) The department of
ecology shall provide staff support to the task force. In its work, the task
force shall consult with other states that have conducted such negotiations.
The task force shall report to the standing committees of the legislature having
jurisdiction over water resource and state and local government issues before
January 1, 2003.

(5) Members will serve
without compensation other than that provided by members' employers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The sum of . . . . . .
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the
biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the department of
ecology to support the work of the task forces in sections 1 and 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. By December 1, 2002, the
department of ecology shall report to the appropriate committees of the senate
and house of representatives on the results of an inquiry to estimate the
number of and the amount of water estimated to be represented by unused water
rights within one or more representative watersheds where the information is
readily available. The department's report shall also identify and evaluate
various methods for reducing the number and size of these unused rights and for
reconciling them in watershed assessments and plans. In carrying out this
task, the department shall consult with watershed planning units regarding this
problem and shall report on the views and recommendations of watershed units.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) A joint task force is
created to study judicial and administrative alternatives for resolving water
disputes. The task force is organized and led by the office of the attorney
general. In addition to the office of the attorney general, members of the
task force include:

(a) Representatives of
the legislature, including one member appointed by each caucus;

(b) Representatives of
the superior courts of Washington state appointed by the president of the
superior court judges association, and shall include two judicial officers of
the superior court from eastern Washington and two judicial officers of the
superior court from western Washington;

(c) A representative of
the Washington state court of appeals appointed by the chief justice of the
state supreme court;

(d) A representative of
the environmental hearings office; and

(e) A representative of
the department of ecology.

(2) The objectives of
the task force are to:

(a) Examine and
characterize the types of water disputes to be resolved;

(b) Examine the
approach of other states to water dispute resolution;

(c) Recommend one or
more methods to resolve water disputes, including, but not limited to, an
administrative resolution process; a judicial resolution process such as water
court; or any combination thereof;

(d) Recommend an
implementation plan that will address:

(i) A specific
administrative structure for each method used to resolve water disputes;

(ii) The cost to
implement the plan; and

(iii) The changes to
statutes and administrative rules necessary to implement the plan.

(3) The office of the
attorney general shall work with the staff of the standing committees of the
legislature with jurisdiction over water resources to research and compile information
relevant to the mission of the task force by December 31, 2002.

(4) The task force
shall submit its report to the appropriate committees of the legislature no
later than December 30, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The sum of
. . . . . . dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the
general fund to the office of the attorney general to support the work of the
task forces in sections 1 and 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The department of ecology
must convene a storm water recharge task force with representatives of city,
county, and other local governments to develop local strategies for managing
storm water in order to realize the greatest possible recharge of surface and
ground water and to recommend necessary funding mechanisms for implementing
these strategies. The task force will report to the legislature's standing
committees with jurisdiction over water resources, state and local government,
and fiscal committees in January 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The department of ecology
and the attorney general's office will conduct a study to identify possible
ways to streamline the water right general adjudication procedures. By
December 1, 2002, the agencies will report on their findings and
recommendations to the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The department of ecology
must conduct a study to evaluate the potential use of private certified water
right examiners to improve water right administration. By December 1, 2002,
the department will report on its finding and provide recommendations to the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The department of ecology
must create a storage permitting work group to identify, evaluate, and
recommend methods to coordinate, streamline, and/or integrate state and local
permits for water storage projects. The work group will report its findings and
recommendations to the legislature's standing committees on water resources and
state and local government in January 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The legislature finds
that improvements in state water management capabilities are necessary to
effectively provide water to people and fish. By October 1, 2002, the
department of ecology shall provide the following reports relating to water
management to the appropriate standing committees of the senate and house of
representatives:

(1) The progress made
to that date in modernizing the department's water resources-related
information systems. The report shall also provide a plan and proposed
schedule for completing the modernization and an estimate of the cost of
completing the modernization and to make water resources information accessible
by the public;

(2) The progress made
to that date in establishing a stream gauging system managed by the department
of ecology and local cooperators. The report shall also provide a plan and
proposed schedule for completing the establishment of a state and local stream
gauging network and shall estimate the cost to operate and maintain the current
system, the cost to complete the system, and the cost to operate and maintain
the complete system;

(3) The progress made
to that date in complying with the Thurston county superior court order on
water use measurement and the department of ecology's plans and schedule to
complete work necessary to comply with the order. The report shall discuss the
department's distribution of funds provided in the 2001-2003 biennial budget
for providing assistance to persons required to install new measuring devices
or improve existing devices. The report shall discuss the department's efforts
to develop a data system for the storage and retrieval of water use data and
shall provide a plan, a proposed schedule, and a proposed budget for the
further implementation of the water use measurement program;

(4) A plan, schedule,
and budget for reestablishing a system of state water masters located within
the watersheds to which they are assigned;

(5) A plan, schedule,
and budget for improving the administration of water right records held by the
department of ecology. The department of ecology shall work with the department
of revenue and with county auditors in developing recommendations for improving
the administration of water rights ownership information and integrating this
information with real property ownership records. The department of ecology
shall evaluate the need for grants to counties to assist with recording and
information management needs related to water rights ownership and title;

(6) The establishing of
a state hydrologic office, under the direction of a state hydrologist, as a
division within the department of ecology for the purpose of receiving and
managing water use reporting data and measuring and characterizing the water
resources of the state. The sole function of the office would be to obtain,
maintain, and provide information;

(7) The
establishing of local watershed councils and a watershed coordinating council
to provide information sharing and coordination among local watershed
organizations and state, federal, and tribal entities.

---
END ---