BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 86.15.050 and 1961 c
153 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board of
county commissioners of each county shall be ex officio, by virtue of their
office, supervisors of the zones created in each county. In any zone with
more than two thousand residents, an election of supervisors other than the
board of county commissioners may be held as provided in this section.

(2) When proposed by
citizen petition or by resolution of the board of county commissioners, a
ballot proposition authorizing election of the supervisors of a zone shall be
submitted by ordinance to the voters residing in the zone at any general
election, or at any special election which may be called for that purpose.

(3) The ballot
proposition shall be submitted (a) if the board of county supervisors enacts an
ordinance submitting the proposition after adopting a resolution proposing the
election of supervisors of a zone; or (b) if a petition proposing the election
of supervisors of a zone is submitted to the county auditor of the county in
which the zone is located that is signed by registered voters within the zone,
numbering at least fifteen percent of the votes cast in the last county general
election by registered voters within the zone.

(4) Upon receipt of
a citizen petition under subsection (3)(b) of this section, the county auditor
shall determine whether the petition is signed by a sufficient number of
registered voters, using the registration records and returns of the preceding
general election, and, no later than forty-five days after receipt of the
petition, shall attach to the petition the auditor's certificate stating
whether or not sufficient signatures have been obtained. If the signatures are
found by the auditor to be insufficient, the petition shall be returned to the
person filing it.

(5) The ballot
proposition authorizing election of supervisors of zones shall appear on the
ballot of the next general election or at the next special election date
specified under RCW 29.13.020 occurring sixty or more days after the last
resolution proposing election of supervisors or the date the county auditor
certifies that the petition proposing such election contains sufficient valid
signatures.

(6) The petition
proposing the election of zone supervisors, or the ordinance submitting the
question to the voters, shall describe the proposed election process. The
ballot proposition shall include the following:

G "For the direct
election of flood control zone district supervisors."

G "Against the direct
election of flood control zone district supervisors."

(7) The ordinance or
petition submitting the ballot proposition shall designate the proposed
composition of the supervisors of zones, which shall be clearly described in
the ballot proposition. The ballot proposition shall state that the zone
supervisors shall thereafter be selected by election, and, at the same election
at which the proposition is submitted to the voters as to whether to elect zone
supervisors, three park commissioners shall be elected. The election of zone
supervisors is null and void if the voters, by a simple majority, do not
approve the direct election of the zone supervisors. Candidates shall run for
specific supervisor positions. No primary may be held to nominate candidates.
The person receiving the greatest number of votes for each position shall be
elected as a supervisor. The staggering of the terms of office shall occur as
follows: (a) The person who is elected receiving the greatest number of votes
shall be elected to a six-year term of office if the election is held in an
odd-numbered year or a five-year term of office if the election is held in an
even-numbered year; (b) the person who is elected receiving the second greatest
number of votes shall be elected to a four-year term of office if the election
is held in an odd-numbered year or a three-year term of office if the election
is held in an even-numbered year; and (c) the other person who is elected shall
be elected to a two-year term of office if the election is held in an
odd-numbered year or a one-year term of office if the election is held in an
even-numbered year. The initial supervisors shall take office immediately when
they are elected and qualified, and for purposes of computing their terms of
office the terms shall be assumed to commence on the first day of January in
the year after they are elected. Thereafter, all supervisors shall be elected
to six-year terms of office. All supervisors shall serve until their
respective successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance
with RCW 29.04.170. Vacancies shall occur and shall be filled as provided in
chapter 42.12 RCW.

(8) The costs and
expenses directly related to the election of zone supervisors shall be borne by
the zone.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---