BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that environmental permit processes must provide protection for the resource,
adequate public involvement, and fairness to the permit applicants. The
legislature further finds that duplicative procedures should be eliminated from
these permit processes when they delay permit decisions without providing any
meaningful additional protection to the resource.

The shoreline
management act allows local governments to issue both conditional use permits
and variance permits. Local governments may only issue a permit for a variance
or a conditional use under the shoreline management act after providing
extensive public notice and an opportunity for public involvement. Conditional
use and variance permits, unlike substantial development permits, must be
approved by the department of ecology. The department can approve, deny, or
approve with conditions these permits. The legislature finds that this process,
which allows the department of ecology to impose additional conditions on these
two types of permits when the department often has not been a participant in
the public hearings, is an unnecessary step that adds frustration and delay to
the parties involved. The legislature therefore finds that it is in the public
interest to eliminate the authority of the department of ecology to impose
conditions upon conditional use permits or variance permits issued under the
shoreline management act, and that instead the department simply appeal any
conditional use or variance permit which it finds defective.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.58.140 and 1995 c
347 s 309 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A development shall
not be undertaken on the shorelines of the state unless it is consistent with
the policy of this chapter and, after adoption or approval, as appropriate, the
applicable guidelines, rules, or master program.

(2) A substantial
development shall not be undertaken on shorelines of the state without first
obtaining a permit from the government entity having administrative
jurisdiction under this chapter.

A permit shall be
granted:

(a) From June 1, 1971,
until such time as an applicable master program has become effective, only when
the development proposed is consistent with: (i) The policy of RCW 90.58.020;
and (ii) after their adoption, the guidelines and rules of the department; and
(iii) so far as can be ascertained, the master program being developed for the
area;

(b) After adoption or
approval, as appropriate, by the department of an applicable master program,
only when the development proposed is consistent with the applicable master
program and this chapter.

(3) The local
government shall establish a program, consistent with rules adopted by the
department, for the administration and enforcement of the permit system
provided in this section. The administration of the system so established
shall be performed exclusively by the local government.

(4) Except as otherwise
specifically provided in subsection (11) of this section, the local government
shall require notification of the public of all applications for permits
governed by any permit system established pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section by ensuring that notice of the application is given by at least one of
the following methods:

(a) Mailing of the
notice to the latest recorded real property owners as shown by the records of
the county assessor within at least three hundred feet of the boundary of the
property upon which the substantial development is proposed;

(b) Posting of the
notice in a conspicuous manner on the property upon which the project is to be
constructed; or

(c) Any other manner
deemed appropriate by local authorities to accomplish the objectives of
reasonable notice to adjacent landowners and the public.

The notices shall
include a statement that any person desiring to submit written comments
concerning an application, or desiring to receive notification of the final
decision concerning an application as expeditiously as possible after the
issuance of the decision, may submit the comments or requests for decisions to
the local government within thirty days of the last date the notice is to be
published pursuant to this subsection. The local government shall forward, in
a timely manner following the issuance of a decision, a copy of the decision to
each person who submits a request for the decision.

If a hearing is to be
held on an application, notices of such a hearing shall include a statement
that any person may submit oral or written comments on an application at the
hearing.

(5) The system shall
include provisions to assure that construction pursuant to a permit will not
begin or be authorized until twenty-one days from the date the permit decision
was filed as provided in subsection (6) of this section; or until all review
proceedings are terminated if the proceedings were initiated within twenty-one
days from the date of filing as defined in subsection (6) of this section
except as follows:

(a) In the case of any
permit issued to the state of Washington, department of transportation, for the
construction and modification of SR 90 (I-90) on or adjacent to Lake
Washington, the construction may begin after thirty days from the date of
filing, and the permits are valid until December 31, 1995;

(b) Construction may be
commenced no sooner than thirty days after the date of the appeal of the
board's decision is filed if a permit is granted by the local government and
(i) the granting of the permit is appealed to the shorelines hearings board
within twenty-one days of the date of filing, (ii) the hearings board approves
the granting of the permit by the local government or approves a portion of the
substantial development for which the local government issued the permit, and
(iii) an appeal for judicial review of the hearings board decision is filed
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. The appellant may request, within ten days of
the filing of the appeal with the court, a hearing before the court to
determine whether construction pursuant to the permit approved by the hearings
board or to a revised permit issued pursuant to the order of the hearings board
should not commence. If, at the conclusion of the hearing, the court finds
that construction pursuant to such a permit would involve a significant,
irreversible damaging of the environment, the court shall prohibit the
permittee from commencing the construction pursuant to the approved or revised
permit until all review proceedings are final. Construction pursuant to a
permit revised at the direction of the hearings board may begin only on that
portion of the substantial development for which the local government had
originally issued the permit, and construction pursuant to such a revised
permit on other portions of the substantial development may not begin until after
all review proceedings are terminated. In such a hearing before the court, the
burden of proving whether the construction may involve significant irreversible
damage to the environment and demonstrating whether such construction would or
would not be appropriate is on the appellant;

(c) If the permit is
for a substantial development meeting the requirements of subsection (11) of
this section, construction pursuant to that permit may not begin or be
authorized until twenty-one days from the date the permit decision was filed as
provided in subsection (6) of this section.

If a permittee begins
construction pursuant to subsections (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, the
construction is begun at the permittee's own risk. If, as a result of judicial
review, the courts order the removal of any portion of the construction or the
restoration of any portion of the environment involved or require the
alteration of any portion of a substantial development constructed pursuant to
a permit, the permittee is barred from recovering damages or costs involved in
adhering to such requirements from the local government that granted the
permit, the hearings board, or any appellant or intervener.

(6) Any decision on an
application for a permit under the authority of this section, whether it is an
approval or a denial, shall, concurrently with the transmittal of the ruling to
the applicant, be filed with the department and the attorney general. ((With
regard to a permit other than a permit governed by subsection (10) of this
section,)) "Date of filing" as used ((herein)) in
this section means the date of actual receipt by the department. ((With
regard to a permit for a variance or a conditional use, "date of
filing" means the date a decision of the department rendered on the permit
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section is transmitted by the department to
the local government.)) The department shall notify in writing the local
government and the applicant of the date of filing.

(7) Applicants for
permits under this section have the burden of proving that a proposed
substantial development is consistent with the criteria that must be met before
a permit is granted. In any review of the granting or denial of an application
for a permit as provided in RCW 90.58.180 (1) and (2), the person requesting
the review has the burden of proof.

(8) Any permit may,
after a hearing with adequate notice to the permittee and the public, be
rescinded by the issuing authority upon the finding that a permittee has not
complied with conditions of a permit. If the department is of the opinion that
noncompliance exists, the department shall provide written notice to the local
government and the permittee. If the department is of the opinion that the
noncompliance continues to exist thirty days after the date of the notice, and
the local government has taken no action to rescind the permit, the department may
petition the hearings board for a rescission of the permit upon written notice
of the petition to the local government and the permittee if the request by the
department is made to the hearings board within fifteen days of the termination
of the thirty-day notice to the local government.

(9) The holder of a
certification from the governor pursuant to chapter 80.50 RCW shall not be
required to obtain a permit under this section.

(10) Any permit for a
variance or a conditional use by local government under approved master
programs must be submitted to the department ((for its approval or
disapproval)).

(11)(a) An application
for a substantial development permit for a limited utility extension or for the
construction of a bulkhead or other measures to protect a single family
residence and its appurtenant structures from shoreline erosion shall be
subject to the following procedures:

(i) The public comment
period under subsection (4) of this section shall be twenty days. The notice
provided under subsection (4) of this section shall state the manner in which
the public may obtain a copy of the local government decision on the
application no later than two days following its issuance;

(ii) The local
government shall issue its decision to grant or deny the permit within
twenty-one days of the last day of the comment period specified in (i) of this
subsection; and

(iii) If there is an
appeal of the decision to grant or deny the permit to the local government
legislative authority, the appeal shall be finally determined by the
legislative authority within thirty days.

(b) For purposes of
this section, a limited utility extension means the extension of a utility
service that:

(i) Is categorically
exempt under chapter 43.21C RCW for one or more of the following: Natural gas,
electricity, telephone, water, or sewer;

(ii) Will serve an
existing use in compliance with this chapter; and

(iii) Will not extend
more than twenty-five hundred linear feet within the shorelines of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department is
not authorized to deny or impose new conditions for a shoreline conditional use
permit or a shoreline variance permit authorized by a local government after
May 1, 2002. The local government issuing the conditional use or variance
permit is required to file the permit with the department in accordance with
RCW 90.58.140(10). The department or any aggrieved party may seek review of a
conditional use or variance permit pursuant to RCW 90.58.180.

(2) For any conditional
use or variance permit that was either denied by the department or had
conditions imposed upon it before May 1, 2002, and for which a final permit has
not yet been issued, the local government at its option may: (a) Continue to
process the permit with the conditions; or (b) notify the department in writing
by June 1, 2002, that it is not accepting the permit conditions and is treating
the original permit issuance by the local government as final. The department
or any aggrieved party may seek review pursuant to RCW 90.58.180 of any
conditional use or variance permit deemed as final under this subsection by the
local government.

(3) This section does
not change the requirements or standards that must be met for the issuance of a
conditional use or variance permit.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
May 1, 2002.

---
END ---