BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.114A.020 and 1999
c 374 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Agricultural
employee" means any person who renders personal services to, or under the
direction of, an agricultural employer in connection with the employer's agricultural
activity.

(2) "Agricultural
employer" means any person engaged in agricultural activity, including the
growing, producing, or harvesting of farm or nursery products, or engaged in
the forestation or reforestation of lands, which includes but is not limited to
the planting, transplanting, tubing, precommercial thinning, and thinning of
trees and seedlings, the clearing, piling, and disposal of brush and slash, the
harvest of Christmas trees, and other related activities. For the purposes
of mobile housing for range sheepherders, the term "agricultural
employer" does not include persons engaged in the business of
sheepherding.

(3)
"Department" means the department of health.

(4) "Dwelling
unit" means a shelter, building, or portion of a building, that may
include cooking and eating facilities, that is:

(a) Provided and
designated by the operator as either a sleeping area, living area, or both, for
occupants; and

(b) Physically
separated from other sleeping and common-use areas.

(5)
"Enforcement" and "enforcement actions" include the
authority to levy and collect fines.

(6)
"Facility" means a sleeping place, drinking water, toilet, sewage
disposal, food handling installation, or other installations required for
compliance with this chapter.

(7)
"Occupant" means a temporary worker or a person who resides with a
temporary worker at the housing site.

(8)
"Operator" means a person holding legal title to the land on which
temporary worker housing is located. However, if the legal title and the right
to possession are in different persons, "operator" means a person
having the lawful control or supervision over the temporary worker housing
under a lease or other arrangement.

(9) "Temporary
worker" means an agricultural employee employed intermittently and not
residing year-round at the same site.

(10) "Temporary
worker housing" means a place, area, or piece of land where sleeping
places or housing sites are provided by an agricultural employer for his or her
agricultural employees or by another person, including a temporary worker
housing operator, who is providing such accommodations for employees, for
temporary, seasonal occupancy.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

For the
purposes of mobile housing for range sheepherders, the department shall not
enforce standards exceeding the minimum applicable requirements for such
housing found in standards adopted by the United States department of labor.

---
END ---