BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that poor nutrition contributes to significant and expensive health problems in
our society, including obesity, tooth decay, cardiovascular disease, diabetes,
and cancer. The legislature also finds that eating "empty calorie"
foods that contain limited or no nutritional value, but are high in sugar,
fats, or cholesterol, are partly to blame for the diets that promote poor
health.

The legislature
recognizes the value of creating disincentives for unhealthy behavior,
including poor eating habits. The state's public health system is an important
resource for promoting good nutrition, as it is for helping to reduce the
incidence of disease in the population. The legislature recognizes that public
health programs are not adequately funded to carry out their job of protecting
the public's health.

The legislature
declares that paying for programs that will help protect the public against
disease by taxing foods that contribute to it, is a worthy cause.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.08.020 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and
there shall be collected a tax on each retail sale in this state equal to six
and five-tenths percent of the selling price.

(2) There is levied
and there shall be collected an additional tax on each retail sale of
carbonated beverages or candy.

(a) For the purposes
of this subsection (2):

(i) "Carbonated
beverage" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.64.010.

(ii)
"Candy" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or
artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts, or other
ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or pieces. Candy does
not include any preparation containing flour nor shall it include any products
that require refrigeration.

(b) The department
shall periodically audit retailers to determine compliance and enforce
compliance with this subsection (2).

(c) Money collected
under this subsection (2) shall be deposited in the public health services account
in RCW 43.72.902.

(3) There is
levied and there shall be collected an additional tax on each retail car
rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal to
five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected under
this subsection shall be deposited in the multimodal transportation account
created in RCW 47.66.070.

(((3))) (4)
The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive retail sales of
the same property.

(((4)))
(5) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under
chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

---
END ---