BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 51.18.010 and 1999 c
7 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall offer a retrospective rating plan to insure the workers' compensation
obligations of employers and groups of employers. The plan is to be made
available to any employer or group of employers who:

(a) Voluntarily elects
to participate in the plan; and

(b) Meets the
requirements of this chapter and rules adopted by the department under
subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The retrospective
rating plan shall be consistent with recognized insurance principles and shall
be administered according to rules adopted by the department. Rules adopted
under this section shall encourage broad participation by qualified employers
and sponsors of retrospective rating groups.

(3) Each
retrospective rating group approved by the department under this chapter shall:
(a) Select a coverage period ((and)) that may be renewed at
the end of each coverage period; and (b) distribute at least ninety percent
of any retrospective rating group refund to members of the group. For the
purposes of this section, "coverage period" means a twelve-month
period provided by the department by rule.

--- END ---