BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature
directs that the lands identified in section 4 of this act must be preserved
and protected for future generations of residents of the state.

(2) The board of
natural resources and the commissioner of public lands are directly responsible
for the preservation and protection of the land identified in section 4 of this
act.

(3) The provisions of
any local planning laws, or the state growth management act under chapter
36.70A RCW, are superseded by the terms of this section and section 2 of this
act.

(4) By January 1st of
each odd‑numbered year, the board of natural resources and the
commissioner of public lands must submit a report to the appropriate committees
of the legislature that details the land management activities for the land
identified in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) No valuable materials
or other assets, as those terms are used in Title 78 or 79 RCW, may be sold
from the land identified in section 4 of this act.

(2) Any form of
resource extraction on lands that abut the land identified in section 4 of this
act may not use the aquatic areas surrounding the property for access or
transportation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

The lands identified in
section 4 of this act are exempt from the provisions of this chapter and must
be managed solely as provided in sections 1 and 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Certain state-owned
aquatic lands are identified as follows:

(1) Certain aquatic
lands consisting of tidelands, bedlands, harbor areas, and waterways adjacent
to the Puyallup River delta and Commencement Bay in Pierce County (that area of
the bay between the Thea Foss and Sitcum Waterways, including the Puyallup
River below the I-5 bridge) described in this subsection:

That portion of Middle
Waterway abutting Blocks 33, 34a, 38, 38a and 38b of the Amended Supplemental
Plat of Tacoma Tide Lands, Sheet 5, approved by the Board of State Land
Commissioners October 7, 1902, described as follows:

The southerly 1595 feet
of said Middle Waterway measured perpendicular to the south line of said Middle
Waterway and the north line of said southerly 1595 feet being parallel to said
south line of Middle Waterway.

Excepting therefrom,
any first class tidelands previously sold by the state of Washington.

Situated in the City of
Tacoma, Pierce County, Washington.

(2) Certain aquatic
lands consisting of tidelands and bedlands adjacent to Cherry Point in Whatcom
County described in this subsection:

That portion of the
tidelands and bedlands of navigable waters owned by the state of Washington,
fronting and abutting Sections 2, 11, 13, 14, and 24, Township 39 North, Range
1 West, Willamette Meridian and fronting and abutting Sections 19, 20, 29 and
32, Township 39 North, Range 1 East, Willamette Meridian described as follows:

Lying south of the
south line of government lot 1, of said Section 2, Township 39 North, Range 1
West, W.M. being the south line of Birch Bay State Park; and lying north of the
south line of Township 39 North, Range 1 East; and extending waterward to a
line which is 70 feet below mean lower low water or 0.5 mile beyond extreme low
tide, whichever line is further waterward;

Excepting therefrom,
the following use authorizations issued by the department of natural resources:
lease application numbers 20-A09122, 20-A11714, 20-A08488, 20-013265 and 20-010521;

Also excepting
therefrom, any second class tidelands previously sold by the state of
Washington.

Situated in Whatcom
County, Washington.

(3) Certain aquatic
lands, consisting of tidelands and bedlands surrounding Cypress Island in
Skagit County described in this subsection:

The tidelands and
bedlands of navigable waters, owned by the state of Washington, department of
natural resources, lying in front of and surrounding Cypress Island, Strawberry
Island (a.k.a. Loon Island), and Cone Islands No.1, No.2 & No.3 (according
to the official U.S. government survey approved 1933) and said islands are
located within Sections 4, 5, 6, and 8, Township 35 North, Range 1 East, W.M.
and Sections 17-22, inclusively, and Sections 27-34, inclusively, Township 36
North, Range 1 East; W.M., and extending waterward to a water depth of 70 feet
below mean lower low water or one-half mile from the line of extreme low tide,
whichever line is further waterward;

Subject to department
of natural resources use authorizations 20-11458, 20-10667, 20-10827,
20-A12517, and 51-33711.

Situated in Skagit
County, Washington.

(4) Certain aquatic
lands consisting of tidelands and bedlands within Fidalgo Bay in Skagit County,
described in this subsection:

That portion of the
harbor area, waterways, and beds of navigable water in Fidalgo Bay owned by the
state of Washington located within Section 5, Township 34 North, Range 2 East,
W.M. and within Sections 29, 30, and 32, Township 35 North, Range 2 East, W.M.
and further described as follows:

That portion of Fidalgo
Bay lying southerly of a line beginning at the northeast corner of Tract No. 10
as shown on Plate 11 of the Tide and Shore Lands of Anacortes Harbor as filed
by the Tideland Appraisers dated May 1, 1893, and said line extended easterly
to terminate at the meander corner between government lots 2 and 3 of Section
29, Township 35 North, Range 2 East, W.M.;

Excepting therefrom,
that portion of the southerly end of the West Arm of Fidalgo Waterway which
was vacated by Waterway Vacation No. 101 according to the Commissioner's Order
dated April 29, 1959, for Primary State Highway No. 1 (State Route 20);

Also excepting
therefrom, that portion of the southerly end of the East Arm of Fidalgo
Waterway granted to the Department of Highways as shown on State Road Plat No.
941 dated January 18, 1961, for Primary State Highway No. 1 (State Route 20);

Also excepting
therefrom, that 100 foot right of way for railroad purposes across said Fidalgo
Waterway granted to the Seattle and Montana Railroad Company by decree filed
March 2, 1904, according to Condemnation file No. A26;

Together with, those
first class tidelands conveyed to the state of Washington according to the
Statutory Warranty deed recorded on December 20, 1999, recorded under Auditor's
File No. 199912200133, Skagit County Auditor's records and further described as
follows:

Tracts 4, 5, 6, 7, 8,
9, and 10 of Plate 13; Tracts 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, and 15 of Plate 12;
that portion of Tracts 16 and 17 of said Plate 12 and lying southerly of the
Seattle and Montana Railroad Company by decree filed March 2, 1904, according
to Condemnation file No. A26; said tracts and plates are according to of the
Tide and Shore Lands of Anacortes Harbor as filed by the Tideland Appraisers dated
May 1, 1893;

Excepting therefrom,
that portion of said first class tidelands, if any, conveyed to the state of
Washington for Primary State Highway No. 1, Jct. S.S.H. No. 1-D (State Route
20) by deed recorded October 15, 1956, under Skagit County Auditor's file No.
542873; by deed recorded January 3, 1958, under Skagit County Auditor's file
No. 560284; and by deed recorded February 7, 1961, under Skagit County
Auditor's file No. 603915;

Also excepting
therefrom, that 100 foot right of way for railroad purposes across said first
class tidelands granted to the Seattle and Montana Railroad Company by decree
filed March 2, 1904, according to Condemnation file No. A26;

Together with, those
second class tidelands conveyed to the state of Washington according to the
Statutory Warranty deed recorded on December 20, 1999, recorded under Auditor's
File No. 199912200133, Skagit County Auditor's records and further described as
follows:

All tidelands of the
second class lying between the line of mean high tide and the line of extreme
low tide, situated in front of and adjacent to, or abutting government lots 5
and 6, Section 32, Township 35 North, Range 2 East, W.M. and government lot 4,
Section 4, Township 34 North, Range 2 East, W.M.;

Together with, those
bedlands, if any, lying westerly of the line of extreme low tide fronting and
abutting the said second class tidelands situated in front of and adjacent to,
or abutting government lots 5 and 6, Section 32, Township 35 North, Range 2
East, W.M. and government lot 4, Section 4, Township 34 North, Range 2 East,
W.M.; and lying easterly of said east line of the East Arm of the Fidalgo
Waterway;

Together with, those
bedlands, if any, lying westerly of the line of extreme low tide fronting and
abutting the second class tidelands situated in front of and adjacent to, or
abutting government lot 7, Section 32, Township 35 North, Range 2 East, W.M.
and lying easterly of the east line of said Fidalgo Waterway and the said east
line of the East Arm of Fidalgo Waterway;

Excepting therefrom,
that 100 foot right of way for railroad purposes across said bedlands, if any,
granted to the Seattle and Montana Railroad Company by decree filed March 2,
1904, according to Condemnation file No. A26;

Together with, second
class tidelands and bedlands, if any, lying northerly of the north lateral
sideline of said second class tidelands in front of and adjacent to, or
abutting government lot 7, Township 35 North, Range 2 East, W.M. and lying
southerly of the south line of Tract No. 2 as shown on Plate 12 of the Tide and
Shore Lands of Anacortes Harbor as filed by the Tideland Appraisers dated May
1, 1893;

Together with, those
bedlands, if any, lying westerly of the line of extreme low tide fronting and abutting
the second class tidelands situated in front of and adjacent to, or abutting
government lots 2, 3 and 4, Section 29, Township 35 North, Range 2 East, W.M.
and the north 10.19 lineal chains along the meander line of government lot 8,
Section 32, Township 35 North, Range 2 East, W.M. and lying easterly of the
inner harbor line of the easterly most harbor area within Fidalgo Bay as shown
on the Map of Anacortes Harbor as filed by the Harbor Line Commission dated
1892;

Excepting therefrom,
those bedlands, if any, of said Tract 2 as shown on Plate 12 of the Tide and
Shore Lands of Anacortes Harbor as filed by the Tideland Appraisers dated May
1, 1893, as conveyed by the state of Washington according to the deed dated
April 17, 1908, within Volume 8 of Tide Land Deeds, page 370 on file in the
office of the commissioner of public lands;

Also excepting
therefrom, those bedlands, if any, of Fidalgo Bay lying southerly of said line
beginning at the northeast corner of Tract No. 10 as shown on Plate 11 of the Tide
and Shore Lands of Anacortes Harbor as filed by the Tideland Appraisers dated
May 1, 1893, and said line extended easterly to terminate at the meander corner
between government lots 2 and 3 of Section 29, Township 35 North, Range 2 East,
W.M.;

Also excepting
therefrom, tidelands of the first class of said Tract 2 as shown on Plate 12 of
the Tide and Shore Lands of Anacortes Harbor as filed by the Tideland
Appraisers dated May 1, 1893, as conveyed by the state of Washington according
to the deed dated April 17, 1908 within Volume 8 of Tide Land Deeds, page 370
on file in the office of the commissioner of public lands;

Also excepting
therefrom, tidelands of the second class, if any, extending from mean high tide
to extreme low tide as conveyed by the state of Washington in deeds recorded in
Volume 88 of Deeds, page 513 on May 21, 1912, and in Volume 102 of Deeds, page
550 on April 25, 1916, of Skagit County Auditor records, situate in front of
and adjacent to or abutting upon that portion of the government meander line
described as follows:

Beginning at the
northeast corner of Government Lot 1, Section 5, Township 34 North, Range 2
East, W.M.; thence South 28° West, 7.50 chains (495.00 feet); thence South 47° West, 17.50 chains (1155.00 feet) to the
terminal point of this description.

Except that portion, if
any, lying outside of the bounds of Tract 3, Plate No. 13, Tide and Shore Lands
in Section 5, Township 34 North, Range 2 East, W.M., Anacortes Harbor as per
the recorded plat thereof on file in the office of the commissioner of public
lands, Olympia, WA.

Also excepting that
portion conveyed to the state of Washington for Primary State Highway No. 1,
Jct. S.S.H. No. 1-D (State Route 20) by deed recorded January 10, 1961, under
Skagit County Auditor's file No. 602917.

Situated in Skagit
County, Washington.

(5) Certain aquatic
lands consisting of tidelands, bedlands, harbor areas, and waterways adjacent
to the Puyallup River delta and Commencement Bay in Pierce County (that area of
the bay between the Thea Foss and Sitcum Waterways, including the Puyallup
River below the I-5 bridge) hereafter described:

That portion of the
harbor area fronting and abutting Blocks 29, 30 and 31 of the Amended
Supplemental Plat of Tacoma Tide Lands, Sheet 4, approved by the Board of State
Land Commissioners October 7, 1902, described as follows:

That portion of the
harbor area bounded by the inner and outer harbor lines, the easterly line of
City (Thea Foss) Waterway and the westerly line of Middle Waterway;

Excepting therefrom,
the following use authorizations issued by the department of natural resources:
lease application numbers 22-A002621 and 22-002572;

Also excepting
therefrom, any first class tidelands previously sold by the state of
Washington.

Situated in the City of
Tacoma, Pierce County, Washington.

(6) Certain aquatic
lands, consisting of tidelands and bedlands surrounding Maury Island in King
County, as described in this subsection:

The tidelands and
bedlands of navigable waters, owned by the state of Washington, described as
follows:

Those tidelands and
bedlands surrounding Maury Island, which are fronting and abutting Section 14,
Sections 20-23, inclusively, and Sections 28-32, inclusively, Township 22 North,
Range 3 East, W.M.;

Together with, those
tidelands and bedlands lying westerly of said Maury Island which are fronting
and abutting only those portions of Sections 9 and 16, which are fronting on
Quartermaster Harbor, Township 22 North, Range 3 East, W.M.;

Together with, those
tidelands and bedlands lying southerly of said Maury Island, which are fronting
and abutting Sections 5 and 6, Township 21 North, Range 3 East, W.M.; and said
reserve extends waterward to a water depth of 70 feet below mean lower low
water or one-half mile from the line of extreme low tide, whichever line is
further waterward;

Those tidelands and
bedlands lying southerly and easterly of Vashon Island, which are fronting and
abutting Section 1, Township 21 North, Range 2 East, W.M.;

Together with, those
tidelands and bedlands lying easterly of said Vashon Island, which are fronting
and abutting Sections 24, 25, and 36, Township 22 North, Range 2 East, W.M.;

Together with, those
tidelands and bedlands lying easterly of said Vashon Island, which are fronting
and abutting Sections 17-20, inclusively, Township 22 North, Range 3 East,
W.M.;

Together with, those
tidelands and bedlands lying southerly westerly of said Vashon Island, which
are fronting and abutting only those portions of Sections 8, which is fronting
on Quartermaster Harbor, Township 22 North, Range 3 East, W.M.; and said
reserve extends waterward to a water depth of 70 feet below mean lower low
water or one-half mile from the line of extreme low tide, whichever line is further
waterward;

Subject to, department
of natural resources use authorizations 51‑021507, 51-027510, 51-033836,
51-CR0207, 51-CR0706, 51-CR0707, 51‑CR1771, 20-009814, 20-A11434,
20-012741, and 20-010075.

Situated in King
County, Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1, 2, and 4 of
this act are each added to chapter 79.01 RCW.

---
END ---