BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 66.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The sale of
sparkling apple cider and sparkling grape juice shall be permitted at state
liquor stores, provided that the sparkling apple cider and sparkling grape
juice is produced, processed, and packaged within the boundaries of the state
of Washington and made exclusively from apples and grapes grown in the state of
Washington, and such sales are cost-effective.

(2) The
board, in accordance with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section,
shall conduct sales of sparkling apple cider and sparkling grape juice at
twenty state liquor stores for a trial period of not less than ninety days, to
determine the cost-effectiveness of the sale of such products.

--- END ---