BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.40.037 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 10 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If a retiree
enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or
her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that month. This
reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from
employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) The benefit
reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one
hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent
will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent
months.

(2)(a) A retiree from
plan 1 who has satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1)
of this section and who enters employment with an employer may continue to
receive pension payments while engaged in such service for up to one thousand
five hundred hours of service in a calendar year without a reduction of pension,
and may enter into a contract with the employing agency that guarantees the
retiree's continued employment for a period not to exceed one year. When a
plan 1 member renders service beyond eight hundred sixty-seven hours, the
department shall collect from the employer the applicable employer retirement
contributions for the entire duration of the member's employment during that
calendar year.

(b) A retiree from plan
2 or plan 3 who has satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection
(1) of this section may work up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a
calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010,
or 41.40.010, or as a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, as defined in
RCW 41.26.030, without suspension of his or her benefit, and may enter into
a contract with the employing agency that guarantees the retiree's continued
employment for a period not to exceed one year.

(3) If the retiree opts
to reestablish membership under RCW 41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or
her retirement status and becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not
accrue during the period of membership and the individual shall make
contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the
right to again retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However,
if the right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has
rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and
survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous retirement
shall be reinstated.

(4) The department
shall collect and provide the state actuary with information relevant to the
use of this section for the joint committee on pension policy.

(5) The legislature
reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future and no member
or beneficiary has a contractual right to be employed for more than five months
in a calendar year without a reduction of his or her pension.

(6) This section
expires December 31, 2004.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.40.037 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 10 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If a retiree
enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or
her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that month. This
reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from
employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) The benefit
reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one
hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent
will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent
months.

(2) A retiree who has
satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this
section, may work up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours per calendar year in an
eligible position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, or as
a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, without
suspension of his or her benefit, and may enter into a contract with the
employing agency that guarantees the retiree's continued employment for a
period not to exceed one year.

(3) If the retiree opts
to reestablish membership under RCW 41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or
her retirement status and becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not
accrue during the period of membership and the individual shall make
contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the
right to again retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However,
if the right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has
rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and
survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous retirement
shall be reinstated.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 2 of this act
takes effect December 31, 2004.

---
END ---