BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that placing a high priority on the continuation of military activities at the
military bases located in our state is in the best interest of the state and
the United States. In order to avoid the closing of these bases, the
privatization of the infrastructure of these bases should be facilitated. This
effort will require the combined efforts of the state and local governments and
the private sector working in partnership with the United States military.
Therefore, the military facilities task force is hereby created. The task
force's primary goal is to create the legislative framework required best to
facilitate the privatization of that infrastructure chosen to be desirable for
that treatment by the task force.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The purpose of the
military facilities task force is to coordinate statewide efforts to ensure all
military facilities in Washington retain their premier status with respect to
their national defense missions. The task force shall inform the governor and
the legislature on matters affecting the operational viability of military
facilities within Washington through (1) understanding the mission of each
military facility in this state; (2) examining the integral role of Washington
facilities within the national defense structure; (3) identifying any obstacles
to the mission of each facility according to criteria used by its respective
branch of service; (4) examining any law, ordinance, requirement, rule, or
regulation that impacts each facility's mission; (5) evaluating any locally
developed proposals intended to mitigate the impact of military facilities on
surrounding areas or the impact of nonmilitary activities in surrounding areas
on the mission of military facilities; and (6) studying the economic impacts of
the facilities on the Washington economy. The task force shall make
recommendations to the governor and the legislature regarding actions needed to
ensure the viability of military facilities, including (a) expenditures
appropriate to ensure the proper functioning and continued operation of
military facilities within the state; (b) required changes to state law, local
ordinances, local zoning requirements, or any other state or local requirement,
rule, or regulation in order to encourage the continued operation of military
facilities within the state; and (c) any required actions to be taken by the
state at the federal level in support of military facilities within the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The military
facilities task force committee shall have the following membership:

(a) The executive
committee of the joint committee on veterans' and military affairs;

(b) Representatives of
each county and city containing a major military facility to be appointed by
resolution of the legislative authorities of these counties and cities;

(c) Two members who are
nonelected community leaders, appointed by the governor; and

(d) The military
authorities of each military base in the state shall be invited to participate
in the task force.

(2) The governor or his
or her designee shall serve as chair of the task force and provide staff
support.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The task force shall meet
as soon as possible after its membership is appointed. It shall have the
authority to invite participation of any experts it deems appropriate. It
shall continue until such time as the consensus of its membership is to
dissolve.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 4 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 38 RCW.

---
END ---