BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.21.045 and 1995 c
265 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) An insurer ((offering
any)) may offer a health benefit plan to a small employer ((shall
offer and actively market to the small employer a health benefit plan providing
benefits identical to the)), as defined in RCW 48.43.005, featuring a
limited schedule of covered health services ((that are required to be
delivered to an individual enrolled in the basic health plan)). Nothing in
this subsection shall preclude an insurer from offering, or a small employer
from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more ((or less))
comprehensive benefits than ((the basic health plan, provided such plans are
in accordance with this chapter)) those included in the product offered
under this section. An insurer offering a health benefit plan ((that
does not include benefits in the basic health plan)) under this subsection
shall clearly disclose ((these differences)) all covered benefits
to the small employer in a brochure approved by the commissioner.

(b) A health benefit
plan offered under this subsection shall provide coverage for hospital
expenses and services rendered by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW but ((is not subject to the requirements of)) will not
include the services identified in RCW 48.21.130, 48.21.140, ((48.21.141,))
48.21.142, 48.21.144, 48.21.146, 48.21.148, 48.21.160 through 48.21.197,
48.21.200, 48.21.220, 48.21.225, 48.21.230, 48.21.235, 48.21.240, 48.21.244,
48.21.250, 48.21.300, 48.21.310, ((or)) 48.21.320 ((if: (i) The
health benefit plan is the mandatory offering under (a) of this subsection that
provides benefits identical to the basic health plan, to the extent these
requirements differ from the basic health plan; or (ii) the health benefit plan
is offered to employers with not more than twenty-five employees)),
48.43.045(1), 48.43.125, or 48.43.180.

(2) Nothing in this
section shall prohibit an insurer from offering, or a purchaser from seeking,
benefits in excess of the ((basic health plan services)) health
benefit plan offered under subsection (1) of this section. All forms,
policies, and contracts shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner,
and the rates of any plan offered under subsection (1) of this section
shall be reasonable in relation to the benefits thereto.

(3) Premium rates for
health benefit plans for small employers as defined in this section shall be
subject to the following provisions:

(a) The insurer shall
develop its rates based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the
adjusted community rate for:

(i) Geographic area;

(ii) Family size;

(iii) Age; ((and))

(iv) Wellness
activities;

(v) Industry; and

(vi) Any other
factor that the commissioner finds to be appropriate.

(b) The adjustment for
age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not use age brackets smaller than
five-year increments, which shall begin with age twenty and end with age
sixty-five. Employees under the age of twenty shall be treated as those age
twenty.

(c) The insurer shall
be permitted to develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older
for coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection (3).

(d) The permitted rates
for any age group shall be no more than ((four hundred twenty-five percent
of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent
on January 1, 1997, and)) three hundred seventy-five percent of the
lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 2000, and five hundred
percent on January 1, 2003, and thereafter.

(e) A discount for
wellness activities shall be permitted to reflect actuarially justified
differences in utilization or cost attributed to such programs not to exceed
twenty percent.

(f) The rate charged
for a health benefit plan offered under this section may not be adjusted more
frequently than annually except that the premium may be changed to reflect:

(i) Changes to the
enrollment of the small employer;

(ii) Changes to the
family composition of the employee;

(iii) Changes to the
health benefit plan requested by the small employer; or

(iv) Changes in
government requirements affecting the health benefit plan.

(g) Rating factors
shall produce premiums for identical groups that differ only by the amounts
attributable to plan design, with the exception of discounts for health
improvement programs.

(h) For the purposes of
this section, a health benefit plan that contains a restricted network
provision shall not be considered similar coverage to a health benefit plan
that does not contain such a provision, provided that the restrictions of
benefits to network providers result in substantial differences in claims
costs. This subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of
benefits as provided in RCW 48.43.015.

(i) Adjusted community
rates established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
small groups purchasing coverage.

(4) ((The health
benefit plans authorized by this section that are lower than the required offering
shall not supplant or supersede any existing policy for the benefit of
employees in this state.)) Nothing in this section shall restrict the
right of employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in
excess of those provided herein.

(5)(a) Except as
provided in this subsection, requirements used by an insurer in determining
whether to provide coverage to a small employer shall be applied uniformly
among all small employers applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the
carrier.

(b) An insurer shall
not require a minimum participation level greater than:

(i) One hundred percent
of eligible employees working for groups with three or less employees; and

(ii) Seventy-five
percent of eligible employees working for groups with more than three
employees.

(c) In applying minimum
participation requirements with respect to a small employer, a small employer
shall not consider employees or dependents who have similar existing coverage
in determining whether the applicable percentage of participation is met.

(d) An insurer may not
increase any requirement for minimum employee participation or modify any
requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a small employer at
any time after the small employer has been accepted for coverage.

(6) An insurer must
offer coverage to all eligible employees of a small employer and their
dependents. An insurer may not offer coverage to only certain individuals or
dependents in a small employer group or to only part of the group. An insurer
may not modify a health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible
employee or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict
or exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions, or
services otherwise covered by the plan.

(7) As used in this
section, "health benefit plan," "small employer,"
"basic health plan," "adjusted community rate," and
"wellness activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 2. RCW 48.43.005 and 2001 c
196 s 5 and 2001 c 147 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless otherwise
specifically provided, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.

(1) "Adjusted
community rate" means the rating method used to establish the premium for
health plans adjusted to reflect actuarially demonstrated differences in
utilization or cost attributable to geographic region, age, family size, and
use of wellness activities.

(2) "Basic health
plan" means the plan described under chapter 70.47 RCW, as revised from
time to time.

(3) "Basic health
plan model plan" means a health plan as required in RCW 70.47.060(2)(d).

(4) "Basic health
plan services" means that schedule of covered health services, including
the description of how those benefits are to be administered, that are required
to be delivered to an enrollee under the basic health plan, as revised from
time to time.

(5) "Catastrophic
health plan" means:

(a) In the case of a
contract, agreement, or policy covering a single enrollee, a health benefit
plan requiring a calendar year deductible of, at a minimum, one thousand five
hundred dollars and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under
the plan (other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least three
thousand dollars; and

(b) In the case of a
contract, agreement, or policy covering more than one enrollee, a health
benefit plan requiring a calendar year deductible of, at a minimum, three
thousand dollars and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under
the plan (other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least five
thousand five hundred dollars; or

(c) Any health benefit
plan that provides benefits for hospital inpatient and outpatient services,
professional and prescription drugs provided in conjunction with such hospital
inpatient and outpatient services, and excludes or substantially limits
outpatient physician services and those services usually provided in an office
setting.

(6)
"Certification" means a determination by a review organization that
an admission, extension of stay, or other health care service or procedure has
been reviewed and, based on the information provided, meets the clinical
requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness, level of care, or
effectiveness under the auspices of the applicable health benefit plan.

(7) "Concurrent
review" means utilization review conducted during a patient's hospital
stay or course of treatment.

(8) "Covered
person" or "enrollee" means a person covered by a health plan
including an enrollee, subscriber, policyholder, beneficiary of a group plan,
or individual covered by any other health plan.

(9)
"Dependent" means, at a minimum, the enrollee's legal spouse and
unmarried dependent children who qualify for coverage under the enrollee's health
benefit plan.

(10) "Eligible
employee" means an employee who works on a full-time basis with a normal
work week of thirty or more hours. The term includes a self-employed
individual, including a sole proprietor, a partner of a partnership, and may include
an independent contractor, if the self-employed individual, sole proprietor,
partner, or independent contractor is included as an employee under a health
benefit plan of a small employer, but does not work less than thirty hours per
week and derives at least seventy-five percent of his or her income from a
trade or business through which he or she has attempted to earn taxable income
and for which he or she has filed the appropriate internal revenue service
form. Persons covered under a health benefit plan pursuant to the consolidated
omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1986 shall not be considered eligible
employees for purposes of minimum participation requirements of chapter 265,
Laws of 1995.

(11) "Emergency
medical condition" means the emergent and acute onset of a symptom or
symptoms, including severe pain, that would lead a prudent layperson acting
reasonably to believe that a health condition exists that requires immediate
medical attention, if failure to provide medical attention would result in
serious impairment to bodily functions or serious dysfunction of a bodily organ
or part, or would place the person's health in serious jeopardy.

(12) "Emergency
services" means otherwise covered health care services medically necessary
to evaluate and treat an emergency medical condition, provided in a hospital
emergency department.

(13) "Enrollee
point-of-service cost-sharing" means amounts paid to health carriers
directly providing services, health care providers, or health care facilities
by enrollees and may include copayments, coinsurance, or deductibles.

(14)
"Grievance" means a written complaint submitted by or on behalf of a
covered person regarding: (a) Denial of payment for medical services or
nonprovision of medical services included in the covered person's health
benefit plan, or (b) service delivery issues other than denial of payment for
medical services or nonprovision of medical services, including dissatisfaction
with medical care, waiting time for medical services, provider or staff
attitude or demeanor, or dissatisfaction with service provided by the health
carrier.

(15) "Health care
facility" or "facility" means hospices licensed under chapter
70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, rural health care
facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020, psychiatric hospitals licensed under
chapter 71.12 RCW, nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, community
mental health centers licensed under chapter 71.05 or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease
treatment centers licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, ambulatory diagnostic,
treatment, or surgical facilities licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, drug and
alcohol treatment facilities licensed under chapter 70.96A RCW, and home health
agencies licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and includes such facilities if
owned and operated by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the state
and such other facilities as required by federal law and implementing
regulations.

(16) "Health care
provider" or "provider" means:

(a) A person regulated
under Title 18 or chapter 70.127 RCW, to practice health or health-related
services or otherwise practicing health care services in this state consistent
with state law; or

(b) An employee or
agent of a person described in (a) of this subsection, acting in the course and
scope of his or her employment.

(17) "Health care
service" means that service offered or provided by health care facilities
and health care providers relating to the prevention, cure, or treatment of
illness, injury, or disease.

(18) "Health
carrier" or "carrier" means a disability insurer regulated under
chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in RCW
48.44.010, or a health maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020.

(19) "Health
plan" or "health benefit plan" means any policy, contract, or
agreement offered by a health carrier to provide, arrange, reimburse, or pay
for health care services except the following:

(a) Long-term care
insurance governed by chapter 48.84 RCW;

(b) Medicare
supplemental health insurance governed by chapter 48.66 RCW;

(c) Limited health care
services offered by limited health care service contractors in accordance with
RCW 48.44.035;

(d) Disability income;

(e) Coverage incidental
to a property/casualty liability insurance policy such as automobile personal
injury protection coverage and homeowner guest medical;

(f) Workers'
compensation coverage;

(g) Accident only
coverage;

(h) Specified disease
and hospital confinement indemnity when marketed solely as a supplement to a
health plan;

(i) Employer-sponsored
self-funded health plans;

(j) Dental only and
vision only coverage; and

(k) Plans deemed by the
insurance commissioner to have a short-term limited purpose or duration, or to
be a student-only plan that is guaranteed renewable while the covered person is
enrolled as a regular full-time undergraduate or graduate student at an
accredited higher education institution, after a written request for such
classification by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the insurance
commissioner.

(20) "Material
modification" means a change in the actuarial value of the health plan as
modified of more than five percent but less than fifteen percent.

(21) "Preexisting
condition" means any medical condition, illness, or injury that existed
any time prior to the effective date of coverage.

(22)
"Premium" means all sums charged, received, or deposited by a health
carrier as consideration for a health plan or the continuance of a health
plan. Any assessment or any "membership," "policy,"
"contract," "service," or similar fee or charge made by a
health carrier in consideration for a health plan is deemed part of the
premium. "Premium" shall not include amounts paid as enrollee
point-of-service cost-sharing.

(23) "Review
organization" means a disability insurer regulated under chapter 48.20 or
48.21 RCW, health care service contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or
health maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020, and entities
affiliated with, under contract with, or acting on behalf of a health carrier
to perform a utilization review.

(24) "Small
employer" or "small group" means ((any person,)) a
firm, corporation, partnership, association, or political subdivision((,
or self-employed individual)) that is actively engaged in business that, on
at least fifty percent of its working days during the preceding calendar
quarter, employed at least two but no more than fifty eligible
employees, with a normal work week of thirty or more hours, the majority of
whom were employed within this state, and is not formed primarily for purposes
of buying health insurance and in which a bona fide employer-employee
relationship exists. In determining the number of eligible employees,
companies that are affiliated companies, or that are eligible to file a
combined tax return for purposes of taxation by this state, shall be considered
an employer. Subsequent to the issuance of a health plan to a small employer
and for the purpose of determining eligibility, the size of a small employer
shall be determined annually. Except as otherwise specifically provided, a
small employer shall continue to be considered a small employer until the plan
anniversary following the date the small employer no longer meets the requirements
of this definition. ((The term "small employer" includes a
self-employed individual or sole proprietor. The term "small
employer" also includes a self-employed individual or sole proprietor who
derives at least seventy-five percent of his or her income from a trade or
business through which the individual or sole proprietor has attempted to earn
taxable income and for which he or she has filed the appropriate internal
revenue service form 1040, schedule C or F, for the previous taxable year.))

(25) "Utilization
review" means the prospective, concurrent, or retrospective assessment of
the necessity and appropriateness of the allocation of health care resources
and services of a provider or facility, given or proposed to be given to an enrollee
or group of enrollees.

(26) "Wellness
activity" means an explicit program of an activity consistent with
department of health guidelines, such as, smoking cessation, injury and
accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse, appropriate weight reduction,
exercise, automobile and motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and
nutrition education for the purpose of improving enrollee health status and
reducing health service costs.

Sec. 3. RCW 48.44.023 and 1995 c
265 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A health care
services contractor ((offering any)) may offer a health benefit
plan to a small employer ((shall offer and actively market to the small
employer a health benefit plan providing benefits identical to the)), as
defined in RCW 48.43.005, featuring a limited schedule of covered health
services ((that are required to be delivered to an individual enrolled in
the basic health plan)). Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a
contractor from offering, or a small employer from purchasing, other health
benefit plans that may have more ((or less)) comprehensive benefits than
((the basic health plan, provided such plans are in accordance with this
chapter)) those included in the product offered under this section.
A contractor offering a health benefit plan ((that does not include benefits
in the basic health plan)) under this subsection shall clearly
disclose ((these differences)) all covered benefits to the small
employer in a brochure approved by the commissioner.

(b) A health benefit
plan offered under this subsection shall provide coverage for hospital
expenses and services rendered by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW but ((is not subject to the requirements of)) will not
include the services identified in RCW 48.44.225, 48.44.240, 48.44.245, ((48.44.290,))
48.44.300, 48.44.310, 48.44.315, 48.44.320, 48.44.325, 48.44.330,
48.44.335, 48.44.340, 48.44.344, 48.44.360, 48.44.400, 48.44.440, 48.44.450, ((and))
48.44.460 ((if: (i) The health benefit plan is the mandatory offering under
(a) of this subsection that provides benefits identical to the basic health
plan, to the extent these requirements differ from the basic health plan; or
(ii) the health benefit plan is offered to employers with not more than
twenty-five employees)), 48.44.500, 48.43.045(1), 48.43.125, or
48.43.180.

(2) Nothing in this
section shall prohibit a health care service contractor from offering, or a
purchaser from seeking, benefits in excess of the ((basic health plan
services)) health benefit plan offered under subsection (1) of this
section. All forms, policies, and contracts shall be submitted for
approval to the commissioner, and the rates of any plan offered under subsection
(1) of this section shall be reasonable in relation to the benefits
thereto.

(3) Premium rates for
health benefit plans for small employers as defined in this section shall be
subject to the following provisions:

(a) The contractor shall
develop its rates based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the
adjusted community rate for:

(i) Geographic area;

(ii) Family size;

(iii) Age; ((and))

(iv) Wellness
activities;

(v) Industry; and

(vi) Any other
factor that the commissioner finds to be appropriate.

(b) The adjustment for
age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not use age brackets smaller than
five-year increments, which shall begin with age twenty and end with age
sixty-five. Employees under the age of twenty shall be treated as those age
twenty.

(c) The contractor
shall be permitted to develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or
older for coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for
which medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection (3).

(d) The permitted rates
for any age group shall be no more than ((four hundred twenty-five percent
of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent
on January 1, 1997, and)) three hundred seventy-five percent of the
lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 2000, and five hundred
percent on January 1, 2003, and thereafter.

(e) A discount for
wellness activities shall be permitted to reflect actuarially justified
differences in utilization or cost attributed to such programs not to exceed
twenty percent.

(f) The rate charged
for a health benefit plan offered under this section may not be adjusted more
frequently than annually except that the premium may be changed to reflect:

(i) Changes to the
enrollment of the small employer;

(ii) Changes to the
family composition of the employee;

(iii) Changes to the
health benefit plan requested by the small employer; or

(iv) Changes in
government requirements affecting the health benefit plan.

(g) Rating factors
shall produce premiums for identical groups that differ only by the amounts
attributable to plan design, with the exception of discounts for health
improvement programs.

(h) For the purposes of
this section, a health benefit plan that contains a restricted network
provision shall not be considered similar coverage to a health benefit plan
that does not contain such a provision, provided that the restrictions of
benefits to network providers result in substantial differences in claims
costs. This subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of
benefits as provided in RCW 48.43.015.

(i) Adjusted community
rates established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
groups purchasing coverage.

(4) ((The health
benefit plans authorized by this section that are lower than the required
offering shall not supplant or supersede any existing policy for the benefit of
employees in this state.)) Nothing in this section shall restrict the
right of employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in
excess of those provided herein.

(5)(a) Except as
provided in this subsection, requirements used by a contractor in determining
whether to provide coverage to a small employer shall be applied uniformly
among all small employers applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the
carrier.

(b) A contractor shall
not require a minimum participation level greater than:

(i) One hundred percent
of eligible employees working for groups with three or less employees; and

(ii) Seventy-five
percent of eligible employees working for groups with more than three
employees.

(c) In applying minimum
participation requirements with respect to a small employer, a small employer
shall not consider employees or dependents who have similar existing coverage
in determining whether the applicable percentage of participation is met.

(d) A contractor may
not increase any requirement for minimum employee participation or modify any
requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a small employer at
any time after the small employer has been accepted for coverage.

(6) A contractor must
offer coverage to all eligible employees of a small employer and their
dependents. A contractor may not offer coverage to only certain individuals or
dependents in a small employer group or to only part of the group. A
contractor may not modify a health plan with respect to a small employer or any
eligible employee or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to
restrict or exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical
conditions, or services otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 4. RCW 48.46.066 and 1995 c
265 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A health
maintenance organization ((offering any)) may offer a health
benefit plan to a small employer ((shall offer and actively market to the
small employer a health benefit plan providing benefits identical to the)),
as defined in RCW 48.43.005, featuring a limited schedule of covered health
services ((that are required to be delivered to an individual enrolled in
the basic health plan)). Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a
health maintenance organization from offering, or a small employer from
purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more ((or less))
comprehensive benefits than ((the basic health plan, provided such plans are
in accordance with this chapter)) those included in the product offered
under this section. A health maintenance organization offering a health
benefit plan ((that does not include benefits in the basic health plan))
under this subsection shall clearly disclose ((these differences))
all covered benefits to the small employer in a brochure approved by the
commissioner.

(b) A health benefit
plan offered under this subsection shall provide coverage for hospital
expenses and services rendered by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW but ((is not subject to the requirements of)) will not
include the services identified in RCW 48.46.272, 48.46.275,
48.46.280, 48.46.285, 48.46.290, 48.46.350, 48.46.355, 48.46.375, 48.46.440,
48.46.480, 48.46.510, 48.46.520, ((and)) 48.46.530 ((if: (i) The
health benefit plan is the mandatory offering under (a) of this subsection that
provides benefits identical to the basic health plan, to the extent these
requirements differ from the basic health plan; or (ii) the health benefit plan
is offered to employers with not more than twenty-five employees)),
48.46.565, 48.46.570, 48.43.045(1), 48.43.125, and 48.43.180.

(2) Nothing in this
section shall prohibit a health maintenance organization from offering, or a
purchaser from seeking, benefits in excess of the ((basic health plan
services)) health benefit plan offered under subsection (1) of this
section. All forms, policies, and contracts shall be submitted for
approval to the commissioner, and the rates of any plan offered under subsection
(1) of this section shall be reasonable in relation to the benefits
thereto.

(3) Premium rates for
health benefit plans for small employers as defined in this section shall be
subject to the following provisions:

(a) The health
maintenance organization shall develop its rates based on an adjusted community
rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:

(i) Geographic area;

(ii) Family size;

(iii) Age; ((and))

(iv) Wellness
activities;

(v) Industry; and

(vi) Any factor that
the commissioner finds to be appropriate.

(b) The adjustment for
age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not use age brackets smaller than
five-year increments, which shall begin with age twenty and end with age
sixty-five. Employees under the age of twenty shall be treated as those age
twenty.

(c) The health
maintenance organization shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is the
primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary payer. Both
rates shall be subject to the requirements of this subsection (3).

(d) The permitted rates
for any age group shall be no more than ((four hundred twenty-five percent
of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent
on January 1, 1997, and)) three hundred seventy-five percent of the
lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 2000, and five hundred
percent on January 1, 2003, and thereafter.

(e) A discount for
wellness activities shall be permitted to reflect actuarially justified
differences in utilization or cost attributed to such programs not to exceed
twenty percent.

(f) The rate charged
for a health benefit plan offered under this section may not be adjusted more
frequently than annually except that the premium may be changed to reflect:

(i) Changes to the
enrollment of the small employer;

(ii) Changes to the
family composition of the employee;

(iii) Changes to the
health benefit plan requested by the small employer; or

(iv) Changes in
government requirements affecting the health benefit plan.

(g) Rating factors
shall produce premiums for identical groups that differ only by the amounts
attributable to plan design, with the exception of discounts for health
improvement programs.

(h) For the purposes of
this section, a health benefit plan that contains a restricted network
provision shall not be considered similar coverage to a health benefit plan
that does not contain such a provision, provided that the restrictions of
benefits to network providers result in substantial differences in claims
costs. This subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of
benefits as provided in RCW 48.43.015.

(i) Adjusted community
rates established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
groups purchasing coverage.

(4) ((The health
benefit plans authorized by this section that are lower than the required
offering shall not supplant or supersede any existing policy for the benefit of
employees in this state.)) Nothing in this section shall restrict the
right of employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in
excess of those provided herein.

(5)(a) Except as
provided in this subsection, requirements used by a health maintenance
organization in determining whether to provide coverage to a small employer
shall be applied uniformly among all small employers applying for coverage or
receiving coverage from the carrier.

(b) A health
maintenance organization shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:

(i) One hundred percent
of eligible employees working for groups with three or less employees; and

(ii) Seventy-five
percent of eligible employees working for groups with more than three
employees.

(c) In applying minimum
participation requirements with respect to a small employer, a small employer
shall not consider employees or dependents who have similar existing coverage
in determining whether the applicable percentage of participation is met.

(d) A health
maintenance organization may not increase any requirement for minimum employee
participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer contribution
applicable to a small employer at any time after the small employer has been
accepted for coverage.

(6) A health
maintenance organization must offer coverage to all eligible employees of a
small employer and their dependents. A health maintenance organization may not
offer coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer
group or to only part of the group. A health maintenance organization may not
modify a health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee
or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or exclude
coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions, or services
otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 5. RCW 48.43.035 and 2000 c
79 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

For group health
benefit plans, the following shall apply:

(1) All health carriers
shall accept for enrollment any state resident within the group to whom the
plan is offered and within the carrier's service area and provide or assure the
provision of all covered services regardless of age, sex, family structure,
ethnicity, race, health condition, geographic location, employment status,
socioeconomic status, other condition or situation, or the provisions of RCW
49.60.174(2). The insurance commissioner may grant a temporary exemption from
this subsection, if, upon application by a health carrier the commissioner
finds that the clinical, financial, or administrative capacity to serve
existing enrollees will be impaired if a health carrier is required to continue
enrollment of additional eligible individuals.

(2) Except as provided
in subsection (5) of this section, all health plans shall contain or
incorporate by endorsement a guarantee of the continuity of coverage of the
plan. For the purposes of this section, a plan is "renewed" when it
is continued beyond the earliest date upon which, at the carrier's sole option,
the plan could have been terminated for other than nonpayment of premium. The
carrier may consider the group's anniversary date as the renewal date for
purposes of complying with the provisions of this section.

(3) The guarantee of
continuity of coverage required in health plans shall not prevent a carrier
from canceling or nonrenewing a health plan for:

(a) Nonpayment of
premium;

(b) Violation of
published policies of the carrier approved by the insurance commissioner;

(c) Covered persons
entitled to become eligible for medicare benefits by reason of age who fail to
apply for a medicare supplement plan or medicare cost, risk, or other plan
offered by the carrier pursuant to federal laws and regulations;

(d) Covered persons who
fail to pay any deductible or copayment amount owed to the carrier and not the
provider of health care services;

(e) Covered persons
committing fraudulent acts as to the carrier;

(f) Covered persons who
materially breach the health plan; or

(g) Change or
implementation of federal or state laws that no longer permit the continued
offering of such coverage.

(4) ((The provisions
of)) This section ((do)) does not apply in the
following cases:

(a) A carrier has zero
enrollment on a product; or

(b) For group health
plans sold to groups other than small employer groups, a carrier replaces a
product and the replacement product is provided to all covered persons within
that class or line of business, includes all of the services covered under the
replaced product, and does not significantly limit access to the kind of
services covered under the replaced product. The health plan may also allow
unrestricted conversion to a fully comparable product; or

(c) For group health
plans offered to small employer groups, no sooner than October 1, 2002, a
carrier discontinues offering a particular type of health benefit plan if: (i)
The carrier provides notice to each group provided coverage of this type of the
discontinuation at least ninety days prior to the date of the discontinuation;
(ii) the carrier offers to each group provided coverage of this type the option
to enroll in any other small employer group health benefit plan currently being
offered by the carrier; and (iii) in exercising the option to discontinue
coverage of this type and in offering the option of coverage under (c)(ii) of
this subsection, the carrier acts uniformly without regard to any health
status-related factor of individuals enrolled through the small employer group,
individuals who may become eligible for such coverage, or the collective health
status of groups enrolled in coverage of this type; or

(d) A carrier
discontinues offering all small employer group health coverage in the state and
discontinues coverage under all existing small employer group health benefit
plans if: (i) The carrier provides notice to the commissioner of its intent to
discontinue offering all small employer group health coverage in the state and
its intent to discontinue coverage under all existing health benefit plans at
least one hundred eighty days prior to the date of the discontinuation of
coverage under all existing health benefit plans; and (ii) the carrier provides
notice to each covered small employer group of the intent to discontinue his or
her existing health benefit plan at least one hundred eighty days prior to the
date of the discontinuation and includes information in the notice that can
help the small employer group identify alternative sources of coverage. In the
case of discontinuation under this subsection, the carrier may not issue any
small employer group health coverage in this state for a five-year period beginning
on the date of the discontinuation of the last health plan not so renewed.
Nothing in this subsection (3) may be construed to require a carrier to provide
notice to the commissioner of its intent to discontinue offering a health
benefit plan to new applicants where the carrier does not discontinue coverage
of existing enrollees under that health benefit plan; or

(e) A carrier is
withdrawing from a service area or from a segment of its service area because
the carrier has demonstrated to the insurance commissioner that the carrier's
clinical, financial, or administrative capacity to serve enrollees would be
exceeded.

(5) The provisions of
this section do not apply to health plans deemed by the insurance commissioner
to be unique or limited or have a short-term purpose, after a written request
for such classification by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the
insurance commissioner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Section 5 of this act
takes effect January 1, 2004.

---
END ---