BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.56.210 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.210 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of robbery in the second degree if he or she commits robbery within
and against a financial institution as defined in RCW 7.88.010 or 35.38.060 and
under circumstances not amounting to robbery in the first degree.

(2) Robbery in the
second degree is a class B felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 9A.56 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of robbery in the third degree if he or she commits robbery under circumstances
not amounting to robbery in the first degree or robbery in the second degree.

(2) Robbery in the
third degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.41.010 and 2001 c
300 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Firearm"
means a weapon or device from which a projectile or projectiles may be fired by
an explosive such as gunpowder.

(2) "Pistol"
means any firearm with a barrel less than sixteen inches in length, or is
designed to be held and fired by the use of a single hand.

(3) "Rifle"
means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired
from the shoulder and designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to
use the energy of the explosive in a fixed metallic cartridge to fire only a
single projectile through a rifled bore for each single pull of the trigger.

(4)
"Short-barreled rifle" means a rifle having one or more barrels less
than sixteen inches in length and any weapon made from a rifle by any means of
modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less than
twenty-six inches.

(5) "Shotgun"
means a weapon with one or more barrels, designed or redesigned, made or
remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned,
made or remade, and intended to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed
shotgun shell to fire through a smooth bore either a number of ball shot or a
single projectile for each single pull of the trigger.

(6)
"Short-barreled shotgun" means a shotgun having one or more barrels
less than eighteen inches in length and any weapon made from a shotgun by any
means of modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less
than twenty-six inches.

(7) "Machine
gun" means any firearm known as a machine gun, mechanical rifle,
submachine gun, or any other mechanism or instrument not requiring that the
trigger be pressed for each shot and having a reservoir clip, disc, drum, belt,
or other separable mechanical device for storing, carrying, or supplying
ammunition which can be loaded into the firearm, mechanism, or instrument, and
fired therefrom at the rate of five or more shots per second.

(8) "Antique
firearm" means a firearm or replica of a firearm not designed or
redesigned for using rim fire or conventional center fire ignition with fixed ammunition
and manufactured in or before 1898, including any matchlock, flintlock,
percussion cap, or similar type of ignition system and also any firearm using
fixed ammunition manufactured in or before 1898, for which ammunition is no
longer manufactured in the United States and is not readily available in the
ordinary channels of commercial trade.

(9) "Loaded"
means:

(a) There is a
cartridge in the chamber of the firearm;

(b) Cartridges are in a
clip that is locked in place in the firearm;

(c) There is a
cartridge in the cylinder of the firearm, if the firearm is a revolver;

(d) There is a
cartridge in the tube or magazine that is inserted in the action; or

(e) There is a ball in
the barrel and the firearm is capped or primed if the firearm is a muzzle
loader.

(10) "Dealer"
means a person engaged in the business of selling firearms at wholesale or
retail who has, or is required to have, a federal firearms license under 18
U.S.C. Sec. 923(a). A person who does not have, and is not required to have, a
federal firearms license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a), is not a dealer if that
person makes only occasional sales, exchanges, or purchases of firearms for the
enhancement of a personal collection or for a hobby, or sells all or part of
his or her personal collection of firearms.

(11) "Crime of
violence" means:

(a) Any of the
following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended: Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony,
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony,
manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second degree, indecent
liberties if committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in the second degree,
arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in
the second degree, extortion in the first degree, burglary in the second
degree, residential burglary, ((and)) robbery in the second degree,
and robbery in the third degree;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996, which is
comparable to a felony classified as a crime of violence in (a) of this
subsection; and

(c) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense comparable to a felony classified as a
crime of violence under (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(12) "Serious
offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit
any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended:

(a) Any crime of
violence;

(b) Any felony
violation of the uniform controlled substances act, chapter 69.50 RCW, that is
classified as a class B felony or that has a maximum term of imprisonment of at
least ten years;

(c) Child molestation
in the second degree;

(d) Incest when
committed against a child under age fourteen;

(e) Indecent liberties;

(f) Leading organized
crime;

(g) Promoting
prostitution in the first degree;

(h) Rape in the third
degree;

(i) Drive-by shooting;

(j) Sexual
exploitation;

(k) Vehicular assault,
when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving
of a vehicle in a reckless manner;

(l) Vehicular homicide,
when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502,
or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(m) Any other class B
felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation, as "sexual
motivation" is defined under RCW 9.94A.030;

(n) Any other felony
with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.602; or

(o) Any felony offense
in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996, that is comparable to a serious
offense, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under
the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious offense.

(13) "Law
enforcement officer" includes a general authority Washington peace officer
as defined in RCW 10.93.020, or a specially commissioned Washington peace
officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020. "Law enforcement officer" also
includes a limited authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW
10.93.020 if such officer is duly authorized by his or her employer to carry a
concealed pistol.

(14) "Felony"
means any felony offense under the laws of this state or any federal or
out-of-state offense comparable to a felony offense under the laws of this
state.

(15) "Sell"
refers to the actual approval of the delivery of a firearm in consideration of
payment or promise of payment of a certain price in money.

(16) "Barrel
length" means the distance from the bolt face of a closed action down the
length of the axis of the bore to the crown of the muzzle, or in the case of a
barrel with attachments to the end of any legal device permanently attached to
the end of the muzzle.

(17) "Family or
household member" means "family" or "household member"
as used in RCW 10.99.020.

Sec. 4. RCW 9.94A.030 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 301, 2001 c 300 s 3, and 2001 c 7 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Board"
means the indeterminate sentence review board created under chapter 9.95 RCW.

(2)
"Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit,"
or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection agreement
authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring and enforcing the
offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial obligation, receiving
payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with current law, delivering
daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk without depositing it in a
departmental account.

(3)
"Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(4) "Community
corrections officer" means an employee of the department who is
responsible for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced
offenders and monitoring of sentence conditions.

(5) "Community
custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence of confinement in
lieu of earned release time or imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b),
9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670, 9.94A.690, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or
9.94A.545, served in the community subject to controls placed on the offender's
movement and activities by the department. For offenders placed on community
custody for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department shall
assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and modify conditions
of community custody, in addition to those imposed by the court, based upon the
risk to community safety.

(6) "Community
custody range" means the minimum and maximum period of community custody
included as part of a sentence under RCW 9.94A.715, as established by the
commission or the legislature under RCW 9.94A.850, for crimes committed on or
after July 1, 2000.

(7) "Community
placement" means that period during which the offender is subject to the
conditions of community custody and/or postrelease supervision, which begins
either upon completion of the term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or
at such time as the offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of
earned release. Community placement may consist of entirely community custody,
entirely postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.

(8) "Community
service" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the
benefit of the community by the offender.

(9) "Community
supervision" means a period of time during which a convicted offender is
subject to crime-related prohibitions and other sentence conditions imposed by
a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW 16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the
court finds that any offender has a chemical dependency that has contributed to
his or her offense, the conditions of supervision may, subject to available
resources, include treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for
out-of-state supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be considered
the same as probation by other states.

(10) "Confinement"
means total or partial confinement.

(11)
"Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles 10 or
13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of
a plea of guilty.

(12)
"Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting
conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the
offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders
directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs or
to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary
to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by the
department.

(13) "Criminal
history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions and juvenile
adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or elsewhere. The
history shall include, where known, for each conviction (a) whether the
defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms thereof; and
(b) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of
incarceration.

(14) "Day
fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that equals the
difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable
obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any
dependents.

(15) "Day
reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to monitor the
offender's daily activities and compliance with sentence conditions, and in
which the offender is required to report daily to a specific location
designated by the department or the sentencing court.

(16)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(17) "Determinate
sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude the number of
actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial confinement, of
community supervision, the number of actual hours or days of community service
work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement
shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate sentence.

(18) "Disposable
earnings" means that part of the earnings of an offender remaining after
the deduction from those earnings of any amount required by law to be
withheld. For the purposes of this definition, "earnings" means
compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as
wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and, notwithstanding any
other provision of law making the payments exempt from garnishment, attachment,
or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation,
specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made under
Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050, or Title 74
RCW.

(19) "Drug
offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option available to
persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent offense or a sex
offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW 9.94A.660.

(20) "Drug
offense" means:

(a) Any felony
violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(d)) or forged prescription for a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.403);

(b) Any offense defined
as a felony under federal law that relates to the possession, manufacture,
distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance; or

(c) Any out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(21) "Earned
release" means earned release from confinement as provided in RCW
9.94A.728.

(22) "Escape"
means:

(a) Sexually violent
predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110),
escape in the second degree (RCW 9A.76.120), willful failure to return from
furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070),
or willful failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this subsection.

(23) "Felony
traffic offense" means:

(a) Vehicular homicide
(RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding a police officer
(RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(24) "Fine"
means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the
offender to the court over a specific period of time.

(25) "First-time
offender" means any person who has no prior convictions for a felony and
is eligible for the first-time offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.

(26) "Home
detention" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders
wherein the offender is confined in a private residence subject to electronic
surveillance.

(27) "Legal
financial obligation" means a sum of money that is ordered by a superior
court of the state of Washington for legal financial obligations which may
include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed crime victims'
compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or
interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense,
fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a
result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or
vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial obligations may also include payment
to a public agency of the expense of an emergency response to the incident
resulting in the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.

(28) "Most serious
offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit
any of the following felonies:

(a) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation of or criminal
conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b) Assault in the
second degree;

(c) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(d) Child molestation
in the second degree;

(e) Controlled
substance homicide;

(f) Extortion in the
first degree;

(g) Incest when
committed against a child under age fourteen;

(h) Indecent liberties;

(i) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(j) Leading organized
crime;

(k) Manslaughter in the
first degree;

(l) Manslaughter in the
second degree;

(m) Promoting prostitution
in the first degree;

(n) Rape in the third
degree;

(o) Robbery in the
second degree;

(p) Sexual
exploitation;

(q) Vehicular assault,
when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving
of a vehicle in a reckless manner;

(r) Vehicular homicide,
when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502,
or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(s) Any other class B
felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation;

(t) Any other felony
with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.602;

(u) Any felony offense
in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is comparable to a most
serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(v)(i) A prior
conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c),
chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW
9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11,
1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986,
until July 1, 1988;

(ii) A prior conviction
for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11,
1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was committed against a child
under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and
perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997, or RCW
9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993, through July 27,
1997.

(29) "Nonviolent
offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.

(30)
"Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by
state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is less than eighteen years
of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030
or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms
"offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.

(31) "Partial
confinement" means confinement for no more than one year in a facility or
institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit
of government, or, if home detention or work crew has been ordered by the
court, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the
balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work
release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and home
detention.

(32) "Persistent
offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i) Has been
convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious offense; and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this state or
elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be considered
most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score under RCW
9.94A.525; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one
conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i) Has been
convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the first
degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible compulsion;
(B) any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder
in the first degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping
in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first degree,
or burglary in the first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed
in this subsection (32)(b)(i); and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or elsewhere, of an
offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection or any federal or out-of-state
offense or offense under prior Washington law that is comparable to the
offenses listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child
in the first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the offender
committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second degree
constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender
was eighteen years of age or older when the offender committed the offense.

(33) "Postrelease
supervision" is that portion of an offender's community placement that is
not community custody.

(34)
"Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specified period of time
as payment of damages. The sum may include both public and private costs.

(35) "Risk
assessment" means the application of an objective instrument supported by
research and adopted by the department for the purpose of assessing an
offender's risk of reoffense, taking into consideration the nature of the harm
done by the offender, place and circumstances of the offender related to risk,
the offender's relationship to any victim, and any information provided to the
department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not be based on
unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

(36) "Serious
traffic offense" means:

(a) Driving while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), actual
physical control while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended
vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or

(b) Any federal,
out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the
laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(37) "Serious
violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and means:

(a)(i) Murder in the
first degree;

(ii) Homicide by abuse;

(iii) Murder in the
second degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in the
first degree;

(v) Assault in the
first degree;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
first degree;

(vii) Rape in the first
degree;

(viii) Assault of a
child in the first degree; or

(ix) An attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of these felonies;
or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(38) "Sex
offense" means:

(a)(i) A felony that is
a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than RCW 9A.44.130(11);

(ii) A violation of RCW
9A.64.020;

(iii) A felony that is
a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than RCW 9.68A.070 or 9.68A.080; or

(iv) A felony that is,
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal
conspiracy to commit such crimes;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this subsection;

(c) A felony with a
finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or

(d) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this subsection.

(39) "Sexual
motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the defendant
committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification.

(40) "Standard
sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in
imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(41) "Statutory
maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time for which an offender
may be confined as punishment for a crime as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW,
RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the crime, or other statute defining the
maximum penalty for a crime.

(42) "Total
confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries of a
facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any
other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW
72.64.050 and 72.64.060.

(43) "Transition
training" means written and verbal instructions and assistance provided by
the department to the offender during the two weeks prior to the offender's
successful completion of the work ethic camp program. The transition training
shall include instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations
during the offender's period of community custody.

(44) "Victim"
means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or
financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the crime charged.

(45) "Violent
offense" means:

(a) Any of the
following felonies:

(i) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony;

(ii) Criminal
solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(iii) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the second degree;

(v) Indecent liberties
if committed by forcible compulsion;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(vii) Arson in the
second degree;

(viii) Assault in the
second degree;

(ix) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(x) Extortion in the
first degree;

(xi) Robbery in the
second degree;

(xii) Robbery in the
third degree;

(xiii) Drive-by
shooting;

(((xiii))) (xiv)
Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a
person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the
operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner; and

(((xiv))) (xv)
Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by
any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as
defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless
manner;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of this subsection;
and

(c) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b) of this
subsection.

(46) "Work
crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of civic
improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that complies with RCW
9.94A.725.

(47) "Work ethic
camp" means an alternative incarceration program as provided in RCW
9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by
requiring offenders to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and
vocational experiences, character-building work ethics training, life
management skills development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling,
literacy training, and basic adult education.

(48) "Work
release" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders who
are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study at school.

Sec. 5. RCW 9.94A.411 and 2000 c
119 s 28 and 2000 c 28 s 17 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Decision not to
prosecute.

STANDARD: A
prosecuting attorney may decline to prosecute, even though technically
sufficient evidence to prosecute exists, in situations where prosecution would
serve no public purpose, would defeat the underlying purpose of the law in
question or would result in decreased respect for the law.

GUIDELINE/COMMENTARY:

Examples

The following are
examples of reasons not to prosecute which could satisfy the standard.

(a) Contrary to
Legislative Intent - It may be proper to decline to charge where the
application of criminal sanctions would be clearly contrary to the intent of
the legislature in enacting the particular statute.

(b) Antiquated Statute
- It may be proper to decline to charge where the statute in question is
antiquated in that:

(i) It has not been
enforced for many years; and

(ii) Most members of
society act as if it were no longer in existence; and

(iii) It serves no
deterrent or protective purpose in today's society; and

(iv) The statute has
not been recently reconsidered by the legislature.

This reason is not to
be construed as the basis for declining cases because the law in question is
unpopular or because it is difficult to enforce.

(c) De Minimis
Violation - It may be proper to decline to charge where the violation of law is
only technical or insubstantial and where no public interest or deterrent
purpose would be served by prosecution.

(d) Confinement on
Other Charges - It may be proper to decline to charge because the accused has
been sentenced on another charge to a lengthy period of confinement; and

(i) Conviction of the
new offense would not merit any additional direct or collateral punishment;

(ii) The new offense is
either a misdemeanor or a felony which is not particularly aggravated; and

(iii) Conviction of the
new offense would not serve any significant deterrent purpose.

(e) Pending Conviction
on Another Charge - It may be proper to decline to charge because the accused
is facing a pending prosecution in the same or another county; and

(i) Conviction of the
new offense would not merit any additional direct or collateral punishment;

(ii) Conviction in the
pending prosecution is imminent;

(iii) The new offense
is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is not particularly aggravated; and

(iv) Conviction of the
new offense would not serve any significant deterrent purpose.

(f) High
Disproportionate Cost of Prosecution - It may be proper to decline to charge
where the cost of locating or transporting, or the burden on, prosecution
witnesses is highly disproportionate to the importance of prosecuting the
offense in question. This reason should be limited to minor cases and should
not be relied upon in serious cases.

(g) Improper Motives of
Complainant - It may be proper to decline charges because the motives of the
complainant are improper and prosecution would serve no public purpose, would
defeat the underlying purpose of the law in question or would result in
decreased respect for the law.

(h) Immunity - It may
be proper to decline to charge where immunity is to be given to an accused in
order to prosecute another where the accused's information or testimony will
reasonably lead to the conviction of others who are responsible for more
serious criminal conduct or who represent a greater danger to the public
interest.

(i) Victim Request - It
may be proper to decline to charge because the victim requests that no criminal
charges be filed and the case involves the following crimes or situations:

(i) Assault cases where
the victim has suffered little or no injury;

(ii) Crimes against
property, not involving violence, where no major loss was suffered;

(iii) Where doing so
would not jeopardize the safety of society.

Care should be taken to
insure that the victim's request is freely made and is not the product of
threats or pressure by the accused.

The presence of these
factors may also justify the decision to dismiss a prosecution which has been
commenced.

Notification

The prosecutor is
encouraged to notify the victim, when practical, and the law enforcement
personnel, of the decision not to prosecute.

(2) Decision to prosecute.

(a) STANDARD:

Crimes against persons
will be filed if sufficient admissible evidence exists, which, when considered
with the most plausible, reasonably foreseeable defense that could be raised
under the evidence, would justify conviction by a reasonable and objective
fact-finder. With regard to offenses prohibited by RCW 9A.44.040, 9A.44.050,
9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, 9A.44.089, and 9A.64.020
the prosecutor should avoid prefiling agreements or diversions intended to place
the accused in a program of treatment or counseling, so that treatment, if
determined to be beneficial, can be provided pursuant to RCW 9.94A.670.

Crimes against
property/other crimes will be filed if the admissible evidence is of such
convincing force as to make it probable that a reasonable and objective
fact-finder would convict after hearing all the admissible evidence and the
most plausible defense that could be raised.

See table below for the
crimes within these categories.

CATEGORIZATION
OF CRIMES FOR PROSECUTING STANDARDS

CRIMES
AGAINST PERSONS

Aggravated
Murder

1st Degree Murder

2nd Degree Murder

1st Degree Manslaughter

2nd Degree Manslaughter

1st Degree Kidnapping

2nd Degree Kidnapping

1st Degree Assault

2nd Degree Assault

3rd Degree Assault

1st Degree Assault of a
Child

2nd Degree Assault of a
Child

3rd Degree Assault of a
Child

1st Degree Rape

2nd Degree Rape

3rd Degree Rape

1st Degree Rape of a
Child

2nd Degree Rape of a
Child

3rd Degree Rape of a
Child

1st Degree Robbery

2nd Degree Robbery

3rd Degree Robbery

1st Degree Arson

1st Degree Burglary

1st Degree Extortion

2nd Degree Extortion

Indecent Liberties

Incest

Vehicular Homicide

Vehicular Assault

1st Degree Child
Molestation

2nd Degree Child
Molestation

3rd Degree Child
Molestation

1st Degree Promoting
Prostitution

Intimidating a Juror

Communication with a
Minor

Intimidating a Witness

Intimidating a Public
Servant

Bomb Threat (if against
person)

Unlawful Imprisonment

Promoting a Suicide
Attempt

Riot (if against
person)

Stalking

Custodial Assault

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Counterfeiting (if a
violation of RCW 9.16.035(4))

CRIMES
AGAINST PROPERTY/OTHER CRIMES

2nd Degree
Arson

1st Degree
Escape

2nd Degree Escape

2nd Degree Burglary

1st Degree Theft

2nd Degree Theft

1st Degree Perjury

2nd Degree Perjury

1st Degree Introducing
Contraband

2nd Degree Introducing
Contraband

1st Degree Possession
of Stolen Property

2nd Degree Possession
of Stolen Property

Bribery

Bribing a Witness

Bribe received by a
Witness

Bomb Threat (if against
property)

1st Degree Malicious
Mischief

2nd Degree Malicious
Mischief

1st Degree Reckless
Burning

Taking a Motor Vehicle
without Authorization

Forgery

2nd Degree Promoting
Prostitution

Tampering with a
Witness

Trading in Public
Office

Trading in Special
Influence

Receiving/Granting
Unlawful Compensation

Bigamy

Eluding a Pursuing
Police Vehicle

Willful Failure to
Return from Furlough

Escape from Community
Custody

Riot (if against
property)

1st Degree Theft of
Livestock

2nd Degree Theft of
Livestock

ALL OTHER UNCLASSIFIED
FELONIES

Selection of
Charges/Degree of Charge

(i) The prosecutor
should file charges which adequately describe the nature of defendant's
conduct. Other offenses may be charged only if they are necessary to ensure
that the charges:

(A) Will significantly
enhance the strength of the state's case at trial; or

(B) Will result in
restitution to all victims.

(ii) The
prosecutor should not overcharge to obtain a guilty plea. Overcharging
includes:

(A)
Charging a higher degree;

(B) Charging additional
counts.

This standard is
intended to direct prosecutors to charge those crimes which demonstrate the
nature and seriousness of a defendant's criminal conduct, but to decline to
charge crimes which are not necessary to such an indication. Crimes which do
not merge as a matter of law, but which arise from the same course of conduct,
do not all have to be charged.

(b)
GUIDELINES/COMMENTARY:

(i) Police
Investigation

A prosecuting attorney
is dependent upon law enforcement agencies to conduct the necessary factual
investigation which must precede the decision to prosecute. The prosecuting
attorney shall ensure that a thorough factual investigation has been conducted
before a decision to prosecute is made. In ordinary circumstances the investigation
should include the following:

(A) The interviewing of
all material witnesses, together with the obtaining of written statements
whenever possible;

(B) The completion of
necessary laboratory tests; and

(C) The obtaining, in
accordance with constitutional requirements, of the suspect's version of the
events.

If the initial
investigation is incomplete, a prosecuting attorney should insist upon further
investigation before a decision to prosecute is made, and specify what the
investigation needs to include.

(ii) Exceptions

In certain situations,
a prosecuting attorney may authorize filing of a criminal complaint before the
investigation is complete if:

(A) Probable cause
exists to believe the suspect is guilty; and

(B) The suspect
presents a danger to the community or is likely to flee if not apprehended; or

(C) The arrest of the
suspect is necessary to complete the investigation of the crime.

In the event that the
exception to the standard is applied, the prosecuting attorney shall obtain a
commitment from the law enforcement agency involved to complete the
investigation in a timely manner. If the subsequent investigation does not
produce sufficient evidence to meet the normal charging standard, the complaint
should be dismissed.

(iii) Investigation
Techniques

The prosecutor should
be fully advised of the investigatory techniques that were used in the case
investigation including:

(A) Polygraph testing;

(B) Hypnosis;

(C) Electronic
surveillance;

(D) Use of informants.

(iv) Pre-Filing
Discussions with Defendant

Discussions with the
defendant or his/her representative regarding the selection or disposition of
charges may occur prior to the filing of charges, and potential agreements can
be reached.

(v) Pre-Filing Discussions
with Victim(s)

Discussions with the
victim(s) or victims' representatives regarding the selection or disposition of
charges may occur before the filing of charges. The discussions may be
considered by the prosecutor in charging and disposition decisions, and should
be considered before reaching any agreement with the defendant regarding these
decisions.

Sec. 6. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 361, 2001 c 300 s 4, 2001 c 217 s 12, and 2001 c 17 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Sexually
Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity
Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(a))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
((2 (RCW 9A.56.210))) 3 (section 2 of this act)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by
the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Vehicular
Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety
of others (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity
Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(b))

Improperly
Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 7. RCW 9A.32.030 and 1990 c
200 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of murder in the first degree when:

(a) With a premeditated
intent to cause the death of another person, he or she causes the death of such
person or of a third person; or

(b) Under circumstances
manifesting an extreme indifference to human life, he or she engages in conduct
which creates a grave risk of death to any person, and thereby causes the death
of a person; or

(c) He or she commits
or attempts to commit the crime of either (1) robbery in the first ((or)),
second, or third degree, (2) rape in the first or second degree, (3)
burglary in the first degree, (4) arson in the first or second degree, or (5)
kidnapping in the first or second degree, and in the course of or in
furtherance of such crime or in immediate flight therefrom, he or she, or
another participant, causes the death of a person other than one of the
participants: Except that in any prosecution under this subdivision (1)(c) in
which the defendant was not the only participant in the underlying crime, if
established by the defendant by a preponderance of the evidence, it is a
defense that the defendant:

(i) Did not commit the
homicidal act or in any way solicit, request, command, importune, cause, or aid
the commission thereof; and

(ii) Was not armed with
a deadly weapon, or any instrument, article, or substance readily capable of
causing death or serious physical injury; and

(iii) Had no reasonable
grounds to believe that any other participant was armed with such a weapon,
instrument, article, or substance; and

(iv) Had no reasonable
grounds to believe that any other participant intended to engage in conduct
likely to result in death or serious physical injury.

(2) Murder in the first
degree is a class A felony.

Sec. 8. RCW 9A.82.010 and 2001 c
222 s 3 and 2001 c 217 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
requires the contrary, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.

(1)(a) "Beneficial
interest" means:

(i) The interest of a
person as a beneficiary under a trust established under Title 11 RCW in which
the trustee for the trust holds legal or record title to real property;

(ii) The interest of a
person as a beneficiary under any other trust arrangement under which a trustee
holds legal or record title to real property for the benefit of the
beneficiary; or

(iii) The interest of a
person under any other form of express fiduciary arrangement under which one
person holds legal or record title to real property for the benefit of the
other person.

(b) "Beneficial
interest" does not include the interest of a stockholder in a corporation
or the interest of a partner in a general partnership or limited partnership.

(c) A beneficial
interest is considered to be located where the real property owned by the
trustee is located.

(2) "Control"
means the possession of a sufficient interest to permit substantial direction
over the affairs of an enterprise.

(3) "Creditor"
means a person making an extension of credit or a person claiming by, under, or
through a person making an extension of credit.

(4) "Criminal
profiteering" means any act, including any anticipatory or completed
offense, committed for financial gain, that is chargeable or indictable under
the laws of the state in which the act occurred and, if the act occurred in a
state other than this state, would be chargeable or indictable under the laws
of this state had the act occurred in this state and punishable as a felony and
by imprisonment for more than one year, regardless of whether the act is
charged or indicted, as any of the following:

(a) Murder, as defined
in RCW 9A.32.030 and 9A.32.050;

(b) Robbery, as defined
in RCW 9A.56.200 ((and)), 9A.56.210, and section 2 of this act;

(c) Kidnapping, as
defined in RCW 9A.40.020 and 9A.40.030;

(d) Forgery, as defined
in RCW 9A.60.020 and 9A.60.030;

(e) Theft, as defined
in RCW 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, 9A.56.060, and 9A.56.080;

(f) Unlawful sale of
subscription television services, as defined in RCW 9A.56.230;

(g) Theft of
telecommunication services or unlawful manufacture of a telecommunication
device, as defined in RCW 9A.56.262 and 9A.56.264;

(h) Child selling or
child buying, as defined in RCW 9A.64.030;

(i) Bribery, as defined
in RCW 9A.68.010, 9A.68.020, 9A.68.040, and 9A.68.050;

(j) Gambling, as
defined in RCW 9.46.220 and 9.46.215 and 9.46.217;

(k) Extortion, as
defined in RCW 9A.56.120 and 9A.56.130;

(l) Extortionate
extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.020;

(m) Advancing money for
use in an extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.030;

(n) Collection of an
extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.040;

(o) Collection of an
unlawful debt, as defined in RCW 9A.82.045;

(p) Delivery or
manufacture of controlled substances or possession with intent to deliver or
manufacture controlled substances under chapter 69.50 RCW;

(q) Trafficking in
stolen property, as defined in RCW 9A.82.050;

(r) Leading organized
crime, as defined in RCW 9A.82.060;

(s) Money laundering,
as defined in RCW 9A.83.020;

(t) Obstructing
criminal investigations or prosecutions in violation of RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100, 9A.72.110, 9A.72.120, 9A.72.130, 9A.76.070, or 9A.76.180;

(u) Fraud in the
purchase or sale of securities, as defined in RCW 21.20.010;

(v) Promoting
pornography, as defined in RCW 9.68.140;

(w) Sexual exploitation
of children, as defined in RCW 9.68A.040, 9.68A.050, and 9.68A.060;

(x) Promoting
prostitution, as defined in RCW 9A.88.070 and 9A.88.080;

(y) Arson, as defined
in RCW 9A.48.020 and 9A.48.030;

(z) Assault, as defined
in RCW 9A.36.011 and 9A.36.021;

(aa) Assault of a
child, as defined in RCW 9A.36.120 and 9A.36.130;

(bb) A pattern of
equity skimming, as defined in RCW 61.34.020;

(cc) Commercial
telephone solicitation in violation of RCW 19.158.040(1);

(dd) Trafficking in
insurance claims, as defined in RCW 48.30A.015;

(ee) Unlawful practice
of law, as defined in RCW 2.48.180;

(ff) Commercial
bribery, as defined in RCW 9A.68.060;

(gg) Health care false
claims, as defined in RCW 48.80.030;

(hh) Unlicensed
practice of a profession or business, as defined in RCW 18.130.190(7);

(ii) Improperly
obtaining financial information, as defined in RCW 9.35.010; or

(jj) Identity theft, as
defined in RCW 9.35.020.

(5) "Dealer in
property" means a person who buys and sells property as a business.

(6) "Debtor"
means a person to whom an extension of credit is made or a person who
guarantees the repayment of an extension of credit or in any manner undertakes
to indemnify the creditor against loss resulting from the failure of a person
to whom an extension is made to repay the same.

(7) "Documentary
material" means any book, paper, document, writing, drawing, graph, chart,
photograph, phonograph record, magnetic tape, computer printout, other data
compilation from which information can be obtained or from which information
can be translated into usable form, or other tangible item.

(8)
"Enterprise" includes any individual, sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation, business trust, or other profit or nonprofit legal
entity, and includes any union, association, or group of individuals associated
in fact although not a legal entity, and both illicit and licit enterprises and
governmental and nongovernmental entities.

(9) "Extortionate
extension of credit" means an extension of credit with respect to which it
is the understanding of the creditor and the debtor at the time the extension
is made that delay in making repayment or failure to make repayment could
result in the use of violence or other criminal means to cause harm to the
person, reputation, or property of any person.

(10) "Extortionate
means" means the use, or an express or implicit threat of use, of violence
or other criminal means to cause harm to the person, reputation, or property of
any person.

(11) "Financial
institution" means any bank, trust company, savings and loan association,
savings bank, mutual savings bank, credit union, or loan company under the
jurisdiction of the state or an agency of the United States.

(12) "Pattern of
criminal profiteering activity" means engaging in at least three acts of
criminal profiteering, one of which occurred after July 1, 1985, and the last
of which occurred within five years, excluding any period of imprisonment,
after the commission of the earliest act of criminal profiteering. In order to
constitute a pattern, the three acts must have the same or similar intent,
results, accomplices, principals, victims, or methods of commission, or be
otherwise interrelated by distinguishing characteristics including a nexus to
the same enterprise, and must not be isolated events. However, in any civil
proceedings brought pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100 by any person other than the
attorney general or county prosecuting attorney in which one or more acts of
fraud in the purchase or sale of securities are asserted as acts of criminal
profiteering activity, it is a condition to civil liability under RCW 9A.82.100
that the defendant has been convicted in a criminal proceeding of fraud in the
purchase or sale of securities under RCW 21.20.400 or under the laws of another
state or of the United States requiring the same elements of proof, but such
conviction need not relate to any act or acts asserted as acts of criminal
profiteering activity in such civil action under RCW 9A.82.100.

(13) "Real
property" means any real property or interest in real property, including
but not limited to a land sale contract, lease, or mortgage of real property.

(14)
"Records" means any book, paper, writing, record, computer program,
or other material.

(15) "Repayment of
an extension of credit" means the repayment, satisfaction, or discharge in
whole or in part of a debt or claim, acknowledged or disputed, valid or
invalid, resulting from or in connection with that extension of credit.

(16) "Stolen
property" means property that has been obtained by theft, robbery, or extortion.

(17) "To collect
an extension of credit" means to induce in any way a person to make
repayment thereof.

(18) "To extend
credit" means to make or renew a loan or to enter into an agreement, tacit
or express, whereby the repayment or satisfaction of a debt or claim, whether
acknowledged or disputed, valid or invalid, and however arising, may or shall
be deferred.

(19)
"Traffic" means to sell, transfer, distribute, dispense, or otherwise
dispose of stolen property to another person, or to buy, receive, possess, or
obtain control of stolen property, with intent to sell, transfer, distribute,
dispense, or otherwise dispose of the property to another person.

(20)(a)
"Trustee" means:

(i) A person acting as
a trustee under a trust established under Title 11 RCW in which the trustee
holds legal or record title to real property;

(ii) A person who holds
legal or record title to real property in which another person has a beneficial
interest; or

(iii) A successor
trustee to a person who is a trustee under (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection.

(b) "Trustee"
does not mean a person appointed or acting as:

(i) A personal
representative under Title 11 RCW;

(ii) A trustee of any
testamentary trust;

(iii) A trustee of any
indenture of trust under which a bond is issued; or

(iv) A trustee under a
deed of trust.

(21) "Unlawful
debt" means any money or other thing of value constituting principal or
interest of a debt that is legally unenforceable in the state in full or in
part because the debt was incurred or contracted:

(a) In violation of any
one of the following:

(i) Chapter 67.16 RCW
relating to horse racing;

(ii) Chapter 9.46 RCW
relating to gambling;

(b) In a gambling
activity in violation of federal law; or

(c) In connection with
the business of lending money or a thing of value at a rate that is at least
twice the permitted rate under the applicable state or federal law relating to
usury.

Sec. 9. RCW 10.95.020 and 1998 c
305 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A person is guilty of
aggravated first degree murder if he or she commits first degree murder as
defined by RCW 9A.32.030(1)(a), as now or hereafter amended, and one or more of
the following aggravating circumstances exist:

(1) The victim was a
law enforcement officer, corrections officer, or fire fighter who was
performing his or her official duties at the time of the act resulting in death
and the victim was known or reasonably should have been known by the person to
be such at the time of the killing;

(2) At the time of the
act resulting in the death, the person was serving a term of imprisonment, had
escaped, or was on authorized or unauthorized leave in or from a state facility
or program for the incarceration or treatment of persons adjudicated guilty of
crimes;

(3) At the time of the
act resulting in death, the person was in custody in a county or county-city
jail as a consequence of having been adjudicated guilty of a felony;

(4) The person
committed the murder pursuant to an agreement that he or she would receive
money or any other thing of value for committing the murder;

(5) The person
solicited another person to commit the murder and had paid or had agreed to pay
money or any other thing of value for committing the murder;

(6) The person
committed the murder to obtain or maintain his or her membership or to advance
his or her position in the hierarchy of an organization, association, or
identifiable group;

(7) The murder was
committed during the course of or as a result of a shooting where the discharge
of the firearm, as defined in RCW 9.41.010, is either from a motor vehicle or
from the immediate area of a motor vehicle that was used to transport the
shooter or the firearm, or both, to the scene of the discharge;

(8) The victim was:

(a) A judge; juror or
former juror; prospective, current, or former witness in an adjudicative
proceeding; prosecuting attorney; deputy prosecuting attorney; defense
attorney; a member of the indeterminate sentence review board; or a probation
or parole officer; and

(b) The murder was
related to the exercise of official duties performed or to be performed by the
victim;

(9) The person
committed the murder to conceal the commission of a crime or to protect or
conceal the identity of any person committing a crime, including, but
specifically not limited to, any attempt to avoid prosecution as a persistent
offender as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(10) There was more
than one victim and the murders were part of a common scheme or plan or the
result of a single act of the person;

(11) The murder was
committed in the course of, in furtherance of, or in immediate flight from one
of the following crimes:

(a) Robbery in the
first ((or)), second, or third degree;

(b) Rape in the first or
second degree;

(c) Burglary in the
first or second degree or residential burglary;

(d) Kidnapping in the
first degree; or

(e) Arson in the first
degree;

(12) The victim was
regularly employed or self-employed as a newsreporter and the murder was committed
to obstruct or hinder the investigative, research, or reporting activities of
the victim;

(13) At the time the
person committed the murder, there existed a court order, issued in this or any
other state, which prohibited the person from either contacting the victim,
molesting the victim, or disturbing the peace of the victim, and the person had
knowledge of the existence of that order;

(14) At the time the
person committed the murder, the person and the victim were "family or
household members" as that term is defined in RCW 10.99.020(1), and the
person had previously engaged in a pattern or practice of three or more of the
following crimes committed upon the victim within a five-year period,
regardless of whether a conviction resulted:

(a) Harassment as
defined in RCW 9A.46.020; or

(b) Any criminal
assault.

Sec. 10. RCW 13.40.0357 and 2001
c 217 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION
AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

juvenile juvenile
disposition

disposition category
for attempt,

offense bailjump,
conspiracy,

category description (rcw citation) or
solicitation

........................................

Arson
and Malicious Mischief

A Arson
1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson
2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless
Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless
Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious
Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious
Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious Mischief 3 (<$50 is

E
class) (9A.48.090) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm

Apparatus
(9.40.100) E

A Possession of Incendiary Device

(9.40.120) B+

Assault and Other Crimes

Involving Physical Harm

A Assault
1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault
2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault
3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault
4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By Shooting

(9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless Endangerment

(9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting Suicide Attempt

(9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion
(9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial
Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary
and Trespass

B+ Burglary
1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential Burglary

(9A.52.025) C

B Burglary
2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools (Possession of)

(9A.52.060) E

D Criminal
Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Vehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle
Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption of Alcohol

(66.44.270) E

C Illegally Obtaining Legend Drug

(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery, Possession of
Legend

Drug with Intent to Sell

(69.41.030) D+

E Possession of Legend Drug

(69.41.030) E

B+ Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Narcotic,

Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam

Sale
(69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii)) B+

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Sale

(69.50.401(a)(1)(iii)) C

E Possession of Marihuana <40
grams

(69.50.401(e)) E

C Fraudulently Obtaining Controlled

Substance
(69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of Controlled Substance

for
Profit (69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful
Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Narcotic,

Methamphetamine,
or Flunitrazepam

Counterfeit Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1)
(i) or (ii)) B

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances
Act - Nonnarcotic

Counterfeit Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1)
(iii), (iv), (v)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances
Act - Possession of a

Controlled Substance

(69.50.401(d)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances
Act - Possession of a

Controlled Substance

(69.50.401(c)) C

Firearms
and Weapons

B Theft
of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of Stolen Firearm

(9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded Pistol Without

Permit
(9.41.050) E

C Possession of Firearms by Minor
(<18)

(9.41.040(1)(b)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of Dangerous Weapon

(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating Another Person by use

of
Weapon (9.41.270) E

Homicide

A+ Murder
1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder
2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter
1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter
2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular
Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap
1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap
2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful Imprisonment

(9A.40.040) D+

Obstructing Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a Law Enforcement

Officer
(9A.76.020) E

E Resisting
Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing Contraband 1

(9A.76.140) C

C Introducing Contraband 2

(9A.76.150) D

E Introducing Contraband 3

(9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a Public Servant

(9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a Witness

(9A.72.110) C+

Public Disturbance

C+ Riot
with Weapon (9A.84.010) D+

D+ Riot Without Weapon

(9A.84.010) E

E Failure to Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly
Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape
1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape
2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape
3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape
of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape
of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest
1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest
2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent Exposure

(Victim
<14) (9A.88.010) E

E Indecent
Exposure

(Victim
14 or over) (9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting
Prostitution 1

(9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting Prostitution 2

(9A.88.080) D+

E O
& A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent
Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child
Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child
Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and
Forgery

B Theft
1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft
2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft
3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft
of Livestock (9A.56.080) C

C Forgery
(9A.60.020) D

A Robbery
1 (9A.56.200) B+

((B+))

A- Robbery
2 (9A.56.210) ((C+))

B+

B+ Robbery
3 (section 2 of this act) C+

B+ Extortion
1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion
2 (9A.56.130) D+

C Identity
Theft 1 (9.35.020(2)(a)) D

D Identity
Theft 2 (9.35.020(2)(b)) E

D Improperly
Obtaining Financial

Information
(([(9.35.010)]))

9.35.010 E

B Possession of Stolen Property 1

(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of Stolen Property 2

(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of Stolen Property 3

(9A.56.170) E

C Taking Motor Vehicle Without

Owner's
Permission (9A.56.070) D

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E Driving Without a License

(46.20.005) E

B+ Hit
and Run - Death

(46.52.020(4)(a)) C+

C Hit and Run - Injury

(46.52.020(4)(b)) D

D Hit and Run-Attended

(46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and Run-Unattended

(46.52.010) E

C Vehicular
Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to Elude Pursuing

Police
Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless
Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While Under the Influence

(46.61.502
and 46.61.504) E

Other

B Bomb
Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape
11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape
21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape
3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene,
Harassing, Etc.,

Phone
Calls (9.61.230) E

A Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class A Felony B+

B Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class B Felony C

C Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class C Felony D

D Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Gross Misdemeanor E

E Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Misdemeanor E

V Violation
of Order of Restitution,

Community
Supervision, or

Confinement
(13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C
offenses and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted
escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks confinement

2nd escape or attempted
escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement

3rd and subsequent
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks confinement

2If
the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order, it may impose
a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE
SENTENCING STANDARDS

This
schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may select sentencing
option A, B, or C.

OPTION
A

JUVENILE
OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID

STANDARD
RANGE

A+ 180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS|WEEKS

EXCEPT | | |

30-40 | | |

WEEKS FOR | | |

15-17 | | |

YEAR OLDS | | |

Current B+ 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

Offense WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL | |52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) |15-36 WEEKS |WEEKS

C+ LS |

|15-36 WEEKS

C LS |15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions: |

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Service

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4 or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE: References in the
grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement.

(1) The vertical axis
of the grid is the current offense category. The current offense category is
determined by the offense of adjudication.

(2) The horizontal axis
of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included in the juvenile's
criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count as one point.
Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall
count as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.

(3) The standard range
disposition for each offense is determined by the intersection of the column
defined by the prior adjudications and the row defined by the current offense
category.

(4) RCW 13.40.180
applies if the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense.

(5) A current offense
that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of E. However, a
disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.

OR

OPTION
B

CHEMICAL
DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile
offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local sanctions or 15 to
36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+ offense, the court
may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION
C

MANIFEST
INJUSTICE

If the court
determines that a disposition under option A or B would effectuate a manifest
injustice, the court shall impose a disposition outside the standard range
under RCW 13.40.160(2).

Sec. 11. RCW 13.40.110 and 1997 c
338 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The prosecutor,
respondent, or the court on its own motion may, before a hearing on the
information on its merits, file a motion requesting the court to transfer the
respondent for adult criminal prosecution and the matter shall be set for a
hearing on the question of declining jurisdiction. Unless waived by the court,
the parties, and their counsel, a decline hearing shall be held when:

(a) The respondent is
fifteen, sixteen, or seventeen years of age and the information alleges a class
A felony or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b) The respondent is
seventeen years of age and the information alleges assault in the second
degree, extortion in the first degree, indecent liberties, child molestation in
the second degree, kidnapping in the second degree, ((or)) robbery in
the second degree, or robbery in the third degree; or

(c) The information
alleges an escape by the respondent and the respondent is serving a minimum
juvenile sentence to age twenty-one.

(2) The court after a
decline hearing may order the case transferred for adult criminal prosecution
upon a finding that the declination would be in the best interest of the
juvenile or the public. The court shall consider the relevant reports, facts,
opinions, and arguments presented by the parties and their counsel.

(3) When
the respondent is transferred for criminal prosecution or retained for
prosecution in juvenile court, the court shall set forth in writing its finding
which shall be supported by relevant facts and opinions produced at the
hearing.

---
END ---