BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.09 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that public confidence in government at all levels is essential and that
programs to improve quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of public functions
must be enhanced.

Washington state's
economic and competitive position in the world and in the United States has a
direct correlation to having efficient management and oversight functions of
state government. Inefficient and wasteful government operations place an unacceptable
burden on the ability of Washington state to compete. The use of performance
audits to identify improvements and grade government operations will increase
business competitiveness, reduce tax burdens, improve unwieldy regulatory
oversight, and increase the success of all businesses, large and small, in the
highly competitive marketplace.

The intent of this act
is to create the governor's performance audit standards and scorecard
commission. A strong, objective, and independent commission is necessary to
develop, oversee, and direct a performance audit system for all government to
ensure that government-funded entities accomplish intended goals and are world
class in management, program outcomes, customer satisfaction, and efficiency.
The governor's performance audit standards and scorecard commission shall
facilitate, teach, motivate, and direct all organizations to develop the
management expertise to continuously improve through self-audit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.09 RCW to read as follows:

The governor's
performance audit standards and scorecard commission is established.

(1) Commission members
shall be appointed by the governor. The governor shall ask for nominations of
individuals who demonstrate knowledge and expertise in auditing, performance
management, quality management, or a closely related field. Nominations shall
be sought from professional auditing, financial management, quality management,
and business management groups, associations, and businesses. The governor
shall select nine individuals from the list of nominations and appoint a chair
and a vice-chair. The state auditor shall provide the staff and resources
necessary for implementing sections 1 through 5 of this act.

(2) Appointed members
shall serve for terms of four years, with the terms expiring on June 30th on
the fourth year of the term. However, in the case of the initial members, four
members shall serve four-year terms, three members shall serve three-year
terms, and two members shall serve two-year terms, with each of the terms
expiring on June 30th of the applicable year. Appointees may be reappointed to
serve more than one term.

(3) Nonlegislative
members of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.220
and reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
Legislative members of the commission shall be reimbursed in accordance with
RCW 44.04.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.09 RCW to read as follows:

Duties of the
governor's performance audit standards and scorecard commission include:

(1) Developing criteria
for performance excellence and a scoring system for grading overall agency
performance. In developing criteria and a scoring system, the commission shall
consult with and seek input from elected officials and professionals with a
background in performance management. Audit criteria shall be distributed at
least six weeks before an audit;

(2) Conducting
performance audits of state agencies and institutions of higher education;

(3) Releasing audit
results to the public and providing public recognition for outstanding effort.
The governor's performance audit standards and scorecard commission must report
audit results to the legislature by November 30th of each year;

(4) Conducting post
audits on all audit findings and tracking agency implementation of suggested
corrective action;

(5) Providing and
approving grants to agencies for the purpose of implementing corrective
actions; and

(6) Forming a committee
to collect, disseminate, and share best practices to state agencies and
institutions of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 43.09 RCW to read as follows:

For purposes of
sections 1 through 6 of this act, "performance audit" means an
objective systematic assessment, survey, or directed self-assessment of state
government or any of its agencies, programs, functions, or activities in order
to help public officials demonstrate public accountability. Performance
audits include, but are not limited to: (1) Quality management practices; (2)
independent and effective internal audit functions; (3) internal and external
customer satisfaction; (4) program and periodic program reviews; (5) financial
and fiscal productivity and efficiency; and (6) regulatory and procedural
compliance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 43.09 RCW to read as follows:

The governor's
performance audit standards and scorecard commission shall conduct performance
audits or may contract performance audits to public or private independent
professional and technical experts qualified to conduct performance audits.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 43.09 RCW to read as follows:

As established in
sections 3 through 5 of this act, the state auditor may conduct performance
audits by the governor's performance audit standards and scorecard commission.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The sum of one million
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the
general fund to the state auditor for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003,
solely for costs associated with the governor's performance audit standards and
scorecard commission.

---
END ---