BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 83.100.020 and 2001
c 320 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1)
"Decedent" means a deceased individual;

(2)
"Department" means the department of revenue, the director of that
department, or any employee of the department exercising authority lawfully
delegated to him by the director;

(3) "Federal
credit" means: (a) For a transfer, the maximum amount of
the credit for state taxes allowed by section 2011 of the Internal Revenue Code,
as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2001: PROVIDED, That the federal
credit shall not exceed the amount of the tax imposed by section 2001 of the
Internal Revenue Code, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2002, reduced
by the amount of the unified credit provided by section 2010 of the Internal
Revenue Code, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2002, and if no such
tax is so imposed, the federal credit shall be zero; and (b) for a
generation-skipping transfer, the maximum amount of the credit for state taxes
allowed by section 2604 of the Internal Revenue Code;

(4) "Federal
return" means any tax return required by chapter 11 or 13 of the Internal
Revenue Code;

(5) "Federal
tax" means (a) for a transfer, a tax under chapter 11 of the Internal
Revenue Code; and (b) for a generation-skipping transfer, the tax under chapter
13 of the Internal Revenue Code;

(6)
"Generation-skipping transfer" means a "generation-skipping
transfer" as defined and used in section 2611 of the Internal Revenue
Code;

(7) "Gross
estate" means "gross estate" as defined and used in section 2031
of the Internal Revenue Code;

(8)
"Nonresident" means a decedent who was domiciled outside Washington
at his death;

(9) "Person"
means any individual, estate, trust, receiver, cooperative association, club,
corporation, company, firm, partnership, joint venture, syndicate, or other
entity and, to the extent permitted by law, any federal, state, or other
governmental unit or subdivision or agency, department, or instrumentality
thereof;

(10) "Person
required to file the federal return" means any person required to file a
return required by chapter 11 or 13 of the Internal Revenue Code, such as the
personal representative of an estate; or a transferor, trustee, or beneficiary
of a generation-skipping transfer; or a qualified heir with respect to
qualified real property, as defined and used in section 2032A(c) of the
Internal Revenue Code;

(11)
"Property" means (a) for a transfer, property included in the gross
estate; and (b) for a generation-skipping transfer, all real and personal
property subject to the federal tax;

(12) "Resident"
means a decedent who was domiciled in Washington at time of death;

(13)
"Transfer" means "transfer" as used in section 2001 of the
Internal Revenue Code, or a disposition or cessation of qualified use as
defined and used in section 2032A(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;

(14) "Trust"
means "trust" under Washington law and any arrangement described in
section 2652 of the Internal Revenue Code; and

(15) "Internal
Revenue Code" means, for the purposes of this chapter and RCW 83.110.010,
the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended or renumbered as of
January 1, ((2001)) 2002, except as otherwise provided in this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. This act applies to
decedents dying on or after January 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately and applies retroactively to January 1, 2002.

---
END ---