BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.17.695 and 1991 c
342 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

A state highway to be
known as state route number 513 is established as follows:

Beginning
at a junction with state route number 520 in Seattle, thence northerly ((and
easterly)) to the vicinity of ((Sand Point)) Northeast Pacific
Street.

--- END ---