BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 7.68.070 and 1996 c
122 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The right to benefits
under this chapter and the amount thereof will be governed insofar as is
applicable by the provisions contained in chapter 51.32 RCW except as provided
in this section:

(1) The provisions
contained in RCW 51.32.015, 51.32.030, 51.32.072, 51.32.073, 51.32.180,
51.32.190, and 51.32.200 are not applicable to this chapter.

(2) Each victim injured
as a result of a criminal act, including criminal acts committed between July
1, 1981, and January 1, 1983, or the victim's family or dependents in case of
death of the victim, are entitled to benefits in accordance with this chapter,
subject to the limitations under RCW 7.68.015. The rights, duties,
responsibilities, limitations, and procedures applicable to a worker as
contained in RCW 51.32.010 are applicable to this chapter.

(3) The limitations
contained in RCW 51.32.020 are applicable to claims under this chapter. In
addition thereto, no person or spouse, child, or dependent of such person is
entitled to benefits under this chapter when the injury for which benefits are
sought, was:

(a) The result of
consent, provocation, or incitement by the victim, unless an injury resulting
from a criminal act caused the death of the victim;

(b) Sustained while the
crime victim was engaged in the attempt to commit, or the commission of, a
felony; or

(c) Sustained while the
victim was confined in any county or city jail, federal jail or prison or in
any other federal institution, or any state correctional institution maintained
and operated by the department of social and health services or the department
of corrections, prior to release from lawful custody; or confined or living in
any other institution maintained and operated by the department of social and
health services or the department of corrections.

(4) The benefits
established upon the death of a worker and contained in RCW 51.32.050 shall be
the benefits obtainable under this chapter and provisions relating to payment
contained in that section shall equally apply under this chapter: PROVIDED,
That benefits for burial expenses shall not exceed the amount paid by the
department in case of the death of a worker as provided in chapter 51.32 RCW in
any claim: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if the criminal act results in the death of
a victim who was not gainfully employed at the time of the criminal act, and
who was not so employed for at least three consecutive months of the twelve
months immediately preceding the criminal act;

(a) Benefits payable to
an eligible surviving spouse, where there are no children of the victim at the
time of the criminal act who have survived the victim or where such spouse has
legal custody of all of his or her children, shall be limited to burial
expenses and a lump sum payment of seven thousand five hundred dollars without
reference to number of children, if any;

(b) Where any such
spouse has legal custody of one or more but not all of such children, then such
burial expenses shall be paid, and such spouse shall receive a lump sum payment
of three thousand seven hundred fifty dollars and any such child or children
not in the legal custody of such spouse shall receive a lump sum of three
thousand seven hundred fifty dollars to be divided equally among such child or
children;

(c) If any such spouse
does not have legal custody of any of the children, the burial expenses shall
be paid and the spouse shall receive a lump sum payment of up to three thousand
seven hundred fifty dollars and any such child or children not in the legal
custody of the spouse shall receive a lump sum payment of up to three thousand
seven hundred fifty dollars to be divided equally among the child or children;

(d) If no such spouse
survives, then such burial expenses shall be paid, and each surviving child of
the victim at the time of the criminal act shall receive a lump sum payment of
three thousand seven hundred fifty dollars up to a total of two such children
and where there are more than two such children the sum of seven thousand five
hundred dollars shall be divided equally among such children.

No other benefits may
be paid or payable under these circumstances.

(5) The benefits
established in RCW 51.32.060 for permanent total disability proximately caused
by the criminal act shall be the benefits obtainable under this chapter, and
provisions relating to payment contained in that section apply under this
chapter: PROVIDED, That if a victim becomes permanently and totally disabled
as a proximate result of the criminal act and was not gainfully employed at the
time of the criminal act, the victim shall receive monthly during the period of
the disability the following percentages, where applicable, of the average
monthly wage determined as of the date of the criminal act pursuant to RCW
51.08.018:

(a) If married at the
time of the criminal act, twenty-nine percent of the average monthly wage.

(b) If married with one
child at the time of the criminal act, thirty-four percent of the average
monthly wage.

(c) If married with two
children at the time of the criminal act, thirty-eight percent of the average
monthly wage.

(d) If married with
three children at the time of the criminal act, forty-one percent of the
average monthly wage.

(e) If married with four
children at the time of the criminal act, forty-four percent of the average
monthly wage.

(f) If married with
five or more children at the time of the criminal act, forty-seven percent of
the average monthly wage.

(g) If unmarried at the
time of the criminal act, twenty-five percent of the average monthly wage.

(h) If unmarried with
one child at the time of the criminal act, thirty percent of the average
monthly wage.

(i) If unmarried with
two children at the time of the criminal act, thirty-four percent of the
average monthly wage.

(j) If unmarried with
three children at the time of the criminal act, thirty-seven percent of the
average monthly wage.

(k) If unmarried with
four children at the time of the criminal act, forty percent of the average monthly
wage.

(l) If unmarried with
five or more children at the time of the criminal act, forty-three percent of
the average monthly wage.

(6) The benefits
established in RCW 51.32.080 for permanent partial disability shall be the
benefits obtainable under this chapter, and provisions relating to payment
contained in that section equally apply under this chapter.

(7) The benefits
established in RCW 51.32.090 for temporary total disability shall be the
benefits obtainable under this chapter, and provisions relating to payment
contained in that section apply under this chapter: PROVIDED, That no person
is eligible for temporary total disability benefits under this chapter if such
person was not gainfully employed at the time of the criminal act, and was not so
employed for at least three consecutive months of the twelve months immediately
preceding the criminal act.

(8) The benefits
established in RCW 51.32.095 for continuation of benefits during vocational
rehabilitation shall be benefits obtainable under this chapter, and provisions
relating to payment contained in that section apply under this chapter:
PROVIDED, That benefits shall not exceed five thousand dollars for any single
injury.

(9) The provisions for
lump sum payment of benefits upon death or permanent total disability as
contained in RCW 51.32.130 apply under this chapter.

(10) The provisions
relating to payment of benefits to, for or on behalf of workers contained in
RCW 51.32.040, 51.32.055, 51.32.100, 51.32.110, 51.32.120, 51.32.135, 51.32.140,
51.32.150, 51.32.160, and 51.32.210 are applicable to payment of benefits to,
for or on behalf of victims under this chapter.

(11) No person or
spouse, child, or dependent of such person is entitled to benefits under this
chapter where the person making a claim for such benefits has refused to give
reasonable cooperation to state or local law enforcement agencies in their
efforts to apprehend and convict the perpetrator(s) of the criminal act which
gave rise to the claim.

(12) In addition to
other benefits provided under this chapter, victims of sexual assault are
entitled to receive appropriate counseling. Fees for such counseling shall be
determined by the department in accordance with RCW 51.04.030, subject to the
limitations of RCW 7.68.080. Counseling services may include, if determined
appropriate by the department, counseling of members of the victim's immediate
family, other than the perpetrator of the assault.

(13) Except for medical
benefits authorized under RCW 7.68.080, no more than thirty thousand dollars
shall be granted as a result of a single injury or death, except that benefits
granted as the result of total permanent disability or death shall not exceed
forty thousand dollars.

(14) Notwithstanding
other provisions of this chapter and Title 51 RCW, benefits payable for total
temporary disability under subsection (7) of this section, shall be limited to
fifteen thousand dollars.

(15) Any person who is
responsible for the victim's injuries, or who would otherwise be unjustly
enriched as a result of the victim's injuries, shall not be a beneficiary under
this chapter.

(16) Crime victims'
compensation is not available to pay for services covered under chapter 74.09
RCW or Title XIX of the federal social security act, except to the extent that
the costs for such services exceed service limits established by the department
of social and health services or, during the 1993-95 fiscal biennium, to the
extent necessary to provide matching funds for federal medicaid reimbursement.

(17) In addition to
other benefits provided under this chapter, immediate family members of a
homicide victim may receive appropriate counseling to assist in dealing with
the immediate, near-term consequences of the related effects of the homicide.
Fees for counseling shall be determined by the department in accordance with
RCW 51.04.030, subject to the limitations of RCW 7.68.080. Payment of
counseling benefits under this section may not be provided to the perpetrator
of the homicide. The benefits under this subsection may be provided only with
respect to homicides committed on or after July 1, 1992.

(18) A
dependent mother, father, stepmother, or stepfather, as defined in RCW
51.08.050, who is a survivor of her or his child's homicide, who has been
requested by a law enforcement agency or a prosecutor to assist in the judicial
proceedings related to the death of the victim, and who is not domiciled in
Washington state at the time of the request, may receive a lump-sum payment
upon arrival in this state. Total benefits under this subsection may not
exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars. If more than one dependent parent
is eligible for this benefit, the lump-sum payment of seven thousand five
hundred dollars shall be divided equally among the dependent parents.

--- END ---