BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission must
offer a training session on law enforcement interaction with developmentally
disabled and mentally ill persons. The training must be developed by the
commission in consultation with appropriate community, local, and state
organizations and agencies that have expertise in the area of mental illness
and developmental disability, and with appropriate consumer and family advocate
groups. In developing the course, the commission must also examine existing
courses certified by the commission that relate to mentally ill and
developmentally disabled persons.

(2) The training must
consist of classroom instruction and use interactive training methods to ensure
that the training is as realistic as possible. The training must include, at a
minimum, core instruction in all of the following:

(a) The cause and
nature of mental illnesses and developmental disabilities;

(b) How to identify
indicators of mental illness and developmental disability and how to respond
appropriately in a variety of common situations;

(c) Conflict resolution
and deescalation techniques for potentially dangerous situations involving
mentally ill and developmentally disabled persons;

(d) Appropriate
language usage when interacting with mentally ill and developmentally disabled
persons;

(e) Alternatives to
lethal force when interacting with potentially dangerous mentally ill and
developmentally disabled persons; and

(f)
Community and state resources available to serve mentally ill and
developmentally disabled persons and how these resources can be best used by
law enforcement to benefit the mentally ill and developmentally disabled
community.

--- END ---