BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that testing and monitoring of beaches used for recreational shellfishing is
essential to ensure the health of recreational shellfishers. The legislature
also finds that it is essential to have a stable and reliable source of funding
for such biotoxin testing and monitoring. The legislature also finds that the
cost of the resident and nonresident personal use shellfish and seaweed
licenses is undervalued and not properly aligned with neighboring states and
provinces.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 77.32 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to the fees
authorized in this chapter, the department shall include a surcharge to fund
biotoxin testing and monitoring by the department of health of beaches used for
recreational shellfishing. A surcharge of two dollars applies to the following
licenses: (1) Resident and nonresident shellfish and seaweed licenses as
authorized by RCW 77.32.520(2)(a); and (2) resident and nonresident adult
combination licenses as authorized by RCW 77.32.470(2)(a). Amounts collected
from this surcharge must be deposited in the general fund‑-local account
managed by the department of health.

Amounts in excess of
the annual costs of the department of health recreational shellfish testing and
monitoring program shall be transferred to the general fund by the department
of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The fee increase proposed
in this act must be implemented in the department of fish and wildlife's
license fee structure for the license year beginning April 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---