BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.44.070 and 1987 c
109 s 110 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No permit
shall be granted for the development or withdrawal of public ground waters
beyond the capacity of the underground bed or formation in the given basin,
district, or locality to yield such water within a reasonable or feasible
pumping lift in case of pumping developments, or within a reasonable or
feasible reduction of pressure in the case of artesian developments. The
department shall have the power to determine whether the granting of any such
permit will injure or damage any vested or existing right or rights under prior
permits and may in addition to the records of the department, require further
evidence, proof, and testimony before granting or denying any such permits.

(2) Any impact upon
the flow or level of any surface water body that provides habitat for one or
more salmonid stocks that are listed or proposed for listing as threatened or
endangered under the federal endangered species act or with stocks listed as
critical or depressed under the state salmon and steelhead inventory, or any surface
water body that has flows regulated under chapter 90.22 RCW, which is likely to
be caused specifically by the exercise of a water right permit issued after the
effective date of this section, is subject to mitigation, using the best
available science to determine as nearly as possible the actual amount of
impact and effective long-term measures to mitigate the impact.

(a) Mitigation
measures prescribed must be in direct proportion to the impact caused and may
include any combination of the following in addition to any other measures
deemed effective by the department:

(i) Stream flow
augmentation to replace measured or calculated loss of water during periods
specified under chapter 90.22 RCW, from an impacted surface water body as a
result of a ground water permit, and subsequent ground water certificate,
issued after the effective date of this section. Such water will be returned
to the impacted water body at a time and at a point that is both economically
feasible and that has the required mitigating effect on stream flows;

(ii) Stream or
watershed restoration, installation of vegetation or runoff controls,
preservation or restoration of wetlands, ground water recharge area
preservation or restoration, replacement of a water source that has a direct
hydraulic connection with a surface water body with an alternative source that
has a lesser or delayed impact upon the impacted water body, or any other
mitigation measures or combination of measures agreed upon by the department
and the applicant for a water right;

(iii) Adoption of
policies and programs designed to obviate construction of new or reduction of
existing exempt wells withdrawing from the specific aquifers that contribute
directly to the flow or level of any surface water body that provides habitat
for one or more salmonid stocks that are listed or proposed for listing as
threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species act or with
stocks listed as critical or depressed under the state salmon and steelhead
inventory.

(b) Mitigation
undertaken under the interlocal agreement shall include:

(i) The provision
for long-term assurance that mitigation measures will be maintained and
effective for the duration of the water right; and

(ii) Enforcement
measures through application of financial penalty, injunction, or other remedy
provided by law.

(c)
Mitigation measures shall be subject to evaluation regarding their
effectiveness on an annual basis and may be modified, as necessary, by joint
agreement between the department and the water right holder to maintain the
agreed standard of performance.

--- END ---