BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.03.386 and 1991 c
350 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within
service areas established pursuant to chapters 43.20 and 70.116 RCW, the
department of ecology and the department of health shall coordinate approval
procedures to ensure compliance and consistency with the approved water system
plan.

(2) The place of use
for municipal water suppliers under this subsection shall be the water service
areas in the municipal water supplier's water system plan approved under
chapter 43.20 RCW or coordinated water system plan approved under chapter
70.116 RCW, as either plan may be amended from time to time. The purpose of
use shall be designated as municipal. As used in this subsection,
"municipal water supplier" means a purveyor as defined in RCW
70.116.030 that has an approved water system plan under chapter 43.20 or 70.116
RCW and meets at least one of the following conditions:

(a) Is a municipal
corporation; or

(b)
Owns or operates an expanding public water system that is entitled or obligated
to serve existing and additional customers and uses within one or more approved
water service areas to the extent such customers and uses are allowed under
applicable land use plans.

--- END ---