BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The BNSF RR now
operates freight rail service over its mainlines between Seattle and Spokane
via Wenatchee, Seattle, and Pasco via Yakima, and Portland and Spokane via
Pasco. The passenger trains that serve Spokane, eastbound and westbound,
arrive and depart between 12:15 a.m. and 2:45 a.m. The westbound passenger
trains that serve Pasco, Ephrata, and Wenatchee arrive and depart before 6:00
a.m. There is no rail passenger service for Kennewick, Yakima, Ellensburg,
Leavenworth, and the many other communities located on mainline track in
eastern Washington. There are more than twenty thousand cars, with many
occupied only by the driver, and eight thousand trucks, on average each day,
traveling over the interstate 90 and state route 2 highways between eastern and
western Washington. The population of eastern Washington exceeds one million
three hundred thousand people. There is significant interest in eastern
Washington in fast and convenient intercity rail passenger service and commuter
rail passenger service.

(2) In eastern
Washington, sixteen city councils, four county commissions, and the Spokane
regional transportation council have declared their support for a feasibility
study of state-sponsored rail passenger service in eastern Washington. The
2000 legislature authorized a study of eastern Washington rail passenger
service with limited funding. The study was completed and a report filed in
2001 with the recommendation by the department of transportation as follows, in
part:

"...in
light of the finding of this preliminary assessment, the study team recommends
that Washington state undertake a detailed study of the east-west passenger
rail service on all three cross state corridors."

(3) A comprehensive
study of railroad passenger service over the lines running from Portland to
Spokane via Pasco, Seattle to Spokane via Pasco, and Seattle to Spokane via
Wenatchee would be helpful and in the public interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The department of
transportation shall conduct a comprehensive study concerning the feasibility
of the operation of rail passenger service from:

(a) King Street station
in Seattle via Wenatchee to the rail station in Spokane;

(b) King Street station
in Seattle via Yakima to the rail station in Pasco;

(c) The rail station in
Pasco via Ritzville to the rail station in Spokane; and

(d) The rail station in
Portland via Vancouver and Pasco to the rail station in Spokane.

(2) The department of
transportation shall assess, analyze, and report about the possibility of
intercity rail service or commuter rail service over any segment of any of the
rail lines under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The department of
transportation shall consider whether passenger trains can be safely operated
at sufficient speeds between Auburn and Pasco via Yakima under the present
track, tunnel, and signal conditions.

(4) The department of
transportation may exercise discretion when assessing, analyzing, and reporting
on issues, including ridership and any necessary funding and potential sources
of funding.

(5) The
department of transportation shall report to the transportation committees of
the legislature by December 15, 2002.

---
END ---