BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.09.450 and 1999 c
370 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of
the legislature to create the children's health insurance program, the benefits
of which are not an entitlement, to provide health care to children who are
eligible for health care coverage under Title XXI of the federal social
security act.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "children's health insurance program" means the program
established in compliance with Title XXI of the federal social security act for
health care coverage of children: (a) ((Who are under)) From
conception until the age of nineteen; (b) whose family income at the time
of enrollment exceeds two hundred percent, but does not exceed two hundred
fifty percent, of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and
determined annually by the federal department of health and human services; (c)
who choose to obtain health care coverage in return for periodic payments; and
(d) who are otherwise eligible under Title XXI.

(3) Consistent with
appropriated funds, the department shall design and administer the children's
health insurance program under Title XXI of the federal social security act.
The benefit and cost-sharing designs shall comply with Title XXI. The primary
mechanism for purchasing and delivery of health care for the program shall be
through contracts with managed health care systems as defined in RCW
74.09.522. Consistent with Title XXI, the department may purchase health
coverage for uninsured children whose families have access to dependent
coverage.

(4) The department
shall: Accept applications for enrollment in the children's health insurance
program; establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods, as may be necessary;
and determine, upon application and based on a reasonable schedule defined by the
department, eligibility due to current family income. No assistance may be
paid with respect to any children's health insurance enrollee whose current
family income is less than two hundred percent or greater than two hundred
fifty percent of the federal poverty level or, is not otherwise eligible under
Title XXI of the federal social security act.

(5) The
department shall make every effort to obtain a change in federal law such that
the state of Washington is authorized to use its children's health insurance
program allotment to provide health care coverage for children whose family
income at the time of enrollment is less than two hundred percent of the
federal poverty level. By December 1, 1999, the department shall report to the
legislature describing its efforts and the congressional response.

--- END ---