BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.29.005 and 1969 c
47 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

((The term)) The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Board" means the board of dental hygiene created in section 9 of
this act.

(2) "Dental
hygiene diagnosis" means the identification of, and the discrimination
between, a person's physical and oral signs and symptoms that are essential to
effective execution and management of the dental hygiene care regimen.

(3) "Licensed
dental hygienist" means a preventive oral health professional who has
graduated from an institute of higher education's accredited dental hygiene
program and is licensed under this chapter.

(4) "Licensed
dental hygienist‑‑advanced practice" means a preventive oral
health professional licensed under this chapter with a baccalaureate degree in
dental hygiene from an institute of higher education approved by the board, or
a preventive oral health professional licensed under this chapter with a baccalaureate
degree in a related field from an institute of higher education approved by the
board.

(5) "Surfaces
of the teeth" ((as used in this chapter)) means the portions of the
crown and root surface to which there is no periodontal membrane attached.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.29.050 and 1997 c
37 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person licensed as
a licensed dental hygienist in this state may remove deposits and stains
from the surfaces of the teeth, may apply topical preventive or prophylactic
agents, may polish and smooth restorations, may perform root planing and
soft-tissue curettage, may administer local anesthetic and nitrous oxide
analgesia under the general supervision of a licensed dentist, may place
restorations into the cavity prepared by the licensed dentist, may carve,
contour, and adjust contacts and occlusion of the restoration under the close
supervision of a licensed dentist, and may perform other dental operations
and services delegated to them by a licensed dentist: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That
licensed dental hygienists shall in no event perform the following dental
operations or services:

(1) Any surgical
removal of tissue of the oral cavity;

(2) Any prescription of
drugs or medications requiring the written order or prescription of a licensed
dentist or physician;

(3) Any dental
diagnosis for treatment or treatment planning; or

(4) The taking of any
impression of the teeth or jaw, or the relationships of the teeth or jaws, for
the purpose of fabricating any intra-oral restoration, appliance, or
prosthesis.

Such licensed dental
hygienists may perform dental operations and services only under the general
supervision except where otherwise provided in this section, of a
licensed dentist, and under such supervision may be employed by hospitals,
boards of education of public or private schools, county boards, boards of
health, or public or charitable institutions, or in dental offices.

For the purposes of
this section, dental hygienists may, under close supervision, delegate certain
functions to unlicensed persons as established by the board by rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 18.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A licensed dental
hygienist‑-advanced practice may perform all dental operations and
services authorized under RCW 18.29.050 without dental supervision. A licensed
dental hygienist‑-advanced practice may also perform the following
authorized dental hygiene operations and services without dental supervision,
regardless of setting: Removing deposits and stains from the surfaces of the
teeth, applying topical preventive or prophylactic agents, polishing and
smoothing restorations, performing root planning, soft-tissue curettage, and applying
temporary cementation.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, licensed dental hygienists‑-advanced practice may, under
close supervision delegate certain functions to unlicensed persons as
established by the board by rule.

(3) For the purposes of
this section, licensed dental hygienists‑-advanced practice may place
permanent antimicrobials and antibiotics.

(4) The board may
authorize advanced practice designation for licensed dental hygienists
practicing in identified critical shortage areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The legislature
recognizes that while Washington state licenses dental hygienists, the majority
of the states and professional organizations still refer to dental hygienists
as "registered dental hygienists." Section 5 of this act takes
cognizance of this fact, and requires persons licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW
to wear name badges that refer to their status "registered dental
hygienists," or "R.D.H."

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 18.29 RCW to read as follows:

A person licensed under
this chapter must wear a name badge that identifies the licensee as an
"R.D.H." when practicing dental hygiene.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.29.021 and 1996 c
191 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((department))
secretary shall issue a license to any applicant who((, as determined
by the secretary)):

(a) Has successfully
completed an educational program approved by the ((secretary)) board.
This educational program shall include course work encompassing the subject
areas within the scope of the license to practice dental hygiene in the state
of Washington;

(b) Has successfully
completed an examination administered or approved by the ((dental hygiene
examining committee)) board; and

(c) Has not engaged in
unprofessional conduct or is not unable to practice with reasonable skill and
safety as a result of a physical or mental impairment.

(2) Applications for
licensure must comply with administrative procedures, administrative
requirements, and fees established according to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

Sec. 7. RCW 18.29.045 and 1991 c
3 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

An applicant holding a
valid license and currently engaged in practice in another state may be granted
a license without examination required by this chapter, on the payment of any
required fees, if the secretary in consultation with the ((advisory
committee)) board determines that the other state's licensing
standards are substantively equivalent to the standards in this state:
PROVIDED, That the secretary in consultation with the ((advisory committee))
board may require the applicant to: (1) File with the secretary
documentation certifying the applicant is licensed to practice in another
state; and (2) provide information as the secretary deems necessary pertaining
to the conditions and criteria of the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130
RCW and to demonstrate to the secretary a knowledge of Washington law
pertaining to the practice of dental hygiene.

Sec. 8. RCW 18.29.071 and 1996 c
191 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((secretary))
board shall establish the administrative procedures, administrative
requirements, and fees for renewal of licenses as provided in this chapter and
in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 18.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The board of dental
hygiene is created. The board consists of five members who shall be appointed
by the governor. Of the initial appointments, two shall be appointed for a
term of two years, two for a term of three years, and one for a term of four years.
Thereafter, all appointments shall be for terms of four years. Four members of
the board shall be dental hygienists licensed under this chapter and residing
in this state, shall have not less than five years' experience in the practice
of dental hygiene, and shall be actively engaged in practice within two years
of appointment. The fifth member shall be appointed from the public at large,
shall have an interest in the rights of consumers of dental services, and shall
not be or have been a member of any other licensing board, a licensee of any
dental related board, an employee of any dental services facility, nor derive
his or her primary livelihood from the provision of dental services at any
level of responsibility. In the event that a member of the board cannot
complete his or her term of office, another appointment shall be made by the
governor in accordance with the procedure stated in this subsection to fill the
remainder of the term. No member may serve for more than two successive
four-year terms.

(2) The secretary of
health shall furnish such secretarial, clerical, and other assistance as the
board may require. Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.240, and be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 18.29 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
duties specified in this chapter, the board has the following powers and
duties:

(1) To develop and
administer, or approve, or both, examinations to applicants for licensure under
this chapter;

(2) To pass upon the
qualifications of applicants for a license and to certify to the secretary duly
qualified applicants;

(3) To adopt rules not
inconsistent with the laws of this state as may be deemed necessary or proper
to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(4) To establish and
administer requirements for continuing competency, which shall be a
prerequisite to renewing a license under this chapter;

(5) To keep an official
record of all board proceedings, which record shall be evidence of all
proceedings of the board that are set forth in the official record; and

(6) To adopt rules not
inconsistent with the laws of this state, when it deems appropriate, in
response to questions put to it by professional dental related associations,
dental hygienists, and consumers in this state concerning the authority of
dental hygienists to perform certain acts.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 18.29 RCW to read as follows:

The board shall elect
from its members a chair and vice-chair/secretary, who shall serve for one year
or until their successors are elected. The board shall meet at least once a
year and upon the call of the chair at such times and places as the chair
designates. Three members constitute a quorum of the full board for the
transaction of any business. Meetings of the board shall be open and public,
except the board may hold executive sessions to the extent permitted by chapter
42.30 RCW.

Sec. 12. RCW 18.29.120 and 1995 c
198 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((secretary in
consultation with the Washington dental hygiene examining committee)) board
shall:

(1) Adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to prepare and conduct examinations
for dental hygiene licensure;

(2) Require an
applicant for licensure to pass an examination consisting of written and practical
tests upon such subjects and of such scope as the ((committee)) board
determines;

(3) Set the standards
for passage of the examination;

(4) Administer at least
two examinations each calendar year. Additional examinations may be given as
necessary; and

(5) Establish by rule
the procedures for an appeal of an examination failure.

Sec. 13. RCW 18.29.140 and 1991 c
3 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((secretary))
board shall establish by rule the standards and procedures for approval
of educational programs and may contract with individuals or organizations
having expertise in the profession or in education to report to the ((secretary))
board information necessary for the ((secretary)) board to
evaluate the educational programs. The ((secretary)) board may
establish a fee for educational program evaluation. The fee shall be set to
defray the administrative costs for evaluating the educational program,
including, but not limited to, costs for site evaluation.

Sec. 14. RCW 18.29.150 and 1991 c
3 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((secretary))
board shall establish the date and location of the examination.
Applicants who meet the education requirements for licensure shall be scheduled
for the next examination following the filing of the application. The ((secretary))
board shall establish by rule the examination application deadline.

(2) The examination
shall contain subjects appropriate to the scope of practice and on laws in the
state of Washington regulating dental hygiene practice.

(3) The ((committee))
board shall establish by rule the requirements for a reexamination if
the applicant has failed the examination.

(4) The ((committee))
board may approve an examination prepared or administered by a private
testing agency or association of licensing authorities.

Sec. 15. RCW 18.29.160 and 1991 c
3 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary, members
of the ((committee)) board, and individuals acting on their
behalf are immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based on any acts
performed in the course of their duties.

Sec. 16. RCW 18.29.190 and 1993 c
323 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall issue a ((temporary)) limited license without the
examination required by this chapter to any applicant who, as determined by the
((secretary)) board:

(a) Holds a valid
license in another state that allows the scope of practice in subsection (((3)))
(2)(a) through (j) of this section;

(b) Is currently
engaged in active practice in another state. For the purposes of this section,
"active practice" means five hundred sixty hours of practice in the
preceding twenty-four months;

(c) Files with the ((secretary))
board documentation certifying that the applicant:

(i) Has graduated from
an accredited dental hygiene school approved by the ((secretary)) board;

(ii) Has successfully
completed the dental hygiene national board examination; and

(iii) Is licensed to
practice in another state;

(d) Provides
information as the ((secretary)) board deems necessary pertaining
to the conditions and criteria of the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130
RCW;

(e) Demonstrates to the
((secretary)) board a knowledge of Washington state law
pertaining to the practice of dental hygiene, including the administration of
legend drugs;

(f) Pays any required
fees; and

(g) Meets requirements
for AIDS education.

(2) ((The term of
the temporary license issued under this section is eighteen months and it is
nonrenewable.

(3))) A person practicing with a ((temporary))
limited license granted under this section has the authority to perform
hygiene procedures that are limited to:

(a) Oral inspection and
measuring of periodontal pockets;

(b) Patient education
in oral hygiene;

(c) Taking intra-oral
and extra-oral radiographs;

(d) Applying topical
preventive or prophylactic agents;

(e) Polishing and
smoothing restorations;

(f) Oral prophylaxis
and removal of deposits and stains from the surface of the teeth;

(g) Recording health
histories;

(h) Taking and
recording blood pressure and vital signs;

(i) Performing
subgingival and supragingival scaling; and

(j) Performing root
planing.

(((4)(a) A person
practicing with a temporary license granted under this section may not perform
the following dental hygiene procedures unless authorized in (b) or (c) of this
subsection:

(i) Give injections
of local anesthetic;

(ii) Place
restorations into the cavity prepared by a licensed dentist and afterwards
carve, contour, and adjust contacts and occlusion of the restoration;

(iii) Soft tissue
curettage; or

(iv) Administer
nitrous oxide/oxygen analgesia.

(b) A person
licensed in another state who can demonstrate substantively equivalent
licensing standards in the administration of local anesthetic may receive a
temporary endorsement to administer local anesthesia.

(c) A person
licensed in another state who can demonstrate substantively equivalent
licensing standards in restorative procedures may receive a temporary
endorsement for restorative procedures.))

(3)(a) A person
practicing with a limited license under this section may not place restorations
into the cavity prepared by a licensed dentist nor afterwards carve, contour,
or adjust contacts and occlusion of the restoration.

(b) Notwithstanding
(a) of this subsection, a person licensed in another state who can demonstrate
substantively equivalent licensing standards for restoration from the other
state may receive an endorsement for restorative procedures.

(4) A person
practicing with a limited license granted under this section must be qualified
to administer local anesthetic and nitrous oxide/oxygen analgesia. Proof of
qualification includes providing proof of education, and successfully
completing an examination, as approved by the board. However, if a person is
licensed to administer local anesthetic and nitrous oxide/oxygen analgesia in
another state that has substantially similar licensing requirements as
Washington state as determined by the board, then that person is deemed
qualified to administer local anesthetic and nitrous oxide/oxygen analgesia.

Sec. 17. RCW 18.29.210 and 1993 c
323 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((secretary in
consultation with the dental hygiene examining committee)) board
shall develop rules and definitions to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 18.29.110 (Dental hygiene examining
committee--Generally) and 1991 c 3 s 51 & 1989 c 202 s 3;

(2) RCW 18.29.130 (Secretary's
authority--Generally--Continuing education) and 1991 c 3 s 53 & 1989 c 202
s 5;

(3) RCW 18.29.170 (Committee
meetings--Quorum--Effect of vacancy) and 1989 c 202 s 9;

(4) RCW 18.29.190 (Temporary licenses) and
1993 c 323 s 2; and

(5) RCW 18.29.200 (Temporary
licensees--Requirements for regular examination) and 1993 c 323 s 3.

---
END ---