BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.79.030 and 2001 c
202 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
hearing on such petition may be held before the legislative authority, or
before a committee thereof upon the date fixed by resolution or at the time
said hearing may be adjourned to. If the hearing is before such a committee
the same shall, following the hearing, report its recommendation on the
petition to the legislative authority which may adopt or reject the
recommendation. If such hearing be held before such a committee it shall not
be necessary to hold a hearing on the petition before such legislative
authority. If the legislative authority determines to grant said petition or
any part thereof, such city or town shall be authorized and have authority by
ordinance to vacate such street, or alley, or any part thereof, and the
ordinance may provide that it shall not become effective until the owners of
property abutting upon the street or alley, or part thereof so vacated, shall
compensate such city or town in an amount which does not exceed one-half the
appraised value of the area so vacated. If the street or alley has been part
of a dedicated public right-of-way for twenty-five years or more, or if the
subject property or portions thereof were acquired at public expense, the
city or town may require the owners of the property abutting the street or
alley to compensate the city or town in an amount that does not exceed the full
appraised value of the area vacated. The ordinance may provide that the city
retain an easement or the right to exercise and grant easements in respect to
the vacated land for the construction, repair, and maintenance of public
utilities and services. A certified copy of such ordinance shall be recorded
by the clerk of the legislative authority and in the office of the auditor of
the county in which the vacated land is located. One-half of the revenue
received by the city or town as compensation for the area vacated must be
dedicated to the acquisition, improvement, development, and related maintenance
of public open space or transportation capital projects within the city or
town.

--- END ---