BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The sum of one million
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the
general fund to the department of community, trade, and economic development
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, to fund the emergency food assistance
program.

---
END ---