BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the Washington state legislative building is an architecturally
significant and irreplaceable building worthy of rehabilitation and
enhancement. Not only is it a magnificent building, but it also reflects the
essence of self-government and democracy in the state of Washington.

The legislature further
finds that the state legislative building is an important asset to the citizens
of Washington state, allowing them to learn about state government, to research
and track legislative activity, to meet with state officials, and to
participate in government.

The legislature further
finds that a combination of public funds and private donations can involve the
citizens of Washington state in the building's rehabilitation and enhancement
by engaging the public in the preservation of the state legislative building
and raising private funds for restoration and educational efforts.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 27.48 RCW to read as follows:

State officers and
state employees, as those terms are defined in RCW 42.52.010, may engage in or
encourage fund-raising activities including the solicitation of charitable gifts,
grants, or donations specifically for the limited purpose of preservation and
restoration of the state legislative building and related educational exhibits
and programs.

Sec. 3. RCW 42.52.800 and 1999 c
343 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When
soliciting charitable gifts, grants, or donations solely for the limited
purposes of RCW 27.48.040, members of the capitol furnishings preservation
committee are exempt from the laws of this chapter.

(2) When soliciting
charitable gifts, grants, or donations solely for the limited purposes of
section 2 of this act or when assisting a nonprofit foundation established for
the purposes of section 2 of this act, state officers and state employees are
exempt from the laws of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---