BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that:

(1) Children living in
single-parent households are more likely to be living in poverty;

(2) The overwhelming
percentage of children residing in poverty reside in homes where fathers are
not present;

(3) Children living in
poverty are at a significantly greater risk for drug and alcohol abuse;

(4) Children living in
poverty are twice as likely to drop out of school;

(5) The vast majority
of homeless and runaway children are from homes where children live in poverty;

(6) Washingtonians
recognize that children are more likely to thrive with support, guidance, and
nurturing from both parents;

(7) The absence of one
parent from a child's life can place that child at a greater risk of health,
emotional, educational, and behavioral problems associated with the child's
development;

(8) Many young men
today are themselves fatherless, lack appropriate role models, and are in need
of information and education regarding the appropriate roles and
responsibilities of fathers; and

(9) Across America
there is a renewed understanding of the unique importance fathers play in the
lives of their children, families, and communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The Washington state
commission for responsible fatherhood is established in the office of the
governor.

(2) The commission
shall consist of twenty-two members and reflect the geographic and cultural
diversity of the state. The membership shall include:

(a) Secretary of the
department of social and health services, or his or her designee;

(b) Secretary of
employment securities, or his or her designee;

(c) Secretary of office
of support enforcement, or his or her designee;

(d) Superintendent of
public instruction, or his or her designee;

(e) Secretary of
corrections, or his or her designee;

(f) Two members of the
senate, one from each of the two major political parties, appointed by the
president of the senate, and two members of the house of representatives, one
from each of the two major political parties, appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives;

(g) One representative
from the family law section of the bar, appointed by the governor;

(h) One representative
from the faith community, appointed by the governor;

(i) One representative
from the Washington association for prosecuting attorneys, appointed by the
governor;

(j) Two representatives
from fatherhood programs or organizations, appointed by the governor;

(k) One representative
from domestic violence programs, appointed by the governor;

(l) Three at-large
members, appointed by the governor;

(m) One member from the
business community, appointed by the governor;

(n) Director of
community, trade, and economic development, or his or her designee;

(o) Head start
collaboration director, or his or her designee; and

(p) Regional
administrator for administration for children and families, or his or her
designee.

(3) All commission
members shall serve at the pleasure of the governor, but in no case may any
member appointed by the governor serve more than three years without formal
reappointment by the governor. All legislative members shall serve for
two-year terms, and the position of any legislative member shall be deemed
vacated whenever such member ceases to be a member of the house from which he
or she was appointed. Of the persons initially appointed by the governor to
the commission, three shall be appointed to serve one year, three to serve two
years, and four to serve three years. Upon expiration of such terms,
subsequent appointments shall be for three years. Any vacancies occurring in
the membership of the commission shall be filled for the remainder of the
unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointments.

(4)(a) Nonlegislative
members shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their
duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(b) Legislative members
shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120.

(5) A simple majority
of the membership constitutes a quorum for the purpose of conducting business.

(6) The governor shall
appoint an executive director of the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The executive director
shall appoint staff who shall be state employees under Title 41 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The commission shall
adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter in accordance
with chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The purpose of the
commission is to further the understanding of the importance of two parents
being actively involved in the lives of a child, with particular emphasis on
fathers. The commission is charged with the following:

(1) Identify promising
best practices that support and engage both parents in the emotional and
financial support of their children;

(2) Identify obstacles
that impede or prevent the involvement of fathers in the lives of their
children;

(3) Raise public
awareness of the consequences the absence of the father may cause in a child's
life;

(4) Make
recommendations for policy and practice both within and without state
government that sustain and reengage fathers in the lives of their children;

(5) Coordinate programs
that promote fatherhood and counter the incidence of fatherlessness in the
state of Washington;

(6) Promote, foster,
encourage, and otherwise support programs designed to educate and train young
men who are both current and future fathers as to effective parenting skills,
behaviors, and attitudes;

(7) Coordinate programs
that counter poverty and low income by increasing the capacity for fathers to
overcome personal challenges and become productive, independent, and
financially responsible contributors to their family; and

(8) Report its findings
and recommendations to the governor annually.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Each state department,
board, commission, authority, or body within the executive branch that provides
services to children and families is directed to plan collaboratively with the
commission for services to fathers. Each body is directed to report to the
commission on this collaboration and improvements to services for and inclusion
of fathers. The commission shall determine the form of such reports and the
submission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The commission may
receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from private sources as may be made
from time to time in trust or otherwise for the use and benefit of the purposes
of the commission and to expend the same or any income therefrom according to
the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments, and the purposes of this
chapter. The executive director shall make a report of such funds received
from private sources to the joint legislative audit and review committee on a
current basis. Such funds received from private sources shall not be applied
to reduce or substitute for the commission's budget as appropriated by the
legislature but shall be applied and expended toward projects and functions
authorized by this chapter that were not funded by the legislature.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. Sections 1 through 7 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

---
END ---