BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.96.105 and 1998 c
298 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each manufacturer
shall specify in its franchise agreement, or in a separate written agreement,
with each of its dealers licensed in this state, the dealer's obligation to
perform warranty work or service on the manufacturer's products. Each
manufacturer shall provide each of its dealers with a schedule of compensation
to be paid to the dealer for any warranty work or service, including parts,
labor, and diagnostic work, required of the dealer by the manufacturer in
connection with the manufacturer's products.

(2) All claims for
warranty work for parts and labor made by dealers under this section shall be submitted
to the manufacturer within one year of the date the work was performed. All
claims submitted must be paid by the manufacturer within thirty days
following receipt, provided the claim has been approved by the manufacturer. The
manufacturer has the right to audit claims for warranty work and to charge the
dealer for any unsubstantiated, incorrect, or false claims for a period of one
year following payment. However, the manufacturer may audit and charge the
dealer for any fraudulent claims during any period for which an action for
fraud may be commenced under applicable state law.

(3) All claims
submitted by dealers on the forms and in the manner specified by the
manufacturer shall be either approved or disapproved within thirty days
following their receipt. The manufacturer shall notify the dealer in writing
of any disapproved claim, and shall set forth the reasons why the claim was not
approved. Any claim not specifically disapproved in writing within thirty days
following receipt is approved, and the manufacturer is required to pay that
claim within thirty days of receipt of the claim.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.96 RCW to read as follows:

MANUFACTURER INCENTIVE PROGRAMS.
(1) A manufacturer or distributor shall pay a motor vehicle dealer's claim for
payment or other compensation due under any manufacturer incentive program
within thirty days after approval of the claim. A claim that is not
disapproved or disallowed within thirty days after the manufacturer or
distributor receives the claim is automatically deemed approved. If the motor
vehicle dealer's claim is not approved, the manufacturer or distributor shall
provide the dealer with written notice of the reasons for the disapproval at
the time notice of disapproval is given.

(2) A manufacturer may
not deny a claim based solely on a motor vehicle dealer's incidental failure to
comply with a specific claim‑processing requirement that results in a
clerical error or other administrative technicality.

(3) Notwithstanding the
terms of a franchise agreement or other contract with a manufacturer or
distributor, a motor vehicle dealer has one year after the expiration of a
manufacturer or distributor incentive program to submit a claim for payment or
compensation under the program.

(4) Notwithstanding the
terms of a franchise agreement or other contract with a dealer and except as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, after the expiration of one year
after the date of payment of a claim under a manufacturer or distributor
incentive program, a manufacturer or distributor may not:

(a) Charge back to a
motor vehicle dealer, whether directly or indirectly, the amount of a claim
that has been approved and paid by the manufacturer or distributor under an
incentive program;

(b) Charge back to a
motor vehicle dealer, whether directly or indirectly, the cash value of a prize
or other thing of value awarded to the dealer under an incentive program; or

(c) Audit the records
of a motor vehicle dealer to determine compliance with the terms of an
incentive program. Where, however, a manufacturer or distributor has
reasonable grounds to believe that the dealer committed fraud with respect to
the incentive program, the manufacturer or distributor may audit the dealer for
a fraudulent claim during any period for which an action for fraud may be
commenced under applicable state law.

(5)
Notwithstanding subsection (4)(a) and (b) of this section, a manufacturer or
distributor may make charge-backs to a motor vehicle dealer if, after
completion of an audit of the dealer's records, the manufacturer or distributor
can show, by a preponderance of the evidence, that (a) the claim was
intentionally false or fraudulent at the time it was submitted to the
manufacturer or distributor, or (b) with respect to a claim under a service
incentive program, the repair work was improperly performed in a substandard
manner or was unnecessary to correct a defective condition.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.96.185 and 2000 c
203 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding the
terms of a franchise agreement, a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or
factory representative, or an agent, officer, parent company, wholly or
partially owned subsidiary, affiliated entity, or other person controlled by or
under common control with a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or
factory representative, shall not:

(a) Discriminate
between new motor vehicle dealers by selling or offering to sell a like vehicle
to one dealer at a lower actual price than the actual price offered to another
dealer for the same model similarly equipped;

(b) Discriminate
between new motor vehicle dealers by selling or offering to sell parts or
accessories to one dealer at a lower actual price than the actual price offered
to another dealer;

(c) Discriminate
between new motor vehicle dealers by using a promotion plan, marketing plan, or
other similar device that results in a lower actual price on vehicles, parts,
or accessories being charged to one dealer over another dealer;

(d) Discriminate
between new motor vehicle dealers by adopting a method, or changing an existing
method, for the allocation, scheduling, or delivery of new motor vehicles,
parts, or accessories to its dealers that is not fair, reasonable, and
equitable. Upon the request of a dealer, a manufacturer, distributor, factory
branch, or factory representative shall disclose in writing to the dealer the
method by which new motor vehicles, parts, and accessories are allocated,
scheduled, or delivered to its dealers handling the same line or make of
vehicles;

(e) Give preferential
treatment to some new motor vehicle dealers over others by refusing or failing
to deliver, in reasonable quantities and within a reasonable time after receipt
of an order, to a dealer holding a franchise for a line or make of motor
vehicles sold or distributed by the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch,
or factory representative, a new vehicle, parts, or accessories, if the
vehicle, parts, or accessories are being delivered to other dealers, or require
a dealer to purchase unreasonable advertising displays or other materials, or
unreasonably require a dealer to remodel or renovate existing facilities as a
prerequisite to receiving a model or series of vehicles;

(f) Compete with a new
motor vehicle dealer by acting in the capacity of a new motor vehicle dealer,
or by owning, operating, or controlling, whether directly or indirectly, a
motor vehicle dealership in this state. It is not, however, a violation of
this subsection for:

(i) A manufacturer,
distributor, factory branch, or factory representative to own or operate a
dealership for a temporary period, not to exceed two years, during the
transition from one owner of the dealership to another where the dealership was
previously owned by a franchised dealer and is currently for sale to any
qualified independent person at a fair and reasonable price. The temporary
operation may be extended for one twelve-month period on petition of the
temporary operator to the department. The matter will be handled as an
adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW. A dealer who is a franchisee
of the petitioning manufacturer or distributor may intervene and participate in
a proceeding under this subsection (1)(f)(i). The temporary operator has the burden
of proof to show justification for the extension and a good faith effort to
sell the dealership to an independent person at a fair and reasonable price;

(ii) A manufacturer,
distributor, factory branch, or factory representative to own or operate a
dealership in conjunction with an independent person in a bona fide business
relationship for the purpose of broadening the diversity of its dealer body and
enhancing opportunities for qualified persons who are part of a group who have
historically been underrepresented in its dealer body, or other qualified
persons who lack the resources to purchase a dealership outright, and where the
independent person: (A) Has made a significant, bona fide capital investment
in the dealership that is subject to loss; (B) has an ownership interest in the
dealership; and (C) operates the dealership under a bona fide written agreement
with the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative
under which he or she will acquire all of the ownership interest in the
dealership within a reasonable period of time and under reasonable terms and
conditions. The manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative has the burden of proof of establishing that the acquisition of
the dealership by the independent person was made within a reasonable period of
time and under reasonable terms and conditions;

(iii) A manufacturer,
distributor, factory branch, or factory representative to own or operate a
dealership in conjunction with an independent person in a bona fide business
relationship where the independent person: (A) Has made a significant, bona
fide capital investment in the dealership that is subject to loss; (B) has an
ownership interest in the dealership; and (C) operates the dealership under a
bona fide written agreement with the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch,
or factory representative under which he or she will acquire all of the
ownership interest in the dealership within a reasonable period of time and
under reasonable terms and conditions. The manufacturer, distributor, factory
branch, or factory representative has the burden of proof of establishing that
the acquisition of the dealership by the independent person was made within a
reasonable period of time and under reasonable terms and conditions. The
number of dealerships operated under this subsection (1)(f)(iii) may not exceed
four percent rounded up to the nearest whole number of a manufacturer's total
of new motor vehicle dealer franchises in this state;

(iv) A truck
manufacturer to own, operate, or control a new motor vehicle dealership that
sells only trucks of that manufacturer's line make with a gross vehicle weight
rating of 12,500 pounds or more, and the truck manufacturer has been
continuously engaged in the retail sale of the trucks at least since January 1,
1993; or

(v) A manufacturer to
own, operate, or control a new motor vehicle dealership trading exclusively in
a single line make of the manufacturer if (A) the manufacturer does not own,
directly or indirectly, in the aggregate, in excess of forty-five percent of
the total ownership interest in the dealership, (B) at the time the
manufacturer first acquires ownership or assumes operation or control of any
such dealership, the distance between any dealership thus owned, operated, or
controlled and the nearest new motor vehicle dealership trading in the same
line make of vehicle and in which the manufacturer has no ownership or control
is not less than fifteen miles and complies with the applicable provisions in
the relevant market area sections of this chapter, (C) all of the
manufacturer's franchise agreements confer rights on the dealer of that line
make to develop and operate within a defined geographic territory or area, as
many dealership facilities as the dealer and the manufacturer agree are
appropriate, and (D) as of January 1, 2000, the manufacturer had no more than
four new motor vehicle dealers of that manufacturer's line make in this state,
and at least half of those dealers owned and operated two or more dealership
facilities in the geographic territory or area covered by their franchise
agreements with the manufacturer;

(g) Compete with a new
motor vehicle dealer by owning, operating, or controlling, whether directly or
indirectly, a service facility in this state for the repair or maintenance of
motor vehicles under the manufacturer's new car warranty and extended
warranty. Nothing in this subsection (1)(g), however, prohibits a
manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative from
owning or operating a service facility for the purpose of providing or
performing maintenance, repair, or service work on motor vehicles that are
owned by the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative;

(h) Use confidential or
proprietary information obtained from a new motor vehicle dealer to unfairly
compete with the dealer. For purposes of this subsection (1)(h),
"confidential or proprietary information" means trade secrets as
defined in RCW 19.108.010, business plans, marketing plans or strategies,
customer lists, contracts, sales data, revenues, or other financial information;

(i) Terminate,
cancel, or fail to renew a franchise with a new motor vehicle dealer based upon
any of the following events, which do not constitute good cause for
termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal under RCW 46.96.060: (i) The fact
that the new motor vehicle dealer owns, has an investment in, participates in
the management of, or holds a franchise agreement for the sale or service of
another make or line of new motor vehicles, or (ii) the fact that the new motor
vehicle dealer has established another make or line of new motor vehicles or
service in the same dealership facilities as those of the manufacturer or
distributor;

(j) Coerce or attempt
to coerce a new motor vehicle dealer to refrain from, or prohibit or attempt to
prohibit a new motor vehicle dealer from acquiring, owning, having an
investment in, participating in the management of, or holding a franchise
agreement for the sale or service of another make or line of new motor vehicles
or related products, or establishing another make or line of new motor vehicles
or service in the same dealership facilities, if acquiring, owning, investing,
managing, or holding a franchise for such additional make or line of vehicles
or products is supported by reasonable business considerations, including but
not limited to capitalization requirements, sales and service facilities,
personnel, market share, and return on investment. The burden of proving by a
preponderance of the evidence that reasonable business considerations do not
support or justify the additional make or line of new motor vehicles or
products or nonexclusive facilities is on the manufacturer.

(2) Subsection (1)(a),
(b), and (c) of this section do not apply to sales to a motor vehicle dealer:
(a) For resale to a federal, state, or local government agency; (b) where the
vehicles will be sold or donated for use in a program of driver's education;
(c) where the sale is made under a manufacturer's bona fide promotional program
offering sales incentives or rebates; (d) where the sale of parts or
accessories is under a manufacturer's bona fide quantity discount program; or
(e) where the sale is made under a manufacturer's bona fide fleet vehicle
discount program. For purposes of this subsection, "fleet" means a
group of fifteen or more new motor vehicles purchased or leased by a dealer at
one time under a single purchase or lease agreement for use as part of a fleet,
and where the dealer has been assigned a fleet identifier code by the
department of licensing.

(3) The following
definitions apply to this section:

(a) "Actual
price" means the price to be paid by the dealer less any incentive paid by
the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative,
whether paid to the dealer or the ultimate purchaser of the vehicle.

(b) "Control"
or "controlling" means (i) the possession of, title to, or control of
ten percent or more of the voting equity interest in a person, whether directly
or indirectly through a fiduciary, agent, or other intermediary, or (ii) the
possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction
of the management or policies of a person, whether through the ownership of
voting securities, through director control, by contract, or otherwise, except
as expressly provided under the franchise agreement.

(c) "Motor
vehicles" does not include trucks that are 14,001 pounds gross vehicle
weight and above or recreational vehicles as defined in RCW 43.22.335.

(d) "Operate"
means to manage a dealership, whether directly or indirectly.

(e) "Own" or
"ownership" means to hold the beneficial ownership of one percent or
more of any class of equity interest in a dealership, whether the interest is
that of a shareholder, partner, limited liability company member, or
otherwise. To hold an ownership interest means to have possession of, title
to, or control of the ownership interest, whether directly or indirectly
through a fiduciary, agent, or other intermediary.

(4) A violation of this
section is deemed to affect the public interest and constitutes an unlawful and
unfair practice under chapter 19.86 RCW. A person aggrieved by an alleged
violation of this section may petition the department to have the matter
handled as an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 46.96 RCW to read as follows:

RIGHT OF FIRST
REFUSAL. (1) In the event of a proposed sale or transfer of a new motor
vehicle dealership involving the transfer or sale of more than fifty percent of
the ownership interest in, or more than fifty percent of the assets of, the
dealership at the time of such transfer or sale, where the franchise agreement
for the dealership contains a right of first refusal in favor of the
manufacturer or distributor, then notwithstanding the terms of the franchise
agreement, the manufacturer or distributor must be permitted to exercise a
right of first refusal to acquire the dealership only if all of the following
requirements are met:

(a) The manufacturer or
distributor sends by certified mail, return receipt requested, or delivers by
personal service, notice of its intent to exercise its right of first refusal
within forty-five days of receipt of the completed proposal for the proposed
sale or transfer; and

(b) The exercise of the
right of first refusal will result in the motor vehicle dealer receiving
consideration, terms, and conditions that are equal to or better than that for
which the dealer has contracted in connection with the proposed transaction.

(2) Notwithstanding
subsection (1) of this section, the manufacturer's or distributor's right of
first refusal does not apply to a proposed transaction involving any of the
following purchasers or transferees:

(a) A purchaser or
transferee who has been preapproved by the manufacturer or distributor with
respect to the transaction;

(b) A designated
successor as defined in RCW 46.96.020, or a designated successor as defined in
the franchise agreement who has been approved in writing by the manufacturer;

(c) A family member or
members, including the spouse, biological or adopted child, grandchild, spouse
of a child or grandchild, brother, sister or parent of the dealer‑operator
or one or more of the dealership's owners;

(d) A manager employed
by the motor vehicle dealer in the dealership during the previous five years
who is otherwise qualified as a dealer-operator;

(e) A partnership,
corporation, limited liability company, or other entity controlled by any of
the family members of the dealer‑operator; or

(f) A trust established
or to be established for the purpose of allowing the new motor vehicle dealer
to continue to qualify as such under the manufacturer's or distributor's
standards, or provides for the succession of the franchise agreement to
designated family members or qualified management in the event of the death or
incapacity of the dealer‑operator or its principal owner or owners.

(3) As a condition to
the manufacturer or distributor exercising its right of first refusal, the
manufacturer or distributor shall pay the reasonable expenses, including
attorneys' fees, incurred by the proposed purchaser or transferee in
negotiating, and undertaking an action to consummate, the contract for the
proposed sale of the dealership. In addition, the manufacturer or distributor
shall pay the reasonable expenses, including attorneys' fees, incurred by the
motor vehicle dealer on and after the date the manufacturer or distributor
gives notice of the exercise of its right of first refusal. The expenses and
fees must be paid by the manufacturer or distributor to the dealer and to the
preempted purchaser or transferee by the closing date of the sale of the
dealership to the manufacturer or distributor if the party entitled to
reimbursement has submitted or caused to be submitted to the manufacturer or
distributor an accounting of the expenses and fees within thirty days after
receipt of the manufacturer's or distributor's written request for such an
accounting. A manufacturer or distributor may request such an accounting from
the proposed purchaser or transferee before exercising its right of first
refusal.

As a further condition
to the exercise of its right of first refusal, a manufacturer or distributor
shall assume and guarantee the lease or shall acquire the real property on
which the motor vehicle franchise is conducted. Unless otherwise agreed to by
the dealer and manufacturer or distributor, the lease terms or the real
property acquisition terms must be the same as those on which the lease or
property was to be transferred or sold to the proposed purchaser or transferee.

(4) If the selling
dealer has disclosed to the proposed purchaser or transferee, in writing, the
existence of the manufacturer's or distributor's right of first refusal, then
the selling dealer has no liability to the proposed purchaser or transferee for
a claim for damages resulting from the manufacturer or distributor exercising
the right of first refusal. The manufacturer or distributor shall assume the
defense of and hold the selling dealer harmless from and against any and all
claims, damages, losses, actions, or causes of action asserted by the proposed
purchaser or transferee arising from the manufacturer's or distributor's
exercise of its right of first refusal.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 46.96 RCW to read as follows:

VENUE. Notwithstanding
the provisions of any franchise agreement or any other provision of law to the
contrary, the venue for a cause of action, claim, lawsuit, administrative
hearing or proceeding, arbitration, or mediation, whether arising under this
chapter or otherwise, in which the parties or litigants are a manufacturer or
distributor and one or more motor vehicle dealers, is the state of Washington.
This provision does not apply to any voluntary dispute resolution procedure
that is not binding on the dealer. It is the public policy of this state that
venue provided for in this section may not be modified or waived in a contract
or other agreement, and any provision contained in a franchise agreement that
requires arbitration or litigation to be conducted outside the state of
Washington is void and unenforceable.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Section captions used in
this act are not part of the law.

---
END ---