BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.30.020 and 2001 c
30 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The positions or
offices on a primary ballot shall be arranged in substantially the following
order: United States senator; United States representative; governor;
lieutenant governor; secretary of state; state treasurer; state auditor;
attorney general; commissioner of public lands; superintendent of public
instruction; insurance commissioner; state senator; state representative;
county officers; justices of the supreme court; judges of the court of appeals;
judges of the superior court; and judges of the district court. For all other
jurisdictions on the primary ballot, the offices in each jurisdiction shall be
grouped together and be in the order of the position numbers assigned to those
offices, if any.

(2) The order of the
positions or offices on an election ballot shall be substantially the same as
on a primary ballot except that the offices of president and vice president of
the United States shall precede all other offices on a presidential election
ballot. State ballot issues shall be placed before all offices on an election
ballot. The positions on a ballot to be assigned to ballot measures regarding
local units of government shall be established by the secretary of state by
rule.

(3) The
political party or independent candidacy of each candidate for partisan office
shall not be indicated ((next to the name of the candidate)) on
the primary and election ballot. ((A candidate shall file a written notice
with the filing officer within three business days after the close of the
filing period designating the political party to be indicated next to the
candidate's name on the ballot if either: (a) The candidate has been nominated
by two or more minor political parties or independent conventions; or (b) the
candidate has both filed a declaration of candidacy declaring an affiliation
with a major political party and been nominated by a minor political party or
independent convention. If no written notice is filed the filing officer shall
give effect to the party designation shown upon the first document filed. A
candidate may be deemed nominated by a minor party or independent convention
only if all documentation required by chapter 29.24 RCW has been timely filed.))

--- END ---