BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that Washington's citizens should have access to environmental benchmarks
information, and should have the opportunity to participate in developing and
maintaining a benchmark program. An enormous amount of environmental quality
data is collected for many purposes, but primarily for administering
environmental quality and public health programs. Key benchmark information is
distilled from this great quantity of data in only rare instances. Such
information should be compiled and be presented in a manner that the public will
find useful in making choices about individual actions and in expressing their
views on priorities for governmental action. This information should address
those key parameters that the public finds most important in staying informed
on environmental quality conditions and trends over time.

(2) The legislature
further finds that a system of environmental quality benchmarks is an integral
component of transiting from traditional command and control regulatory
strategies to protect environmental quality to performance-based strategies
that allow greater flexibility in choosing the means to attain goals that are
publicly developed and supported. The success of such second generation
environmental protection strategies is dependent upon high quality information
that is widely available and useable by the regulated community and the public
generally.

(3) Therefore, it is
the purpose of this act to authorize the development of a proposal for an
environmental quality benchmarks program for future legislative consideration,
and to make better use of existing monitoring data and analysis to inform the
public and to further performance-based environmental quality strategies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The Washington state
institute for public policy shall provide to the legislature a report that
includes a proposal for a Washington environmental benchmarks program. The
institute shall review benchmark programs currently operating at the local and state
level, and in other states. The institute's review shall address and provide
options as well as recommendations on:

(a) Ensuring a
continuous and meaningful role for the public in adopting benchmarks and
advising on how the benchmark information should be used in governmental
programs;

(b) Administering and
funding the benchmark program;

(c) Addressing key
environmental and natural resources, such as:

(i) Water resources;

(ii) Air resources;

(iii) Soil;

(iv) Public health
effects from environmental contaminants or conditions;

(v) Forest land and
farmland resources;

(vi) Fish and wildlife
resources; and

(vii) Important and
unique natural areas;

(d) Methods to rely
primarily on existing monitoring data sources and analysis;

(e) A long-term strategy
for tracking trends on key benchmarks and ensuring that data will be collected
continuously over time to make such trends' information useful and accurate;
and

(f) Identifying
benchmark parameters for which information widely accessible by the public and
regulated community would support performance-based strategies.

(2) In conducting the
study, the institute shall consult with legislators, local, state, and federal
environmental agency program staff, and interested stakeholder groups.

(3) The institute may
accept nonstate funds to conduct the study.

(4) The institute's
report and recommendations shall be submitted no later than December 15, 2002.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.21A.510 and 1995
c 399 s 66 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to
assist the department of community, trade, and economic development in
providing information to businesses interested in locating in Washington state and
to assist Washington citizens in making informed decisions regarding actions to
protect and restore the state's environmental quality, the department shall
develop and periodically update an environmental profile of the state.
This profile shall identify the state's natural resources and environmental
quality conditions, and provide information on trends over time on such
resources and conditions. The profile shall describe how these assets are
valuable to the public and to industry. Examples of information to be
included are water resources and quality, air quality, and recreational
opportunities related to natural resources.

(2) The department
shall complete the initial profile by June 30, 2004, and shall incorporate
benchmark information that may be developed as a result of the report in
section 2 of this act.

Sec. 4. RCW 49.70.175 and 1985 c
410 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Funds in
the worker and community right to know fund established under RCW 49.70.170 may
be spent by the department of ecology to implement RCW 70.102.020 (1) through
(3) following legislative appropriation, and through June 30, 2003, may be
expended for the development of a proposal for an environmental benchmark
program under chapter . . ., Laws of 2002 (this act).
Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the director of the
department of ecology.

---
END ---