BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. INTENT. The construction industry
is the largest industry segment in the nation and in Washington state.
Construction contractors, large and small, both general contractors and
subcontractors, and including contractors doing all kinds of building
development work, experience difficulty in obtaining contractor liability
insurance coverage in the state of Washington. New contractors, in particular,
cannot obtain coverage and existing contractors are finding renewal coverage
extremely difficult to obtain. If contractor liability renewals are offered,
coverage is often severely restricted, accompanied by extreme rate hikes, or
both.

The market pull-out
from offering this insurance is targeted primarily at contractors building more
than ten homes a year, multifamily residences, or condominiums. As a result of
this unavailability, many contractors are abandoning multifamily development,
despite the growth management act's call for dense urban infill.

This chapter is
intended to increase the availability of construction contractor liability
coverage by creating a mechanism making contractor liability insurance
available for construction contractors. This chapter is implemented by
requiring all insurers authorized to write general casualty insurance to be
members of a joint underwriting association created to provide contractor
liability to construction contractors.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. DEFINITIONS. Unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Association" means the joint underwriting association established
under this chapter.

(2) "Construction
contractor liability insurance" means insurance coverage for the legal
liability of the insured and for loss, damage, or expense incident to a claim
arising from negligence in construction by a contractor as defined in this
section.

(3)
"Contractor" means a person or entity licensed as a contractor under
chapter 18.27 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. PLAN FOR ESTABLISHING
ASSOCIATION. The insurance commissioner shall approve by December 31, 2002, a
reasonable plan for the establishment of a nonprofit, joint underwriting
association for construction contractor liability insurance subject to the
conditions and limitations in this chapter. This plan shall include a market
assistance plan to be used prior to activating a joint underwriting
association.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. MARKET ASSISTANCE PLANS.
(1) The commissioner shall by rule require insurers authorized to write general
casualty insurance in this state to form a market assistance plan to assist
persons and other entities unable to purchase construction contractor liability
insurance in an adequate amount from either the admitted market or nonadmitted
market.

(2) For the purpose of
this section, "market assistance plan" means a voluntary mechanism by
insurers writing general casualty insurance in this state in either the
admitted or nonadmitted market to provide construction contractor liability
insurance for a class of insurance designated in writing to the plan by the
commissioner.

(3) The bylaws and
method of operation of any market assistance plan must be approved by the
commissioner prior to its operation.

(4) A market assistance
plan must have a minimum of twenty-five insurers willing to insure risks within
the class designated by the commissioner. If twenty-five insurers do not
voluntarily agree to participate, the commissioner may require casualty
insurers to participate in a market assistance plan as a condition of
continuing to do business in this state. The commissioner shall make such a
requirement to fulfill the quota of at least twenty-five insurers. The
commissioner shall make his or her designation on the basis of the insurer's
direct premium for other liability and products liability insurance in this
state, as reported in the insurer's annual statement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. COMPOSITION OF
ASSOCIATION. The association is all insurers possessing a certificate of
authority to write general casualty insurance, engaged in writing construction
contractor liability insurance, or both, within this state. Every insurer is a
member of the association and remains a member as a condition of its authority
to continue to transact business in this state. Only licensed contractors
under chapter 18.27 RCW may obtain insurance from the joint underwriting
association.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. CONSTRUCTION CONTRACTOR
LIABILITY INSURANCE‑-RATING PLAN MODIFIED ACCORDING TO PRACTICE VOLUME.
A licensed contractor may apply to the association to purchase construction
contractor liability insurance, and the association shall offer a policy with
liability limits established by the commissioner. The commissioner shall
require the use of a rating plan for construction contractor liability
insurance that permits rates to be modified according to type of construction
and volume of construction. Any rating plan for construction contractor
liability insurance under this section must be based on sound actuarial
principles.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. ADMINISTERING A PLAN.
The commissioner may select an insurer to administer a plan established under
this chapter. The insurer must be authorized to write general casualty
insurance in the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. POLICIES WRITTEN ON A
CLAIMS-MADE BASIS‑-COMMISSIONER MAY NOT APPROVE WITHOUT INSURER
GUARANTEES. The commissioner may not approve a policy written on a claims-made
basis by an insurer doing business in this state unless the insurer guarantees
to the commissioner the continued availability of suitable liability protection
for construction contractors (1) subsequent to the discontinuance of business
by the construction contractor, or (2) the sooner termination of the insurance
policy by the insurer, for so long as there is a reasonable probability of a
claim for damages for which the construction contractor might be liable.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. RISK MANAGEMENT PROGRAM‑-PART
OF PLAN. A risk management program for insureds of the association must be
established as a part of the plan. This program must include but not be
limited to: Investigation and analysis of frequency, severity, and causes of
defective construction projects; development of measures to reduce or control
the defective construction; systematic reporting of defect claims;
investigation and analysis of property owner complaints; and education of
association members to improve construction quality and risk reduction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. RULE MAKING. The
commissioner may adopt all rules necessary to ensure the efficient, equitable
operation of the association, including, but not limited to, rules requiring or
limiting certain policy provisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. CAPTIONS. Captions used
in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. Sections 1 through 11 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

---
END ---