BE IT ENACTED
BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds and
declares that:

(1) There is a need to address the potential risks posed by mercury
and other persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances;

(2) Persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances are durable and
break down very slowly when released into the environment;

(3) Animals and people accumulate persistent, bioaccumulative,
toxic substances in their bodies, primarily from the food they eat. As these
chemicals move up the food chain, they increase in concentration;

(4) The intent of this chapter is to reduce and, where feasible,
eliminate the risks to human health and the environment within the state posed
by mercury and persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances through the
identification, prioritization, and management of such substances;

(5) It is necessary to establish precise, science-based criteria,
and a consistent procedure for identifying and prioritizing mercury and
persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances;

(6) It is necessary to build on existing state and federal programs
that address mercury and persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances, to use
a full range of risk management options, both regulatory and nonregulatory, and
to reduce, and where feasible, eliminate potential risks posed by mercury and
persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances;

(7) It is necessary to develop a cross-media approach for managing
persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances because those substances move
readily between air, water, and land; and

(8) To ensure progress towards reducing and, where feasible,
eliminating risks posed by persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances it is
necessary to regularly measure the results of risk management actions and,
where necessary, improve risk management actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Bioaccumulation" means the buildup of a chemical in
biological organisms compared with their surrounding physical environment. A
substance bioaccumulates if: (a) Evidence that the bioconcentration factor or
bioaccumulation factor in aquatic species for the chemical is greater than five
thousand or, in the absence of such data, that the log kow is greater than
five; (b) evidence that a chemical presents other reasons for concern, such as
high bioaccumulation in other species, high toxicity, or ecotoxicity; or (c)
monitoring data in biota indicating that the bioaccumulation potential of the
chemical is sufficient to justify its consideration in the scope of this
chapter.

(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department of
ecology.

(4) "Persistence" means the ability of a substance to
remain in the environment and is defined as: (a) Evidence that the half-life
of the chemical in water is greater than two months, or that the chemical's
half-life in soil is greater than six months; (b) that the chemical's half-life
in sediment is greater than six months; (c) evidence that the chemical is otherwise
sufficiently persistent to justify its consideration within the scope of this
chapter.

(5) "Persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substance" means
a substance that concentrates primarily in water, sediment, or soil, and is not
removed at a rate adequate to prevent its bioaccumulation in aquatic or
terrestrial species, and is, therefore, present in the environment in toxic
concentrations. A persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substance satisfies all
of these three criteria: (a) Bioaccumulation, (b) persistence, and (c)
toxicity.

(6) "Persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substance working
list" means the list of substances that exhibit the characteristics of
persistence, bioaccumulation, and toxicity, and pose an unreasonable risk to
human health and the environment within the state.

(7) "Risk management" means activities taken to reduce or
eliminate risks to human health or the environment. Risk management includes
regulation as well as nonregulatory actions, such as voluntary programs or
educational activities that reduce exposures.

(8) "Toxicity" means the inherent capacity of a substance
to produce injury. A substance is toxic if it causes adverse effects to human
health or to the environment at levels typically encountered in the
environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. IDENTIFICATION AND
PRIORITIZATION OF PERSISTENT, BIOACCUMULATIVE, TOXIC SUBSTANCES. (1) The
department must adopt scientific criteria for determining bioaccumulation,
persistence, and toxicity.

(2) The department must, using the persistent, bioaccumulative,
toxic substance selection criteria developed in subsection (1) of this section,
identify substances that meet the criteria for persistence, bioaccumulation,
and toxicity, and that may pose an unreasonable risk to human health or the
environment within the state. In determining whether a substance poses an
unreasonable risk to human health or the environment, the department must apply
scientifically based risk assessment techniques.

(3) The department must apply its persistent, bioaccumulative,
toxic substance selection criteria and use its risk determinations described in
subsection (2) of this section to establish a persistent, bioaccumulative,
toxic substance working list of candidate persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic
substances that the department will consider for risk management actions. The
department must prioritize persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances on its
persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substance working list according to the
potential risks to human health and the environment in the state posed by such
substances, giving highest priority to persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic
substances that pose the greatest potential risk. The working list does not
represent any type or form of regulatory or statutory requirement, nor does it
represent a ban on any chemicals or chemical groups.

(4) The department must establish by rule, a process for adding and
removing substances from its persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substance
working list and for altering the priority assigned individual persistent,
bioaccumulative, toxic substances.

(5) The department must use the working list to establish the
priority for selecting specific persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances
for risk management action by the state.

(6) The department must initially consider for placement on its
persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substance working list: Aldrin, chlordane,
dieldrin, endrin, heptachlor, hexachlorobenzene, mercury, mirex, toxaphene,
polychlorinated biphenyls, DDT, and polychlorinated dibenzo-p-dioxin and
dibenzofurans. The department shall include on its persistent,
bioaccumulative, toxic substance working list only those internationally
recognized priority persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances that are
present in the state's environment and pose an unreasonable risk to human
health or the environment in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. MANAGEMENT OF PERSISTENT,
BIOACCUMULATIVE, TOXIC SUBSTANCES. When designing and implementing actions to
manage persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances in order to reduce and,
where feasible, eliminate risks to human health and the environment within the
state, the department must use the following process:

(1) Every two years the department may select from its persistent,
bioaccumulative, toxic substance working list, those substances that pose the
greatest risk to human health and the environment within the state. The
department must select for risk management actions the number of priority
persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances that it has the resources and
ability to fully address.

(2) The department must develop an inventory of sources, uses,
stockpiles, and reservoirs of priority persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic
substances selected for risk management activity. The inventories must include
all sources of priority persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances selected
for action within the state, including industrial, nonindustrial, and natural
sources of selected priority persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances.

(3) The department must identify all regulatory and nonregulatory
measures available to the department to manage selected priority persistent,
bioaccumulative, toxic substances. The department must also identify federal
regulatory and nonregulatory programs for managing priority persistent,
bioaccumulative, toxic substances selected for action.

(4) The department must identify regulatory and nonregulatory options
for managing the potential human health and environmental risks associated with
exposure to priority persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances selected for
action.

(5) The department must identify economic, environmental, and
social factors associated with management options for priority persistent,
bioaccumulative, toxic substances selected for action, and quantify the
economic, environmental, and social impacts associated with different
persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substance management options.

(6) The department must assess the possible risks and impacts
associated with different persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substance
management options. The department must consider the cost and availability of
alternate products and processes and the risks posed by such alternative
products and processes. The department must also consider the impact different
persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substance management options may have on
waste generation and disposal capacity within the state.

(7) The department must select and implement risk management
actions to reduce the potential human health and environmental risks associated
with exposures to priority persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances
selected for action. In selecting persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substance
management options, the department must analyze and consider all available
approaches, including voluntary and educational programs, to manage priority
persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances. If nonregulatory approaches are
insufficient to adequately manage the risks posed by selected priority
persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances, the department must use
available rule-making authority to manage persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic
substances and, to the extent necessary, adopt other necessary rules for
managing persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances consistent with state
law.

(8) Regulatory approaches for managing priority persistent,
bioaccumulative, toxic substances selected for action must:

(a) Be based on best available science;

(b) Be technologically and practically feasible;

(c) Explore use of innovative technologies;

(d) Minimize socioeconomic impacts on the state and its citizens;

(e) Result in measurable benefits to human health or the environment
in the state;

(f) Use a multimedia approach;

(g) Coordinate with relevant national and international efforts;

(h) Be cost-effective;

(i) Be effective and efficient for purposes of reducing risks to
human health and the environment; and

(j) Reduce overall risks to human health and the environment.

(9) The department must involve stakeholders in the selection of
risk management actions to reduce and, where feasible, eliminate the potential
human health and environmental risks associated with exposures to priority
persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. MEASUREMENT AND REPORTING
REQUIREMENTS. (1) Every two years the department must measure its progress
towards reducing and, where feasible, eliminating risks posed by persistent,
bioaccumulative, toxic substances achieved by implemented persistent, bioaccumulative,
toxic substance management actions.

(2) The department must develop and implement additional or
alternative persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substance risk management
actions if the department finds that existing persistent, bioaccumulative,
toxic substance risk management actions are not sufficiently protective of
human health or the environment, or if the department finds that existing
persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substance risk management actions no longer
comply with section 4(8) of this act. Additional or alternative persistent,
bioaccumulative, toxic substance risk management actions must comply with
section 4 of this act.

(3) Every two years the department must update its inventory of
services, uses, stockpiles, and reservoirs of priority persistent,
bioaccumulative, toxic substances selected for risk management activities. The
inventory updates will report on all sources of priority persistent,
bioaccumulative, toxic substances selected for action including industrial,
nonindustrial, and natural sources.

(4) The department must issue biennial reports to the legislature
and describe the department's progress towards managing persistent,
bioaccumulative, toxic substances in the state and the effectiveness of the
department's persistent, bioaccumulative, toxic substance risk management
activities. The biennial reports must also include the department's updated
inventory of sources, uses, stockpiles, and reservoirs of priority persistent,
bioaccumulative, toxic substances selected for risk management activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The department must adopt
rules to implement and enforce this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Sections 1 through 8 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---