BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that artistic, scientific, and historical organizations and associations
engaged in the production and performance of musical, dance, artistic,
dramatic, or literary works provide many public benefits to the people of the
state of Washington. Therefore, the legislature finds that it is in the best
interest of the state of Washington to provide a limited property tax and
leasehold excise tax exemption for the incidental use of these facilities by
certain organizations to better raise additional revenues from the public in
order to be self-sustaining for their exempt purposes.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.36.060 and 1995 c
306 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The following property
shall be exempt from taxation:

(1) All art,
scientific, or historical collections of associations maintaining and
exhibiting such collections for the benefit of the general public and not for
profit, together with all real and personal property of such associations used
exclusively for the safekeeping, maintaining and exhibiting of such
collections; and all the real and personal property owned by or leased to
associations engaged in the production and performance of musical, dance,
artistic, dramatic, or literary works for the benefit of the general public and
not for profit, which real and personal property is used exclusively for this
production or performance.

(a) To receive this
exemption an organization must be organized and operated exclusively for
artistic, scientific, historical, literary, musical, dance, dramatic, or
educational purposes and receive a substantial part of its support (exclusive
of income received in the exercise or performance by such organization of its
purpose or function) from the United States or any state or any political
subdivision thereof or from direct or indirect contributions from the general
public.

(b) If the property is
not currently being used for an exempt purpose but will be used for an exempt
purpose within a reasonable period of time, the nonprofit organization,
association, or corporation claiming the exemption must submit proof that a
reasonably specific and active program is being carried out to construct,
remodel, or otherwise enable the property to be used for an exempt purpose. Except
as provided in subsection (1)(c) of this section, the property does not
qualify for an exemption during this interim period if the property is used by,
loaned to, or rented to a for-profit organization or business enterprise.
Proof of a specific and active program to build or remodel the property so it
may be used for an exempt purpose may include, but is not limited to:

(i) Affirmative action
by the board of directors, trustees, or governing body of the nonprofit
organization, association, or corporation toward an active program of
construction or remodeling;

(ii) Itemized reasons
for the proposed construction or remodeling;

(iii) Clearly
established plans for financing the construction or remodeling; or

(iv) Building permits.

(c) ((Notwithstanding
(b) of this subsection, a for-profit limited partnership created to provide
facilities for the use of nonprofit art, scientific, or historical
organizations qualifies for the exemption under (b) of this subsection through
1997 if the for-profit limited partnership otherwise qualifies under (b) of
this subsection)) The loan or rental of the property to any person, for‑profit
organization, or business enterprise does not subject the property to taxation
if:

(i) The money
received for the loan or rental of the property does not exceed the maintenance
and operation expenses of the property; and

(ii) The total
income received from all loans or rentals of the property to any person, for‑profit
organization, or business enterprise does not exceed ten percent of the gross
income received from all sources in any calendar year. As used in this
subsection (1)(c), "all sources" means all revenue received from any
source including entrance or admittance fees, user fees, fund-raising events,
sales of tickets to performing arts events, and rents or donations received as
a result of the loan or rental of the exempt property. In calculating this
percentage, the revenue received as a result of the loans or rentals provided
for in this subsection shall be divided by the revenue received from all
sources.

(2) All fire engines
and other implements used for the extinguishment of fire, with the buildings
used exclusively for the safekeeping thereof, and for meetings of fire
companies, provided such properties belong to any city or town or to a fire
company therein.

(3) Property owned by
humane societies in this state in actual use by such societies.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.36.805 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 7 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to qualify
for an exemption under this chapter and RCW 84.36.560, the nonprofit
organizations, associations, or corporations must satisfy the conditions in
this section.

(2) The property must
be used exclusively for the actual operation of the activity for which
exemption is granted, unless otherwise provided, and does not exceed an amount
reasonably necessary for that purpose, except:

(a) The loan or rental
of the property does not subject the property to tax if:

(i) The rents and
donations received for the use of the portion of the property are reasonable
and do not exceed the maintenance and operation expenses attributable to the
portion of the property loaned or rented; and

(ii) Except for the
exemptions under RCW 84.36.030(4) ((and)), 84.36.037, and
84.36.060(1)(c), the property would be exempt from tax if owned by the
organization to which it is loaned or rented;

(b) The use of the
property for fund-raising activities does not subject the property to tax if
the fund-raising activities are consistent with the purposes for which the
exemption is granted.

(3) The property must
be irrevocably dedicated to the purpose for which exemption has been granted,
and on the liquidation, dissolution, or abandonment by said organization,
association, or corporation, said property will not inure directly or
indirectly to the benefit of any shareholder or individual, except a nonprofit
organization, association, or corporation which too would be entitled to
property tax exemption. This property need not be irrevocably dedicated if it
is leased or rented to those qualified for exemption under this chapter or RCW
84.36.560 for leased property, but only if under the terms of the lease or
rental agreement the nonprofit organization, association, or corporation
receives the benefit of the exemption.

(4) The facilities and
services must be available to all regardless of race, color, national origin or
ancestry.

(5) The organization,
association, or corporation must be duly licensed or certified where such
licensing or certification is required by law or regulation.

(6) Property sold to
organizations, associations, or corporations with an option to be repurchased
by the seller shall not qualify for exempt status. This subsection does not
apply to property sold to a nonprofit entity, as defined in RCW 84.36.560(7),
by:

(a) A nonprofit as
defined in RCW 84.36.800 that is exempt from income tax under section 501(c) of
the federal internal revenue code;

(b) A governmental
entity established under RCW 35.21.660, 35.21.670, or 35.21.730;

(c) A housing authority
created under RCW 35.82.030;

(d) A housing authority
meeting the definition in RCW 35.82.210(2)(a); or

(e) A housing authority
established under RCW 35.82.300.

(7) The department
shall have access to its books in order to determine whether the nonprofit
organization, association, or corporation is exempt from taxes under this
chapter and RCW 84.36.560.

(8) This section does
not apply to exemptions granted under RCW 84.36.020, 84.36.032, 84.36.250, and
84.36.260.

Sec. 4. RCW 84.36.840 and 1973
2nd ex.s. c 40 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to
determine whether organizations, associations, corporations or institutions
except those exempted under RCW 84.36.020 and 84.36.030 are exempt from taxes
within the intent of this chapter, and before the exemption shall be allowed
for any year, the superintendent or manager or other proper officer of the
organization, association, corporation or institution claiming exemption from
taxation shall file, with the department of revenue on forms furnished by the
director, a signed statement made under oath that the income and the receipts
thereof, including donations to it, have been applied to the actual expenses of
operating and maintaining it, or for its capital expenditures, and to no other
purpose. Such forms shall also include a statement of the receipts and
disbursements of said organization((: PROVIDED, That)).

(a) Institutions
claiming exemption under RCW 84.36.050 shall also file ((in addition))
a list of all property claimed to be exempt, the purpose for which it is used,
the revenue derived from it for the preceding year, the use to which ((such))
the revenue was applied, the number of students in attendance at the
school or college, the total revenues of the institution with the source from
which they were derived, and the purposes to which ((such)) the
revenues were applied, giving the items of such revenues and expenditures in
detail.

((Such)) (b)
Any organization or association claiming exemption under RCW 84.36.060(1)(c)
shall also file a report listing the source of its gross income received by the
organization or association in the preceding calendar year. This report will
include all income received through entrance or admittance fees, user fees,
fund-raising events, sales of tickets to performing arts events, and rents or
donations received as a result of the loan or rental of the exempt property.
The organization shall also provide the amount of income received from the
rental to any person, for‑profit organization, or business enterprise.

(2) The report
shall be submitted on or before April 1st following the close of the accounting
period for the fiscal year ended during the previous calendar year. The
department of revenue shall remove the tax exemption from the property and
assets of any organization, association, corporation, or institution which does
not file such report with the department of revenue on or before the due date((:
PROVIDED, That)). The department of revenue shall allow a
reasonable extension of time for filing upon written request filed on or before
the required filing date and for good cause shown therein.

Sec. 5. RCW 82.29A.130 and 1999
c 165 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

The following leasehold
interests shall be exempt from taxes imposed pursuant to RCW 82.29A.030 and
82.29A.040:

(1) All leasehold
interests constituting a part of the operating properties of any public utility
which is assessed and taxed as a public utility pursuant to chapter 84.12 RCW.

(2) All leasehold
interests in facilities owned or used by a school, college or university which
leasehold provides housing for students and which is otherwise exempt from
taxation under provisions of RCW 84.36.010 and 84.36.050.

(3) All leasehold
interests of subsidized housing where the fee ownership of such property is
vested in the government of the United States, or the state of Washington or
any political subdivision thereof but only if income qualification exists for
such housing.

(4) All leasehold
interests used for fair purposes of a nonprofit fair association that sponsors
or conducts a fair or fairs which receive support from revenues collected
pursuant to RCW 67.16.100 and allocated by the director of the department of
agriculture where the fee ownership of such property is vested in the
government of the United States, the state of Washington or any of its
political subdivisions: PROVIDED, That this exemption shall not apply to the
leasehold interest of any sublessee of such nonprofit fair association if such
leasehold interest would be taxable if it were the primary lease.

(5) All leasehold
interests in any property of any public entity used as a residence by an
employee of that public entity who is required as a condition of employment to
live in the publicly owned property.

(6) All leasehold
interests held by enrolled Indians of lands owned or held by any Indian or
Indian tribe where the fee ownership of such property is vested in or held in
trust by the United States and which are not subleased to other than to a lessee
which would qualify pursuant to this chapter, RCW 84.36.451 and 84.40.175.

(7) All leasehold
interests in any real property of any Indian or Indian tribe, band, or
community that is held in trust by the United States or is subject to a
restriction against alienation imposed by the United States: PROVIDED, That
this exemption shall apply only where it is determined that contract rent paid
is greater than or equal to ninety percent of fair market rental, to be
determined by the department of revenue using the same criteria used to
establish taxable rent in RCW 82.29A.020(2)(b).

(8) All leasehold
interests for which annual taxable rent is less than two hundred fifty dollars
per year. For purposes of this subsection leasehold interests held by the same
lessee in contiguous properties owned by the same lessor shall be deemed a
single leasehold interest.

(9) All leasehold
interests which give use or possession of the leased property for a continuous
period of less than thirty days: PROVIDED, That for purposes of this
subsection, successive leases or lease renewals giving substantially continuous
use of possession of the same property to the same lessee shall be deemed a
single leasehold interest: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no leasehold interest shall
be deemed to give use or possession for a period of less than thirty days
solely by virtue of the reservation by the public lessor of the right to use
the property or to allow third parties to use the property on an occasional,
temporary basis.

(10) All leasehold
interests under month-to-month leases in residential units rented for
residential purposes of the lessee pending destruction or removal for the
purpose of constructing a public highway or building.

(11) All leasehold
interests in any publicly owned real or personal property to the extent such
leasehold interests arises solely by virtue of a contract for public
improvements or work executed under the public works statutes of this state or
of the United States between the public owner of the property and a contractor.

(12) All leasehold
interests that give use or possession of state adult correctional facilities
for the purposes of operating correctional industries under RCW 72.09.100.

(13) All leasehold
interests used to provide organized and supervised recreational activities for
disabled persons of all ages in a camp facility and for public recreational
purposes by a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation that would be
exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.030(1) if it owned the property. If
the publicly owned property is used for any taxable purpose, the leasehold
excise taxes set forth in RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040 shall be imposed and
shall be apportioned accordingly.

(14) All leasehold
interests in the public or entertainment areas of a baseball stadium with
natural turf and a retractable roof or canopy that is in a county with a
population of over one million, that has a seating capacity of over forty
thousand, and that is constructed on or after January 1, 1995. "Public or
entertainment areas" include ticket sales areas, ramps and stairs, lobbies
and concourses, parking areas, concession areas, restaurants, hospitality and
stadium club areas, kitchens or other work areas primarily servicing other
public or entertainment areas, public rest room areas, press and media areas,
control booths, broadcast and production areas, retail sales areas, museum and
exhibit areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage areas, loading,
staging, and servicing areas, seating areas and suites, the playing field, and
any other areas to which the public has access or which are used for the
production of the entertainment event or other public usage, and any other
personal property used for these purposes. "Public or entertainment areas"
does not include locker rooms or private offices exclusively used by the
lessee.

(15) All leasehold
interests in the public or entertainment areas of a stadium and exhibition
center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, that is constructed on or after January
1, 1998. For the purposes of this subsection, "public or entertainment
areas" has the same meaning as in subsection (14) of this section, and
includes exhibition areas.

(16) All leasehold
interests in public facilities districts, as provided in chapter 36.100 or
35.57 RCW.

(17) All leasehold
interests created by the loan or rental of publicly owned real property used
for artistic, scientific, and historical organizations and associations engaged
in the production and performance of musical, dance, artistic, dramatic, or
literary works to any person as defined by RCW 82.04.030 if:

(a) The money
received for the loan or rental of the property does not exceed the maintenance
and operation expenses of the property; and

(b) The total income
received from all loans or rentals of the publicly owned real property to any
person does not exceed ten percent of the gross income received from all
sources in any calendar year. As used in this subsection, "all
sources" means all revenue received from any source including entrance or
admittance fees, user fees, fund-raising events, sales of tickets to performing
arts events, and rents or donations received as a result of the loan or rental
of the exempt property. In calculating this percentage, the revenue received
as a result of the loans or rentals provided for in this subsection shall be
divided by the revenue received from all sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Any person as defined by
RCW 82.04.030 that qualifies for the exemption set forth in RCW 82.29A.130(17)
is entitled to a waiver of any tax liability accrued, but unpaid, under chapter
82.29A RCW during the four years immediately preceding the effective date of
this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---