BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 10.01.160 and 1995 c
221 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court may
require a defendant to pay costs. Costs may be imposed only upon a convicted
defendant, except for costs imposed upon a defendant's entry into a deferred
prosecution program or costs imposed upon a defendant for preparing and serving
a warrant for failure to appear.

(2) Costs shall be
limited to expenses specially incurred by the state in prosecuting the
defendant or in administering the deferred prosecution program under chapter
10.05 RCW. They cannot include expenses inherent in providing a
constitutionally guaranteed jury trial or expenditures in connection with the
maintenance and operation of government agencies that must be made by the
public irrespective of specific violations of law. Expenses incurred for
serving of warrants for failure to appear and jury fees under RCW 10.46.190 may
be included in costs the court may require a defendant to pay. Costs for
administering a deferred prosecution may not exceed one hundred fifty dollars including
costs for supervision or probation. Costs for preparing and serving a
warrant for failure to appear may not exceed one hundred dollars. Costs of
incarceration imposed on a defendant convicted of a misdemeanor or a gross
misdemeanor may not exceed fifty dollars per day of incarceration. Payment of
other court-ordered financial obligations, including all legal financial
obligations and costs of supervision take precedence over the payment of the
cost of incarceration ordered by the court. All funds received from defendants
for the cost of incarceration in the county or city jail must be remitted for
criminal justice purposes to the county or city that is responsible for the
defendant's jail costs. Costs imposed constitute a judgment against a
defendant and survive a dismissal of the underlying action against the
defendant. However, if the defendant is acquitted on the underlying action,
the costs for preparing and serving a warrant for failure to appear do not
survive the acquittal, and the judgment that such costs would otherwise
constitute shall be vacated.

(3) The court shall not
sentence a defendant to pay costs unless the defendant is or will be able to
pay them. In determining the amount and method of payment of costs, the court
shall take account of the financial resources of the defendant and the nature
of the burden that payment of costs will impose.

(4) A defendant who has
been sentenced to pay costs and who is not in contumacious default in the
payment thereof may at any time petition the sentencing court for remission of
the payment of costs or of any unpaid portion thereof. If it appears to the
satisfaction of the court that payment of the amount due will impose manifest
hardship on the defendant or the defendant's immediate family, the court may
remit all or part of the amount due in costs, or modify the method of payment
under RCW 10.01.170.

Sec. 2. RCW 10.05.170 and 1991 c
247 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As a condition of
granting deferred prosecution, the court may order supervision of the
petitioner during the period of deferral ((and may levy a monthly assessment
upon the petitioner as provided in RCW 10.64.120)). In a jurisdiction with
a probation department, the court may appoint the probation department to
supervise the petitioner. In a jurisdiction without a probation department,
the court may appoint an appropriate person or agency to supervise the
petitioner. A supervisor appointed under this section shall be required to do
at least the following:

(1) If the charge for
which deferral is granted relates to operation of a motor vehicle, at least
once every six months request from the department of licensing an abstract of
the petitioner's driving record; and

(2) At
least once every month make contact with the petitioner or with any agency to
which the petitioner has been directed for treatment as a part of the deferral.

---
END ---