BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART 1 - DEFINITIONS

Sec. 101. RCW 66.04.010 and 2000 c
142 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In this title, unless
the context otherwise requires:

(1) "Alcohol"
is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, hydrated oxide of ethyl, or spirit of
wine, which is commonly produced by the fermentation or distillation of grain,
starch, molasses, or sugar, or other substances including all dilutions and
mixtures of this substance. The term "alcohol" does not include
alcohol in the possession of a manufacturer or distiller of alcohol fuel, as
described in RCW 66.12.130, which is intended to be denatured and used as a fuel
for use in motor vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements of
husbandry.

(2) "Beer"
means any malt beverage or malt liquor as these terms are defined in this
chapter.

(3) "Beer
distributor" means a person who buys beer from a brewer or brewery located
either within or beyond the boundaries of the state, beer importers, or foreign
produced beer from a source outside the state of Washington, for the purpose of
selling the same pursuant to this title, or who represents such brewer or
brewery as agent.

(4) "Beer
importer" means a person or business within Washington who purchases beer
from a United States brewery holding a certificate of approval (B5) or foreign
produced beer from a source outside the state of Washington for the purpose of
selling the same pursuant to this title.

(5) "Brewer"
means any person engaged in the business of manufacturing beer and malt
liquor. Brewer includes a brand owner of malt beverages who holds a brewer's
notice with the federal bureau of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms at a location
outside the state and whose malt beverage is contract-produced by a licensed
in-state brewery, and who may exercise within the state, under a domestic
brewery license, only the privileges of storing, selling to licensed beer distributors,
and exporting beer from the state.

(6) "Board"
means the liquor control board, constituted under this title.

(7) "Club"
means an organization of persons, incorporated or unincorporated, operated
solely for fraternal, benevolent, educational, athletic or social purposes, and
not for pecuniary gain.

(8) "Consume"
includes the putting of liquor to any use, whether by drinking or otherwise.

(9) "Dentist"
means a practitioner of dentistry duly and regularly licensed and engaged in
the practice of his profession within the state pursuant to chapter 18.32 RCW.

(10)
"Distiller" means a person engaged in the business of distilling
spirits.

(11) "Domestic
brewery" means a place where beer and malt liquor are manufactured or
produced by a brewer within the state.

(12) "Domestic
winery" means a place where wines are manufactured or produced within the
state of Washington.

(13)
"Druggist" means any person who holds a valid certificate and is a
registered pharmacist and is duly and regularly engaged in carrying on the
business of pharmaceutical chemistry pursuant to chapter 18.64 RCW.

(14) "Drug
store" means a place whose principal business is, the sale of drugs,
medicines and pharmaceutical preparations and maintains a regular prescription
department and employs a registered pharmacist during all hours the drug store
is open.

(15)
"Employee" means any person employed by the board, including a
vendor, as hereinafter in this section defined.

(16) "Franchise"
means the privilege of selling spirits and strong beer in original packages for
off-premises consumption and the sale of alcohol to holders of a permit to
purchase.

(17) "Franchise
applicant" means any person who bids for a franchise to sell spirits,
strong beer, and alcohol in accordance with the provisions of this title.

(18) "Franchise
area" means a geographic area designated as such by the board for the
purpose of issuing franchises.

(19)
"Franchisee" means the holder of a franchise to sell spirits and
strong beer in original packages for off-premises consumption and the sale of
alcohol to holders of a permit to purchase.

(20)
"Fund" means 'liquor revolving fund.'

(((17))) (21)
"Hotel" means every building or other structure kept, used,
maintained, advertised or held out to the public to be a place where food is
served and sleeping accommodations are offered for pay to transient guests, in
which twenty or more rooms are used for the sleeping accommodation of such
transient guests and having one or more dining rooms where meals are served to
such transient guests, such sleeping accommodations and dining rooms being
conducted in the same building and buildings, in connection therewith, and such
structure or structures being provided, in the judgment of the board, with
adequate and sanitary kitchen and dining room equipment and capacity, for
preparing, cooking and serving suitable food for its guests: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That in cities and towns of less than five thousand population, the board shall
have authority to waive the provisions requiring twenty or more rooms.

(((18))) (22)
"Importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits from a
distillery outside the state of Washington and imports such spirituous liquor
into the state for sale to the board or for export.

(((19))) (23)
"Imprisonment" means confinement in the county jail.

(((20))) (24)
"Liquor" includes the four varieties of liquor herein defined
(alcohol, spirits, wine and beer), and all fermented, spirituous, vinous, or
malt liquor, or combinations thereof, and mixed liquor, a part of which is
fermented, spirituous, vinous or malt liquor, or otherwise intoxicating; and
every liquid or solid or semisolid or other substance, patented or not,
containing alcohol, spirits, wine or beer, and all drinks or drinkable liquids
and all preparations or mixtures capable of human consumption, and any liquid,
semisolid, solid, or other substance, which contains more than one percent of
alcohol by weight shall be conclusively deemed to be intoxicating. Liquor does
not include confections or food products that contain one percent or less of
alcohol by weight.

(((21))) (25)
"Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the preparation of liquor
for sale, in any form whatsoever.

(((22))) (26)
"Malt beverage" or "malt liquor" means any beverage such as
beer, ale, lager beer, stout, and porter obtained by the alcoholic fermentation
of an infusion or decoction of pure hops, or pure extract of hops and pure
barley malt or other wholesome grain or cereal in pure water containing not
more than eight percent of alcohol by weight, and not less than one-half of one
percent of alcohol by volume. For the purposes of this title, any such beverage
containing more than eight percent of alcohol by weight shall be referred to as
"strong beer."

(((23))) (27)
"Package" means any container or receptacle used for holding liquor.

(((24))) (28)
"Permit" means a permit for the purchase of liquor under this title.

(((25))) (29)
"Person" means an individual, copartnership, association, or
corporation.

(((26))) (30)
"Physician" means a medical practitioner duly and regularly licensed
and engaged in the practice of his profession within the state pursuant to
chapter 18.71 RCW.

(((27))) (31)
"Prescription" means a memorandum signed by a physician and given by
him to a patient for the obtaining of liquor pursuant to this title for
medicinal purposes.

(((28))) (32)
"Public place" includes streets and alleys of incorporated cities and
towns; state or county or township highways or roads; buildings and grounds
used for school purposes; public dance halls and grounds adjacent thereto;
those parts of establishments where beer may be sold under this title, soft drink
establishments, public buildings, public meeting halls, lobbies, halls and
dining rooms of hotels, restaurants, theatres, stores, garages and filling
stations which are open to and are generally used by the public and to which
the public is permitted to have unrestricted access; railroad trains, stages,
and other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and the depots and
waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are open to unrestricted use
and access by the public; publicly owned bathing beaches, parks, and/or
playgrounds; and all other places of like or similar nature to which the
general public has unrestricted right of access, and which are generally used
by the public.

(((29))) (33)
"Regulations" means regulations made by the board under the powers
conferred by this title.

(((30))) (34)
"Restaurant" means any establishment provided with special space and
accommodations where, in consideration of payment, food, without lodgings, is
habitually furnished to the public, not including drug stores and soda
fountains.

(((31))) (35)
"Retail liquor store" means a specific location where spirits, strong
beer, and alcohol may be lawfully sold by a franchisee under provisions of this
title.

(36)
"Sale" and "sell" include exchange, barter, and traffic;
and also include the selling or supplying or distributing, by any means
whatsoever, of liquor, or of any liquid known or described as beer or by any
name whatever commonly used to describe malt or brewed liquor or of wine, by any
person to any person; and also include a sale or selling within the state to a
foreign consignee or his agent in the state. "Sale" and
"sell" shall not include the giving, at no charge, of a reasonable
amount of liquor by a person not licensed by the board to a person not licensed
by the board, for personal use only. "Sale" and "sell"
also does not include a raffle authorized under RCW 9.46.0315: PROVIDED, That
the nonprofit organization conducting the raffle has obtained the appropriate
permit from the board.

(((32))) (37)
"Soda fountain" means a place especially equipped with apparatus for
the purpose of dispensing soft drinks, whether mixed or otherwise.

(((33))) (38)
"Spirits" means any beverage which contains alcohol obtained by
distillation, including wines exceeding twenty-four percent of alcohol by
volume.

(((34))) (39)
"Store" means a state liquor store established under this title.

(((35))) (40)
"Strong beer" means malt beverage or malt liquor as defined in this
section that has an alcohol content of more than eight percent alcohol by
weight.

(41)
"Tavern" means any establishment with special space and accommodation
for sale by the glass and for consumption on the premises, of beer, as herein
defined.

(((36))) (42)
"Vendor" means a person employed by the board as a store manager
under this title.

(((37))) (43)
"Winery" means a business conducted by any person for the manufacture
of wine for sale, other than a domestic winery.

(((38))) (44)
"Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by fermentation of
fruits (grapes, berries, apples, et cetera) or other agricultural product
containing sugar, to which any saccharine substances may have been added
before, during or after fermentation, and containing not more than twenty-four
percent of alcohol by volume, including sweet wines fortified with wine
spirits, such as port, sherry, muscatel and angelica, not exceeding twenty-four
percent of alcohol by volume and not less than one-half of one percent of
alcohol by volume. For purposes of this title, any beverage containing no more
than fourteen percent of alcohol by volume when bottled or packaged by the
manufacturer shall be referred to as "table wine," and any beverage
containing alcohol in an amount more than fourteen percent by volume when
bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as "fortified
wine." However, "fortified wine" shall not include: (a) Wines
that are both sealed or capped by cork closure and aged two years or more; and
(b) wines that contain more than fourteen percent alcohol by volume solely as a
result of the natural fermentation process and that have not been produced with
the addition of wine spirits, brandy, or alcohol.

This subsection shall
not be interpreted to require that any wine be labeled with the designation
"table wine" or "fortified wine."

(((39))) (45)
"Wine distributor" means a person who buys wine from a vintner or
winery located either within or beyond the boundaries of the state for the
purpose of selling the same not in violation of this title, or who represents
such vintner or winery as agent.

(((40))) (46)
"Wine importer" means a person or business within Washington who
purchases wine from a United States winery holding a certificate of approval
(W7) or foreign produced wine from a source outside the state of Washington for
the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.

PART 2 - RETAIL AND WHOLESALE LIQUOR FRANCHISES

Sec. 201. RCW 66.08.020 and 1933
ex.s. c 62 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The administration of
this title, including the general control, management and supervision of all
liquor stores and the regulation of retail liquor stores and liquor
agencies, in addition to the prohibitions in section 209 of this act, shall
be vested in the liquor control board, constituted under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. RETAIL FRANCHISES‑-ESTABLISHMENT.
The board shall establish, or cause to be established, franchises for the
retail sale of liquor within the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
203. WHOLESALE
FRANCHISES--ESTABLISHMENT. The board shall establish, or cause to be
established, franchises for the wholesale sale of liquor within the state. No
person may simultaneously hold a wholesale and retail franchise within the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
204. BOARD'S AUTHORITY. The
board may:

(1) By rule, establish
the franchise period, expiration date, and renewal procedures;

(2) By rule, enforce
this chapter through rule making and administrative penalties;

(3) Enter the facility
of any franchisee at any time for the purpose of inspecting the facility and
determining the compliance of the franchisee with this title and any
implementing rules;

(4) By rule, prescribe
the records to be kept by franchisees relating to the purchase and sale of
spirits, strong beer, and alcohol. These records shall be open at all
reasonable times to inspection by the board.

(5) Adopt rules for
advertising and other promotion of sales of spirits, strong beer, and alcohol
in accordance with RCW 66.08.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
205. TRANSITION--BOARD NOT TO
COMPETE. (1) The board shall provide an orderly transition from state liquor
stores to franchised liquor sales.

(2) After state liquor
sales are converted to franchises under sections 202 and 203 of this act, it is
unlawful for the board to lease space for or operate a state retail or
wholesale liquor outlet.

Sec. 206. RCW 66.08.050 and 1997 c
228 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The board, subject to
the provisions of this title and the rules, shall:

(1) ((Determine the
localities within which state liquor stores shall be established throughout the
state, and the number and situation of the stores within each locality;

(2))) Appoint in cities and towns and other
communities, in which no ((state)) liquor store is located, liquor
vendors. In addition, the board may appoint, in its discretion, a manufacturer
that also manufactures liquor products other than wine under a license under
this title, as a vendor for the purpose of sale of liquor products of its own
manufacture on the licensed premises only. Such liquor vendors shall be agents
of the board and be authorized to sell liquor to such persons, firms or
corporations as provided for the sale of liquor from ((a state)) other
liquor stores, and such vendors shall be subject to such additional
rules and regulations consistent with this title as the board may require;

(((3) Establish all
necessary warehouses for the storing and bottling, diluting and rectifying of
stocks of liquors for the purposes of this title;

(4))) (2) Provide for the leasing for periods
not to exceed ten years of all premises required for the conduct of the
business; and for remodeling the same, and the procuring of their furnishings,
fixtures, and supplies; and for obtaining options of renewal of such leases by
the lessee. The terms of such leases in all other respects shall be subject to
the direction of the board;

(((5))) (3)
Determine the nature, form and capacity of all packages to be used for
containing liquor kept for sale under this title;

(((6))) (4)
Execute or cause to be executed, all contracts, papers, and documents in the
name of the board, under such regulations as the board may fix;

(((7))) (5)
Pay all customs, duties, excises, charges and obligations whatsoever relating
to the business of the board;

(((8))) (6)
Require bonds from all employees in the discretion of the board, and to
determine the amount of fidelity bond of each such employee;

(((9))) (7)
Perform services for the state lottery commission to such extent, and for such
compensation, as may be mutually agreed upon between the board and the
commission;

(((10))) (8)
Accept and deposit into the general fund-local account and disburse, subject to
appropriation, federal grants or other funds or donations from any source for
the purpose of improving public awareness of the health risks associated with
alcohol consumption by youth and the abuse of alcohol by adults in Washington
state. The board's alcohol awareness program shall cooperate with federal and
state agencies, interested organizations, and individuals to effect an active
public beverage alcohol awareness program;

(((11))) (9)
Perform all other matters and things, whether similar to the foregoing or not,
to carry out the provisions of this title, and shall have full power to do each
and every act necessary to the conduct of its business, including all buying,
selling, preparation and approval of forms, and every other function of the
business whatsoever, subject only to audit by the state auditor: PROVIDED,
That the board shall have no authority to regulate the content of spoken
language on licensed premises where wine and other liquors are served and where
there is not a clear and present danger of disorderly conduct being provoked by
such language;

(10) Establish fees
for retail and wholesale franchisees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
207. TRANSFER OF RETAIL AND
WHOLESALE FRANCHISES--SUBLEASING PROHIBITED--SURRENDER OF LICENSE. A retail or
wholesale franchise may be transferred to any person determined by
investigation of the board to be qualified to hold a liquor store license. The
board may adopt reasonable rules governing the transfer of franchises.

No franchise may be
subleased by any franchise holder.

Sec. 208. RCW 66.08.150 and 1989 c
175 s 122 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The action,
order, or decision of the board as to any denial of an application for the
reissuance of a permit ((or)), license, or franchise or as
to any revocation, suspension, or modification of any permit ((or)),
license, or franchise shall be an adjudicative proceeding and subject to
the applicable provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

(((1))) (2)
An opportunity for a hearing may be provided an applicant for the reissuance of
a permit ((or)), license, or franchise prior to the
disposition of the application, and if no such opportunity for a prior hearing
is provided then an opportunity for a hearing to reconsider the application
must be provided the applicant.

(((2))) (3)
An opportunity for a hearing must be provided a permittee ((or)),
licensee, or franchisee prior to a revocation or modification of any
permit ((or)), license, or franchise and, except as
provided in subsection (4) of this section, prior to the suspension of any
permit ((or)), license, or franchise.

(((3))) (4)
No hearing shall be required until demanded by the applicant, permittee, ((or))
licensee, or franchisee.

(((4))) (5)
The board may summarily suspend a license ((or)), permit, or
franchise for a period of up to thirty days without a prior hearing if it
finds that public health, safety, or welfare imperatively require emergency
action, and incorporates a finding to that effect in its order; and proceedings
for revocation or other action must be promptly instituted and determined.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
209. PROHIBITED ACTS. (1) In
addition to other provisions of law, it is unlawful for any franchisee, or
agent or employee thereof, on the franchisee’s premises to:

(a) Sell or offer for
sale any liquor other than from the original package or container;

(b) Sell, give away, or
permit the sale, gift, or procurement of any liquor for or to any person under
twenty-one years of age;

(c) Sell, give away, or
permit the sale, gift, or procurement of any liquor for or to any person
apparently intoxicated;

(d) Sell or offer for
sale of spirits, strong beer, or alcohol on any Sunday or at other prohibited
dates and times;

(e) Permit the
consumption of any spirits, strong beer, or alcohol on the premises by any
person;

(f) Alter, change, or misrepresent
the quality, quantity, or brand name of any liquor with the intent to defraud;

(g) Permit any person
under twenty-one years of age to sell or give liquor to any other person,
except to assist a cashier who is twenty-one years of age or older; or

(h) Purchase or
otherwise obtain liquor in any manner or from any source other than that
specifically authorized in this chapter.

(2) Violations of any
provision of this chapter or any rule adopted by the board, or any false
statement concerning any material fact, or omission of any material fact in
submitting an application for a franchise or license or for a renewal of a
franchise or license or in any hearing concerning the suspension or revocation
thereof, or the commission of any of the acts declared in this chapter to be
unlawful is subject to disciplinary action by the board, including suspension
or revocation of the license and/or franchise. No fees paid for the franchise
or license will be refunded. The board shall develop rules to implement and
enforce this subsection and may assess an administrative penalty for
violations.

(3) Nothing in this
chapter or any rule of the board prevents or prohibits any franchisee from
employing any person who is at least eighteen years of age to serve in any franchise,
or from having such a person assist a person twenty-one years of age or older
who handles, sells, or delivers spirits, strong beer, or alcohol under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
210. RETAIL LIQUOR
FRANCHISE--SEPARATION FROM OTHER MERCHANDISE. Spirits, strong beer, and
alcohol shall be located in a separate building from other retail facilities of
the franchisee or be separated from the sales area of other types of
merchandise and shall have a separate entrance and exit and its own point of
sale device.

PART 3 - AMENDATORY PROVISIONS

Sec. 301. RCW 66.24.010 and 1998 c
126 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every license shall
be issued in the name of the applicant, and the holder thereof shall not allow
any other person to use the license.

(2) For the purpose of
considering any application for a license, the board may cause an inspection of
the premises to be made, and may inquire into all matters in connection with
the construction and operation of the premises. For the purpose of reviewing
any application for a license and for considering the denial, suspension or
revocation of any license, the liquor control board may consider any prior
criminal conduct of the applicant and the provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of
chapter 9.96A RCW shall not apply to such cases. The board may, in its
discretion, grant or refuse the license applied for. Authority to approve an
uncontested or unopposed license may be granted by the board to any staff
member the board designates in writing. Conditions for granting such authority
shall be adopted by rule. No retail license of any kind may be issued to:

(a) A person who has
not resided in the state for at least one month prior to making application,
except in cases of licenses issued to dining places on railroads, boats, or
aircraft;

(b) A copartnership,
unless all of the members thereof are qualified to obtain a license, as
provided in this section;

(c) A person whose
place of business is conducted by a manager or agent, unless such manager or
agent possesses the same qualifications required of the licensee;

(d) A corporation or a
limited liability company, unless it was created under the laws of the state of
Washington or holds a certificate of authority to transact business in the
state of Washington.

(3)(a) The board may,
in its discretion, subject to the provisions of RCW 66.08.150, suspend or
cancel any license; and all rights of the licensee to keep or sell liquor
thereunder shall be suspended or terminated, as the case may be.

(b) The board shall
immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been
certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the
person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during
the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic
upon the board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and
health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

(c) The board may
request the appointment of administrative law judges under chapter 34.12 RCW
who shall have power to administer oaths, issue subpoenas for the attendance of
witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and
testimony, examine witnesses, and to receive testimony in any inquiry,
investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, under such
rules and regulations as the board may adopt.

(d) Witnesses shall be
allowed fees and mileage each way to and from any such inquiry, investigation,
hearing, or proceeding at the rate authorized by RCW 34.05.446, as now or
hereafter amended. Fees need not be paid in advance of appearance of witnesses
to testify or to produce books, records, or other legal evidence.

(e) In case of
disobedience of any person to comply with the order of the board or a subpoena
issued by the board, or any of its members, or administrative law judges, or on
the refusal of a witness to testify to any matter regarding which he or she may
be lawfully interrogated, the judge of the superior court of the county in
which the person resides, on application of any member of the board or
administrative law judge, shall compel obedience by contempt proceedings, as in
the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from said
court or a refusal to testify therein.

(4) Upon receipt of notice
of the suspension or cancellation of a license, the licensee shall forthwith
deliver up the license to the board. Where the license has been suspended
only, the board shall return the license to the licensee at the expiration or
termination of the period of suspension. The board shall notify all vendors in
the city or place where the licensee has its premises of the suspension or
cancellation of the license; and no employee may allow or cause any liquor to
be delivered to or for any person at the premises of that licensee.

(5)(a) At the time of
the original issuance of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, the
board shall prorate the license fee charged to the new licensee according to
the number of calendar quarters, or portion thereof, remaining until the first
renewal of that license is required.

(b) Unless sooner
canceled, every license issued by the board shall expire at midnight of the
thirtieth day of June of the fiscal year for which it was issued. However, if
the board deems it feasible and desirable to do so, it may establish, by rule
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, a system for staggering the annual renewal dates
for any and all licenses authorized by this chapter. If such a system of
staggered annual renewal dates is established by the board, the license fees
provided by this chapter shall be appropriately prorated during the first year
that the system is in effect.

(6) Every license
issued under this section shall be subject to all conditions and restrictions
imposed by this title or by the regulations in force from time to time. All
conditions and restrictions imposed by the board in the issuance of an
individual license shall be listed on the face of the individual license along
with the trade name, address, and expiration date.

(7) Every licensee
shall post and keep posted its license, or licenses, in a conspicuous place on
the premises.

(8) Before the board
shall issue a license to an applicant it shall give notice of such application
to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town, if the
application be for a license within an incorporated city or town, or to the
county legislative authority, if the application be for a license outside the
boundaries of incorporated cities or towns; and such incorporated city or town,
through the official or employee selected by it, or the county legislative
authority or the official or employee selected by it, shall have the right to
file with the board within twenty days after date of transmittal of such
notice, written objections against the applicant or against the premises for
which the license is asked, and shall include with such objections a statement
of all facts upon which such objections are based, and in case written
objections are filed, may request and the liquor control board may in its
discretion hold a formal hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title
34 RCW. Upon the granting of a license under this title the board shall send a
duplicate of the license or written notification to the chief executive officer
of the incorporated city or town in which the license is granted, or to the
county legislative authority if the license is granted outside the boundaries
of incorporated cities or towns.

(9) Before the board
issues any license to any applicant, it shall give (a) due consideration to the
location of the business to be conducted under such license with respect to the
proximity of churches, schools, and public institutions and (b) written notice
by certified mail of the application to churches, schools, and public
institutions within five hundred feet of the premises to be licensed. The
board shall issue no beer retailer license for either on-premises or
off-premises consumption or wine retailer license for either on-premises or
off-premises consumption or spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license covering
any premises not now licensed, if such premises are within five hundred feet of
the premises of any tax-supported public elementary or secondary school
measured along the most direct route over or across established public walks,
streets, or other public passageway from the outer property line of the school
grounds to the nearest public entrance of the premises proposed for license,
and if, after receipt by the school or public institution of the notice as
provided in this subsection, the board receives written notice, within twenty
days after posting such notice, from an official representative or
representatives of the school within five hundred feet of said proposed
licensed premises, indicating to the board that there is an objection to the
issuance of such license because of proximity to a school. For the purpose of
this section, church shall mean a building erected for and used exclusively for
religious worship and schooling or other activity in connection therewith. No
liquor license may be issued or reissued by the board to any motor sports
facility or licensee operating within the motor sports facility unless the
motor sports facility enforces a program reasonably calculated to prevent alcohol
or alcoholic beverages not purchased within the facility from entering the
facility and such program is approved by local law enforcement agencies. It is
the intent under this subsection that a retail license shall not be issued by
the board where doing so would, in the judgment of the board, adversely affect
a private school meeting the requirements for private schools under Title 28A
RCW, which school is within five hundred feet of the proposed licensee. The
board shall fully consider and give substantial weight to objections filed by
private schools. If a license is issued despite the proximity of a private
school, the board shall state in a letter addressed to the private school the
board's reasons for issuing the license.

(10) The restrictions
set forth in subsection (9) of this section shall not prohibit the board from
authorizing the assumption of existing licenses now located within the
restricted area by other persons or licenses or relocations of existing
licensed premises within the restricted area. In no case may the licensed
premises be moved closer to a church or school than it was before the
assumption or relocation.

(11) The notice
requirements and restrictions in subsection (9) of this section apply to the
issuance of retail and wholesale liquor store franchises.

(12) Nothing in
this section prohibits the board, in its discretion, from issuing a temporary
retail or distributor license to an applicant assuming an existing retail or
distributor license to continue the operation of the retail or distributor
premises during the period the application for the license is pending and when
the following conditions exist:

(a) The licensed
premises has been operated under a retail or distributor license within ninety
days of the date of filing the application for a temporary license;

(b) The retail or
distributor license for the premises has been surrendered pursuant to issuance
of a temporary operating license;

(c) The applicant for
the temporary license has filed with the board an application to assume the
retail or distributor license at such premises to himself or herself; and

(d) The application for
a temporary license is accompanied by a temporary license fee established by
the board by rule.

A temporary license
issued by the board under this section shall be for a period not to exceed
sixty days. A temporary license may be extended at the discretion of the board
for an additional sixty-day period upon payment of an additional fee and upon
compliance with all conditions required in this section.

Refusal by the board to
issue or extend a temporary license shall not entitle the applicant to request
a hearing. A temporary license may be canceled or suspended summarily at any
time if the board determines that good cause for cancellation or suspension
exists. RCW 66.08.130 and chapter 34.05 RCW shall apply to temporary licenses.

Application for a
temporary license shall be on such form as the board shall prescribe. If an
application for a temporary license is withdrawn before issuance or is refused
by the board, the fee which accompanied such application shall be refunded in
full.

Sec. 302. RCW 66.16.010 and 1939 c
172 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((There shall be
established at such places throughout the state as the liquor control board,
constituted under this title, shall deem advisable, stores to be known as
"state liquor stores," for the sale of liquor in accordance with the
provisions of this title and the regulations: PROVIDED, That the prices of all
liquor shall be fixed by the board from time to time so that the net annual
revenue received by the board therefrom shall not exceed thirty-five percent.

(2))) The liquor control board may, from time to
time, fix the special price at which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to
physicians and dentists and institutions regularly conducted as hospitals, for
use or consumption only in such hospitals; and may also fix the special price
at which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to schools, colleges and universities
within the state for use for scientific purposes. Regularly conducted
hospitals may have right to purchase pure ethyl alcohol on a federal permit.

(((3))) (2)
The liquor control board may also fix the special price at which pure ethyl
alcohol may be sold to any department, branch or institution of the state of
Washington, federal government, or to any person engaged in a manufacturing or
industrial business or in scientific pursuits requiring alcohol for use
therein.

(((4))) (3)
The liquor control board may also fix a special price at which pure ethyl
alcohol may be sold to any private individual, and shall make regulations
governing such sale of alcohol to private individuals as shall promote, as
nearly as may be, the minimum purchase of such alcohol by such persons.

(4) Pure ethyl
alcohol may be sold by retail liquor franchisees only to permit holders at
prices the retail liquor franchisees fix for their own sales.

Sec. 303. RCW 66.16.040 and 1996 c
291 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as otherwise
provided by law, an employee in a ((state liquor store)) retail
liquor franchise or liquor agency may sell liquor to any person of
legal age to purchase alcoholic beverages and may also sell to holders of
permits such liquor as may be purchased under such permits.

Where there may be a
question of a person's right to purchase liquor by reason of age, such person
shall be required to present any one of the following officially issued cards
of identification which shows his/her correct age and bears his/her signature
and photograph:

(1) Liquor control
authority card of identification of any state or province of Canada.

(2) Driver's license,
instruction permit or identification card of any state or province of Canada,
or "identicard" issued by the Washington state department of
licensing pursuant to RCW 46.20.117.

(3) United States armed
forces identification card issued to active duty, reserve, and retired
personnel and the personnel's dependents.

(4) Passport.

(5) Merchant Marine
identification card issued by the United States Coast Guard.

The board may adopt
such regulations as it deems proper covering the acceptance of such cards of
identification.

No liquor sold under
this section shall be delivered until the purchaser has paid for the liquor in
cash, except as allowed under RCW 66.16.041. The use of a personal credit card
does not rely upon the credit of the state as prohibited by Article VIII,
section 5 of the state Constitution.

Sec. 304. RCW 66.16.060 and 1943 c
216 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The board may in its
discretion by regulation prescribe that any or all liquors other than malt
liquor shall be delivered to any purchaser at a state liquor ((store)) retail
franchise only in a package sealed with the official seal.

Sec. 305. RCW 66.16.070 and 1933
ex.s. c 62 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

No employee in a state
liquor ((store)) retail franchise shall open or consume, or allow
to be opened or consumed any liquor on the ((store)) retail franchise
premises.

Sec. 306. RCW 66.16.080 and 1988 c
101 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

No sale or delivery of
liquor shall be made on or from the premises of any state liquor ((store))
retail franchise, nor shall any store be open for the sale of liquor, on
Sunday, unless the board determines that unique circumstances exist which
necessitate Sunday liquor sales by vendors appointed under RCW 66.08.050(2) of
products of their own manufacture, not to exceed one case of liquor per
customer.

Sec. 307. RCW 66.16.100 and 1997 c
321 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

No state liquor ((store))
retail franchise in a county with a population over three hundred
thousand may sell fortified wine if the board finds that the sale would be
against the public interest based on the factors in RCW 66.24.360. The burden
of establishing that the sale would be against the public interest is on those
persons objecting.

Sec. 308. RCW 66.16.110 and 1993 c
422 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The board
shall cause to be posted in conspicuous places, in a number determined by the
board, within each ((state liquor store)) retail liquor franchise,
notices in print not less than one inch high warning persons that consumption
of alcohol shortly before conception or during pregnancy may cause birth
defects, including fetal alcohol syndrome and fetal alcohol effects.

Sec. 309. RCW 66.20.010 and 1998 c
126 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon application in the
prescribed form being made to any employee authorized by the board to issue
permits, accompanied by payment of the prescribed fee, and upon the employee
being satisfied that the applicant should be granted a permit under this title,
the employee shall issue to the applicant under such regulations and at such
fee as may be prescribed by the board a permit of the class applied for, as
follows:

(1) Where the
application is for a special permit by a physician or dentist, or by any person
in charge of an institution regularly conducted as a hospital or sanitorium for
the care of persons in ill health, or as a home devoted exclusively to the care
of aged people, a special liquor purchase permit;

(2) Where the
application is for a special permit by a person engaged within the state in
mechanical or manufacturing business or in scientific pursuits requiring
alcohol for use therein, or by any private individual, a special permit to
purchase alcohol for the purpose named in the permit;

(3) Where the
application is for a special permit to consume liquor at a banquet, at a
specified date and place, a special permit to purchase liquor for consumption
at such banquet, to such applicants as may be fixed by the board;

(4) Where the
application is for a special permit to consume liquor on the premises of a
business not licensed under this title, a special permit to purchase liquor for
consumption thereon for such periods of time and to such applicants as may be
fixed by the board;

(5) Where the application
is for a special permit by a manufacturer to import or purchase within the
state alcohol, malt, and other materials containing alcohol to be used in the
manufacture of liquor, or other products, a special permit;

(6) Where the
application is for a special permit by a person operating a drug store to
purchase liquor at retail prices only, to be thereafter sold by such person on
the prescription of a physician, a special liquor purchase permit;

(7) Where the
application is for a special permit by an authorized representative of a
military installation operated by or for any of the armed forces within the
geographical boundaries of the state of Washington, a special permit to
purchase liquor for use on such military installation at prices to be fixed by the
board;

(8) Where the
application is for a special permit by a manufacturer, importer, or
distributor, or representative thereof, to serve liquor without charge to
delegates and guests at a convention of a trade association composed of
licensees of the board, when the said liquor is served in a hospitality room or
from a booth in a board-approved suppliers' display room at the convention, and
when the liquor so served is for consumption in the said hospitality room or
display room during the convention, anything in Title 66 RCW to the contrary
notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor shall be purchased from ((the
board)) a state liquor franchise, a liquor agency, or a spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant licensee and any such beer and wine shall be subject
to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;

(9) Where the
application is for a special permit by a manufacturer, importer, or
distributor, or representative thereof, to donate liquor for a reception,
breakfast, luncheon, or dinner for delegates and guests at a convention of a
trade association composed of licensees of the board, when the liquor so
donated is for consumption at the said reception, breakfast, luncheon, or
dinner during the convention, anything in Title 66 RCW to the contrary notwithstanding.
Any such spirituous liquor shall be purchased from ((the board)) a
state liquor franchise, a liquor agency, or a spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant licensee and any such beer and wine shall be subject to the taxes
imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;

(10) Where the
application is for a special permit by a manufacturer, importer, or
distributor, or representative thereof, to donate and/or serve liquor without
charge to delegates and guests at an international trade fair, show, or
exposition held under the auspices of a federal, state, or local governmental
entity or organized and promoted by a nonprofit organization, anything in Title
66 RCW to the contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor shall be
purchased from ((the board)) a state liquor franchise, a liquor
agency, and any such beer or wine shall be subject to the taxes imposed by
RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;

(11) Where the
application is for an annual special permit by a person operating a bed and
breakfast lodging facility to donate or serve wine or beer without charge to
overnight guests of the facility if the wine or beer is for consumption on the
premises of the facility. "Bed and breakfast lodging facility," as
used in this subsection, means a hotel or similar facility offering from one to
eight lodging units and breakfast to travelers and guests.

Sec. 310. RCW 66.20.160 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 209 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Words and phrases as
used in RCW 66.20.160 to 66.20.210, inclusive, shall have the following
meaning:

"Card of
identification" means any one of those cards described in RCW 66.16.040.

"Licensee"
means the holder of a retail liquor license issued by the board, and includes
any employee or agent of the licensee.

"((Store)) Employee"
means a person employed ((in)) by a ((state)) retail
liquor store, or liquor agency or licensee authorized to
sell liquor.

Sec. 311. RCW 66.20.170 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 209 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

A card of
identification may for the purpose of this title and for the purpose of
procuring liquor, be accepted as an identification card by any licensee or ((store))
employee and as evidence of legal age of the person presenting such card,
provided the licensee or ((store)) employee complies with the conditions
and procedures prescribed herein and such regulations as may be made by the
board.

Sec. 312. RCW 66.20.180 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 209 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A card of
identification shall be presented by the holder thereof upon request of any
licensee, ((store)) employee, peace officer, or enforcement officer of
the board for the purpose of aiding the licensee, ((store)) employee,
peace officer, or enforcement officer of the board to determine whether or not
such person is of legal age to purchase liquor when such person desires to
procure liquor from a licensed establishment ((or state)), retail
liquor store, or liquor agency.

Sec. 313. RCW 66.20.190 and 1981
1st ex.s. c 5 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
presentation by the holder and verification by the licensee or ((store))
employee of such card of identification, the licensee or ((store))
employee who is still in doubt about the true age of the holder shall require
the person whose age may be in question to sign a certification card and record
an accurate description and serial number of his card of identification
thereon. Such statement shall be upon a five-inch by eight-inch file card,
which card shall be filed alphabetically by the licensee or ((store))
employee at or before the close of business on the day on which the statement
is executed, in the file box containing a suitable alphabetical index and the
card shall be subject to examination by any peace officer or agent or employee
of the board at all times. The certification card shall also contain in
bold-face type a statement stating that the signer understands that conviction
for unlawful purchase of alcoholic beverages or misuse of the certification
card may result in criminal penalties including imprisonment or fine or both.

Sec. 314. RCW 66.20.200 and 1994 c
201 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be unlawful
for the owner of a card of identification to transfer the card to any other
person for the purpose of aiding such person to procure alcoholic beverages
from any licensee or ((store)) employee. Any person who shall permit
his or her card of identification to be used by another or transfer such card
to another for the purpose of aiding such transferee to obtain alcoholic
beverages from a licensee or ((store)) employee or gain admission to a
premises or portion of a premises classified by the board as off-limits to
persons under twenty-one years of age, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable
as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a minimum fine of two hundred fifty
dollars shall be imposed and any sentence requiring community service shall
require not fewer than twenty-five hours of such service. Any person not
entitled thereto who unlawfully procures or has issued or transferred to him or
her a card of identification, and any person who possesses a card of
identification not issued to him or her, and any person who makes any false
statement on any certification card required by RCW 66.20.190, as now or
hereafter amended, to be signed by him or her, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a minimum fine of two
hundred fifty dollars shall be imposed and any sentence requiring community service
shall require not fewer than twenty-five hours of such service.

Sec. 315. RCW 66.20.210 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 209 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

No licensee or the
agent or employee of the licensee, ((or store employee,)) retail
liquor store, or liquor agency shall be prosecuted criminally or be sued in
any civil action for serving liquor to a person under legal age to purchase
liquor if such person has presented a card of identification in accordance with
RCW 66.20.180, and has signed a certification card as provided in RCW
66.20.190.

Such card in the
possession of a licensee may be offered as a defense in any hearing held by the
board for serving liquor to the person who signed the card and may be considered
by the board as evidence that the licensee or employee acted in good
faith.

Sec. 316. RCW 66.44.150 and 1955 c
289 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

If any person in this
state buys alcoholic beverages from any person other than ((the board, a
state liquor store,)) a retail liquor store, liquor agency, or some
person authorized by the board to sell them, ((he)) that person
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 317. RCW 66.24.440 and 1998 c
126 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant, spirits, beer, and wine private club, and
sports entertainment facility licensee shall be entitled to purchase any ((spirituous
liquor items)) spirits salable under such license from ((the
board at a discount of not less than fifteen percent from the retail price
fixed by the board, together with all taxes)) wholesale and retail
liquor franchises and liquor agencies.

Sec. 318. RCW 66.24.540 and 1999 c
129 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a
retailer's license to be designated as a motel license. The motel license may
be issued to a motel regardless of whether it holds any other class of license
under this title. No license may be issued to a motel offering rooms to its
guests on an hourly basis. The license authorizes the licensee to:

(1) Sell, at retail, in
locked honor bars, spirits in individual bottles not to exceed fifty
milliliters, beer in individual cans or bottles not to exceed twelve ounces,
and wine in individual bottles not to exceed one hundred eighty-seven
milliliters, to registered guests of the motel for consumption in guest rooms.

(a) Each honor bar must
also contain snack foods. No more than one-half of the guest rooms may have
honor bars.

(b) All spirits to be
sold under the license must be purchased from ((the board)) a retail
liquor franchise or liquor agency.

(c) The licensee shall
require proof of age from the guest renting a guest room and requesting the use
of an honor bar. The guest shall also execute an affidavit verifying that no
one under twenty-one years of age shall have access to the spirits, beer, and
wine in the honor bar.

(2) Provide without
additional charge, to overnight guests of the motel, beer and wine by the
individual serving for on-premises consumption at a specified regular date,
time, and place as may be fixed by the board. Self-service by attendees is
prohibited. All beer and wine service must be done by an alcohol server as
defined in RCW 66.20.300 and comply with RCW 66.20.310.

The annual fee for a
motel license is five hundred dollars.

"Motel" as
used in this section means a transient accommodation licensed under chapter
70.62 RCW.

As used in this
section, "spirits," "beer," and "wine" have the
meanings defined in RCW 66.04.010.

Sec. 319. RCW 66.24.410 and 1983 c
3 s 164 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Spirituous
liquor((,))" or "spirits" as used in RCW 66.24.400
to 66.24.450, inclusive, means "liquor" as defined in RCW 66.04.010,
except "wine" and "beer" sold as such.

(2)
"Restaurant" as used in RCW 66.24.400 to 66.24.450, inclusive, means
an establishment provided with special space and accommodations where, in
consideration of payment, food, without lodgings, is habitually furnished to
the public, not including drug stores and soda fountains: PROVIDED, That such
establishments shall be approved by the board and that the board shall be
satisfied that such establishment is maintained in a substantial manner as a
place for preparing, cooking and serving of complete meals. The service of
only fry orders or such food and victuals as sandwiches, hamburgers, or salads
shall not be deemed in compliance with this definition.

(3) "Hotel,"
"clubs," "wine" and "beer" are used in RCW
66.24.400 to 66.24.450, inclusive, with the meaning given in chapter 66.04
RCW: PROVIDED, That any such hotel shall be provided with special space and
accommodations where, in consideration of payment, food is habitually furnished
to the public: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the board shall be satisfied that such
hotel is maintained in a substantial manner as a place for preparing, cooking
and serving of complete meals. The service of only fry orders, sandwiches,
hamburgers, or salads shall not be deemed in compliance with this definition.

Sec. 320. RCW 66.08.030 and 1977
ex.s. c 115 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of
carrying into effect the provisions of this title according to their true
intent or of supplying any deficiency therein, the board may make such
regulations not inconsistent with the spirit of this title as are deemed
necessary or advisable. All regulations so made shall be a public record and
shall be filed in the office of the code reviser, and thereupon shall have the
same force and effect as if incorporated in this title. Such regulations,
together with a copy of this title, shall be published in pamphlets and shall
be distributed as directed by the board.

(2) Without thereby
limiting the generality of the provisions contained in subsection (1), it is
declared that the power of the board to make regulations in the manner set out
in that subsection shall extend to:

(a) ((Regulating the
equipment and management of stores and warehouses in which state liquor is sold
or kept, and prescribing the books and records to be kept therein and the
reports to be made thereon to the board;

(b))) Prescribing the duties of the employees
of the board, and regulating their conduct in the discharge of their duties;

(((c) governing the
purchase of liquor by the state and the furnishing of liquor to stores
established under this title;

(d) determining the
classes, varieties, and brands of liquor to be kept for sale at any store;

(e))) (b) Prescribing, subject to RCW
66.16.080, the hours during which ((the state liquor stores)) retail
liquor franchises and liquor agencies shall be kept open for the sale of
liquor;

(((f) providing for
the issuing and distributing of price lists showing the price to be paid by
purchasers for each variety of liquor kept for sale under this title;

(g))) (c) Prescribing an official seal and
official labels and stamps and determining the manner in which they shall be
attached to every package of liquor sold or sealed under this title, including
the prescribing of different official seals or different official labels for
different classes of liquor;

(((h) providing for
the payment by the board in whole or in part of the carrying charges on liquor
shipped by freight or express;

(i))) (d) Prescribing forms to be used for
purposes of this title or the regulations, and the terms and conditions to be
contained in permits and licenses issued under this title;

(((j))) (e) Prescribing
the fees payable in respect of permits and licenses issued under this title for
which no fees are prescribed in this title, and prescribing the fees for
anything done or permitted to be done under the regulations;

(((k))) (f) Prescribing
the kinds and quantities of liquor which may be kept on hand by the holder of a
special permit for the purposes named in the permit, regulating the manner in
which the same shall be kept and disposed of, and providing for the inspection
of the same at any time at the instance of the board;

(((l))) (g) Regulating
the sale of liquor kept by the holders of licenses which entitle the holder to
purchase and keep liquor for sale;

(((m))) (h) Prescribing
the records of purchases or sales of liquor kept by the holders of licenses,
and the reports to be made thereon to the board, and providing for inspection
of the records so kept;

(((n))) (i) Prescribing
the kinds and quantities of liquor for which a prescription may be given, and
the number of prescriptions which may be given to the same patient within a
stated period;

(((o))) (j) Prescribing
the manner of giving and serving notices required by this title or the
regulations, where not otherwise provided for in this title;

(((p))) (k) Regulating
premises in which liquor is kept for export from the state, or from which
liquor is exported, prescribing the books and records to be kept therein and
the reports to be made thereon to the board, and providing for the inspection
of the premises and the books, records and the liquor so kept;

(((q))) (l) Prescribing
the conditions and qualifications requisite for the obtaining of club licenses
and the books and records to be kept and the returns to be made by clubs,
prescribing the manner of licensing clubs in any municipality or other
locality, and providing for the inspection of clubs;

(((r))) (m) Prescribing
the conditions, accommodations and qualifications requisite for the obtaining
of licenses to sell beer and wines, and regulating the sale of beer and wines
thereunder;

(((s))) (n) Specifying
and regulating the time and periods when, and the manner, methods and means by
which manufacturers shall deliver liquor within the state; and the time and
periods when, and the manner, methods and means by which liquor may lawfully be
conveyed or carried within the state;

(((t))) (o) Providing
for the making of returns by brewers of their sales of beer shipped within the
state, or from the state, showing the gross amount of such sales and providing
for the inspection of brewers' books and records, and for the checking of the
accuracy of any such returns;

(((u))) (p) Providing
for the making of returns by the wholesalers of beer whose breweries are
located beyond the boundaries of the state;

(((v))) (q) Providing
for the making of returns by any other liquor manufacturers, showing the gross
amount of liquor produced or purchased, the amount sold within and exported
from the state, and to whom so sold or exported, and providing for the
inspection of the premises of any such liquor manufacturers, their books and
records, and for the checking of any such return;

(((w))) (r) Providing
for the giving of fidelity bonds by any or all of the employees of the board:
PROVIDED, That the premiums therefor shall be paid by the board;

(((x))) (s) Providing
for the shipment by mail or common carrier of liquor to any person holding a
permit and residing in any unit which has, by election pursuant to this title,
prohibited the sale of liquor therein;

(((y))) (t) Prescribing
methods of manufacture, conditions of sanitation, standards of ingredients,
quality and identity of alcoholic beverages manufactured, sold, bottled, or
handled by licensees and the board; and conducting from time to time, in the
interest of the public health and general welfare, scientific studies and
research relating to alcoholic beverages and the use and effect thereof;

(((z)))
(u) Seizing, confiscating and destroying all alcoholic beverages
manufactured, sold or offered for sale within this state which do not conform
in all respects to the standards prescribed by this title or the regulations of
the board: PROVIDED, Nothing herein contained shall be construed as
authorizing the liquor board to prescribe, alter, limit or in any way change
the present law as to the quantity or percentage of alcohol used in the
manufacturing of wine or other alcoholic beverages.

Sec. 321. RCW 66.12.110 and 1999 c
281 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A person twenty-one
years of age or over may bring into the state from without the United States,
free of tax and markup, for his personal or household use such alcoholic
beverages as have been declared and permitted to enter the United States duty
free under federal law.

Such entry of alcoholic
beverages in excess of that herein provided may be authorized by the board upon
payment of ((an equivalent markup and tax as would be applicable to the
purchase of the same or similar liquor at retail from a Washington state liquor
store)) applicable taxes. The board shall adopt appropriate
regulations pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW for the purpose of carrying out the
provisions of this section. The board may issue a spirits, beer, and wine
private club license to a charitable or nonprofit corporation of the state of
Washington, the majority of the officers and directors of which are United
States citizens and the minority of the officers and directors of which are
citizens of the Dominion of Canada, and where the location of the premises for
such spirits, beer, and wine private club license is not more than ten miles
south of the border between the United States and the province of British
Columbia.

Sec. 322. RCW 66.12.120 and 1995 c
100 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any
other provision of Title 66 RCW, a person twenty-one years of age or over may,
free of tax and markup, for personal or household use, bring into the state of
Washington from another state no more than once per calendar month up to two
liters of spirits or wine or two hundred eighty-eight ounces of beer.
Additionally, such person may be authorized by the board to bring into the
state of Washington from another state a reasonable amount of alcoholic
beverages in excess of that provided in this section for personal or household
use only upon payment of ((an equivalent markup and tax as would be
applicable to the purchase of the same or similar liquor at retail from a state
liquor store)) applicable taxes. The board shall adopt appropriate
regulations pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW for the purpose of carrying into
effect the provisions of this section.

PART 4 - MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. Captions and part
headings as used in this act do not constitute any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. Sections 202 through 205,
207, 209, and 210 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 66 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
403. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 66.16.030 (Vendor to be in charge)
and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 6; and

(2) RCW 66.16.090 (Record of individual
purchases confidential--Penalty for disclosure) and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 89.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
404. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003. The liquor control board is authorized to take steps
necessary to implement this act on its effective date.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 405. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---