BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 48.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All group
disability insurance contracts and blanket disability insurance contracts,
issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this section, must provide
benefits or coverage for colorectal cancer examinations and laboratory tests
specified in current American cancer society guidelines for colorectal cancer
screening of asymptomatic individuals. Coverage or benefits must be provided
for all colorectal screening examinations and tests that are administered at a
frequency identified in the American cancer society guidelines for colorectal
cancer.

(2) Benefits under this
section must be provided to a covered individual who is:

(a) At least fifty
years old; or

(b) Less than fifty
years old and at high risk for colorectal cancer according to current
colorectal cancer screening guidelines of the American cancer society.

(3) To encourage
colorectal cancer screenings, patients and health care providers must not be required
to meet burdensome criteria or overcome significant obstacles to secure such
coverage. An individual may not be required to pay an additional deductible or
coinsurance for testing that is greater than an annual deductible or
coinsurance established for similar benefits. If the contract does not cover a
similar benefit, a deductible or coinsurance may not be set at a level that
materially diminishes the value of the colorectal cancer benefit required.
Reimbursement to health care providers for colorectal cancer screenings
provided under this section must be equal to or greater than reimbursement to
health care providers provided under Title XVII of the social security act
(medicare).

(4) A health insurance
issuer is not required under this section to provide for a referral to a
nonparticipating health care provider, unless the issuer does not have an
appropriate health care provider that is available and accessible to administer
the screening exam and that is a participating health care provider with
respect to such treatment.

(5) If a health
insurance issuer refers an individual to a nonparticipating health care
provider pursuant to this section, services provided pursuant to the approved
screening exam or resulting treatment, if any, must be provided at no
additional cost to the individual beyond what the individual would otherwise
pay for services received by such a participating health care provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 48.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All health benefit
plans offered by health care service contractors, issued or renewed on or after
the effective date of this section, must provide benefits or coverage for
colorectal cancer examinations and laboratory tests specified in current
American cancer society guidelines for colorectal cancer screening of
asymptomatic individuals. Coverage or benefits must be provided for all
colorectal screening examinations and tests that are administered at a
frequency identified in the American cancer society guidelines for colorectal
cancer.

(2) Benefits under this
section must be provided to a covered individual who is:

(a) At least fifty
years old; or

(b) Less than fifty
years old and at high risk for colorectal cancer according to current
colorectal cancer screening guidelines of the American cancer society.

(3) To encourage
colorectal cancer screenings, patients and health care providers must not be
required to meet burdensome criteria or overcome significant obstacles to secure
such coverage. An individual may not be required to pay an additional
deductible or coinsurance for testing that is greater than an annual deductible
or coinsurance established for similar benefits. If the group contract or
individual contract does not cover a similar benefit, a deductible or
coinsurance may not be set at a level that materially diminishes the value of
the colorectal cancer benefit required. Reimbursement to providers for
colorectal cancer screenings provided under this section must be equal to or
greater than reimbursement to health care providers provided under Title XVII
of the social security act (medicare).

(4) A carrier is not
required under this section to provide for a referral to a nonparticipating
health care provider, unless the carrier does not have an appropriate health
care provider that is available and accessible to administer the screening exam
and that is a participating health care provider with respect to such
treatment.

(5) If a carrier refers
an individual to a nonparticipating health care provider pursuant to this
section, services provided pursuant to the approved screening exam or resulting
treatment, if any, must be provided at no additional cost to the individual
beyond what the individual would otherwise pay for services received by such a
participating health care provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 48.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All health benefit
plans offered by health maintenance organizations, issued on or after the
effective date of this section, must provide benefits or coverage for
colorectal cancer examinations and laboratory tests specified in current
American cancer society guidelines for colorectal cancer screening of
asymptomatic individuals. Coverage or benefits must be provided for all
colorectal screening examinations and tests that are administered at a
frequency identified in the American cancer society guidelines for colorectal
cancer.

(2) Benefits under this
section must be provided to a covered individual who is:

(a) At least fifty
years old; or

(b) Less than fifty
years old and at high risk for colorectal cancer according to current
colorectal cancer screening guidelines of the American cancer society.

(3) To encourage colorectal
cancer screenings, consumers and health maintenance organizations must not be
required to meet burdensome criteria or overcome significant obstacles to
secure such coverage. A consumer may not be required to pay an additional
deductible or coinsurance for testing that is greater than an annual deductible
or coinsurance established for similar benefits. If the health maintenance
agreement does not cover a similar benefit, a deductible or coinsurance may not
be set at a level that materially diminishes the value of the colorectal cancer
benefit required. Reimbursement to health professionals for colorectal cancer
screenings provided under this section must be equal to or greater than
reimbursement to health care providers provided under Title XVII of the social
security act (medicare).

(4) A health
maintenance organization is not required under this section to provide for a
referral to a nonparticipating health care provider, unless the health
maintenance organization does not have an appropriate health care provider that
is available and accessible to administer the screening exam and that is a
participating health care provider with respect to such treatment.

(5) If a
health maintenance organization refers a consumer to a nonparticipating health
care provider pursuant to this section, services provided pursuant to the
approved screening exam or resulting treatment, if any, must be provided at no
additional cost to the consumer beyond what the consumer would otherwise pay
for services received by a health maintenance organization.

---
END ---