BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1)(a) Except under
subsection (2) of this section, the number of employees employed by each agency
of state government shall not exceed the actual employment level of the agency
on March 1, 2002, for all employee positions paid for, in full or in part, with
funds from the state general fund.

(b) Except under
subsection (2) of this section, beginning March 1, 2002, each agency of state
government is prohibited from hiring replacements for employees who leave the
agency regardless of the reason. This prohibition attaches to all employee
positions paid for, in full or in part, with funds from the state general fund.

(2) The only exceptions
to subsection (1) of this section are as follows:

(a) Positions in state
agencies with less than twenty full-time equivalents;

(b) Service positions
within correctional facilities and state hospitals that are necessary to
maintain full security or service levels; and

(c) The following
agencies or portions of agencies: (i) Supreme court, (ii) court of appeals,
(iii) department of revenue, (iv) state school for the blind, (v) state school
for the deaf, (vi) military department, (vii) faculty at the state's
institutions of higher education (program 010 in LEAP), and (viii) nonprogram
support positions (program 110 and category 9000 in LEAP) in the department of
social and health services that provide direct service operations in the
divisions of children's administration, juvenile rehabilitation, developmental
disabilities, long-term care, alcohol and substance abuse, medical assistance,
and vocational rehabilitation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. This act expires June 30,
2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
March 1, 2002.

---
END ---