BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.09.070 and 1997 c
241 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Application for
annual or temporary ORV use permits shall be made to the department or its
authorized agent in such manner and upon such forms as the department shall
prescribe and shall state the name and address of each owner of the off-road
vehicle.

(2) An application for
an annual permit shall be signed by at least one owner, and shall be
accompanied by a fee of five dollars. Upon receipt of the annual permit
application and the application fee, the off-road vehicle shall be assigned a
use permit number tag or decal, which shall be affixed to the off-road vehicle
in a manner prescribed by the department. The annual permit is valid for a
period of one year and is renewable each year in such manner as the department
may prescribe for an additional period of one year upon payment of a renewal
fee of five dollars.

Any person acquiring an
off-road vehicle for which an annual permit has been issued who desires to
continue to use the permit must, within fifteen days of the acquisition of the
off-road vehicle, make application to the department or its authorized agent
for transfer of the permit, and the application shall be accompanied by a
transfer fee of ((one dollar and twenty-five cents)) five dollars.

(3) A temporary use
permit is valid for sixty days. Application for a temporary permit shall be
accompanied by a fee of two dollars. The permit shall be carried on the
vehicle at all times during its operation in the state.

(4) Except
as provided in RCW 46.09.050, any out-of-state operator of an off-road vehicle
shall, when operating in this state, comply with this chapter, and if an ORV
use permit is required under this chapter, the operator shall obtain an annual
or temporary permit and tag.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.10.040 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 7 s 918 are each amended to read as follows:

Application for
registration shall be made to the department in the manner and upon forms the
department prescribes, and shall state the name and address of each owner of
the snowmobile to be registered, and shall be signed by at least one such
owner, and shall be accompanied by an annual registration fee to be established
by the commission, after consultation with the committee and any statewide
snowmobile user groups. The commission shall increase the current fee of
twenty dollars by five dollars effective September 30, 2001, and the commission
shall increase the fee by another five dollars effective September 30, 2002.
After the fee increase effective September 30, 2002, the commission shall not
increase the fee. Upon receipt of the application and the application fee, the
snowmobile shall be registered and a registration number assigned, which shall
be affixed to the snowmobile in a manner provided in RCW 46.10.070.

The registration
provided in this section shall be valid for a period of one year. At the end
of the period of registration, every owner of a snowmobile in this state shall
renew his or her registration in the manner the department prescribes, for an
additional period of one year, upon payment of the annual registration fee as
determined by the commission.

Any person acquiring a
snowmobile already validly registered under the provisions of this chapter
must, within ten days of the acquisition or purchase of the snowmobile, make application
to the department for transfer of the registration, and the application shall
be accompanied by a transfer fee of ((one dollar and twenty-five cents))
five dollars.

A snowmobile owned by a
resident of another state or Canadian province where registration is not
required by law may be issued a nonresident registration permit valid for not
more than sixty days. Application for the permit shall state the name and
address of each owner of the snowmobile to be registered and shall be signed by
at least one owner and shall be accompanied by a registration fee of five
dollars. The registration permit shall be carried on the vehicle at all times
during its operation in this state.

The registration fees
provided in this section shall be in lieu of any personal property or excise
tax heretofore imposed on snowmobiles by this state or any political
subdivision thereof, and no city, county, or other municipality, and no state
agency shall hereafter impose any other registration or license fee on any
snowmobile in this state.

The department shall
make available a pair of uniform decals consistent with the provisions of RCW
46.10.070. In addition to the registration fee provided in this section the
department shall charge each applicant for registration the actual cost of the
decal. The department shall make available replacement decals for a fee
equivalent to the actual cost of the decals.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.12.040 and 2001 c
125 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The application
accompanied by a draft, money order, certified bank check, or cash for ((one
dollar and twenty-five cents)) five dollars, together with the last
preceding certificates or other satisfactory evidence of ownership, shall be
forwarded to the director.

The fee shall be in
addition to any other fee for the license registration of the vehicle. The
certificate of ownership shall not be required to be renewed annually, or at
any other time, except as by law provided.

In addition to the
application fee and any other fee for the license registration of a vehicle,
the department shall collect from the applicant a fee of fifteen dollars for
vehicles previously registered in any other state or country. The proceeds
from the fee shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund. For vehicles
requiring a physical examination, the inspection fee shall be fifty dollars and
shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.12.080 and 1997 c
241 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person holding the
certificate of ownership for a motorcycle or any vehicle registered by its
motor number in which there has been installed a new or different motor than
that with which it was issued certificates of ownership and license
registration shall forthwith and within five days after such installation
forward and surrender such certificates to the department, together with an
application for issue of corrected certificates of ownership and license
registration and a fee of ((one dollar and twenty-five cents)) five
dollars, and a statement of the disposition of the former motor. The
possession by any person of any such certificates for such vehicle in which a
new or different motor has been installed, after five days following such
installation, shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of the provisions of
this chapter and shall constitute a misdemeanor.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.12.170 and 1997 c
432 s 5 and 1997 c 241 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

If, after a certificate
of ownership is issued, a security interest is granted on the vehicle described
therein, the registered owner or secured party shall, within ten days
thereafter, present an application to the department, to which shall be
attached the certificate of ownership last issued covering the vehicle, or such
other documentation as may be required by the department, which application
shall be upon a form approved by the department and shall be accompanied by a
fee of ((one dollar and twenty-five cents)) five dollars in
addition to all other fees. The department, if satisfied that there should be
a reissue of the certificate, shall note such change upon the vehicle records
and issue to the secured party a new certificate of ownership.

Whenever there is no
outstanding secured obligation and no commitment to make advances and incur
obligations or otherwise give value, the secured party must assign the
certificate of ownership to the debtor or the debtor's assignee or transferee,
and transmit the certificate to the department with an accompanying fee of ((one
dollar and twenty-five cents)) five dollars in addition to all other
fees. The department shall then issue a new certificate of ownership and
transmit it to the owner. If the affected secured party fails to either assign
the certificate of ownership to the debtor or the debtor's assignee or
transferee or transmit the certificate of ownership to the department within
ten days after proper demand, that secured party shall be liable to the debtor
or the debtor's assignee or transferee for one hundred dollars, and in addition
for any loss caused to the debtor or the debtor's assignee or transferee by
such failure.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.12.181 and 1997 c
241 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

If a certificate of
ownership is lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed or becomes illegible, the
first priority secured party or, if none, the owner or legal representative of
the owner named in the certificate, as shown by the records of the department,
shall promptly make application for and may obtain a duplicate upon tender of
((one dollar and twenty-five cents)) five dollars in addition to
all other fees and upon furnishing information satisfactory to the department.
The duplicate certificate of ownership shall contain the legend,
"duplicate." It shall be provided to the first priority secured
party named in it or, if none, to the owner.

A person
recovering an original certificate of ownership for which a duplicate has been
issued shall promptly surrender the original certificate to the department.

Sec. 7. RCW 46.16.0621 and 2000
1st sp.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) License tab fees
shall be thirty dollars per year for ((motor)) vehicles((, regardless
of year, value, make, or model, beginning January 1, 2000)).

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "license tab fees" are defined as the general fees paid
annually for licensing motor vehicles, ((including cars, sport utility
vehicles, motorcycles, and motor homes)) and nonmotorized vehicles,
including trailers as defined in RCW 46.04.620 and 46.04.623. Trailers
licensed under RCW 46.16.065, 46.16.068, or 46.16.085 or campers licensed under
RCW 46.16.505 are not required to pay license tab fees under this section.

Sec. 8. RCW 46.16.160 and 1999 c
270 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The owner of a
vehicle which under reciprocal relations with another jurisdiction would be
required to obtain a license registration in this state or an unlicensed
vehicle which would be required to obtain a license registration for operation
on public highways of this state may, as an alternative to such license
registration, secure and operate such vehicle under authority of a trip permit
issued by this state in lieu of a Washington certificate of license
registration, and licensed gross weight if applicable. The licensed gross
weight may not exceed eighty thousand pounds for a combination of vehicles nor
forty thousand pounds for a single unit vehicle with three or more axles. Trip
permits may also be issued for movement of mobile homes pursuant to RCW
46.44.170. For the purpose of this section, a vehicle is considered unlicensed
if the licensed gross weight currently in effect for the vehicle or combination
of vehicles is not adequate for the load being carried. Vehicles registered
under RCW 46.16.135 shall not be operated under authority of trip permits in
lieu of further registration within the same registration year.

(2) Each trip permit
shall authorize the operation of a single vehicle at the maximum legal weight
limit for such vehicle for a period of three consecutive days commencing with
the day of first use. No more than three such permits may be used for any one
vehicle in any period of thirty consecutive days, except that in the case of a
recreational vehicle as defined in RCW 43.22.335, no more than two trip permits
may be used for any one vehicle in a one-year period. Every permit shall
identify, as the department may require, the vehicle for which it is issued and
shall be completed in its entirety and signed by the operator before operation
of the vehicle on the public highways of this state. Correction of data on the
permit such as dates, license number, or vehicle identification number
invalidates the permit. The trip permit shall be displayed on the vehicle to
which it is issued as prescribed by the department.

(3) Vehicles operating
under authority of trip permits are subject to all laws, rules, and regulations
affecting the operation of like vehicles in this state.

(4) Prorate operators
operating commercial vehicles on trip permits in Washington shall retain the
customer copy of such permit for four years.

(5) Trip permits may be
obtained from field offices of the department of transportation, Washington
state patrol, department of licensing, or other agents appointed by the
department. The fee for each trip permit shall be fifteen dollars. For
each permit issued, ((there shall be collected)) the fee shall
include a filing fee as provided by RCW 46.01.140((, an administrative
fee of eight dollars,)) and an excise tax of one dollar. ((If the
filing fee amount of one dollar prescribed by RCW 46.01.140 is increased or
decreased after January 1, 1981, the administrative fee shall be adjusted to
compensate for such change to insure that the total amount collected for the
filing fee, administrative fee, and excise tax remain at ten dollars.)) The
remaining portion of the trip permit fee shall be deposited to the credit of
the motor vehicle fund as an administrative fee. If the filing fee amount of
three dollars as prescribed in RCW 46.01.140 is increased or decreased after
July 1, 2002, the administrative fee shall be increased or decreased by the
same amount so that the total trip permit fee would be adjusted equally to
compensate. These fees and taxes are in lieu of all other vehicle license
fees and taxes. No exchange, credits, or refunds may be given for trip permits
after they have been purchased.

(6) The department may
appoint county auditors or businesses as agents for the purpose of selling trip
permits to the public. County auditors or businesses so appointed may retain
the filing fee collected for each trip permit to defray expenses incurred in
handling and selling the permits.

(7) A violation of or a
failure to comply with any provision of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

(8) The department of
licensing may adopt rules as it deems necessary to administer this section.

(9) A surcharge of five
dollars is imposed on the issuance of trip permits. The portion of the
surcharge paid by motor carriers must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund
for the purpose of supporting vehicle weigh stations, weigh-in-motion programs,
and the commercial vehicle information systems and networks program. The
remaining portion of the surcharge must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund
for the purpose of supporting congestion relief programs. All other
administrative fees and excise taxes collected under the provisions of this
chapter shall be forwarded by the department with proper identifying detailed
report to the state treasurer who shall deposit the administrative fees to the
credit of the motor vehicle fund and the excise taxes to the credit of the
general fund. Filing fees will be forwarded and reported to the state
treasurer by the department as prescribed in RCW 46.01.140.

Sec. 9. RCW 46.16.630 and 1997 c
241 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Application for
registration of a moped shall be made to the department of licensing in such
manner and upon such forms as the department shall prescribe, and shall state
the name and address of each owner of the moped to be registered, the vehicle
identification number, and such other information as the department may
require, and shall be accompanied by a registration fee of three dollars. Upon
receipt of the application and the application fee, the moped shall be
registered and a registration number assigned, which shall be affixed to the
moped in the manner as provided by rules adopted by the department. The
registration provided in this section shall be valid for a period of twelve
months.

Every owner of a moped
in this state shall renew the registration, in such manner as the department
shall prescribe, for an additional period of twelve months, upon payment of a
renewal fee of three dollars.

Any person acquiring a
moped already validly registered must, within fifteen days of the acquisition
or purchase of the moped, make application to the department for transfer of
the registration, and the application shall be accompanied by a transfer fee of
((one dollar and twenty-five cents)) five dollars.

The registration fees
provided in this section shall be in lieu of any personal property tax or the
vehicle excise tax imposed by chapter 82.44 RCW.

The department shall,
at the time the registration number is assigned, make available a decal or
other identifying device to be displayed on the moped. A fee of one dollar and
fifty cents shall be charged for the decal or other identifying device.

The provisions of RCW
46.01.130 and 46.01.140 shall apply to applications for the issuance of
registration numbers or renewals or transfers thereof for mopeds as they do to
the issuance of vehicle licenses, the appointment of agents, and the collection
of application fees. Except for the fee collected pursuant to RCW 46.01.140,
all fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the motor vehicle
fund.

Sec. 10. RCW 46.20.055 and 1999 c
274 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Driver's
instruction permit. The department may issue a driver's instruction permit
with or without a photograph to an applicant who has successfully passed
all parts of the examination other than the driving test, provided the
information required by RCW 46.20.091, paid a ((five-dollar)) fifteen-dollar
fee, and meets the following requirements:

(a) Is at least fifteen
and one-half years of age; or

(b) Is at least fifteen
years of age and:

(i) Has submitted a
proper application; and

(ii) Is enrolled in a
traffic safety education program approved and accredited by the superintendent
of public instruction that includes practice driving.

(2) ((Nonphoto
permit fee. An applicant who meets the requirements of subsection
(1) of this section other than payment of the five-dollar fee may obtain a
driver's instruction permit without a photograph by paying a fee of four
dollars.

(3))) Waiver of written examination for
instruction permit. The department may waive the written examination, if,
at the time of application, an applicant is enrolled in:

(a) A traffic safety
education course as defined by RCW 28A.220.020(2); or

(b) A course of
instruction offered by a licensed driver training school as defined by RCW
46.82.280(1).

The department may
require proof of registration in such a course as it deems necessary.

(((4))) (3)
Effect of instruction permit. A person holding a driver's instruction
permit may drive a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, upon the public
highways if:

(a) The person has
immediate possession of the permit; and

(b) An approved
instructor, or a licensed driver with at least five years of driving
experience, occupies the seat beside the driver.

(((5))) (4)
Term of instruction permit. A driver's instruction permit is valid for
one year from the date of issue.

(a) The department may
issue one additional one-year permit.

(b) The
department may issue a third driver's permit if it finds after an investigation
that the permittee is diligently seeking to improve driving proficiency.

Sec. 11. RCW 46.20.117 and 1999 c
274 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Issuance.
The department shall issue an identicard, containing a picture, if the
applicant:

(a) Does not hold a
valid Washington driver's license;

(b) Proves his or her
identity as required by RCW 46.20.035; and

(c) Pays the required
fee. The fee is ((four)) fifteen dollars unless an applicant is
a recipient of continuing public assistance grants under Title 74 RCW, who is
referred in writing by the secretary of social and health services. For those
persons the fee must be the actual cost of production of the identicard.

(2) Design and term.
The identicard must:

(a) Be distinctly
designed so that it will not be confused with the official driver's license;
and

(b) Expire on the fifth
anniversary of the applicant's birthdate after issuance.

(3) Cancellation.
The department may cancel an identicard if the holder of the identicard used
the card or allowed others to use the card in violation of RCW 46.20.0921.

Sec. 12. RCW 46.20.200 and 1985
ex.s. c 1 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If an instruction
permit, identicard, or a driver's license is lost or destroyed, the person to
whom it was issued may obtain a duplicate of it upon furnishing proof of such
fact satisfactory to the department and payment of a fee of ((five)) fifteen
dollars to the department.

(2) A replacement
permit, identicard, or driver's license may be obtained to change or correct
material information upon payment of a fee of ((two)) five
dollars and surrender of the permit, identicard, or driver's license being
replaced.

Sec. 13. RCW 46.20.293 and 1999 c
86 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The department is
authorized to provide juvenile courts with the department's record of traffic
charges compiled under RCW 46.52.101 and 13.50.200, against any minor upon the
request of any state juvenile court or duly authorized officer of any juvenile
court of this state. Further, the department is authorized to provide any
juvenile court with any requested service which the department can reasonably
perform which is not inconsistent with its legal authority which substantially
aids juvenile courts in handling traffic cases and which promotes highway
safety.

The
department is authorized to furnish to the parent, parents, or guardian of any
person under eighteen years of age who is not emancipated from such parent,
parents, or guardian, the department records of traffic charges compiled
against the person and shall collect for the copy a fee of ((four)) five
dollars ((and fifty cents)) to be deposited in the highway safety fund.

Sec. 14. RCW 46.29.050 and 1987
1st ex.s. c 9 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall upon request furnish any person or his attorney a certified abstract of
his driving record, which abstract shall include enumeration of any motor
vehicle accidents in which such person has been involved. Such abstract shall
(a) indicate the total number of vehicles involved, whether the vehicles were
legally parked or moving, and whether the vehicles were occupied at the time of
the accident; and (b) contain reference to any convictions of the person for
violation of the motor vehicle laws as reported to the department, reference to
any findings that the person has committed a traffic infraction which have been
reported to the department, and a record of any vehicles registered in the name
of the person. The department shall collect for each abstract the sum of ((four))
five dollars ((and fifty cents)) which shall be deposited in the
highway safety fund.

(2) The department
shall upon request furnish any person who may have been injured in person or
property by any motor vehicle, with an abstract of all information of record in
the department pertaining to the evidence of the ability of any driver or owner
of any motor vehicle to respond in damages. The department shall collect for
each abstract the sum of ((four)) five dollars ((and fifty
cents)) which shall be deposited in the highway safety fund.

Sec. 15. RCW 46.52.130 and 2001 c
309 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A certified abstract of
the driving record shall be furnished only to the individual named in the
abstract, an employer or prospective employer or an agent acting on behalf of
an employer or prospective employer, the insurance carrier that has insurance
in effect covering the employer or a prospective employer, the insurance carrier
that has insurance in effect covering the named individual, the insurance
carrier to which the named individual has applied, an alcohol/drug assessment
or treatment agency approved by the department of social and health services,
to which the named individual has applied or been assigned for evaluation or
treatment, or city and county prosecuting attorneys. City attorneys and county
prosecuting attorneys may provide the driving record to alcohol/drug assessment
or treatment agencies approved by the department of social and health services
to which the named individual has applied or been assigned for evaluation or
treatment. The director, upon proper request, shall furnish a certified
abstract covering the period of not more than the last three years to insurance
companies. Upon proper request, the director shall furnish a certified
abstract covering a period of not more than the last five years to state
approved alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies, except that the
certified abstract shall also include records of alcohol-related offenses as
defined in RCW 46.01.260(2) covering a period of not more than the last ten
years. Upon proper request, a certified abstract of the full driving record
maintained by the department shall be furnished to a city or county prosecuting
attorney, to the individual named in the abstract or to an employer or
prospective employer or an agent acting on behalf of an employer or prospective
employer of the named individual. The abstract, whenever possible, shall include
an enumeration of motor vehicle accidents in which the person was driving; the
total number of vehicles involved; whether the vehicles were legally parked or
moving; whether the vehicles were occupied at the time of the accident; whether
the accident resulted in any fatality; any reported convictions, forfeitures of
bail, or findings that an infraction was committed based upon a violation of
any motor vehicle law; and the status of the person's driving privilege in this
state. The enumeration shall include any reports of failure to appear in
response to a traffic citation or failure to respond to a notice of infraction
served upon the named individual by an arresting officer. Certified abstracts
furnished to prosecutors and alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies
shall also indicate whether a recorded violation is an alcohol-related offense
as defined in RCW 46.01.260(2) that was originally charged as one of the
alcohol-related offenses designated in RCW 46.01.260(2)(b)(i).

The abstract provided
to the insurance company shall exclude any information, except that related to
the commission of misdemeanors or felonies by the individual, pertaining to law
enforcement officers or fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030, or any
officer of the Washington state patrol, while driving official vehicles in the
performance of occupational duty. The abstract provided to the insurance
company shall include convictions for RCW 46.61.5249 and 46.61.525 except that
the abstract shall report them only as negligent driving without reference to
whether they are for first or second degree negligent driving. The abstract
provided to the insurance company shall exclude any deferred prosecution under
RCW 10.05.060, except that if a person is removed from a deferred prosecution
under RCW 10.05.090, the abstract shall show the deferred prosecution as well
as the removal.

The director shall
collect for each abstract the sum of ((four)) five dollars ((and
fifty cents)) which shall be deposited in the highway safety fund.

Any insurance company
or its agent receiving the certified abstract shall use it exclusively for its
own underwriting purposes and shall not divulge any of the information
contained in it to a third party. No policy of insurance may be canceled,
nonrenewed, denied, or have the rate increased on the basis of such information
unless the policyholder was determined to be at fault. No insurance company or
its agent for underwriting purposes relating to the operation of commercial
motor vehicles may use any information contained in the abstract relative to
any person's operation of motor vehicles while not engaged in such employment,
nor may any insurance company or its agent for underwriting purposes relating
to the operation of noncommercial motor vehicles use any information contained
in the abstract relative to any person's operation of commercial motor
vehicles.

Any employer or
prospective employer or an agent acting on behalf of an employer or prospective
employer receiving the certified abstract shall use it exclusively for his or
her own purpose to determine whether the licensee should be permitted to
operate a commercial vehicle or school bus upon the public highways of this
state and shall not divulge any information contained in it to a third party.

Any alcohol/drug
assessment or treatment agency approved by the department of social and health
services receiving the certified abstract shall use it exclusively for the
purpose of assisting its employees in making a determination as to what level
of treatment, if any, is appropriate. The agency, or any of its employees,
shall not divulge any information contained in the abstract to a third party.

Release of a certified
abstract of the driving record of an employee or prospective employee requires
a statement signed by: (1) The employee or prospective employee that
authorizes the release of the record, and (2) the employer attesting that the
information is necessary to determine whether the licensee should be employed
to operate a commercial vehicle or school bus upon the public highways of this
state. If the employer or prospective employer authorizes an agent to obtain
this information on their behalf, this must be noted in the statement.

Any negligent violation
of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Any intentional
violation of this section is a class C felony.

Sec. 16. RCW 46.68.020 and 1961 c
12 s 46.68.020 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall
forward all fees for certificates of ownership or other moneys accruing under
the provisions of chapter 46.12 RCW to the state treasurer, together with a
proper identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit such
moneys to the ((motor vehicle fund)) multimodal transportation
account in RCW 47.66.070 and all expenses incurred in carrying out the
provisions of that chapter shall be paid from such ((fund)) account
as authorized by legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. Any fee increases
provided in this act do not constitute new transportation revenue for the
purposes of chapter 5, Laws of 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. Section 7 of this act
applies to registrations due or to become due on July 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---