BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The automobile
theft task force is established, consisting of:

(a) One police chief,
appointed by the Washington council of police and sheriffs;

(b) One sheriff,
appointed by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(c) A representative of
prosecuting attorneys, appointed by the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys;

(d) Two employees of
insurers licensed to write motor vehicle liability insurance in this state,
appointed by the governor;

(e) Two members of the
public, appointed by the governor;

(f) The assistant
director for vehicle services in the department of licensing; and

(g) The chief of the
Washington state patrol, or the chief's designee.

(2) Task force members
shall select a chair annually from among the members.

(3) Members of the task
force shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to legislative
appropriation, the automobile theft task force shall hire up to two staff
members as necessary, including an executive director. In hiring an executive
director, preference shall be given to qualified applicants with law
enforcement and criminal policy experience. In no case may the task force's
expenses exceed ten percent of the total expenditures under this section in any
fiscal year.

(2) The automobile
theft task force shall:

(a) Make grants and
awards to public agencies for motor vehicle theft intervention programs;
however, this funding shall be used to supplement, not supplant, other moneys
available for motor vehicle theft prevention;

(b) Identify priorities
for theft prevention strategies and criteria for the task force's evaluation of
recipients of assistance from the task force;

(c) Study and propose
laws that will further prevent and deter vehicle thefts and related crimes; and

(d) Report by December
31st of each year to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature
on its activities during the preceding year.

(3) The automobile
theft task force may:

(a) Solicit and accept
funds to be used to carry out the purposes of this section; and

(b) Establish or assist
in the establishment of programs designed to reduce the incidence of vehicle
thefts and related crimes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act expires December
31, 2006.

---
END ---