BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that an educated and skilled work force, and a 21st century infrastructure, a
tax and regulatory environment that encourages entrepreneurship and business
growth, and a desirable quality of life for all Washington citizens are
necessary elements if the state is to economically and environmentally
prosper. The legislature further finds that recent events, including the
national economic downturn, the Pacific Northwest drought, the energy crisis,
and events of September 11, 2001, all have resulted in a number of business
closures in the technology sector, layoffs in the aerospace, airline,
hospitality, and aluminum industries, and continuing economic hardship in the
agriculture and food processing sectors, compel the reexamination of state
plans to accomplish its economic, business growth, development, and
environmental objectives. The legislature further finds that the final report
of the Washington competitiveness council, issued in December 2001, includes a
number of specific recommendations for improving the state's business climate,
including the state's environmental, land use, and regulatory environment, many
of which require legislative action.

It is the intent of the
legislature to consider the recommendations of the Washington competitiveness
council for improvement of the state's environmental, land use, and regulatory
system, as articulated in its final report, and to implement those legislative
recommendations that are in the best interests of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The joint select
committee on environmental, regulatory, and land use competitiveness is
created. The committee is composed of twelve voting members, including four
members from the house of representatives, two from each of the two largest
caucuses, appointed by the respective caucus chairs; four senators, two from
each of the two largest caucuses, appointed by the respective caucus chairs;
and four members of the Washington competitiveness council, appointed by the
governor.

(2) The committee shall
create an advisory committee of not less than eight nor more than sixteen
members, composed of representatives of interested and affected industries,
businesses, commercial and environmental groups, and state and local
governments, and may create technical committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The committee shall
consider the recommendations of the Washington competitiveness council for the
environmental regulatory and permitting system, and shall draft proposed
legislation to implement each of those recommendations that require, or can be
implemented by, legislative action. Specifically, the committee shall
consider, draft, and recommend legislation for the following recommendations:

(a) 3.0Environmental regulatory and permitting system;

(b) 3.3.4Amend the administrative procedure act under chapter 34.05
RCW;

(c) 3.3.5Consolidate permit processes, reduce the number of permits
required to complete a project, and improve permit coordination among the
agencies;

(d) 3.3.7Meet the goals of the growth management act under chapter
36.70A RCW, generally;

(e) 3.3.9Reduce the number of environmental adjudication bodies;
and

(f) 3.3.10Benchmark and enforce local government permitting
timelines.

(2) In drafting
legislation to implement the recommendations of the Washington competitiveness
council, the committee shall also consider the reports and recommendations of
the transportation permit efficiency and accountability committee under RCW
47.06C.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The committee shall
monitor, analyze, and report to the legislature as provided in section 7 of
this act with respect to ongoing efforts, proposals, and actions taken to
implement the following recommendations of the Washington competitiveness
council:

(1) 3.3.2Reinvent the department of ecology to increase agency
accountability and responsiveness;

(2) 3.3.6Improve Washington's water rights system.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The committee shall
develop and recommend a process, mechanism time schedule, and proposed funding
for the creation of a consolidated land use code, as recommended in the
Washington competitiveness council report, recommendation 3.3.8, that integrates
all of Washington's land use and environmental laws in a single manageable
statute while maintaining environmental values.

(2) The Washington
competitiveness council report recognized that a consolidated land use code
will take time to develop and implement and that it will also require adequate
funding.

(3) In 1995, in
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1724, the legislature recognized the growth
management act as the fundamental building block of regulatory reform, and that
it provides the means to effectively combine certainty for planning and
development decisions, reasonable environmental protection, long‑range
planning for cost‑effective infrastructure, and orderly growth and
development by the integration and consolidation of the state's land use and
environmental laws into a simple, manageable statute.

(4) The land use study
commission identified the state environmental policy act, the growth management
act, the shoreline management act, the environmental hearings office statutes,
the planning enabling statutes, the regional transportation planning act, the
subdivision and platting statutes, impact fees, project review, and the land
use petition act as appropriate for inclusion in the consolidated land use
code, concluding that the growth management act should serve as the integrating
framework for land use and environmental decisions.

(5) The committee shall
include its recommendations to the legislature in its report as provided in
section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The committee shall
prepare a cost/benefit and fiscal impact analysis for each of the
recommendations the committee proposes for consideration by the legislature.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The committee shall
select a chair from among the legislators. The committee shall provide its
final report and proposed draft legislation to the legislature on or before
December 31, 2002.

---
END ---