BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.04.015 and 2001 c
294 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the policy of
this state and the purpose of this chapter:

(a) To promote the
dependability of information which is used for guidance in financial
transactions or for accounting for or assessing the status or performance of
commercial and noncommercial enterprises, whether public, private or
governmental, by preventing conflicts of interest in the ownership of
certified public accounting firms and separating the auditing function from any
other interests, as well as by other means; and

(b) To protect the
public interest by requiring that:

(i) Persons who hold
themselves out as licensees or certificate holders conduct themselves in a
competent, ethical, and professional manner;

(ii) A public authority
be established that is competent to prescribe and assess the qualifications of
certified public accountants, including certificate holders who are not
licensed for the practice of public accounting;

(iii) Persons other
than licensees refrain from using the words "audit,"
"review," and "compilation" when designating a report
customarily prepared by someone knowledgeable in accounting;

(iv) A public authority
be established to provide for consumer alerts and public protection information
to be published regarding persons or firms who violate the provisions of
chapter 294, Laws of 2001 or board rule and to provide general consumer
protection information to the public; and

(v) The use of
accounting titles likely to confuse the public be prohibited.

(2) The purpose of
this act is to make revisions to chapter 234, Laws of 1983; chapter 103, Laws
of 1992; and chapter 294, Laws of 2001 to: Limit ownership of certified public
accounting firms to licensees, provide for a clear separation of auditing
functions from any other interests, and prohibit contingency and referral fees.

(3) The purpose
of chapter 294, Laws of 2001 is to make revisions to chapter 234, Laws of 1983
and chapter 103, Laws of 1992 to: Fortify the public protection provisions of
chapter 294, Laws of 2001; establish one set of qualifications to be a
licensee; revise the regulations of certified public accountants; make
revisions in the ownership of certified public accounting firms; assure to the
greatest extent possible that certified public accountants from Washington
state are substantially equivalent with certified public accountants in other
states and can therefore perform the duties of certified public accountants in
as many states and countries as possible; assure certified public accountants from
other states and countries have met qualifications that are substantially
equivalent to the certified public accountant qualifications of this state; and
clarify the authority of the board of accountancy with respect to the
activities of persons holding licenses and certificates under this chapter. It
is not the intent of chapter 294, Laws of 2001 to in any way restrict or limit
the activities of persons not holding licenses or certificates under this
chapter except as otherwise specifically restricted or limited by chapter 234,
Laws of 1983 and chapter 103, Laws of 1992.

(((3))) (4)
A purpose of chapter 103, Laws of 1992, revising provisions of chapter 234,
Laws of 1983, is to clarify the authority of the board of accountancy with
respect to the activities of persons holding certificates under this chapter.
Furthermore, it is not the intent of chapter 103, Laws of 1992 to in any way
restrict or limit the activities of persons not holding certificates under this
chapter except as otherwise specifically restricted or limited by chapter 234,
Laws of 1983.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.04.055 and 2001 c
294 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The board may adopt and
amend rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the orderly conduct of its affairs.
The board shall prescribe rules consistent with this chapter as necessary to
implement this chapter. Included may be:

(1) Rules of procedure
to govern the conduct of matters before the board;

(2) Rules of
professional conduct for all licensees((,)) and certificate
holders, ((and nonlicensee owners of licensed firms,)) in order to
establish and maintain high standards of competence and ethics including rules
dealing with independence, integrity, objectivity, and freedom from conflicts
of interest;

(3) Rules specifying
actions and circumstances deemed to constitute holding oneself out as a
licensee in connection with the practice of public accountancy;

(4) Rules specifying
the manner and circumstances of the use of the titles "certified public
accountant" and "CPA," by holders of certificates who do not
also hold licenses under this chapter;

(5) Rules specifying
the educational requirements to take the certified public accountant
examination;

(6) Rules designed to
ensure that licensees' "reports on financial statements" meet the
definitional requirements for that term as specified in RCW 18.04.025;

(7) Requirements for
CPE to maintain or improve the professional competence of licensees as a
condition to maintaining their license and certificate holders as a condition
to maintaining their certificate under RCW 18.04.215;

(8) Rules governing
firms issuing or offering to issue reports on financial statements or using the
title "certified public accountant" or "CPA" including, but
not limited to, rules concerning their style, name, title, and affiliation with
any other organization, and establishing reasonable practice and ethical
standards to protect the public interest;

(9) The board may by
rule implement a quality assurance review program as a means to monitor
licensees' quality of practice and compliance with professional standards. The
board may exempt from such program, licensees who undergo periodic peer reviews
in programs of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants, NASBA,
or other programs recognized and approved by the board;

(10) The board may by
rule require licensed firms to obtain professional liability insurance if in
the board's discretion such insurance provides additional and necessary
protection for the public;

(11) Rules specifying
the experience requirements in order to qualify for a license;

(12) Rules specifying
the requirements for certificate holders to qualify for a license under this
chapter which must include provisions for meeting CPE and experience requirements
prior to application for licensure;

(13) ((Rules
specifying the registration requirements, including ethics examination and fee
requirements, for resident nonlicensee partners, shareholders, and managers of
licensed firms;

(14))) Rules specifying the ethics CPE requirements
for certificate holders and owners of licensed firms, including the process for
reporting compliance with those requirements;

(((15))) (14)
Rules specifying the experience and CPE requirements for licensees offering or
issuing reports on financial statements; ((and

(16))) (15) Any other rule which the board
finds necessary or appropriate to implement this chapter; and

(16)
The board shall adopt rules to prohibit either a licensee or a licensed firm
from conducting any activity which would, or appear to the public to,
compromise the integrity of the practice of public accounting. The rules
shall, at a minimum, prohibit either a licensee or a licensed firm which
provides services to a client of the nature of the issuance of audit reports or
review reports on financial statements from providing significant consulting or
other services to that client, unless the provision of those services clearly
does not, and can not reasonably appear to the public, to compromise the
integrity of the practice of public accounting. The rules shall be adopted to
be effective no later than January 1, 2003.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.04.065 and 2001 c
294 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The board
shall set its fees at a level adequate to pay the costs of administering this
chapter. All fees for licenses, ((registrations of nonlicensee partners,
shareholders, and managers of licensed firms,)) renewals of licenses, ((renewals
of registrations of nonlicensee partners, shareholders, and managers of
licensed firms,)) renewals of certificates, reinstatements of lapsed
licenses, reinstatements of lapsed certificates, ((reinstatements of lapsed registrations
of nonlicensee partners, shareholders, and managers of licensed firms,))
practice privileges under RCW 18.04.350, and delinquent filings received under
the authority of this chapter shall be deposited in the certified public
accountants' account created by RCW 18.04.105. Appropriation from such account
shall be made only for the cost of administering the provisions of this
chapter.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.04.195 and 2001 c
294 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A sole
proprietorship engaged in business in this state and offering to issue or
issuing reports on financial statements or using the title CPA or certified
public accountant shall license, as a firm, every three years with the board.

(a) The principal
purpose and business of the firm shall be to furnish services to the public
which are consistent with this chapter and the rules of the board;

(b) The sole
proprietor shall hold a license to practice under RCW 18.04.215;

(((b))) (c)
Each resident person in charge of an office located in this state shall hold a
license to practice under RCW 18.04.215; and

(((c))) (d)
The licensed firm must meet competency requirements established by rule by the
board.

(2) A partnership
engaged in business in this state and offering to issue or issuing reports on
financial statements or using the title CPA or certified public accountant
shall license as a firm every three years with the board, and shall meet the
following requirements:

(a) The principal
purpose and business of the partnership shall be to furnish services to the
public which are consistent with this chapter and the rules of the board;

(b) At least one
general partner of the partnership shall hold a license to practice under RCW
18.04.215;

(((b))) (c)
Each resident person in charge of an office in this state and each resident
partner personally engaged within this state in the practice of public
accounting shall hold a license to practice under RCW 18.04.215; and

(((c) A simple
majority of the ownership of the licensed firm in terms of financial interests
and voting rights of all partners or owners shall be held by natural persons
who are licensees or holders of a valid license issued under this chapter or by
another state that entitles the holder to practice public accounting in this
state. The principal partner of the partnership and any partner having
authority over issuing reports on financial statements shall hold a license
under this chapter or issued by another state that entitles the holder to
practice public accounting in this state; and))

(d) The licensed firm
must meet competency requirements established by rule by the board.

(3) A corporation
engaged in business in this state and offering to issue or issuing reports on
financial statements or using the title CPA or certified public accountant
shall license as a firm every three years with the board and shall meet the
following requirements:

(a) ((A simple
majority of the ownership of the licensed firm in terms of financial interests
and voting rights of all shareholders or owners shall be held by natural
persons who are licensees or holders of a valid license issued under this
chapter or by another state that entitles the holder to practice public
accounting in this state and is)) The principal purpose and business of
the corporation shall be to furnish services to the public which are consistent
with this chapter and the rules of the board; and

(b) Each shareholder
of the corporation shall be a certified public accountant of some state holding
a license to practice and shall be principally employed by the corporation
or actively engaged in its business. No other person may have any interest
in the stock of the corporation. The principal officer of the corporation
and any officer or director having authority over issuing reports on financial
statements shall hold a license under this chapter or issued by another state
that entitles the holder to practice public accounting in this state;

(((b))) (c)
At least one shareholder of the corporation shall hold a license under RCW
18.04.215;

(((c))) (d)
Each resident person in charge of an office located in this state and each
shareholder or director personally engaged within this state in the practice of
public accounting shall hold a license under RCW 18.04.215;

(((d))) (e)
A written agreement shall bind the corporation or its shareholders to purchase
any shares offered for sale by, or not under the ownership or effective control
of, a qualified shareholder, and bind any holder not a qualified shareholder to
sell the shares to the corporation or its qualified shareholders. The
agreement shall be noted on each certificate of corporate stock. The
corporation may purchase any amount of its stock for this purpose,
notwithstanding any impairment of capital, as long as one share remains
outstanding;

(((e))) (f)
The corporation shall comply with any other rules pertaining to corporations
practicing public accounting in this state as the board may prescribe; and

(((f))) (g)
The licensed firm must meet competency requirements established by rule by the
board.

(4) A limited liability
company engaged in business in this state and offering to issue or issuing
reports on financial statements or using the title CPA or certified public
accountant shall license as a firm every three years with the board, and shall
meet the following requirements:

(a) The principal
purpose and business of the limited liability company shall be to furnish
services to the public which are consistent with this chapter and the rules of
the board;

(b) At least one
((member)) manager of the limited liability company shall hold a
license under RCW 18.04.215;

(((b))) (c)
Each resident manager or member in charge of an office located in this state and
each resident manager or member personally engaged within this state in the
practice of public accounting shall hold a license under RCW 18.04.215; and

(((c) A simple
majority of the ownership of the licensed firm in terms of financial interests
and voting rights of all owners shall be held by natural persons who are
licensees or holders of a valid license issued under this chapter or by another
state that entitles the holder to practice public accounting in this state.
The principal member or manager of the limited liability company and any member
having authority over issuing reports on financial statements shall hold a
license under this chapter or issued by another state that entitles the holder
to practice public accounting in this state; and))

(d) The licensed firm
must meet competency requirements established by rule by the board.

(5) Application for a
license as a firm shall be made upon the affidavit of the proprietor or person
designated as managing partner((, member,)) or shareholder for
Washington. This person shall hold a license under RCW 18.04.215. The board
shall determine in each case whether the applicant is eligible for a license.
A partnership, corporation, or limited liability company which is licensed to
practice under RCW 18.04.215 may use the designation "certified public
accountants" or "CPAs" in connection with its partnership,
limited liability company, or corporate name. The board shall be given
notification within ninety days after the admission or withdrawal of a partner,
shareholder, or member engaged in this state in the practice of public
accounting from any partnership, corporation, or limited liability company so
licensed.

(6) ((Licensed firms
which fall out of compliance with the provisions of this section due to changes
in firm ownership or personnel, after receiving or renewing a license, shall
notify the board in writing within thirty days of its falling out of compliance
and propose a time period in which they will come back into compliance. The
board may grant a reasonable period of time for a firm to be in compliance with
the provisions of this section. Failure to bring the firm into compliance
within a reasonable period of time, as determined by the board, may result in
suspension, revocation, or imposition of conditions on the firm's license.

(7))) Fees for the license as a firm and for
notification of the board of the admission or withdrawal of a partner,
shareholder, or member shall be determined by the board. Fees shall be paid by
the firm at the time the license application form or notice of admission or
withdrawal of a partner, shareholder, or member is filed with the board.

(((8) Nonlicensee
owners of licensed firms are:

(a) Required to
fully comply with the provisions of this chapter and board rules;

(b) Required to be a
natural person;

(c) Required to be
an active individual participant in the licensed firm or affiliated entities as
these terms are defined by board rule; and

(d) Subject to
discipline by the board for violation of this chapter.

(9) Resident
nonlicensee owners of licensed firms are required to meet:

(a) The ethics
examination, registration, and fee requirements as established by the board
rules; and

(b) The ethics CPE
requirements established by the board rules.))

Sec. 5. RCW 18.04.295 and 2001 c
294 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall have
the power to: Revoke, suspend, refuse to renew, or reinstate a license or
certificate; impose a fine in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars plus
the board's investigative and legal costs in bringing charges against a certified
public accountant, a certificate holder, a licensee, or a licensed
firm((, or a nonlicensee holding an ownership interest in a licensed firm));
may impose full restitution to injured parties; or may impose conditions
precedent to renewal of a certificate or a license((; or may prohibit a
nonlicensee from holding an ownership interest in a licensed firm,)) for
any of the following causes:

(1) Fraud or deceit in
obtaining a license, or in any filings with the board;

(2) Dishonesty, fraud,
or negligence while representing oneself as ((a nonlicensee owner holding an
ownership interest in a licensed firm,)) a licensee((,)) or a
certificate holder;

(3) A violation of any
provision of this chapter;

(4) A violation of a
rule of professional conduct promulgated by the board under the authority
granted by this chapter;

(5) Conviction of a
crime or an act constituting a crime under:

(a) The laws of this
state;

(b) The laws of another
state, and which, if committed within this state, would have constituted a crime
under the laws of this state; or

(c) Federal law;

(6) Cancellation,
revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew the authority to practice as a
certified public accountant by any other state for any cause other than failure
to pay a fee or to meet the requirements of CPE in the other state;

(7) Suspension or
revocation of the right to practice matters relating to public accounting
before any state or federal agency;

For purposes of
subsections (6) and (7) of this section, a certified copy of such revocation,
suspension, or refusal to renew shall be prima facie evidence;

(8) Failure to maintain
compliance with the requirements for issuance, renewal, or reinstatement of a
certificate or license, or to report changes to the board;

(9) Failure to cooperate
with the board by:

(a) Failure to furnish
any papers or documents requested or ordered by the board;

(b) Failure to furnish
in writing a full and complete explanation covering the matter contained in the
complaint filed with the board or the inquiry of the board;

(c) Failure to respond
to subpoenas issued by the board, whether or not the recipient of the subpoena
is the accused in the proceeding;

(10) ((Failure by a
nonlicensee owner of a licensed firm to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or board rule; and

(11))) Failure to comply with an order of the board.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.04.305 and 2001 c
294 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The board may revoke,
suspend, or refuse to renew the license issued to a firm if at any time the
firm does not meet the requirements of this chapter for licensing, or for any
of the causes enumerated in RCW 18.04.295, or for any of the following additional
causes:

(1) The revocation or
suspension of the sole-practitioner's license or the revocation or suspension
or refusal to renew the license of any partner, manager, member, or
shareholder;

(2) The revocation,
suspension, or refusal to renew the license of the firm, or any partner,
manager, member, or shareholder thereof, to practice public accounting in any
other state or foreign jurisdiction for any cause other than failure to pay a
fee or to meet the CPE requirements of the other state or foreign jurisdiction;

(3) ((Failure by a
nonlicensee owner of a licensed firm to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or board rule; or

(4))) Failure of the firm to comply with the
requirements of this chapter or board rule.

Sec. 7. RCW 18.04.345 and 2001 c
294 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person may
assume or use the designation "certified public accountant-inactive"
or "CPA-inactive" or any other title, designation, words, letters,
abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the person is a
certified public accountant-inactive or CPA-inactive unless the person holds a
certificate. Persons holding only a certificate may not practice public
accounting.

(2) No person may hold
himself or herself out to the public or assume or use the designation
"certified public accountant" or "CPA" or any other title,
designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to
indicate that the person is a certified public accountant or CPA unless the
person holds a license under RCW 18.04.215.

(3) No firm may hold
itself out to the public as offering to issue or issuing reports on financial
statements, or assume or use the designation "certified public
accountant" or "CPA" or any other title, designation, words,
letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the firm
is composed of certified public accountants or CPAs, unless the firm is
licensed under RCW 18.04.195 and all offices of the firm in this state are
maintained and registered under RCW 18.04.205.

(4) No person,
partnership, limited liability company, or corporation offering accounting
services to the public may hold himself, herself, or itself out to the public,
or assume or use along, or in connection with his, hers, or its name, or any
other name the title or designation "certified accountant,"
"chartered accountant," "licensed accountant,"
"licensed public accountant," "public accountant," or any
other title or designation likely to be confused with "certified public
accountant" or any of the abbreviations "CA," "LA,"
"LPA," or "PA," or similar abbreviations likely to be
confused with "CPA."

(5) No licensed firm
may operate under an alias, a firm name, title, or "DBA" that differs
from the firm name that is registered with the board.

(6) No person may sign,
affix, or associate his or her name or any trade or assumed name used by the
person in his or her business to any report designated as an "audit,"
"review," or "compilation," unless the person holds a license
to practice under RCW 18.04.215 and a firm license under RCW 18.04.195, and all
of the person's offices in this state are licensed under RCW 18.04.205.

(7) No person may sign,
affix, or associate a firm name to any report designated as an
"audit," "review," or "compilation," unless the
firm is licensed under RCW 18.04.195 and 18.04.215, and all of its offices in
this state are maintained and registered under RCW 18.04.205.

(8) No person,
partnership, limited liability company, or corporation not holding a license to
practice under RCW 18.04.215 may hold himself, herself, or itself out to the
public as an "auditor" with or without any other description or
designation by use of such word on any sign, card, letterhead, or in any
advertisement or directory.

(9) No person,
partnership, limited liability company, or corporation holding a license to
practice under RCW 18.04.215 may accept a commission, referral fee, or
contingent fee for the performance of a professional service or the referral of
a client to a product or service.

Sec. 8. 2001 c 294 s 23
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) By December 1,
2002, the board of accountancy shall report to the senate committee on labor,
commerce, and financial institutions and the house committee on commerce and
labor, or successor committees, on the implementation of ((this act)) the
2001 and 2002 acts, including but not limited to the provisions ((governing))
prohibiting nonlicensee owners of CPA firms, protecting the integrity
of and public confidence in the profession of public accounting, and the
fiscal impacts of the legislation.

(2) This section does
not affect the board's authority to proceed with implementation of ((this
act)) the 2001 and 2002 acts.

(3) This section
expires January 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---