BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.135.035 and 2001
c 3 s 8 (Initiative Measure No. 728) and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) After July 1, 1995,
any action or combination of actions by the legislature that raises state
revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax shifts may be taken only if approved by
a two-thirds vote of each house, and then only if state expenditures in any
fiscal year, including the new revenue, will not exceed the state expenditure
limits established under this chapter. However, during the 2001-2003
biennium, any action or combination of actions by the legislature that raises
state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax shifts may be taken only if
approved by a majority vote of each house, and then only if state expenditures
in any fiscal year, including the new revenue, will not exceed the state expenditure
limits established under this chapter.

(2)(a) If the
legislative action under subsection (1) of this section will result in
expenditures in excess of the state expenditure limit, then the action of the
legislature shall not take effect until approved by a vote of the people at a
November general election. The office of financial management shall adjust the
state expenditure limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the
voters under this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of
revenue generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be adjusted
downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.

(b) The ballot title
for any vote of the people required under this section shall be substantially
as follows:

"Shall taxes be
imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for inflation
and population increases?"

(3)(a) The state
expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration of an emergency for a period
not to exceed twenty-four months by a law approved by a two-thirds vote of each
house of the legislature and signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the
nature of the emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require
immediate government action to alleviate human suffering and provide
humanitarian assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded for no
more than twenty-four months following the declaration of the emergency and
only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.

(b) Additional taxes
required for an emergency under this section may be imposed only until thirty
days following the next general election, unless an extension is approved at
that general election. The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of
the declaration of emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional
taxes for emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.

(c) The state or any
political subdivision of the state shall not impose any tax on intangible
property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that statute exists on January 1, 1993.

(4) If the cost of any
state program or function is shifted from the state general fund on or after
January 1, 1993, to another source of funding, or if moneys are transferred
from the state general fund to another fund or account, the state expenditure
limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state
expenditure limit to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a
transfer of money from the state general fund to another fund or account
includes any state legislative action taken after July 1, 2000, that has the
effect of reducing revenues from a particular source, where such revenues would
otherwise be deposited into the state general fund, while increasing the
revenues from that particular source to another state or local government
account. This subsection does not apply to the dedication or use of lottery
revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3) or property taxes under RCW 84.52.068, in
support of education or education expenditures.

(5) If the cost of any
state program or function is shifted to the state general fund on or after
January 1, 2000, from another source of funding, or if moneys are transferred
to the state general fund from another fund or account, the state expenditure
limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall increase the state
expenditure limit to reflect the shift.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.135.045 and 2001
c 3 s 9 (Initiative Measure No. 728), 2000 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 1, and 2000 2nd
sp.s. c 2 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The emergency
reserve fund is established in the state treasury. During each fiscal year,
the state treasurer shall deposit in the emergency reserve fund all general
fund‑-state revenues in excess of the state expenditure limit for that
fiscal year. Deposits shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter based on
projections of state revenues and the state expenditure limit. The treasurer
shall make transfers between these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual
annual revenues and the expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and thereafter.

(2) The legislature may
appropriate moneys from the emergency reserve fund only with approval of at
least two-thirds of the members of each house of the legislature, and then only
if the appropriation does not cause total expenditures to exceed the state
expenditure limit under this chapter. However, during the 2001-2003
biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys from the emergency reserve fund
to the general fund only with approval of a majority of the members of each house
of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation does not cause total
expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit under this chapter.

(3) The emergency
reserve fund balance shall not exceed five percent of annual general fund‑-state
revenues as projected by the official state revenue forecast. Any balance in
excess of five percent shall be transferred on a quarterly basis by the state
treasurer as follows: Seventy-five percent to the student achievement fund
hereby created in the state treasury and twenty-five percent to the general
fund balance. The treasurer shall make transfers between these accounts as
necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues for fiscal year 2000 and
thereafter. When per-student state funding for the maintenance and operation
of K-12 education meets a level of no less than ninety percent of the national
average of total funding from all sources per student as determined by the most
recent published data from the national center for education statistics of the United
States department of education, as calculated by the office of financial
management, further deposits to the student achievement fund shall be required
only to the extent necessary to maintain the ninety-percent level. Remaining
funds are part of the general fund balance and these funds are subject to the
expenditure limits of this chapter.

(4) The education
construction fund is hereby created in the state treasury.

(a) Funds may be
appropriated from the education construction fund exclusively for common school
construction or higher education construction.

(b) Funds may be
appropriated for any other purpose only if approved by a two-thirds vote of
each house of the legislature and if approved by a vote of the people at the
next general election. An appropriation approved by the people under this
subsection shall result in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only
for the fiscal period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect
any subsequent fiscal period.

(5) Funds from the student
achievement fund shall be appropriated to the superintendent of public
instruction strictly for distribution to school districts to meet the
provisions set out in the student achievement act. Allocations shall be made
on an equal per full-time equivalent student basis to each school district.

(6) Earnings of the
emergency reserve fund under RCW 43.84.092(4)(a) shall be transferred quarterly
to the multimodal transportation account, except for those earnings that are in
excess of thirty-five million dollars each fiscal year. Within thirty days
following any fiscal year in which earnings transferred to the multimodal
transportation account under this subsection did not total thirty-five million
dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer from the emergency reserve fund an
amount necessary to bring the total deposited in the multimodal transportation
account under this subsection to thirty-five million dollars. The revenues to
the multimodal transportation account reflected in this subsection provide
ongoing support for the transportation programs of the state. However, it is
the intent of the legislature that any new long-term financial support that may
be subsequently provided for transportation programs will be used to replace
and supplant the revenues reflected in this subsection, thereby allowing those
revenues to be returned to the purposes to which they were previously
dedicated.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. This act expires June 30,
2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---