BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. By June 1, 2002, the
state treasurer shall transfer two hundred forty-six million eight hundred
thousand dollars from the emergency reserve fund under RCW 43.135.045 to the
state general fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---