BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that local governments in the state of Washington face enormous challenges in
the areas of criminal justice and public health. It is the legislature's
intent to allow local governments to raise revenues in order to better protect
the health and safety of Washington state and its residents.

---
END ---