BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1.
RCW 28A.150.410 and 1997 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
shall establish for each school year in the appropriations act a state-wide
salary allocation schedule, for allocation purposes only, to be used to
distribute funds for basic education certificated instructional staff salaries
under RCW 28A.150.260.

(2) ((The
superintendent of public instruction shall calculate salary allocations for
state funded basic education certificated instructional staff by determining
the district average salary for basic education and special education
instructional staff using the salary allocation schedule established pursuant
to this section.)) Salary allocations for state-funded basic education
certificated instructional staff shall be calculated by the superintendent of
public instruction by determining the district's average salary for
certificated instructional staff, using the statewide salary allocation
schedule and related documents, conditions, and limitations established by the
omnibus appropriations act.

(3) Beginning January
1, 1992, no more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any
employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine compensation
allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents
referenced in the ((biennial)) omnibus appropriations act, or any
replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a) The employee has a masters
degree; or

(b) The credits were
used in generating state salary allocations before January 1, 1992.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.400.200 and 1997
c 141 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every school
district board of directors shall fix, alter, allow, and order paid salaries
and compensation for all district employees in conformance with this section.

(2)(a) Salaries for
certificated instructional staff shall not be less than the salary provided in
the appropriations act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an
employee with a baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and

(b) Salaries for
certificated instructional staff with a masters degree shall not be less than
the salary provided in the appropriations act in the statewide salary
allocation schedule for an employee with a masters degree and zero years of
service;

(3)(a) The actual
average salary paid to ((basic education and special education))
certificated instructional staff shall not exceed the district's average ((basic
education and special education program)) certificated instructional staff
salary used for the state basic education allocations for that school year as
determined pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410.

(b) Fringe benefit
contributions for ((basic education and special education)) certificated
instructional staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this subsection
only to the extent that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating appropriations act
in effect at the time the compensation is payable. For purposes of this
section, fringe benefits shall not include payment for unused leave for illness
or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer contributions for old age survivors
insurance, workers' compensation, unemployment compensation, and retirement
benefits under the Washington state retirement system; or employer
contributions for health benefits in excess of the insurance benefits
allocation provided per certificated instructional staff unit in the state
operating appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is
payable. A school district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions for such excess health benefits.

(c) Salary and benefits
for certificated instructional staff in programs other than basic education ((and
special education)) shall be consistent with the salary and benefits paid
to certificated instructional staff in the basic education ((and special
education)) program((s)).

(4) Salaries and
benefits for certificated instructional staff may exceed the limitations in
subsection (3) of this section only by separate contract for additional time,
additional responsibilities, or incentives. Supplemental contracts shall not
cause the state to incur any present or future funding obligation.
Supplemental contracts shall be subject to the collective bargaining provisions
of chapter 41.59 RCW and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240, shall not exceed
one year, and if not renewed shall not constitute adverse change in accordance
with RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380. No district may enter into a
supplemental contract under this subsection for the provision of services which
are a part of the basic education program required by Article IX, section 3 of
the state Constitution.

(5) Employee benefit
plans offered by any district shall comply with RCW 28A.400.350 and 28A.400.275
and 28A.400.280.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
September 1, 2002.

---
END ---