BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.47 RCW to read as follows:

Within thirty days of
the effective date of this act, the administrator shall request in writing from
each subsidized enrollee sufficient information to verify the enrollee's
eligibility for benefits under this chapter. Failure of any enrollee, within
ninety days of the mailing of the request, to submit information verifying his
or her eligibility for benefits shall result in disenrollment.

The administrator may
either bill an enrollee determined to be ineligible for amounts overpaid by the
state or impose civil penalties of up to two hundred percent of the amount of
overpayment, and may contract with private firms to collect any amount due
including amounts due under RCW 70.47.060(9).

The administrator
shall, on no less than an annual basis, verify the eligibility of each enrollee
in the basic health plan. A procedure for verifying eligibility shall be
submitted to the office of financial management for approval.

By January 1, 2003, the
health care authority and office of financial management shall submit a report
to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees on the implementation of this
section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---