BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 76.04.610 and 2001 c
279 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who
owns more than one parcel may elect to pay one assessment directly to the
department in lieu of the procedures set out under subsections (2) through (10)
of this section.

(2) If any owner
of forest land within a forest protection zone neglects or fails to provide
adequate fire protection as required by RCW 76.04.600, the department shall
provide such protection and shall annually impose the following assessments on
each parcel of such land: (a) A flat fee assessment of fourteen dollars and
fifty cents; and (b) twenty-five cents on each acre exceeding fifty acres.
Assessors may, at their option, collect the assessment on tax exempt lands. If
the assessor elects not to collect the assessment, the department may bill the
landowner directly.

(((2))) (3)
An owner who has paid assessments on two or more parcels, each containing fewer
than fifty acres and each within the same county, may obtain the following
refund:

(a) If all the parcels
together contain less than fifty acres, then the refund is equal to the flat
fee assessments paid, reduced by the total of (i) fourteen dollars and (ii) the
total of the amounts retained by the county from such assessments under
subsection (((5))) (6) of this section.

(b) If all the parcels
together contain fifty or more acres, then the refund is equal to the flat fee
assessments paid, reduced by the total of (i) fourteen dollars, (ii)
twenty-five cents for each acre exceeding fifty acres, and (iii) the total of
the amounts retained by the county from such assessments under subsection (((5)))
(6) of this section.

Applications for
refunds shall be submitted to the department on a form prescribed by the
department and in the same year in which the assessments were paid. The
department may not provide refunds to applicants who do not provide
verification that all assessments and property taxes on the property have been
paid. Applications may be made by mail.

In addition to the
procedures under this subsection, property owners with multiple parcels in a
single county who qualify for a refund under this section may apply to the
department on an application listing all the parcels owned in order to have the
assessment computed on all parcels but billed to a single parcel. Property
owners with the following number of parcels may apply to the department in the
year indicated:

Year Number
of Parcels

2002 10
or more parcels

2003 8
or more parcels

2004 6
or more parcels

2005 4
or more parcels

2006 and thereafter 2
or more parcels

The department must
compute the correct assessment and allocate one parcel in the county to use to
collect the assessment. The county must then bill the forest fire protection
assessment on that one allocated identified parcel. The landowner is responsible
for notifying the department of any changes in parcel ownership.

(((3))) (4)
Beginning January 1, 1991, under the administration and at the discretion of
the department up to two hundred thousand dollars per year of this assessment
shall be used in support of those rural fire districts assisting the department
in fire protection services on forest lands.

(((4))) (5)
For the purpose of this chapter, the department may divide the forest lands of
the state, or any part thereof, into districts, for fire protection and
assessment purposes, may classify lands according to the character of timber
prevailing, and the fire hazard existing, and place unprotected lands under the
administration of the proper district. Amounts paid or contracted to be paid
by the department for protection of forest lands from funds at its disposal
shall be a lien upon the property protected, unless reimbursed by the owner
within ten days after October 1st of the year in which they were incurred. The
department shall be prepared to make statement thereof, upon request, to a
forest owner whose own protection has not been previously approved as to its
adequacy, the department shall report the same to the assessor of the county in
which the property is situated. The assessor shall extend the amounts upon the
tax rolls covering the property, and upon authorization from the department
shall levy the forest protection assessment against the amounts of unimproved
land as shown in each ownership on the county assessor's records. The assessor
may then segregate on the records to provide that the improved land and
improvements thereon carry the millage levy designed to support the rural fire
protection districts as provided for in RCW 52.16.170.

(((5))) (6)
The amounts assessed shall be collected at the time, in the same manner, by the
same procedure, and with the same penalties attached that general state and
county taxes on the same property are collected, except that errors in
assessments may be corrected at any time by the department certifying them to
the treasurer of the county in which the land involved is situated.
Assessments shall be known and designated as assessments of the year in which
the amounts became reimbursable. Upon the collection of assessments the county
treasurer shall place fifty cents of the total assessments paid on a parcel for
fire protection into the county current expense fund to defray the costs of
listing, billing, and collecting these assessments. The treasurer shall then transmit
the balance to the department. Collections shall be applied against expenses
incurred in carrying out the provisions of this section, including necessary
and reasonable administrative costs incurred by the department in the
enforcement of these provisions. The department may also expend sums collected
from owners of forest lands or received from any other source for necessary
administrative costs in connection with the enforcement of RCW 76.04.660.

(((6))) (7)
When land against which forest protection assessments are outstanding is
acquired for delinquent taxes and sold at public auction, the state shall have
a prior lien on the proceeds of sale over and above the amount necessary to
satisfy the county's delinquent tax judgment. The county treasurer, in case
the proceeds of sale exceed the amount of the delinquent tax judgment, shall
immediately remit to the department the amount of the outstanding forest
protection assessments.

(((7))) (8)
All nonfederal public bodies owning or administering forest land included in a
forest protection zone shall pay the forest protection assessments provided in
this section and the special forest fire suppression account assessments under
RCW 76.04.630. The forest protection assessments and special forest fire suppression
account assessments shall be payable by nonfederal public bodies from available
funds within thirty days following receipt of the written notice from the
department which is given after October 1st of the year in which the protection
was provided. Unpaid assessments are not a lien against the nonfederal
publicly owned land but shall constitute a debt by the nonfederal public body
to the department and are subject to interest charges at the legal rate.

(((8))) (9)
A public body, having failed to previously pay the forest protection
assessments required of it by this section, which fails to suppress a fire on
or originating from forest lands owned or administered by it, is liable for the
costs of suppression incurred by the department or its agent and is not
entitled to reimbursement of costs incurred by the public body in the
suppression activities.

(((9)))
(10) The department may adopt rules to implement this section,
including, but not limited to, rules on levying and collecting forest protection
assessments.

--- END ---