BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

In cooperation with the
Washington state patrol and the department of licensing, the department of
veterans affairs shall create and design, and the department of licensing shall
issue, a special military veteran license plate displaying a symbol
representing military veterans. The special military veteran license plate may
be used in lieu of regular or personalized license plates for motor vehicles
required to display two motor vehicle license plates, excluding vehicles
registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by
the department of licensing.

The special military
veteran license plate may be purchased only by veterans discharged under
honorable conditions and individuals serving on active duty who served during
periods of war or armed conflict.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.16.290 and 1997 c
291 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In any case of a valid
sale or transfer of the ownership of any vehicle, the right to the certificates
properly transferable therewith, except as provided in RCW 46.16.280, and to
the vehicle license plates passes to the purchaser or transferee. It is
unlawful for the holder of such certificates, except as provided in RCW
46.16.280, or vehicle license plates to fail, neglect, or refuse to endorse the
certificates and deliver the vehicle license plates to the purchaser or
transferee. If the sale or transfer is of a vehicle licensed by the state or
any county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision
entitled to exemption as provided by law, or, if the vehicle is licensed with
personalized plates, amateur radio operator plates, Congressional Medal
of Honor plates, military veteran plates, disabled person plates,
disabled veteran plates, prisoner of war plates, or other special license
plates issued under RCW 46.16.301 as it existed before amendment by section 5,
chapter 291, Laws of 1997, the vehicle license plates therefor shall be
retained and may be displayed upon a vehicle obtained in replacement of the
vehicle so sold or transferred.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c
291 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may
establish a fee of no more than forty dollars for each type of special
license plates issued under RCW 46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing
before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, ((in an amount
calculated)) to offset the cost of production of the special license plates
and the administration of this program. ((Until December 31, 1997, the fee
shall not exceed thirty-five dollars, but effective with vehicle registrations
due or to become due on January 1, 1998, the department may adjust the fee to no
more than forty dollars.)) This fee is in addition to all other fees
required to register and license the vehicle for which the plates have been
requested. All such additional special license plate fees collected by the
department shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the motor
vehicle fund.

(2) ((Until December
31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application, registration, and renewal registration of a motor vehicle, the
holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection expenses
incurred by it. The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production,
shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(3) Effective with
vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 1998,)) In addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the
holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars.
The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection expenses
incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the
state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The state treasurer
shall credit the funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as
provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(((4) Effective with
annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 1999,)) (3) In addition
to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle
registration, the holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of
thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted
to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(((5))) (4)
In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a special baseball stadium
license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The
remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds
issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW
82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary preconstruction costs, while the
taxes are being collected under RCW 82.14.360. After this date, the state
treasurer shall credit the funds to the state general fund.

(((6) Effective with
annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 1999,)) (5) In
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a special baseball stadium license plate
shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not
to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds
shall be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium,
as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary preconstruction
costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW 82.14.360. After this
date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds to the state general fund.

(6) Effective with
vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 2003, in addition to
all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and registration of a
motor vehicle, the holder of a special military veteran license plate shall pay
an initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to
exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses. The remaining proceeds will be
deposited in the state treasury and credited to the motor vehicle account.

(7)
Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 2004, in
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a special military veteran license plate
shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses. The remaining proceeds
will be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the motor vehicle
account.

---
END ---