BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. LEGISLATIVE DECLARATION. The legislature declares
it to be the public policy of the state and a recognized governmental function
to assist in securitizing the revenue stream from the master settlement
agreement between the state and tobacco product manufacturers in order to
provide a current and reliable source of revenue for the state. The purpose of
this chapter is to establish a tobacco settlement authority having the power to
purchase certain rights of the state under the master settlement agreement and
to issue nonrecourse revenue bonds. This chapter, being necessary for the
welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to
effect the purposes thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Authority" means the tobacco settlement authority created in this
chapter.

(2) "Board"
means the governing board of the authority.

(3) "Bonds"
means bonds, notes, and other obligations and financing arrangements issued or
entered into by the authority under this chapter.

(4) "Master
settlement agreement" means the national master settlement agreement for
litigation brought by the state against tobacco product manufacturers.

(5) "Sales
agreement" means any agreement authorized under this chapter in which the
state provides for the sale of a portion of the state's monetary rights and
interests, all rights of enforcement, and all rights necessary and convenient
for enforcement of those monetary rights and interests, in the master
settlement agreement, to the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. TOBACCO SETTLEMENT
AUTHORITY‑-ESTABLISHED. (1) The tobacco settlement authority is created
and constitutes a public instrumentality and agency of the state, separate and
distinct from the state, exercising public and essential governmental
functions. The authority is a public body within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010.

(2) The powers of the
authority are vested in and shall be exercised by a board consisting of five
directors appointed by the governor, one of whom shall be appointed by the
governor as chair of the authority and who shall serve on the authority and as
chair of the authority at the pleasure of the governor. The governor shall make
the initial appointments no later than thirty days after the effective date of
this section. The term of the directors, other than the chair, shall be four
years from the date of their appointment, except that the terms of two of the
initial appointees, as determined by the governor, shall be for two years from
the date of their appointment. A director may be removed by the governor for
cause under RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080. The governor shall fill any vacancy
on the board by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term. The
members of the authority shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240
and may be reimbursed, solely from the funds of the authority, for expenses
incurred in the discharge of their duties under this chapter, subject to RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3) Three members of
the board constitute a quorum.

(4) The members shall
elect a treasurer and secretary annually, and other officers as the members
determine necessary.

(5) Meetings of the
board shall be held in accordance with the open public meetings act, chapter
42.30 RCW, and at the call of the chair or when a majority of the members so
requests. Meetings of the board may be held at any location within or out of
the state, and members of the board may participate in a meeting of the board
by means of a conference telephone or similar communication equipment under RCW
23B.08.200.

(6) The staff of the
state housing finance commission under chapter 43.180 RCW shall provide
administrative and staff support to the authority and shall be compensated for
its services solely from the funds of the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. BONDS NOT DEBT OF STATE.
(1) Bonds issued under this chapter shall be issued in the name of the
authority. The bonds shall not be obligations of the state of Washington and
shall be obligations only of the authority, payable from the special fund or
funds created by the authority for their payment.

(2) Bonds issued under
this chapter shall contain a recital on their face to the effect that payment
of the principal of, interest on, and prepayment premium, if any, on the bonds
shall be a valid claim only as against the special fund or funds relating
thereto, that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or
any municipal corporation, subdivision, or agency of the state, other than the
authority as set forth in this chapter, is pledged to the payment of the
principal of, interest on, and prepayment premium, if any, on the bonds.

(3) Contracts entered into
by the authority shall be entered into in the name of the authority and not in
the name of the state of Washington. The obligations of the authority under
the contracts shall be obligations only of the authority and are not in any way
obligations of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. FINANCING POWERS. In
addition to other powers and duties prescribed in this chapter, the authority
is empowered to:

(1) Establish a stable
source of revenue to be used for the purposes designated in this chapter;

(2) Enter into sales
agreements with the state for the periodic distribution of amounts due the
state under the master settlement agreement;

(3) Issue bonds which
may or may not be exempt from general federal income taxation in one or more
series, and to refund or refinance its debt and obligations;

(4) Sell, pledge, or
assign, as security, all or a portion of the revenues derived by the authority
under any sales agreement, to provide for and secure the issuance of its bonds;

(5) Provide for the
investment of any funds, including funds held in reserve, not required for
immediate disbursement, and provide for the selection of investments;

(6) Manage its funds,
obligations, and investments as necessary and as consistent with its purpose;
and

(7) Implement the
purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. GENERAL POWERS‑-RESTRICTIONS.
(1) The authority has all the general powers necessary to carry out its
purposes and duties and to exercise its specific powers. In addition to other
powers specified in this chapter, the authority may:

(a) Sue and be sued in
its own name;

(b) Make and execute
agreements, contracts, and other instruments, with any public or private
person, in accordance with this chapter;

(c) Employ, contract
with, or engage independent counsel, bond counsel, other attorneys, financial
advisors, investment bankers, auditors, other technical or professional
assistants, and such other personnel as are necessary and recommended by the
state housing finance commission staff;

(d) Invest or deposit
moneys of the authority in any manner determined by the authority and enter
into hedge agreements, swap agreements, or other financial products, including
payment agreements defined under RCW 39.96.020(5). The authority is not a
governmental entity for purposes of chapter 39.96 RCW;

(e) Establish such
special funds, and controls on deposits to and disbursements from them, as it
finds convenient for the implementation of this chapter;

(f) Procure insurance,
other credit enhancements, and other financing arrangements for its bonds to
fulfill its purposes under this chapter, including but not limited to municipal
bond insurance and letters of credit;

(g) Accept
appropriations, gifts, grants, loans, or other aid from public or private
entities;

(h) Adopt rules,
consistent with this chapter, as the board determines necessary;

(i) Delegate any of its
powers and duties if consistent with the purposes of this chapter; and

(j) Exercise any other
power reasonably required to implement the purposes of this chapter.

(2) The authority does
not have the power of eminent domain and does not have the power to levy taxes of
any kind.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. AUTHORIZATION OF THE SALE
OF RIGHTS IN THE MASTER SETTLEMENT AGREEMENT. (1) The governor is authorized
to sell to the authority the right to receive up to twenty-five percent of the
state's annual share of the revenue derived from the master settlement
agreement for litigation brought by the state against tobacco product
manufacturers. The portion of the revenue sold shall be determined by the
governor based on the revenue assumptions reflected in the biennial state
appropriations act at the time of the sale. The attorney general shall assist
the governor in the review of all necessary documentation to effect the sale.
The governor and the authority are authorized to take any action necessary to
facilitate and complete the sale.

(2) The sale made under
this section is irrevocable during the time when bonds are outstanding under
this chapter and shall be a part of the contractual obligation owed to the
bondholders. The sale shall constitute and be treated as a true sale and
absolute transfer of the property so transferred and not as a pledge or other
security interest for any borrowing. The characterization of such a sale as an
absolute transfer shall not be negated or adversely affected by the fact that
only a portion of the revenue from the master settlement agreement is being
sold, or by the state's acquisition or retention of an ownership interest in
the residual assets.

(3) On or after the
effective date of the sale, the state shall not have any right, title, or
interest in the portion of the master settlement agreement revenues sold and
such portion shall be the property of the authority and not the state, and
shall be owned, received, held, and disbursed by the authority or its trustee
or assignee, and not the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. BONDS. (1) The authority
may issue its bonds in principal amounts which, in the opinion of the
authority, are necessary to provide sufficient funds for achievement of its
purposes, the payment of debt service on its bonds, the establishment of
reserves to secure the bonds, the costs of issuance of its bonds, and all other
expenditures of the authority incident to and necessary to carry out its
purposes or powers. The authority may also issue refunding bonds, including
advance refunding bonds, for the purpose of refunding previously issued bonds,
and may issue other types of bonds, debt obligations, and financing
arrangements necessary to fulfill its purposes or the purposes of this
chapter. The bonds are investment securities and negotiable instruments within
the meaning of and for the purposes of the uniform commercial code.

(2) The authority's
bonds shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, be in such
denominations, be in such form, be registered or registrable in such manner, be
made transferable, exchangeable, and interchangeable, be payable in such medium
of payment, at such place or places, be subject to such terms of redemption,
bear such fixed or variable rate or rates of interest, be taxable or tax
exempt, be payable at such time or times, and be sold in such manner and at
such price or prices, as the authority determines. The bonds shall be executed
by one or more officers of the authority, and by the trustee or paying agent if
the authority determines to use a trustee or paying agent for the bonds.
Execution of the bonds may be by manual or facsimile signature, provided that
at least one signature on the bond is manual.

(3) The bonds of the
authority shall be subject to such terms, conditions, covenants, and protective
provisions as are found necessary or desirable by the authority, including, but
not limited to, pledges of the authority's assets, setting aside of reserves,
and other provisions the authority finds are necessary or desirable for the
security of bondholders.

(4) Any amount pledged
by the authority to be received under the sales agreement or in special funds
created by the authority shall be valid and binding at the time the pledge is
made. Receipts so pledged and then or thereafter received by the authority and
any securities in which such receipts may be invested shall immediately be
subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or
further act. The lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against
all parties having claims of any kind against the authority, whether such
parties have notice of the lien. Notwithstanding any other provision to the
contrary, the resolution or indenture of the authority or any other instrument
by which a pledge is created need not be recorded or filed pursuant to chapter
62A.9A RCW to perfect such pledge. The authority shall constitute a
governmental unit within the meaning of RCW 62A.9A‑102(a)(45).

(5) When issuing bonds,
the authority may provide for the future issuance of additional bonds or parity
debt on a parity with outstanding bonds, and the terms and conditions of their
issuance. The authority may issue refunding bonds in accordance with chapter
39.53 RCW or issue bonds with a subordinate lien against the fund or funds
securing outstanding bonds.

(6) The board and any
person executing the bonds are not liable personally on the indebtedness or
subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance
thereof.

(7) The authority may,
out of any fund available therefor, purchase its bonds in the open market.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. LEGAL INVESTMENTS. Bonds
issued under this chapter are hereby made securities in which all insurance
companies, trust companies in their commercial departments, savings banks,
cooperative banks, banking associations, investment companies, executors,
trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are now or
may hereafter be authorized to invest in obligations of the state may properly
and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to
them.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY.
Members of the board and persons acting in the authority's behalf, while acting
within the scope of their employment or agency, are not subject to personal
liability resulting from carrying out the powers and duties conferred on them
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. BANKRUPTCY. Prior to the
date that is three hundred sixty‑six days after which the authority no
longer has any bonds outstanding, the authority is prohibited from filing a
voluntary petition under chapter 9 of the federal bankruptcy code or such
corresponding chapter or section as may, from time to time, be in effect, and a
public official or organization, entity, or other person shall not authorize
the authority to be or become a debtor under chapter 9 or any successor or
corresponding chapter or sections during such periods. This section shall be
part of any contractual obligation owed to the holders of bonds issued under
this chapter. Any such contractual obligation shall not subsequently be modified
by state law during the period of the contractual obligation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. DISSOLUTION OF THE
AUTHORITY. The authority shall dissolve no later than two years from the date
of final payment of all outstanding bonds and the satisfaction of all
outstanding obligations of the authority, except to the extent necessary to
remain in existence to fulfill any outstanding covenants or provisions with
bondholders or third parties made in accordance with this chapter. Upon
dissolution of the authority, all assets of the authority shall be returned to
the state and shall be deposited in the state general fund, and the authority
shall execute any necessary assignments or instruments, including any
assignment of any right, title, or ownership to the state for receipt of
payments under the master settlement agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION
TAX EXEMPTION. This chapter does not apply to income received by the tobacco
settlement authority under chapter 43.‑- RCW (sections 1 through 12 of
this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. DISPOSITION OF PROCEEDS.
During fiscal year 2003, the state treasurer shall deposit the proceeds of the
sale of revenue under chapter 43.‑- RCW (sections 1 through 12 of this
act) as follows:

(1) One hundred five
million dollars shall be deposited into the health services account established
by RCW 43.72.900; and

(2) The remainder of
the proceeds shall be deposited to the state general fund.

Sec. 15. RCW 43.79.480 and 1999 c
309 s 927 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Moneys received by
the state of Washington in accordance with the settlement of the state's legal
action against tobacco product manufacturers, exclusive of costs and attorneys'
fees, shall be deposited in the tobacco settlement account created in this
section except as these moneys are sold or assigned under chapter 43.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 12 of this act).

(2) The tobacco
settlement account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the tobacco
settlement account may only be transferred to the health services account for
the purposes set forth in RCW 43.72.900, and to the tobacco prevention and
control account for purposes set forth in this section.

(3) The tobacco prevention
and control account is created in the state treasury. The source of revenue
for this account is moneys transferred to the account from the tobacco
settlement account, investment earnings, donations to the account, and other
revenues as directed by law. Expenditures from the account are subject to
appropriation.

(((4) The state
treasurer shall transfer one hundred million dollars from the tobacco
settlement account to the tobacco prevention and control account upon
authorization of the director of financial management. The director shall
authorize transfer of the total amount by June 30, 2001.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. CAPTIONS. Captions used
in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. CODIFICATION. Sections 1
through 12 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. SEVERABILITY. If any
provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act
is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---