BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that limited-English speaking and sensory-impaired applicants and recipients of
public assistance often require interpreter services in order to communicate
effectively with employees of the department of social and health services,
medical professionals, and other social services personnel. The legislature
further finds that interpreter services can be procured and delivered through a
variety of different means. It is in the public's interest for the department
to deliver interpreter services, to the extent funds are available, by the
means which it determines most cost-effectively ensure that limited-English
speaking and sensory-impaired persons are able to communicate with department
employees and service providers.

Sec. 2. RCW 39.29.040 and 1998 c
101 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter does not
apply to:

(1) Contracts specifying
a fee of less than five thousand dollars if the total of the contracts from
that agency with the contractor within a fiscal year does not exceed five
thousand dollars;

(2) Contracts awarded
to companies that furnish a service where the tariff is established by the
utilities and transportation commission or other public entity;

(3) Intergovernmental
agreements awarded to any governmental entity, whether federal, state, or local
and any department, division, or subdivision thereof;

(4) Contracts awarded
for services to be performed for a standard fee, when the standard fee is
established by the contracting agency or any other governmental entity and a
like contract is available to all qualified applicants;

(5) Contracts for
services that are necessary to the conduct of collaborative research if prior
approval is granted by the funding source;

(6) Contracts for
client services;

(7) Contracts for
architectural and engineering services as defined in RCW 39.80.020, which shall
be entered into under chapter 39.80 RCW;

(8) Contracts for the
employment of expert witnesses for the purposes of litigation; ((and))

(9) Contracts for bank
supervision authorized under RCW 30.38.040; and

(10)
Contracts for interpreter services and interpreter brokerage services on behalf
of limited-English speaking or sensory-impaired applicants and recipients of
public assistance.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.19.190 and 1995 c
269 s 1401 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of general
administration, through the state purchasing and material control director,
shall:

(1) Establish and staff
such administrative organizational units within the division of purchasing as
may be necessary for effective administration of the provisions of RCW
43.19.190 through 43.19.1939;

(2) Purchase all
material, supplies, services, and equipment needed for the support,
maintenance, and use of all state institutions, colleges, community colleges,
technical colleges, college districts, and universities, the offices of the
elective state officers, the supreme court, the court of appeals, the
administrative and other departments of state government, and the offices of
all appointive officers of the state: PROVIDED, That the provisions of RCW 43.19.190
through 43.19.1937 do not apply in any manner to the operation of the state
legislature except as requested by the legislature: PROVIDED, That any agency
may purchase material, supplies, services, and equipment for which the agency
has notified the purchasing and material control director that it is more
cost-effective for the agency to make the purchase directly from the vendor:
PROVIDED, That primary authority for the purchase of specialized equipment,
instructional, and research material for their own use shall rest with the
colleges, community colleges, and universities: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
universities operating hospitals and the state purchasing and material control
director, as the agent for state hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010, and for
health care programs provided in state correctional institutions as defined in
RCW 72.65.010(3) and veterans' institutions as defined in RCW 72.36.010 and
72.36.070, may make purchases for hospital operation by participating in
contracts for materials, supplies, and equipment entered into by nonprofit
cooperative hospital group purchasing organizations: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
primary authority for the purchase of materials, supplies, and equipment for
resale to other than public agencies shall rest with the state agency
concerned: PROVIDED FURTHER, That authority to purchase services as included
herein does not apply to personal services as defined in chapter 39.29 RCW,
unless such organization specifically requests assistance from the division of
purchasing in obtaining personal services and resources are available within
the division to provide such assistance: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the authority
for the purchase of insurance and bonds shall rest with the risk manager under
RCW 43.19.1935: PROVIDED FURTHER, That, except for the authority of the risk
manager to purchase insurance and bonds, the director is not required to
provide purchasing services for institutions of higher education that choose to
exercise independent purchasing authority under RCW 28B.10.029: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the authority to purchase interpreter services and interpreter
brokerage services on behalf of limited-English speaking or sensory-impaired
applicants and recipients of public assistance shall rest with the department of
social and health services;

(3) Have authority to
delegate to state agencies authorization to purchase or sell, which
authorization shall specify restrictions as to dollar amount or to specific
types of material, equipment, services, and supplies. Acceptance of the
purchasing authorization by a state agency does not relieve such agency from
conformance with other sections of RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.1939, or from
policies established by the director. Also, delegation of such authorization
to a state agency, including an educational institution to which this section
applies, to purchase or sell material, equipment, services, and supplies shall
not be granted, or otherwise continued under a previous authorization, if such
agency is not in substantial compliance with overall state purchasing and
material control policies as established herein;

(4) Contract for the
testing of material, supplies, and equipment with public and private agencies
as necessary and advisable to protect the interests of the state;

(5) Prescribe the
manner of inspecting all deliveries of supplies, materials, and equipment
purchased through the division;

(6) Prescribe the
manner in which supplies, materials, and equipment purchased through the
division shall be delivered, stored, and distributed;

(7) Provide for the
maintenance of a catalogue library, manufacturers' and wholesalers' lists, and
current market information;

(8) Provide for a
commodity classification system and may, in addition, provide for the adoption
of standard specifications;

(9) Provide for the
maintenance of inventory records of supplies, materials, and other property;

(10) Prepare rules and
regulations governing the relationship and procedures between the division of
purchasing and state agencies and vendors;

(11) Publish procedures
and guidelines for compliance by all state agencies, including those
educational institutions to which this section applies, which implement overall
state purchasing and material control policies;

(12)
Advise state agencies, including educational institutions, regarding compliance
with established purchasing and material control policies under existing
statutes.

---
END ---