BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.08A.100 and 1997
c 57 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The state shall
exercise its option under P.L. 104-193 to continue services to legal immigrants
under temporary assistance for needy families, medicaid to the extent
allowed by federal law, the state's basic health plan as provided in chapter
70.47 RCW, and social services block grant programs. Eligibility for these
benefits for legal immigrants arriving after August 21, 1996, is limited to
those families where the parent, parents, or legal guardians have been in
residence in Washington state for a period of twelve consecutive months before
making their application for assistance. Legal immigrants who lose benefits
under the supplemental security income program as a result of P.L. 104-193 are
immediately eligible for benefits under the state's general
assistance-unemployable program. The department shall redetermine income and
resource eligibility at least annually, in accordance with existing state
policy.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.09.415 and 1998 c
245 s 144 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
established a program to be known as the children's health program.

To the extent of
available funds:

(a) Health care
services may be provided to persons who are under eighteen years of age with
household incomes at or below the federal poverty level and ((not otherwise))
eligible for medical assistance or the limited casualty program for the
medically needy.

(b) The determination
of eligibility of recipients for health care services shall be the
responsibility of the department. The application process shall be easy to
understand and, to the extent possible, applications shall be made available at
local schools and other appropriate locations. The department shall make
eligibility determinations within the time frames for establishing eligibility
for children on medical assistance, as defined by RCW 74.09.510.

(c) The amount, scope,
and duration of health care services provided to eligible children under the
children's health program shall be the same as that provided to children under
medical assistance, as defined in RCW 74.09.520.

(2) The legislature is
interested in assessing the effectiveness of the prenatal care program.
However, the legislature recognizes the cost and complexity associated with
such assessment.

The legislature accepts
the effectiveness of prenatal and maternity care at improving birth outcomes
when these services are received by eligible persons. Therefore, the
legislature intends to focus scarce assessment resources to determine the
extent to which support services such as child care, psychosocial and
nutritional assessment and counseling, case management, transportation, and
other support services authorized by chapter 296, Laws of 1990, result in
receipt of prenatal and maternity care by eligible persons.

The University of
Washington shall conduct a study, based on a statistically significant
statewide sampling of data, to evaluate the effectiveness of the maternity care
access program set forth in RCW 74.09.760 through 74.09.820 based on the
principles set forth in RCW 74.09.770.

The University of
Washington shall develop a plan and budget for the study in consultation with
the joint legislative audit and review committee. The joint legislative audit
and review committee shall also monitor the progress of the study.

The department of
social and health services shall make data and other information available as
needed to the University of Washington as required to conduct this study.

The study shall
determine:

(a) The characteristics
of women receiving services, including health risk factors;

(b) The extent to which
access to maternity care and support services have improved in this state as a
result of this program;

(c) The utilization of
services and birth outcomes for women and infants served by this program by
type of practitioner;

(d) The extent to which
birth outcomes for women receiving services under this program have improved in
comparison to birth outcomes of nonmedicaid mothers;

(e) The impact of
increased medicaid reimbursement to physicians on provider participation;

(f) The difference
between costs for services provided under this program and medicaid
reimbursement for the services;

(g) The gaps in services,
if any, that may still exist for women and their infants as defined by RCW
74.09.790 (1) and (4) served by this program, excluding pregnant substance
abusers, and women covered by private health insurance; and

(h) The number and mix
of services provided to eligible women as defined by subsection (2)(g) of this
section and the effect on birth outcomes as compared to nonmedicaid birth
outcomes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
October 1, 2002.

---
END ---