BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.04.060 and 1998 c
332 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

"Sale at
wholesale" or "wholesale sale" means: (1) Any sale of tangible
personal property((; (2))), any sale of services defined as a retail
sale in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), any sale of amusement or recreation services
as defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a)((; (3))), any sale of canned
software((;)), or (((4))) any sale of telephone service as
defined in RCW 82.04.065, which is not a sale at retail; and ((means))
(2) Any charge made for labor and services rendered for persons who are
not consumers, in respect to real or personal property, if such charge is
expressly defined as a retail sale by RCW 82.04.050 when rendered to or for
consumers: PROVIDED, That the term "real or personal property" as
used in this ((section)) subsection shall not include any natural
products named in RCW 82.04.100.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.190 and 1998 c
332 s 6 and 1998 c 308 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

"Consumer"
means the following:

(1) Any person who
purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any article of tangible personal
property irrespective of the nature of the person's business and including,
among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair,
clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or
for consumers other than for the purpose (a) of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business or (b) of incorporating such
property as an ingredient or component of real or personal property when
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving, constructing,
or decorating such real or personal property of or for consumers or (c) of
consuming such property in producing for sale a new article of tangible
personal property or a new substance, of which such property becomes an
ingredient or component or as a chemical used in processing, when the primary
purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through
contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale or (d)
purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing
ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the
primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly
through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon;

(2)(a) Any person
engaged in any business activity taxable under RCW 82.04.290; (b) any person
who purchases, acquires, or uses any telephone service as defined in RCW
82.04.065, other than for resale in the regular course of business; (c) any
person who purchases, acquires, or uses any service defined in RCW
82.04.050(2)(a) or any amusement and recreation service defined in RCW
82.04.050(3)(a), other than for resale in the regular course of business; and
(d) any person who is an end user of software;

(3) Any person engaged
in the business of contracting for the building, repairing or improving of any
street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which
is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state of
Washington or by the United States and which is used or to be used primarily
for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any
kind as defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when
such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of such
publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass
public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
by installing, placing or spreading the property in or upon the right of way of
such street, place, road, highway, easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in
or upon the site of such mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility;

(4) Any person who is
an owner, lessee or has the right of possession to or an easement in real
property which is being constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or
otherwise altered by a person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal
corporations or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and
services rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road
purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and county and
city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW in respect to
labor and services rendered to their real property. Nothing contained in this
or any other subsection of this definition shall be construed to modify any
other definition of "consumer";

(5) Any person who is
an owner, lessee, or has the right of possession to personal property which is
being constructed, repaired, improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered
by a person engaged in business;

(6) Any person engaged
in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of
or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city
housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or
thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by
virtue of installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing
land and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof,
or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW.
Any such person shall be a consumer within the meaning of this subsection in
respect to tangible personal property incorporated into, installed in, or
attached to such building or other structure by such person;

(7) Any person who is a
lessor of machinery and equipment, the rental of which is exempt from the tax
imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or
charge made for tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the
machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful life of
less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this
section shall be construed to modify any other definition of
"consumer";

(8) Any person engaged
in the business of cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production and nuclear
research and development; and

(9) Until July 1, 2003,
any person engaged in the business of conducting environmental remedial action
as defined in RCW 82.04.2635(2).

Sec. 3. RCW 82.12.010 and 2001 c
188 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter:

(1)(a) "Value of
the article used" shall mean the consideration, whether money, credit,
rights, or other property except trade-in property of like kind, expressed in
terms of money, paid or given or contracted to be paid or given by the purchaser
to the seller for the article of tangible personal property, the use of which
is taxable under this chapter. The term includes, in addition to the
consideration paid or given or contracted to be paid or given, the amount of
any tariff or duty paid with respect to the importation of the article used.
In case the article used is acquired by lease or by gift or is extracted,
produced, or manufactured by the person using the same or is sold under
conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value thereof,
the value of the article used shall be determined as nearly as possible
according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of
like quality and character under such rules as the department of revenue may
prescribe.

(b) In case the
articles used are acquired by bailment, the value of the use of the articles so
used shall be in an amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the
articles so bailed, determined as nearly as possible according to the value of
such use at the places of use of similar products of like quality and character
under such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case any such
articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to the construction,
repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become or are to become an
ingredient or component of, new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant
to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of any such
articles therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such
articles so used shall be determined according to the retail selling price of
such articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as possible
according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of
like quality and character or, in the absence of either of these selling price
measures, such value may be determined upon a cost basis, in any event under
such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe.

(c) In the case of
articles owned by a user engaged in business outside the state which are
brought into the state for no more than one hundred eighty days in any period
of three hundred sixty-five consecutive days and which are temporarily used for
business purposes by the person in this state, the value of the article used
shall be an amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the
articles, unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter 82.08
RCW upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this
subsection.

(d) In the case of
articles manufactured or produced by the user and used in the manufacture or
production of products sold or to be sold to the department of defense of the
United States, the value of the articles used shall be determined according to
the value of the ingredients of such articles.

(e) In the case of an
article manufactured or produced for purposes of serving as a prototype for the
development of a new or improved product, the value of the article used shall
be determined by: (i) The retail selling price of such new or improved product
when first offered for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into
the prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered for
sale.

(f) In the case of an
article purchased with a direct pay permit under RCW 82.32.087, the value of
the article used shall be determined by the retail selling price, as defined in
RCW 82.08.010, of such article if but for the use of the direct pay permit the
transaction would have been subject to sales tax;

(2) "Value of
the service used" means the consideration, whether money, credit, rights,
or other property, expressed in terms of money, paid or given or contracted to
be paid or given by the purchaser to the seller for the service, the use of
which is taxable under this chapter. If the service is received by gift or
under conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value
thereof, the value of the service used shall be determined as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar
services of like quality and character under rules the department of revenue
may prescribe.

(3)
"Use," "used," "using," or "put to use"
shall have their ordinary meaning, and shall mean:

(a) With respect to
tangible personal property, the first act within this state by which the
taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of tangible
personal property (as a consumer), and include installation, storage,
withdrawal from storage, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use
or consumption within this state; and

(((3))) (b)
With respect to a service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), the first act within
this state by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the
article of tangible personal property upon which the service was performed (as
a consumer), and include installation, storage, withdrawal from storage, or any
other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption of the article
within this state;

(4)
"Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included
within the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word
"consumer" as defined in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW;

(((4))) (5)
"Retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010 and every
person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property at retail
and every person required to collect from purchasers the tax imposed under this
chapter;

(((5))) (6)
The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW,
insofar as applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect to taxes
imposed under the provisions of this chapter. "Consumer," in
addition to the meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW insofar
as applicable, shall also mean any person who distributes or displays, or causes
to be distributed or displayed, any article of tangible personal property,
except newspapers, the primary purpose of which is to promote the sale of
products or services.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.12.020 and 1999 c
358 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
levied and there shall be collected from every person in this state a tax or
excise for the privilege of using within this state as a consumer: (a) Any
article of tangible personal property purchased at retail, or acquired by
lease, gift, repossession, or bailment, or extracted or produced or
manufactured by the person so using the same, or otherwise furnished to a
person engaged in any business taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) or (7); or (b)
any canned software, regardless of the method of delivery, but excluding canned
software that is either provided free of charge or is provided for temporary
use in viewing information, or both.

(2) This tax shall
apply to the use of every service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a)
or (3)(a) and the use of every article of tangible personal property,
including property acquired at a casual or isolated sale, and including
byproducts used by the manufacturer thereof, except as hereinafter provided,
irrespective of whether the article or similar articles are manufactured or are
available for purchase within this state.

(3) Except as provided
in RCW 82.12.0252, payment by one purchaser or user of tangible personal
property or service of the tax imposed by chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW shall not
have the effect of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same property
or service from the taxes imposed by such chapters.

(4) The tax shall be
levied and collected in an amount equal to the value of the article used or
value of the service used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rate in effect
for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.

Sec. 5. RCW 82.12.035 and 1996 c
148 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A credit shall be
allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter upon the use of tangible
personal property, or services taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or
(3)(a), in the state of Washington in the amount that the present user thereof
or his or her bailor or donor has paid a retail sales or use tax with respect
to such property to any other state of the United States, any political
subdivision thereof, the District of Columbia, and any foreign country or
political subdivision thereof, prior to the use of such property in Washington.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.14.020 and 2001 c
186 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this
chapter:

(1) A retail sale
consisting solely of the sale of tangible personal property shall be deemed to
have occurred at the retail outlet at or from which delivery is made to the
consumer;

(2) A retail sale
consisting essentially of the performance of personal, business,
or professional services shall be deemed to have occurred at the place at which
such services were primarily performed, except that for the performance of a
tow truck service, as defined in RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be deemed
to have occurred at the place of business of the operator of the tow truck
service;

(3) A retail sale
consisting of the rental of tangible personal property shall be deemed to have
occurred (a) in the case of a rental involving periodic rental payments, at the
primary place of use by the lessee during the period covered by each payment,
or (b) in all other cases, at the place of first use by the lessee;

(4) A retail sale
within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2), and a retail sale of taxable personal
property to be installed by the seller shall be deemed to have occurred at the
place where the labor and services involved were primarily performed;

(5) A retail sale
consisting of the providing to a consumer of telephone service, as defined in
RCW 82.04.065, other than a sale of tangible personal property under subsection
(1) of this section or a rental of tangible personal property under subsection
(3) of this section, shall be deemed to have occurred at the situs of the
telephone or other instrument through which the telephone service is rendered;

(6) A retail sale of
linen and uniform supply services is deemed to occur as provided in RCW
82.08.0202;

(7) "City"
means a city or town;

(8) The meaning
ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04, 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, as now or
hereafter amended, insofar as applicable, shall have full force and effect with
respect to taxes imposed under authority of this chapter;

(9) "Taxable
event" shall mean any retail sale, or any use ((of an article of
tangible personal property)), upon which a state tax is imposed pursuant to
chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the term shall not include a retail sale taxable
pursuant to RCW 82.08.150, as now or hereafter amended;

(10) "Treasurer or
other legal depository" shall mean the treasurer or legal depository of a
county or city.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2002.

---
END ---