BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.21.030 and 1989 c
2 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A tax is imposed on
the privilege of possession of hazardous substances in this state. The rate of
the tax shall be ((seven-tenths of)) one and six-tenths percent
multiplied by the wholesale value of the substance.

(2) Moneys collected
under this chapter shall be deposited in the toxics control accounts under RCW
70.105D.070.

(3) Chapter 82.32 RCW
applies to the tax imposed in this chapter. The tax due dates, reporting
periods, and return requirements applicable to chapter 82.04 RCW apply equally
to the tax imposed in this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.21.040 and 1989 c
2 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The following are
exempt from the tax imposed in this chapter:

(1) Any successive
possession of a previously taxed hazardous substance. If tax due under this
chapter has not been paid with respect to a hazardous substance, the department
may collect the tax from any person who has had possession of the hazardous
substance. If the tax is paid by any person other than the first person having
taxable possession of a hazardous substance, the amount of tax paid shall
constitute a debt owed by the first person having taxable possession to the
person who paid the tax.

(2) ((Any possession
of a hazardous substance by a natural person under circumstances where the
substance is used, or is to be used, for a personal or domestic purpose (and
not for any business purpose) by that person or a relative of, or person
residing in the same dwelling as, that person.

(3) Any possession
of a hazardous substance amount which is determined as minimal by the
department of ecology and which is possessed by a retailer for the purpose of
making sales to ultimate consumers. This exemption does not apply to pesticide
or petroleum products.

(4))) Any possession of alumina or natural gas.

(((5))) (3)
Persons or activities which the state is prohibited from taxing under the
United States Constitution.

(((6))) (4)
Any persons possessing a hazardous substance where such possession first
occurred before March 1, 1989.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2002.

---
END ---