BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 26.28.085 and 1995 c
373 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person
who applies a tattoo to or who engages in body piercing on any minor
under the age of eighteen is guilty of a misdemeanor. It is not a defense to a
violation of this section that the person applying the tattoo or engaging in
body piercing did not know the minor's age unless the person applying the
tattoo or engaging in body piercing establishes by a preponderance of
the evidence that he or she made a reasonable, bona fide attempt to ascertain
the true age of the minor by requiring production of a driver's license or
other picture identification card or paper and did not rely solely on the oral
allegations or apparent age of the minor.

(2) For the
purposes of this section, (a) "tattoo" includes any permanent
marking or coloring of the skin with any pigment, ink, or dye, or any procedure
that leaves a visible scar on the skin; and (b) "body piercing"
means the creation of an opening in the body of a human being for the purpose
of inserting jewelry or other decoration. This includes, but is not limited
to, piercing of a lip, tongue, nose, or eyebrow. "Body piercing"
does not include the piercing of an earlobe.

(3)
Medical procedures performed by a licensed physician are exempted from this
section.

--- END ---