BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.52.160 and 1996 c
213 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No state officer ((or)),
state employee, or certificated educational employee may employ or use
any person, money, or property under the officer's or employee's official
control or direction, or in his or her official custody, for the private
benefit or gain of the officer, employee, or another.

(2) This section does
not prohibit the use of public resources to benefit others as part of a state
officer's ((or)), state employee's, or certificated educational
employee's official duties.

(3) The appropriate
ethics boards may adopt rules providing exceptions to this section for
occasional use of the state officer ((or)), state employee, or
certificated educational employee, of de minimis cost and value, if the
activity does not result in interference with the proper performance of public
duties.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.52.180 and 1995 c
397 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No state officer ((or)),
state employee, or certificated educational employee may use or
authorize the use of facilities of an agency, directly or indirectly, for the
purpose of assisting a campaign for election of a person to an office or for
the promotion of or opposition to a ballot proposition. Knowing acquiescence
by a person with authority to direct, control, or influence the actions of the
state officer ((or)), state employee, or certificated
educational employee using public resources in violation of this section
constitutes a violation of this section. Facilities of an agency include, but
are not limited to, use of stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of
state employees of the agency during working hours, vehicles, office space,
publications of the agency, and clientele lists of persons served by the
agency.

(2) This section shall
not apply to the following activities:

(a) Action taken at an
open public meeting by members of an elected legislative body to express a
collective decision, or to actually vote upon a motion, proposal, resolution,
order, or ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot proposition as long as
(i) required notice of the meeting includes the title and number of the ballot
proposition, and (ii) members of the legislative body or members of the public
are afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing view;

(b) A statement by an
elected official in support of or in opposition to any ballot proposition at an
open press conference or in response to a specific inquiry. For the purposes
of this subsection, it is not a violation of this section for an elected
official to respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot proposition, to make
incidental remarks concerning a ballot proposition in an official
communication, or otherwise comment on a ballot proposition without an actual,
measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards shall adopt by rule
a definition of measurable expenditure;

(c) Activities that are
part of the normal and regular conduct of the office or agency; and

(d) De minimis use of
public facilities by statewide elected officials and legislators incidental to
the preparation or delivery of permissible communications, including written
and verbal communications initiated by them of their views on ballot
propositions that foreseeably may affect a matter that falls within their
constitutional or statutory responsibilities.

(3) As to state
officers ((and)), state employees, and certificated
educational employees, this section operates to the exclusion of RCW
42.17.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 42.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The teachers'
ethics board is created, composed of seven members, as follows:

(a) The superintendent
of public instruction, or the superintendent's designee;

(b) Three practicing
teachers, appointed by the superintendent of public instruction after consulting
with one or more officers within recognized professional associations regarding
possible appointments; and

(c) Three citizens who
do not hold and have not held teaching certificates, appointed by the governor.

(2) Except for initial
members and members completing partial terms, members shall serve a single
five-year term.

(3) Except for the term
of the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee,
terms of initial board members shall be staggered.

(4) A vacancy on the board
shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

(5) Each member shall
serve for the term of his or her appointment and until his or her successor is
appointed.

(6) The members shall
annually select a chair from among themselves.

(7) Members of the
board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

(8) Staff shall be
provided by the office of the attorney general.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 42.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The teachers'
ethics board shall:

(a) Investigate
violations of RCW 42.52.160 and 42.52.180 with regard to certificated
educational employees and report the results of the investigation to the
superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education;

(b) Investigate, hear,
and determine complaints by any person or on its own motion;

(c) Recommend
suspension or removal of a certificated educational employee to the office of
the superintendent of public instruction; and

(d) Develop educational
materials and training with regard to ethics for certificated educational
employees.

(2) The teachers'
ethics board may:

(a) Issue subpoenas for
the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of documentary
evidence relating to any matter under investigation by the board or involved in
any hearing;

(b) Administer oaths
and affirmations;

(c) Examine witnesses;
and

(d)
Receive evidence.

---
END ---