BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.92.090 and 1963 c
159 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The state of
Washington, whether acting in its governmental or proprietary capacity, shall
be liable for damages arising out of its tortious conduct to the same extent as
if it were a private person or corporation, subject to the limitations
provided in this section.

(1) Neither the
state nor its agencies, institutions, officers, employees, or volunteers are
liable to pay a claim or a judgment by any one person that exceeds the sum of
one million dollars or any claim or judgment, or portions thereof, that, when
totaled with all other claims or judgments paid by the state or its agencies,
institutions, officers, employees, or volunteers arising out of the same
incident or occurrence, exceeds the sum of two million dollars. However, a
judgment or judgments may be claimed and rendered in excess of these amounts
and may be settled and paid under this section up to one million dollars or two
million dollars, as the case may be, and that portion of the judgment that
exceeds these amounts may be reported to the legislature, but may be paid in
part or in whole only by further act of the legislature. Notwithstanding the
limited waiver of sovereign immunity provided in this section, the state or an
agency, institution, or any officer, employee, or volunteer may agree, within
the limits of insurance coverage provided, to settle a claim made or a judgment
rendered against it without further action by the legislature, but the state or
agency has not waived any defense of sovereign immunity or increased the limits
of its liability as a result of its obtaining insurance coverage for tortious
acts in excess of the waiver provided in this section.

(2) The liability of
the state, its agencies, and institutions is several only and is not joint.

(3) No attorney may
charge, demand, receive, or collect, for services rendered, fees in excess of
twenty-five percent of any judgment or settlement under this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 4.92.005 and 1985 c
217 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW
4.92.060, 4.92.070, 4.92.090, 4.92.130, ((4.92.140,)) and
4.92.150, volunteer is defined in RCW 51.12.035.

Sec. 3. RCW 4.96.010 and 2001 c
119 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All local
governmental entities, whether acting in a governmental or proprietary
capacity, shall be liable for damages arising out of their tortious conduct, or
the tortious conduct of their past or present officers, employees, or
volunteers while performing or in good faith purporting to perform their
official duties, to the same extent as if they were a private person or
corporation, subject to the limitations provided in subsection (2) of this
section. Filing a claim for damages within the time allowed by law shall
be a condition precedent to the commencement of any action claiming damages.
The laws specifying the content for such claims shall be liberally construed so
that substantial compliance therewith will be deemed satisfactory.

(2)(a) Local government
entities, officers, employees, or volunteers are liable to pay a claim or a
judgment by any one person that exceeds the sum of one million dollars or any
claim or judgment, or portions thereof, that, when totaled with all other
claims or judgments paid by the local government entities, officers, employees,
or volunteers arising out of the same incident or occurrence, exceeds the sum
of two million dollars. However, a judgment or judgments may be claimed and
rendered in excess of these amounts and may be settled and paid under this
section up to one million dollars or two million dollars, as the case may be,
and that portion of the judgment that exceeds these amounts may be reported to
the local legislative authority, but may be paid in part or in whole only by
further act of the local legislative authority. Notwithstanding the limited
waiver of sovereign immunity provided in this section, the local government
entities, officers, employees, or volunteers may agree, within the limits of
insurance coverage provided, to settle a claim made or a judgment rendered
against it without further action by the local legislative authority, but the
local government entities, officers, employees, or volunteers have not waived
any defense of sovereign immunity or increased the limits of its liability as a
result of its obtaining insurance coverage for tortious acts in excess of the
waiver provided in this section.

(b) The liability of
the local government entities, officers, employees, or volunteers is several
only and is not joint.

(c) No attorney may
charge, demand, receive, or collect, for services rendered, fees in excess of
twenty-five percent of any judgment or settlement under this section.

(3) Unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, for the purposes of this chapter,
"local governmental entity" means a county, city, town, special
district, municipal corporation as defined in RCW 39.50.010, quasi-municipal
corporation, or public hospital.

(((3))) (4)
For the purposes of this chapter, "volunteer" is defined according to
RCW 51.12.035.

Sec. 4. RCW 4.22.070 and 1993 c
496 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In all actions
involving fault of more than one entity, the trier of fact shall determine the
percentage of the total fault which is attributable to every entity which
caused the claimant's damages except entities immune from liability to the
claimant under Title 51 RCW. The sum of the percentages of the total fault
attributed to at-fault entities shall equal one hundred percent. The entities
whose fault shall be determined include the claimant or person suffering
personal injury or incurring property damage, defendants, third-party
defendants, entities released by the claimant, entities with any other
individual defense against the claimant, and entities immune from liability to
the claimant, but shall not include those entities immune from liability to the
claimant under Title 51 RCW. Judgment shall be entered against each defendant
except those who have been released by the claimant or are immune from
liability to the claimant or have prevailed on any other individual defense
against the claimant in an amount which represents that party's proportionate
share of the claimant's total damages. The liability of each defendant shall
be several only and shall not be joint except:

(a) A party shall be
responsible for the fault of another person or for payment of the proportionate
share of another party where both were acting in concert or when a person was
acting as an agent or servant of the party.

(b) If the trier of
fact determines that the claimant or party suffering bodily injury or incurring
property damages was not at fault, the defendants against whom judgment is
entered shall be jointly and severally liable for the sum of their
proportionate shares of the ((claimants [claimant's])) claimant's
total damages, except as provided in RCW 4.92.090(2) and 4.96.010(2).

(2) If a defendant is
jointly and severally liable under one of the exceptions listed in subsections
(1)(a) or (1)(b) of this section, such defendant's rights to contribution
against another jointly and severally liable defendant, and the effect of
settlement by either such defendant, shall be determined under RCW 4.22.040,
4.22.050, and 4.22.060.

(3)(a) Nothing in this
section affects any cause of action relating to hazardous wastes or substances
or solid waste disposal sites.

(b) Nothing in this
section shall affect a cause of action arising from the tortious interference
with contracts or business relations.

(c)
Nothing in this section shall affect any cause of action arising from the
manufacture or marketing of a fungible product in a generic form which contains
no clearly identifiable shape, color, or marking.

---
END ---