BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.08.020 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and
there shall be collected a tax on each retail sale in this state equal to six
and five-tenths percent of the selling price, except that the rate shall be
seven and one-tenth percent of the selling price for the period May 1, 2002,
through June 30, 2003.

(2) There is levied and
there shall be collected an additional tax on each retail car rental,
regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal to five and
nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected under this
subsection shall be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created
in RCW 47.66.070.

(3) The taxes imposed
under this chapter shall apply to successive retail sales of the same property.

(4) The rates provided
in this section apply to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in
RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.08.064 and 2000 c
104 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A sales and
use tax rate change under this chapter or chapter 82.12 RCW shall be imposed (((1)))
(a) no sooner than seventy-five days after its enactment into law and (((2)))
(b) only on the first day of January, April, July, or October.

(2) Subsection (1)
of this section does not apply to the temporary tax rate change under section 1
of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---