BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 79A.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A state park
facility closed due to a lack of funding may be operated on an interim basis by
one or more nonprofit organizations.

(2) In order to assume
this obligation, the nonprofit organization or organizations must apply to the
commission. The commission shall accept, review, and approve the applications
as expediently as practicable.

(3) Each nonprofit
organization applying under this section must outline the plan for operating
the park. The plan may make provisions for full or part-time operation of the
park.

(4) In considering
applications submitted under subsection (2) of this section, the commission
must approve all applications unless the applicant is deemed unable to meet the
obligations it offers to provide.

This section expires
July 1, 2006.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---