BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any city or town may establish the position of warrant officer.

(2) If any city or town establishes the position of warrant officer, the position shall be maintained by the city or town within the city or town police department. The number and qualifications of warrant officers shall be fixed by ordinance and their compensation shall be paid by the city or town. The chief of police of the city or town must establish training requirements consistent with the job description of warrant officer established in that city or town.

(3) Warrant officers shall be vested only with the special authority identified in ordinance, which may include the authority to make arrests authorized by warrants and other authority related to service of civil and criminal process.

(4) Process issuing from any court that is directed to a police department in which a warrant officer position is maintained may be served or enforced by the warrant officer.

(5) Warrant officers shall not be entitled to death, disability, or retirement benefits pursuant to chapter 41.26 RCW on the basis of service as a warrant officer as described in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any code city may establish the position of warrant officer.

(2) If any code city establishes the position of warrant officer, the position shall be maintained by the city within the city police department. The number and qualifications of warrant officers shall be fixed by ordinance, and their compensation shall be paid by the city. The chief of police of the city must establish training requirements consistent with the job description of warrant officer established in that city.

(3) Warrant officers shall be vested only with the special authority identified in ordinance, which may include the authority to make arrests authorized by warrants and other authority related to service of civil and criminal process.

(4) Process issuing from any court that is directed to a police department in which a warrant officer position is maintained may be served or enforced by the warrant officer.

(5) Warrant officers shall not be entitled to death, disability, or retirement benefits pursuant to chapter 41.26 RCW on the basis of service as a warrant officer as described in this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 35.20.270 and 1992 c 99 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The position of warrant officer is hereby created and shall be maintained by the city within the city police department. The number and qualifications of warrant officers shall be fixed by ordinance, and their compensation shall be paid by the city.

(2) Warrant officers shall be vested only with the special authority to make arrests authorized by warrants and other arrests as are authorized by ordinance.

(3))) All criminal and civil process issuing out of courts created under this title shall be directed to the chief of police of the city served by the court and/or to the sheriff of the county in which the court is held and/or the warrant officers and be by them executed according to law in any county of this state.

(((4)))(2) No process of courts created under this title shall be executed outside the corporate limits of the city served by the court unless the person authorized by the process first contacts the applicable law enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction the process is to be served.

(((5)))(3) Upon a defendant being arrested in another city or county the cost of arresting or serving process thereon shall be borne by the court issuing the process including the cost of returning the defendant from any county of the state to the city.

(((6) Warrant officers shall not be entitled to death, disability, or retirement benefits pursuant to chapter 41.26 RCW on the basis of service as a warrant officer as described in this section.))

--- END ---