BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.132.020 and 1983 c 257 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,))The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter((:))unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Beverage" means ((beer or other malt beverage or)) mineral water, soda water, or other drink in liquid form and intended for human consumption. The term does not include milk-based, soy-based, or similar products requiring heat and pressure in the canning process, or beer or other malt beverages.

(2) "Beverage container" means a separate and sealed can containing a beverage.

(3) "Department" means the department of ecology created under chapter 43.21A RCW.

--- END ---