BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to authorize the growing of industrial hemp as a legal, agricultural activity in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Grower" means any person or business entity growing industrial hemp.

(2) "Hemp products" includes all products made from industrial hemp including, but not limited to, cloth, cordage, fiber, food, fuel, paint, paper, particle board, plastics, seed, seed meal and seed oil for consumption, and certified seed for cultivation, if the seeds originate from industrial hemp varieties.

(3) "Industrial hemp" means all parts and varieties of the genera, Cannabis, cultivated or possessed by a grower, whether growing or not, that contain a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of 0.3 percent or less by dry weight, except that the THC concentration limit of 0.3 percent may be exceeded for licensed industrial hemp seed research.

(4) "THC concentration" means percent of total THC, which is the combined percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in any part of the plant, Cannabis, regardless of moisture content.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Industrial hemp is an agricultural product that may be grown, produced, possessed, and commercially traded in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) Subject to receiving federal or private funds for this purpose, Washington State University shall study the feasibility and desirability of industrial hemp production in Washington. In conducting the study, the Washington State University shall gather information from agricultural and scientific literature, consult with experts and the public, and review the best practices of other states and countries worldwide regarding the development of markets for industrial hemp and hemp products. The study must include an analysis of:

(a) The market economic conditions affecting the development of an industrial hemp industry in the state;

(b) The estimated value-added benefit that Washington's economy would reap from having a developed industrial hemp industry in the state;

(c) Whether Washington soils and growing conditions are appropriate for use of hemp in the rotation of other crops and whether soils and growing conditions are appropriate for farming industrial hemp at economically viable levels;

(d) The agronomy research being conducted worldwide relating to industrial hemp varieties, production, and use; and

(e) Other legislative acts, experiences, and outcomes around the world regarding industrial hemp production.

(2)(a) Washington State University shall report its findings to the legislature by January 14, 2016.

(b) The report must include recommendations for any legislative actions necessary to encourage and support the development of an industrial hemp industry in the state of Washington.

(3) This section expires August 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

--- END ---