BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.240.020 and 2008 c 288 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1, 2009, no manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer may manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for use in this state a children's product or product component containing the following:

(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, lead at more than .009 percent by weight (ninety parts per million);

(b) Cadmium at more than .004 percent by weight (forty parts per million), except for children's jewelry, which must meet the ASTM F2923-14 standards, as approved on October 1, 2014; or

(c) Phthalates, individually or in combination, at more than 0.10 percent by weight (one thousand parts per million).

(2) If determined feasible for manufacturers to achieve and necessary to protect children's health, the department, in consultation with the department of health, may by rule require that no manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer may manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for use in this state a children's product or product component containing lead at more than .004 percent by weight (forty parts per million).

--- END ---