BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of the legislature to enhance competition and create regulatory uniformity in the filing requirements for group health benefit plans other than small group plans, as well as stand-alone dental plan and stand-alone vision plan rates and forms in order to increase competition among carriers and provide a more competitive market for these products.

Sec. 2. RCW 48.18.100 and 2008 c 217 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No insurance policy form or application form where written application is required and is to be attached to the policy, or printed life or disability rider or endorsement form may be issued, delivered, or used unless it has been filed with and approved by the commissioner. This section does not apply to:

(a) Surety bond forms;

(b) Forms filed under RCW 48.18.103;

(c) Forms exempted from filing requirements by the commissioner under RCW 48.18.103;

(d) Manuscript policies, riders, or endorsements of unique character designed for and used with relation to insurance upon a particular subject; ((or))

(e) Contracts of insurance procured under the provisions of chapter 48.15 RCW; or

(f) Forms filed under the requirements of section 3 of this act.

(2) Every such filing containing a certification, in a form approved by the commissioner, by either the chief executive officer of the insurer or by an actuary who is a member of the American academy of actuaries, attesting that the filing complies with Title 48 RCW and Title 284 of the Washington Administrative Code, may be used by the insurer immediately after filing with the commissioner. The commissioner may order an insurer to cease using a certified form upon the grounds set forth in RCW 48.18.110. This subsection does not apply to certain types of policy forms designated by the commissioner by rule.

(3) Except as provided in RCW 48.18.103 and section 3 of this act, every filing that does not contain a certification pursuant to subsection (2) of this section must be made not less than thirty days in advance of issuance, delivery, or use. At the expiration of the thirty days, the filed form shall be deemed approved unless prior thereto it has been affirmatively approved or disapproved by order of the commissioner. The commissioner may extend by not more than an additional fifteen days the period within which he or she may affirmatively approve or disapprove any form, by giving notice of the extension before expiration of the initial thirty-day period. At the expiration of the period that has been extended, and in the absence of prior affirmative approval or disapproval, the form shall be deemed approved. The commissioner may withdraw any approval at any time for cause. By approval of any form for immediate use, the commissioner may waive any unexpired portion of the initial thirty-day waiting period.

(4) The commissioner's order disapproving any form or withdrawing a previous approval must state the grounds for disapproval.

(5) No form may knowingly be issued or delivered as to which the commissioner's approval does not then exist.

(6) The commissioner may, by rule, exempt from the requirements of this section any class or type of insurance policy forms if filing and approval is not desirable or necessary for the protection of the public.

(7) Every member or subscriber to a rating organization must adhere to the form filings made on its behalf by the organization. Deviations from the organization are permitted only when filed with the commissioner in accordance with this chapter.

(8) Medical malpractice insurance form filings are subject to the provisions of this section.

(9) Variable contract forms; disability insurance policy forms; individual life insurance policy forms; life insurance policy illustration forms; industrial life insurance contract, individual medicare supplement insurance policy, and long-term care insurance policy forms, which are amended solely to comply with the changes in nomenclature required by RCW 48.18A.035, 48.20.013, 48.20.042, 48.20.072, 48.23.380, 48.23A.040, 48.23A.070, 48.25.140, 48.66.120, and 48.76.090 are exempt from this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All rates and forms of group health benefit plans other than small group plans and all stand-alone dental and stand-alone vision plans offered by a health carrier or limited health care service contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.035 and modification of a contract form or rate must be filed before the contract form is offered for sale to the public and before the rate schedule is used.

(2) Filings of negotiated contract forms for groups other than small groups, and applicable rate schedules, that are placed into effect at time of negotiation or that have a retroactive effective date are not required to be filed in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, but must be filed within thirty working days after the earlier of:

(a) The date group contract negotiations are completed; or

(b) The date renewal premiums are implemented.

(3) For purposes of this section, a negotiated contract form is a health benefit plan, stand-alone dental plan, or stand-alone vision plan where benefits, and other terms and conditions, including the applicable rate schedules are negotiated and agreed to by the carrier or limited health care service contractor and the policy or contract holder. The negotiated policy form and associated rate schedule must otherwise comply with state and federal laws governing the content and schedule of rates for the negotiated plans.

(4) Stand-alone dental and stand-alone vision plans offered by a disability insurer to out-of-state groups specified by RCW 48.21.010(2) may be negotiated, but may not be offered in this state before the commissioner finds that the stand-alone dental or stand-alone vision plan otherwise meet the standards set forth in RCW 48.21.010(2) (a) and (b).

(5) The commissioner may, subject to a carrier's or limited health care service contractor's right to demand and receive a hearing under chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW, disapprove filings submitted under this section, as permitted under RCW 48.18.110, 48.44.020, and 48.46.060.

(6) The commissioner shall adopt rules to standardize the rate and form filing requirements under this section. In developing rules to implement this section, the commissioner must use the already adopted standards in place for health care service contractors and health maintenance organizations.

(7) The requirements of this section apply to all group health benefit plans, stand-alone dental plans, and stand-alone vision plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2016.

Sec. 4. RCW 48.19.010 and 1987 c 185 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as is otherwise expressly provided the provisions of this chapter apply to all insurances upon subjects located, resident or to be performed in this state except:

(a) Life insurance;

(b) Disability insurance;

(c) Reinsurance except as to joint reinsurance as provided in RCW 48.19.360;

(d) Insurance against loss of or damage to aircraft, their hulls, accessories, and equipment, or against liability, other than workers' compensation and employers' liability, arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of aircraft;

(e) Insurance of vessels or craft, their cargoes, marine builders' risks, marine protection and indemnity; and such other risks commonly insured under marine, as distinguished from inland marine, insurance contracts as may be defined by ruling of the commissioner for the purposes of this provision;

(f) Title insurance.

(2) Except, that every insurer shall, as to disability insurance, before using file with the commissioner its manual of classification, manual of rules and rates, and any modifications thereof except as provided under section 3 of this act or rate filing requirements established by a specific statute or federal law.

--- END ---