BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.36.057 and 1993 c 408 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The supreme court is requested to adopt court rules to be effective by September 1, 1994, regarding methodology and standards for merging the list of registered voters in Washington state with the list of licensed drivers and identicard holders in Washington state for purposes of creating an expanded jury source list. The rules should specify the standard electronic format or formats in which the lists will be provided to requesting superior courts by the department of ((information services)) enterprise services. In the interim, and until such court rules become effective, the methodology and standards provided in RCW 2.36.054 shall apply. An expanded jury source list shall be available to the courts for use by September 1, 1994.

Sec. 2. RCW 2.36.0571 and 1993 c 408 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Not later than January 1, 1994, the secretary of state, the department of licensing, and the department of ((information services)) enterprise services shall adopt administrative rules as necessary to provide for the implementation of the methodology and standards established pursuant to RCW 2.36.057 and 2.36.054 or by supreme court rule.

Sec. 3. RCW 2.68.060 and 2010 c 282 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The administrative office of the courts, under the direction of the judicial information system committee, shall:

(1) Develop a judicial information system information technology portfolio consistent with the provisions of RCW ((43.105.172)) 43.41A.110;

(2) Participate in the development of an enterprise-based statewide information technology strategy ((as defined in RCW 43.105.019));

(3) Ensure the judicial information system information technology portfolio is organized and structured to clearly indicate participation in and use of enterprise-wide information technology strategies;

(4) As part of the biennial budget process, submit the judicial information system information technology portfolio to the chair and ranking member of the ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the senate, the office of financial management, and the ((department of information services)) office of the chief information officer.

Sec. 4. RCW 4.92.110 and 2009 c 433 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

No action subject to the claim filing requirements of RCW 4.92.100 shall be commenced against the state, or against any state officer, employee, or volunteer, acting in such capacity, for damages arising out of tortious conduct until sixty calendar days have elapsed after the claim is presented to the office of risk management ((division)) in the department of enterprise services. The applicable period of limitations within which an action must be commenced shall be tolled during the sixty calendar day period. For the purposes of the applicable period of limitations, an action commenced within five court days after the sixty calendar day period has elapsed is deemed to have been presented on the first day after the sixty calendar day period elapsed.

Sec. 5. RCW 4.96.020 and 2012 c 250 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this section apply to claims for damages against all local governmental entities and their officers, employees, or volunteers, acting in such capacity.

(2) The governing body of each local governmental entity shall appoint an agent to receive any claim for damages made under this chapter. The identity of the agent and the address where he or she may be reached during the normal business hours of the local governmental entity are public records and shall be recorded with the auditor of the county in which the entity is located. All claims for damages against a local governmental entity, or against any local governmental entity's officers, employees, or volunteers, acting in such capacity, shall be presented to the agent within the applicable period of limitations within which an action must be commenced. A claim is deemed presented when the claim form is delivered in person or is received by the agent by regular mail, registered mail, or certified mail, with return receipt requested, to the agent or other person designated to accept delivery at the agent's office. The failure of a local governmental entity to comply with the requirements of this section precludes that local governmental entity from raising a defense under this chapter.

(3) For claims for damages presented after July 26, 2009, all claims for damages must be presented on the standard tort claim form that is maintained by the office of risk management ((division of the office of financial management)) in the department of enterprise services, except as allowed under (c) of this subsection. The standard tort claim form must be posted on the ((office of financial management's)) department of enterprise services' web site.

(a) The standard tort claim form must, at a minimum, require the following information:

(i) The claimant's name, date of birth, and contact information;

(ii) A description of the conduct and the circumstances that brought about the injury or damage;

(iii) A description of the injury or damage;

(iv) A statement of the time and place that the injury or damage occurred;

(v) A listing of the names of all persons involved and contact information, if known;

(vi) A statement of the amount of damages claimed; and

(vii) A statement of the actual residence of the claimant at the time of presenting the claim and at the time the claim arose.

(b) The standard tort claim form must be signed either:

(i) By the claimant, verifying the claim;

(ii) Pursuant to a written power of attorney, by the attorney in fact for the claimant;

(iii) By an attorney admitted to practice in Washington state on the claimant's behalf; or

(iv) By a court-approved guardian or guardian ad litem on behalf of the claimant.

(c) Local governmental entities shall make available the standard tort claim form described in this section with instructions on how the form is to be presented and the name, address, and business hours of the agent of the local governmental entity. If a local governmental entity chooses to also make available its own tort claim form in lieu of the standard tort claim form, the form:

(i) May require additional information beyond what is specified under this section, but the local governmental entity may not deny a claim because of the claimant's failure to provide that additional information;

(ii) Must not require the claimant's social security number; and

(iii) Must include instructions on how the form is to be presented and the name, address, and business hours of the agent of the local governmental entity appointed to receive the claim.

(d) If any claim form provided by the local governmental entity fails to require the information specified in this section, or incorrectly lists the agent with whom the claim is to be filed, the local governmental entity is deemed to have waived any defense related to the failure to provide that specific information or to present the claim to the proper designated agent.

(e) Presenting either the standard tort claim form or the local government tort claim form satisfies the requirements of this chapter.

(f) The amount of damages stated on the claim form is not admissible at trial.

(4) No action subject to the claim filing requirements of this section shall be commenced against any local governmental entity, or against any local governmental entity's officers, employees, or volunteers, acting in such capacity, for damages arising out of tortious conduct until sixty calendar days have elapsed after the claim has first been presented to the agent of the governing body thereof. The applicable period of limitations within which an action must be commenced shall be tolled during the sixty calendar day period. For the purposes of the applicable period of limitations, an action commenced within five court days after the sixty calendar day period has elapsed is deemed to have been presented on the first day after the sixty calendar day period elapsed.

(5) With respect to the content of claims under this section and all procedural requirements in this section, this section must be liberally construed so that substantial compliance will be deemed satisfactory.

Sec. 6. RCW 8.26.085 and 2011 c 336 s 281 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The lead agency, after full consultation with the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, shall adopt rules and establish such procedures as the lead agency may determine to be necessary to assure:

(a) That the payments and assistance authorized by this chapter are administered in a manner that is fair and reasonable and as uniform as practicable;

(b) That a displaced person who makes proper application for a payment authorized for that person by this chapter is paid promptly after a move or, in hardship cases, is paid in advance; and

(c) That a displaced person who is aggrieved by a program or project that is under the authority of a state agency or local public agency may have his or her application reviewed by the state agency or local public agency.

(2) The lead agency, after full consultation with the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, may adopt such other rules and procedures, consistent with the provisions of this chapter, as the lead agency deems necessary or appropriate to carry out this chapter.

(3) State agencies and local public agencies shall comply with the rules adopted pursuant to this section by April 2, 1989.

Sec. 7. RCW 15.24.086 and 1994 c 164 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

All such printing contracts provided for in this section ((and RCW 15.24.085)) shall be executed and performed under conditions of employment which shall substantially conform to the laws of this state respecting hours of labor, the minimum wage scale, and the rules and regulations of the department of labor and industries regarding conditions of employment, hours of labor, and minimum wages, and the violation of such provision of any contract shall be ground for cancellation thereof.

Sec. 8. RCW 15.64.060 and 2008 c 215 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A farm-to-school program is created within the department to facilitate increased procurement of Washington grown food by schools.

(2) The department, in consultation with the department of health, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, and Washington State University, shall, in order of priority:

(a) Identify and develop policies and procedures to implement and evaluate the farm-to-school program, including coordinating with school procurement officials, buying cooperatives, and other appropriate organizations to develop uniform procurement procedures and materials, and practical recommendations to facilitate the purchase of Washington grown food by the common schools. These policies, procedures, and recommendations shall be made available to school districts to adopt at their discretion;

(b) Assist food producers, distributors, and food brokers to market Washington grown food to schools by informing them of food procurement opportunities, bid procedures, school purchasing criteria, and other requirements;

(c) Assist schools in connecting with local producers by informing them of the sources and availability of Washington grown food as well as the nutritional, environmental, and economic benefits of purchasing Washington grown food;

(d) Identify and recommend mechanisms that will increase the predictability of sales for producers and the adequacy of supply for purchasers;

(e) Identify and make available existing curricula, programs and publications that educate students on the nutritional, environmental, and economic benefits of preparing and consuming locally grown food;

(f) Support efforts to advance other farm-to-school connections such as school gardens or farms and farm visits; and

(g) As resources allow, seek additional funds to leverage state expenditures.

(3) The department in cooperation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall collect data on the activities conducted pursuant to chapter 215, Laws of 2008 and communicate such data biennially to the appropriate committees of the legislature beginning November 15, 2009. Data collected may include the numbers of schools and farms participating and any increases in the procurement of Washington grown food by the common schools.

(4) As used in this section, RCW ((43.19.1905, 43.19.1906,)) 28A.335.190, and 28A.235.170, "Washington grown" means grown and packed or processed in Washington.

Sec. 9. RCW 15.65.285 and 1972 ex.s. c 112 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The restrictive provisions of chapter ((43.78)) 43.19 RCW((, as now or hereafter amended,)) shall not apply to promotional printing and literature for any commodity board.

Sec. 10. RCW 15.66.280 and 1972 ex.s. c 112 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The restrictive provisions of chapter ((43.78)) 43.19 RCW ((as now or hereafter amended)) shall not apply to promotional printing and literature for any commission formed under this chapter.

Sec. 11. RCW 15.88.070 and 2010 c 8 s 6114 are each amended to read as follows:

The powers and duties of the commission include:

(1) To elect a chair and such officers as the commission deems advisable. The officers shall include a treasurer who is responsible for all receipts and disbursements by the commission and the faithful discharge of whose duties shall be guaranteed by a bond at the sole expense of the commission. The commission shall adopt rules for its own governance, which shall provide for the holding of an annual meeting for the election of officers and transaction of other business and for such other meetings as the commission may direct;

(2) To do all things reasonably necessary to effect the purposes of this chapter. However, the commission shall have no legislative power;

(3) At the pleasure of the commission, to employ and discharge managers, secretaries, agents, attorneys, and employees and to engage the services of independent contractors as the commission deems necessary, to prescribe their duties, and to fix their compensation;

(4) To receive donations of wine from wineries for promotional purposes;

(5) To engage directly or indirectly in the promotion of Washington wine, including without limitation the acquisition in any lawful manner and the dissemination without charge of wine, which dissemination shall not be deemed a sale for any purpose and in which dissemination the commission shall not be deemed a wine producer, supplier, or manufacturer of any kind or the clerk, servant, or agent of a producer, supplier, or manufacturer of any kind. Such dissemination shall be for agricultural development or trade promotion, which may include promotional hosting and shall in the good faith judgment of the commission be in aid of the marketing, advertising, or sale of wine, or of research related to such marketing, advertising, or sale;

(6) To acquire and transfer personal and real property, establish offices, incur expense, enter into contracts (including contracts for creation and printing of promotional literature, which contracts shall not be subject to chapter ((43.78)) 43.19 RCW, but which shall be cancelable by the commission unless performed under conditions of employment which substantially conform to the laws of this state and the rules of the department of labor and industries). The commission may create such debt and other liabilities as may be reasonable for proper discharge of its duties under this chapter;

(7) To maintain such account or accounts with one or more qualified public depositaries as the commission may direct, to cause moneys to be deposited therein, and to expend moneys for purposes authorized by this chapter by drafts made by the commission upon such institutions or by other means;

(8) To cause to be kept and annually closed, in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, accurate records of all receipts, disbursements, and other financial transactions, available for audit by the state auditor;

(9) To create and maintain a list of producers and to disseminate information among and solicit the opinions of producers with respect to the discharge of the duties of the commission, directly or by arrangement with trade associations or other instrumentalities;

(10) To employ, designate as agent, act in concert with, and enter into contracts with any person, council, commission or other entity for the purpose of promoting the general welfare of the vinifera grape industry and particularly for the purpose of assisting in the sale and distribution of Washington wine in domestic and foreign commerce, expending moneys as it may deem necessary or advisable for such purpose and for the purpose of paying its proportionate share of the cost of any program providing direct or indirect assistance to the sale and distribution of Washington wine in domestic or foreign commerce, employing and paying for vendors of professional services of all kinds; and

(11) To sue and be sued as a commission, without individual liability for acts of the commission within the scope of the powers conferred upon it by this chapter.

Sec. 12. RCW 15.89.070 and 2011 c 103 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall:

(1) Elect a chair and officers. The officers must include a treasurer who is responsible for all receipts and disbursements by the commission and the faithful discharge of whose duties shall be guaranteed by a bond at the sole expense of the commission. The commission must adopt rules for its own governance that provide for the holding of an annual meeting for the election of officers and the transaction of other business and for other meetings the commission may direct;

(2) Do all things reasonably necessary to effect the purposes of this chapter. However, the commission has no rule-making power except as provided in this chapter;

(3) Employ and discharge managers, secretaries, agents, attorneys, and employees and engage the services of independent contractors;

(4) Retain, as necessary, the services of private legal counsel to conduct legal actions on behalf of the commission. The retention of a private attorney is subject to review by the office of the attorney general;

(5) Receive donations of beer from producers for promotional purposes under subsections (6) and (7) of this section and for fund-raising purposes under subsection (8) of this section. Donations of beer for promotional purposes may only be disseminated without charge;

(6) Engage directly or indirectly in the promotion of Washington beer, including, without limitation, the acquisition in any lawful manner and the dissemination without charge of beer. This dissemination is not deemed a sale for any purpose and the commission is not deemed a producer, supplier, or manufacturer, or the clerk, servant, or agent of a producer, supplier, distributor, or manufacturer. This dissemination without charge shall be for agricultural development or trade promotion, and not for fund-raising purposes under subsection (8) of this section. Dissemination for promotional purposes may include promotional hosting and must in the good faith judgment of the commission be in the aid of the marketing, advertising, sale of beer, or of research related to such marketing, advertising, or sale;

(7) Promote Washington beer by conducting unique beer tastings without charge;

(8) Beginning July 1, 2007, fund the Washington beer commission through sponsorship of up to twelve beer festivals annually at which beer may be sold to festival participants. For this purpose, the commission would qualify for issue of a special occasion license as an exception to WAC 314-05-020 but must comply with laws under Title 66 RCW and rules adopted by the liquor control board under which such events may be conducted;

(9) Participate in international, federal, state, and local hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the production, regulation, distribution, sale, or use of beer including activities authorized under RCW 42.17A.635, including the reporting of those activities to the public disclosure commission;

(10) Acquire and transfer personal and real property, establish offices, incur expenses, and enter into contracts, including contracts for the creation and printing of promotional literature. The contracts are not subject to chapter ((43.78)) 43.19 RCW, and are cancelable by the commission unless performed under conditions of employment that substantially conform to the laws of this state and the rules of the department of labor and industries. The commission may create debt and other liabilities that are reasonable for proper discharge of its duties under this chapter;

(11) Maintain accounts with one or more qualified public depositories as the commission may direct, for the deposit of money, and expend money for purposes authorized by this chapter by drafts made by the commission upon such institutions or by other means;

(12) Cause to be kept and annually closed, in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, accurate records of all receipts, disbursements, and other financial transactions, available for audit by the state auditor;

(13) Create and maintain a list of producers and disseminate information among and solicit the opinions of producers with respect to the discharge of the duties of the commission, directly or by arrangement with trade associations or other instrumentalities;

(14) Employ, designate as an agent, act in concert with, and enter into contracts with any person, council, commission, or other entity to promote the general welfare of the beer industry and particularly to assist in the sale and distribution of Washington beer in domestic and foreign commerce. The commission shall expend money necessary or advisable for this purpose and to pay its proportionate share of the cost of any program providing direct or indirect assistance to the sale and distribution of Washington beer in domestic or foreign commerce, employing and paying for vendors of professional services of all kinds;

(15) Sue and be sued as a commission, without individual liability for acts of the commission within the scope of the powers conferred upon it by this chapter;

(16) Serve as liaison with the liquor control board on behalf of the commission and not for any individual producer;

(17) Receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the commission and expend the same or any income therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

Sec. 13. RCW 15.100.080 and 2010 c 8 s 6115 are each amended to read as follows:

The powers and duties of the commission include:

(1) To elect a chair and such officers as the commission deems advisable. The commission shall adopt rules for its own governance, which provide for the holding of an annual meeting for the election of officers and transaction of other business and for such other meetings as the commission may direct;

(2) To adopt any rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, in conformance with chapter 34.05 RCW;

(3) To administer and do all things reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(4) At the pleasure of the commission, to employ a treasurer who is responsible for all receipts and disbursements by the commission and the faithful discharge of whose duties shall be guaranteed by a bond at the sole expense of the commission;

(5) At the pleasure of the commission, to employ and discharge managers, secretaries, agents, attorneys, and employees and to engage the services of independent contractors as the commission deems necessary, to prescribe their duties, and to fix their compensation;

(6) To engage directly or indirectly in the promotion of Washington forest products and managed forests, and shall in the good faith judgment of the commission be in aid of the marketing, advertising, or sale of forest products, or of research related to such marketing, advertising, or sale of forest products, or of research related to managed forests;

(7) To enforce the provisions of this chapter, including investigating and prosecuting violations of this chapter;

(8) To acquire and transfer personal and real property, establish offices, incur expense, and enter into contracts. Contracts for creation and printing of promotional literature are not subject to chapter ((43.78)) 43.19 RCW, but such contracts may be canceled by the commission unless performed under conditions of employment which substantially conform to the laws of this state and the rules of the department of labor and industries. The commission may create such debt and other liabilities as may be reasonable for proper discharge of its duties under this chapter;

(9) To maintain such account or accounts with one or more qualified public depositaries as the commission may direct, to cause moneys to be deposited therein, and to expend moneys for purposes authorized by this chapter by drafts made by the commission upon such institutions or by other means;

(10) To cause to be kept and annually closed, in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, accurate records of all receipts, disbursements, and other financial transactions, available for audit by the state auditor;

(11) To create and maintain a list of producers and to disseminate information among and solicit the opinions of producers with respect to the discharge of the duties of the commission, directly or by arrangement with trade associations or other instrumentalities;

(12) To employ, designate as agent, act in concert with, and enter into contracts with any person, council, commission, or other entity for the purpose of promoting the general welfare of the forest products industry and particularly for the purpose of assisting in the sale and distribution of Washington forest products in domestic and foreign commerce, expending moneys as it may deem necessary or advisable for such purpose and for the purpose of paying its proportionate share of the cost of any program providing direct or indirect assistance to the sale and distribution of Washington forest products in domestic or foreign commerce, and employing and paying for vendors of professional services of all kinds;

(13) To sue and be sued as a commission, without individual liability for acts of the commission within the scope of the powers conferred upon it by this chapter;

(14) To propose assessment levels for producers subject to referendum approval under RCW 15.100.110; and

(15) To participate in federal and state agency hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the regulation, production, manufacture, distribution, sale, or use of forest products.

Sec. 14. RCW 15.115.180 and 2009 c 33 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The restrictive provisions of chapter ((43.78)) 43.19 RCW do not apply to promotional printing and literature for the commission.

(2) All promotional printing contracts entered into by the commission must be executed and performed under conditions of employment that substantially conform to the laws of this state respecting hours of labor, the minimum wage scale, and the rules and regulations of the department of labor and industries regarding conditions of employment, hours of labor, and minimum wages, and the violation of such a provision of any contract is grounds for cancellation of the contract.

Sec. 15. RCW 17.15.020 and 1997 c 357 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Each of the following state agencies or institutions shall implement integrated pest management practices when carrying out the agency's or institution's duties related to pest control:

(1) The department of agriculture;

(2) The state noxious weed control board;

(3) The department of ecology;

(4) The department of fish and wildlife;

(5) The department of transportation;

(6) The parks and recreation commission;

(7) The department of natural resources;

(8) The department of corrections;

(9) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services; and

(10) Each state institution of higher education, for the institution's own building and grounds maintenance.

Sec. 16. RCW 19.27.097 and 2010 c 271 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each applicant for a building permit of a building necessitating potable water shall provide evidence of an adequate water supply for the intended use of the building. Evidence may be in the form of a water right permit from the department of ecology, a letter from an approved water purveyor stating the ability to provide water, or another form sufficient to verify the existence of an adequate water supply. In addition to other authorities, the county or city may impose conditions on building permits requiring connection to an existing public water system where the existing system is willing and able to provide safe and reliable potable water to the applicant with reasonable economy and efficiency. An application for a water right shall not be sufficient proof of an adequate water supply.

(2) Within counties not required or not choosing to plan pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040, the county and the state may mutually determine those areas in the county in which the requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply. The departments of health and ecology shall coordinate on the implementation of this section. Should the county and the state fail to mutually determine those areas to be designated pursuant to this subsection, the county may petition the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services to mediate or, if necessary, make the determination.

(3) Buildings that do not need potable water facilities are exempt from the provisions of this section. The department of ecology, after consultation with local governments, may adopt rules to implement this section, which may recognize differences between high-growth and low-growth counties.

Sec. 17. RCW 19.27.150 and 2010 c 271 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

Every month a copy of the United States department of commerce, bureau of the census' "report of building or zoning permits issued and local public construction" or equivalent report shall be transmitted by the governing bodies of counties and cities to the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services.

Sec. 18. RCW 19.27A.020 and 2010 c 271 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state building code council shall adopt rules to be known as the Washington state energy code as part of the state building code.

(2) The council shall follow the legislature's standards set forth in this section to adopt rules to be known as the Washington state energy code. The Washington state energy code shall be designed to:

(a) Construct increasingly energy efficient homes and buildings that help achieve the broader goal of building zero fossil-fuel greenhouse gas emission homes and buildings by the year 2031;

(b) Require new buildings to meet a certain level of energy efficiency, but allow flexibility in building design, construction, and heating equipment efficiencies within that framework; and

(c) Allow space heating equipment efficiency to offset or substitute for building envelope thermal performance.

(3) The Washington state energy code shall take into account regional climatic conditions. Climate zone 1 shall include all counties not included in climate zone 2. Climate zone 2 includes: Adams, Chelan, Douglas, Ferry, Grant, Kittitas, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pend Oreille, Spokane, Stevens, and Whitman counties.

(4) The Washington state energy code for residential buildings shall be the 2006 edition of the Washington state energy code, or as amended by rule by the council.

(5) The minimum state energy code for new nonresidential buildings shall be the Washington state energy code, 2006 edition, or as amended by the council by rule.

(6)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the Washington state energy code for residential structures shall preempt the residential energy code of each city, town, and county in the state of Washington.

(b) The state energy code for residential structures does not preempt a city, town, or county's energy code for residential structures which exceeds the requirements of the state energy code and which was adopted by the city, town, or county prior to March 1, 1990. Such cities, towns, or counties may not subsequently amend their energy code for residential structures to exceed the requirements adopted prior to March 1, 1990.

(7) The state building code council shall consult with the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services as provided in RCW 34.05.310 prior to publication of proposed rules. The director of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall recommend to the state building code council any changes necessary to conform the proposed rules to the requirements of this section.

(8) The state building code council shall evaluate and consider adoption of the international energy conservation code in Washington state in place of the existing state energy code.

(9) The definitions in RCW 19.27A.140 apply throughout this section.

Sec. 19. RCW 19.27A.190 and 2009 c 423 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The requirements of this section apply to the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services and other qualifying state agencies only to the extent that specific appropriations are provided to those agencies referencing chapter 423, Laws of 2009 or chapter number and this section.

(2) By July 1, 2010, each qualifying public agency shall:

(a) Create an energy benchmark for each reporting public facility using a portfolio manager;

(b) Report to ((general administration)) the department of enterprise services, the environmental protection agency national energy performance rating for each reporting public facility included in the technical requirements for this rating; and

(c) Link all portfolio manager accounts to the state portfolio manager master account to facilitate public reporting.

(3) By January 1, 2010, ((general administration)) the department of enterprise services shall establish a state portfolio manager master account. The account must be designed to provide shared reporting for all reporting public facilities.

(4) By July 1, 2010, ((general administration)) the department of enterprise services shall select a standardized portfolio manager report for reporting public facilities. ((General administration)) The department of enterprise services, in collaboration with the United States environmental protection agency, shall make the standard report of each reporting public facility available to the public through the portfolio manager web site.

(5) ((General administration)) The department of enterprise services shall prepare a biennial report summarizing the statewide portfolio manager master account reporting data. The first report must be completed by December 1, 2012. Subsequent reporting shall be completed every two years thereafter.

(6) By July 1, 2010, ((general administration)) the department of enterprise services shall develop a technical assistance program to facilitate the implementation of a preliminary audit and the investment grade energy audit. ((General administration)) The department of enterprise services shall design the technical assistance program to utilize audit services provided by utilities or energy services contracting companies when possible.

(7) For a reporting public facility that is leased by the state with a national energy performance rating score below seventy-five, a qualifying public agency may not enter into a new lease or lease renewal on or after January 1, 2010, unless:

(a) A preliminary audit has been conducted within the last two years; and

(b) The owner or lessor agrees to perform an investment grade audit and implement any cost-effective energy conservation measures within the first two years of the lease agreement if the preliminary audit has identified potential cost-effective energy conservation measures.

(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, for each reporting public facility with a national energy performance rating score below fifty, the qualifying public agency, in consultation with ((general administration)) the department of enterprise services, shall undertake a preliminary energy audit by July 1, 2011. If potential cost-effective energy savings are identified, an investment grade energy audit must be completed by July 1, 2013. Implementation of cost-effective energy conservation measures are required by July 1, 2016. For a major facility that is leased by a state agency, college, or university, energy audits and implementation of cost-effective energy conservation measures are required only for that portion of the facility that is leased by the state agency, college, or university.

(b) A reporting public facility that is leased by the state is deemed in compliance with (a) of this subsection if the qualifying public agency has already complied with the requirements of subsection (7) of this section.

(9) Schools are strongly encouraged to follow the provisions in subsections (2) through (8) of this section.

(10) The director of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, in consultation with the affected state agencies and the office of financial management, shall review the cost and delivery of agency programs to determine the viability of relocation when a facility leased by the state has a national energy performance rating score below fifty. The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall establish a process to determine viability.

(11) ((General administration)) The department of enterprise services, in consultation with the office of financial management, shall develop a waiver process for the requirements in subsection (7) of this section. The director of the office of financial management, in consultation with ((general administration)) the department of enterprise services, may waive the requirements in subsection (7) of this section if the director determines that compliance is not cost-effective or feasible. The director of the office of financial management shall consider the review conducted by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services on the viability of relocation as established in subsection (10) of this section, if applicable, prior to waiving the requirements in subsection (7) of this section.

(12) By July 1, 2011, ((general administration)) the department of enterprise services shall conduct a review of facilities not covered by the national energy performance rating. Based on this review, ((general administration)) the department of enterprise services shall develop a portfolio of additional facilities that require preliminary energy audits. For these facilities, the qualifying public agency, in consultation with ((general administration)) the department of enterprise services, shall undertake a preliminary energy audit by July 1, 2012. If potential cost-effective energy savings are identified, an investment grade energy audit must be completed by July 1, 2013.

Sec. 20. RCW 19.34.100 and 1999 c 287 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To obtain or retain a license, a certification authority must:

(a) Provide proof of identity to the secretary;

(b) Employ only certified operative personnel in appropriate positions;

(c) File with the secretary an appropriate, suitable guaranty, unless the certification authority is a city or county that is self-insured or the department of ((information services)) enterprise services;

(d) Use a trustworthy system;

(e) Maintain an office in this state or have established a registered agent for service of process in this state; and

(f) Comply with all further licensing and practice requirements established by rule by the secretary.

(2) The secretary may by rule create license classifications according to specified limitations, and the secretary may issue licenses restricted according to the limits of each classification.

(3) The secretary may impose license restrictions specific to the practices of an individual certification authority. The secretary shall set forth in writing and maintain as part of the certification authority's license application file the basis for such license restrictions.

(4) The secretary may revoke or suspend a certification authority's license, in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, for failure to comply with this chapter or for failure to remain qualified under subsection (1) of this section. The secretary may order the summary suspension of a license pending proceedings for revocation or other action, which must be promptly instituted and determined, if the secretary includes within a written order a finding that the certification authority has either:

(a) Utilized its license in the commission of a violation of a state or federal criminal statute or of chapter 19.86 RCW; or

(b) Engaged in conduct giving rise to a serious risk of loss to public or private parties if the license is not immediately suspended.

(5) The secretary may recognize by rule the licensing or authorization of certification authorities by other governmental entities, in whole or in part, provided that those licensing or authorization requirements are substantially similar to those of this state. If licensing by another government is so recognized:

(a) RCW 19.34.300 through 19.34.350 apply to certificates issued by the certification authorities licensed or authorized by that government in the same manner as it applies to licensed certification authorities of this state; and

(b) The liability limits of RCW 19.34.280 apply to the certification authorities licensed or authorized by that government in the same manner as they apply to licensed certification authorities of this state.

(6) A certification authority that has not obtained a license is not subject to the provisions of this chapter, except as specifically provided.

Sec. 21. RCW 19.285.060 and 2007 c 1 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a qualifying utility that fails to comply with the energy conservation or renewable energy targets established in RCW 19.285.040 shall pay an administrative penalty to the state of Washington in the amount of fifty dollars for each megawatt-hour of shortfall. Beginning in 2007, this penalty shall be adjusted annually according to the rate of change of the inflation indicator, gross domestic product-implicit price deflator, as published by the bureau of economic analysis of the United States department of commerce or its successor.

(2) A qualifying utility that does not meet an annual renewable energy target established in RCW 19.285.040(2) is exempt from the administrative penalty in subsection (1) of this section for that year if the commission for investor-owned utilities or the auditor for all other qualifying utilities determines that the utility complied with RCW 19.285.040(2) (d) or (i) or 19.285.050(1).

(3) A qualifying utility must notify its retail electric customers in published form within three months of incurring a penalty regarding the size of the penalty and the reason it was incurred.

(4) The commission shall determine if an investor-owned utility may recover the cost of this administrative penalty in electric rates, and may consider providing positive incentives for an investor-owned utility to exceed the targets established in RCW 19.285.040.

(5) Administrative penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited into the energy independence act special account which is hereby created. All receipts from administrative penalties collected under this chapter must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purchase of renewable energy credits or for energy conservation projects at public facilities, local government facilities, community colleges, or state universities. The state shall own and retire any renewable energy credits purchased using moneys from the account. Only the director of ((general administration)) enterprise services or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(6) For a qualifying utility that is an investor-owned utility, the commission shall determine compliance with the provisions of this chapter and assess penalties for noncompliance as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

(7) For qualifying utilities that are not investor-owned utilities, the auditor is responsible for auditing compliance with this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter that apply to those utilities and the attorney general is responsible for enforcing that compliance.

Sec. 22. RCW 27.34.075 and 1994 c 82 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of chapter ((43.78)) 43.19 RCW shall not apply to the printing of educational publications of the state historical societies.

Sec. 23. RCW 27.34.410 and 2007 c 333 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The heritage barn preservation fund is created as an account in the state treasury. All receipts from appropriations and private sources must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only to provide assistance to owners of heritage barns in Washington state in the stabilization and restoration of their barns so that these historic properties may continue to serve the community.

(2) The department shall minimize the amount of funds that are used for program administration, which shall include consultation with the department of ((general administration's)) enterprise services' barrier-free facilities program for input regarding accessibility for people with disabilities where public access to historic barns is permitted.

(3) The primary public benefit of funding through the heritage barn preservation program is the preservation and enhancement of significant historic properties that provide economic benefit to the state's citizens and enrich communities throughout the state.

Sec. 24. RCW 27.48.040 and 1999 c 343 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this section.

(a) "State capitol group" includes the legislative building, the insurance building, the Cherberg building, the John L. O'Brien building, the Newhouse building, and the temple of justice building.

(b) "Historic furnishings" means furniture, fixtures, and artwork fifty years of age or older.

(2) The capitol furnishings preservation committee is established to promote and encourage the recovery and preservation of the original and historic furnishings of the state capitol group, prevent future loss of historic furnishings, and review and advise future remodeling and restoration projects as they pertain to historic furnishings. The committee's authority does not extend to the placement of any historic furnishings within the state capitol group.

(3) The capitol furnishings preservation committee account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts designated for the account from appropriations and from other sources must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only to finance the activities of the capitol furnishings preservation committee. Only the director of the Washington state historical society or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account when authorized to do so by the committee. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(4) The committee may:

(a) Authorize the director of the Washington state historical society or the director's designee to expend funds from the capitol furnishings preservation committee account for limited purposes of purchasing and preserving historic furnishings of the state capitol group;

(b) Accept monetary donations, grants, and donations of historic furnishings from, but not limited to, (i) current and former legislators, state officials, and lobbyists; (ii) the families of former legislators, state officials, and lobbyists; and (iii) the general public. Moneys received under this section must be deposited in the capitol furnishings preservation committee account; and

(c) Engage in or encourage fund-raising activities including the solicitation of charitable gifts, grants, or donations specifically for the limited purpose of the recovery of the original and historic furnishings.

(5) The membership of the committee shall include: Two members of the house of representatives, one from each major caucus, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; two members of the senate, one from each major caucus, appointed by the president of the senate; the chief clerk of the house of representatives; the secretary of the senate; the governor or the governor's designee; the lieutenant governor or the lieutenant governor's designee; a representative from the office of the secretary of state, the office of the state treasurer, the office of the state auditor, and the office of the insurance commissioner; a representative from the supreme court; a representative from the Washington state historical society, the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, and the Thurston county planning council, each appointed by the governor; and three private citizens, appointed by the governor.

(6) Original or historic furnishings from the state capitol group are not surplus property under chapter 43.19 RCW or other authority unless designated as such by the committee.

Sec. 25. RCW 28A.150.530 and 2006 c 263 s 326 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In adopting implementation rules, the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, shall review and modify the current requirement for an energy conservation report review by the department of ((general administration as provided in WAC 180-27-075)) enterprise services.

(2) In adopting implementation rules, the superintendent of public instruction shall:

(a) Review and modify the current requirements for value engineering, constructibility review, and building commissioning ((as provided in WAC 180-27-080));

(b) Review private and public utility providers' capacity and financial/technical assistance programs for affected public school districts to monitor and report utility consumption for purposes of reporting to the superintendent of public instruction as provided in RCW 39.35D.040;

(c) Coordinate with the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, the state board of health, the department of ecology, federal agencies, and other affected agencies as appropriate in their consideration of rules to implement this section.

Sec. 26. RCW 28A.335.300 and 1991 c 297 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Every school board of directors shall consider the purchase of playground matting manufactured from shredded waste tires in undertaking construction or maintenance of playgrounds. The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall upon request assist in the development of product specifications and vendor identification.

Sec. 27. RCW 28B.10.417 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section applies only to those persons who are first employed by a higher education institution in a position eligible for participation in an annuity or retirement program under RCW 28B.10.400 prior to July 1, 2011.

(2) A faculty member or other employee exempt from civil service pursuant to RCW 41.06.070 (1)(((cc))) (z) and (2) designated by the board of trustees of the applicable regional university or of The Evergreen State College as being subject to an annuity or retirement income plan and who, at the time of such designation, is a member of the Washington state teachers' retirement system, shall retain credit for such service in the Washington state teachers' retirement system and, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, shall leave his or her accumulated contributions in the teachers' retirement fund. Upon his or her attaining eligibility for retirement under the Washington state teachers' retirement system, such faculty member or other employee shall receive from the Washington state teachers' retirement system a retirement allowance consisting of an annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his or her accumulated contributions at his or her age when becoming eligible for such retirement and a pension for each year of creditable service established and retained at the time of said designation as provided in RCW 41.32.497. Anyone who on July 1, 1967, was receiving pension payments from the teachers' retirement system based on thirty-five years of creditable service shall thereafter receive a pension based on the total years of creditable service established with the retirement system: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That any such faculty member or other employee exempt from civil service pursuant to RCW 41.06.070 (1)(((cc))) (z) and (2) who, upon attainment of eligibility for retirement under the Washington state teachers' retirement system, is still engaged in public educational employment, shall not be eligible to receive benefits under the Washington state teachers' retirement system until he or she ceases such public educational employment. Any retired faculty member or other employee who enters service in any public educational institution shall cease to receive pension payments while engaged in such service: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such service may be rendered up to seventy-five days in a school year without reduction of pension.

(3) A faculty member or other exempt employee designated by the board of trustees of the applicable regional university or of The Evergreen State College as being subject to the annuity and retirement income plan and who, at the time of such designation, is a member of the Washington state teachers' retirement system may, at his or her election and at any time, on and after midnight June 10, 1959, terminate his or her membership in the Washington state teachers' retirement system and withdraw his or her accumulated contributions and interest in the teachers' retirement fund upon written application to the board of trustees of the Washington state teachers' retirement system. Faculty members or other employees who withdraw their accumulated contributions, on and after the date of withdrawal of contributions, shall no longer be members of the Washington state teachers' retirement system and shall forfeit all rights of membership, including pension benefits, theretofore acquired under the Washington state teachers' retirement system.

Sec. 28. RCW 35.21.779 and 1995 c 399 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In cities or towns where the estimated value of state-owned facilities constitutes ten percent or more of the total assessed valuation, the state agency or institution owning the facilities shall contract with the city or town to pay an equitable share for fire protection services. The contract shall be negotiated as provided in subsections (2) through (6) of this section and shall provide for payment by the agency or institution to the city or town.

(2) A city or town seeking to enter into fire protection contract negotiations shall provide written notification to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce and the state agencies or institutions that own property within the jurisdiction, of its intent to contract for fire protection services. Where there are multiple state agencies located within a single jurisdiction, a city may choose to notify only the department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce, which in turn shall notify the agencies or institution that own property within the jurisdiction of the city's intent to contract for fire protection services. Any such notification shall be based on the valuation procedures, based on commonly accepted standards, adopted by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce in consultation with the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services and the association of Washington cities.

(3) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce shall review any such notification to ensure that the valuation procedures and results are accurate. The department will notify each affected city or town and state agency or institution of the results of their review within thirty days of receipt of notification.

(4) The parties negotiating fire protection contracts under this section shall conduct those negotiations in good faith. Whenever there are multiple state agencies located within a single jurisdiction, every effort shall be made by the state to consolidate negotiations on behalf of all affected agencies.

(5) In the event of notification by one of the parties that an agreement cannot be reached on the terms and conditions of a fire protection contract, the director of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce shall mediate a resolution of the disagreement. In the event of a continued impasse, the director of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce shall recommend a resolution.

(6) If the parties reject the recommendation of the director and an impasse continues, the director shall direct the parties to arbitration. The parties shall agree on a neutral arbitrator, and the fees and expenses of the arbitrator shall be shared equally between the parties. The arbitration shall be a final offer, total arbitration, with the arbitrator empowered only to pick the final offer of one of the parties or the recommended resolution by the director of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce. The decision of the arbitrator shall be final, binding, and nonappealable on the parties.

(7) The provisions of this section shall not apply if a city or town and a state agency or institution have contracted pursuant to RCW 35.21.775.

(8) The provisions of this section do not apply to cities and towns not meeting the conditions in subsection (1) of this section. Cities and towns not meeting the conditions of subsection (1) of this section may enter into contracts pursuant to RCW 35.21.775.

Sec. 29. RCW 35.68.076 and 1989 c 175 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act, adopt several suggested model design, construction, or location standards to aid counties, cities, and towns in constructing curb ramps to allow reasonable access to the crosswalk for ((physically handicapped)) persons with physical disabilities without uniquely endangering blind persons. The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall consult with ((handicapped)) persons with physical disabilities, blind persons, counties, cities, and the state building code council in adopting the suggested standards.

Sec. 30. RCW 35A.65.010 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.65.010 are each amended to read as follows:

All printing, binding and stationery work done for any code city shall be done within the state and all proposals, requests and invitations to submit bids, prices or contracts thereon and all contracts for such work shall so stipulate subject to the limitations contained in RCW ((43.78.130)) 43.19.748 and 35.23.352.

Sec. 31. RCW 36.28A.070 and 2003 c 102 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs in consultation with the Washington state emergency management office, the Washington association of county officials, the Washington association of cities, the ((information services board)) office of the chief information officer, the Washington state fire chiefs' association, and the Washington state patrol shall convene a committee to establish guidelines related to the statewide first responder building mapping information system. The committee shall have the following responsibilities:

(a) Develop the type of information to be included in the statewide first responder building mapping information system. The information shall include, but is not limited to: Floor plans, fire protection information, evacuation plans, utility information, known hazards, and text and digital images showing emergency personnel contact information;

(b) Develop building mapping software standards that must be utilized by all entities participating in the statewide first responder building mapping information system;

(c) Determine the order in which buildings shall be mapped when funding is received;

(d) Develop guidelines on how the information shall be made available. These guidelines shall include detailed procedures and security systems to ensure that the information is only made available to the government entity that either owns the building or is responding to an incident at the building;

(e) Recommend training guidelines regarding using the statewide first responder building mapping information system to the criminal justice training commission and the Washington state patrol fire protection bureau.

(2)(a) Nothing in this section supersedes the authority of the ((information services board)) office of the chief information officer under chapter ((43.105)) 43.41A RCW.

(b) Nothing in this section supersedes the authority of state agencies and local governments to control and maintain access to information within their independent systems.

Sec. 32. RCW 39.04.155 and 2009 c 74 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section provides uniform small works roster provisions to award contracts for construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration, repair, or improvement of real property that may be used by state agencies and by any local government that is expressly authorized to use these provisions. These provisions may be used in lieu of other procedures to award contracts for such work with an estimated cost of three hundred thousand dollars or less. The small works roster process includes the limited public works process authorized under subsection (3) of this section and any local government authorized to award contracts using the small works roster process under this section may award contracts using the limited public works process under subsection (3) of this section.

(2)(a) A state agency or authorized local government may create a single general small works roster, or may create a small works roster for different specialties or categories of anticipated work. Where applicable, small works rosters may make distinctions between contractors based upon different geographic areas served by the contractor. The small works roster or rosters shall consist of all responsible contractors who have requested to be on the list, and where required by law are properly licensed or registered to perform such work in this state. A state agency or local government establishing a small works roster or rosters may require eligible contractors desiring to be placed on a roster or rosters to keep current records of any applicable licenses, certifications, registrations, bonding, insurance, or other appropriate matters on file with the state agency or local government as a condition of being placed on a roster or rosters. At least once a year, the state agency or local government shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction a notice of the existence of the roster or rosters and solicit the names of contractors for such roster or rosters. In addition, responsible contractors shall be added to an appropriate roster or rosters at any time they submit a written request and necessary records. Master contracts may be required to be signed that become effective when a specific award is made using a small works roster.

(b) A state agency establishing a small works roster or rosters shall adopt rules implementing this subsection. A local government establishing a small works roster or rosters shall adopt an ordinance or resolution implementing this subsection. Procedures included in rules adopted by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services in implementing this subsection must be included in any rules providing for a small works roster or rosters that is adopted by another state agency, if the authority for that state agency to engage in these activities has been delegated to it by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services under chapter 43.19 RCW. An interlocal contract or agreement between two or more state agencies or local governments establishing a small works roster or rosters to be used by the parties to the agreement or contract must clearly identify the lead entity that is responsible for implementing the provisions of this subsection.

(c) Procedures shall be established for securing telephone, written, or electronic quotations from contractors on the appropriate small works roster to assure that a competitive price is established and to award contracts to the lowest responsible bidder, as defined in RCW 39.04.010. Invitations for quotations shall include an estimate of the scope and nature of the work to be performed as well as materials and equipment to be furnished. However, detailed plans and specifications need not be included in the invitation. This subsection does not eliminate other requirements for architectural or engineering approvals as to quality and compliance with building codes. Quotations may be invited from all appropriate contractors on the appropriate small works roster. As an alternative, quotations may be invited from at least five contractors on the appropriate small works roster who have indicated the capability of performing the kind of work being contracted, in a manner that will equitably distribute the opportunity among the contractors on the appropriate roster. However, if the estimated cost of the work is from one hundred fifty thousand dollars to three hundred thousand dollars, a state agency or local government that chooses to solicit bids from less than all the appropriate contractors on the appropriate small works roster must also notify the remaining contractors on the appropriate small works roster that quotations on the work are being sought. The government has the sole option of determining whether this notice to the remaining contractors is made by: (i) Publishing notice in a legal newspaper in general circulation in the area where the work is to be done; (ii) mailing a notice to these contractors; or (iii) sending a notice to these contractors by facsimile or other electronic means. For purposes of this subsection (2)(c), "equitably distribute" means that a state agency or local government soliciting bids may not favor certain contractors on the appropriate small works roster over other contractors on the appropriate small works roster who perform similar services.

(d) A contract awarded from a small works roster under this section need not be advertised.

(e) Immediately after an award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be recorded, open to public inspection, and available by telephone inquiry.

(3) In lieu of awarding contracts under subsection (2) of this section, a state agency or authorized local government may award a contract for work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement projects estimated to cost less than thirty-five thousand dollars using the limited public works process provided under this subsection. Public works projects awarded under this subsection are exempt from the other requirements of the small works roster process provided under subsection (2) of this section and are exempt from the requirement that contracts be awarded after advertisement as provided under RCW 39.04.010.

For limited public works projects, a state agency or authorized local government shall solicit electronic or written quotations from a minimum of three contractors from the appropriate small works roster and shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder as defined under RCW 39.04.010. After an award is made, the quotations shall be open to public inspection and available by electronic request. A state agency or authorized local government shall attempt to distribute opportunities for limited public works projects equitably among contractors willing to perform in the geographic area of the work. A state agency or authorized local government shall maintain a list of the contractors contacted and the contracts awarded during the previous twenty-four months under the limited public works process, including the name of the contractor, the contractor's registration number, the amount of the contract, a brief description of the type of work performed, and the date the contract was awarded. For limited public works projects, a state agency or authorized local government may waive the payment and performance bond requirements of chapter 39.08 RCW and the retainage requirements of chapter 60.28 RCW, thereby assuming the liability for the contractor's nonpayment of laborers, mechanics, subcontractors, materialpersons, suppliers, and taxes imposed under Title 82 RCW that may be due from the contractor for the limited public works project, however the state agency or authorized local government shall have the right of recovery against the contractor for any payments made on the contractor's behalf.

(4) The breaking of any project into units or accomplishing any projects by phases is prohibited if it is done for the purpose of avoiding the maximum dollar amount of a contract that may be let using the small works roster process or limited public works process.

(5)(a) A state agency or authorized local government may use the limited public works process of subsection (3) of this section to solicit and award small works roster contracts to small businesses that are registered contractors with gross revenues under one million dollars annually as reported on their federal tax return.

(b) A state agency or authorized local government may adopt additional procedures to encourage small businesses that are registered contractors with gross revenues under two hundred fifty thousand dollars annually as reported on their federal tax returns to submit quotations or bids on small works roster contracts.

(6) As used in this section, "state agency" means the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, the state parks and recreation commission, the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of transportation, any institution of higher education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016, and any other state agency delegated authority by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services to engage in construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration, improvement, or repair activities.

Sec. 33. RCW 39.04.220 and 1996 c 18 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to currently authorized methods of public works contracting, and in lieu of the requirements of RCW 39.04.010 and 39.04.020 through 39.04.060, capital projects funded for over ten million dollars authorized by the legislature for the department of corrections to construct or repair facilities may be accomplished under contract using the general contractor/construction manager method described in this section. In addition, the general contractor/construction manager method may be used for up to two demonstration projects under ten million dollars for the department of corrections. Each demonstration project shall aggregate capital projects authorized by the legislature at a single site to total no less than three million dollars with the approval of the office of financial management. The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall present its plan for the aggregation of projects under each demonstration project to the oversight advisory committee established under subsection (2) of this section prior to soliciting proposals for general contractor/construction manager services for the demonstration project.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "general contractor/construction manager" means a firm with which the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services has selected and negotiated a maximum allowable construction cost to be guaranteed by the firm, after competitive selection through a formal advertisement, and competitive bids to provide services during the design phase that may include life-cycle cost design considerations, value engineering, scheduling, cost estimating, constructability, alternative construction options for cost savings, and sequencing of work, and to act as the construction manager and general contractor during the construction phase. The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall establish an independent oversight advisory committee with representatives of interest groups with an interest in this subject area, the department of corrections, and the private sector, to review selection and contracting procedures and contracting documents. The oversight advisory committee shall discuss and review the progress of the demonstration projects. The general contractor/construction manager method is limited to projects authorized on or before July 1, 1997.

(3) Contracts for the services of a general contractor/construction manager awarded under the authority of this section shall be awarded through a competitive process requiring the public solicitation of proposals for general contractor/construction manager services. Minority and women enterprise total project goals shall be specified in the bid instructions to the general contractor/construction manager finalists. The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services is authorized to include an incentive clause in any contract awarded under this section for savings of either time or cost or both from that originally negotiated. No incentives granted shall exceed five percent of the maximum allowable construction cost. The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services or his or her designee shall establish a committee to evaluate the proposals considering such factors as: Ability of professional personnel; past performance in negotiated and complex projects; ability to meet time and budget requirements; location; recent, current, and projected workloads of the firm; and the concept of their proposal. After the committee has selected the most qualified finalists, these finalists shall submit sealed bids for the percent fee, which is the percentage amount to be earned by the general contractor/construction manager as overhead and profit, on the estimated maximum allowable construction cost and the fixed amount for the detailed specified general conditions work. The maximum allowable construction cost may be negotiated between the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services and the selected firm after the scope of the project is adequately determined to establish a guaranteed contract cost for which the general contractor/construction manager will provide a performance and payment bond. The guaranteed contract cost includes the fixed amount for the detailed specified general conditions work, the negotiated maximum allowable construction cost, the percent fee on the negotiated maximum allowable construction cost, and sales tax. If the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services is unable to negotiate a satisfactory maximum allowable construction cost with the firm selected that the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services determines to be fair, reasonable, and within the available funds, negotiations with that firm shall be formally terminated and the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall negotiate with the next low bidder and continue until an agreement is reached or the process is terminated. If the maximum allowable construction cost varies more than fifteen percent from the bid estimated maximum allowable construction cost due to requested and approved changes in the scope by the state, the percent fee shall be renegotiated. All subcontract work shall be competitively bid with public bid openings. Specific contract requirements for women and minority enterprise participation shall be specified in each subcontract bid package that exceeds ten percent of the department's estimated project cost. All subcontractors who bid work over two hundred thousand dollars shall post a bid bond and the awarded subcontractor shall provide a performance and payment bond for their contract amount if required by the general contractor/construction manager. A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project. Bidding on subcontract work by the general contractor/construction manager or its subsidiaries is prohibited. The general contractor/construction manager may negotiate with the low-responsive bidder only in accordance with RCW 39.04.015 or, if unsuccessful in such negotiations, rebid.

(4) If the project is completed for less than the agreed upon maximum allowable construction cost, any savings not otherwise negotiated as part of an incentive clause shall accrue to the state. If the project is completed for more than the agreed upon maximum allowable construction cost, excepting increases due to any contract change orders approved by the state, the additional cost shall be the responsibility of the general contractor/construction manager.

(5) The powers and authority conferred by this section shall be construed as in addition and supplemental to powers or authority conferred by any other law, and nothing contained in this section may be construed as limiting any other powers or authority of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services. However, all actions taken pursuant to the powers and authority granted to the director or the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services under this section may only be taken with the concurrence of the department of corrections.

Sec. 34. RCW 39.04.290 and 2001 c 34 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A state agency or local government may award contracts of any value for the design, fabrication, and installation of building engineering systems by: (a) Using a competitive bidding process or request for proposals process where bidders are required to provide final specifications and a bid price for the design, fabrication, and installation of building engineering systems, with the final specifications being approved by an appropriate design, engineering, and/or public regulatory body; or (b) using a competitive bidding process where bidders are required to provide final specifications for the final design, fabrication, and installation of building engineering systems as part of a larger project with the final specifications for the building engineering systems portion of the project being approved by an appropriate design, engineering, and/or public regulatory body. The provisions of chapter 39.80 RCW do not apply to the design of building engineering systems that are included as part of a contract described under this section.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Building engineering systems" means those systems where contracts for the systems customarily have been awarded with a requirement that the contractor provide final approved specifications, including fire alarm systems, building sprinkler systems, pneumatic tube systems, extensions of heating, ventilation, or air conditioning control systems, chlorination and chemical feed systems, emergency generator systems, building signage systems, pile foundations, and curtain wall systems.

(b) "Local government" means any county, city, town, school district, or other special district, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation.

(c) "State agency" means the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, the state parks and recreation commission, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of natural resources, any institution of higher education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016, and any other state agency delegated authority by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services to engage in building, renovation, remodeling, alteration, improvement, or repair activities.

Sec. 35. RCW 39.04.320 and 2009 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) through (d) of this subsection, from January 1, 2005, and thereafter, for all public works estimated to cost one million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(b)(i) This section does not apply to contracts advertised for bid before July 1, 2007, for any public works by the department of transportation.

(ii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2007, and before July 1, 2008, for all public works by the department of transportation estimated to cost five million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than ten percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(iii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2008, and before July 1, 2009, for all public works by the department of transportation estimated to cost three million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than twelve percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(iv) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2009, for all public works by the department of transportation estimated to cost two million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(c)(i) This section does not apply to contracts advertised for bid before January 1, 2008, for any public works by a school district, or to any project funded in whole or in part by bond issues approved before July 1, 2007.

(ii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2008, for all public works by a school district estimated to cost three million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than ten percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(iii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2009, for all public works by a school district estimated to cost two million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than twelve percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(iv) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2010, for all public works by a school district estimated to cost one million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(d)(i) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2010, for all public works by a four-year institution of higher education estimated to cost three million dollars or more, all specifications must require that no less than ten percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(ii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2011, for all public works by a four-year institution of higher education estimated to cost two million dollars or more, all specifications must require that no less than twelve percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(iii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2012, for all public works by a four-year institution of higher education estimated to cost one million dollars or more, all specifications must require that no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(2) Awarding entities may adjust the requirements of this section for a specific project for the following reasons:

(a) The demonstrated lack of availability of apprentices in specific geographic areas;

(b) A disproportionately high ratio of material costs to labor hours, which does not make feasible the required minimum levels of apprentice participation;

(c) Participating contractors have demonstrated a good faith effort to comply with the requirements of RCW 39.04.300 and 39.04.310 and this section; or

(d) Other criteria the awarding entity deems appropriate, which are subject to review by the office of the governor.

(3) The secretary of the department of transportation shall adjust the requirements of this section for a specific project for the following reasons:

(a) The demonstrated lack of availability of apprentices in specific geographic areas; or

(b) A disproportionately high ratio of material costs to labor hours, which does not make feasible the required minimum levels of apprentice participation.

(4) This section applies to public works contracts awarded by the state, to public works contracts awarded by school districts, and to public works contracts awarded by state four-year institutions of higher education. However, this section does not apply to contracts awarded by state agencies headed by a separately elected public official.

(5)(a) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services must provide information and technical assistance to affected agencies and collect the following data from affected agencies for each project covered by this section:

(i) The name of each apprentice and apprentice registration number;

(ii) The name of each project;

(iii) The dollar value of each project;

(iv) The date of the contractor's notice to proceed;

(v) The number of apprentices and labor hours worked by them, categorized by trade or craft;

(vi) The number of journey level workers and labor hours worked by them, categorized by trade or craft; and

(vii) The number, type, and rationale for the exceptions granted under subsection (2) of this section.

(b) The department of labor and industries shall assist the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services in providing information and technical assistance.

(6) The secretary of transportation shall establish an apprenticeship utilization advisory committee, which shall include statewide geographic representation and consist of equal numbers of representatives of contractors and labor. The committee must include at least one member representing contractor businesses with less than thirty-five employees. The advisory committee shall meet regularly with the secretary of transportation to discuss implementation of this section by the department of transportation, including development of the process to be used to adjust the requirements of this section for a specific project. The committee shall provide a report to the legislature by January 1, 2008, on the effects of the apprentice labor requirement on transportation projects and on the availability of apprentice labor and programs statewide.

(7) At the request of the senate labor, commerce, research and development committee, the house of representatives commerce and labor committee, or their successor committees, and the governor, the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services and the department of labor and industries shall compile and summarize the agency data and provide a joint report to both committees. The report shall include recommendations on modifications or improvements to the apprentice utilization program and information on skill shortages in each trade or craft.

Sec. 36. RCW 39.04.330 and 2005 c 12 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of determining compliance with chapter 39.35D RCW, the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall credit the project for using wood products with a credible third party sustainable forest certification or from forests regulated under chapter 76.09 RCW, the Washington forest practices act.

Sec. 37. RCW 39.04.370 and 2010 c 276 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For any public work estimated to cost over one million dollars, the contract must contain a provision requiring the submission of certain information about off-site, prefabricated, nonstandard, project specific items produced under the terms of the contract and produced outside Washington. The information must be submitted to the department of labor and industries under subsection (2) of this section. The information that must be provided is:

(a) The estimated cost of the public works project;

(b) The name of the awarding agency and the title of the public works project;

(c) The contract value of the off-site, prefabricated, nonstandard, project specific items produced outside Washington, including labor and materials; and

(d) The name, address, and federal employer identification number of the contractor that produced the off-site, prefabricated, nonstandard, project specific items.

(2)(a) The required information under this section must be submitted by the contractor or subcontractor as a part of the affidavit of wages paid form filed with the department of labor and industries under RCW 39.12.040. This information is only required to be submitted by the contractor or subcontractor who directly contracted for the off-site, prefabricated, nonstandard, project specific items produced outside Washington.

(b) The department of labor and industries shall include requests for the information about off-site, prefabricated, nonstandard, project specific items produced outside Washington on the affidavit of wages paid form required under RCW 39.12.040.

(c) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall develop standard contract language to meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section and make the language available on its web site.

(d) Failure to submit the information required in subsection (1) of this section as part of the affidavit of wages paid form does not constitute a violation of RCW 39.12.050.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "off-site, prefabricated, nonstandard, project specific items" means products or items that are: (a) Made primarily of architectural or structural precast concrete, fabricated steel, pipe and pipe systems, or sheet metal and sheet metal duct work; (b) produced specifically for the public work and not considered to be regularly available shelf items; (c) produced or manufactured by labor expended to assemble or modify standard items; and (d) produced at an off-site location.

(4) The department of labor and industries shall transmit information collected under this section to the capital projects advisory review board created in RCW 39.10.220 for review.

(5) This section applies to contracts entered into between September 1, 2010, and December 31, 2013.

(6) This section does not apply to department of transportation public works projects.

(7) This section does not apply to local transportation public works projects.

Sec. 38. RCW 39.04.380 and 2011 c 345 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services must conduct a survey and compile the results into a list of which states provide a bidding preference on public works contracts for their resident contractors. The list must include details on the type of preference, the amount of the preference, and how the preference is applied. The list must be updated periodically as needed. The initial survey must be completed by November 1, 2011, and by December 1, 2011, the department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the results of the survey. The report must include the list and recommendations necessary to implement the intent of this section and section 2, chapter 345, Laws of 2011.

(2) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services must distribute the report, along with the requirements of this section and section 2, chapter 345, Laws of 2011, to all state and local agencies with the authority to procure public works. The department may adopt rules and procedures to implement the reciprocity requirements in subsection (3) of this section. However, subsection (3) (([of this section])) of this section does not take effect until the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services has adopted the rules and procedures for reciprocity under this subsection (((2) of this section [this subsection])) or announced that it will not be issuing rules or procedures pursuant to this section.

(3) In any bidding process for public works in which a bid is received from a nonresident contractor from a state that provides a percentage bidding preference, a comparable percentage disadvantage must be applied to the bid of that nonresident contractor. This subsection does not apply until the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services has adopted the rules and procedures for reciprocity under subsection (2) of this section, or has determined and announced that rules are not necessary for implementation.

(4) A nonresident contractor from a state that provides a percentage bid preference means a contractor that:

(a) Is from a state that provides a percentage bid preference to its resident contractors bidding on public works contracts; and

(b) At the time of bidding on a public works project, does not have a physical office located in Washington.

(5) The state of residence for a nonresident contractor is the state in which the contractor was incorporated or, if not a corporation, the state where the contractor's business entity was formed.

(6) This section does not apply to public works procured pursuant to RCW 39.04.155, 39.04.280, or any other procurement exempt from competitive bidding.

Sec. 39. RCW 39.24.050 and 1982 c 61 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A governmental unit shall, to the maximum extent economically feasible, purchase paper products which meet the specifications established by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services under RCW ((43.19.538)) 39.26.255.

Sec. 40. RCW 39.30.050 and 1982 c 61 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Any contract by a governmental unit shall require the use of paper products to the maximum extent economically feasible that meet the specifications established by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services under RCW ((43.19.538)) 39.26.255.

Sec. 41. RCW 39.32.020 and 1995 c 137 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services is hereby authorized to purchase, lease or otherwise acquire from federal, state, or local government or any surplus property disposal agency thereof surplus property to be used in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 42. RCW 39.32.040 and 1998 c 105 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In purchasing federal surplus property on requisition for any eligible donee the director may advance the purchase price thereof from the ((general administration)) enterprise services account, and he or she shall then in due course bill the proper eligible donee for the amount paid by him or her for the property plus a reasonable amount to cover the expense incurred by him or her in connection with the transaction. In purchasing surplus property without requisition, the director shall be deemed to take title outright and he or she shall then be authorized to resell from time to time any or all of such property to such eligible donees as desire to avail themselves of the privilege of purchasing. All moneys received in payment for surplus property from eligible donees shall be deposited by the director in the ((general administration)) enterprise services account. The director shall sell federal surplus property to eligible donees at a price sufficient only to reimburse the ((general administration)) enterprise services account for the cost of the property to the account, plus a reasonable amount to cover expenses incurred in connection with the transaction. Where surplus property is transferred to an eligible donee without cost to the transferee, the director may impose a reasonable charge to cover expenses incurred in connection with the transaction. The governor, through the director of ((general administration)) enterprise services, shall administer the surplus property program in the state and shall perform or supervise all those functions with respect to the program, its agencies and instrumentalities.

Sec. 43. RCW 39.32.060 and 1977 ex.s. c 135 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall have power to promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of RCW 39.32.010 through 39.32.060 and to carry out the provisions of the Federal Property and Administrative Services Act of 1949, as amended.

Sec. 44. RCW 39.35.060 and 2001 c 292 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may impose fees upon affected public agencies for the review of life-cycle cost analyses. The fees shall be deposited in the ((general administration)) enterprise services account. The purpose of the fees is to recover the costs by the department for review of the analyses. The department shall set fees at a level necessary to recover all of its costs related to increasing the energy efficiency of state-supported new construction. The fees shall not exceed one-tenth of one percent of the total cost of any project or exceed two thousand dollars for any project unless mutually agreed to. The department shall provide detailed calculation ensuring that the energy savings resulting from its review of life-cycle cost analysis justify the costs of performing that review.

Sec. 45. RCW 39.35A.050 and 2001 c 214 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The state department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall maintain a registry of energy service contractors and provide assistance to municipalities in identifying available performance-based contracting services.

Sec. 46. RCW 39.35B.040 and 1986 c 127 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The principal executives of all state agencies are responsible for implementing the policy set forth in this chapter. The office of financial management in conjunction with the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services may establish guidelines for compliance by the state government and its agencies, and state universities and community colleges. The office of financial management shall include within its biennial capital budget instructions:

(1) A discount rate for the use of all agencies in calculating the present value of future costs, and several examples of resultant trade-offs between annual operating costs eliminated and additional capital costs thereby justified; and

(2) Types of projects and building components that are particularly appropriate for life-cycle cost analysis.

Sec. 47. RCW 39.35C.050 and 1996 c 186 s 409 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any other authorities conferred by law:

(1) The department, with the consent of the state agency or school district responsible for a facility, a state or regional university acting independently, and any other state agency acting through the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services or as otherwise authorized by law, may:

(a) Develop and finance conservation at public facilities in accordance with express provisions of this chapter;

(b) Contract for energy services, including performance-based contracts;

(c) Contract to sell energy savings from a conservation project at public facilities to local utilities or the Bonneville power administration.

(2) A state or regional university acting independently, and any other state agency acting through the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services or as otherwise authorized by law, may undertake procurements for third-party development of conservation at its facilities.

(3) A school district may:

(a) Develop and finance conservation at school district facilities;

(b) Contract for energy services, including performance-based contracts at school district facilities; and

(c) Contract to sell energy savings from energy conservation projects at school district facilities to local utilities or the Bonneville power administration directly or to local utilities or the Bonneville power administration through third parties.

(4) In exercising the authority granted by subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, a school district or state agency must comply with the provisions of RCW 39.35C.040.

Sec. 48. RCW 39.35C.090 and 1996 c 186 s 413 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any other authorities conferred by law:

(1) The department, with the consent of the state agency responsible for a facility, a state or regional university acting independently, and any other state agency acting through the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services or as otherwise authorized by law, may:

(a) Contract to sell electric energy generated at state facilities to a utility; and

(b) Contract to sell thermal energy produced at state facilities to a utility.

(2) A state or regional university acting independently, and any other state agency acting through the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services or as otherwise authorized by law, may:

(a) Acquire, install, permit, construct, own, operate, and maintain cogeneration and facility heating and cooling measures or equipment, or both, at its facilities;

(b) Lease state property for the installation and operation of cogeneration and facility heating and cooling equipment at its facilities;

(c) Contract to purchase all or part of the electric or thermal output of cogeneration plants at its facilities;

(d) Contract to purchase or otherwise acquire fuel or other energy sources needed to operate cogeneration plants at its facilities; and

(e) Undertake procurements for third-party development of cogeneration projects at its facilities, with successful bidders to be selected based on the responsible bid, including nonprice elements listed in RCW ((43.19.1911)) 39.26.160, that offers the greatest net achievable benefits to the state and its agencies.

(3) After July 28, 1991, a state agency shall consult with the department prior to exercising any authority granted by this section.

(4) In exercising the authority granted by subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a state agency must comply with the provisions of RCW 39.35C.080.

Sec. 49. RCW 39.59.010 and 2002 c 332 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Bond" means any agreement which may or may not be represented by a physical instrument, including but not limited to bonds, notes, warrants, or certificates of indebtedness, that evidences an obligation under which the issuer agrees to pay a specified amount of money, with or without interest, at a designated time or times either to registered owners or bearers.

(2) "Local government" means any county, city, town, special purpose district, political subdivision, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation, including any public corporation, authority, or other instrumentality created by such an entity.

(3) "Money market fund" means a mutual fund the portfolio which consists of only bonds having maturities or demand or tender provisions of not more than one year, managed by an investment advisor who has posted with the office of risk management ((division of the office of financial management)) in the department of enterprise services a bond or other similar instrument in the amount of at least five percent of the amount invested in the fund pursuant to RCW 39.59.030 (2) or (3).

(4) "Mutual fund" means a diversified mutual fund registered with the federal securities and exchange commission and which is managed by an investment advisor with assets under management of at least five hundred million dollars and with at least five years' experience in investing in bonds authorized for investment by this chapter and who has posted with the office of risk management ((division of the office of financial management)) in the department of enterprise services a bond or other similar instrument in the amount of at least five percent of the amount invested in the fund pursuant to RCW 39.59.030(1).

(5) "State" includes a state, agencies, authorities, and instrumentalities of a state, and public corporations created by a state or agencies, authorities, or instrumentalities of a state.

Sec. 50. RCW 41.04.017 and 2007 c 487 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid as a sundry claim to the estate of an employee of any state agency, the common school system of the state, or institution of higher education who dies as a result of (1) injuries sustained in the course of employment; or (2) an occupational disease or infection that arises naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter, and is not otherwise provided a death benefit through coverage under their enrolled retirement system under chapter 402, Laws of 2003. The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries. The department of labor and industries shall notify the director of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services by order under RCW 51.52.050.

Sec. 51. RCW 41.04.220 and 1983 c 3 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

Any governmental entity other than state agencies, may use the services of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services upon the approval of the director, in procuring health benefit programs as provided by RCW 41.04.180, 28A.400.350 and 28B.10.660: PROVIDED, That the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services may charge for the administrative cost incurred in the procuring of such services.

Sec. 52. RCW 41.04.375 and 1993 c 194 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

An agency may identify space they wish to use for child care facilities or they may request assistance from the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services in identifying the availability of suitable space in state-owned or state-leased buildings for use as child care centers for the children of state employees.

When suitable space is identified in state-owned or state-leased buildings, the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall establish a rental rate for organizations to pay for the space used by persons who are not state employees.

Sec. 53. RCW 42.17A.110 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 448 and 2011 c 60 s 20 are each reenacted to read as follows:

The commission may:

(1) Adopt, amend, and rescind suitable administrative rules to carry out the policies and purposes of this chapter, which rules shall be adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. Any rule relating to campaign finance, political advertising, or related forms that would otherwise take effect after June 30th of a general election year shall take effect no earlier than the day following the general election in that year;

(2) Appoint an executive director and set, within the limits established by the office of financial management under RCW 43.03.028, the executive director's compensation. The executive director shall perform such duties and have such powers as the commission may prescribe and delegate to implement and enforce this chapter efficiently and effectively. The commission shall not delegate its authority to adopt, amend, or rescind rules nor may it delegate authority to determine whether an actual violation of this chapter has occurred or to assess penalties for such violations;

(3) Prepare and publish reports and technical studies as in its judgment will tend to promote the purposes of this chapter, including reports and statistics concerning campaign financing, lobbying, financial interests of elected officials, and enforcement of this chapter;

(4) Conduct, as it deems appropriate, audits and field investigations;

(5) Make public the time and date of any formal hearing set to determine whether a violation has occurred, the question or questions to be considered, and the results thereof;

(6) Administer oaths and affirmations, issue subpoenas, and compel attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any records relevant to any investigation authorized under this chapter, or any other proceeding under this chapter;

(7) Adopt a code of fair campaign practices;

(8) Adopt rules relieving candidates or political committees of obligations to comply with the election campaign provisions of this chapter, if they have not received contributions nor made expenditures in connection with any election campaign of more than five thousand dollars;

(9) Adopt rules prescribing reasonable requirements for keeping accounts of, and reporting on a quarterly basis, costs incurred by state agencies, counties, cities, and other municipalities and political subdivisions in preparing, publishing, and distributing legislative information. For the purposes of this subsection, "legislative information" means books, pamphlets, reports, and other materials prepared, published, or distributed at substantial cost, a substantial purpose of which is to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation. The state auditor in his or her regular examination of each agency under chapter 43.09 RCW shall review the rules, accounts, and reports and make appropriate findings, comments, and recommendations concerning those agencies; and

(10) Develop and provide to filers a system for certification of reports required under this chapter which are transmitted by facsimile or electronically to the commission. Implementation of the program is contingent on the availability of funds.

Sec. 54. RCW 43.01.090 and 2005 c 330 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services may assess a charge or rent against each state board, commission, agency, office, department, activity, or other occupant or user for payment of a proportionate share of costs for occupancy of buildings, structures, or facilities including but not limited to all costs of acquiring, constructing, operating, and maintaining such buildings, structures, or facilities and the repair, remodeling, or furnishing thereof and for the rendering of any service or the furnishing or providing of any supplies, equipment, historic furnishings, or materials.

The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services may recover the full costs including appropriate overhead charges of the foregoing by periodic billings as determined by the director including but not limited to transfers upon accounts and advancements into the ((general administration)) enterprise services account. Charges related to the rendering of real estate services under RCW 43.82.010 and to the operation and maintenance of public and historic facilities at the state capitol, as defined in RCW 79.24.710, shall be allocated separately from other charges assessed under this section. Rates shall be established by the director of ((general administration)) enterprise services after consultation with the director of financial management. The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services may allot, provide, or furnish any of such facilities, structures, services, equipment, supplies, or materials to any other public service type occupant or user at such rates or charges as are equitable and reasonably reflect the actual costs of the services provided: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the legislature, its duly constituted committees, interim committees and other committees shall be exempted from the provisions of this section.

Upon receipt of such bill, each entity, occupant, or user shall cause a warrant or check in the amount thereof to be drawn in favor of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services which shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the ((general administration)) enterprise services account unless the director of financial management has authorized another method for payment of costs.

Beginning July 1, 1995, the director of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall assess a capital projects surcharge upon each agency or other user occupying a facility owned and managed by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services in Thurston county, excluding state capitol public and historic facilities, as defined in RCW 79.24.710. The capital projects surcharge does not apply to agencies or users that agree to pay all future repairs, improvements, and renovations to the buildings they occupy and a proportional share, as determined by the office of financial management, of all other campus repairs, installations, improvements, and renovations that provide a benefit to the buildings they occupy or that have an agreement with the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services that contains a charge for a similar purpose, including but not limited to RCW 43.01.091, in an amount greater than the capital projects surcharge. Beginning July 1, 2002, the capital projects surcharge does not apply to department of services for the blind vendors who operate cafeteria services in facilities owned and managed by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services; the department shall consider this space to be a common area for purposes of allocating the capital projects surcharge to other building tenants beginning July 1, 2003. The director, after consultation with the director of financial management, shall adopt differential capital project surcharge rates to reflect the differences in facility type and quality. The initial payment structure for this surcharge shall be one dollar per square foot per year. The surcharge shall increase over time to an amount that when combined with the facilities and service charge equals the market rate for similar types of lease space in the area or equals five dollars per square foot per year, whichever is less. The capital projects surcharge shall be in addition to other charges assessed under this section. Proceeds from the capital projects surcharge shall be deposited into the Thurston county capital facilities account created in RCW 43.19.501.

Sec. 55. RCW 43.01.091 and 1994 c 219 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state of Washington that each agency or other occupant of newly constructed or substantially renovated facilities owned and operated by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services in Thurston county shall proportionally share the debt service costs associated with the original construction or substantial renovation of the facility. Beginning July 1, 1995, each state agency or other occupant of a facility constructed or substantially renovated after July 1, 1992, and owned and operated by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services in Thurston county, shall be assessed a charge to pay the principal and interest payments on any bonds or other financial contract issued to finance the construction or renovation or an equivalent charge for similar projects financed by cash sources. In recognition that full payment of debt service costs may be higher than market rates for similar types of facilities or higher than existing agreements for similar charges entered into prior to June 9, 1994, the initial charge may be less than the full cost of principal and interest payments. The charge shall be assessed to all occupants of the facility on a proportional basis based on the amount of occupied space or any unique construction requirements. The office of financial management, in consultation with the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, shall develop procedures to implement this section and report to the legislative fiscal committees, by October 1994, their recommendations for implementing this section. The office of financial management shall separately identify in the budget document all payments and the documentation for determining the payments required by this section for each agency and fund source during the current and the two past and future fiscal biennia. The charge authorized in this section is subject to annual audit by the state auditor.

Sec. 56. RCW 43.01.240 and 1998 c 245 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby established an account in the state treasury to be known as the state agency parking account. All parking income collected from the fees imposed by state agencies on parking spaces at state-owned or leased facilities, including the capitol campus, shall be deposited in the state agency parking account. Only the office of financial management may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures. No agency may receive an allotment greater than the amount of revenue deposited into the state agency parking account.

(2) An agency may, as an element of the agency's commute trip reduction program to achieve the goals set forth in RCW 70.94.527, impose parking rental fees at state-owned and leased properties. These fees will be deposited in the state agency parking account. Each agency shall establish a committee to advise the agency director on parking rental fees, taking into account the market rate of comparable, privately owned rental parking in each region. The agency shall solicit representation of the employee population including, but not limited to, management, administrative staff, production workers, and state employee bargaining units. Funds shall be used by agencies to: (a) Support the agencies' commute trip reduction program under RCW 70.94.521 through 70.94.551; (b) support the agencies' parking program; or (c) support the lease or ownership costs for the agencies' parking facilities.

(3) In order to reduce the state's subsidization of employee parking, after July 1997 agencies shall not enter into leases for employee parking in excess of building code requirements, except as authorized by the director of ((general administration)) enterprise services. In situations where there are fewer parking spaces than employees at a worksite, parking must be allocated equitably, with no special preference given to managers.

Sec. 57. RCW 43.01.250 and 2007 c 348 s 206 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is in the state's interest and to the benefit of the people of the state to encourage the use of electrical vehicles in order to reduce emissions and provide the public with cleaner air. This section expressly authorizes the purchase of power at state expense to recharge privately and publicly owned plug-in electrical vehicles at state office locations where the vehicles are used for state business, are commute vehicles, or where the vehicles are at the state location for the purpose of conducting business with the state.

(2) The director of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services may report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature, as deemed necessary by the director, on the estimated amount of state-purchased electricity consumed by plug-in electrical vehicles if the director of ((general administration)) enterprise services determines that the use has a significant cost to the state, and on the number of plug-in electric vehicles using state office locations. The report may be combined with the report under section 401, chapter 348, Laws of 2007.

Sec. 58. RCW 43.01.900 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 140 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All documents and papers, equipment, or other tangible property in the possession of the terminated entity shall be delivered to the custody of the entity assuming the responsibilities of the terminated entity or if such responsibilities have been eliminated, documents and papers shall be delivered to the state archivist and equipment or other tangible property to the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services.

(2) All funds held by, or other moneys due to, the terminated entity shall revert to the fund from which they were appropriated, or if that fund is abolished to the general fund.

(3) All contractual rights and duties of an entity shall be assigned or delegated to the entity assuming the responsibilities of the terminated entity, or if there is none to such entity as the governor shall direct.

(4) All rules and all pending business before any terminated entity shall be continued and acted upon by the entity assuming the responsibilities of the terminated entity.

Sec. 59. RCW 43.15.020 and 2011 c 158 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The lieutenant governor serves as president of the senate and is responsible for making appointments to, and serving on, the committees and boards as set forth in this section.

(1) The lieutenant governor serves on the following boards and committees:

(a) Capitol furnishings preservation committee, RCW 27.48.040;

(b) Washington higher education facilities authority, RCW 28B.07.030;

(c) Productivity board, also known as the employee involvement and recognition board, RCW 41.60.015;

(d) State finance committee, RCW 43.33.010;

(e) State capitol committee, RCW 43.34.010;

(f) Washington health care facilities authority, RCW 70.37.030;

(g) State medal of merit nominating committee, RCW 1.40.020;

(h) Medal of valor committee, RCW 1.60.020; and

(i) Association of Washington generals, RCW 43.15.030.

(2) The lieutenant governor, and when serving as president of the senate, appoints members to the following boards and committees:

(a) Civil legal aid oversight committee, RCW 2.53.010;

(b) Office of public defense advisory committee, RCW 2.70.030;

(c) Washington state gambling commission, RCW 9.46.040;

(d) Sentencing guidelines commission, RCW 9.94A.860;

(e) State building code council, RCW 19.27.070;

(f) Financial education public-private partnership, RCW 28A.300.450;

(g) Joint administrative rules review committee, RCW 34.05.610;

(h) Capital projects advisory review board, RCW 39.10.220;

(i) Select committee on pension policy, RCW 41.04.276;

(j) Legislative ethics board, RCW 42.52.310;

(k) Washington citizens' commission on salaries, RCW 43.03.305;

(l) Legislative oral history committee, RCW 44.04.325;

(m) State council on aging, RCW 43.20A.685;

(n) State investment board, RCW 43.33A.020;

(o) Capitol campus design advisory committee, RCW 43.34.080;

(p) Washington state arts commission, RCW 43.46.015;

(q) ((Information services board, RCW 43.105.032;

(r) Council for children and families, RCW 43.121.020;

(s))) PNWER-Net working subgroup under chapter 43.147 RCW;

(((t))) (r) Community economic revitalization board, RCW 43.160.030;

(((u))) (s) Washington economic development finance authority, RCW 43.163.020;

(((v))) (t) Life sciences discovery fund authority, RCW 43.350.020;

(((w))) (u) Legislative children's oversight committee, RCW 44.04.220;

(((x))) (v) Joint legislative audit and review committee, RCW 44.28.010;

(((y))) (w) Joint committee on energy supply and energy conservation, RCW 44.39.015;

(((z))) (x) Legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, RCW 44.48.010;

(((aa))) (y) Agency council on coordinated transportation, RCW 47.06B.020;

(((bb))) (z) Washington horse racing commission, RCW 67.16.014;

(((cc))) (aa) Correctional industries board of directors, RCW 72.09.080;

(((dd))) (bb) Joint committee on veterans' and military affairs, RCW 73.04.150;

(((ee))) (cc) Joint legislative committee on water supply during drought, RCW 90.86.020;

(((ff))) (dd) Statute law committee, RCW 1.08.001; and

(((gg))) (ee) Joint legislative oversight committee on trade policy, RCW 44.55.020.

Sec. 60. RCW 43.17.050 and 2009 c 549 s 5060 are each amended to read as follows:

Each department shall maintain its principal office at the state capital. The director of each department may, with the approval of the governor, establish and maintain branch offices at other places than the state capital for the conduct of one or more of the functions of his or her department.

The governor, in his or her discretion, may require all administrative departments of the state and the appointive officers thereof, other than those created by this chapter, to maintain their principal offices at the state capital in rooms to be furnished by the director of ((general administration)) enterprise services.

Sec. 61. RCW 43.17.100 and 2009 c 549 s 5062 are each amended to read as follows:

Every appointive state officer and employee of the state shall give a surety bond, payable to the state in such sum as shall be deemed necessary by the director of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, conditioned for the honesty of the officer or employee and for the accounting of all property of the state that shall come into his or her possession by virtue of his or her office or employment, which bond shall be approved as to form by the attorney general and shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services may purchase one or more blanket surety bonds for the coverage required in this section.

Any bond required by this section shall not be considered an official bond and shall not be subject to chapter 42.08 RCW.

Sec. 62. RCW 43.17.400 and 2007 c 62 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Disposition" means sales, exchanges, or other actions resulting in a transfer of land ownership.

(b) "State agencies" includes:

(i) The department of natural resources established in chapter 43.30 RCW;

(ii) The department of fish and wildlife established in chapter 43.300 RCW;

(iii) The department of transportation established in chapter 47.01 RCW;

(iv) The parks and recreation commission established in chapter 79A.05 RCW; and

(v) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services established in this chapter.

(2) State agencies proposing disposition of state-owned land must provide written notice of the proposed disposition to the legislative authorities of the counties, cities, and towns in which the land is located at least sixty days before entering into the disposition agreement.

(3) The requirements of this section are in addition and supplemental to other requirements of the laws of this state.

Sec. 63. RCW 43.19.647 and 2007 c 348 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to allow the motor vehicle fuel needs of state and local government to be satisfied by Washington-produced biofuels as provided in this chapter, the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services as well as local governments may contract in advance and execute contracts with public or private producers, suppliers, or other parties, for the purchase of appropriate biofuels, as that term is defined in RCW 43.325.010, and biofuel blends. Contract provisions may address items including, but not limited to, fuel standards, price, and delivery date.

(2) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services may combine the needs of local government agencies, including ports, special districts, school districts, and municipal corporations, for the purposes of executing contracts for biofuels and to secure a sufficient and stable supply of alternative fuels.

Sec. 64. RCW 43.19.651 and 2003 c 340 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When planning for the capital construction or renovation of a state facility, state agencies shall consider the utilization of fuel cells and renewable or alternative energy sources as a primary source of power for applications that require an uninterruptible power source.

(2) When planning the purchase of back-up or emergency power systems and remote power systems, state agencies shall consider the utilization of fuel cells and renewable or alternative energy sources instead of batteries or internal combustion engines.

(3) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall develop criteria by which state agencies can identify, evaluate, and develop potential fuel cell applications at state facilities.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "fuel cell" means an electrochemical reaction that generates electric energy by combining atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the presence of a catalyst.

Sec. 65. RCW 43.19.670 and 2001 c 214 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in RCW 43.19.670 through 43.19.685, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Energy audit" means a determination of the energy consumption characteristics of a facility which consists of the following elements:

(a) An energy consumption survey which identifies the type, amount, and rate of energy consumption of the facility and its major energy systems. This survey shall be made by the agency responsible for the facility.

(b) A walk-through survey which determines appropriate energy conservation maintenance and operating procedures and indicates the need, if any, for the acquisition and installation of energy conservation measures and energy management systems. This survey shall be made by the agency responsible for the facility if it has technically qualified personnel available. The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall provide technically qualified personnel to the responsible agency if necessary.

(c) An investment grade audit, which is an intensive engineering analysis of energy conservation and management measures for the facility, net energy savings, and a cost-effectiveness determination. ((This element is required only for those facilities designated in the schedule adopted under RCW 43.19.680(2).))

(2) "Cost-effective energy conservation measures" means energy conservation measures that the investment grade audit concludes will generate savings sufficient to finance project loans of not more than ten years.

(3) "Energy conservation measure" means an installation or modification of an installation in a facility which is primarily intended to reduce energy consumption or allow the use of an alternative energy source, including:

(a) Insulation of the facility structure and systems within the facility;

(b) Storm windows and doors, multiglazed windows and doors, heat absorbing or heat reflective glazed and coated windows and door systems, additional glazing, reductions in glass area, and other window and door system modifications;

(c) Automatic energy control systems;

(d) Equipment required to operate variable steam, hydraulic, and ventilating systems adjusted by automatic energy control systems;

(e) Solar space heating or cooling systems, solar electric generating systems, or any combination thereof;

(f) Solar water heating systems;

(g) Furnace or utility plant and distribution system modifications including replacement burners, furnaces, and boilers which substantially increase the energy efficiency of the heating system; devices for modifying flue openings which will increase the energy efficiency of the heating system; electrical or mechanical furnace ignitions systems which replace standing gas pilot lights; and utility plant system conversion measures including conversion of existing oil- and gas-fired boiler installations to alternative energy sources;

(h) Caulking and weatherstripping;

(i) Replacement or modification of lighting fixtures which increase the energy efficiency of the lighting system;

(j) Energy recovery systems;

(k) Energy management systems; and

(l) Such other measures as the director finds will save a substantial amount of energy.

(4) "Energy conservation maintenance and operating procedure" means modification or modifications in the maintenance and operations of a facility, and any installations within the facility, which are designed to reduce energy consumption in the facility and which require no significant expenditure of funds.

(5) "Energy management system" has the definition contained in RCW 39.35.030.

(6) "Energy savings performance contracting" means the process authorized by chapter 39.35C RCW by which a company contracts with a state agency to conduct no-cost energy audits, guarantee savings from energy efficiency, provide financing for energy efficiency improvements, install or implement energy efficiency improvements, and agree to be paid for its investment solely from savings resulting from the energy efficiency improvements installed or implemented.

(7) "Energy service company" means a company or contractor providing energy savings performance contracting services.

(8) "Facility" means a building, a group of buildings served by a central energy distribution system, or components of a central energy distribution system.

(9) "Implementation plan" means the annual tasks and budget required to complete all acquisitions and installations necessary to satisfy the recommendations of the energy audit.

Sec. 66. RCW 43.19.682 and 1993 c 204 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall seek to further energy conservation objectives among other landscape objectives in planting and maintaining trees upon grounds administered by the department.

Sec. 67. RCW 43.19.691 and 2005 c 299 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Municipalities may conduct energy audits and implement cost-effective energy conservation measures among multiple government entities.

(2) All municipalities shall report to the department if they implemented or did not implement, during the previous biennium, cost-effective energy conservation measures aggregated among multiple government entities. The reports must be submitted to the department by September 1, 2007, and by September 1, 2009. In collecting the reports, the department shall cooperate with the appropriate associations that represent municipalities.

(3) The department shall prepare a report summarizing the reports submitted by municipalities under subsection (2) of this section and shall report to the committee by December 31, 2007, and by December 31, 2009.

(4) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(a) "Committee" means the joint committee on energy supply and energy conservation in chapter 44.39 RCW.

(b) "Cost-effective energy conservation measures" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.19.670.

(c) "Department" means the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services.

(d) "Energy audit" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.19.670.

(e) "Municipality" has the meaning provided in RCW 39.04.010.

Sec. 68. RCW 43.19.757 and 1965 c 8 s 43.78.160 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in RCW ((43.78.130, 43.78.140 and 43.78.150)) 43.19.748, 43.19.751, and 43.19.754 shall be construed as requiring any public official to accept any such work of inferior quality or workmanship.

Sec. 69. RCW 43.19A.022 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 251 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All state agencies shall purchase one hundred percent recycled content white cut sheet bond paper used in office printers and copiers. State agencies are encouraged to give priority to purchasing from companies that produce paper in facilities that generate energy from a renewable energy source.

(2) State agencies that utilize office printers and copiers that, after reasonable attempts, cannot be calibrated to utilize such paper referenced in subsection (1) of this section, must for those models of equipment:

(a) Purchase paper at the highest recycled content that can be utilized efficiently by the copier or printer;

(b) At the time of lease renewal or at the end of the life-cycle, either lease or purchase a model that will efficiently utilize one hundred percent recycled content white cut sheet bond paper;

(3) Printed projects that require the use of high volume production inserters or high-speed digital devices, such as those used by the department of enterprise services, are not required to meet the one hundred percent recycled content white cut sheet bond paper standard, but must utilize the highest recycled content that can be utilized efficiently by such equipment and not impede the business of agencies.

(4) The department of enterprise services ((and the department of information services)) shall ((work together to)) identify for use by agencies one hundred percent recycled paper products that process efficiently through high-speed production equipment and do not impede the business of agencies.

Sec. 70. RCW 43.19A.040 and 1991 c 297 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each local government shall consider the adoption of policies, rules, or ordinances to provide for the preferential purchase of recycled content products. Any local government may adopt the preferential purchasing policy of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, or portions of such policy, or another policy that provides a preference for recycled content products.

(2) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall prepare one or more model recycled content preferential purchase policies suitable for adoption by local governments. The model policy shall be widely distributed and provided through the technical assistance and workshops under RCW 43.19A.070.

(3) A local government that is not subject to the purchasing authority of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, and that adopts the preferential purchase policy or rules of the department, shall not be limited by the percentage price preference included in such policy or rules.

Sec. 71. RCW 43.21F.045 and 1996 c 186 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall supervise and administer energy-related activities as specified in RCW 43.330.904 and shall advise the governor and the legislature with respect to energy matters affecting the state.

(2) In addition to other powers and duties granted to the department, the department shall have the following powers and duties:

(a) Prepare and update contingency plans for implementation in the event of energy shortages or emergencies. The plans shall conform to chapter 43.21G RCW and shall include procedures for determining when these shortages or emergencies exist, the state officers and agencies to participate in the determination, and actions to be taken by various agencies and officers of state government in order to reduce hardship and maintain the general welfare during these emergencies. The department shall coordinate the activities undertaken pursuant to this subsection with other persons. The components of plans that require legislation for their implementation shall be presented to the legislature in the form of proposed legislation at the earliest practicable date. The department shall report to the governor and the legislature on probable, imminent, and existing energy shortages, and shall administer energy allocation and curtailment programs in accordance with chapter 43.21G RCW.

(b) Establish and maintain a central repository in state government for collection of existing data on energy resources, including:

(i) Supply, demand, costs, utilization technology, projections, and forecasts;

(ii) Comparative costs of alternative energy sources, uses, and applications; and

(iii) Inventory data on energy research projects in the state conducted under public and/or private auspices, and the results thereof.

(c) Coordinate federal energy programs appropriate for state-level implementation, carry out such energy programs as are assigned to it by the governor or the legislature, and monitor federally funded local energy programs as required by federal or state regulations.

(d) Develop energy policy recommendations for consideration by the governor and the legislature.

(e) Provide assistance, space, and other support as may be necessary for the activities of the state's two representatives to the Pacific northwest electric power and conservation planning council. To the extent consistent with federal law, the director shall request that Washington's councilmembers request the administrator of the Bonneville power administration to reimburse the state for the expenses associated with the support as provided in the Pacific Northwest Electric Power Planning and Conservation Act (P.L. 96-501).

(f) Cooperate with state agencies, other governmental units, and private interests in the prioritization and implementation of the state energy strategy elements and on other energy matters.

(g) Serve as the official state agency responsible for coordinating implementation of the state energy strategy.

(h) No later than December 1, 1982, and by December 1st of each even-numbered year thereafter, prepare and transmit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature a report on the implementation of the state energy strategy and other important energy issues, as appropriate.

(i) Provide support for increasing cost-effective energy conservation, including assisting in the removal of impediments to timely implementation.

(j) Provide support for the development of cost-effective energy resources including assisting in the removal of impediments to timely construction.

(k) Adopt rules, under chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to carry out the powers and duties enumerated in this chapter.

(l) Provide administrative assistance, space, and other support as may be necessary for the activities of the energy facility site evaluation council, as provided for in RCW 80.50.030.

(m) Appoint staff as may be needed to administer energy policy functions and manage energy facility site evaluation council activities. These employees are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW.

(3) To the extent the powers and duties set out under this section relate to energy education, applied research, and technology transfer programs they are transferred to Washington State University.

(4) To the extent the powers and duties set out under this section relate to energy efficiency in public buildings they are transferred to the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services.

Sec. 72. RCW 43.34.090 and 2002 c 164 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature shall approve names for new or existing buildings on the state capitol grounds based upon recommendations from the state capitol committee and the director of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, with the advice of the capitol campus design advisory committee, subject to the following limitations:

(a) An existing building may be renamed only after a substantial renovation or a change in the predominant tenant agency headquartered in the building.

(b) A new or existing building may be named or renamed after:

(i) An individual who has played a significant role in Washington history;

(ii) The purpose of the building;

(iii) The single or predominant tenant agency headquartered in the building;

(iv) A significant place name or natural place in Washington;

(v) A Native American tribe located in Washington;

(vi) A group of people or type of person;

(vii) Any other appropriate person consistent with this section as recommended by the director of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services.

(c) The names on the facades of the state capitol group shall not be removed.

(2) The legislature shall approve names for new or existing public rooms or spaces on the west capitol campus based upon recommendations from the state capitol committee and the director of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, with the advice of the capitol campus design advisory committee, subject to the following limitations:

(a) An existing room or space may be renamed only after a substantial renovation;

(b) A new or existing room or space may be named or renamed only after:

(i) An individual who has played a significant role in Washington history;

(ii) The purpose of the room or space;

(iii) A significant place name or natural place in Washington;

(iv) A Native American tribe located in Washington;

(v) A group of people or type of person;

(vi) Any other appropriate person consistent with this section as recommended by the director of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services.

(3) When naming or renaming buildings, rooms, and spaces under this section, consideration must be given to: (a) Any disparity that exists with respect to the gender of persons after whom buildings, rooms, and spaces are named on the state capitol grounds; (b) the diversity of human achievement; and (c) the diversity of the state's citizenry and history.

(4) For purposes of this section, "state capitol grounds" means buildings and land owned by the state and otherwise designated as state capitol grounds, including the west capitol campus, the east capitol campus, the north capitol campus, the Tumwater campus, the Lacey campus, Sylvester Park, Centennial Park, the Old Capitol Building, and Capitol Lake.

Sec. 73. RCW 43.82.035 and 2007 c 506 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of financial management shall design and implement a modified predesign process for any space request to lease, purchase, or build facilities that involve (a) the housing of new state programs, (b) a major expansion of existing state programs, or (c) the relocation of state agency programs. This includes the consolidation of multiple state agency tenants into one facility. The office of financial management shall define facilities that meet the criteria described in (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(2) State agencies shall submit modified predesigns to the office of financial management and the legislature. Modified predesigns must include a problem statement, an analysis of alternatives to address programmatic and space requirements, proposed locations, and a financial assessment. For proposed projects of twenty thousand gross square feet or less, the agency may provide a cost-benefit analysis, rather than a life-cycle cost analysis, as determined by the office of financial management.

(3) Projects that meet the capital requirements for predesign on major facility projects with an estimated project cost of five million dollars or more pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW shall not be required to prepare a modified predesign.

(4) The office of financial management shall require state agencies to identify plans for major leased facilities as part of the ten-year capital budget plan. State agencies shall not enter into new or renewed leases of more than one million dollars per year unless such leases have been approved by the office of financial management except when the need for the lease is due to an unanticipated emergency. The regular termination date on an existing lease does not constitute an emergency. The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall notify the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees if an emergency situation arises.

(5) For project proposals in which there are estimates of operational savings, the office of financial management shall require the agency or agencies involved to provide details including but not limited to fund sources and timelines.

Sec. 74. RCW 43.82.055 and 2007 c 506 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The office of financial management shall:

(1) Work with the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services and all other state agencies to determine the long-term facility needs of state government; and

(2) Develop and submit a six-year facility plan to the legislature by January 1st of every odd-numbered year, beginning January 1, 2009, that includes state agency space requirements and other pertinent data necessary for cost-effective facility planning. The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall assist with this effort as required by the office of financial management.

Sec. 75. RCW 43.82.130 and 1965 c 8 s 43.82.130 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services is authorized to do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers and duties expressly provided in this chapter.

Sec. 76. RCW 43.83.116 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 217 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The principal proceeds from the sale of the bonds or notes deposited in the state building construction account of the general fund shall be administered by the ((state department of general administration)) office of financial management.

Sec. 77. RCW 43.83.120 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 217 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any other charges authorized by law and to assist in reimbursing the state general fund for expenditures from the general state revenues in paying the principal and interest on the bonds and notes herein authorized, the director of ((general administration)) financial management shall assess a charge against each state board, commission, agency, office, department, activity, or other occupant or user for payment of a proportion of costs for each square foot of floor space assigned to or occupied by it. Payment of the amount so billed to the entity for such occupancy shall be made annually and in advance at the beginning of each fiscal year. The director of ((general administration)) financial management shall cause the same to be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the general fund.

Sec. 78. RCW 43.83.136 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 249 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The principal proceeds from the sale of the bonds or notes authorized in RCW 43.83.130 through 43.83.148 and deposited in the state building construction account of the general fund shall be administered by the ((state department of general administration)) office of financial management, subject to legislative appropriation.

Sec. 79. RCW 43.83.142 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 249 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any other charges authorized by law and to assist in reimbursing the state general fund for expenditures from the general state revenues in paying the principal and interest on the bonds and notes authorized in RCW 43.83.130 through 43.83.148, the director of ((general administration)) financial management may assess a charge against each state board, commission, agency, office, department, activity, or other occupant or user of any facility or other building as authorized in RCW 43.83.130 for payment of a proportion of costs for each square foot of floor space assigned to or occupied by it. Payment of the amount so billed to the entity for such occupancy shall be made annually and in advance at the beginning of each fiscal year. The director of ((general administration)) financial management shall cause the same to be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the general fund.

Sec. 80. RCW 43.83.156 and 1979 ex.s. c 230 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The principal proceeds from the sale of the bonds or notes deposited in the state building construction account of the general fund shall be administered by the ((state department of general administration)) office of financial management, subject to legislative appropriation.

Sec. 81. RCW 43.83.176 and 1981 c 235 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The principal proceeds from the sale of the bonds deposited in the state building construction account of the general fund shall be administered by the ((state department of general administration)) office of financial management, subject to legislative appropriation.

Sec. 82. RCW 43.83.188 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 54 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The proceeds from the sale of the bonds deposited under RCW 43.83.186 in the state building construction account of the general fund shall be administered by the ((department of general administration)) office of financial management, subject to legislative appropriation.

Sec. 83. RCW 43.83.202 and 1984 c 271 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The proceeds from the sale of the bonds deposited under RCW 43.83.200 in the state building construction account of the general fund shall be administered by the ((department of general administration)) office of financial management, subject to legislative appropriation.

Sec. 84. RCW 43.88.090 and 2012 c 229 s 587 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of developing budget proposals to the legislature, the governor shall have the power, and it shall be the governor's duty, to require from proper agency officials such detailed estimates and other information in such form and at such times as the governor shall direct. The governor shall communicate statewide priorities to agencies for use in developing biennial budget recommendations for their agency and shall seek public involvement and input on these priorities. The estimates for the legislature and the judiciary shall be transmitted to the governor and shall be included in the budget without revision. The estimates for state pension contributions shall be based on the rates provided in chapter 41.45 RCW. Copies of all such estimates shall be transmitted to the standing committees on ways and means of the house and senate at the same time as they are filed with the governor and the office of financial management.

The estimates shall include statements or tables which indicate, by agency, the state funds which are required for the receipt of federal matching revenues. The estimates shall be revised as necessary to reflect legislative enactments and adopted appropriations and shall be included with the initial biennial allotment submitted under RCW 43.88.110. The estimates must reflect that the agency considered any alternatives to reduce costs or improve service delivery identified in the findings of a performance audit of the agency by the joint legislative audit and review committee. Nothing in this subsection requires performance audit findings to be published as part of the budget.

(2) Each state agency shall define its mission and establish measurable goals for achieving desirable results for those who receive its services and the taxpayers who pay for those services. Each agency shall also develop clear strategies and timelines to achieve its goals. This section does not require an agency to develop a new mission or goals in place of identifiable missions or goals that meet the intent of this section. The mission and goals of each agency must conform to statutory direction and limitations.

(3) For the purpose of assessing activity performance, each state agency shall establish quality and productivity objectives for each major activity in its budget. The objectives must be consistent with the missions and goals developed under this section. The objectives must be expressed to the extent practicable in outcome-based, objective, and measurable form unless an exception to adopt a different standard is granted by the office of financial management and approved by the legislative committee on performance review. Objectives must specifically address the statutory purpose or intent of the program or activity and focus on data that measure whether the agency is achieving or making progress toward the purpose of the activity and toward statewide priorities. The office of financial management shall provide necessary professional and technical assistance to assist state agencies in the development of strategic plans that include the mission of the agency and its programs, measurable goals, strategies, and performance measurement systems.

(4) Each state agency shall adopt procedures for and perform continuous self-assessment of each activity, using the mission, goals, objectives, and measurements required under subsections (2) and (3) of this section. The assessment of the activity must also include an evaluation of major information technology systems or projects that may assist the agency in achieving or making progress toward the activity purpose and statewide priorities. The evaluation of proposed major information technology systems or projects shall be in accordance with the standards and policies established by the ((information services board)) office of the chief information officer. Agencies' progress toward the mission, goals, objectives, and measurements required by subsections (2) and (3) of this section is subject to review as set forth in this subsection.

(a) The office of financial management shall regularly conduct reviews of selected activities to analyze whether the objectives and measurements submitted by agencies demonstrate progress toward statewide results.

(b) The office of financial management shall consult with: (i) The four-year institutions of higher education in those reviews that involve four-year institutions of higher education; and (ii) the state board for community and technical colleges in those reviews that involve two-year institutions of higher education.

(c) The goal is for all major activities to receive at least one review each year.

(d) The office of ((financial management shall consult with the information services board when conducting reviews of)) the chief information officer shall review major information technology systems in use by state agencies((. The goal is that reviews of these information technology systems occur)) periodically.

(5) It is the policy of the legislature that each agency's budget recommendations must be directly linked to the agency's stated mission and program, quality, and productivity goals and objectives. Consistent with this policy, agency budget proposals must include integration of performance measures that allow objective determination of an activity's success in achieving its goals. When a review under subsection (4) of this section or other analysis determines that the agency's objectives demonstrate that the agency is making insufficient progress toward the goals of any particular program or is otherwise underachieving or inefficient, the agency's budget request shall contain proposals to remedy or improve the selected programs. The office of financial management shall develop a plan to merge the budget development process with agency performance assessment procedures. The plan must include a schedule to integrate agency strategic plans and performance measures into agency budget requests and the governor's budget proposal over three fiscal biennia. The plan must identify those agencies that will implement the revised budget process in the 1997-1999 biennium, the 1999-2001 biennium, and the 2001-2003 biennium. In consultation with the legislative fiscal committees, the office of financial management shall recommend statutory and procedural modifications to the state's budget, accounting, and reporting systems to facilitate the performance assessment procedures and the merger of those procedures with the state budget process. The plan and recommended statutory and procedural modifications must be submitted to the legislative fiscal committees by September 30, 1996.

(6) In reviewing agency budget requests in order to prepare the governor's biennial budget request, the office of financial management shall consider the extent to which the agency's activities demonstrate progress toward the statewide budgeting priorities, along with any specific review conducted under subsection (4) of this section.

(7) In the year of the gubernatorial election, the governor shall invite the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee to attend all hearings provided in RCW 43.88.100; and the governor shall furnish the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee with such information as will enable the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee to gain an understanding of the state's budget requirements. The governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee may ask such questions during the hearings and require such information as the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee deems necessary and may make recommendations in connection with any item of the budget which, with the governor-elect's reasons therefor, shall be presented to the legislature in writing with the budget document. Copies of all such estimates and other required information shall also be submitted to the standing committees on ways and means of the house and senate.

Sec. 85. RCW 43.88.350 and 1998 c 105 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Any rate increases proposed for or any change in the method of calculating charges from the legal services revolving fund or services provided in accordance with RCW 43.01.090 or 43.19.500 in the ((general administration)) enterprise services account is subject to approval by the director of financial management prior to implementation.

Sec. 86. RCW 43.88.560 and 2010 c 282 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of financial management shall establish policies and standards governing the funding of major information technology projects ((as required under RCW 43.105.190(2))). The director of financial management shall also direct the collection of additional information on information technology projects and submit an information technology plan as required under RCW 43.88.092.

Sec. 87. RCW 43.96B.215 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 116 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

At the time the state finance committee determines to issue such bonds or a portion thereof, it may, pending the issuing of such bonds, issue, in the name of the state, temporary notes in anticipation of the money to be derived from the sale of the bonds, which notes shall be designated as "anticipation notes". Such portion of the proceeds of the sale of such bonds that may be required for such purpose shall be applied to the payment of the principal of and interest on such anticipation notes which have been issued. The proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 43.96B.200 through 43.96B.245 and any interest earned on the interim investment of such proceeds, shall be deposited in the state building construction account of the general fund in the state treasury and shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in RCW 43.96B.200 through 43.96B.245 and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds. The Expo '74 commission is hereby authorized to acquire property, real and personal, by lease, purchase(([,])), condemnation or gift to achieve the objectives of chapters 1, 2, and 3, Laws of 1971 ex. sess., and RCW 43.96B.200 through 43.96B.245. The commission is further directed pursuant to RCW 43.19.450 to utilize the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services to accomplish the purposes set forth herein.

Sec. 88. RCW 43.101.080 and 2011 c 234 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall have all of the following powers:

(1) To meet at such times and places as it may deem proper;

(2) To adopt any rules and regulations as it may deem necessary;

(3) To contract for services as it deems necessary in order to carry out its duties and responsibilities;

(4) To cooperate with and secure the cooperation of any department, agency, or instrumentality in state, county, and city government, and other commissions affected by or concerned with the business of the commission;

(5) To do any and all things necessary or convenient to enable it fully and adequately to perform its duties and to exercise the power granted to it;

(6) To select and employ an executive director, and to empower him or her to perform such duties and responsibilities as it may deem necessary;

(7) To assume legal, fiscal, and program responsibility for all training conducted by the commission;

(8) To establish, by rule and regulation, standards for the training of criminal justice personnel where such standards are not prescribed by statute;

(9) To own, establish, and operate, or to contract with other qualified institutions or organizations for the operation of, training and education programs for criminal justice personnel and to purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire, subject to the approval of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, a training facility or facilities necessary to the conducting of such programs;

(10) To establish, by rule and regulation, minimum curriculum standards for all training programs conducted for employed criminal justice personnel;

(11) To review and approve or reject standards for instructors of training programs for criminal justice personnel, and to employ personnel on a temporary basis as instructors without any loss of employee benefits to those instructors;

(12) To direct the development of alternative, innovate, and interdisciplinary training techniques;

(13) To review and approve or reject training programs conducted for criminal justice personnel and rules establishing and prescribing minimum training and education standards recommended by the training standards and education boards;

(14) To allocate financial resources among training and education programs conducted by the commission;

(15) To allocate training facility space among training and education programs conducted by the commission;

(16) To issue diplomas certifying satisfactory completion of any training or education program conducted or approved by the commission to any person so completing such a program;

(17) To provide for the employment of such personnel as may be practical to serve as temporary replacements for any person engaged in a basic training program as defined by the commission;

(18) To establish rules and regulations recommended by the training standards and education boards prescribing minimum standards relating to physical, mental and moral fitness which shall govern the recruitment of criminal justice personnel where such standards are not prescribed by statute or constitutional provision;

(19) To require county, city, or state law enforcement agencies that make a conditional offer of employment to an applicant as a fully commissioned peace officer or a reserve officer to administer a background investigation including a check of criminal history, a psychological examination, and a polygraph test or similar assessment to each applicant, the results of which shall be used by the employer to determine the applicant's suitability for employment as a fully commissioned peace officer or a reserve officer. The background investigation, psychological examination, and the polygraph examination shall be administered in accordance with the requirements of RCW 43.101.095(2). The employing county, city, or state law enforcement agency may require that each peace officer or reserve officer who is required to take a psychological examination and a polygraph or similar test pay a portion of the testing fee based on the actual cost of the test or four hundred dollars, whichever is less. County, city, and state law enforcement agencies may establish a payment plan if they determine that the peace officer or reserve officer does not readily have the means to pay for his or her portion of the testing fee;

(20) To promote positive relationships between law enforcement and the citizens of the state of Washington by allowing commissioners and staff to participate in the "chief for a day program." The executive director shall designate staff who may participate. In furtherance of this purpose, the commission may accept grants of funds and gifts and may use its public facilities for such purpose. At all times, the participation of commissioners and staff shall comply with chapter 42.52 RCW and chapter 292-110 WAC.

All rules and regulations adopted by the commission shall be adopted and administered pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW.

Sec. 89. RCW 43.325.020 and 2009 c 451 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The energy freedom program is established within the department. The director may establish policies and procedures necessary for processing, reviewing, and approving applications made under this chapter.

(2) When reviewing applications submitted under this program, the director shall consult with those agencies and other public entities having expertise and knowledge to assess the technical and business feasibility of the project and probability of success. These agencies may include, but are not limited to, Washington State University, the University of Washington, the department of ecology, the department of natural resources, the department of agriculture, the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, local clean air authorities, the Washington state conservation commission, and the clean energy leadership council created in section 2, chapter 318, Laws of 2009.

(3) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the director, in cooperation with the department of agriculture, may approve an application only if the director finds:

(a) The project will convert farm products, wastes, cellulose, or biogas directly into electricity or biofuel or other coproducts associated with such conversion;

(b) The project demonstrates technical feasibility and directly assists in moving a commercially viable project into the marketplace for use by Washington state citizens;

(c) The facility will produce long-term economic benefits to the state, a region of the state, or a particular community in the state;

(d) The project does not require continuing state support;

(e) The assistance will result in new jobs, job retention, or higher incomes for citizens of the state;

(f) The state is provided an option under the assistance agreement to purchase a portion of the fuel or feedstock to be produced by the project, exercisable by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services;

(g) The project will increase energy independence or diversity for the state;

(h) The project will use feedstocks produced in the state, if feasible, except this criterion does not apply to the construction of facilities used to distribute and store fuels that are produced from farm products or wastes;

(i) Any product produced by the project will be suitable for its intended use, will meet accepted national or state standards, and will be stored and distributed in a safe and environmentally sound manner;

(j) The application provides for adequate reporting or disclosure of financial and employment data to the director, and permits the director to require an annual or other periodic audit of the project books; and

(k) For research and development projects, the application has been independently reviewed by a peer review committee as defined in RCW 43.325.010 and the findings delivered to the director.

(4) When reviewing an application for a refueling project, the coordinator may award a grant or a loan to an applicant if the director finds:

(a) The project will offer alternative fuels to the motoring public;

(b) The project does not require continued state support;

(c) The project is located within a green highway zone as defined in RCW 43.325.010;

(d) The project will contribute towards an efficient and adequately spaced alternative fuel refueling network along the green highways designated in RCW 47.17.020, 47.17.135, and 47.17.140; and

(e) The project will result in increased access to alternative fueling infrastructure for the motoring public along the green highways designated in RCW 47.17.020, 47.17.135, and 47.17.140.

(5) When reviewing an application for energy efficiency improvements, renewable energy improvements, or innovative energy technology, the director may award a grant or a loan to an applicant if the director finds:

(a) The project or program will result in increased access for the public, state and local governments, and businesses to energy efficiency improvements, renewable energy improvements, or innovative energy technologies;

(b) The project or program demonstrates technical feasibility and directly assists in moving a commercially viable project into the marketplace for use by Washington state citizens;

(c) The project or program does not require continued state support; or

(d) The federal government has provided funds with a limited time frame for use for energy independence and security, energy efficiency, renewable energy, innovative energy technologies, or conservation.

(6)(a) The director may approve a project application for assistance under subsection (3) of this section up to five million dollars. In no circumstances shall this assistance constitute more than fifty percent of the total project cost.

(b) The director may approve a refueling project application for a grant or a loan under subsection (4) of this section up to fifty thousand dollars. In no circumstances shall a grant or a loan award constitute more than fifty percent of the total project cost.

(7) The director shall enter into agreements with approved applicants to fix the terms and rates of the assistance to minimize the costs to the applicants, and to encourage establishment of a viable bioenergy or biofuel industry, or a viable energy efficiency, renewable energy, or innovative energy technology industry. The agreement shall include provisions to protect the state's investment, including a requirement that a successful applicant enter into contracts with any partners that may be involved in the use of any assistance provided under this program, including services, facilities, infrastructure, or equipment. Contracts with any partners shall become part of the application record.

(8) The director may defer any payments for up to twenty-four months or until the project starts to receive revenue from operations, whichever is sooner.

Sec. 90. RCW 43.325.030 and 2009 c 451 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of the department shall appoint a coordinator that is responsible for:

(1) Managing, directing, inventorying, and coordinating state efforts to promote, develop, and encourage biofuel and energy efficiency, renewable energy, and innovative energy technology markets in Washington;

(2) Developing, coordinating, and overseeing the implementation of a plan, or series of plans, for the production, transport, distribution, and delivery of biofuels produced predominantly from recycled products or Washington feedstocks;

(3) Working with the departments of transportation and ((general administration)) enterprise services, and other applicable state and local governmental entities and the private sector, to ensure the development of biofuel fueling stations for use by state and local governmental motor vehicle fleets, and to provide greater availability of public biofuel fueling stations for use by state and local governmental motor vehicle fleets;

(4) Coordinating with the Western Washington University alternative automobile program for opportunities to support new Washington state technology for conversion of fossil fuel fleets to biofuel, hybrid, or alternative fuel propulsion;

(5) Coordinating with the University of Washington's college of forest management and the Olympic natural resources center for the identification of barriers to using the state's forest resources for fuel production, including the economic and transportation barriers of physically bringing forest biomass to the market;

(6) Coordinating with the department of agriculture and Washington State University for the identification of other barriers for future biofuels development and development of strategies for furthering the penetration of the Washington state fossil fuel market with Washington produced biofuels, particularly among public entities.

Sec. 91. RCW 43.330.907 and 2010 c 271 s 308 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the department of commerce pertaining to administrative and support services for the state building code council are transferred to the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services. All references to the director or the department of commerce in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services when referring to the functions transferred in this section. Policy and planning assistance functions performed by the department of commerce remain with the department of commerce.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of commerce in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services.

(b) Any appropriations made to the department of commerce for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on July 1, 2010, be transferred and credited to the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services.

(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of the department of commerce engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services.

(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of commerce shall not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 2010.

(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(7) All classified employees of the department of commerce assigned to the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services under this section whose positions are within an existing bargaining unit description at the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall become a part of the existing bargaining unit at the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services and shall be considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

Sec. 92. RCW 43.331.040 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 35 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of commerce, in consultation with the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services and the Washington State University energy program, shall administer the jobs act.

(2) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services must develop guidelines that are consistent with national and international energy savings performance standards for the implementation of energy savings performance contracting projects by the energy savings performance contractors by December 31, 2010.

(3) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter ((and RCW 43.331.050)) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Cost-effectiveness" means that the present value to higher education institutions and school districts of the energy reasonably expected to be saved or produced by a facility, activity, measure, or piece of equipment over its useful life, including any compensation received from a utility or the Bonneville power administration, is greater than the net present value of the costs of implementing, maintaining, and operating such facility, activity, measure, or piece of equipment over its useful life, when discounted at the cost of public borrowing.

(b) "Energy cost savings" means savings realized in expenses for energy use and expenses associated with water, wastewater, or solid waste systems.

(c) "Energy equipment" means energy management systems and any equipment, materials, or supplies that are expected, upon installation, to reduce the energy use or energy cost of an existing building or facility, and the services associated with the equipment, materials, or supplies, including but not limited to design, engineering, financing, installation, project management, guarantees, operations, and maintenance. Reduction in energy use or energy cost may also include reductions in the use or cost of water, wastewater, or solid waste.

(d) "Energy savings performance contracting" means the process authorized by chapter 39.35C RCW by which a company contracts with a public agency to conduct energy audits and guarantee energy savings from energy efficiency.

(e) "Innovative measures" means advanced or emerging technologies, systems, or approaches that may not yet be in common practice but improve energy efficiency, accelerate deployment, or reduce energy usage, and become widely commercially available in the future if proven successful in demonstration programs without compromising the guaranteed performance or measurable energy and operational cost savings anticipated. Examples of innovative measures include, but are not limited to, advanced energy and systems operations monitoring, diagnostics, and controls systems for buildings; novel heating, cooling, ventilation, and water heating systems; advanced windows and insulation technologies, highly efficient lighting technologies, designs, and controls; and integration of renewable energy sources into buildings, and energy savings verification technologies and solutions.

(f) "Operational cost savings" means savings realized from parts, service fees, capital renewal costs, and other measurable annual expenses to maintain and repair systems. This definition does not mean labor savings related to existing facility staff.

(g) "Public facilities" means buildings, building components, and major equipment or systems owned by public school districts and public higher education institutions.

Sec. 93. RCW 43.331.050 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 35 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within appropriations specifically provided for the purposes of this chapter, the department of commerce, in consultation with the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, and the Washington State University energy program shall establish a competitive process to solicit and evaluate applications from public school districts, public higher education institutions, and other state agencies. Final grant awards shall be determined by the department of commerce.

(2) Grants must be awarded in competitive rounds, based on demand and capacity, with at least five percent of each grant round awarded to small public school districts with fewer than one thousand full-time equivalent students, based on demand and capacity.

(3) Within each competitive round, projects must be weighted and prioritized based on the following criteria and in the following order:

(a) Leverage ratio: In each round, the higher the leverage ratio of nonstate funding sources to state jobs act grant, the higher the project ranking.

(b) Energy savings: In each round, the higher the energy savings, the higher the project ranking. Applicants must submit documentation that demonstrates energy and operational cost savings resulting from the installation of the energy equipment and improvements. The energy savings analysis must be performed by a licensed engineer and documentation must include but is not limited to the following:

(i) A description of the energy equipment and improvements;

(ii) A description of the energy and operational cost savings; and

(iii) A description of the extent to which the project employs collaborative and innovative measures and encourages demonstration of new and emerging technologies with high energy savings or energy cost reductions.

(c) Expediency of expenditure: Project readiness to spend funds must be prioritized so that the legislative intent to expend funds quickly is met.

(4) Projects that do not use energy savings performance contracting must: (a) Verify energy and operational cost savings, as defined in RCW 43.331.040, for ten years or until the energy and operational costs savings pay for the project, whichever is shorter; (b) follow the department of ((general administration's)) enterprise services' energy savings performance contracting project guidelines developed pursuant to RCW 43.331.040; and (c) employ a licensed engineer for the energy audit and construction. The department of commerce may require third-party verification of savings if a project is not implemented by an energy savings performance contractor selected by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services through the request of qualifications process. Third-party verification must be conducted either by an energy savings performance contractor selected by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services through a request for qualifications, a licensed engineer specializing in energy conservation, or by a project resource conservation manager or educational service district resource conservation manager.

(5) To intensify competition, the department of commerce may only award funds to the top eighty-five percent of projects applying in a round until the department of commerce determines a final round is appropriate. Projects that do not receive a grant award in one round may reapply in subsequent rounds.

(6) To match federal grants and programs that require state matching funds and produce significantly higher efficiencies in operations and utilities, the level of innovation criteria may be increased for the purposes of weighted scoring to capture those federal dollars for selected projects that require a higher level of innovation and regional collaboration.

(7) Grant amounts awarded to each project must allow for the maximum number of projects funded with the greatest energy and cost benefit.

(8)(a) The department of commerce must use bond proceeds to pay one-half of the preliminary audit, up to five cents per square foot, if the project does not meet the school district's and higher education institution's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria. School districts and higher education institutions must pay the other one-half of the cost of the preliminary audit if the project does not meet their predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria.

(b) The energy savings performance contractor may not charge for an investment grade audit if the project does not meet the school district's and higher education institution's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria. School districts and higher education institutions must pay the full price of an investment grade audit if they do not proceed with a project that meets the school district's and higher education institution's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria.

(9) The department of commerce may charge projects administrative fees and may pay the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services and the Washington State University energy program administration fees in an amount determined through a memorandum of understanding.

(10) The department of commerce and the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services must submit a joint report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on the timing and use of the grant funds, program administrative function, compliance with apprenticeship utilization requirements in RCW 39.04.320, compliance with prevailing wage requirements, and administration fees by the end of each fiscal year, until the funds are fully expended and all savings verification requirements are fulfilled.

Sec. 94. RCW 44.68.065 and 2010 c 282 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative service center, under the direction of the joint legislative systems committee and the joint legislative systems administrative committee, shall:

(1) Develop a legislative information technology portfolio consistent with the provisions of RCW ((43.105.172)) 43.41A.110;

(2) Participate in the development of an enterprise-based statewide information technology strategy ((as defined in RCW 43.105.019));

(3) Ensure the legislative information technology portfolio is organized and structured to clearly indicate participation in and use of enterprise-wide information technology strategies;

(4) As part of the biennial budget process, submit the legislative information technology portfolio to the chair and ranking member of the ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the senate, the office of financial management, and the ((department of information services)) office of the chief information officer.

Sec. 95. RCW 44.73.010 and 2007 c 453 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created in the legislature a legislative gift center for the retail sale of products bearing the state seal, Washington state souvenirs, other Washington products, and other products as approved. Wholesale purchase of products for sale at the legislative gift center is not subject to competitive bidding.

(2) Governance for the legislative gift center shall be under the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate. They may designate a legislative staff member as the lead staff person to oversee management and operation of the gift shop.

(3) The chief clerk of the house of representatives and secretary of the senate shall consult with the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services in planning, siting, and maintaining legislative building space for the gift center.

(4) Products bearing the "Seal of the State of Washington" as described in Article XVIII, section 1 of the Washington state Constitution and RCW 1.20.080, must be purchased from the secretary of state pursuant to an agreement between the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, and the secretary of state.

Sec. 96. RCW 46.08.065 and 1998 c 111 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any public officer having charge of any vehicle owned or controlled by any county, city, town, or public body in this state other than the state of Washington and used in public business to operate the same upon the public highways of this state unless and until there shall be displayed upon such automobile or other motor vehicle in letters of contrasting color not less than one and one-quarter inches in height in a conspicuous place on the right and left sides thereof, the name of such county, city, town, or other public body, together with the name of the department or office upon the business of which the said vehicle is used. This section shall not apply to vehicles of a sheriff's office, local police department, or any vehicles used by local peace officers under public authority for special undercover or confidential investigative purposes. This subsection shall not apply to: (a) Any municipal transit vehicle operated for purposes of providing public mass transportation; (b) any vehicle governed by the requirements of subsection (4) of this section; nor to (c) any motor vehicle on loan to a school district for driver training purposes. It shall be lawful and constitute compliance with the provisions of this section, however, for the governing body of the appropriate county, city, town, or public body other than the state of Washington or its agencies to adopt and use a distinctive insignia which shall be not less than six inches in diameter across its smallest dimension and which shall be displayed conspicuously on the right and left sides of the vehicle. Such insignia shall be in a color or colors contrasting with the vehicle to which applied for maximum visibility. The name of the public body owning or operating the vehicle shall also be included as part of or displayed above such approved insignia in colors contrasting with the vehicle in letters not less than one and one-quarter inches in height. Immediately below the lettering identifying the public entity and agency operating the vehicle or below an approved insignia shall appear the words "for official use only" in letters at least one inch high in a color contrasting with the color of the vehicle. The appropriate governing body may provide by rule or ordinance for marking of passenger motor vehicles as prescribed in subsection (2) of this section or for exceptions to the marking requirements for local governmental agencies for the same purposes and under the same circumstances as permitted for state agencies under subsection (3) of this section.

(2) Except as provided by subsections (3) and (4) of this section, passenger motor vehicles owned or controlled by the state of Washington, and purchased after July 1, 1989, must be plainly and conspicuously marked on the lower left-hand corner of the rear window with the name of the operating agency or institution or the words "state motor pool," as appropriate, the words "state of Washington — for official use only," and the seal of the state of Washington or the appropriate agency or institution insignia, approved by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services. Markings must be on a transparent adhesive material and conform to the standards established by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services. For the purposes of this section, "passenger motor vehicles" means sedans, station wagons, vans, light trucks, or other motor vehicles under ten thousand pounds gross vehicle weight.

(3) Subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to vehicles used by the Washington state patrol for general undercover or confidential investigative purposes. Traffic control vehicles of the Washington state patrol may be exempted from the requirements of subsection (2) of this section at the discretion of the chief of the Washington state patrol. The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall adopt general rules permitting other exceptions to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section for other vehicles used for law enforcement, confidential public health work, and public assistance fraud or support investigative purposes, for vehicles leased or rented by the state on a casual basis for a period of less than ninety days, and those provided for in RCW 46.08.066(((3))). The exceptions in this subsection, subsection (4) of this section, and those provided for in RCW 46.08.066(((3))) shall be the only exceptions permitted to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

(4) Any motorcycle, vehicle over 10,000 pounds gross vehicle weight, or other vehicle that for structural reasons cannot be marked as required by subsection (1) or (2) of this section that is owned or controlled by the state of Washington or by any county, city, town, or other public body in this state and used for public purposes on the public highways of this state shall be conspicuously marked in letters of a contrasting color with the words "State of Washington" or the name of such county, city, town, or other public body, together with the name of the department or office that owns or controls the vehicle.

(5) All motor vehicle markings required under the terms of this chapter shall be maintained in a legible condition at all times.

Sec. 97. RCW 46.08.150 and 2010 c 161 s 1112 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall have power to devise and promulgate rules and regulations for the control of vehicular and pedestrian traffic and the parking of motor vehicles on the state capitol grounds. However, the monetary penalty for parking a motor vehicle without a valid special license plate or placard in a parking place reserved for persons with physical disabilities shall be the same as provided in RCW 46.19.050. Such rules and regulations shall be promulgated by publication in one issue of a newspaper published at the state capitol and shall be given such further publicity as the director may deem proper.

Sec. 98. RCW 46.08.172 and 1995 c 215 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall establish equitable and consistent parking rental fees for the capitol campus and may, if requested by agencies, establish equitable and consistent parking rental fees for agencies off the capitol campus, to be charged to employees, visitors, clients, service providers, and others, that reflect the legislature's intent to reduce state subsidization of parking or to meet the commute trip reduction goals established in RCW 70.94.527. All fees shall take into account the market rate of comparable privately owned rental parking, as determined by the director. However, parking rental fees are not to exceed the local market rate of comparable privately owned rental parking.

The director may delegate the responsibility for the collection of parking fees to other agencies of state government when cost-effective.

Sec. 99. RCW 47.60.830 and 2008 c 126 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In performing the function of operating its ferry system, the department may, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose and after consultation with the department of ((general administration's office of state procurement)) enterprise services, explore and implement strategies designed to reduce the overall cost of fuel and mitigate the impact of market fluctuations and pressure on both short-term and long-term fuel costs. These strategies may include, but are not limited to, futures contracts, hedging, swap transactions, option contracts, costless collars, and long-term storage. The department shall periodically submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature and the ((office of state procurement)) department of enterprise services on the status of any such implemented strategies, including cost mitigation results, a description of each contract established to mitigate fuel costs, the amounts of fuel covered by the contracts, the cost mitigation results, and any related recommendations. The first report must be submitted within one year of implementation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 100. A new section is added to chapter 49.74 RCW to read as follows:

If no agreement can be reached under RCW 49.74.030, the commission may refer the matter to the administrative law judge for hearing pursuant to RCW 49.60.250. If the administrative law judge finds that the state agency, institution of higher education, or state patrol has not made a good faith effort to correct the noncompliance, the administrative law judge shall order the state agency, institution of higher education, or state patrol to comply with this chapter. The administrative law judge may order any action that may be necessary to achieve compliance, provided such action is not inconsistent with the rules adopted under RCW 41.06.150(6) and 43.43.340(5), whichever is appropriate.

An order by the administrative law judge may be appealed to superior court.

Sec. 101. RCW 70.58.005 and 2009 c 231 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Business days" means Monday through Friday except official state holidays.

(2) "Department" means the department of health.

(3) "Electronic approval" or "electronically approve" means approving the content of an electronically filed vital record through the processes provided by the department. Electronic approval processes shall be consistent with policies, standards, and procedures developed by the ((information services board under RCW 43.105.041)) office of the chief information officer.

(4) "Embalmer" means a person licensed as required in chapter 18.39 RCW and defined in RCW 18.39.010.

(5) "Funeral director" means a person licensed as required in chapter 18.39 RCW and defined in RCW 18.39.010.

(6) "Vital records" means records of birth, death, fetal death, marriage, dissolution, annulment, and legal separation, as maintained under the supervision of the state registrar of vital statistics.

Sec. 102. RCW 70.94.537 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A sixteen member state commute trip reduction board is established as follows:

(a) The secretary of transportation or the secretary's designee who shall serve as chair;

(b) One representative from the office of financial management;

(c) The director or the director's designee of one of the following agencies, to be determined by the secretary of transportation:

(i) Department of ((general administration)) enterprise services;

(ii) Department of ecology;

(iii) Department of commerce;

(d) Three representatives from cities and towns or counties appointed by the secretary of transportation for staggered four-year terms from a list recommended by the association of Washington cities or the Washington state association of counties;

(e) Two representatives from transit agencies appointed by the secretary of transportation for staggered four-year terms from a list recommended by the Washington state transit association;

(f) Two representatives from participating regional transportation planning organizations appointed by the secretary of transportation for staggered four-year terms;

(g) Four representatives of employers at or owners of major worksites in Washington, or transportation management associations, business improvement areas, or other transportation organizations representing employers, appointed by the secretary of transportation for staggered four-year terms; and

(h) Two citizens appointed by the secretary of transportation for staggered four-year terms.

Members of the commute trip reduction board shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Members appointed by the secretary of transportation shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.220. The board has all powers necessary to carry out its duties as prescribed by this chapter.

(2) By March 1, 2007, the department of transportation shall establish rules for commute trip reduction plans and implementation procedures. The commute trip reduction board shall advise the department on the content of the rules. The rules are intended to ensure consistency in commute trip reduction plans and goals among jurisdictions while fairly taking into account differences in employment and housing density, employer size, existing and anticipated levels of transit service, special employer circumstances, and other factors the board determines to be relevant. The rules shall include:

(a) Guidance criteria for growth and transportation efficiency centers;

(b) Data measurement methods and procedures for determining the efficacy of commute trip reduction activities and progress toward meeting commute trip reduction plan goals;

(c) Model commute trip reduction ordinances;

(d) Methods for assuring consistency in the treatment of employers who have worksites subject to the requirements of this chapter in more than one jurisdiction;

(e) An appeals process by which major employers, who as a result of special characteristics of their business or its locations would be unable to meet the requirements of a commute trip reduction plan, may obtain a waiver or modification of those requirements and criteria for determining eligibility for waiver or modification;

(f) Establishment of a process for determining the state's affected areas, including criteria and procedures for regional transportation planning organizations in consultation with local jurisdictions to propose to add or exempt urban growth areas;

(g) Listing of the affected areas of the program to be done every four years as identified in subsection (5) of this section;

(h) Establishment of a criteria and application process to determine whether jurisdictions that voluntarily implement commute trip reduction are eligible for state funding;

(i) Guidelines and deadlines for creating and updating local commute trip reduction plans, including guidance to ensure consistency between the local commute trip reduction plan and the transportation demand management strategies identified in the transportation element in the local comprehensive plan, as required by RCW 36.70A.070;

(j) Guidelines for creating and updating regional commute trip reduction plans, including guidance to ensure the regional commute trip reduction plan is consistent with and incorporated into transportation demand management components in the regional transportation plan;

(k) Methods for regional transportation planning organizations to evaluate and certify that designated growth and transportation efficiency center programs meet the minimum requirements and are eligible for funding;

(l) Guidelines for creating and updating growth and transportation efficiency center programs; and

(m) Establishment of statewide program goals. The goals shall be designed to achieve substantial reductions in the proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute trips and the commute trip vehicle miles traveled per employee, at a level that is projected to improve the mobility of people and goods by increasing the efficiency of the state highway system.

(3) The board shall create a state commute trip reduction plan that shall be updated every four years as discussed in subsection (5) of this section. The state commute trip reduction plan shall include, but is not limited to: (a) Statewide commute trip reduction program goals that are designed to substantially improve the mobility of people and goods; (b) identification of strategies at the state and regional levels to achieve the goals and recommendations for how transportation demand management strategies can be targeted most effectively to support commute trip reduction program goals; (c) performance measures for assessing the cost-effectiveness of commute trip reduction strategies and the benefits for the state transportation system; and (d) a sustainable financial plan. The board shall review and approve regional commute trip reduction plans, and work collaboratively with regional transportation planning organizations in the establishment of the state commute trip reduction plan.

(4) The board shall work with affected jurisdictions, major employers, and other parties to develop and implement a public awareness campaign designed to increase the effectiveness of local commute trip reduction programs and support achievement of the objectives identified in this chapter.

(5) The board shall evaluate and update the commute trip reduction program plan and recommend changes to the rules every four years, with the first assessment report due July 1, 2011, to ensure that the latest data methodology used by the department of transportation is incorporated into the program and to determine which areas of the state should be affected by the program. The board shall review the definition of a major employer no later than December 1, 2009. The board shall regularly identify urban growth areas that are projected to be affected by chapter 329, Laws of 2006 in the next four-year period and may provide advance planning support to the potentially affected jurisdictions.

(6) The board shall review progress toward implementing commute trip reduction plans and programs and the costs and benefits of commute trip reduction plans and programs and shall make recommendations to the legislature and the governor by December 1, 2009, and every two years thereafter. In assessing the costs and benefits, the board shall consider the costs of not having implemented commute trip reduction plans and programs ((with the assistance of the transportation performance audit board authorized under chapter 44.75 RCW)). The board shall examine other transportation demand management programs nationally and incorporate its findings into its recommendations to the legislature. The recommendations shall address the need for continuation, modification, or termination or any or all requirements of this chapter.

(7) The board shall invite personnel with appropriate expertise from state, regional, and local government, private, public, and nonprofit providers of transportation services, and employers or owners of major worksites in Washington to act as a technical advisory group. The technical advisory group shall advise the board on the implementation of local and regional commute trip reduction plans and programs, program evaluation, program funding allocations, and state rules and guidelines.

Sec. 103. RCW 70.94.551 and 2009 c 427 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary of the department of transportation may coordinate an interagency board or other interested parties for the purpose of developing policies or guidelines that promote consistency among state agency commute trip reduction programs required by RCW 70.94.527 and 70.94.531 or developed under the joint comprehensive commute trip reduction plan described in this section. The board shall include representatives of the departments of transportation, ((general administration)) enterprise services, ecology, and ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce and such other departments and interested groups as the secretary of the department of transportation determines to be necessary. Policies and guidelines shall be applicable to all state agencies including but not limited to policies and guidelines regarding parking and parking charges, employee incentives for commuting by other than single-occupant automobiles, flexible and alternative work schedules, alternative worksites, and the use of state-owned vehicles for car and van pools and guaranteed rides home. The policies and guidelines shall also consider the costs and benefits to state agencies of achieving commute trip reductions and consider mechanisms for funding state agency commute trip reduction programs.

(2) State agencies sharing a common location in affected urban growth areas where the total number of state employees is one hundred or more shall, with assistance from the department of transportation, develop and implement a joint commute trip reduction program. The worksite must be treated as specified in RCW 70.94.531 and 70.94.534.

(3) The department of transportation shall develop a joint comprehensive commute trip reduction plan for all state agencies, including institutions of higher education, located in the Olympia, Lacey, and Tumwater urban growth areas.

(a) In developing the joint comprehensive commute trip reduction plan, the department of transportation shall work with applicable state agencies, including institutions of higher education, and shall collaborate with the following entities: Local jurisdictions; regional transportation planning organizations as described in chapter 47.80 RCW; transit agencies, including regional transit authorities as described in chapter 81.112 RCW and transit agencies that serve areas within twenty-five miles of the Olympia, Lacey, or Tumwater urban growth areas; and the capitol campus design advisory committee established in RCW 43.34.080.

(b) The joint comprehensive commute trip reduction plan must build on existing commute trip reduction programs and policies. At a minimum, the joint comprehensive commute trip reduction plan must include strategies for telework and flexible work schedules, parking management, and consideration of the impacts of worksite location and design on multimodal transportation options.

(c) The joint comprehensive commute trip reduction plan must include performance measures and reporting methods and requirements.

(d) The joint comprehensive commute trip reduction plan may include strategies to accommodate differences in worksite size and location.

(e) The joint comprehensive commute trip reduction plan must be consistent with jurisdictional and regional transportation, land use, and commute trip reduction plans, the state six-year facilities plan, and the master plan for the capitol of the state of Washington.

(f) Not more than ninety days after the adoption of the joint comprehensive commute trip reduction plan, state agencies within the three urban growth areas must implement a commute trip reduction program consistent with the objectives and strategies of the joint comprehensive commute trip reduction plan.

(4) The department of transportation shall review the initial commute trip reduction program of each state agency subject to the commute trip reduction plan for state agencies to determine if the program is likely to meet the applicable commute trip reduction goals and notify the agency of any deficiencies. If it is found that the program is not likely to meet the applicable commute trip reduction goals, the department of transportation will work with the agency to modify the program as necessary.

(5) Each state agency implementing a commute trip reduction plan shall report at least once per year to its agency director on the performance of the agency's commute trip reduction program as part of the agency's quality management, accountability, and performance system as defined by RCW 43.17.385. The reports shall assess the performance of the program, progress toward state goals established under RCW 70.94.537, and recommendations for improving the program.

(6) The department of transportation shall review the agency performance reports defined in subsection (5) of this section and submit a biennial report for state agencies subject to this chapter to the governor and incorporate the report in the commute trip reduction board report to the legislature as directed in RCW 70.94.537(6). The report shall include, but is not limited to, an evaluation of the most recent measurement results, progress toward state goals established under RCW 70.94.537, and recommendations for improving the performance of state agency commute trip reduction programs. The information shall be reported in a form established by the commute trip reduction board.

Sec. 104. RCW 70.95.265 and 1995 c 399 s 190 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall work closely with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce, the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, and with other state departments and agencies, the Washington state association of counties, the association of Washington cities, and business associations, to carry out the objectives and purposes of chapter 41, Laws of 1975-'76 2nd ex. sess.

Sec. 105. RCW 70.95C.110 and 1989 c 431 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds and declares that the buildings and facilities owned and leased by state government produce significant amounts of solid and hazardous wastes, and actions must be taken to reduce and recycle these wastes and thus reduce the costs associated with their disposal. In order for the operations of state government to provide the citizens of the state an example of positive waste management, the legislature further finds and declares that state government should undertake an aggressive program designed to reduce and recycle solid and hazardous wastes produced in the operations of state buildings and facilities to the maximum extent possible.

The office of waste reduction, in cooperation with the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, shall establish an intensive waste reduction and recycling program to promote the reduction of waste produced by state agencies and to promote the source separation and recovery of recyclable and reusable materials.

All state agencies, including but not limited to, colleges, community colleges, universities, offices of elected and appointed officers, the supreme court, court of appeals, and administrative departments of state government shall fully cooperate with the office of waste reduction and recycling in all phases of implementing the provisions of this section. The office shall establish a coordinated state plan identifying each agency's participation in waste reduction and recycling. The office shall develop the plan in cooperation with a multiagency committee on waste reduction and recycling. Appointments to the committee shall be made by the director of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services. The director shall notify each agency of the committee, which shall implement the applicable waste reduction and recycling plan elements. All state agencies are to use maximum efforts to achieve a goal of increasing the use of recycled paper by fifty percent by July 1, 1993.

Sec. 106. RCW 70.95H.030 and 1992 c 131 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The center shall:

(1) Provide targeted business assistance to recycling businesses, including:

(a) Development of business plans;

(b) Market research and planning information;

(c) Access to financing programs;

(d) Referral and information on market conditions; and

(e) Information on new technology and product development;

(2) Negotiate voluntary agreements with manufacturers to increase the use of recycled materials in product development;

(3) Support and provide research and development to stimulate and commercialize new and existing technologies and products using recycled materials;

(4) Undertake an integrated, comprehensive education effort directed to recycling businesses to promote processing, manufacturing, and purchase of recycled products, including:

(a) Provide information to recycling businesses on the availability and benefits of using recycled materials;

(b) Provide information and referral services on recycled material markets;

(c) Provide information on new research and technologies that may be used by local businesses and governments; and

(d) Participate in projects to demonstrate new market uses or applications for recycled products;

(5) Assist the departments of ecology and ((general administration)) enterprise services in the development of consistent definitions and standards on recycled content, product performance, and availability;

(6) Undertake studies on the unmet capital needs of reprocessing and manufacturing firms using recycled materials;

(7) Undertake and participate in marketing promotions for the purposes of achieving expanded market penetration for recycled content products;

(8) Coordinate with the department of ecology to ensure that the education programs of both are mutually reinforcing, with the center acting as the lead entity with respect to recycling businesses, and the department as the lead entity with respect to the general public and retailers;

(9) Develop an annual work plan. The plan shall describe actions and recommendations for developing markets for commodities comprising a significant percentage of the waste stream and having potential for use as an industrial or commercial feedstock. The initial plan shall address, but not be limited to, mixed waste paper, waste tires, yard and food waste, and plastics; and

(10) Represent the state in regional and national market development issues.

Sec. 107. RCW 70.95M.060 and 2003 c 260 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of general administration must, by January 1, 2005, revise its rules, policies, and guidelines to implement the purpose of this chapter.

(2) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services must give priority and preference to the purchase of equipment, supplies, and other products that contain no mercury-added compounds or components, unless: (a) There is no economically feasible nonmercury-added alternative that performs a similar function; or (b) the product containing mercury is designed to reduce electricity consumption by at least forty percent and there is no nonmercury or lower mercury alternative available that saves the same or a greater amount of electricity as the exempted product. In circumstances where a nonmercury-added product is not available, preference must be given to the purchase of products that contain the least amount of mercury added to the product necessary for the required performance.

Sec. 108. RCW 70.235.050 and 2009 c 519 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All state agencies shall meet the statewide greenhouse gas emission limits established in RCW 70.235.020 to achieve the following, using the estimates and strategy established in subsections (2) and (3) of this section:

(a) By July 1, 2020, reduce emissions by fifteen percent from 2005 emission levels;

(b) By 2035, reduce emissions to thirty-six percent below 2005 levels; and

(c) By 2050, reduce emissions to the greater reduction of fifty-seven and one-half percent below 2005 levels, or seventy percent below the expected state government emissions that year.

(2)(a) By June 30, 2010, all state agencies shall report estimates of emissions for 2005 to the department, including 2009 levels of emissions, and projected emissions through 2035.

(b) State agencies required to report under RCW 70.94.151 must estimate emissions from methodologies recommended by the department and must be based on actual operation of those agencies. Agencies not required to report under RCW 70.94.151 shall derive emissions estimates using an emissions calculator provided by the department.

(3) By June 30, 2011, each state agency shall submit to the department a strategy to meet the requirements in subsection (1) of this section. The strategy must address employee travel activities, teleconferencing alternatives, and include existing and proposed actions, a timeline for reductions, and recommendations for budgetary and other incentives to reduce emissions, especially from employee business travel.

(4) By October 1st of each even-numbered year beginning in 2012, each state agency shall report to the department the actions taken to meet the emission reduction targets under the strategy for the preceding fiscal biennium. The department may authorize the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services to report on behalf of any state agency having fewer than five hundred full-time equivalent employees at any time during the reporting period. The department shall cooperate with the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services and the department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce to develop consolidated reporting methodologies that incorporate emission reduction actions taken across all or substantially all state agencies.

(5) All state agencies shall cooperate in providing information to the department, the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, and the department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce for the purposes of this section.

(6) The governor shall designate a person as the single point of accountability for all energy and climate change initiatives within state agencies. This position must be funded from current full-time equivalent allocations without increasing budgets or staffing levels. If duties must be shifted within an agency, they must be shifted among current full-time equivalent allocations. All agencies, councils, or work groups with energy or climate change initiatives shall coordinate with this designee.

Sec. 109. RCW 71A.20.190 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 30 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A developmental disability service system task force is established.

(2) The task force shall be convened by September 1, 2011, and consist of the following members:

(a) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, from different political caucuses;

(b) Two members of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, from different political caucuses;

(c) The following members appointed by the governor:

(i) Two advocates for people with developmental disabilities;

(ii) A representative from the developmental disabilities council;

(iii) A representative of families of residents in residential habilitation centers;

(iv) Two representatives of labor unions representing workers who serve residents in residential habilitation centers;

(d) The secretary of the department of social and health services or their designee; and

(e) The ((secretary)) director of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services or their designee.

(3) The members of the task force shall select the chair or cochairs of the task force.

(4) Staff assistance for the task force will be provided by legislative staff and staff from the agencies listed in subsection (2) of this section.

(5) The task force shall make recommendations on:

(a) The development of a system of services for persons with developmental disabilities that is consistent with the goals articulated in section 1, chapter 30, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.;

(b) The state's long-term needs for residential habilitation center capacity, including the benefits and disadvantages of maintaining one center in eastern Washington and one center in western Washington;

(c) A plan for efficient consolidation of institutional capacity, including whether one or more centers should be downsized or closed and, if so, a time frame for closure;

(d) Mechanisms through which any savings that result from the downsizing, consolidation, or closure of residential habilitation center capacity can be used to create additional community-based capacity;

(e) Strategies for the use of surplus property that results from the closure of one or more centers;

(f) Strategies for reframing the mission of Yakima Valley School consistent with chapter 30, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. that consider:

(i) The opportunity, where cost-effective, to provide medical services, including centers of excellence, to other clients served by the department; and

(ii) The creation of a treatment team consisting of crisis stabilization and short-term respite services personnel, with the long-term goal of expanding to include the provisions of specialty services such as dental care, physical therapy, occupational therapy, and specialized nursing care to individuals with developmental disabilities residing in the surrounding community.

(6) The task force shall report their recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2012.

Sec. 110. RCW 72.01.430 and 1981 c 136 s 75 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, is hereby authorized to transfer equipment, livestock and supplies between the several institutions within the department without reimbursement to the transferring institution excepting, however, any such equipment donated by organizations for the sole use of such transferring institutions. Whenever transfers of capital items are made between institutions of the department, notice thereof shall be given to the director of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services accompanied by a full description of such items with inventory numbers, if any.

Sec. 111. RCW 72.09.450 and 1996 c 277 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An inmate shall not be denied access to services or supplies required by state or federal law solely on the basis of his or her inability to pay for them.

(2) The department shall record all lawfully authorized assessments for services or supplies as a debt to the department. The department shall recoup the assessments when the inmate's institutional account exceeds the indigency standard, and may pursue other remedies to recoup the assessments after the period of incarceration.

(3) The department shall record as a debt any costs assessed by a court against an inmate plaintiff where the state is providing defense pursuant to chapter 4.92 RCW. The department shall recoup the debt when the inmate's institutional account exceeds the indigency standard and may pursue other remedies to recoup the debt after the period of incarceration.

(4) In order to maximize the cost-efficient collection of unpaid offender debt existing after the period of an offender's incarceration, the department is authorized to use the following nonexclusive options: (a) Use the collection services available through the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, or (b) notwithstanding any provision of chapter 41.06 RCW, contract with collection agencies for collection of the debts. The costs for ((general administration)) enterprise services or collection agency services shall be paid by the debtor. Any contract with a collection agency shall only be awarded after competitive bidding. Factors the department shall consider in awarding a collection contract include but are not limited to a collection agency's history and reputation in the community; and the agency's access to a local database that may increase the efficiency of its collections. The servicing of an unpaid obligation to the department does not constitute assignment of a debt, and no contract with a collection agency may remove the department's control over unpaid obligations owed to the department.

Sec. 112. RCW 77.12.177 and 2011 c 339 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in this title, state and county officers receiving the following moneys shall deposit them in the state general fund:

(a) The sale of commercial licenses required under this title, except for licenses issued under RCW 77.65.490; and

(b) Moneys received for damages to food fish or shellfish.

(2) The director shall make weekly remittances to the state treasurer of moneys collected by the department.

(3) All fines and forfeitures collected or assessed by a district court for a violation of this title or rule of the department shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW.

(4) Proceeds from the sale of food fish or shellfish taken in test fishing conducted by the department, to the extent that these proceeds exceed the estimates in the budget approved by the legislature, may be allocated as unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.270 to reimburse the department for unanticipated costs for test fishing operations in excess of the allowance in the budget approved by the legislature.

(5) Proceeds from the sale of salmon carcasses and salmon eggs from state general funded hatcheries by the department ((of general administration)) shall be deposited in the regional fisheries enhancement group account established in RCW 77.95.090.

(6) Proceeds from the sale of herring spawn on kelp fishery licenses by the department, to the extent those proceeds exceed estimates in the budget approved by the legislature, may be allocated as unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.270. Allocations under this subsection shall be made only for herring management, enhancement, and enforcement.

Sec. 113. RCW 77.12.451 and 1990 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director may take or remove any species of fish or shellfish from the waters or beaches of the state.

(2) The director may sell food fish or shellfish caught or taken during department test fishing operations.

(3) The director shall not sell inedible salmon for human consumption. Salmon and carcasses may be given to state institutions or schools or to economically depressed people, unless the salmon are unfit for human consumption. Salmon not fit for human consumption may be sold by the director for animal food, fish food, or for industrial purposes.

(4) In the sale of surplus salmon from state hatcheries, the ((division of purchasing)) director shall require that a portion of the surplus salmon be processed and returned to the state by the purchaser. The processed salmon shall be fit for human consumption and in a form suitable for distribution to individuals. The ((division of purchasing)) department shall establish the required percentage at a level that does not discourage competitive bidding for the surplus salmon. The measure of the percentage is the combined value of all of the surplus salmon sold. The department of social and health services shall distribute the processed salmon to economically depressed individuals and state institutions pursuant to rules adopted by the department of social and health services.

Sec. 114. RCW 79.19.080 and 2003 c 334 s 531 are each amended to read as follows:

Periodically, at intervals to be determined by the board, the department shall identify trust lands which are expected to convert to commercial, residential, or industrial uses within ten years. The department shall adhere to existing local comprehensive plans, zoning classifications, and duly adopted local policies when making this identification and determining the fair market value of the property.

The department shall hold a public hearing on the proposal in the county where the state land is located. At least fifteen days but not more than thirty days before the hearing, the department shall publish a public notice of reasonable size in display advertising form, setting forth the date, time, and place of the hearing, at least once in one or more daily newspapers of general circulation in the county and at least once in one or more weekly newspapers circulated in the area where the trust land is located. At the same time that the published notice is given, the department shall give written notice of the hearings to the departments of fish and wildlife and ((general administration)) enterprise services, to the parks and recreation commission, and to the county, city, or town in which the property is situated. The department shall disseminate a news release pertaining to the hearing among printed and electronic media in the area where the trust land is located. The public notice and news release also shall identify trust lands in the area which are expected to convert to commercial, residential, or industrial uses within ten years.

A summary of the testimony presented at the hearings shall be prepared for the board's consideration. The board shall designate trust lands which are expected to convert to commercial, residential, or industrial uses as urban land. Descriptions of lands designated by the board shall be made available to the county and city or town in which the land is situated and for public inspection and copying at the department's administrative office in Olympia, Washington and at each area office.

The hearing and notice requirements of this section apply to those trust lands which have been identified by the department prior to July 1, 1984, as being expected to convert to commercial, residential, or industrial uses within the next ten years, and which have not been sold or exchanged prior to July 1, 1984.

Sec. 115. RCW 79.24.300 and 1977 c 75 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

The state capitol committee may construct parking facilities for the state capitol adequate to provide parking space for automobiles, said parking facilities to be either of a single level, multiple level, or both, and to be either on one site or more than one site and located either on or in close proximity to the capitol grounds, though not necessarily contiguous thereto. The state capitol committee may select such lands as are necessary therefor and acquire them by purchase or condemnation. As an aid to such selection the committee may cause location, topographical, economic, traffic, and other surveys to be conducted, and for this purpose may utilize the services of existing state agencies, may employ personnel, or may contract for the services of any person, firm or corporation. In selecting the location and plans for the construction of the parking facilities the committee shall consider recommendations of the director of ((general administration)) enterprise services.

Space in parking facilities may be rented to the officers and employees of the state on a monthly basis at a rental to be determined by the director of ((general administration)) enterprise services. The state shall not sell gasoline, oil, or any other commodities or perform any services for any vehicles or equipment other than state equipment.

Sec. 116. RCW 79.24.530 and 1961 c 167 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall develop, amend and modify an overall plan for the design and establishment of state capitol buildings and grounds on the east capitol site in accordance with current and prospective requisites of a state capitol befitting the state of Washington. The overall plan, amendments and modifications thereto shall be subject to the approval of the state capitol committee.

Sec. 117. RCW 79.24.540 and 1961 c 167 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

State agencies which are authorized by law to acquire land and construct buildings, whether from appropriated funds or from funds not subject to appropriation by the legislature, may buy land in the east capitol site and construct buildings thereon so long as the location, design and construction meet the requirements established by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services and approved by the state capitol committee.

Sec. 118. RCW 79.24.560 and 1961 c 167 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall have the power to rent, lease, or otherwise use any of the properties acquired in the east capitol site.

Sec. 119. RCW 79.24.570 and 2000 c 11 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

All moneys received by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services from the management of the east capitol site, excepting (1) funds otherwise dedicated prior to April 28, 1967, (2) parking and rental charges and fines which are required to be deposited in other accounts, and (3) reimbursements of service and other utility charges made to the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, shall be deposited in the capitol purchase and development account of the state general fund.

Sec. 120. RCW 79.24.664 and 1969 ex.s. c 272 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

There is appropriated to the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services from the general fund—state building construction account the sum of fifteen million dollars or so much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes set forth in RCW 79.24.650.

Sec. 121. RCW 79.24.710 and 2005 c 330 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW 79.24.720, 79.24.730, 43.01.090, 43.19.500, and 79.24.087, "state capitol public and historic facilities" includes:

(1) The east, west and north capitol campus grounds, Sylvester park, Heritage park, Marathon park, Centennial park, the Deschutes river basin commonly known as Capitol lake, the interpretive center, Deschutes parkway, and the landscape, memorials, artwork, fountains, streets, sidewalks, lighting, and infrastructure in each of these areas not including state-owned aquatic lands in these areas managed by the department of natural resources under RCW ((79.90.450)) 79.105.010;

(2) The public spaces and the historic interior and exterior elements of the following buildings: The visitor center, the Governor's mansion, the legislative building, the John L. O'Brien building, the Cherberg building, the Newhouse building, the Pritchard building, the temple of justice, the insurance building, the Dolliver building, capitol court, and the old capitol buildings, including the historic state-owned furnishings and works of art commissioned for or original to these buildings; and

(3) Other facilities or elements of facilities as determined by the state capitol committee, in consultation with the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services.

Sec. 122. RCW 79.24.720 and 2005 c 330 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services is responsible for the stewardship, preservation, operation, and maintenance of the public and historic facilities of the state capitol, subject to the policy direction of the state capitol committee ((and the legislative buildings committee as created in chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1301), Laws of 2005,)) and the guidance of the capitol campus design advisory committee. In administering this responsibility, the department shall:

(1) Apply the United States secretary of the interior's standards for the treatment of historic properties;

(2) Seek to balance the functional requirements of state government operations with public access and the long-term preservation needs of the properties themselves; and

(3) Consult with the capitol furnishings preservation committee, the state historic preservation officer, the state arts commission, and the state facilities accessibility advisory committee in fulfilling the responsibilities provided for in this section.

Sec. 123. RCW 79.24.730 and 2005 c 330 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To provide for responsible stewardship of the state capitol public and historic facilities, funding for:

(a) Maintenance and operational needs shall be authorized in the state's omnibus appropriations act and funded by the ((general administration)) enterprise services account as provided under RCW 43.19.500;

(b) Development and preservation needs shall be authorized in the state's capital budget. To the extent revenue is available, the capitol building construction account under RCW 79.24.087 shall fund capital budget needs. If capitol building construction account funds are not available, the state building construction account funds may be authorized for this purpose.

(2) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise services may seek grants, gifts, or donations to support the stewardship of state capitol public and historic facilities. The department may: (a) Purchase historic state capitol furnishings or artifacts; or (b) sell historic state capitol furnishings and artifacts that have been designated as state surplus by the capitol furnishings preservation committee under RCW 27.48.040(6). Funds generated from grants, gifts, donations, or sales for omnibus appropriations act needs shall be deposited into the ((general administration)) enterprise services account. Funds generated for capital budget needs shall be deposited into the capitol building construction account.

Sec. 124. RCW 79A.15.010 and 2009 c 341 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Acquisition" means the purchase on a willing seller basis of fee or less than fee interests in real property. These interests include, but are not limited to, options, rights of first refusal, conservation easements, leases, and mineral rights.

(2) "Board" means the recreation and conservation funding board.

(3) "Critical habitat" means lands important for the protection, management, or public enjoyment of certain wildlife species or groups of species, including, but not limited to, wintering range for deer, elk, and other species, waterfowl and upland bird habitat, fish habitat, and habitat for endangered, threatened, or sensitive species.

(4) "Farmlands" means any land defined as "farm and agricultural land" in RCW 84.34.020(2).

(5) "Local agencies" means a city, county, town, federally recognized Indian tribe, special purpose district, port district, or other political subdivision of the state providing services to less than the entire state.

(6) "Natural areas" means areas that have, to a significant degree, retained their natural character and are important in preserving rare or vanishing flora, fauna, geological, natural historical, or similar features of scientific or educational value.

(7) "Nonprofit nature conservancy corporation or association" means an organization as defined in RCW 84.34.250.

(8) "Riparian habitat" means land adjacent to water bodies, as well as submerged land such as streambeds, which can provide functional habitat for salmonids and other fish and wildlife species. Riparian habitat includes, but is not limited to, shorelines and near-shore marine habitat, estuaries, lakes, wetlands, streams, and rivers.

(9) "Special needs populations" means physically restricted people or people of limited means.

(10) "State agencies" means the state parks and recreation commission, the department of natural resources, the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, and the department of fish and wildlife.

(11) "Trails" means public ways constructed for and open to pedestrians, equestrians, or bicyclists, or any combination thereof, other than a sidewalk constructed as a part of a city street or county road for exclusive use of pedestrians.

(12) "Urban wildlife habitat" means lands that provide habitat important to wildlife in proximity to a metropolitan area.

(13) "Water access" means boat or foot access to marine waters, lakes, rivers, or streams.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 125. RCW 37.14.010, 43.19.533, 43.320.012, 43.320.013, 43.320.014, 43.320.015, 43.320.901, and 70.120.210 are each decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 126. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.105.041 (Powers and duties of board) and 2011 c 358 s 6, 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 65, 2009 c 486 s 13, 2003 c 18 s 3, & 1999 c 285 s 5;

(2) RCW 43.105.178 (Information technology assets—Inventory) and 2010 c 282 s 12;

(3) RCW 43.105.330 (State interoperability executive committee) and 2011 c 367 s 711, 2006 c 76 s 2, & 2003 c 18 s 4;

(4) RCW 43.105.070 (Confidential or privileged information) and 1969 ex.s. c 212 s 4; and

(5) RCW 49.74.040 (Failure to reach conciliation agreement—Administrative hearing—Appeal) and 2002 c 354 s 248, 2002 c 354 s 247, & 1985 c 365 s 11.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 127. Section 89 of this act expires June 30, 2016.

--- END ---