BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 1.60.010 and 2000 c 224 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There is established a decoration of the state medal of valor with accompanying certificate, ribbons, and appurtenances for award by the governor, in the name of the state, to any person or group of persons who has or have saved, or attempted to save, the life of another at the risk of serious injury or death to himself or herself, upon the selection of the governor's state medal of valor committee.

Sec. 2. RCW 1.60.020 and 2000 c 224 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created the state medal of valor committee for selecting honorees for the award of the state medal of valor. The committee membership consists of the governor, president of the senate, speaker of the house of representatives, and the chief justice of the supreme court, or their designees. The secretary of state shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member, and shall serve as secretary to the committee. The committee shall meet annually to consider candidates for this award. Any individual may nominate any resident or group of residents of this state for any act of valor covered by this section. The committee shall adopt rules establishing the qualifications for the state medal of valor, the protocol governing the decoration, the certificate, and appurtenances necessary to the implementation of this chapter.

Sec. 3. RCW 1.60.030 and 2000 c 224 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The award will be presented by the governor of the state of Washington to the recipient or recipients only during a joint session of both houses of the legislature.

(2) If the governor is unable to present the award due to the disability or illness of the governor, the governor may delegate the presenting of the award to the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, or the chief justice of the supreme court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---