BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Dense breast tissue" means heterogeneously dense or extremely dense tissue as defined in nationally recognized guidelines or systems for breast imaging reporting of mammography screening, including the breast imaging reporting and data system of the American college of radiology, as they exist on the effective date of this section.

(b) "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

(2) If a physician has determined, after a mammogram is performed, that a patient has dense breast tissue, the facility where the mammogram was performed shall provide the following notice in the summary of the written report sent to the patient as required by federal law:

"Your mammogram shows that your breast tissue is dense. Dense breast tissue is common but can make it harder to evaluate the results of your mammogram. Adult women of all ages are encouraged to perform a monthly breast self-exam. This information about your mammogram results is given to you to raise your awareness and to inform your conversations with your primary care provider. A report of your results was sent to your primary care provider."

(3) This section does not create a duty of care or impose any liability on a physician or health care facility beyond the duty to provide notice as required in this section.

--- END ---