BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that human trafficking is modern day slavery, which often takes the form of forced sexual exploitation. The potential to make significant financial gains is what motivates sex traffickers to use force, coercion, and physical violence to require victims to engage in sex acts for profit. The legislature finds that both children and adults are forced daily to sell themselves for the profit of others. It is the intent of the legislature that the buyers of sex are held responsible for their participation in this form of modern day slavery. Local governments and law enforcement agencies must have the effective tools necessary to focus on the buyers of sex in order to deter the demand for sexual exploitation. Providing law enforcement with the ability to seize and forfeit the property of buyers who use that property to commit the crime of sexual exploitation will hold these individuals responsible for actions that perpetuate human sex trafficking in our state.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.88.150 and 2014 c 188 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following are subject to seizure and forfeiture and no property right exists in them:

(a) Any property or other interest acquired or maintained in violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070 to the extent of the investment of funds, and any appreciation or income attributable to the investment, from a violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070;

(b) All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels, which are used, or intended for use, in any manner to facilitate a violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, ((or)) 9A.88.070, or 9A.88.110, except that:

(i) No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture under this section unless it appears that the owner or other person in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, ((or)) 9A.88.070, or 9A.88.110;

(ii) No conveyance is subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of any act or omission established by the owner thereof to have been committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent;

(iii) A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission; and

(iv) When the owner of a conveyance has been arrested for a violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, ((or)) 9A.88.070, or 9A.88.110, the conveyance in which the person is arrested may not be subject to forfeiture unless it is seized or process is issued for its seizure within ten days of the owner's arrest;

(c) Any property, contractual right, or claim against property used to influence any enterprise that a person has established, operated, controlled, conducted, or participated in the conduct of, in violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070;

(d) All proceeds traceable to or derived from an offense defined in RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070 and all moneys, negotiable instruments, securities, and other things of value significantly used or intended to be used significantly to facilitate commission of the offense;

(e) All books, records, and research products and materials, including formulas, microfilm, tapes, and data which are used, or intended for use, in violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070;

(f) All moneys, negotiable instruments, securities, or other tangible or intangible property of value furnished or intended to be furnished by any person in exchange for a violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, ((or)) 9A.88.070, or 9A.88.110, all tangible or intangible personal property, proceeds, or assets acquired in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to an exchange or series of exchanges in violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070, and all moneys, negotiable instruments, and securities used or intended to be used to facilitate any violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070. A forfeiture of money, negotiable instruments, securities, or other tangible or intangible property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if, at the time the security interest was created, the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission. No personal property may be forfeited under this subsection (1)(f), to the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission, which that owner establishes was committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent; and

(g) All real property, including any right, title, and interest in the whole of any lot or tract of land, and any appurtenances or improvements which are being used with the knowledge of the owner for a violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070, or which have been acquired in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to an exchange or series of exchanges in violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070, if a substantial nexus exists between the violation and the real property. However:

(i) No property may be forfeited pursuant to this subsection (1)(g), to the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent;

(ii) A forfeiture of real property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party, at the time the security interest was created, neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission.

(2) Real or personal property subject to forfeiture under this section may be seized by any law enforcement officer of this state upon process issued by any superior court having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure of real property shall include the filing of a lis pendens by the seizing agency. Real property seized under this section shall not be transferred or otherwise conveyed until ninety days after seizure or until a judgment of forfeiture is entered, whichever is later: PROVIDED, That real property seized under this section may be transferred or conveyed to any person or entity who acquires title by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a security interest. Seizure of personal property without process may be made if:

(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant;

(b) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding; or

(c) The law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, ((or)) 9A.88.070, or 9A.88.110.

(3) In the event of seizure pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, proceedings for forfeiture shall be deemed commenced by the seizure. The law enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure was made shall cause notice to be served within fifteen days following the seizure on the owner of the property seized and the person in charge thereof and any person having any known right or interest therein, including any community property interest, of the seizure and intended forfeiture of the seized property. Service of notice of seizure of real property shall be made according to the rules of civil procedure. However, the state may not obtain a default judgment with respect to real property against a party who is served by substituted service absent an affidavit stating that a good faith effort has been made to ascertain if the defaulted party is incarcerated within the state, and that there is no present basis to believe that the party is incarcerated within the state. Notice of seizure in the case of property subject to a security interest that has been perfected by filing a financing statement, or a certificate of title, shall be made by service upon the secured party or the secured party's assignee at the address shown on the financing statement or the certificate of title. The notice of seizure in other cases may be served by any method authorized by law or court rule including, but not limited to, service by certified mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail shall be deemed complete upon mailing within the fifteen day period following the seizure.

(4) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of items specified in subsection (1) of this section within forty-five days of the service of notice from the seizing agency in the case of personal property and ninety days in the case of real property, the item seized shall be deemed forfeited. The community property interest in real property of a person whose spouse or domestic partner committed a violation giving rise to seizure of the real property may not be forfeited if the person did not participate in the violation.

(5) If any person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of items specified in subsection (1) of this section within forty-five days of the service of notice from the seizing agency in the case of personal property and ninety days in the case of real property, the person or persons shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to the claim or right. The notice of claim may be served by any method authorized by law or court rule including, but not limited to, service by first-class mail. Service by mail shall be deemed complete upon mailing within the forty-five day period following service of the notice of seizure in the case of personal property and within the ninety day period following service of the notice of seizure in the case of real property. The hearing shall be before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or the chief law enforcement officer's designee, except where the seizing agency is a state agency as defined in RCW 34.12.020(4), the hearing shall be before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except that any person asserting a claim or right may remove the matter to a court of competent jurisdiction. Removal of any matter involving personal property may only be accomplished according to the rules of civil procedure. The person seeking removal of the matter must serve process against the state, county, political subdivision, or municipality that operates the seizing agency, and any other party of interest, in accordance with RCW 4.28.080 or 4.92.020, within forty-five days after the person seeking removal has notified the seizing law enforcement agency of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession. The court to which the matter is to be removed shall be the district court when the aggregate value of personal property is within the jurisdictional limit set forth in RCW 3.66.020. A hearing before the seizing agency and any appeal therefrom shall be under Title 34 RCW. In all cases, the burden of proof is upon the law enforcement agency to establish, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the property is subject to forfeiture.

The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly return the article or articles to the claimant upon a determination by the administrative law judge or court that the claimant is the present lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession thereof of items specified in subsection (1) of this section.

(6) In any proceeding to forfeit property under this title, where the claimant substantially prevails, the claimant is entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees reasonably incurred by the claimant. In addition, in a court hearing between two or more claimants to the article or articles involved, the prevailing party is entitled to a judgment for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.

(7) When property is forfeited under this chapter, the seizing law enforcement agency may:

(a) Retain it for official use or upon application by any law enforcement agency of this state release the property to that agency for the exclusive use of enforcing this chapter or chapter 9.68A RCW;

(b) Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and which is not harmful to the public; or

(c) Request the appropriate sheriff or director of public safety to take custody of the property and remove it for disposition in accordance with law.

(8)(a) When property is forfeited, the seizing agency shall keep a record indicating the identity of the prior owner, if known, a description of the property, the disposition of the property, the value of the property at the time of seizure, and the amount of proceeds realized from disposition of the property.

(b) Each seizing agency shall retain records of forfeited property for at least seven years.

(c) Each seizing agency shall file a report including a copy of the records of forfeited property with the state treasurer each calendar quarter.

(d) The quarterly report need not include a record of forfeited property that is still being held for use as evidence during the investigation or prosecution of a case or during the appeal from a conviction.

(9)(a) By January 31st of each year, each seizing agency shall remit to the state treasurer an amount equal to ten percent of the net proceeds of any property forfeited during the preceding calendar year. Money remitted shall be deposited in the prostitution prevention and intervention account under RCW 43.63A.740.

(b) The net proceeds of forfeited property is the value of the forfeitable interest in the property after deducting the cost of satisfying any bona fide security interest to which the property is subject at the time of seizure; and in the case of sold property, after deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable fees or commissions paid to independent selling agents, and the cost of any valid landlord's claim for damages under subsection (12) of this section.

(c) The value of sold forfeited property is the sale price. The value of destroyed property and retained firearms or illegal property is zero.

(10) Net proceeds not required to be paid to the state treasurer shall be used for payment of all proper expenses of the investigation leading to the seizure, including any money delivered to the subject of the investigation by the law enforcement agency, and of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure, maintenance of custody, advertising, actual costs of the prosecuting or city attorney, and court costs. Money remaining after payment of these expenses shall be retained by the seizing law enforcement agency for the exclusive use of enforcing the provisions of this chapter or chapter 9.68A RCW.

(11) Upon the entry of an order of forfeiture of real property, the court shall forward a copy of the order to the assessor of the county in which the property is located. Orders for the forfeiture of real property shall be entered by the superior court, subject to court rules. Such an order shall be filed by the seizing agency in the county auditor's records in the county in which the real property is located.

(12) A landlord may assert a claim against proceeds from the sale of assets seized and forfeited under subsection (9) of this section, only if:

(a) A law enforcement officer, while acting in his or her official capacity, directly caused damage to the complaining landlord's property while executing a search of a tenant's residence;

(b) The landlord has applied any funds remaining in the tenant's deposit, to which the landlord has a right under chapter 59.18 RCW, to cover the damage directly caused by a law enforcement officer prior to asserting a claim under the provisions of this section:

(i) Only if the funds applied under (b) of this subsection are insufficient to satisfy the damage directly caused by a law enforcement officer, may the landlord seek compensation for the damage by filing a claim against the governmental entity under whose authority the law enforcement agency operates within thirty days after the search;

(ii) Only if the governmental entity denies or fails to respond to the landlord's claim within sixty days of the date of filing, may the landlord collect damages under this subsection by filing within thirty days of denial or the expiration of the sixty day period, whichever occurs first, a claim with the seizing law enforcement agency. The seizing law enforcement agency must notify the landlord of the status of the claim by the end of the thirty day period. Nothing in this section requires the claim to be paid by the end of the sixty day or thirty day period; and

(c) For any claim filed under (b) of this subsection, the law enforcement agency shall pay the claim unless the agency provides substantial proof that the landlord either:

(i) Knew or consented to actions of the tenant in violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, ((or)) 9A.88.070, or 9A.88.110; or

(ii) Failed to respond to a notification of the illegal activity, provided by a law enforcement agency under RCW 59.18.075, within seven days of receipt of notification of the illegal activity.

(13) The landlord's claim for damages under subsection (12) of this section may not include a claim for loss of business and is limited to:

(a) Damage to tangible property and clean-up costs;

(b) The lesser of the cost of repair or fair market value of the damage directly caused by a law enforcement officer;

(c) The proceeds from the sale of the specific tenant's property seized and forfeited under subsection (9) of this section; and

(d) The proceeds available after the seizing law enforcement agency satisfies any bona fide security interest in the tenant's property and costs related to sale of the tenant's property as provided by subsection (12) of this section.

(14) Subsections (12) and (13) of this section do not limit any other rights a landlord may have against a tenant to collect for damages. However, if a law enforcement agency satisfies a landlord's claim under subsection (12) of this section, the rights the landlord has against the tenant for damages directly caused by a law enforcement officer under the terms of the landlord and tenant's contract are subrogated to the law enforcement agency.

Sec. 3. RCW 9A.88.110 and 1988 c 146 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of ((patronizing a prostitute)) sexual exploitation if:

(a) Pursuant to a prior understanding, he or she pays a fee to another person as compensation for such person or a third person having engaged in sexual conduct with him or her; or

(b) He or she pays or agrees to pay a fee to another person pursuant to an understanding that in return therefor such person will engage in sexual conduct with him or her; or

(c) He or she solicits or requests another person to engage in sexual conduct with him or her in return for a fee.

(2) For purposes of this section, "sexual conduct" has the meaning given in RCW 9A.88.030.

(3) ((Patronizing a prostitute)) Sexual exploitation is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 4. RCW 9A.88.130 and 2012 c 136 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When sentencing or imposing conditions on a person convicted of, or receiving a deferred sentence or deferred prosecution for, violating RCW 9A.88.110 or 9.68A.100, the court must impose a requirement that the offender:

(a) Not be subsequently arrested for ((patronizing a prostitute)) sexual exploitation or commercial sexual abuse of a minor;

(b) Remain outside the geographical area, prescribed by the court, in which the person was arrested for violating RCW 9A.88.110 or 9.68A.100, unless such a requirement would interfere with the person's legitimate employment or residence or otherwise be infeasible; and

(c) Fulfill the terms of a program, if a first-time offender, designated by the sentencing court, designed to educate offenders about the negative costs of ((prostitution)) sexual exploitation.

(2) This requirement is in addition to the penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.110, 9A.88.120, and 9.68A.100.

Sec. 5. RCW 9A.88.140 and 2013 c 121 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Upon an arrest for a suspected violation of ((patronizing a prostitute)) sexual exploitation, promoting prostitution in the first degree, promoting prostitution in the second degree, promoting travel for prostitution, the arresting law enforcement officer may impound the person's vehicle if (i) the motor vehicle was used in the commission of the crime; (ii) the person arrested is the owner of the vehicle or the vehicle is a rental car as defined in RCW 46.04.465; and (iii) either (A) the person arrested has previously been convicted of one of the offenses listed in this subsection or (B) the offense was committed within an area designated under (b) of this subsection.

(b) A local governing authority may designate areas within which vehicles are subject to impoundment under this section regardless of whether the person arrested has previously been convicted of any of the offenses listed in (a) of this subsection.

(i) The designation must be based on evidence indicating that the area has a disproportionately higher number of arrests for the offenses listed in (a) of this subsection as compared to other areas within the same jurisdiction.

(ii) The local governing authority shall post signs at the boundaries of the designated area to indicate that the area has been designated under this subsection.

(2) Upon an arrest for a suspected violation of commercial sexual abuse of a minor, promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor, or promoting travel for commercial sexual abuse of a minor, the arresting law enforcement officer shall impound the person's vehicle if (a) the motor vehicle was used in the commission of the crime; and (b) the person arrested is the owner of the vehicle or the vehicle is a rental car as defined in RCW 46.04.465.

(3) Impoundments performed under this section shall be in accordance with chapter 46.55 RCW and the impoundment order must clearly state "prostitution hold."

(4)(a) Prior to redeeming the impounded vehicle, and in addition to all applicable impoundment, towing, and storage fees paid to the towing company under chapter 46.55 RCW, the owner of the impounded vehicle must pay a fine to the impounding agency. The fine shall be five hundred dollars for the offenses specified in subsection (1) of this section, or two thousand five hundred dollars for the offenses specified in subsection (2) of this section.

(b) Upon receipt of the fine paid under (a) of this subsection, the impounding agency shall issue a written receipt to the owner of the impounded vehicle.

(c) Fines assessed under this section shall be collected by the clerk of the court and remitted to the treasurer of the county where the offense occurred for deposit in the county general fund, except in cases in which the offense occurred in a city or town that provides for its own law enforcement, in which case these amounts shall be remitted to the treasurer of the city or town for deposit in the general fund of the city or town. Revenue from the fines must be used for local efforts to reduce the commercial sale of sex including, but not limited to, increasing enforcement of commercial sex laws.

(i) At least fifty percent of the revenue from fines imposed under this section must be spent on prevention, including education programs for offenders, such as john school, and rehabilitative services for victims, such as mental health and substance abuse counseling, parenting skills, training, housing relief, education, vocational training, drop-in centers, and employment counseling.

(ii) Two percent of the revenue from fines imposed under this section shall be remitted quarterly to the department of commerce, together with a report detailing the fees assessed, the revenue received, and how that revenue was spent.

(iii) Revenues from these fees are not subject to the distribution requirements under RCW 3.50.100, 3.62.020, 3.62.040, 10.82.070, or 35.20.220.

(5)(a) In order to redeem a vehicle impounded under this section, the owner must provide the towing company with the written receipt issued under subsection (4)(b) of this section.

(b) The written receipt issued under subsection (4)(b) of this section authorizes the towing company to release the impounded vehicle upon payment of all impoundment, towing, and storage fees.

(c) A towing company that relies on a forged receipt to release a vehicle impounded under this section is not liable to the impounding authority for any unpaid fine under subsection (4)(a) of this section.

(6)(a) In any proceeding under chapter 46.55 RCW to contest the validity of an impoundment under this section where the claimant substantially prevails, the claimant is entitled to a full refund of the impoundment, towing, and storage fees paid under chapter 46.55 RCW and the five hundred dollar fine paid under subsection (4) of this section.

(b) If the person is found not guilty at trial for a crime listed under subsection (1) of this section, the person is entitled to a full refund of the impoundment, towing, and storage fees paid under chapter 46.55 RCW and the fine paid under subsection (4) of this section.

(c) All refunds made under this section shall be paid by the impounding agency.

(d) Prior to receiving any refund under this section, the claimant must provide proof of payment.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.43.754 and 2008 c 97 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A biological sample must be collected for purposes of DNA identification analysis from:

(a) Every adult or juvenile individual convicted of a felony, or any of the following crimes (or equivalent juvenile offenses):

Assault in the fourth degree with sexual motivation (RCW 9A.36.041, 9.94A.835)

Communication with a minor for immoral purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Custodial sexual misconduct in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.170)

Failure to register (RCW ((9A.44.130)) 9A.44.132)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

((Patronizing a prostitute)) Sexual exploitation (RCW 9A.88.110)

Sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.096)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Violation of a sexual assault protection order granted under chapter 7.90 RCW; and

(b) Every adult or juvenile individual who is required to register under RCW 9A.44.130.

(2) If the Washington state patrol crime laboratory already has a DNA sample from an individual for a qualifying offense, a subsequent submission is not required to be submitted.

(3) Biological samples shall be collected in the following manner:

(a) For persons convicted of any offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense who do not serve a term of confinement in a department of corrections facility, and do serve a term of confinement in a city or county jail facility, the city or county shall be responsible for obtaining the biological samples.

(b) The local police department or sheriff's office shall be responsible for obtaining the biological samples for:

(i) Persons convicted of any offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense who do not serve a term of confinement in a department of corrections facility, and do not serve a term of confinement in a city or county jail facility; and

(ii) Persons who are required to register under RCW ((9A.44.030)) 9A.44.130.

(c) For persons convicted of any offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense, who are serving or who are to serve a term of confinement in a department of corrections facility or a department of social and health services facility, the facility holding the person shall be responsible for obtaining the biological samples. For those persons incarcerated before June 12, 2008, who have not yet had a biological sample collected, priority shall be given to those persons who will be released the soonest.

(4) Any biological sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758 may be retained by the forensic laboratory services bureau, and shall be used solely for the purpose of providing DNA or other tests for identification analysis and prosecution of a criminal offense or for the identification of human remains or missing persons. Nothing in this section prohibits the submission of results derived from the biological samples to the federal bureau of investigation combined DNA index system.

(5) The forensic laboratory services bureau of the Washington state patrol is responsible for testing performed on all biological samples that are collected under subsection (1) of this section, to the extent allowed by funding available for this purpose. The director shall give priority to testing on samples collected from those adults or juveniles convicted of a felony or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense that is defined as a sex offense or a violent offense in RCW 9.94A.030. Known duplicate samples may be excluded from testing unless testing is deemed necessary or advisable by the director.

(6) This section applies to:

(a) All adults and juveniles to whom this section applied prior to June 12, 2008;

(b) All adults and juveniles to whom this section did not apply prior to June 12, 2008, who:

(i) Are convicted on or after June 12, 2008, of an offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section; or

(ii) Were convicted prior to June 12, 2008, of an offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section and are still incarcerated on or after June 12, 2008; and

(c) All adults and juveniles who are required to register under RCW 9A.44.130 on or after June 12, 2008, whether convicted before, on, or after June 12, 2008.

(7) This section creates no rights in a third person. No cause of action may be brought based upon the noncollection or nonanalysis or the delayed collection or analysis of a biological sample authorized to be taken under RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758.

(8) The detention, arrest, or conviction of a person based upon a database match or database information is not invalidated if it is determined that the sample was obtained or placed in the database by mistake, or if the conviction or juvenile adjudication that resulted in the collection of the biological sample was subsequently vacated or otherwise altered in any future proceeding including but not limited to posttrial or postfact-finding motions, appeals, or collateral attacks.

--- END ---