BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that safety rest areas provide highway travelers safe and convenient facilities to rest before continuing with their journey. The free coffee program at high volume safety rest areas is sustained by nonprofit organizations throughout the state of Washington and supports the safety mission of rest areas by keeping highway travelers more alert. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature that the department of transportation continue this successful program and restore signage that the agency previously had in place to make travelers aware of the availability of free coffee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 47.42 RCW to read as follows:

By August 1, 2015, the department must restore all signage, including electronic signage, used to advertise the availability of free coffee at safety rest areas and that were in place as of December 31, 2011.

--- END ---