BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.36.160 and 2005 c 209 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of the crime of failing to summon assistance if:

(((1)))(a) He or she was present at the time when:

(i) A crime was committed against another person; or

(ii) Another person was injured; and

(((2)))(b) He or she knows that the other person has suffered substantial bodily harm ((as a result of the crime committed against the other person)) and that the other person is in need of assistance; and

(((3)))(c) He or she could reasonably summon assistance for the person in need without danger to himself or herself and without interference with an important duty owed to a third party; and

(((4)))(d) He or she fails to summon assistance for the person in need; and

(((5)))(e) Another person is not summoning or has not summoned assistance for the person in need of such assistance.

(2) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 9A.36.161 (Failing to summon assistance—Penalty) and 2005 c 209 s 2 are each repealed.

--- END ---