BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.47.030 and 2004 c 192 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The basic health plan trust account is hereby established in the state treasury. Except for funds distributed to the account pursuant to RCW 69.50.540, any nongeneral fund-state funds collected for this program shall be deposited in the basic health plan trust account and may be expended without further appropriation. Moneys in the account shall be used ((exclusively)) for the purposes of this chapter, including payments to participating managed health care systems on behalf of enrollees in the plan and payment of costs of administering the plan and for the purposes in subsection (2) of this section.

((During the 1995-97 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer funds from the basic health plan trust account to the state general fund.))

(2) Twenty-two percent of the funds distributed to the account from RCW 69.50.540 must be used to fund evidence-based or research-based community interventions shown to promote recovery and reduce the need for inpatient hospitalization, involuntary commitment, or criminal justice involvement for persons with mental illness or persons with co-occurring mental illness and chemical dependency disorders. Funds expended under this subsection must be used for crisis services including mobile crisis response, crisis stabilization, and crisis triage; evidence-based or research-based peer support services; mental health courts; cognitive behavioral therapy; posttraumatic stress disorder prevention following trauma; inpatient transition support programs; or permanent supportive housing programs.

(3) The basic health plan subscription account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from amounts due from or on behalf of nonsubsidized enrollees and health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees shall be deposited into the account. Funds in the account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter, including payments to participating managed health care systems on behalf of nonsubsidized enrollees and health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees in the plan and payment of costs of administering the plan. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

(((3))) (4) The ((administrator)) director shall take every precaution to see that none of the funds in the separate accounts created in this section or that any premiums paid either by subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees are commingled in any way, except that the ((administrator)) director may combine funds designated for administration of the plan into a single administrative account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect August 1, 2015.

--- END ---