BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall implement a grant program to fund introductory K-12 STEM programs in career and technical education with the goal of developing model programs across elementary, middle, and high schools. Grant awards shall be for a period of two years and shall be used to pay for one-time start-up costs for introductory courses, programs, activities, or curricula to be offered to students beginning in the 2015-16 school year. The grants must be equally distributed across elementary, middle, and high schools. Priority must be given to schools that have an enrollment of seventy percent or more students eligible for free or reduced-price meals under the national school lunch program or the school breakfast program to receive lunch or breakfast at no cost to the student or at a reduced cost to the student.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education data center in the office of financial management shall track student participation and long-term outcome data.

(3) By September 1, 2017, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education data center must submit a report to the legislature that details the programs developed through this grant program and the outcomes for students participating in the programs.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016, from the general fund to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the purpose of awarding grants to fund introductory K-12 STEM programs in career and technical education.

(2) The funding in this section must be used for one-time start-up costs for introductory courses, programs, activities, or curricula to be offered to students beginning in the 2015-16 school year.

--- END ---