BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that sudden cardiac death is the result of an unexpected failure of proper heart function that may occur during or immediately after exercise. The legislature further finds that it has been reported that cardiac arrest is the leading cause of death in young athletes. The legislature finds that approximately one in two hundred fifty young athletes has a heart disorder that may increase his or her risk of sudden cardiac arrest. The legislature intends to make youth athletes, their families, and coaches aware of sudden cardiac arrest.

Sec. 2. RCW 4.24.660 and 2009 c 475 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A school district shall not be liable for an injury to or the death of a person due to action or inaction of persons employed by, or under contract with, a youth program if:

(a) The action or inaction takes place on school property and during the delivery of services of the youth program;

(b) The private nonprofit group provides proof of being insured, under an accident and liability policy issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state, that covers any injury or damage arising from delivery of its services. Coverage for a policy meeting the requirements of this section must be at least fifty thousand dollars due to bodily injury or death of one person, or at least one hundred thousand dollars due to bodily injury or death of two or more persons in any incident. The private nonprofit shall also provide a statement of compliance with the policies for the management of concussion and head injury in youth sports as set forth in RCW 28A.600.190 and a statement of compliance with the policies for sudden cardiac arrest awareness as set forth in section 3 of this act; and

(c) The group provides proof of such insurance before the first use of the school facilities. The immunity granted shall last only as long as the insurance remains in effect.

(2) Immunity under this section does not apply to any school district before January 1, 2000.

(3) As used in this section, "youth programs" means any program or service, offered by a private nonprofit group, that is operated primarily to provide persons under the age of eighteen with opportunities to participate in services or programs.

(4) This section does not impair or change the ability of any person to recover damages for harm done by: (a) Any contractor or employee of a school district acting in his or her capacity as a contractor or employee; or (b) the existence of unsafe facilities or structures or programs of any school district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The Washington interscholastic activities association shall work with member schools' board of directors, a nonprofit organization that educates communities about sudden cardiac arrest in youth athletes, and the University of Washington medicine center for sports cardiology to develop and make available an online pamphlet that provides youth athletes, their parents or guardians, and coaches with information about sudden cardiac arrest. The online pamphlet must include information on the nature, risk, symptoms and warning signs, prevention, and treatment of sudden cardiac arrest. The online pamphlet shall be posted on the office of the superintendent of public instruction's web site.

(2) The Washington interscholastic activities association shall work with member schools' board of directors, an organization that provides educational training for safe participation in athletic activity, and the University of Washington medicine center for sports cardiology to make available an existing online sudden cardiac arrest prevention program for coaches.

(3) On a yearly basis, prior to participating in an interscholastic athletic activity a sudden cardiac arrest form stating that the online pamphlet was reviewed shall be signed by the youth athlete and the athlete's parents and/or guardian and returned to the school.

(4) Every three years, prior to coaching an interscholastic athletic activity coaches shall complete the online sudden cardiac arrest prevention program described in this section. Coaches shall provide a certificate showing completion of the online sudden cardiac arrest prevention program to the school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act may be known and cited as the sudden cardiac arrest awareness act.

--- END ---