BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.600.290 and 2012 c 229 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction, the state board for community and technical colleges, the student achievement council, and the public baccalaureate institutions shall jointly develop and each adopt rules governing the college in the high school program. The association of Washington school principals shall be consulted during the rules development. ((The rules shall be written to encourage the maximum use of the program and may not narrow or limit the enrollment options.))Rules for the program shall be updated by September 1, 2015. The update shall address course requirements so that courses offered through the college in the high school program meet the standards for transferable college credit for the purposes of meeting general education requirements or degree requirements at institutions of higher education.

(2) College in the high school programs shall each be governed by a local contract between the district and the institution of higher education, in compliance with the ((guidelines))rules adopted ((by the superintendent of public instruction, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the public baccalaureate institutions))under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The college in the high school program must include the provisions in this subsection.

(a) The high school and institution of higher education together shall define the criteria for student eligibility. The institution of higher education may charge tuition fees ((to))per participating student((s))on a per credit basis as provided in subsection (5) of this section. However if specific funding is provided in the omnibus appropriations act for subsection (5)(b) of this section, the maximum per credit fee charged to any participating student may not exceed the amount of the state subsidy per credit.

(b) School districts shall report no student for more than one full-time equivalent including college in the high school courses.

(c) The funds received by the institution of higher education may not be deemed tuition or operating fees and may be retained by the institution of higher education.

(d) Enrollment information on persons registered under this section must be maintained by the institution of higher education separately from other enrollment information and may not be included in official enrollment reports, nor may such persons be considered in any enrollment statistics that would affect higher education budgetary determinations.

(e) A school district must grant high school credit to a student enrolled in a program course if the student successfully completes the course. ((If no comparable course is offered by the school district, the school district superintendent shall determine how many credits to award for the course.)) The determination of the number of high school credits shall be made in writing before the student enrolls in the course. The credits shall be applied toward graduation requirements and subject area requirements. Evidence of successful completion of each program course shall be included in the student's secondary school records and transcript.

(f) ((An))The participating institution of higher education must grant college credit to a student enrolled in a program course if the student successfully completes the course. The college credit shall be applied toward general education requirements or ((major))degree requirements. ((If no comparable course is offered by the college, the institution of higher education at which the teacher of the program course is employed shall determine how many credits to award for the course and whether the course fulfills general education or major requirements.)) Evidence of successful completion of each program course must be included in the student's college transcript.

(g) Eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not yet received a high school diploma or its equivalent and are eligible to be in the eleventh or twelfth grades may participate in the college in the high school program.

(h) Participating school districts must provide general information about the college in the high school program to all students in grades ten, eleven, and twelve and to the parents and guardians of those students.

(i) Full-time and part-time faculty at institutions of higher education, including adjunct faculty, are eligible to teach program courses.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning in RCW 28B.10.016 and also includes a public tribal college located in Washington and accredited by the Northwest commission on colleges and universities or another accrediting association recognized by the United States department of education.

(b) "Program course" means a college course offered in a high school under the college in the high school program by an institution of higher education. To be considered a "program course" a comparable course must be offered for college credit to matriculated students at the institution and the course must satisfy a general education requirement or degree requirement.

(5)(a) A district or a student may pay the tuition fees charged under subsection (3) of this section.

(b)(i) Subject to appropriation, the state must provide a per credit subsidy for eligible students in participating districts, with the per credit subsidy and maximum annual number of subsidized credits as specified in the omnibus appropriations act.

(ii) An eligible student is one enrolled in the course by September 1st of the school year and is eligible for free or reduced-price lunches.

(iii) Districts must annually apply to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by July 1st of each year to participate in the subsidy program and report the preliminary estimate of eligible students to receive the subsidy by projected credit hours.

(iv) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall notify districts by September 1st of each school year if the district's students will receive the subsidy. If more districts apply than funding is available, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall prioritize the district applications. The superintendent shall develop factors to determine priority including, but not limited to, the number dual credit opportunities available for low-income students in the districts.

(v) Districts shall remit any subsidies on behalf of the students to the participating institution of higher education and those students shall not be required to pay for the subsidized credits.

(vi) Districts are encouraged to pay the costs for students not eligible for the subsidy.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.600.310 and 2012 c 229 s 702 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not yet received the credits required for the award of a high school diploma and are eligible to be in the eleventh or twelfth grades may apply to a participating institution of higher education to enroll in courses or programs offered by the institution of higher education. The course sections and programs must be open for registration to matriculated students at the participating institution of higher education. This section does not apply to courses offered at high schools consisting solely of high school students. A student receiving home-based instruction enrolling in a public high school for the sole purpose of participating in courses or programs offered by institutions of higher education shall not be counted by the school district in any required state or federal accountability reporting if the student's parents or guardians filed a declaration of intent to provide home-based instruction and the student received home-based instruction during the school year before the school year in which the student intends to participate in courses or programs offered by the institution of higher education. Students receiving home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW and students attending private schools approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW shall not be required to meet the student learning goals, obtain a certificate of academic achievement or a certificate of individual achievement to graduate from high school, or to master the essential academic learning requirements. However, students are eligible to enroll in courses or programs in participating universities only if the board of directors of the student's school district has decided to participate in the program. Participating institutions of higher education, in consultation with school districts, may establish admission standards for these students. If the institution of higher education accepts a secondary school pupil for enrollment under this section, the institution of higher education shall send written notice to the pupil and the pupil's school district within ten days of acceptance. The notice shall indicate the course and hours of enrollment for that pupil.

(2)(a) In lieu of tuition and fees, as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041:

(i) Running start students shall pay to the community or technical college all other mandatory fees as established by each community or technical college and, in addition, the state board for community and technical colleges may authorize a fee of up to ten percent of tuition and fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041; and

(ii) All other institutions of higher education operating a running start program may charge running start students a fee of up to ten percent of tuition and fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041 in addition to technology fees.

(b) The fees charged under this subsection (2) shall be prorated based on credit load.

(3)(a) The institutions of higher education must make available fee waivers for low-income running start students. Each institution must establish a written policy for the determination of low-income students before offering the fee waiver. A student shall be considered low income and eligible for a fee waiver upon proof that the student is currently qualified to receive free or reduced-price lunch. Acceptable documentation of low-income status may also include, but is not limited to, documentation that a student has been deemed eligible for free or reduced-price lunches in the last five years, or other criteria established in the institution's policy.

(b) Institutions of higher education, in collaboration with relevant student associations, shall aim to have students who can benefit from fee waivers take advantage of these waivers. Institutions shall make every effort to communicate to students and their families the benefits of the waivers and provide assistance to students and their families on how to apply. Information about waivers shall, to the greatest extent possible, be incorporated into financial aid counseling, admission information, and individual billing statements. Institutions also shall, to the greatest extent possible, use all means of communication, including but not limited to web sites, online catalogues, admission and registration forms, mass e-mail messaging, social media, and outside marketing to ensure that information about waivers is visible, compelling, and reaches the maximum number of students and families that can benefit.

(4) The pupil's school district shall transmit to the institution of higher education an amount per each full-time equivalent college student at statewide uniform rates for vocational and nonvocational students. The superintendent of public instruction shall separately calculate and allocate moneys appropriated for basic education under RCW 28A.150.260 to school districts for purposes of making such payments and for granting school districts seven percent thereof to offset program related costs. The calculations and allocations shall be based upon the estimated statewide annual average per full-time equivalent high school student allocations under RCW 28A.150.260, excluding small high school enhancements, and applicable rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The superintendent of public instruction, participating institutions of higher education, and the state board for community and technical colleges shall consult on the calculation and distribution of the funds. The funds received by the institution of higher education from the school district shall not be deemed tuition or operating fees and may be retained by the institution of higher education. A student enrolled under this subsection shall be counted for the purpose of meeting enrollment targets in accordance with terms and conditions specified in the omnibus appropriations act.

(((5) The state board for community and technical colleges, in collaboration with the other institutions of higher education that participate in the running start program and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall identify, assess, and report on alternatives for providing ongoing and adequate financial support for the program. Such alternatives shall include but are not limited to student tuition, increased support from local school districts, and reallocation of existing state financial support among the community and technical college system to account for differential running start enrollment levels and impacts. The state board for community and technical colleges shall report the assessment of alternatives to the governor and to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature by September 1, 2010.))

--- END ---