BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2017, out of the several funds specified in this act.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Fiscal year 2016" or "FY 2016" means the period beginning July 1, 2015, and ending June 30, 2016.

(b) "Fiscal year 2017" or "FY 2017" means the period beginning July 1, 2016, and ending June 30, 2017.

(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.

(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose.

(3) Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

(4) The amounts shown under the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the 2017-2019 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide funding for the project or program in the future.

(5) "Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended balances remaining on June 30, 2015, from the 2013-2015 biennial appropriations for each project.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rural Washington Loan Fund (19882002)

Reappropriation:

Rural Washington Loan Account—State. . . .$86,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$13,279,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,365,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects (20064008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 131, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$348,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$45,554,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$45,902,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rural Washington Loan Fund (20064010)

Reappropriation:

Rural Washington Loan Account—State. . . .$2,656,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,471,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,127,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rural Washington Loan Fund (20074008)

Reappropriation:

Rural Washington Loan Account—State. . . .$1,747,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$280,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,027,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (20074009)

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State. . . .$1,405,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$198,595,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Job Development Fund Grants (20074010)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1032, chapter 520, Laws of 2007 and section 1005, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,987,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$44,943,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$48,930,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Development Fund (20084850)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,811,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,916,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000005)

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account—State. . . .$11,177,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,954,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$42,131,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building for the Arts (30000006)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$218,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,481,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,699,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (30000013)

Reappropriation:

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$312,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$129,688,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$130,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2010 Local and Community Projects (30000082)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125 and other requirements for community projects administered by the department.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,461,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,811,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000095)

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State. . . .$6,451,000

Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account—State. . . .$92,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$98,451,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,549,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$108,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000097)

Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving Account—

State. . . .$2,278,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,722,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Assistance, Weatherization, Affordable Housing Trust Fund (30000098)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1026, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,013,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$41,987,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Program (30000103)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$90,734,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$85,684,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$176,418,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects (30000166)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1002, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,935,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,882,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,817,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Partnership (30000175)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is provided solely for implementation of the recommendations of the clean energy leadership council by providing state matching funds for projects that:

(a) Integrate energy efficiency and renewable energy in buildings;

(b) Integrate renewable energy into the regional electrical grid;

(c) Advance bioenergy in the state.

(2) State funding must not exceed fifty percent of the total program or project funds.

(3) Eligible projects must:

(a) Involve a majority of companies that are located in Washington state;

(b) Represent a substantially new solution that is not widely available today; and

(c) Be designed to generate solutions that are applicable both inside and outside of the state.

Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving Account—

State. . . .$4,828,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$672,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Financing Energy/Water Efficiency (30000180)

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$4,554,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$114,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,668,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Program 2013 Loan List (30000184)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1016, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$82,786,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$82,786,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (30000185)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1062, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,568,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,563,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,131,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building for the Arts Grants (30000186)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1063, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,622,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,582,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,204,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building Communities Fund Grants (30000188)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1072, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,837,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,442,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,279,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000189)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the public works board must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State. . . .$4,400,000

Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account—

State. . . .$200,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$204,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$204,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000190)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1070, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving Account—

State. . . .$8,882,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$118,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Weatherization (30000192)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1076, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,304,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,696,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2013-2015 Energy Efficiency Grants (30000193)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1075, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$23,706,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,294,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

ARRA SEP Revolving Loans (30000725)

Appropriation:

Energy Recovery Act Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (30000726)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions or otherwise increase energy independence for the state. All expenditures must be used for projects that develop and acquire assets that have a useful life of at least thirteen years. These requirements must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(2)(a) Up to $15,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account is provided solely to create a revolving loan fund to support the widespread use of proven energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies now inhibited by lack of access to capital.

(b) The department shall provide grant funds to one or more competitively selected nonprofit lenders that will provide matching private capital and will administer the loan fund. The department must select the loan fund administrator or administrators through a competitive process, with scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts, applying criteria specified by the department.

(c) The department must establish guidelines that specify applicant eligibility, the screening process, and evaluation and selection criteria. The guidelines must be used by the nonprofit lenders.

(d) Loan applications must disclose all sources of public funds invested in the project. The nonprofit lender must make loans available to the following types of projects that include, but are not limited to: Residential, commercial, industrial, and agricultural energy retrofits, residential and community-scale solar installations, anaerobic digesters to treat dairy and organic waste, and combined heat and power projects using woody biomass as a fuel source.

(e) State funds may not exceed fifty percent of the estimated cost of a project, and funding preference must be provided to projects that offer a higher percentage of nonstate match funds.

(f) The department must conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds, including oversight of the project selection process and project monitoring.

(3) $10,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account is provided solely for credit enhancements of advanced solar and renewable energy manufacturing within Washington state. The department shall develop an application process to competitively select projects.

(4)(a) $20,000,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for grants to advance clean and renewable energy technologies and advance transmission and distribution control system improvements for increased reliability, resiliency, and enabling integration of distributed and renewable resources and technology by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Eligible utilities may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding.

(b) The department shall develop a grant application process to competitively select projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the department. In development of the application criteria, the department shall, to the extent possible, allow smaller utilities or consortia of small utilities to apply for funding.

(c) The department shall convene an advisory panel of electric utility representatives to identify program objectives, near term priorities and long term goals.

(d) Applications for grants must disclose all sources of public funds invested in a project.

(e) Grant funds must be used for research, development, or demonstration projects that integrate intermittent renewables through energy storage, information technology or other smart grid technologies, dispatch energy storage resources from utility control rooms, use demand response, transactive control, or the thermal properties and electric load of commercial buildings and district energy systems to store energy, reduce transmission congestion or otherwise improve system reliability and resiliency and enable integration of distributed and renewable energy sources.

(5)(a) $15,000,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for grants to match federal funds or other nonstate funding sources used to research, develop, and demonstrate clean energy technologies.

(b) The department shall consult with the University of Washington, Washington State University, the Pacific Northwest national laboratory and other clean energy organizations to design the program. The program shall offer matching funds for clean energy projects including, but not limited to: Advancing energy storage and solar technologies, advancing bioenergy, developing new lightweight materials, and advancing renewable energy and energy efficiency technologies.

(6) The department must report on number and results of projects that receive grants or loans through the clean energy fund, including the number of job hours created and the number of jobs maintained and created, to the governor and the legislature, by November 1, 2016.

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$25,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$35,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$60,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$240,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$300,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Program 2016 Loan List (30000727)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $69,733,000 is provided solely for the list of projects in OFM capital document number 2015-1, developed December 18, 2014.

Appropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$69,733,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$280,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$349,733,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building for the Arts Program (30000731)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.750.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Spokane children's theatre. . . .$18,000

Friends of KEXP. . . .$1,866,000

Admiral theatre foundation. . . .$100,000

Kirkland arts center. . . .$48,000

Uniontown community development association. . . .$123,000

San Juan islands museum of art. . . .$650,000

KidsQuest children's museum. . . .$2,000,000

Cornish College of the arts. . . .$232,000

ACT theatre. . . .$303,000

Music works northwest. . . .$64,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,404,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,404,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$21,600,000

TOTAL. . . .$27,004,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Youth Recreational Facilities Program (30000792)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.135.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

YMCA of Pierce and Kitsap counties. . . .$515,000

Boys & girls clubs of Bellevue. . . .$1,200,000

Sea Mar community health centers. . . .$150,000

Boys & girls clubs of Bellevue. . . .$1,200,000

Boys & girls clubs of Snohomish county. . . .$340,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,405,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,405,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$13,600,000

TOTAL. . . .$17,005,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building Communities Fund Program (30000803)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Seattle tilth. . . .$307,000

Alternatives to hunger DBA Bellingham food bank. . . .$575,000

Hopelink Redmond integrated services center. . . .$2,400,000

Community action of Skagit county. . . .$137,500

Centerforce. . . .$98,000

Eritrean association in greater Seattle. . . .$58,250

Tonasket emergency food bank. . . .$22,500

Pierce county AIDS foundation. . . .$300,000

Entiat Valley community services food bank. . . .$100,000

Market foundation. . . .$500,000

Opportunity council. . . .$170,000

FareStart. . . .$437,000

Blue Mountain action council. . . .$475,000

El Centro de la Raza. . . .$600,000

Women and children's free restaurant and community kitchen. . . .$300,000

Domestic violence and sexual assault services of Whatcom

county. . . .$66,000

Casa Latina. . . .$150,000

Centerstone. . . .$1,500,000

Puget Sound regional services. . . .$212,250

LASA - Prairie Oaks. . . .$200,000

Seattle Indian health board. . . .$1,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$9,609,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,609,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$49,609,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Trust Fund Appropriation (30000833)

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$60,000,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$15,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$75,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$300,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$375,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2015-17 Community Economic Revitalization Board Program (30000834)

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,400,000

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving Account—

State. . . .$10,600,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$28,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$48,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants (30000835)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $15,000,000 for fiscal year 2016 and $15,000,000 for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local agencies, public higher education institutions, and state agencies for operational cost savings improvements to facilities and related projects that result in energy and operational cost savings.

(b) At least ten percent of each competitive grant round must be awarded to small cities or towns with a population of five thousand or fewer residents.

(c) In each competitive round, the higher the leverage ratio of nonstate funding sources to state grant and the higher the energy savings, the higher the project ranking.

(2) $10,000,000 is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local agencies, public higher education institutions, and state agencies for projects that involve the purchase and installation of solar energy systems, including solar modules and inverters, with a preference for Washington-manufactured products.

(3) $4,400,000 is provided solely for energy efficiency improvements to minor works and stand-alone projects at state-owned facilities that repair or replace existing building systems including but not limited to HVAC, lighting, insulation, windows, and other mechanical systems. Eligibility for this funding is dependent on an analysis using the office of financial management's life cycle cost tool that compares project design alternatives for initial and long-term cost-effectiveness. Assuming a reasonable return on investment, the cost to improve the project's energy efficiency compared to the original project request will be added to the project appropriation after construction bids are received. The department of commerce shall coordinate with the office of financial management to develop a process for project submittal, review, approval criteria, tracking project budget adjustments, and performance measures.

(4) $600,000 is provided solely for resource conservation managers in the department of enterprise services to coordinate with state agencies to assess and adjust existing building systems and operations to optimize the efficiency in use of energy and other resources in state-owned facilities. The department of commerce will oversee an interagency agreement with the department of enterprise services to fund the resource conservation managers.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$45,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$180,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$225,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Ultra-Efficient Affordable Housing Demonstration (30000836)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for loans or grants to low-income housing developers to design and construct ultra-high energy efficient housing projects including single and multifamily units;

(2) In consultation with professional building, energy efficiency and housing finance organizations, office of financial management and the appropriate legislative staff, the department shall develop and implement a competitive program by December 1, 2015, that is designed to fund and evaluate ultra-high energy efficient housing projects;

(3) The department must partner with the private sector to create an affordable performance-based design-build process;

(4) To receive funding, a project must demonstrate energy-saving and renewable energy systems designed to reach net-zero energy use after housing is fully occupied and provide a life-cycle cost analysis report to the department; and

(5) The department must consider, at a minimum and in any order, the following factors in assigning a numerical ranking to a project:

(a) Whether the proposed design has demonstrated that the project will achieve net-zero energy use when fully occupied;

(b) The life cycle cost of the project;

(c) That the project demonstrates a design, use of materials, and construction process that can be replicated by the Washington building industry;

(d) The extent to which the project leverages nonstate funds;

(e) The extent to which the project is ready to proceed to construction;

(f) Whether the project promotes sustainable use of resources and environmental quality;

(g) Whether the project is being well-managed to fund maintenance and capital depreciation;

(h) Reduction of housing and utilities carbon footprint; and

(i) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Trust Fund Portfolio Preservation Program (30000837)

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Weatherization Matchmaker Program (30000838)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$60,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2015-17 Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000840)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,400,000 of the drinking water assistance account for fiscal year 2016 and $4,400,000 of the drinking water assistance account for fiscal year 2017 is provided as state match for federal safe drinking water funds.

(2) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the public works board must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

(3) The agency must encourage local government use of federally-funded drinking water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture - rural development.

Appropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State. . . .$120,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$480,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$600,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Energy Efficiency Program (30000845)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2016 Local and Community Projects (30000846)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriations in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is released for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

ICHS Shoreline medical and dental clinic. . . .$5,000,000

Okanogan county infrastructure repairs. . . .$2,225,000

Port of Grays Harbor navigation improvement channel. . . .$4,575,000

Riverside wastewater system improvement. . . .$550,000

Seattle children's research institute. . . .$15,000,000

Stilly Valley youth project. . . .$5,250,000

TOTAL. . . .$32,600,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$29,825,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$2,775,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$32,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Jobs Act for K-12 Public Schools and Higher Education Institutions (91000085)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1016, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$126,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$44,683,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$44,809,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency Grants for Local Governments (91000241)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 301, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,642,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$15,358,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$18,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency Grants for Higher Education (91000242)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 307, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,852,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,148,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Pre-Construction Loan Program (91000319)

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$767,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,233,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Families with Children (91000409)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 310, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,316,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,934,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Seniors and People with Physical Disabilities (91000411)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 311, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,368,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,298,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,666,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for People with Chronic Mental Illness (91000412)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1010, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$190,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$935,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for the Homeless (91000413)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1011, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,356,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$22,588,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$28,944,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Farmworkers (91000414)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1012, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,055,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,215,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for People At Risk of Homelessness (91000415)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 312, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$959,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,541,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Low-Income Households (91000416)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1013, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,689,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$293,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,982,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2012 Local and Community Projects (91000417)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 302, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,518,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,623,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects 2012 (91000437)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1003, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,035,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,835,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Pacific Medical Center (91000445)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for window repair, replacement, and weatherization.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,405,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$14,285,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$16,690,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,310,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$26,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Sand Point Building 9 (91000446)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1068, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,846,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,154,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Mental Health Beds (91000447)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1071, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,644,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,356,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Homeless Veterans (91000455)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1065, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,001,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$366,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,367,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Farmworkers (91000457)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1066, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$23,392,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,658,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$27,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for People with Developmental Disabilities (91000458)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1067, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,952,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,067,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,019,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for People with Chronic Mental Illness (91000459)

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,735,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$329,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,064,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Project Backfill (91000581)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,564,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$44,362,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$49,926,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$108,074,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$158,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (91000582)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1074, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Energy Recovery Act Account—Federal Stimulus. . . .$4,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,887,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$19,903,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$33,790,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,210,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Innovation Partnership Zones - Facilities and Infrastructure (92000089)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 309, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,933,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,587,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,520,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1065. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board Administered Economic Development, Innovation, and Export Grants (92000096)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 304, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,868,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$11,579,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$17,447,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$15,151,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,598,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1066. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Main Street Improvement Grants (92000098)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 305, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$355,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,116,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,471,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,379,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1067. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Brownfield Redevelopment Grants (92000100)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for redevelopment of the Bellingham waterfront.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$1,216,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$284,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1068. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Port and Export Related Infrastructure (92000102)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 306, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$13,644,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,506,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$33,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1069. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects for Jobs and Economic Development (92000151)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1077, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State. . . .$7,100,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$29,137,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$36,237,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,872,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1070. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Youth and Families (92000227)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1079, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$14,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,277,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,677,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1071. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Communities and Quality of Life (92000230)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1078, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$455,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$25,623,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$26,078,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,050,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,128,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1072. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Cowlitz River Dredging (20082856)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$246,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,254,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1073. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Catastrophic Flood Relief (20084850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $20,000,000 of the appropriation is for advancing the long-term strategy for the Chehalis Basin projects to reduce flood damage and restore aquatic species including a programmatic environmental impact statement, data collection, engineering design of future construction projects, feasibility analysis, and engagement of state agencies, tribes, and other parties.

(2) Up to $10,000,000 of the appropriation is for construction of local priority flood protection and habitat restoration projects.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$13,773,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$23,813,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$120,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$187,586,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1074. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Statewide Master Plan for Museums and Historical Societies (30000044)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for developing a master plan for museums and research facilities to address the statewide need for providing storage, research, and display space for collections of art and artifacts, archaeological research materials, DNA tissue samples, tribal artifacts, and other related items of an historical nature.

(2) The office of financial management will identify the following: (a) Types of space needed to store, research, and display items and collections depending on types of items; (b) an inventory of existing spaces that the state may utilize to fill storage, research, and display needs; (c) recommendations regarding the highest and best use of the capital museum in Olympia; (d) collections and other state assets that may be divested or transferred to more appropriate entities for storage, research, and display; (e) database systems used or needed to inventory collections of items of an historical nature and the ability to display those collections on the internet; and (f) other items related to the storage, research, and display of collections of an historical nature.

(3) The office of the financial management or its contractor must consult with the following agencies in developing the statewide master plan for museums and research centers: (a) The Washington state historical society; (b) state parks and recreation; (c) the burke museum; (d) the eastern Washington state historical society; and (e) other entities as necessary.

(4) The office of financial management must present the statewide museum master plan to the house of representatives capital budget committee and the senate ways and means committee by December 31, 2015.

Appropriation:

Enterprise Services Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1075. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Office of Financial Management Capital Budget Staff (30000045)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1076. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Oversight of State Facilities (30000046)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,080,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,320,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1077. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Construction Contingency Pool (30000047)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for construction projects that confront emergent and unavoidable costs in excess of the construction contingency included in the project appropriation. For requests occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting contingency funds from the office of financial management. Eligible agencies that may apply to the pool include higher education institutions, the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, the department of enterprise services, the criminal justice training commission, the department of veterans affairs, and the department of fish and wildlife. Eligible construction projects are only projects that had cost reductions as kept on file with the office of financial management. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee as projects are approved for funding.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1078. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Emergency Repairs (30000048)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Emergency repair funding is provided solely to address unexpected building or grounds failures that will impact public health and safety and the day-to-day operations of the facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, an emergency declaration signed by the affected agency director must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The emergency declaration must include a description of the health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of other funding that may be applied to the project. For emergencies occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting emergency funds from the office of financial management. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee as emergency projects are approved for funding.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1079. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Emergency Repair Pool for K-12 Public Schools (30000051)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Emergency repair funding is provided solely to address unexpected and imminent health and safety hazards at K-12 public schools, including skill centers, that will impact the day-to-day operations of the school facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, an emergency declaration must be signed by the school district board of directors and the superintendent of public instruction, and submitted to the office of financial management for consideration. The emergency declaration must include a description of the imminent health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of local funding to be applied to the project. Grants of emergency repair moneys must be conditioned upon the written commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be awarded, if applicable. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee as emergency projects are approved for funding.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1080. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Chehalis River Basin Flood Relief Projects (91000398)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$546,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,454,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1081. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Construction Contingency Pool (91000428)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1091, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,979,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,979,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1082. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Culverts in Three State Agencies (92000004)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,761,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,239,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1083. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

East Plaza - Water Infiltration and Elevator Repairs (30000548)

Reappropriation:

State Vehicle Parking Account—State. . . .$521,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,837,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,358,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$745,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,103,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1084. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

NRB Garage Fire Suppression System Repairs (30000578)

Reappropriation:

State Vehicle Parking Account—State. . . .$642,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,142,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$96,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,238,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1085. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Building Exterior Repairs (30000604)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$584,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$491,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,075,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1086. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Underground Utility Repairs (30000687)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$828,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,785,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,613,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1087. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

East Plaza - Structure and Elevator Repairs (30000717)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,239,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,239,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1088. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

NRB Garage Fire Suppression Systems and Critical Repairs (30000719)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,077,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,516,000

TOTAL. . . .$9,593,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1089. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Highway License Building - Carpet Replacement (30000720)

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$1,774,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,774,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1090. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation (30000722)

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$850,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$11,002,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$11,852,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$19,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$30,852,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1091. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Old Capitol - Exterior and Interior Repairs (30000724)

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1092. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Modular Building - Critical Repairs and Upgrades (30000725)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for development of a plan that identifies the existing building deficiencies and recommended project specific improvements with cost estimates to be completed as funding becomes available. Urgent repairs to this building will be prioritized against the other projects in the department of enterprise services' minor works project list.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1093. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Dolliver - Critical Building Repairs (30000726)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for development of a plan that identifies the existing building deficiencies and recommended project specific improvements with cost estimates to be completed as funding becomes available. Urgent repairs to this building will be prioritized against the other projects in the department of enterprise services' minor works project list.

Appropriation:

Enterprise Services Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1094. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

West Campus Historic Buildings Exterior Preservation (30000727)

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$100,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,860,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$3,960,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,960,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1095. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Temple of Justice Building Systems Renewal and Upgrades (30000729)

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1096. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Heating Systems Repairs - Phase 1 (30000730)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,727,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,727,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1097. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Campus Utility Repairs - Sunken Garden to General Administration (30000731)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1098. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Critical Network Standardization and Connectivity (30000732)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for development of a plan to improve the functionality of capitol campus building controls and automation network to achieve improved building performance, including a campus-wide condition assessment, deficiency inventory, and prioritized project plan with deliverables and cost estimates.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1099. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

East Campus Chilled Water Loop (30000735)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$7,085,000

TOTAL. . . .$7,835,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1100. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Court Major Exterior and Building Systems Renewal (30000738)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for development of a plan that identifies the existing building deficiencies and recommended project specific improvements with cost estimates to be completed as funding becomes available. Urgent repairs to this building will be prioritized against the other projects in the department of enterprise services' minor works project list.

Appropriation:

Enterprise Services Account—State. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$8,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Lake Longterm Management Planning (30000740)

Appropriation:

Enterprise Services Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1102. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Campus Building and Grounds Facilities Replacement (30000759)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for project planning to effectively and efficiently house the grounds maintenance operations for the capitol campus. The department of enterprise services will examine current locations, functions, and needs occupied by buildings and grounds staff and equipment to develop a plan that specifies future work necessary to efficiently operate the campus buildings and grounds maintenance program which may include renovation and/or replacing aging and deficient facilities.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1103. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Engineering and Architectural Services: Staffing (30000762)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for architectural and engineering services to manage public works contracting for all state facilities pursuant to RCW 43.19.450. The service charge is increased from 2.15 percent to 2.27 percent of total project costs to reduce the number of projects assigned to each manager. The intended results of the increased fee are improved accountability, reduced project delays, and reduced the number and cost of change orders. At the end of each fiscal year, the department must report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature on performance improvements resulting from the increased management fee, including the following:

(1) The number of projects managed by each manager compared to previous biennia;

(2) Projects that were not completed on schedule and the reasons for delays; and

(3) The number and cost of the change orders and the reason for each change order.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$16,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$62,052,000

TOTAL. . . .$78,252,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1104. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Campus Steam System and Chiller Upgrades (91000014)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1106, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$1,173,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,964,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$3,137,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$860,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,997,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1105. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Archives Building and Capitol Court HVAC Upgrades (91000015)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1107, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$409,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$591,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1106. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

1063 Block Replacement (91000016)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1109, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,340,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,660,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1107. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Pierce County Readiness Center (30000593)

Reappropriation:

Military Department Capital Account—State. . . .$2,953,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,509,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$26,618,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$33,080,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$521,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$33,601,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1108. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,800,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,883,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$34,207,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$42,090,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$44,890,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1109. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Washington Youth Academy Platoon Dormitory (30000599)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1110. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation - 2013-2015 Biennium (30000602)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$467,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,604,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,071,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,155,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,500,000

TOTAL. . . .$7,726,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1111. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program - 2013-2015 Biennium (30000605)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$9,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,776,000

TOTAL. . . .$17,701,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1112. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Yakima Training Center Barracks (30000696)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$18,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$18,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1113. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation - 2015-2017 Biennium (30000702)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,267,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$10,195,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$17,462,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$17,462,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1114. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program - 2015-2017 Biennium (30000744)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,013,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$15,953,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$21,966,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$21,966,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1115. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Montesano Readiness Center Roof Replacement and Tenant Improvements (30000805)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,500,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,750,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$5,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1116. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Heritage Barn Preservation Program (30000009)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1117. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Historic County Courthouse Grants Program (30000010)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,580,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$12,980,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1118. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

Dormitory Remodel (30000012)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1119. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

Omnibus Minor Works (30000017)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$456,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$456,000

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Naselle Youth Camp-Three Cottages: Renovation (20081222)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building (20081319)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$26,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$828,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$27,628,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center: Kitchen and Dining Room Upgrades (20081506)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Medical Lake Campus-Laundry Building: New Construction (20082371)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,100,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School Electrical Service Rehabilitation (30000415)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for electrical service rehabilitation and improvements on campus. The department of social and health services will also coordinate with the department of health to install a new and separate electrical service for the public health laboratory.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Statewide (30001859)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$755,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,755,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide (30002235)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$14,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,155,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$120,030,000

TOTAL. . . .$148,285,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Lakeland Village: Code Required Campus Infrastructure Upgrades (30002238)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,250,000

TOTAL. . . .$21,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study and Treatment Center-Orcas: Acute Treatment Addition (30002733)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-South Hall: Building Systems Replacement (30002735)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo Glen-Housing Unit: Acute Mental Health Unit (30002736)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School: Campus Master Plan (30002738)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Westlake: Nurse Call System (30002739)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier School: Campus Master Plan and Forest Management Plan (30002740)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center: Campus Master Plan (30002741)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory Institutions Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Yakima Valley School-Main Building: Roofing Replacement (30002742)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Eastlake and Westlake: Flooring Replacement (30002744)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School: New Acute Mental Health Unit (30002745)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Behavioral Health: Evaluation and Treatment Centers Grant Program (30002749)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Forensic Services: Two Wards Addition (30002765)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,700,000

TOTAL. . . .$22,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-East Campus: Psychiatric Intensive Care Unit and Competency Restoration (30002773)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Department of Corrections/Department of Social and Health Services on McNeil Island-Infrastructure: Repairs and Upgrades (30003211)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$6,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Water System: Improvements (30003215)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,115,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Department of Corrections/Department of Social and Health Services on McNeil Island-Main Dock: Float and Dolphin Replacement (30003234)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Yakima Valley School: Center for Excellence (30003236)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-South Hall: Wards Preservation and Renewal (30003240)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-East Campus: Wards Preservation and Renewal (30003241)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-East Campus: Building Systems Replacement (30003244)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital and Western State Hospital-All Wards: Patient Safety Improvements (91000019)

Reappropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$500,000

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$2,569,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,180,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,549,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Newborn Screening Wing Addition (30000301)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,049,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,049,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Newborn Screening Lab Conversion (30000302)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,411,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,411,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Minor Works - Program (30000315)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$322,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$322,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000323)

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal. . . .$28,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$28,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000328)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$277,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$277,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Preconstruction Loans (30000334)

Appropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account—State. . . .$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$24,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000336)

Appropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal. . . .$32,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$128,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$160,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Safe Reliable Drinking Water Grants (92000002)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,631,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,007,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,638,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Walla Walla Nursing Facility (20082008)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$14,244,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$31,200,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$45,444,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,681,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$48,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Washington Veterans Home: Buildings 6 and 7 Demolition and Grounds Improvement (30000002)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Feasibility Study/Predesign for Western State Hospital Skilled Nursing Replacement (30000090)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Facilities Preservation (30000174)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,095,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,690,000

TOTAL. . . .$12,785,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Program (30000131)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$945,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,864,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,809,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

South Central Washington State Veterans Cemetery Feasibility (30000151)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Eastern Washington Cemetery Upgrade (30000152)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$270,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,422,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$2,692,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,692,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Correctional Complex: Close Sewer Lagoon (20082022)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$214,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,177,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,791,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Transformers and Switches (30000143)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,699,000

TOTAL. . . .$12,849,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Roof and Equipment Replacement (30000195)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Clallam Bay Corrections Center: MSC and Rec Building Roofs (30000548)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,808,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,808,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Airway Heights Corrections Center: CI Food Factory Remodel (30000567)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,163,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,163,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Correctional Complex: WSR Replace Fire Alarm System (30000724)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$866,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Airway Heights Corrections Center: Replace Fire Alarm System (30000725)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,449,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,399,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Airway Heights Corrections Center: Security Electronics Renovations (30000726)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,397,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,047,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center for Women: Replace Fire Alarm System (30000727)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,619,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,569,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Correctional Complex: TRU Support Building Repair Fire Detection System (30000733)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$808,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,058,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Security Video System (30000791)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,522,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,972,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Correctional Complex: WSR Security Video System (30000795)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,833,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,233,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Security Video System (30000800)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Correctional Complex: TRU Security Video System (30000801)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,326,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,876,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center for Women: Security Video System (30000802)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,271,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,421,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Correctional Complex: SOU IMU Security Video (30000803)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$990,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington State Penitentiary: Education Building Roof (30000820)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,525,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Airway Heights Corrections Center: Security Video System (30000838)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Correctional Complex: MSU Bathroom Renovation (30000975)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,720,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,720,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Statewide: Minor Works - Programmatic Projects (30001004)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$18,816,000

TOTAL. . . .$21,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2065. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Statewide: Minor Works - Preservation Projects (30001013)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,181,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$65,095,000

TOTAL. . . .$80,276,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2066. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Correctional Complex: MSU Heat Exchanger Replacement (30001074)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,342,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,342,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2067. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Access Road Culvert Replacement and Road Resurfacing (30001078)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2068. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington State Penitentiary: Program and Support Building (30001101)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$15,014,000

TOTAL. . . .$16,914,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2069. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Prison Capacity Expansion (30001105)

Based on the current and forecast medium security prison capacity needs of the department of corrections, this appropriation is provided solely for developing design documents to increase medium security prison capacity by opening a prison facility at Maple Lane in Thurston county or expanding capacity at the Washington corrections center in Mason county. The design option pursued under this section is contingent on actions taken by the 2015 legislature to implement the recommendations of the justice reinvestment task force to reduce sentences for property crimes and other legislation which may decrease or increase the department's need for medium security prison capacity.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$67,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$75,000,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Supply Facilities (19742006)

Reappropriation:

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account (Water

Supply Facilities)—State. . . .$375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$20,175,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (19972012)

Reappropriation:

Site Closure Account—State. . . .$10,941,000

Appropriation:

Site Closure Account—State. . . .$3,675,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,492,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,108,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Twin Lake Aquifer Recharge Project (20042951)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$162,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$588,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Supply Facilities (20044006)

Reappropriation:

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account (Water

Supply Facilities)—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$13,468,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,518,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Quad Cities Water Right Mitigation (20052852)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$421,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,179,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20062003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 136, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$317,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,483,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Program (20062950)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water Supply

Development Account—State. . . .$1,770,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Account—

State. . . .$6,307,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$8,077,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$83,423,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$91,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Transfer of Water Rights for Cabin Owners (20081951)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$186,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$264,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (20084008)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,792,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$80,083,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$92,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (20084010)

Reappropriation:

Water Quality Capital Account—State. . . .$43,000

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$570,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$613,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$65,870,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$66,483,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Loan Program (20084011)

Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State. . . .$14,563,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$125,437,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$140,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Storage Feasibility Study (20084026)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 3035, chapter 497, Laws of 2009.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$82,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,168,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20084029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 3054, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,456,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,544,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000007)

Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—Federal

Stimulus. . . .$766,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—Federal. . . .$1,802,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State. . . .$4,133,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$6,701,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$171,999,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$178,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000008)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,769,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,231,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000028)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,044,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,956,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Kittitas Groundwater Study (30000029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 3001, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account (Water

Supply Facilities)—State. . . .$76,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$624,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000039)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3006, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,364,000

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$9,246,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$10,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$65,301,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$75,911,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000142)

Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—Federal. . . .$8,792,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State. . . .$21,050,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$29,842,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,158,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$2,150,000

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$3,884,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$6,034,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$35,164,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$41,198,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Settlement Funding to Clean Up Toxic Sites (30000145)

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$187,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,313,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000208)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3024, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$13,358,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$20,742,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$34,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000209)

Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—Federal. . . .$51,095,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State. . . .$88,255,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$139,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$52,794,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$192,144,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000213)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3030, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,725,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,275,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000216)

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$34,571,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$29,263,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$63,834,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000217)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$3,029,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,971,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Safe Soils Remediation Program - Central Washington (30000263)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$863,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,848,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,711,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000265)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$1,985,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,415,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima Basin Integrated Water Management Plan Implementation (30000278)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$208,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,792,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO - Tacoma Smelter Plume and Mines (30000280)

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$10,829,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,818,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,647,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects (30000282)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$794,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds Administration (30000283)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$11,057,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,143,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$23,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Statewide Storm Water Projects (30000294)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3041, chapter 4, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$17,088,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,912,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (30000322)

Reappropriation:

Waste Tire Removal Account—State. . . .$447,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$553,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Mercury Switch Removal (30000323)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$389,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$111,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Diesel Emissions (30000324)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$2,812,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,688,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Wood Stove Emissions (30000325)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$2,546,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,454,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000326)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3066, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$39,663,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,337,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000327)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3067, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—Federal. . . .$50,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State. . . .$192,127,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$242,127,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$23,373,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$265,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (30000328)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$9,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000331)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,632,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$368,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000332)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,048,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Dungeness Water Supply and Mitigation (30000333)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 3082, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,020,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000334)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3072, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$924,000

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$27,681,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$28,605,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,055,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$34,660,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects - Programmatic (30000335)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000337)

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$22,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,890,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$31,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000351)

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$8,370,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,930,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000372)

Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Account—

State. . . .$23,874,000

Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water Supply

Development Account—State. . . .$28,847,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$52,721,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,779,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$74,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000373)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,640,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,460,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000374)

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$53,387,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,150,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$62,537,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000389)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3080, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coordinated Prevention Grants (CPG) (30000426)

Appropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$29,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$120,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$149,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000427)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the department of ecology must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its centennial clean water program grant.

(2) The agency must encourage local government use of federally funded water pollution control infrastructure programs operated by the United States Department of Agriculture - Rural Development.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$160,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Diesel Emissions (30000428)

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Woodstove Emissions (30000429)

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Swift Creek Natural Asbestos Flood Control and Cleanup (30000430)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,200,000

TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (30000431)

Appropriation:

Waste Tire Removal Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000432)

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$13,772,000

TOTAL. . . .$24,772,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000458)

Appropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$75,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$300,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$375,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Leaking Tank Model Remedies (30000490)

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000534)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $12,000,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely as state match for federal clean water funds.

(2) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the department of ecology must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its water pollution control program loan.

(3) The agency must encourage local government use of federally funded water pollution control infrastructure programs operated by the United States Department of Agriculture - Rural Development.

Appropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—Federal. . . .$50,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State. . . .$141,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$191,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$800,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$991,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (30000535)

Appropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$12,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$62,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$74,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$280,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$354,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (30000536)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design (30000537)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$100,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$125,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3065. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000538)

Appropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$12,146,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$67,900,000

TOTAL. . . .$80,046,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Cleanup Toxics Sites – Puget Sound (30000542)

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$28,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$72,763,000

TOTAL. . . .$100,763,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Minor Works - Programmatic (30000578)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$180,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000587)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for technical assistance and grants to conservation districts for the purpose of implementing water conservation measures and irrigation efficiencies. The department of ecology and the state conservation commission shall give preference in order of priority to projects located in the 16 fish critical basins, other water short basins, and basins with significant water resource and instream flow problems. Projects that are not within basins as described in this subsection are also eligible to receive funding.

(2) Conservation districts statewide are eligible for grants listed in subsection (1) of this section. A conservation district receiving funds shall manage each grant to ensure that a portion of the water saved by the water conservation measure or irrigation efficiency will be placed as a purchase or a lease in the trust water rights program to enhance instream flows. The proportion of saved water placed in the trust water rights program must be equal to the percentage of the public investment in the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency. The percentage of the public investment may not exceed eighty-five percent of the total cost of the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency.

(3) Up to $300,000 of the appropriation in this section may be allocated for the purchase and installation of flow meters that are implemented in cooperation with the Washington State Department of Fish and Wildlife fish screening program authorized under RCW 77.57.070.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000588)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $2,000,000 of the Columbia River basin water supply development account—state is provided solely for the Sullivan Lake water supply project to replace funds that were diverted to fund repairs to the Moses Lake irrigation and reclamation district dam.

Appropriation:

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue Recovery

Account—State. . . .$2,200,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Account—

State. . . .$9,200,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$11,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$19,761,000

TOTAL. . . .$31,161,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000589)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,055,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$15,600,000

TOTAL. . . .$18,655,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3071. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000590)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$120,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$135,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3072. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000591)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3073. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000596)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3074. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Habitat Mitigation (91000007)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,087,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,313,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3075. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (91000032)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$7,037,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,233,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3076. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

FY 2012 Statewide Stormwater Grant Program (91000053)

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$17,396,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,677,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$24,073,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3077. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Stormwater Retrofit and LID Competitive Grants (91000054)

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$9,534,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,929,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,463,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3078. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Skagit Mitigation (91000181)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,539,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$686,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3079. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Protect Communities from Flood and Drought (92000002)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$228,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,747,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3080. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Wastewater Treatment and Water Reclamation (92000041)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3016, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$151,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,279,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3081. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Flood Levee Improvements (92000057)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 503, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,247,000

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$3,461,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,708,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,792,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3082. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Ground Water Management Yakima Basin (92000061)

Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Account—

State. . . .$267,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$183,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3083. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Improvements (92000076)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3081, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$94,285,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,715,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3084. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplain Management and Control Grants (92000078)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3069, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$42,476,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,524,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3085. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Lower Yakima GWMA Program Development (92000085)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,614,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,614,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3086. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE AGENCY

Underground Storage Tank Capital Program Demonstration and Design (30000001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section must be used for projects that provide a benefit to the public through removal, replacement or upgrade of underground storage tank fuel systems, retrofit existing systems to disperse renewable or alternative fuels, and cleanup of contamination caused by legacy petroleum releases. All projects must develop and acquire assets that have a useful life of at least thirteen years. These requirements must be specified in funding agreements issued by the agency.

(2)(a) $1,800,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to design a capital financial assistance program to provide underground storage tank owners and operators with financial resources to remove, replace or upgrade underground storage tank fuel systems, retrofit existing systems to disperse renewable or alternative fuels, and to clean up contamination caused by legacy petroleum releases.

(b) The design must:

(i) Assess options for program structure and administration, and develop a recommended program design, financial management plan and staffing model;

(ii) Include data and legal analysis of statewide need, availability of existing fund sources for grants and loans, assessment of owner and operator willingness to participate and potential environmental and economic impacts of the loan program.

(iii) As part of the program design, the agency must conduct a pilot demonstration of a capital grant program that includes three study sites with aging tanks, demonstrated impact to either soil or groundwater, or both, and serious financial hardship, as defined in chapter 374-60 WAC. Each study site may not cost more than $600,000.

(3) The agency shall conduct the study in consultation with the office of financial management, and internal and external agency stakeholders.

(4) The agency must provide a final report of the program design, as well as any associated legislative and budget recommendations, to the governor and legislature by October 1, 2015.

Appropriation:

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust

Account—State. . . .$1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3087. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Peace Arch - Restoration (30000095)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$164,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$164,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3088. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Flagler - WWI Historic Facilities Preservation (30000100)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$430,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,540,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,970,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3089. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Spencer Spit Water System Replacement (30000140)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$695,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$288,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$983,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3090. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Housing Areas Exterior Improvements (30000287)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$921,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,858,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,779,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3091. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Pearrygin - West Campground Redevelopment (30000302)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$546,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$7,672,000

TOTAL. . . .$8,218,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3092. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sun Lakes State Park: Dry Falls Campground Renovation (30000305)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$402,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,951,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,353,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3093. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sun Lakes Dry Falls Visitor Center Development (30000409)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,228,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,744,000

TOTAL. . . .$12,972,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3094. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Chelan State Park Moorage Dock Pile Replacement (30000416)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$248,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,448,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,696,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3095. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cape Disappointment Major Park Restoration (30000418)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,317,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,767,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3096. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Willapa Hills Trail Develop Safe Multi-Use Trail Crossing at SR 6 (30000519)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$339,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,082,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,421,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3097. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cape Disappointment North Head Parking (30000522)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$925,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,290,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3098. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Dosewallips Wastewater Treatment System (30000523)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$480,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,052,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,532,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3099. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Ocean City Campground Restoration (30000533)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$7,070,000

TOTAL. . . .$7,578,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3100. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lewis and Clark Replace Wastewater System (30000544)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$695,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$382,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,077,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3101. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Twanoh and Manchester Historic Preservation (30000646)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$604,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,559,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,163,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3102. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane Road Improvements, Stage 2D (30000693)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3103. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Goldendale Observatory - Phase 3 Expansion (30000709)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,649,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,650,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,299,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3104. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steamboat Rock Build Dunes Campground (30000729)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,499,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,499,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3105. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Deception Pass - Kukutali Access and Interpretation (30000774)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$171,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$54,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3106. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Camano Island Day Use Access and Facility Renovation (30000782)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$107,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,347,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,648,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3107. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Flaming Geyser State Park Infrastructure (30000810)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$848,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$477,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,325,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3108. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Belfair Replace Failing Electrical Supply to Main Camp Loop (30000813)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,311,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,311,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3109. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Dosewallips Replace Failing Electrical Supply (30000814)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,040,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3110. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Flagler - Replace Failing Electrical Power Historic District (30000815)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,303,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,303,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3111. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Blake Island Dredge Marina (30000818)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$583,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,846,000

TOTAL. . . .$6,429,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3112. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Kopachuck Day Use Development (30000820)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,341,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$309,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,660,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3113. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Millersylvania Replace Environmental Learning Center Cabins (30000821)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$481,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$608,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,089,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3114. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Flaming Geyser Day Use Renovation (30000832)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$642,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$360,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,002,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3115. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Health and Safety (30000839)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,662,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,662,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3116. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Twanoh State Park Stormwater Improvements (30000851)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$354,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3117. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Rocky Reach - Trail Development (30000853)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$535,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,220,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,755,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3118. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fish Barrier Removal (30000854)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$767,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$281,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,048,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3119. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Clean Vessel Boating Pump-Out Grants (30000856)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$15,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3120. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Local Grant Authority (30000857)

Appropriation:

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—Private/Local. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$6,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3121. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Federal Grant Authority (30000858)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,750,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3122. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Replace Failing Sewer Lines (30000860)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$234,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,406,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3123. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sequim Bay Address Failing Retaining Wall (30000861)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,247,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,247,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3124. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Improve Camp Host Sites (30000864)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,927,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,927,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3125. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Willapa Hills Swinging Bridge Assessment and Remedial Work or Removal (30000868)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$198,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,198,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,396,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3126. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Amphitheaters (30000869)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,431,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,431,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3127. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Iron Horse - Tunnel 46 and 47 Repairs (30000870)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,642,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,642,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3128. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Dock Grant Match (30000872)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3129. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Birch Bay - Replace Failing Bridge (30000876)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$213,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$913,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,126,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3130. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane - Nordic Area Improvements and Horse Camp Development (30000877)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$182,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,748,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,930,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3131. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden-Roof Replacement on NCO Housing and Other Structures (30000879)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,713,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,713,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3132. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Cabins, Yurts, and Associated Park Improvement (30000883)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,153,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,153,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3133. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Flaming Geyser - Stewardship and Access Upgrades (30000943)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,513,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,513,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3134. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fish Barrier Removal (Lawsuit) (30000944)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,034,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,034,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3135. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Facility and Infrastructure Backlog Reduction (30000946)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$19,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$26,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3136. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Facilities and Infrastructures (30000947)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$11,117,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$250,000

TOTAL. . . .$11,367,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3137. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steamboat Rock - Replace Failing Sewage Lift Stations (30000948)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,365,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3138. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Pier and Marine Learning Center Improve or Replace (30000950)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$820,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,888,000

TOTAL. . . .$13,708,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3139. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Field Spring Replace Failed Sewage System and Non-ADA Comfort Station (30000951)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$101,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$959,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,060,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3140. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Larrabee-Clayton Beach Rail Road Crossing and Trail Improvements (30000952)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$237,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,700,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,937,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3141. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish - Park Redevelopment per Master Plan (30000956)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$513,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,821,000

TOTAL. . . .$7,334,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3142. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane - Maintenance Facility Relocation from Harms Way (30000959)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$384,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,789,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,173,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3143. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Maintenance Shop Relocate from Center of Historical District (30000960)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,990,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,990,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3144. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sun Lakes - Dry Falls - Upgrade Failing Water Supply Systems (30000962)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$881,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,631,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3145. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Depression Era Structures Restoration Assessment (30000966)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,028,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,563,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,591,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3146. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cape Disappointment - Replace Non-Compliant Comfort Stations (30000969)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,486,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,487,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,973,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3147. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Ocean City - Replace Noncompliant Comfort Stations (30000970)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$152,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,291,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,443,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3148. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Riverside Fisk Property Lake Spokane (Long Lake) Initial Park Access (30000971)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,072,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,072,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3149. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Dash Point - Replace Bridge (Pedestrian) (30000972)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$165,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,443,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,608,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3150. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Program (30000975)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,753,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,753,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3151. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Parkland Acquisition (30000976)

Appropriation:

Parkland Acquisition Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3152. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Backlog Repairs and Enhanced Amenities (92000007)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$794,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,610,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,404,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3153. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (20084011)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3146, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$291,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$2,523,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,814,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$95,678,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$98,492,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3154. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (20084851)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$639,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$59,361,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3155. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000002)

Reappropriation:

Farmlands Preservation Account—State. . . .$257,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$307,000

Riparian Protection Account—State. . . .$911,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$3,672,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,147,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$64,298,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$69,445,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3156. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000080)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$673,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$32,327,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$33,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3157. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000138)

Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .$1,589,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,411,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3158. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000139)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3074, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Farmlands Preservation Account—State. . . .$195,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$3,694,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$3,985,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$7,874,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$34,126,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$42,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3159. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000140)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,497,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$24,969,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$28,466,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$41,596,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$70,062,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3160. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Land and Water Conservation Fund (30000142)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,313,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,687,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3161. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000143)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3070, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$845,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,616,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,461,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3162. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreational Trails Program (30000146)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,328,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,672,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3163. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Restoration (30000147)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3072, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,656,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,344,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3164. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000148)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3070, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$560,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,440,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3165. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000205)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3161, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Farmlands Preservation Account—State. . . .$3,218,000

Riparian Protection Account—State. . . .$4,973,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$14,918,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$15,700,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$38,809,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,191,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$65,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3166. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000206)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3162, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,886,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$37,278,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$45,164,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$29,836,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3167. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000207)

Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .$3,309,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,054,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,363,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3168. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000208)

Reappropriation:

NOVA Program Account—State. . . .$5,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3169. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000210)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3165, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$3,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3170. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000211)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$44,058,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$25,942,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3171. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000212)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,794,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,206,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3172. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000213)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3168, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Firearms Range Account—State. . . .$415,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$385,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3173. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreational Trails Program (30000214)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3174. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Infrastructure Grants (30000215)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,320,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3175. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Land and Water Conservation (30000216)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$3,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3176. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000218)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$990,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,010,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3177. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000220)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects in OFM capital document No. 2015-2, developed December 18, 2014.

Appropriation:

Farmlands Preservation Account—State. . . .$6,000,000

Riparian Protection Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$27,000,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$27,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$70,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$280,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$350,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3178. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000221)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$40,000,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$60,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$100,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$400,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$500,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3179. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000222)

Appropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .$9,360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$37,800,000

TOTAL. . . .$47,160,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3180. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000223)

Appropriation:

NOVA Program Account—State. . . .$8,670,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$34,770,000

TOTAL. . . .$43,440,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3181. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Youth Athletic Facilities (30000224)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3182. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000225)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in OFM capital document No. 2015-3, developed December 18, 2014.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,660,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$18,060,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3183. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000226)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$200,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$250,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3184. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000227)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3185. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000228)

Appropriation:

Firearms Range Account—State. . . .$580,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,320,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3186. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreational Trails Program (30000229)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3187. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Infrastructure Grants (30000230)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,800,000

TOTAL. . . .$11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3188. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Land and Water Conservation (30000231)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3189. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000233)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$990,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$50,990,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3190. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (91000097)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$2,617,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,383,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3191. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Youth Recreation Grants (92000055)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,942,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,688,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,630,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3192. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP Riparian Cost Share - State Match (30000009)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,790,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$16,590,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3193. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Natural Resources Investment for the Economy and Environment (30000010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for grants to complete natural resource enhancement projects necessary to improve water quality in non-shellfish growing areas.

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,250,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,250,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,750,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3194. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP PIP Loan Program (30000011)

Reappropriation:

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State. . . .$150,000

Appropriation:

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$400,000

TOTAL. . . .$680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3195. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP Riparian Contract Funding (30000012)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,231,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,731,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,924,000

TOTAL. . . .$13,386,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3196. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Match for Federal RCPP Program (30000017)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the state's match of a United States department of agriculture grant of up to $20,000,000 for the regional conservation partnership program. The state match is for implementation of projects that include United States department of agriculture approved activities. The regional conservation partnership program encourages coordination between the natural resource conservation service and local partners or to deliver conservation assistance to agricultural producers and landowners. If none of the eight proposals from entities in Washington state are approved by the United States department of agriculture by July 1, 2015, this section is null and void.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$20,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$24,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$24,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3197. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Improve Shellfish Growing Areas (30000018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for grants to complete natural resource enhancement projects necessary to improve water quality in shellfish growing areas.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3198. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Deschutes Watershed Center (20062008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3205, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,156,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,119,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$31,454,000

TOTAL. . . .$41,729,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3199. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Voights Creek Hatchery (20081003)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,329,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,968,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,297,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3200. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Migratory Waterfowl Habitat (20082045)

Appropriation:

State Wildlife Account—State. . . .$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,080,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3201. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3191, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Wildlife Account—State. . . .$75,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local. . . .$100,000

General Fund—Private/Local. . . .$500,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$10,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$10,675,000

Appropriation:

State Wildlife Account—State. . . .$500,000

General Fund—Private/Local. . . .$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal. . . .$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local. . . .$1,000,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$9,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$12,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$87,626,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$54,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$164,801,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3202. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Lake Rufus Woods Fishing Access (30000241)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3203. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation (30000727)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,780,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$89,780,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3204. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Kalama Falls Hatchery Renovate Adult Handling Facilities (30000480)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3205. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wooten Wildlife Area Improve Flood Plain (30000481)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3207, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$100,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,100,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,600,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$6,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$875,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,722,000

TOTAL. . . .$21,297,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3206. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Puyallup Hatchery Rebuild (30000589)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$571,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,177,000

TOTAL. . . .$9,748,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3207. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Replace Fire Damaged Fencing (30000655)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3208, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,112,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,612,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3208. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Soos Creek Hatchery Renovation (30000661)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$17,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,103,000

TOTAL. . . .$26,103,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3209. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Edmonds Pier Renovation (30000664)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3210. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Marblemount Hatchery - Renovating Jordan Creek Intake (30000666)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,293,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,293,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3211. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Lake Whatcom Hatchery - Replace Intake and Pipeline (30000667)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,354,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,354,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3212. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Fir Island Farm Estuary Restoration Project (30000673)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$15,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3213. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works - Programmatic (30000682)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$375,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$725,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3214. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Springs Production Shift (30000723)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,620,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,620,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3215. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitchell Act Federal Grant (91000021)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,030,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,970,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3216. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Fishway Improvements/Diversions (91000033)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3217. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hatchery Improvements (91000036)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,775,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$34,775,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3218. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works - Access Sites (91000044)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,906,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3219. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works - Fish Passage Barriers (Culverts) (91000045)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,095,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3220. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Leque Island Highway 532 Road Protection (92000019)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$390,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$290,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3221. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Beebe Springs Development (92000026)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,491,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,891,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3222. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Beebe Springs (92000034)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3223. FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP

Community Partnership Restoration Grants (30000007)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$455,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,625,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3224. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Land Acquisition Grants (20052021)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,000,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$85,518,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$89,518,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3225. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Legacy (30000060)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$3,000,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$18,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$56,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$91,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3226. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Riparian Easement Program (30000198)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,999,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,499,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3227. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Transfer (30000200)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the list of projects in OFM capital document number 2015-4, developed December 18, 2014.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$37,746,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$115,735,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$240,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$393,481,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3228. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Sustainable Recreation (30000207)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$15,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3229. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Community Forest Trust (30000217)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,442,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,442,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3230. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Rivers and Habitat Open Space Program (30000221)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3231. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Replacement (30000222)

Appropriation:

Comm/Tech College Forest Reserve Account—State. . . .$500,000

Nat Res Real Property Replacement—State. . . .$30,000,000

Resources Management Cost Account—State. . . .$30,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$60,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$242,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$353,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3232. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

State Forest Land Replacement (30000223)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3233. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Hazard Reduction (30000224)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $9,000,000 is provided solely for forest health hazard reduction treatments on state, federal, and small nonindustrial private timber lands. The appropriation may be used for mechanical treatments, project planning, site preparation, permitting, or prescribed burning.

(b)(i) A minimum of $800,000 of this appropriation must be spent on restoration activities on department of fish and wildlife managed lands. The department of natural resources must work with the department of fish and wildlife to prioritize and conduct these forest hazard reduction treatments.

(ii) Not more than $4,000,000 of this amount may be expended until the department of natural resources submits a report and draft legislation that recommends a feasible funding mechanism to equitably share the costs of forest health hazard reduction treatments between the general public and landowners. The goal of this plan must be to generate an additional $5,000,000 each fiscal year. The department shall submit the report and draft legislation to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature by October 15, 2015. If this report is not submitted the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(2) $1,000,000 is provided solely for grants to local communities, counties, fire districts, and conservation districts to establish new firewise communities and complete near-term actions to increase public safety. The department must implement policies and procedures to follow by local communities, counties, fire districts, and conservation districts that seek to enroll in the firewise program.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$54,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3234. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

DNR Olympic Region Shop Fire Recovery (30000225)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,471,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,471,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3235. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Blanchard Working Forest (30000231)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,500,000

TOTAL. . . .$7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3236. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

NE Region Consolidation (30000236)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3237. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2015-2017 Minor Works Programmatic (30000237)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,345,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3238. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2015-2017 Minor Works Preservation (30000238)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3239. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Contaminated Sites Cleanup and Settlement (30000240)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $261,000 is provided solely for the state's share of liability under the model toxics control act for the cleanup of lead contamination at a rock pit now owned by plum creek timber company.

(2) $95,000 is provided solely for the contaminated soils cleanup at the Cedar creek correction center.

(3) $125,000 is provided solely for the webster nursery pesticides and groundwater cleanup.

(4) $375,000 is provided solely for the underground storage tank cleanup of contaminated soils of an old fueling station at the department of natural resources, SE region headquarters' parking lot that is within the city of Ellensburg new drinking water supply wellhead protection area.

Appropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$856,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$856,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3240. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (30000241)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3241. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (RMAP) (91000040)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$206,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,628,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,024,000

TOTAL. . . .$18,758,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3242. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Puget Sound Corps (91000046)

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$200,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$61,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3243. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Barbeque Flats Road Access (91000081)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$489,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3244. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Quinault Coastal Forest and Watershed Restoration Grant (92000019)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,800,000

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA Access Road Reconstruction (30000059)

Appropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .$900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$950,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Fire Training Academy Burn Building Replacement (30000071)

Reappropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .$300,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$13,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$650,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4003. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Fire Training Academy Emergency Preservation and Repair (30000100)

None

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$50,000

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .$200,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4004. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA Campus Communication Infrastructure Improvement (30000101)

None

Appropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4005. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA Master Plan Phase I Projects Design and Construction (30000103)

None

Appropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .$40,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$60,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,900,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Pierce County Skills Center (20084856)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,905,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$25,640,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$35,545,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2009-11 School Construction Asst. Grant Program (30000031)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5004, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$9,420,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$387,696,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$397,116,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2011-13 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$64,969,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$487,941,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$552,910,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Yakima Valley Technical Skills Center (30000076)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,161,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,282,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$23,443,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

SEA-Tech Branch Campus of Tri-Tech Skills Center (30000078)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$338,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,181,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,519,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Grant County Branch Campus of Wenatchee Valley Skills Center (30000091)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,432,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$17,976,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,408,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Clark County Skills Center (30000093)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,588,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,313,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,901,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2013-15 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance (30000145)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5020, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$183,413,000

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$100,481,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$283,894,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$103,553,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$387,447,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Tri-Tech Skills Center East Growth (30000159)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Clark County Building 100 Modernization (30000160)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,146,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,054,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

West Sound Technical Skills Center (30000162)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,259,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$25,989,000

TOTAL. . . .$29,248,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Capital Program Administration (30000165)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction will publish to its web site and report to the office of financial management, the appropriate committees of the legislature, and the legislative evaluation and accountability program a list of local school district projects submitted for school construction assistance within seven business days of the grant program deadline. The report must be updated within seven days following the superintendent of public instruction's final grant award decisions. The report must include, but not be limited to:

(a) School district;

(b) Project name;

(c) Estimated square footage by proposed project type;

(d) Estimated total of all project costs and estimated total construction contract cost;

(e) Funding sources and election dates, if applicable; and

(f) Intent to front-fund the project.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction will provide to the office of financial management and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee in electronic database form the following:

(a) Study and survey information beginning with grants awarded July 1, 2015; and

(b) All available inventory and condition of schools data.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction must consult with the appropriate committees of the legislature, the office of financial management, and the community and technical colleges to develop an evaluation process and criteria that will provide information necessary to prioritize skills center requests. The process and criteria must be developed by December 1, 2015, and include at least the following criteria with regard to new skills center development or major renovation:

(a) Location;

(b) Programs;

(c) Reasonableness of construction costs;

(d) Life cycle costs;

(e) Demand; and

(f) Other relevant factors.

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$2,924,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,244,000

TOTAL. . . .$15,168,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2015-17 Energy Grants (30000167)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Grants shall be awarded for projects that use the energy savings performance contracting method under chapter 39.35C RCW or an equivalent method of evaluating and delivering energy operational costs savings improvements.

(b) Projects that do not use energy savings performance contracting must: (i) Verify energy and operational cost savings for ten years or until the energy and operational costs savings pay for the project, whichever is shorter; (ii) follow the department of enterprise service's energy savings performance contracting method guidelines; and (iii) employ a licensed engineer for the energy audit, design, and construction.

(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may require third-party verification of savings if a project is not implemented by an energy savings performance contracting method as outlined in chapter 39.35C RCW. If required, third-party verification must be conducted either by an energy savings performance contractor qualified by the department of enterprise services, or a licensed engineer that is a certified energy manager.

(2) Projects must be weighted and prioritized based on the following criteria and in the following order: (a) Healthiest next generation initiative: Priority consideration shall be given to applicants that demonstrate improved health and safety through (i) reductions of carbon emissions; (ii) reduced exposure to polychlorinated biphenyl; or (iii) replacing outdated heating systems that use oil or propane as fuel sources as identified by the Washington state university extension energy program; (b) prior grant award: Priority consideration must be given to applicants that did not receive grant awards from appropriations provided in section 5023, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.; (c) leverage ratio: The higher the leverage ratio of guaranteed energy savings and utility or other incentives to state grant, the higher the project ranking; (d) energy savings: The higher the simple payback for energy savings, not to exceed the useful life of the energy conservation measure, the higher the project ranking; and (e) persistence: The more extensively a project ensures the persistence of energy operational cost savings through ongoing measurement, verification, and reporting over the life of a project, the higher the project ranking.

(3) In order to be eligible for energy cost savings grants under this section, school districts must complete an investment grade audit prior to application or have completed an audit in the 2015-2017 biennium.

(4)(a) The superintendent of public instruction must pay one-half of the preliminary audit, up to five cents per square foot, if the project does not meet the school district's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria. Public school districts must pay the other one-half of the cost of the preliminary audit if the project does not meet their predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria.

(b) The energy savings performance contractor may not charge for an investment grade audit if the project does not meet the school district's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria. Public school districts must pay the full price of an investment grade audit if they do not proceed with a project that meets the school district's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria.

(5) Applicants must submit documentation that demonstrates energy and operational cost savings resulting from the installation of the energy equipment and improvements. The energy savings analysis must be performed by a licensed engineer and the documentation must include, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) A description of the energy equipment and improvements; and

(b) A description of the energy and operational cost savings.

(6) Each school district is limited to one grant award and no more than $1,000,000.

(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may charge projects administrative fees.

(8) The superintendent of public instruction must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on the timing and use of the funds by the end of each fiscal year, until the funds are fully expended.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2015-17 School Construction Assistance Program (30000169)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,355,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for all public school districts once every six years. The office of the superintendent of public instruction will update data in the inventory and condition of school system database to reflect the studies and surveys submitted by school districts receiving grants in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

(2) $771,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for mapping the design of new facilities and remapping the design of facilities to be remodeled, for school construction projects funded through the school construction assistance program.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the technical advisory committee, must develop a formula-based method of allocating energy incentives that would be administered through the school construction assistance program to increase energy efficiency and the use of renewable resources. The recommended formula-based method must be submitted to the office of financial management, the senate ways and means committee, and the house capital budget committee by December 31, 2015.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction must weight and prioritize grant requests on the following criteria and in the following order: (a) Will provide facility capacity needs to reduce kindergarten through third grade class sizes at high poverty schools; (b) will provide facility capacity needs to reduce kindergarten through third grade class sizes in remaining schools.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$351,705,000

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$242,858,000

Common School Construction Account—Federal. . . .$1,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$596,063,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,638,207,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,234,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Full Day Kindergarten Capacity Grants (30000174)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for providing space to support full-day kindergarten enrollment to those school districts with a demonstrated need. Grants may be applied to new construction, portable classrooms, or retrofits to existing facilities to accommodate kindergarten enrollment.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop criteria for providing funding for specific projects to stay within the appropriation level provided in this section. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Prioritizing districts eligible to receive the grant to those that have a lower ending fund balance; (b) considering a district's ability to raise funds through levies or bonds in the prior ten year period; (c) prioritizing projects that will provide full-day kindergarten at high poverty schools; and (d) requiring any district receiving funding provided in this section to demonstrate an inability to provide space for full-day kindergarten enrollment within existing school facilities.

(3) Portable classrooms funded through this grant program do not count against a district's eligibility for the school construction assistance program.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Small Repair and Healthiest Next Generation Grants (30000175)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for nonrecurring costs associated with school facility repairs, renovations, and equipment necessary for improving health and safety needs and to support Washington's healthiest next generation efforts.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of school districts and the department of health, shall develop criteria for providing funding and outcomes for specific projects to stay within the appropriation level provided in this section consistent with the healthiest next generation priorities. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting district applications to two hundred thousand dollars; (b) requiring any district receiving funding provided in this section to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facilities' needs; (c) requiring any district receiving funding provided in this section to demonstrate a consistent commitment to support Washington's healthiest next generation efforts; and (d) considering health equity issues such as weighting applicants with a high percentage of students who qualify for free and reduced-price lunch.

(3) The grants may be used to purchase equipment or make repairs and renovations related to improving children's health and may include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Small repairs and renovations necessary for improving general health and safety needs;(b) fitness playground equipment, covered play, physical education equipment or related structures or renovation; (c) school nutrition equipment or upgrades; (d) water bottle filling stations; (e) renovations, repairs, or equipment to increase safe routes to schools; or (f) garden related structures and greenhouses to provide students access to fresh produce.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Energy Efficiency Grants for K-12 Schools (91000017)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,715,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$38,285,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Tahoma School District (91000023)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Distressed Schools (91000024)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5021, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Energy Efficiency Grants for K-12 Schools (91000025)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,586,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,414,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

San Juan Island School District STEM Vocational Bldg Renovation (91000027)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$382,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$618,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Wenatchee Valley Skills Center (92000004)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,283,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

NEWTECH (Spokane Area Professional-Technical Skills Center) (92000005)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,506,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,493,000

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account. . . .$657,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$8,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,181,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$21,837,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Puget Sound Skills Center (92000007)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$19,433,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,933,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Distressed Schools (92000009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 602, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,039,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,361,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$27,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Yakima Valley Technical Skills Center Sunnyside Satellite (92000013)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$384,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,841,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

School Security Improvement Grants (92000015)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5025, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,941,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$714,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,655,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Delta High School (92000017)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

Independent Living Cottage (30000001)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$506,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,651,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,157,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5030. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General Campus Preservation (30000088)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$820,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,920,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,740,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5031. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

New Education and Physical Education Building (30000022)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (1) The center for childhood deafness and hearing loss shall update the predesign for a new education and physical education building; (2) upon completion of the predesign study, the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss shall enter into an interagency agreement with the office of financial management to provide funding for a budget evaluation study. The office of financial management shall use a budget evaluation study team approach using value engineering techniques and life cycle cost analysis in conducting the study. The office of financial management shall select the budget evaluation team members, contract for the study, and report the results to the legislature and the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss in a timely manner following completion of the study. The study must also include a review of specific facility needs that provide support in educating students with deafness or hearing loss.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$230,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$22,850,000

TOTAL. . . .$23,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5032. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

Minor Works - Preservation (30000025)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

Cottage HVAC Replacement (30000028)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,160,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Denny Hall Renovation (20081002)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$27,590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,890,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Lewis Hall Renovation (20081003)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,865,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,065,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Burke Museum (20082850)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$650,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,150,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Health Sciences Education Phase I - T-Wing Renovation/Addition (30000486)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$623,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$93,377,000

TOTAL. . . .$94,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5038. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

School of Nursing Simulation Learning Lab (30000600)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5039. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Health Sciences Interprofessional Education Classroom Phase I (30000602)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5040. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Computer Science and Engineering Expansion (30000603)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5041. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

University of Washington Minor Capital Repairs - Preservation (30000604)

Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .$43,175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$172,700,000

TOTAL. . . .$215,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5042. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30000714)

Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .$25,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$103,300,000

TOTAL. . . .$129,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5043. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Center for Advanced Materials and Clean Energy Technologies (30000716)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,578,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$169,573,000

TOTAL. . . .$176,151,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5044. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Clean Energy Research Test Beds (30000717)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5045. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

University of Washington Tacoma Urban/Science Education Facility (91000014)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5046. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

University of Washington Tacoma Campus Soil Remediation (92000002)

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5047. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Pullman - Troy Hall Renovation (20061030)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$850,000

Washington State University Building Account—State. . . .$400,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,250,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$30,282,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$771,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,303,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5048. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Clean Technology Laboratory (30000069)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$24,835,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,835,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5049. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

2015-17 Minor Works - Preservation (30001188)

Appropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—

State. . . .$33,585,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$134,340,000

TOTAL. . . .$167,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5050. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Tri-Cities - Academic Building (30001190)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$68,600,000

TOTAL. . . .$69,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5051. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30001324)

Appropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—

State. . . .$10,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,115,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5052. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Everett University Center (91000026)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$54,563,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$64,563,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5053. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

University Science Center - Science I (30000001)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,791,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$55,444,000

TOTAL. . . .$60,635,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5054. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Upgrade/Repair Campus Water System (30000422)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$650,000

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$1,770,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,420,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,858,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,278,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5055. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

University Science Center - Science II (30000466)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,691,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$67,290,000

TOTAL. . . .$73,331,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5056. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure Renewal I (30000506)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,949,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,949,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5057. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Renovate Science (30000507)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$52,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$52,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5058. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000513)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,167,000

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$3,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$11,667,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$56,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$67,667,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5059. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Program (30000516)

Appropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$19,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5060. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventive Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30000547)

Appropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$2,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,868,000

TOTAL. . . .$11,085,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5061. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Science Building (30000045)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$26,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$37,771,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$63,771,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5062. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Samuelson Communication and Technology Center (SCTC) (30000451)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$58,677,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$63,677,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5063. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Nutrition Science (30000456)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$44,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$49,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5064. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation (30000684)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,659,000

Central Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$787,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$7,446,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,640,000

TOTAL. . . .$28,086,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5065. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Bouillon Hall Renovation (30000711)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,977,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,977,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5066. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Program (30000723)

Appropriation:

Central Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$3,777,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,768,000

TOTAL. . . .$8,545,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5067. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Lind Hall Renovation (30000738)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5068. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Combined Utilities (30000740)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$32,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5069. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Old Heat - Plant Annex (30000767)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5070. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventive Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30000770)

Appropriation:

Central Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$2,422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5071. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Science Center - Lab II, 2nd Floor Renovation (30000117)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$575,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,119,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,694,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5072. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Science Center - Lab I Basement Renovation (30000118)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,525,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,240,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$280,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,045,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5073. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Seminar I Renovation (30000125)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$23,318,000

TOTAL. . . .$23,718,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5074. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Facilities Preservation (30000457)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,720,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$5,628,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$10,348,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,180,000

TOTAL. . . .$50,528,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5075. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works Program (30000487)

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$1,164,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,140,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,304,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5076. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Lecture Hall Remodel (30000493)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$16,310,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,008,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$17,618,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5077. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30000612)

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$783,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,132,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,915,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5078. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Carver Academic Renovation (20081060)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$445,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$48,903,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,929,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$56,277,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5079. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

North Campus Utility Upgrade (30000426)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,044,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,538,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,582,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5080. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Performing Arts Exterior Renewal (30000428)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$693,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,254,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,947,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5081. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Classroom and Lab Upgrades Phase 2 (30000518)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$400,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,346,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,746,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5082. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Science Building Renovation and Addition (30000598)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$97,215,000

TOTAL. . . .$97,715,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5083. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

2015-17 Classroom and Lab Upgrades (30000600)

Appropriation:

Western Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$4,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5084. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000615)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,035,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$4,886,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$11,921,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$64,422,000

TOTAL. . . .$76,343,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5085. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30000757)

Appropriation:

Western Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$3,614,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,456,000

TOTAL. . . .$18,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5086. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage Grants (20074004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of RCW 27.34.330.

(2) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the project list in section 5137, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

(3) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 5044, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$340,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,565,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,905,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5087. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage Project Capital Grants (30000011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 5120, chapter 497, Laws of 2009.

(2) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 5045, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,225,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5088. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage Grants (30000117)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of RCW 27.34.330.

(2) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 622, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,782,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,082,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5089. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grants Projects (30000170)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of RCW 27.34.330.

(2) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the project list in section 5093, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,131,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,831,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5090. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

History Museum Membrane System Replacement (30000220)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,805,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,805,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5091. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Facilities Preservation – Minor Works Projects (30000222)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$12,515,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5092. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage Grants (30000237)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 27.34.330.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Project﻿ Authorized Amount

Pantages centennial: Façade restoration. . . .$685,000

Chong Wa parapet preservation. . . .$66,000

Rehabilitation of historic structures. . . .$750,000

Renovation heating of interior space of Balfour dock. . . .$1,000,000

Town hall historic restoration: Phase one of construction. . . .$1,000,000

Washington hall restoration. . . .$452,000

Rehabilitation of Ritzville library for ADA compliance. . . .$138,000

Quartermaster and dental surgery renovation project. . . .$309,000

Skagit city school restoration. . . .$91,000

Yamasaki courtyard restoration project. . . .$129,000

Prairie line trail historic interpretation project. . . .$400,000

Total. . . .$5,020,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,020,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,020,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5093. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Research Center HVAC Replacement (30000238)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5094. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Exhibit Hall/Cowles Center Renovation (30000036)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The eastern Washington state historical society shall conduct a predesign study for a renovation to the exhibit hall and the Cheney cowles center that will include strategies to increase nonstate revenues for the operation of the museum and estimate the minimum amount of state funding necessary to preserve, maintain, and protect state-owned facilities and assets. The predesign study shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5095. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000038)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$702,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$702,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5096. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Falls Community College: Campus Classrooms (20062696)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$430,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,186,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5097. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Puget Sound Community College: Learning Resource Center (20062698)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,146,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$32,515,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$33,661,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5098. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover Park Technical College: Allied Health Care Facility (20062699)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$948,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,385,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$22,333,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5099. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Community College: Technical Education Building (20081220)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,388,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$23,042,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$26,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5100. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett Community College: Index Hall Replacement (20081221)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,657,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$34,657,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$36,314,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5101. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Green River Community College: Trades and Industry Building (20081222)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,013,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$13,606,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$28,619,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5102. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Grays Harbor College: Science and Math Building (20081226)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$21,534,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$22,610,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$44,144,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5103. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma Community College: Health Careers Center (20082701)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,754,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$31,419,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$41,173,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5104. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellevue Community College: Health Science Building (20082702)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,564,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,162,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$31,726,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5105. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates Technical College: Mohler Communications Technology Center (20082703)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$18,606,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,841,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$26,447,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5106. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Columbia Basin College: Social Science Center (20082704)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$728,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$14,505,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$348,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,581,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5107. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark College: Health and Advanced Technologies Building (20082705)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$32,246,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,806,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,052,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5108. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Peninsula College: Fort Worden Building 202 (30000114)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,876,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$501,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,377,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5109. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Seattle Central Community College: Seattle Maritime Academy (30000120)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$14,946,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,882,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,828,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5110. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima Valley Community College: Palmer Martin Building (30000121)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,482,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,758,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5111. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic College: College Instruction Center (30000122)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,489,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$48,516,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,135,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$52,140,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5112. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Centralia Community College: Student Services (30000123)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,331,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$31,209,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,186,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$33,726,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5113. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Peninsula College: Allied Health and Early Childhood Development Center (30000126)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,117,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$23,553,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$693,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,363,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5114. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle Community College: Cascade Court (30000128)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,275,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$28,005,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$812,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$30,092,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5115. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle Community College: Technology Building Renewal (30000129)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,156,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$23,263,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,419,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5116. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Renton Technical College: Automotive Complex Renovation (30000134)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$655,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,104,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$928,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,687,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5117. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Edmonds Community College: Science, Engineering, Technology Building (30000137)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,856,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$964,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,820,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5118. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Whatcom Community College: Learning Commons (30000138)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,526,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$296,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,822,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5119. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Big Bend: Professional-Technical Education Center (30000981)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,040,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$34,490,000

TOTAL. . . .$36,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5120. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane: Main Building South Wing Renovation (30000982)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,823,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$24,742,000

TOTAL. . . .$27,565,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5121. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline: Health and Life Sciences (30000983)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,932,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$23,850,000

TOTAL. . . .$26,782,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5122. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover Park: Center for Advanced Manufacturing Technologies (30000984)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,144,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$33,497,000

TOTAL. . . .$36,641,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5123. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Program (30001038)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$22,456,000

Community/Technical College Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$1,744,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$24,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$24,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5124. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Preservation (30001106)

Appropriation:

Community/Technical College Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$19,360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,360,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5125. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Roof Repairs (30001155)

Appropriation:

Community/Technical College Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$12,534,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,534,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5126. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Facility Repairs (30001182)

Appropriation:

Community/Technical College Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$20,733,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,733,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5127. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Site Repairs (30001216)

Appropriation:

Community/Technical College Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$2,829,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,829,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5128. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Preventive Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30001286)

Appropriation:

Community/Technical College Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$22,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$91,200,000

TOTAL. . . .$114,000,000

(End of part)

PART 6

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6001. RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are thirty-eight million dollars for the 2015-2017 biennium, two hundred thirty million dollars for the 2017-2019 biennium, and three hundred twenty-eight million dollars for the 2019-2021 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6002. ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. (1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of enterprise services and the state treasurer's office to develop requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include charges for services rendered.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Department of enterprise services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $69,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a new office building at 1063 Capitol Way South, Olympia.

(4) Washington State University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $8,300,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to design and construct a dairy research and teaching facility.

(5) Central Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $8,414,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a welcome center.

(6) The Evergreen State College: Enter into a financing contract for up to $12,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase a permanent location for the Tacoma program.

(7) Western Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $16,310,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the carver building renovation.

(8) Eastern Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $10,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the Washington street facility project.

(9) Department of labor and industries: Enter into a financing contract for up to $12,717,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves for construction of a new laboratory and training facility.

(10) Community and technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Centralia Community College for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the student services building.

(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Centralia Community College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct student housing.

(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clark College for up to $8,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the culinary arts facility.

(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clark College for up to $35,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to design and construct a student recreation center.

(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin College for up to $7,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to design and construct a health science center.

(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River College for up to $15,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an aviation program center.

(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Highline College for up to $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the maintenance and grounds building.

(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the main building.

(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate and expand the Myklebust gymnasium.

(j) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Tacoma Community College for up to $12,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to expand a health and wellness center.

(k) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla Community College for up to $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a workforce and business development center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6003. (1) Allotments for appropriations in this act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10 RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and RCW 43.88.110.

(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget notes or in the governor's budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6004. (1) The office of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the completion of such project to another capital project for which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended in making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or institution of higher education and only between capital projects that are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects to local government agencies except where the grants are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that govern the grants.

(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in this act.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a different way.

(4) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6005. (1) It is expected that projects be ready to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.

(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.

(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and shall use contracted design and construction services wherever necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6006. State agencies, including institutions of higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6007. Executive Order No. 05-05, archaeological and cultural resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005. Agencies and higher education institutions shall comply with the requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6008. PUGET SOUND PROTECTION AND RESTORATION. Consistent with RCW 90.71.340, when expending appropriations under this act that contribute to Puget Sound protection and recovery, agencies shall consult with the Puget Sound partnership to ensure that projects and expenditures are either in, or consistent with the 2020 action agenda. These consultations shall include the exchange of information on specific actions, projects, associated funding, performance measures, and other information necessary to track project implementation and ensure alignment with the action agenda. In situations where the Puget Sound partnership finds that a project is not in, or is not consistent with the action agenda, Puget Sound partnership shall document this finding and report back to the governor and legislative fiscal committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6009. FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION—ART WORK ALLOWANCE. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210.

(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding $200,000 by colleges or universities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027.

(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of any public building by a state agency identified in RCW 43.17.020 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 43.17.200.

(4) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts commission during the 2015-2017 biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended solely for direct acquisition of works of art. Art allocations not expended within the ensuing two biennia will lapse. The commission may use up to $100,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces in the state art collection pursuant to RCW 28A.335.210.

(5) The executive director of the arts commission shall appoint a study group to review the operations of the one-half of one percent for works of art purchased or commissioned as required by RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200. The findings of the review must be reported annually to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by August 15th. The review must include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) Projects purchased or commissioned per biennium; (b) partner agencies; (c) funding sources by fiscal year; (d) artwork costs; (e) administrative costs; (f) collection care costs; and (g) project status.

Sec. 6010. RCW 27.34.330 and 2006 c 371 s 232 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state historical society shall establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and prioritize heritage capital projects for potential funding in the state capital budget. The society shall adopt rules governing project eligibility and evaluation criteria. Application for funding of specific projects may be made to the society by local governments, public development authorities, nonprofit corporations, tribal governments, and other entities, as determined by the society. The society, with the advice of leaders in the heritage field, including but not limited to representatives from the office of the secretary of state, the eastern Washington state historical society, and the department of archaeology and historic preservation, shall establish and submit a prioritized list of heritage capital projects to the governor and the legislature in the society's biennial capital budget request. The list shall include a description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding, and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. The total amount of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial project list shall not exceed ten million dollars. The prioritized list shall be developed through open and public meetings and the amount of state funding shall not exceed thirty-three and thirty-three one hundredths percent of the total cost of the project. The nonstate portion of the total project cost may include cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions. The department shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the legislature has approved a specific list of projects. In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the society shall include provisions requiring that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6011. To carry out the provisions of this act, the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design, construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6012. If any federal moneys appropriated by this act for capital projects are not received by the state, the department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace the federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources. No replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval of the director of financial management in consultation with the senate ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6013. (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW 43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended state share of total project costs.

(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6014. NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS. Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, may be transferred to the state taxable building construction account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. Portions of the general obligation bond proceeds authorized by chapter . . ., Laws of 2015 (Bill No.--- (Z-0290/15), the general obligation bond bill) for deposit into the state taxable building construction account that are in excess of amounts required to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations shall be deposited into the state building construction account. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation authority between the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, and the state taxable building construction account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation authority from the state taxable building construction account to the state building construction account may be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6015. COLUMBIA RIVER BASIN NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS. Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the Columbia river basin water supply development account may be transferred to the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation authority between the Columbia river basin water supply development account and the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation authority from the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account to the Columbia river basin water supply development account may be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6016. The office of financial management, in consultation with the fiscal committees of the legislature, may select capital projects that have completed predesign to undergo a budget evaluation study. The budget evaluation study team approach using value engineering techniques and life cycle cost analysis must be utilized by the office of financial management in conducting the studies. The office of financial management shall select the budget evaluation team members, contract for the study, and report the results to the legislature and agencies in a timely manner following the study. Funds from the project appropriation must be used by the office of financial management through an interagency agreement with the affected agencies to cover the cost of the study.

Sec. 6017. RCW 28B.20.725 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7027 are each amended to read as follows:

The board is hereby empowered:

(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;

(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;

(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the University of Washington building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;

(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;

(5) To authorize the transfer to the University of Washington building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. However, during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within one year of the date of transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.

Sec. 6018. RCW 28B.15.310 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7028 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all building fees shall be paid and credited as follows: To the Washington State University bond retirement fund, one-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such bond retirement fund; and the remainder thereof to the Washington State University building account.

The sum so credited to the Washington State University building account shall be expended by the board of regents for buildings, equipment, or maintenance on the campus of Washington State University as may be deemed most advisable and for the best interests of the university, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized by law. During the 2011-2013 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs. During the 2013-2015 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2015-2017 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility conditionassessments. Expenditures so made shall be accounted for in accordance with existing law and shall not be expended until appropriated by the legislature.

The sum so credited to the Washington State University bond retirement fund shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on building bonds issued by the university, except for any sums which may be transferred out of such fund as authorized by law.

Sec. 6019. RCW 28B.15.210 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7026 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all building fees at the University of Washington, including building fees to be charged students registering in the schools of medicine and dentistry, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited as follows:

One-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of the bond retirement fund to the "University of Washington bond retirement fund" and the remainder thereof to the "University of Washington building account." The sum so credited to the University of Washington building account shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting, altering, maintaining, equipping, or furnishing buildings, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(3). The sum so credited to the University of Washington bond retirement fund shall be used for the payment of principal of and interest on bonds outstanding as provided by chapter 28B.20 RCW except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(5). During the 2013-2015 biennium, sums credited to the University of Washington building account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2015-2017 biennium, sums credited to the University of Washington building account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.

Sec. 6020. RCW 28B.30.750 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7029 are each amended to read as follows:

The board is hereby empowered:

(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;

(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;

(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the Washington State University building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;

(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;

(5) To authorize the transfer to the Washington State University building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. However, during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within one year of the date of transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.

Sec. 6021. RCW 28B.35.370 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7030 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof all building fees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be paid into the state treasury and these together with such normal school fund revenues as provided in RCW 28B.35.751 as are received by the state treasury shall be credited as follows:

(1) On or before June 30th of each year the board of trustees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College, if issuing bonds payable out of its building fees and above described normal school fund revenues, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing twelve months to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The amounts so certified by each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be a prior lien and charge against all building fees and above described normal school fund revenues of such institution. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The amounts deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by such regional universities and The Evergreen State College as authorized by law. If in any twelve month period it shall appear that the amount certified by any such board of trustees is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building and above described normal school fund revenue bonds of its institution, the state treasurer shall notify the board of trustees and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.

(2) All normal school fund revenue pursuant to RCW 28B.35.751 shall be deposited in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and normal school revenue and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto except for any sums transferred therefrom as authorized by law. During the 2011-2013 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts shall also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs. During the 2013-2015 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2015-2017 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.

(3) Funds available in the respective capital projects accounts may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 6022. RCW 28B.50.360 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7031 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of start of each quarter all collected building fees of each such community and technical college shall be paid into the state treasury, and shall be credited as follows:

(1) On or before June 30th of each year the college board if issuing bonds payable out of building fees shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing twelve-month period to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the community and technical college capital projects account. Such amounts of the funds deposited in the community and technical college capital projects account as are necessary to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by the college board as authorized by this chapter shall be devoted to that purpose. If in any twelve-month period it shall appear that the amount certified by the college board is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building bonds, the state treasurer shall notify the college board and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.

(2) The community and technical college capital projects account is hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the capital projects account shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets owned by the state board for community and technical colleges in the name of the state of Washington, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto, engineering and architectural services provided by the department of enterprise services, and for the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds issued for such purposes. During the 2011-2013 biennium, sums in the capital projects account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs. During the 2013-2015 biennium, sums in the capital projects account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs. During the 2015-2017 biennium, sums in the capital projects account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.

(3) Funds available in the community and technical college capital projects account may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 6023. RCW 43.155.050 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 983 are each amended to read as follows:

The public works assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning loans. During the ((2011-2013 and 2013-2015))2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to the general fund, the water pollution control revolving account, and the drinking water assistance account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account. During the ((2011-2013))2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account ((for economic development, innovation, and export grants, including brownfields; main street improvement grants; and the loan program consolidation board))to fund the 2016 local and community projects administered by the department of commerce. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to the education legacy trust account such amounts as specified by the legislature.

Sec. 6024. RCW 70.105D.070 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7033 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 992 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control account are hereby created in the state treasury.

(2)(a) Moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 must be deposited as follows: Fifty-six percent to the state toxics control account under subsection (3) of this section and forty-four percent to the local toxics control account under subsection (4) of this section. When the cumulative amount of deposits made to the state and local toxics control accounts under this section reaches the limit during a fiscal year as established in (b) of this subsection, the remainder of the moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 during that fiscal year must be deposited into the environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170.

(b) The limit on distributions of moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 to the state and local toxics control accounts for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2013, is one hundred forty million dollars.

(c) In addition to the funds required under (a) of this subsection, the following moneys must be deposited into the state toxics control account: (i) The costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter 70.105A RCW; (ii) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter; and (iii) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by the legislature.

(3) Moneys in the state toxics control account must be used only to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the following activities:

(a) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;

(b) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;

(c) The hazardous waste clean-up program required under this chapter;

(d) State matching funds required under federal cleanup law;

(e) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;

(f) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling, or disposal of paint and hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and agriculture;

(g) Oil and hazardous materials spill prevention, preparedness, training, and response activities;

(h) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring programs;

(i) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;

(j) A public participation program;

(k) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will achieve both: (i) A substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur; and (ii) the prevention or mitigation of unfair economic hardship;

(l) Development and demonstration of alternative management technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management priorities of RCW 70.105.150;

(m) State agriculture and health programs for the safe use, reduction, recycling, or disposal of pesticides;

(n) Storm water pollution control projects and activities that protect or preserve existing remedial actions or prevent hazardous clean-up sites;

(o) Funding requirements to maintain receipt of federal funds under the federal solid waste disposal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.);

(p) Air quality programs and actions for reducing public exposure to toxic air pollution;

(q) Public funding to assist prospective purchasers to pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) if:

(i) The facility is located within a redevelopment opportunity zone designated under RCW 70.105D.150;

(ii) The amount and terms of the funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70.105D.040(5); and

(iii) The director has found the funding meets any additional criteria established in rule by the department, will achieve a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur, and will provide a public benefit in addition to cleanup commensurate with the scope of the public funding;

(r) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters;

(s) Appropriations to the local toxics control account or the environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170, if the legislature determines that priorities for spending exceed available funds in those accounts;

(t) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the department of ecology's water quality, shorelands, environmental assessment, administration, and air quality programs;

(u) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, actions at the state conservation commission to improve water quality for shellfish; ((and))

(v) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, actions at the University of Washington for reducing ocean acidification;

(w) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics control account may be spent on projects in section 3159, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. and for transfer to the local toxics control account; ((and))

(x) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics control account may be transferred to the radioactive mixed waste account; and

(y) For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics control account may be used for the University of Washington Tacoma soil remediation.

(4)(a) The department shall use moneys deposited in the local toxics control account for grants or loans to local governments for the following purposes in descending order of priority:

(i) Extended grant agreements entered into under (((c)[(e)]))(e)(i) of this subsection;

(ii) Remedial actions, including planning for adaptive reuse of properties as provided for under (((c)[(e)]))(e)(iv) of this subsection. The department must prioritize funding of remedial actions at:

(A) Facilities on the department's hazardous sites list with a high hazard ranking for which there is an approved remedial action work plan or an equivalent document under federal cleanup law;

(B) Brownfield properties within a redevelopment opportunity zone if the local government is a prospective purchaser of the property and there is a department-approved remedial action work plan or equivalent document under the federal cleanup law;

(iii) Storm water pollution source projects that: (A) Work in conjunction with a remedial action; (B) protect completed remedial actions against recontamination; or (C) prevent hazardous clean-up sites;

(iv) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;

(v) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;

(vi) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters; and

(vii) Appropriations to the state toxics control account or the environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170, if the legislature determines that priorities for spending exceed available funds in those accounts.

(b) Funds for plans and programs must be allocated consistent with the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW.

(c) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control account may also be used for local government storm water planning and implementation activities.

(d) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the local toxics control account to the state general fund, such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

(e) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department may use the following strategies when providing grants to local governments under this subsection:

(i) Enter into an extended grant agreement with a local government conducting remedial actions at a facility where those actions extend over multiple biennia and the total eligible cost of those actions exceeds twenty million dollars. The agreement is subject to the following limitations:

(A) The initial duration of such an agreement may not exceed ten years. The department may extend the duration of such an agreement upon finding substantial progress has been made on remedial actions at the facility;

(B) Extended grant agreements may not exceed fifty percent of the total eligible remedial action costs at the facility; and

(C) The department may not allocate future funding to an extended grant agreement unless the local government has demonstrated to the department that funds awarded under the agreement during the previous biennium have been substantially expended or contracts have been entered into to substantially expend the funds;

(ii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government conducting a remedial action that provides for periodic reimbursement of remedial action costs as they are incurred as established in the agreement;

(iii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government prior to it acquiring a property or obtaining necessary access to conduct remedial actions, provided the agreement is conditioned upon the local government acquiring the property or obtaining the access in accordance with a schedule specified in the agreement;

(iv) Provide integrated planning grants to local governments to fund studies necessary to facilitate remedial actions at brownfield properties and adaptive reuse of properties following remediation. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to: Environmental site assessments; remedial investigations; health assessments; feasibility studies; site planning; community involvement; land use and regulatory analyses; building and infrastructure assessments; economic and fiscal analyses; and any environmental analyses under chapter 43.21C RCW;

(v) Provide grants to local governments for remedial actions related to area-wide groundwater contamination. To receive the funding, the local government does not need to be a potentially liable person or be required to seek reimbursement of grant funds from a potentially liable person;

(vi) The director may alter grant matching requirements to create incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the following conditions exists:

(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship imposed by the clean-up liability;

(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development, public recreational opportunities, or habitat restoration opportunities that would not otherwise occur; or

(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and redevelopment of brownfield property under RCW 70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;

(vii) When pending grant applications under (((c)[(e)]))(e)(iv) and (v) of this subsection (4) exceed the amount of funds available, designated redevelopment opportunity zones must receive priority for distribution of available funds.

(((d) [(f)]))(f) To expedite multiparty clean-up efforts, the department may purchase remedial action cost-cap insurance. For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the local toxics control account may be spent on projects in sections 3024, 3035, 3036, and 3059, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

(5) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be spent only after appropriation by statute.

(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics control account may be used for: Natural disasters where there is no hazardous substance contamination; high performance buildings; solid waste incinerator facility feasibility studies, construction, maintenance, or operation; or after January 1, 2010, for projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound, funded in a competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310. However, this subsection does not prevent an appropriation from the state toxics control account to the department of revenue to enforce compliance with the hazardous substance tax imposed in chapter 82.21 RCW.

(7) Except during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, one percent of the moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 shall be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management priorities. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation that are not expended at the close of any biennium revert to the state toxics control account.

(8) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and performance. To accelerate both remedial action and economic recovery, the department may expedite the adoption of rules necessary to implement chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. using the expedited procedures in RCW 34.05.353. The department shall initiate the award of financial assistance by August 1, 2013. To ensure the adoption of rules will not delay financial assistance, the department may administer the award of financial assistance through interpretive guidance pending the adoption of rules through July 1, 2014.

(9) Except as provided under subsection (3)(k) and (q) of this section, nothing in chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. effects [affects] the ability of a potentially liable person to receive public funding.

(10) During the ((2013-2015))2015-2017 fiscal biennium the local toxics control account may also be used for the centennial clean water program ((and for storm water grants))administered by the department of ecology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6025. (1) Funds appropriated in this act for minor works may not be allotted until final project lists are submitted to the office of financial management. Revisions to the project lists are allowed for projects not anticipated at the time of budget development but must be submitted to the office of financial management, the house of representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee for review and comment and must include an explanation of variances from the prior lists before funds may be expended on the revisions. Any project list revisions must be approved by the office of financial management before funds may be expended from the minor works appropriation.

(2)(a) Minor works project lists are single line appropriations that include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each, with the exception of higher education minor works projects that may be valued up to $2,000,000. All projects must meet the criteria included in this subsection (2)(a). These projects should be completed within two years of the appropriation with the funding provided. Agencies are prohibited from including projects on their minor works lists that are a phase of a larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time, would exceed $1,000,000, or $2,000,000 for higher education minor works projects. Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the Americans with disabilities act may be included in any of the minor works categories.

(b) Minor works appropriations may not be used for the following: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works list; moveable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; rolling stock; computers; or to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless expressly authorized. The office of financial management may make an exception to the limitations described in this subsection (2)(b) for exigent circumstances after notifying the legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comments by the legislature regarding the proposed exception.

(c) Minor works preservation projects may include program improvements of no more than twenty-five percent of the individual minor works preservation project cost.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6026. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Public works assistance account—state: For transfer

to the water pollution control revolving account,

$6,000,000 for fiscal year 2016 and $6,000,000 for

fiscal year 2017. . . .$12,000,000

Public works assistance account—state: For transfer

to the drinking water assistance account, $4,400,000

for fiscal year 2016 and $4,400,000 for fiscal

year 2017. . . .$8,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6027. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---