BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that the federal government encourages states to ensure that a child who is eligible for subsidized child care remains in child care regardless of temporary changes to the child's family. The legislature intends to meet this federal goal, which will increase administrative efficiency and provide stable child care, by streamlining a family's reporting requirements regarding changes to a family's circumstances.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.215.135 and 2013 c 323 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall establish and implement policies in the working connections child care program to promote stability and quality of care for children from low-income households. Policies for the expenditure of funds constituting the working connections child care program must be consistent with the outcome measures defined in RCW 74.08A.410 and the standards established in this section intended to promote continuity of care for children.

(2) ((Beginning in fiscal year 2013)) As recommended by Public Law 113-186, authorizations for the working connections child care subsidy shall be effective for twelve months unless a change in circumstances necessitates reauthorization sooner than twelve months. The twelve-month certification applies only if the enrollments in the child care subsidy or working connections child care program are capped. No later than November 1, 2016, the department shall establish and implement a policy that provides working connections child care authorizations for up to three thirty-day periods when a recipient experiences a gap in his or her employment or approved activity.

(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, beginning September 1, 2013, working connections child care providers shall receive a five percent increase in the subsidy rate for enrolling in level 2 in the early achievers programs. Providers must complete level 2 and advance to level 3 within thirty months in order to maintain this increase.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.215.1352 and 2012 c 251 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

When an applicant or recipient applies for or receives working connections child care benefits, ((he or she)) the applicant or recipient is required to((:

(1))) notify the department of social and health services, within five days, of any change in providers((; and

(2) Notify the department of social and health services, within ten days, about any significant change related to the number of child care hours the applicant or recipient needs, cost sharing, or eligibility)).

--- END ---