BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that judges in the trial courts throughout the state effectively utilize what are known as therapeutic courts to remove a defendant's or respondent's case from the criminal and civil court traditional trial track and allow those defendants or respondents the opportunity to obtain treatment services to address particular issues that may have contributed to the conduct that led to their arrest or other issues before the court. Trial courts have proved adept at creative approaches in fashioning a wide variety of therapeutic courts addressing the spectrum of social issues that can contribute to criminal activity and engagement with the child welfare system.

(2) The legislature further finds that by focusing on the specific individual's needs, providing treatment for the issues presented, and ensuring rapid and appropriate accountability for program violations, therapeutic courts may decrease recidivism, improve the safety of the community, and improve the life of the program participant and the lives of the participant's family members by decreasing the severity and frequency of the specific behavior addressed by the therapeutic court.

(3) The legislature recognizes the inherent authority of the judiciary under Article IV, section 1 of the state Constitution to establish therapeutic courts, and the outstanding contribution to the state and local communities made by the establishment of therapeutic courts and desires to provide a general provision in statute acknowledging and encouraging the judiciary to provide for therapeutic court programs to address the particular needs within a given judicial jurisdiction.

(4) Therapeutic court programs may include, but are not limited to:

(a) Adult drug court;

(b) Juvenile drug court;

(c) Family dependency treatment court or family drug court;

(d) Mental health court, which may include participants with developmental disabilities;

(e) DUI court;

(f) Veterans treatment court;

(g) Truancy court;

(h) Domestic violence court;

(i) Gambling court;

(j) Community court;

(k) Homeless court;

(l) Treatment, responsibility, and accountability on campus (Back on TRAC) court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Emerging best practice" or "promising practice" means a program or practice that, based on statistical analyses or a well- established theory of change, shows potential for meeting the evidence- based or research-based criteria, which may include the use of a program that is evidence-based for outcomes other than those listed in this section.

(2) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that: (a) Has been tested in heterogeneous or intended populations with multiple randomized, or statistically controlled evaluations, or both; or one large multiple site randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review demonstrates sustained improvements in at least one outcome; or (b) may be implemented with a set of procedures to allow successful replication in Washington and, when possible, is determined to be cost-beneficial.

(3) "Government authority" means prosecutor or other representative initiating action leading to a proceeding in therapeutic court.

(4) "Participant" means an accused person, offender, or respondent in the judicial proceeding.

(5) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has been tested with a single randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, demonstrating sustained desirable outcomes; or where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review supports sustained outcomes as described in this subsection but does not meet the full criteria for evidence-based.

(6) "Specialty court" and "therapeutic court" both mean a court utilizing a program or programs structured to achieve both a reduction in recidivism and an increase in the likelihood of rehabilitation, or to reduce child abuse and neglect, out-of-home placements of children, termination of parental rights, and substance abuse and mental health symptoms among parents or guardians and their children through continuous and intense judicially supervised treatment and the appropriate use of services, sanctions, and incentives.

(7) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a therapeutic court including, but not limited to: Court and clerk personnel with therapeutic court duties, prosecuting attorneys, the attorney general or his or her representatives, defense counsel, monitoring personnel, and others acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties.

(8) "Trial court" means a superior court authorized under Title 2 RCW or a district or municipal court authorized under Title 3 or 35 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) Every trial and juvenile court in the state of Washington is authorized and encouraged to establish and operate therapeutic courts. Therapeutic courts, in conjunction with the government authority and subject matter experts specific to the focus of the therapeutic court, develop and process cases in ways that depart from traditional judicial processes to allow defendants or respondents the opportunity to obtain treatment services to address particular issues that may have contributed to the conduct that led to their arrest or involvement in the child welfare system in exchange for resolution of the case or charges. In criminal cases, the consent of the prosecutor is required.

(2) While a therapeutic court judge retains the discretion to decline to accept a case into the therapeutic court, and while a therapeutic court retains discretion to establish processes and determine eligibility for admission to the therapeutic court process unique to their community and jurisdiction, the effectiveness and credibility of any therapeutic court will be enhanced when the court implements evidence-based practices, research-based practices, emerging best practices, or promising practices that have been identified and accepted at the state and national levels. Promising practices, emerging best practices, and/or research-based programs are authorized where determined by the court to be appropriate. As practices evolve, the trial court shall regularly assess the effectiveness of its program and the methods by which it implements and adopts new best practices.

(3) Except under special findings by the court, the following individuals are not eligible for participation in therapeutic courts:

(a) Individuals who are currently charged or who have been previously convicted of a serious violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(b) Individuals who are currently charged with an offense alleging intentional discharge, threat to discharge, or attempt to discharge a firearm in furtherance of the offense;

(c) Individuals who are currently charged with or who have been previously convicted of vehicular homicide or an equivalent out-of- state offense; or

(d) Individuals who are currently charged with or who have been previously convicted of: An offense alleging substantial bodily harm or great bodily harm as defined in RCW 9A.04.110, or death of another person.

(4) Any jurisdiction establishing a therapeutic court shall endeavor to incorporate the therapeutic court principles of best practices as recognized by state and national therapeutic court organizations in structuring a particular program, which may include:

(a) Determining the population;

(b) Performing a clinical assessment;

(c) Developing the treatment plan;

(d) Monitoring the participant, including any appropriate testing;

(e) Forging agency, organization, and community partnerships;

(f) Taking a judicial leadership role;

(g) Developing case management strategies;

(h) Addressing transportation, housing, and subsistence issues;

(i) Evaluating the program;

(j) Ensuring a sustainable program.

(5) Upon a showing of indigence under RCW 10.101.010, fees may be reduced or waived.

(6) The department of social and health services shall furnish services to therapeutic courts addressing dependency matters where substance abuse or mental health are an issue unless the court contracts with providers outside of the department.

(7) Any jurisdiction that has established more than one therapeutic court under this chapter may combine the functions of these courts into a single therapeutic court.

(8) Nothing in this section prohibits a district or municipal court from ordering treatment or other conditions of sentence or probation following a conviction, without the consent of either the prosecutor or defendant.

(9) No therapeutic or specialty court may be established specifically for the purpose of applying foreign law, including foreign criminal, civil, or religious law, that is otherwise not required by treaty.

(10) No therapeutic or specialty court established by court rule shall enforce a foreign law, if doing so would violate a right guaranteed by the Constitution of this state or of the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Jurisdictions may seek federal funding available to support the operation of its therapeutic court and associated services and must match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state moneys allocated for therapeutic courts with local cash or in-kind resources. Moneys allocated by the state may be used to supplement, not supplant other federal, state, and local funds for therapeutic courts. However, until June 30, 2016, no match is required for state moneys expended for the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a therapeutic court authorized under this chapter.

Sec. 5. RCW 82.14.460 and 2012 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A county legislative authority may authorize, fix, and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter.

(b) If a county with a population over eight hundred thousand has not imposed the tax authorized under this subsection by January 1, 2011, any city with a population over thirty thousand located in that county may authorize, fix, and impose the sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The county must provide a credit against its tax for the full amount of tax imposed under this subsection (1)(b) by any city located in that county if the county imposes the tax after January 1, 2011.

(2) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the county for a county's tax and within a city for a city's tax. The rate of tax equals one-tenth of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.

(3) Moneys collected under this section must be used solely for the purpose of providing for the operation or delivery of chemical dependency or mental health treatment programs and services and for the operation or delivery of therapeutic court programs and services. For the purposes of this section, "programs and services" includes, but is not limited to, treatment services, case management, transportation, and housing that are a component of a coordinated chemical dependency or mental health treatment program or service. Every jurisdiction that authorizes the tax provided in this section shall, and every other jurisdiction may, establish and operate a therapeutic court component for dependency proceedings designed to be effective for the court's size, location, and resources.

(4) All moneys collected under this section must be used solely for the purpose of providing new or expanded programs and services as provided in this section, except as follows:

(a) For a county with a population larger than twenty-five thousand or a city with a population over thirty thousand, which initially imposed the tax authorized under this section prior to January 1, 2012, a portion of moneys collected under this section may be used to supplant existing funding for these purposes as follows: Up to fifty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar years 2011-2012; up to forty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2013; up to thirty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2014; up to twenty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2015; and up to ten percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2016;

(b) For a county with a population larger than twenty-five thousand or a city with a population over thirty thousand, which initially imposes the tax authorized under this section after December 31, 2011, a portion of moneys collected under this section may be used to supplant existing funding for these purposes as follows: Up to fifty percent may be used to supplant existing funding for up to the first three calendar years following adoption; and up to twenty-five percent may be used to supplant existing funding for the fourth and fifth years after adoption;

(c) For a county with a population of less than twenty-five thousand, a portion of moneys collected under this section may be used to supplant existing funding for these purposes as follows: Up to eighty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar years 2011-2012; up to sixty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2013; up to forty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2014; up to twenty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2015; and up to ten percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2016; and

(d) Notwithstanding (a) through (c) of this subsection, moneys collected under this section may be used to support the cost of the judicial officer and support staff of a therapeutic court.

(5) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to prohibit the use of moneys collected under this section for the replacement of lapsed federal funding previously provided for the operation or delivery of services and programs as provided in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Individual trial courts are authorized and encouraged to establish multijurisdictional partnerships and/or interlocal agreements under RCW 39.34.180 to enhance and expand the coverage area of the therapeutic court. Specifically, district and municipal courts may work cooperatively with each other and with the superior courts to identify and implement nontraditional case processing methods which can eliminate traditional barriers that decrease judicial efficiency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Any therapeutic court meeting the definition of therapeutic court in section 2 of this act and existing on the effective date of this section continues to be authorized.

Sec. 8. RCW 9.94A.517 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)

TABLE 3

DRUG OFFENSE SENTENCING GRID

Seriousness

Level

Offender Score

0 to 2

Offender Score

3 to 5

Offender Score

6 to 9 or more

III

51 to 68 months

68 + to 100 months

100 + to 120 months

II

12 + to 20 months

20 + to 60 months

60 + to 120 months

I

0 to 6 months

6 + to 12 months

12 + to 24 months

References to months represent the standard sentence ranges. 12 +equals one year and one day.

(2) The court may utilize any other sanctions or alternatives as authorized by law, including but not limited to the special drug offender sentencing alternative under RCW 9.94A.660 or drug court under ((RCW 2.28.170)) chapter 2.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 12 of this act).

(3) Nothing in this section creates an entitlement for a criminal defendant to any specific sanction, alternative, sentence option, or substance abuse treatment.

Sec. 9. RCW 9.94A.517 and 2002 c 290 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)

TABLE 3

DRUG OFFENSE SENTENCING GRID

Seriousness

Level

Offender Score

0 to 2

Offender Score

3 to 5

Offender Score

6 to 9 or more

III

51 to 68 months

68 + to 100 months

100 + to 120 months

II

12 + to 20 months

20 + to 60 months

60 + to 120 months

I

0 to 6 months

6 + to 18 months

12 + to 24 months

References to months represent the standard sentence ranges. 12 + equals one year and one day.

(2) The court may utilize any other sanctions or alternatives as authorized by law, including but not limited to the special drug offender sentencing alternative under RCW 9.94A.660 or drug court under ((RCW 2.28.170)) chapter 2.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 12 of this act).

(3) Nothing in this section creates an entitlement for a criminal defendant to any specific sanction, alternative, sentence option, or substance abuse treatment.

Sec. 10. RCW 70.96A.350 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 990 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The criminal justice treatment account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for: (a) Substance abuse treatment and treatment support services for offenders with an addiction or a substance abuse problem that, if not treated, would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a prosecuting attorney in Washington state; (b) the provision of drug and alcohol treatment services and treatment support services for nonviolent offenders within a drug court program; (c) the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court; and (d) during the 2011-2013 biennium, the legislature may appropriate up to three million dollars from the account in order to offset reductions in the state general fund for treatment services provided by counties. This amount is not subject to the requirements of subsections (5) through (9) of this section. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the criminal justice treatment account to the state general fund amounts as reflect the state savings associated with the implementation of the medicaid expansion of the federal affordable care act. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Treatment" means services that are critical to a participant's successful completion of his or her substance abuse treatment program, but does not include the following services: Housing other than that provided as part of an inpatient substance abuse treatment program, vocational training, and mental health counseling; and

(b) "Treatment support" means transportation to or from inpatient or outpatient treatment services when no viable alternative exists, and child care services that are necessary to ensure a participant's ability to attend outpatient treatment sessions.

(3) Revenues to the criminal justice treatment account consist of: (a) Funds transferred to the account pursuant to this section; and (b) any other revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.

(4)(a) For the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2003, the state treasurer shall transfer eight million nine hundred fifty thousand dollars from the general fund into the criminal justice treatment account, divided into eight equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, and each subsequent fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer eight million two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the general fund to the criminal justice treatment account, divided into four equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, and each subsequent fiscal year, the amount transferred shall be increased on an annual basis by the implicit price deflator as published by the federal bureau of labor statistics.

(b) In each odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate the amount transferred to the criminal justice treatment account in (a) of this subsection to the division of alcohol and substance abuse for the purposes of subsection (5) of this section.

(5) Moneys appropriated to the division of alcohol and substance abuse from the criminal justice treatment account shall be distributed as specified in this subsection. The department shall serve as the fiscal agent for purposes of distribution. Until July 1, 2004, the department may not use moneys appropriated from the criminal justice treatment account for administrative expenses and shall distribute all amounts appropriated under subsection (4)(b) of this section in accordance with this subsection. Beginning in July 1, 2004, the department may retain up to three percent of the amount appropriated under subsection (4)(b) of this section for its administrative costs.

(a) Seventy percent of amounts appropriated to the division from the account shall be distributed to counties pursuant to the distribution formula adopted under this section. The division of alcohol and substance abuse, in consultation with the department of corrections, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, the superior court judges' association, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, representatives of the criminal defense bar, representatives of substance abuse treatment providers, and any other person deemed by the division to be necessary, shall establish a fair and reasonable methodology for distribution to counties of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account. County or regional plans submitted for the expenditure of formula funds must be approved by the panel established in (b) of this subsection.

(b) Thirty percent of the amounts appropriated to the division from the account shall be distributed as grants for purposes of treating offenders against whom charges are filed by a county prosecuting attorney. The division shall appoint a panel of representatives from the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges' association, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington defender's association or the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, substance abuse treatment providers, and the division. The panel shall review county or regional plans for funding under (a) of this subsection and grants approved under this subsection. The panel shall attempt to ensure that treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.

(6) The county alcohol and drug coordinator, county prosecutor, county sheriff, county superior court, a substance abuse treatment provider appointed by the county legislative authority, a member of the criminal defense bar appointed by the county legislative authority, and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of the drug court shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (5)(b) of this section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the criminal justice treatment account within that county. The funds shall be used solely to provide approved alcohol and substance abuse treatment pursuant to RCW 70.96A.090, treatment support services, and for the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court.

(a) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent on the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court.

(b) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent for treatment support services.

(7) Counties are encouraged to consider regional agreements and submit regional plans for the efficient delivery of treatment under this section.

(8) Moneys allocated under this section shall be used to supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds used for substance abuse treatment.

(9) Counties must meet the criteria established in ((RCW 2.28.170(3)(b))) section 3(3) of this act.

(10) The authority under this section to use funds from the criminal justice treatment account for the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court expires June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 2.28.170 (Drug courts) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 952, 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 951, 2013 c 257 s 5, 2009 c 445 s 2, 2006 c 339 s 106, 2005 c 504 s 504, 2002 c 290 s 13, & 1999 c 197 s 9;

(2) RCW 2.28.175 (DUI courts) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 35 s 2, 2013 c 257 s 6, 2012 c 183 s 1, & 2011 c 293 s 10;

(3) RCW 2.28.180 (Mental health courts) and 2013 c 257 s 7, 2011 c 236 s 1, & 2005 c 504 s 501;

(4) RCW 2.28.190 (DUI court, drug court, and mental health court may be combined) and 2013 c 257 s 8, 2011 c 293 s 11, & 2005 c 504 s 502;

(5) RCW 13.40.700 (Juvenile gang courts—Minimum requirements— Admission—Individualized plan—Completion) and 2012 c 146 s 2;

(6) RCW 13.40.710 (Juvenile gang courts—Data—Reports) and 2012 c 146 s 3;

(7) RCW 26.12.250 (Therapeutic courts) and 2005 c 504 s 503;

(8) RCW 2.28.165 (Specialty and therapeutic courts—Establishment— Principles of best practices—Limitations) and 2013 c 257 s 2; and

(9) RCW 2.28.166 (Definition of "specialty court" and "therapeutic court") and 2013 c 257 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. Sections 1 through 4, 6, and 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 2 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. Section 8 of this act expires July 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. Section 9 of this act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---