BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The energy facility site evaluation council shall study matters relating to the siting of small modular reactors in Washington. The study must include the following: (a) Identification of possible locations in the state where small modular reactors could be suitably located; (b) identification of permits and studies that would need to be conducted in order to facilitate the siting of small modular reactors; and (c) recommendations on how the siting and permitting process could be streamlined for small modular reactors, including recommendations for establishing general or programmatic permits or processes developed in consultation with the departments in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The energy facility site evaluation council must consult with the military department, the department of ecology, and the department of health to review the permitting responsibilities of those agencies as they may relate to siting small modular reactors.

(3) The energy facility site evaluation council shall report its findings and recommendations to the legislature and governor by December 1, 2015.

(4) The energy facility site evaluation council may contract for services to assist in the study.

(5) For purposes of this section, "small modular reactor" means the following: (a) A scalable nuclear power plant using reactors each with a gross power output no greater than three hundred megawatts electric; and (b) where each reactor is designed for factory manufacturing and transport by truck, rail, or barge.

--- END ---