BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The development of a bistate megaproject takes years of hard work and difficult decisions. Once a megaproject has reached the stage in its development when the federal government has issued a record of decision, the megaproject must move forward. To allow otherwise is to waste tens of millions of dollars of taxpayer money, destroy bistate relationships and trust, and stall economic growth and productivity in the entire region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 47.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) As used in this section, "bistate megaproject" means a highway construction project valued at five hundred million dollars or more that extends across the border between Washington and another state.

(2) If the legislature fails to adopt a financing plan that identifies the sources of funding to complete a bistate megaproject that has received a record of decision from the federal government by the next ensuing regular legislative session following the state's receipt of the record of decision, the office of financial management must reallocate funds from planned and budgeted transportation projects that are not currently under construction sufficient to completely construct the bistate megaproject.

--- END ---