BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a review of the available data on higher education costs at the state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College.

(2)(a) The review must describe the available cost data for each institution and the available cost data for students over the most recent twenty-year period, including the cost of:

(i) Research;

(ii) Faculty and staff salaries;

(iii) Administration;

(iv) Health care and benefits;

(v) Capital;

(vi) Student services;

(vii) Textbooks; and

(viii) Student housing.

(b) The review must also compare whether this data is available for institutions and students in the global challenge states.

(c) The review shall use information already available and report where there are gaps in the information sought under this section. The education data center in the office of financial management and the institutions of higher education must provide data and staff support to the committee to assist with completing the review.

(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall issue a report to the legislature by January 2016.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2016.

--- END ---