BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.131.413 and 2010 c 245 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The alternative process for awarding contracts established in RCW 28B.20.744 terminates June 30, ((2015)) 2017, as provided in RCW 43.131.414.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.131.414 and 2010 c 245 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW 28B.20.744 and 2010 c 245 s 11, as now existing or hereafter amended, is repealed, effective June 30, ((2016)) 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 30, 2015.

--- END ---