BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall develop and make available resources for expecting parents regarding recommended childhood immunizations. The resources are intended to be provided to expecting parents by their health care providers to encourage discussion on childhood immunizations and postnatal care.

--- END ---