BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.14.090 and 2006 c 307 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A health technology clinical committee is established, to include the following eleven members appointed by the administrator in consultation with participating state agencies:

(a) Six practicing physicians licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW; and

(b) Five other practicing licensed health professionals who use health technology in their scope of practice.

(i) At least two members of the committee must have professional experience treating women, children, elderly persons, and people with diverse ethnic and racial backgrounds.

(ii) At least one member of the committee must be appointed from nominations submitted by the Washington state medical association or the Washington state osteopathic medical association.

(2) In addition, any rotating clinical expert selected to advise the committee on health technology must be a nonvoting member of the committee.

(3) Members of the committee:

(a) Shall not contract with or be employed by a health technology manufacturer or a participating agency during their term or for eighteen months before their appointment. As a condition of appointment, each person shall agree to the terms and conditions imposed by the administrator regarding conflicts of interest;

(b) Are immune from civil liability for any official acts performed in good faith as members of the committee; and

(c) Shall be compensated for participation in the work of the committee in accordance with a personal services contract to be executed after appointment and before commencement of activities related to the work of the committee.

(((3))) (4) Meetings of the committee and any advisory group are subject to chapter 42.30 RCW, the open public meetings act, including RCW 42.30.110(1)(l), which authorizes an executive session during a regular or special meeting to consider proprietary or confidential nonpublished information.

(((4))) (5) Neither the committee nor any advisory group is an agency for purposes of chapter 34.05 RCW.

(((5))) (6) The health care authority shall provide administrative support to the committee and any advisory group, and may adopt rules governing their operation.

--- END ---