BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.39 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Health insurance carriers licensed under chapters 48.20, 48.21, 48.44, and 48.46 RCW must provide notice to health care providers of changes in provider networks including the buying, selling, or transferring of a provider network. The notice must be provided not less than sixty days in advance of the network change and must inform the providers that they may choose to opt out of the network change.

(2) Health insurance carriers may not publish or advertise provider networks that include the newly acquired or transferred providers until the providers advance notification period is complete to ensure providers have opportunity to opt out of the network change.

--- END ---