BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.24.550 and 2011 c 337 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the disclosure under subsection (5) of this section, public agencies are authorized to release information to the public regarding sex offenders and kidnapping offenders when the agency determines that disclosure of the information is relevant and necessary to protect the public and counteract the danger created by the particular offender. This authorization applies to information regarding: (a) Any person adjudicated or convicted of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9A.44.128 or a kidnapping offense as defined by RCW 9A.44.128; (b) any person under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence review board as the result of a sex offense or kidnapping offense; (c) any person committed as a sexually violent predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or as a sexual psychopath under chapter 71.06 RCW; (d) any person found not guilty of a sex offense or kidnapping offense by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW; and (e) any person found incompetent to stand trial for a sex offense or kidnapping offense and subsequently committed under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW.

(2) Except for the information specifically required under subsection (5) of this section, the extent of the ((public disclosure)) community notification of relevant and necessary information shall be rationally related to: (a) The level of risk posed by the offender to the community; (b) the locations where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is regularly found; and (c) the needs of the affected community members for information to enhance their individual and collective safety.

(3) Except for the information specifically required under subsection (5) of this section, local law enforcement agencies shall consider the following guidelines in determining the extent of a ((public disclosure)) community notification made under this section: (a) For offenders classified as risk level I, the agency shall share information with other appropriate law enforcement agencies and, if the offender is a student, the public or private school regulated under Title 28A RCW or chapter 72.40 RCW which the offender is attending, or planning to attend. The agency may disclose, upon request, relevant, necessary, and accurate information to any victim or witness to the offense ((and to)), any individual community member who lives near the residence where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is regularly found, and any individual who requests information regarding a specifically named offender; (b) for offenders classified as risk level II, the agency may also disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information to public and private schools, child day care centers, family day care providers, public libraries, businesses and organizations that serve primarily children, women, or vulnerable adults, and neighbors and community groups near the residence where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is regularly found; (c) for offenders classified as risk level III, the agency may also disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information to the public at large; and (d) because more localized notification is not feasible and homeless and transient offenders may present unique risks to the community, the agency may also disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information to the public at large for offenders registered as homeless or transient.

(4) The county sheriff with whom an offender classified as risk level III is registered shall ((cause to be published by legal notice, advertising, or news release a sex offender community notification that conforms to the guidelines established under RCW 4.24.5501 in at least one legal newspaper with general circulation in the area of the sex offender's registered address or location. Unless the information is posted on the web site described in subsection (5) of this section, this list shall be maintained by the county sheriff on a publicly accessible web site and shall be updated at least once per month)) release a sex offender community notification that conforms to the guidelines established under RCW 4.24.5501.

(5)(a) When funded by federal grants or other sources, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall create and maintain a statewide registered kidnapping and sex offender web site, which shall be available to the public. The web site shall post all level III and level II registered sex offenders, level I registered sex offenders only during the time they are out of compliance with registration requirements under RCW 9A.44.130 or if lacking a fixed residence as provided in RCW 9A.44.130, and all registered kidnapping offenders in the state of Washington.

(i) For level III offenders, the web site shall contain, but is not limited to, the registered sex offender's name, relevant criminal convictions, address by hundred block, physical description, and photograph. The web site shall provide mapping capabilities that display the sex offender's address by hundred block on a map. The web site shall allow citizens to search for registered sex offenders within the state of Washington by county, city, zip code, last name, and address by hundred block.

(ii) For level II offenders, and level I sex offenders during the time they are out of compliance with registration requirements under RCW 9A.44.130, the web site shall contain, but is not limited to, the same information and functionality as described in (a)(i) of this subsection, provided that it is permissible under state and federal law. If it is not permissible, the web site shall be limited to the information and functionality that is permissible under state and federal law.

(iii) For kidnapping offenders, the web site shall contain, but is not limited to, the same information and functionality as described in (a)(i) of this subsection, provided that it is permissible under state and federal law. If it is not permissible, the web site shall be limited to the information and functionality that is permissible under state and federal law.

(b) ((Until the implementation of (a) of this subsection, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall create a web site available to the public that provides electronic links to county-operated web sites that offer sex offender registration information.)) Law enforcement agencies must provide information requested by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to administer the statewide registered kidnapping and sex offender web site.

(c) Information held by or accessible to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs pursuant to this section is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(6) ((Local)) (a) Law enforcement agencies ((that disseminate information pursuant to this section)) responsible for the registration and dissemination of information regarding offenders required to register under RCW 9A.44.130 shall assign a risk level classification to all offenders after consideration of: (((a) Review)) (i) Any available risk level classifications ((made)) provided by the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, and the indeterminate sentence review board; (((b) assign risk level classifications to all offenders about whom information will be disseminated)) (ii) the agency's own application of a sex offender risk assessment tool; and (iii) other information and aggravating or mitigating factors known to the agency and deemed rationally related to the risk posed by the offender to the community at large.

(b) A sex offender shall be classified as a risk level I if his or her risk assessment and other information or factors deemed relevant by the law enforcement agency indicate he or she is at a low risk to sexually reoffend within the community at large. A sex offender shall be classified as a risk level II if his or her risk assessment and other information or factors deemed relevant by the law enforcement agency indicate he or she is at a moderate risk to sexually reoffend within the community at large. A sex offender shall be classified as a risk level III if his or her risk assessment and other information or factors deemed relevant by the law enforcement agency indicate he or she is at a high risk to sexually reoffend within the community at large.

(c) The agency shall make a good faith effort to notify the public and residents within a reasonable period of time after the offender registers with the agency.

((The juvenile court shall provide local law enforcement officials with all relevant information on offenders allowed to remain in the community in a timely manner.)) (d) Agencies may develop a process to allow an offender to petition for review of the offender's assigned risk level classification. The timing, frequency, and process for review are at the sole discretion of the agency.

(7) An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470, or units of local government and its employees, as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are immune from civil liability for damages for any discretionary risk level classification decisions or release of relevant and necessary information, unless it is shown that the official, employee, or agency acted with gross negligence or in bad faith. The immunity in this section applies to risk level classification decisions and the release of relevant and necessary information regarding any individual for whom disclosure is authorized. The decision of a ((local)) law enforcement agency or official to classify an offender to a risk level other than the one assigned by the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, or the indeterminate sentence review board, or the release of any relevant and necessary information based on that different classification shall not, by itself, be considered gross negligence or bad faith. The immunity provided under this section applies to the release of relevant and necessary information to other public officials, public employees, or public agencies, and to the general public.

(8) Except as may otherwise be provided by law, nothing in this section shall impose any liability upon a public official, public employee, or public agency for failing to release information authorized under this section.

(9) ((Nothing in this section implies that information regarding persons designated in subsection (1) of this section is confidential except as may otherwise be provided by law.)) Sex offender and kidnapping offender registration information is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(10) When a ((local)) law enforcement agency or official classifies an offender differently than the offender is classified by the end of sentence review committee ((or the department of social and health services)) at the time of the offender's release from confinement, the law enforcement agency or official shall notify the end of sentence review committee ((or the department of social and health services)) and the Washington state patrol and submit its reasons supporting the change in classification.

(11) As used in this section, "law enforcement agency" means a general authority Washington law enforcement agency as defined in RCW 10.93.020.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.44.128 and 2014 c 188 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW 9A.44.130 through 9A.44.145, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330, the following definitions apply:

(1) "Business day" means any day other than Saturday, Sunday, or a legal local, state, or federal holiday.

(2) "Conviction" means any adult conviction or juvenile adjudication for a sex offense or kidnapping offense.

(3) "Disqualifying offense" means a conviction for: Any offense that is a felony; a sex offense as defined in this section; a crime against children or persons as defined in RCW 43.43.830(7) and 9.94A.411(2)(a); an offense with a domestic violence designation as provided in RCW 10.99.020; permitting the commercial sexual abuse of a minor as defined in RCW 9.68A.103; or any violation of chapter 9A.88 RCW.

(4) "Employed" or "carries on a vocation" means employment that is full time or part time for a period of time exceeding fourteen days, or for an aggregate period of time exceeding thirty days during any calendar year. A person is employed or carries on a vocation whether the person's employment is financially compensated, volunteered, or for the purpose of government or educational benefit.

(5) "Fixed residence" means a building that a person lawfully and habitually uses as living quarters a majority of the week. Uses as living quarters means to conduct activities consistent with the common understanding of residing, such as sleeping; eating; keeping personal belongings; receiving mail; and paying utilities, rent, or mortgage. A nonpermanent structure including, but not limited to, a motor home, travel trailer, camper, or boat may qualify as a residence provided it is lawfully and habitually used as living quarters a majority of the week, primarily kept at one location with a physical address, and the location it is kept at is either owned or rented by the person or used by the person with the permission of the owner or renter. A shelter program may qualify as a residence provided it is a shelter program designed to provide temporary living accommodations for the homeless, provides an offender with a personally assigned living space, and the offender is permitted to store belongings in the living space.

(6) "In the community" means residing outside of confinement or incarceration for a disqualifying offense.

(7) "Institution of higher education" means any public or private institution dedicated to postsecondary education, including any college, university, community college, trade, or professional school.

(8) "Kidnapping offense" means:

(a) The crimes of kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, and unlawful imprisonment, as defined in chapter 9A.40 RCW, where the victim is a minor and the offender is not the minor's parent;

(b) Any offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit an offense that is classified as a kidnapping offense under this subsection; ((and))

(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for: An offense for which the person would be required to register as a kidnapping offender if residing in the state of conviction; or, if not required to register in the state of conviction, an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a kidnapping offense under this subsection; and

(d) Any tribal conviction for an offense for which the person would be required to register as a kidnapping offender while residing in the reservation of conviction; or, if not required to register in the reservation of conviction, an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a kidnapping offense under this subsection.

(9) "Lacks a fixed residence" means the person does not have a living situation that meets the definition of a fixed residence and includes, but is not limited to, a shelter program designed to provide temporary living accommodations for the homeless, an outdoor sleeping location, or locations where the person does not have permission to stay.

(10) "Sex offense" means:

(a) Any offense defined as a sex offense by RCW 9.94A.030;

(b) Any violation under RCW 9A.44.096 (sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree);

(c) Any violation under RCW 9A.40.100(1)(b)(ii) (trafficking);

(d) Any violation under RCW 9.68A.090 (communication with a minor for immoral purposes);

(e) A violation under RCW 9A.88.070 (promoting prostitution in the first degree) or RCW 9A.88.080 (promoting prostitution in the second degree) if the person has a prior conviction for one of these offenses;

(f) Any violation under RCW 9A.40.100(1)(a)(i)(A) (III) or (IV) or (a)(i)(B);

(g) Any gross misdemeanor that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit an offense that is classified as a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030 or this subsection;

(h) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense for which the person would be required to register as a sex offender while residing in the state of conviction; or, if not required to register in the state of conviction, an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a sex offense under this subsection;

(i) Any federal conviction classified as a sex offense under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 16911 (SORNA);

(j) Any military conviction for a sex offense. This includes sex offenses under the uniform code of military justice, as specified by the United States secretary of defense;

(k) Any conviction in a foreign country for a sex offense if it was obtained with sufficient safeguards for fundamental fairness and due process for the accused under guidelines or regulations established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 16912;

(l) Any tribal conviction for an offense for which the person would be required to register as a sex offender while residing in the reservation of conviction; or, if not required to register in the reservation of conviction, an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a sex offense under this subsection.

(11) "School" means a public or private school regulated under Title 28A RCW or chapter 72.40 RCW.

(12) "Student" means a person who is enrolled, on a full-time or part-time basis, in any school or institution of higher education.

Sec. 3. RCW 9A.44.130 and 2011 c 337 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any adult or juvenile residing whether or not the person has a fixed residence, or who is a student, is employed, or carries on a vocation in this state who has been found to have committed or has been convicted of any sex offense or kidnapping offense, or who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of committing any sex offense or kidnapping offense, shall register with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of employment or vocation, or as otherwise specified in this section. When a person required to register under this section is in custody of the state department of corrections, the state department of social and health services, a local division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility as a result of a sex offense or kidnapping offense, the person shall also register at the time of release from custody with an official designated by the agency that has jurisdiction over the person.

(b) Any adult or juvenile who is required to register under (a) of this subsection must give notice to the county sheriff of the county with whom the person is registered within three business days:

(i) Prior to arriving at a school or institution of higher education to attend classes;

(ii) Prior to starting work at an institution of higher education; or

(iii) After any termination of enrollment or employment at a school or institution of higher education.

(2)(a) A person required to register under this section must provide the following information when registering: (i) Name and any aliases used; (ii) complete and accurate residential address or, if the person lacks a fixed residence, where he or she plans to stay; (iii) date and place of birth; (iv) place of employment; (v) crime for which convicted; (vi) date and place of conviction; (vii) social security number; (viii) photograph; and (ix) fingerprints.

(b) A person may be required to update any of the information required in this subsection in conjunction with any address verification conducted by the county sheriff or as part of any notice required by this section.

(c) A photograph or copy of an individual's fingerprints may be taken at any time to update an individual's file.

(3) Any person required to register under this section who intends to travel outside the United States must provide, by certified mail, with return receipt requested, or in person, signed written notice of the plan to travel outside the country to the county sheriff of the county with whom the person is registered at least twenty-one days prior to travel. The notice shall include the following information: (a) Name; (b) passport number and country; (c) destination; (d) itinerary details including departure and return dates; (e) means of travel; and (f) purpose of travel. If the offender does not subsequently travel outside the United States, the offender must notify the county sheriff within three days of the departure date provided in the notification. The county sheriff shall notify the United States marshals service as soon as practicable after receipt of the notification.

(4)(a) Offenders shall register with the county sheriff within the following deadlines:

(i) OFFENDERS IN CUSTODY. (((A))) Sex offenders ((who committed a sex offense on, before, or after February 28, 1990, and who, on or after July 28, 1991, are in custody, as a result of that offense, of the state department of corrections, the state department of social and health services, a local division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility, and (B))) or kidnapping offenders who ((on or after July 27, 1997,)) are in custody of the state department of corrections, the state department of social and health services, a local division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility, must register at the time of release from custody with an official designated by the agency that has jurisdiction over the offender. The agency shall within three days forward the registration information to the county sheriff for the county of the offender's anticipated residence. The offender must also register within three business days from the time of release with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of employment or vocation. The agency that has jurisdiction over the offender shall provide notice to the offender of the duty to register.

When the agency with jurisdiction intends to release an offender with a duty to register under this section, and the agency has knowledge that the offender is eligible for developmental disability services from the department of social and health services, the agency shall notify the division of developmental disabilities of the release. Notice shall occur not more than thirty days before the offender is to be released. The agency and the division shall assist the offender in meeting the initial registration requirement under this section. Failure to provide such assistance shall not constitute a defense for any violation of this section.

When a person required to register under this section is in the custody of the state department of corrections or a local corrections or probations agency and has been approved for partial confinement as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the person must register at the time of transfer to partial confinement with the official designated by the agency that has jurisdiction over the offender. The agency shall within three days forward the registration information to the county sheriff for the county in which the offender is in partial confinement. The offender must also register within three business days from the time of the termination of partial confinement or release from confinement with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence. The agency that has jurisdiction over the offender shall provide notice to the offender of the duty to register.

(ii) ((OFFENDERS NOT IN CUSTODY BUT UNDER STATE OR LOCAL JURISDICTION. Sex offenders who, on July 28, 1991, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence review board or under the department of corrections' active supervision, as defined by the department of corrections, the state department of social and health services, or a local division of youth services, for sex offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990, must register within ten days of July 28, 1991. Kidnapping offenders who, on July 27, 1997, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence review board or under the department of corrections' active supervision, as defined by the department of corrections, the state department of social and health services, or a local division of youth services, for kidnapping offenses committed before, on, or after July 27, 1997, must register within ten days of July 27, 1997. A change in supervision status of a sex offender who was required to register under this subsection (3)(a)(ii) as of July 28, 1991, or a kidnapping offender required to register as of July 27, 1997, shall not relieve the offender of the duty to register or to reregister following a change in residence.

(iii))) OFFENDERS UNDER FEDERAL JURISDICTION. Sex offenders ((who, on or after July 23, 1995, and)) or kidnapping offenders who((, on or after July 27, 1997, as a result of that offense)) are in the custody of the United States bureau of prisons or other federal or military correctional agency ((for sex offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990, or kidnapping offenses committed on, before, or after July 27, 1997,)) must register within three business days from the time of release with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of employment or vocation. ((Sex offenders who, on July 23, 1995, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the United States bureau of prisons, United States courts, United States parole commission, or military parole board for sex offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990, must register within ten days of July 23, 1995. Kidnapping offenders who, on July 27, 1997, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the United States bureau of prisons, United States courts, United States parole commission, or military parole board for kidnapping offenses committed before, on, or after July 27, 1997, must register within ten days of July 27, 1997. A change in supervision status of a sex offender who was required to register under this subsection (3)(a)(iii) as of July 23, 1995, or a kidnapping offender required to register as of July 27, 1997 shall not relieve the offender of the duty to register or to reregister following a change in residence, or if the person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of employment or vocation.

(iv))) (iii) OFFENDERS WHO ARE CONVICTED BUT NOT CONFINED. Sex offenders who are convicted of a sex offense ((on or after July 28, 1991, for a sex offense that was committed on or after February 28, 1990,)) and kidnapping offenders who are convicted ((on or after July 27, 1997,)) for a kidnapping offense ((that was committed on or after July 27, 1997,)) but who are not sentenced to serve a term of confinement immediately upon sentencing((,)) shall report to the county sheriff to register within three business days of being sentenced.

(((v))) (iv) OFFENDERS WHO ARE NEW RESIDENTS, TEMPORARY RESIDENTS, OR RETURNING WASHINGTON RESIDENTS. Sex offenders and kidnapping offenders who move to Washington state from another state or a foreign country ((that are not under the jurisdiction of the state department of corrections, the indeterminate sentence review board, or the state department of social and health services at the time of moving to Washington,)) must register within three business days of establishing residence or reestablishing residence if the person is a former Washington resident. ((The duty to register under this subsection applies to sex offenders convicted under the laws of another state or a foreign country, federal or military statutes for offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990, or Washington state for offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990, and to kidnapping offenders convicted under the laws of another state or a foreign country, federal or military statutes, or Washington state for offenses committed before, on, or after July 27, 1997. Sex offenders and kidnapping offenders from other states or a foreign country who, when they move to Washington, are under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections, the indeterminate sentence review board, or the department of social and health services must register within three business days of moving to Washington. The agency that has jurisdiction over the offender shall notify the offender of the registration requirements before the offender moves to Washington.

(vi))) If the offender is under the jurisdiction of an agency of this state when the offender moves to Washington, the agency shall provide notice to the offender of the duty to register.

Sex offenders and kidnapping offenders who are visiting Washington state and intend to reside or be present in the state for ten days or more shall register his or her temporary address or where he or she plans to stay with the county sheriff of each county where the offender will be staying within three business days of arrival. Registration for temporary residents shall include the information required by subsection (2)(a) of this section, except the photograph and fingerprints.

(v) OFFENDERS FOUND NOT GUILTY BY REASON OF INSANITY. Any adult or juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of (((A))) committing a sex offense ((on, before, or after February 28, 1990, and who, on or after July 23, 1995, is in custody, as a result of that finding, of the state department of social and health services,)) or (((B) committing)) a kidnapping offense ((on, before, or after July 27, 1997,)) and who ((on or after July 27, 1997,)) is in custody, as a result of that finding, of the state department of social and health services, must register within three business days from the time of release with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence. The state department of social and health services shall provide notice to the adult or juvenile in its custody of the duty to register. ((Any adult or juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity of committing a sex offense on, before, or after February 28, 1990, but who was released before July 23, 1995, or any adult or juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity of committing a kidnapping offense but who was released before July 27, 1997, shall be required to register within three business days of receiving notice of this registration requirement.

(vii))) (vi) OFFENDERS WHO LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE. Any person who lacks a fixed residence and leaves the county in which he or she is registered and enters and remains within a new county for twenty-four hours is required to register with the county sheriff not more than three business days after entering the county and provide the information required in subsection (2)(a) of this section.

(((viii))) (vii) OFFENDERS WHO LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE AND WHO ARE UNDER SUPERVISION. Offenders who lack a fixed residence and who are under the supervision of the department shall register in the county of their supervision.

(((ix))) (viii) OFFENDERS WHO MOVE TO, WORK, CARRY ON A VOCATION, OR ATTEND SCHOOL IN ANOTHER STATE. Offenders required to register in Washington, who move to another state, or who work, carry on a vocation, or attend school in another state shall register a new address, fingerprints, and photograph with the new state within three business days after establishing residence, or after beginning to work, carry on a vocation, or attend school in the new state. The person must also send written notice within three business days of moving to the new state or to a foreign country to the county sheriff with whom the person last registered in Washington state. The county sheriff shall promptly forward this information to the Washington state patrol.

(b) The county sheriff shall not be required to determine whether the person is living within the county.

(c) An arrest on charges of failure to register, service of an information, or a complaint for a violation of RCW 9A.44.132, or arraignment on charges for a violation of RCW 9A.44.132, constitutes actual notice of the duty to register. Any person charged with the crime of failure to register under RCW 9A.44.132 who asserts as a defense the lack of notice of the duty to register shall register within three business days following actual notice of the duty through arrest, service, or arraignment. Failure to register as required under this subsection (((3))) (4)(c) constitutes grounds for filing another charge of failing to register. Registering following arrest, service, or arraignment on charges shall not relieve the offender from criminal liability for failure to register prior to the filing of the original charge.

(((d) The deadlines for the duty to register under this section do not relieve any sex offender of the duty to register under this section as it existed prior to July 28, 1991.

(4))) (5)(a) If any person required to register pursuant to this section changes his or her residence address within the same county, the person must provide, by certified mail, with return receipt requested or in person, signed written notice of the change of address to the county sheriff within three business days of moving.

(b) If any person required to register pursuant to this section moves to a new county, within three business days of moving the person must register with ((that)) the new county sheriff ((within three business days of moving. Within three business days, the person must also)) and provide, by certified mail, with return receipt requested or in person, signed written notice of the change of address ((in the new county)) to the county sheriff with whom the person last registered. The county sheriff with whom the person last registered ((shall promptly forward the information concerning the change of address to the county sheriff for the county of the person's new residence. Upon receipt of notice of change of address to a new state, the county sheriff shall promptly forward the information regarding the change of address to the agency designated by the new state as the state's offender registration agency)) is responsible for address verification pursuant to RCW 9A.44.135 until the person completes registration of his or her new residence address.

(((5))) (6)(a) Any person required to register under this section who lacks a fixed residence shall provide signed written notice to the sheriff of the county where he or she last registered within three business days after ceasing to have a fixed residence. The notice shall include the information required by subsection (2)(a) of this section, except the photograph and fingerprints. The county sheriff may, for reasonable cause, require the offender to provide a photograph and fingerprints. The sheriff shall forward this information to the sheriff of the county in which the person intends to reside, if the person intends to reside in another county.

(b) A person who lacks a fixed residence must report weekly, in person, to the sheriff of the county where he or she is registered. The weekly report shall be on a day specified by the county sheriff's office, and shall occur during normal business hours. The person must keep an accurate accounting of where he or she stays during the week and provide it to the county sheriff upon request. The lack of a fixed residence is a factor that may be considered in determining an offender's risk level and shall make the offender subject to disclosure of information to the public at large pursuant to RCW 4.24.550.

(c) If any person required to register pursuant to this section does not have a fixed residence, it is an affirmative defense to the charge of failure to register, that he or she provided written notice to the sheriff of the county where he or she last registered within three business days of ceasing to have a fixed residence and has subsequently complied with the requirements of subsections (((3))) (4)(a)(((vii))) (vi) or (((viii))) (vii) and (((5))) (6) of this section. To prevail, the person must prove the defense by a preponderance of the evidence.

(((6))) (7) A sex offender subject to registration requirements under this section who applies to change his or her name under RCW 4.24.130 or any other law shall submit a copy of the application to the county sheriff of the county of the person's residence and to the state patrol not fewer than five days before the entry of an order granting the name change. No sex offender under the requirement to register under this section at the time of application shall be granted an order changing his or her name if the court finds that doing so will interfere with legitimate law enforcement interests, except that no order shall be denied when the name change is requested for religious or legitimate cultural reasons or in recognition of marriage or dissolution of marriage. A sex offender under the requirement to register under this section who receives an order changing his or her name shall submit a copy of the order to the county sheriff of the county of the person's residence and to the state patrol within three business days of the entry of the order.

(((7))) (8) Except as may otherwise be provided by law, nothing in this section shall impose any liability upon a peace officer, including a county sheriff, or law enforcement agency, for failing to release information authorized under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1) RCW 9A.44.128 through 9A.44.145 apply to offenders who committed their crimes and were adjudicated within the following time frames:

(a) Sex offenders convicted of a sex offense on or after July 28, 1991, for a sex offense committed on or after February 28, 1990;

(b) Kidnapping offenders convicted of a kidnapping offense on or after July 27, 1997, for a kidnapping offense committed on or after July 27, 1997;

(c) Sex offenders who, on or after July 28, 1991, were in the custody or under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, a local division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility as the result of a sex offense, regardless of when the sex offense was committed;

(d) Kidnapping offenders who, on or after July 27, 1997, were in the custody or under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, a local division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility as the result of a kidnapping offense, regardless of when the kidnapping offense was committed;

(e) Any person who is or has been determined to be a sexually violent predator pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW;

(f) Sex offenders who, on or after July 23, 1995, were in the custody or under the jurisdiction of the United States bureau of prisons, United States courts, United States parole commission, or military parole board as the result of a sex offense, regardless of when the sex offense was committed;

(g) Kidnapping offenders who, on or after July 27, 1997, were in the custody or under the jurisdiction of the United States bureau of prisons, United States courts, United States parole commission, or military parole board as the result of a kidnapping offense, regardless of when the kidnapping offense was committed;

(h) Sex offenders who move to Washington state from another state, tribe, or a foreign country and who were convicted of a sex offense under the laws of this state, another state, a foreign country, tribe, or other federal or military tribunal, regardless of when the sex offense was committed or the conviction occurred;

(i) Kidnapping offenders who move to Washington state from another state, tribe, or a foreign country and who were convicted of a kidnapping offense under the laws of this state, another state, a foreign country, tribe, or other federal or military tribunal, regardless of when the kidnapping offense was committed or the conviction occurred;

(j) Any adult or juvenile found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of committing a sex offense or of committing a kidnapping offense, regardless of when the offense was committed.

(2) The provisions of this section do not relieve any sex offender of the duty to register under the law as it existed prior to July 28, 1991.

Sec. 5. RCW 9A.44.132 and 2011 c 337 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person commits the crime of failure to register as a sex offender if the person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for a felony sex offense and knowingly fails to comply with any of the requirements of RCW 9A.44.130.

(a) The failure to register as a sex offender pursuant to this subsection is a class C felony if:

(i) It is the person's first conviction for a felony failure to register; or

(ii) The person has previously been convicted of a felony failure to register as a sex offender in this state or pursuant to the laws of another state, or pursuant to federal law.

(b) If a person has been convicted of a felony failure to register as a sex offender in this state or pursuant to the laws of another state, or pursuant to federal law, on two or more prior occasions, the failure to register under this subsection is a class B felony.

(2) A person is guilty of failure to register as a sex offender if the person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for a sex offense other than a felony and knowingly fails to comply with any of the requirements of RCW 9A.44.130. The failure to register as a sex offender under this subsection is a gross misdemeanor.

(3) A person commits the crime of failure to register as a kidnapping offender if the person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for a kidnapping offense and knowingly fails to comply with any of the requirements of RCW 9A.44.130.

(a) If the person has a duty to register for a felony kidnapping offense, the failure to register as a kidnapping offender is a class C felony.

(b) If the person has a duty to register for a kidnapping offense other than a felony, the failure to register as a kidnapping offender is a gross misdemeanor.

(4) A person commits the crime of refusal to provide DNA if the person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 and the person willfully refuses to comply with a legal request for a DNA sample as required under RCW 43.43.754(1)(b). The refusal to provide DNA is a gross misdemeanor.

(5) Unless relieved of the duty to register pursuant to RCW 9A.44.141 and 9A.44.142, a violation of this section is an ongoing offense for purposes of the statute of limitations under RCW 9A.04.080.

Sec. 6. RCW 9A.44.140 and 2010 c 267 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 shall continue for the duration provided in this section.

(1) For a person convicted in this state of a class A felony ((or an offense listed in RCW 9A.44.142(5))), or a person convicted ((in this state)) of any sex offense or kidnapping offense who has one or more prior convictions for a sex offense or kidnapping offense, the duty to register shall continue indefinitely.

(2) For a person convicted in this state of a class B felony who does not have one or more prior convictions for a sex offense or kidnapping offense ((and whose current offense is not listed in RCW 9A.44.142(5))), the duty to register shall end fifteen years after the last date of release from confinement, if any, (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to the conviction, or entry of the judgment and sentence, if the person has spent fifteen consecutive years in the community without being convicted of a disqualifying offense during that time period.

(3) For a person convicted in this state of a class C felony, a violation of RCW 9.68A.090 or 9A.44.096, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a class C felony, and the person does not have one or more prior convictions for a sex offense or kidnapping offense ((and the person's current offense is not listed in RCW 9A.44.142(5))), the duty to register shall end ten years after the last date of release from confinement, if any, (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to the conviction, or entry of the judgment and sentence, if the person has spent ten consecutive years in the community without being convicted of a disqualifying offense during that time period.

(4) Except as provided in RCW 9A.44.142, for a person required to register for a federal, tribal, or out-of-state conviction, the duty to register shall continue indefinitely.

(5) For a person who is or has been determined to be a sexually violent predator pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW, the duty to register shall continue for the person's lifetime.

(6) Nothing in this section prevents a person from being relieved of the duty to register under RCW 9A.44.142 and 9A.44.143.

(((6))) (7) Nothing in RCW 9.94A.637 relating to discharge of an offender shall be construed as operating to relieve the offender of his or her duty to register pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130.

(((7))) (8) For purposes of determining whether a person has been convicted of more than one sex offense, failure to register as a sex offender or kidnapping offender is not a sex or kidnapping offense.

(((8))) (9) The provisions of this section and RCW 9A.44.141 through 9A.44.143 apply equally to a person who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of a sex offense or kidnapping offense.

Sec. 7. RCW 9A.44.141 and 2011 c 337 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon the request of a person who is listed in the Washington state patrol central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders, the county sheriff shall investigate whether a person's duty to register has ended by operation of law pursuant to RCW 9A.44.140.

(a) Using available records, the county sheriff shall verify that the offender has spent the requisite time in the community and has not been convicted of a disqualifying offense.

(b) If the county sheriff determines the person's duty to register has ended by operation of law, the county sheriff shall request the Washington state patrol remove the person's name from the central registry.

(2) Nothing in this subsection prevents a county sheriff from investigating, upon his or her own initiative, whether a person's duty to register has ended by operation of law pursuant to RCW 9A.44.140.

(3)(a) A person who is listed in the central registry as the result of a federal, tribal, or out-of-state conviction may request the county sheriff to investigate whether the person should be removed from the registry if:

(i) A court or other administrative authority in the person's state of conviction has made an individualized determination that the person ((should)) is not ((be)) required to register; and

(ii) The person provides proof of relief from registration to the county sheriff.

(b) If the county sheriff determines the person has been relieved of the duty to register in his or her state of conviction, the county sheriff shall request the Washington state patrol remove the person's name from the central registry.

(4) An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470, or units of local government and its employees, as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are immune from civil liability for damages for removing or requesting the removal of a person from the central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders or the failure to remove or request removal of a person within the time frames provided in RCW 9A.44.140.

Sec. 8. RCW 9A.44.142 and 2011 c 337 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who is required to register under RCW 9A.44.130 may petition the superior court to be relieved of the duty to register:

(a) If the person has a duty to register for a sex offense or kidnapping offense committed when the offender was a juvenile, regardless of whether the conviction was in this state, as provided in RCW 9A.44.143;

(b) If the person is required to register for a conviction in this state and is not prohibited from petitioning for relief from registration under subsection (2) of this section, when the person has spent ten consecutive years in the community without being convicted of a disqualifying offense during that time period; or

(c) If the person is required to register for a federal, tribal, or out-of-state conviction, when the person has spent fifteen consecutive years in the community without being convicted of a disqualifying offense during that time period.

(2)(a) A person may not petition for relief from registration if the person has been:

(i) Determined to be a sexually violent predator ((as defined in RCW 71.09.020)) pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW; or

(ii) Convicted as an adult of a sex offense or kidnapping offense that is a class A felony and that was committed with forcible compulsion on or after June 8, 2000((; or

(iii) Until July 1, 2012, convicted of one aggravated offense or more than one sexually violent offense, as defined in subsection (5) of this section, and the offense or offenses were committed on or after March 12, 2002. After July 1, 2012, this subsection (2)(a)(iii) shall have no further force and effect)).

(b) Any person who may not be relieved of the duty to register may petition the court to be exempted from any community notification requirements that the person may be subject to fifteen years after the later of the entry of the judgment and sentence or the last date of release from confinement, including full-time residential treatment, pursuant to the conviction, if the person has spent the time in the community without being convicted of a disqualifying offense.

(3) A petition for relief from registration or exemption from notification under this section shall be made to the court in which the petitioner was convicted of the offense that subjects him or her to the duty to register or, in the case of convictions in other states, a foreign country, or a federal, tribal, or military court, to the court in the county where the person is registered at the time the petition is sought. The prosecuting attorney of the county shall be named and served as the respondent in any such petition.

(4)(a) The court may relieve a petitioner of the duty to register only if the petitioner shows by clear and convincing evidence that the petitioner is sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant removal from the central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders.

(b) In determining whether the petitioner is sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant removal from the registry, the following factors are provided as guidance to assist the court in making its determination:

(i) The nature of the registrable offense committed including the number of victims and the length of the offense history;

(ii) Any subsequent criminal history;

(iii) The petitioner's compliance with supervision requirements;

(iv) The length of time since the charged incident(s) occurred;

(v) Any input from community corrections officers, law enforcement, or treatment providers;

(vi) Participation in sex offender treatment;

(vii) Participation in other treatment and rehabilitative programs;

(viii) The offender's stability in employment and housing;

(ix) The offender's community and personal support system;

(x) Any risk assessments or evaluations prepared by a qualified professional;

(xi) Any updated polygraph examination;

(xii) Any input of the victim;

(xiii) Any other factors the court may consider relevant.

(5)(((a) A person who has been convicted of an aggravated offense, or has been convicted of one or more prior sexually violent offenses or criminal offenses against a victim who is a minor, as defined in (b) of this subsection:

(i) Until July 1, 2012, may not be relieved of the duty to register;

(ii) After July 1, 2012, may petition the court to be relieved of the duty to register as provided in this section;

(iii) This provision shall apply to convictions for crimes committed on or after July 22, 2001.

(b) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following definitions apply only to the federal lifetime registration requirements under this subsection:

(i) "Aggravated offense" means an adult conviction that meets the definition of 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2241, which is limited to the following:

(A) Any sex offense involving sexual intercourse or sexual contact where the victim is under twelve years of age;

(B) RCW 9A.44.040 (rape in the first degree), RCW 9A.44.073 (rape of a child in the first degree), or RCW 9A.44.083 (child molestation in the first degree);

(C) Any of the following offenses when committed by forcible compulsion or by the offender administering, by threat or force or without the knowledge or permission of that person, a drug, intoxicant, or other similar substance that substantially impairs the ability of that person to appraise or control conduct: RCW 9A.44.050 (rape in the second degree), RCW 9A.44.100 (indecent liberties), RCW 9A.44.160 (custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree), RCW 9A.64.020 (incest), or RCW 9.68A.040 (sexual exploitation of a minor);

(D) Any of the following offenses when committed by forcible compulsion or by the offender administering, by threat or force or without the knowledge or permission of that person, a drug, intoxicant, or other similar substance that substantially impairs the ability of that person to appraise or control conduct, if the victim is twelve years of age or over but under sixteen years of age and the offender is eighteen years of age or over and is more than forty-eight months older than the victim: RCW 9A.44.076 (rape of a child in the second degree), RCW 9A.44.079 (rape of a child in the third degree), RCW 9A.44.086 (child molestation in the second degree), or RCW 9A.44.089 (child molestation in the third degree);

(E) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 where the victim is under twelve years of age or that is committed by forcible compulsion or by the offender administering, by threat or force or without the knowledge or permission of that person, a drug, intoxicant, or other similar substance that substantially impairs the ability of that person to appraise or control conduct;

(F) An offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, an attempt or solicitation to commit such an offense; or

(G) An offense defined by federal law or the laws of another state that is equivalent to the offenses listed in (b)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection.

(ii) "Sexually violent offense" means an adult conviction that meets the definition of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 14071(a)(1)(A), which is limited to the following:

(A) An aggravated offense;

(B) An offense that is not an aggravated offense but meets the definition of 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2242, which is limited to RCW 9A.44.050(1) (b) through (f) (rape in the second degree) and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) through (f) (indecent liberties);

(C) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 where the victim is incapable of appraising the nature of the conduct or physically incapable of declining participation in, or communicating unwillingness to engage in, the conduct;

(D) An offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, an attempt or solicitation to commit such an offense; or

(E) An offense defined by federal law or the laws of another state that is equivalent to the offenses listed in (b)(ii)(A) through (D) of this subsection.

(iii) "Criminal offense against a victim who is a minor" means, in addition to any aggravated offense or sexually violent offense where the victim was under eighteen years of age, an adult conviction for the following offenses where the victim is under eighteen years of age:

(A) RCW 9A.44.060 (rape in the third degree), RCW 9A.44.076 (rape of a child in the second degree), RCW 9A.44.079 (rape of a child in the third degree), RCW 9A.44.086 (child molestation in the second degree), RCW 9A.44.089 (child molestation in the third degree), RCW 9A.44.093 (sexual misconduct with a minor in the first degree), RCW 9A.44.096 (sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree), RCW 9A.44.160 (custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree), RCW 9A.64.020 (incest), RCW 9.68A.040 (sexual exploitation of a minor), RCW 9.68A.090 (communication with a minor for immoral purposes), or RCW 9.68A.100 (commercial sexual abuse of a minor);

(B) RCW 9A.40.020 (kidnapping in the first degree), RCW 9A.40.030 (kidnapping in the second degree), or RCW 9A.40.040 (unlawful imprisonment), where the victim is a minor and the offender is not the minor's parent;

(C) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 where the victim is a minor;

(D) An offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, an attempt or solicitation to commit such an offense; or

(E) An offense defined by federal law or the laws of another state that is equivalent to the offenses listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (D) of this subsection)) If a person is relieved of the duty to register pursuant to this section, the relief of registration does not constitute a certificate of rehabilitation, or the equivalent of a certificate of rehabilitation, for the purposes of restoration of firearm possession under RCW 9.41.040.

Sec. 9. RCW 9A.44.143 and 2011 c 338 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An offender having a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for a sex offense or kidnapping offense committed when the offender was a juvenile, and who has not been determined to be a sexually violent predator pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW may petition the superior court to be relieved of that duty as provided in this section.

(2) For class A sex offenses or kidnapping offenses committed when the petitioner was fifteen years of age or older, the court may relieve the petitioner of the duty to register if:

(a) At least sixty months have passed since the petitioner's adjudication and completion of any term of confinement for the offense giving rise to the duty to register and the petitioner has not been adjudicated or convicted of any additional sex offenses or kidnapping offenses within the sixty months before the petition;

(b) The petitioner has not been adjudicated or convicted of a violation of RCW 9A.44.132 (failure to register) during the sixty months prior to filing the petition; and

(c) The petitioner shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the petitioner is sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant removal from the central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders.

(3) For all other sex offenses or kidnapping offenses committed by a juvenile not included in subsection (2) of this section, the court may relieve the petitioner of the duty to register if:

(a) At least twenty-four months have passed since the petitioner's adjudication and completion of any term of confinement for the offense giving rise to the duty to register and the petitioner has not been adjudicated or convicted of any additional sex offenses or kidnapping offenses within the twenty-four months before the petition;

(b) The petitioner has not been adjudicated or convicted of a violation of RCW 9A.44.132 (failure to register) during the twenty-four months prior to filing the petition; and

(c) The petitioner shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the petitioner is sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant removal from the central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders.

(4) A petition for relief from registration under this section shall be made to the court in which the petitioner was convicted of the offense that subjects him or her to the duty to register or, in the case of convictions in other states, a foreign country, or a federal or military court, to the court in ((Thurston)) the county in which the juvenile is registered at the time a petition is sought. The prosecuting attorney of the county shall be named and served as the respondent in any such petition.

(5) In determining whether the petitioner is sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant removal from the central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders, the following factors are provided as guidance to assist the court in making its determination, to the extent the factors are applicable considering the age and circumstances of the petitioner:

(a) The nature of the registrable offense committed including the number of victims and the length of the offense history;

(b) Any subsequent criminal history;

(c) The petitioner's compliance with supervision requirements;

(d) The length of time since the charged incident(s) occurred;

(e) Any input from community corrections officers, juvenile parole or probation officers, law enforcement, or treatment providers;

(f) Participation in sex offender treatment;

(g) Participation in other treatment and rehabilitative programs;

(h) The offender's stability in employment and housing;

(i) The offender's community and personal support system;

(j) Any risk assessments or evaluations prepared by a qualified professional;

(k) Any updated polygraph examination;

(l) Any input of the victim;

(m) Any other factors the court may consider relevant.

(6) If a person is relieved of the duty to register pursuant to this section, the relief of registration does not constitute a certificate of rehabilitation, or the equivalent of a certificate of rehabilitation, for the purposes of restoration of firearm possession under RCW 9.41.040.

(7) A juvenile prosecuted and convicted of a sex offense or kidnapping offense as an adult pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 or 13.04.030 may not petition to the superior court under this section and must follow the provisions of RCW 9A.44.142.

(8) An adult prosecuted for an offense committed as juvenile once the juvenile court has lost jurisdiction due to the passage of time between the date of the offense and the date of filing of charges may petition the superior court under the provisions of this section.

Sec. 10. RCW 43.43.754 and 2008 c 97 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A biological sample must be collected for purposes of DNA identification analysis from:

(a) Every adult or juvenile individual convicted of a felony, or any of the following crimes (or equivalent juvenile offenses):

Assault in the fourth degree with sexual motivation (RCW 9A.36.041, 9.94A.835)

Communication with a minor for immoral purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Custodial sexual misconduct in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.170)

Failure to register (RCW 9A.44.130 for persons convicted on or before June 10, 2010, and RCW 9A.44.132 for persons convicted after June 10, 2010)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Patronizing a prostitute (RCW 9A.88.110)

Sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.096)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Violation of a sexual assault protection order granted under chapter 7.90 RCW; and

(b) Every adult or juvenile individual who is required to register under RCW 9A.44.130.

(2) If the Washington state patrol crime laboratory already has a DNA sample from an individual for a qualifying offense, a subsequent submission is not required to be submitted.

(3) Biological samples shall be collected in the following manner:

(a) For persons convicted of any offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense who do not serve a term of confinement in a department of corrections facility, and do serve a term of confinement in a city or county jail facility, the city or county shall be responsible for obtaining the biological samples.

(b) The local police department or sheriff's office shall be responsible for obtaining the biological samples for:

(i) Persons convicted of any offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense who do not serve a term of confinement in a department of corrections facility, and do not serve a term of confinement in a city or county jail facility; and

(ii) Persons who are required to register under RCW ((9A.44.030)) 9A.44.130.

(c) For persons convicted of any offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense, who are serving or who are to serve a term of confinement in a department of corrections facility or a department of social and health services facility, the facility holding the person shall be responsible for obtaining the biological samples. For those persons incarcerated before June 12, 2008, who have not yet had a biological sample collected, priority shall be given to those persons who will be released the soonest.

(4) Any biological sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758 may be retained by the forensic laboratory services bureau, and shall be used solely for the purpose of providing DNA or other tests for identification analysis and prosecution of a criminal offense or for the identification of human remains or missing persons. Nothing in this section prohibits the submission of results derived from the biological samples to the federal bureau of investigation combined DNA index system.

(5) The forensic laboratory services bureau of the Washington state patrol is responsible for testing performed on all biological samples that are collected under subsection (1) of this section, to the extent allowed by funding available for this purpose. The director shall give priority to testing on samples collected from those adults or juveniles convicted of a felony or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense that is defined as a sex offense or a violent offense in RCW 9.94A.030. Known duplicate samples may be excluded from testing unless testing is deemed necessary or advisable by the director.

(6) This section applies to:

(a) All adults and juveniles to whom this section applied prior to June 12, 2008;

(b) All adults and juveniles to whom this section did not apply prior to June 12, 2008, who:

(i) Are convicted on or after June 12, 2008, of an offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section; or

(ii) Were convicted prior to June 12, 2008, of an offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section and are still incarcerated on or after June 12, 2008; and

(c) All adults and juveniles who are required to register under RCW 9A.44.130 on or after June 12, 2008, whether convicted before, on, or after June 12, 2008.

(7) This section creates no rights in a third person. No cause of action may be brought based upon the noncollection or nonanalysis or the delayed collection or analysis of a biological sample authorized to be taken under RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758.

(8) The detention, arrest, or conviction of a person based upon a database match or database information is not invalidated if it is determined that the sample was obtained or placed in the database by mistake, or if the conviction or juvenile adjudication that resulted in the collection of the biological sample was subsequently vacated or otherwise altered in any future proceeding including but not limited to posttrial or postfact-finding motions, appeals, or collateral attacks.

(9) A person commits the crime of refusal to provide DNA if the person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 and the person willfully refuses to comply with a legal request for a DNA sample as required under this section. The refusal to provide DNA is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 11. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2013 c 322 s 26, 2013 c 290 s 8, 2013 c 267 s 2, and 2013 c 153 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI

Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XV

Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV

Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII

Malicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII

Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(((2))) (3))

XI

Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

X

Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

IX

Abandonment of Dependent Person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit and Run—Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

VIII

Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.100)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW 79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VII

Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW 9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.050(1))

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.675)

Sending, bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.060(1))

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VI

Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.070(1))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

V

Abandonment of Dependent Person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Dealing in Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.050(2))

Domestic Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220, 26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Driving While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.502(6))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Physical Control of a Vehicle While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.504(6))

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sending, Bringing into State Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.060(2))

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV

Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run—Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel—Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.070(2))

Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health care service contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health maintenance organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance professional (RCW 48.17.063(2))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicle Prowling 2 (third or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.52.100(3))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Viewing of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.075(1))

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III

Animal Cruelty 1 (Sexual Conduct or Contact) (RCW 16.52.205(3))

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace Officer With a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily Harm By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.674)

Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.350(2))

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 1 (RCW 9A.56.360(2))

Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW 9A.56.340(2))

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.82.055)

Unlawful Hunting of Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.410(3)(b))

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful Misbranding of Food Fish or Shellfish 1 (RCW 69.04.938(3))

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Unlawful Taking of Endangered Fish or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.120(3)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(b))

Unlawful Use of a Nondesignated Vessel (RCW 77.15.530(4))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II

Commercial Fishing Without a License 1 (RCW 77.15.500(3)(b))

Computer Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Engaging in Fish Dealing Activity Unlicensed 1 (RCW 77.15.620(3))

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.44.130 prior to June 10, 2010, and RCW 9A.44.132)

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.350(3))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068)

Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 2 (RCW 9A.56.360(3))

Scrap Processing, Recycling, or Supplying Without a License (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 19.290.100)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW 9A.56.340(3))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Participation of Non-Indians in Indian Fishery (RCW 77.15.570(2))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlawful Purchase or Use of a License (RCW 77.15.650(3)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 2 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(a))

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

Voyeurism (RCW 9A.44.115)

I

Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a Mental Health Advance Directive (RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Spotlighting Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.450(3)(b))

Suspension of Department Privileges 1 (RCW 77.15.670(3)(b))

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business beyond the scope of licensure (RCW 48.17.063)

Unlawful Fish and Shellfish Catch Accounting (RCW 77.15.630(3)(b))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal Identification Device (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful ((Release of)) Releasing, planting, possessing, or placing Deleterious Exotic Wildlife (RCW 77.15.250(2)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.144)

Unlawful Use of Net to Take Fish 1 (RCW 77.15.580(3)(b))

Unlawful Use of Prohibited Aquatic Animal Species (RCW 77.15.253(3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Violating Commercial Fishing Area or Time 1 (RCW 77.15.550(3)(b))

Sec. 12. RCW 9.94A.030 and 2012 c 143 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created under chapter 9.95 RCW.

(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department, means that the department, either directly or through a collection agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.

(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence conditions.

(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed as part of a sentence under this chapter and served in the community subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and activities by the department.

(6) "Community protection zone" means the area within eight hundred eighty feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or private school.

(7) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the offender.

(8) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.

(9) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Title 10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of a plea of guilty.

(10) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.

(11) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or elsewhere.

(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i) whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of incarceration.

(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated pursuant to a governor's pardon.

(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's criminal history.

(12) "Criminal street gang" means any ongoing organization, association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or informal, having a common name or common identifying sign or symbol, having as one of its primary activities the commission of criminal acts, and whose members or associates individually or collectively engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal street gang activity. This definition does not apply to employees engaged in concerted activities for their mutual aid and protection, or to the activities of labor and bona fide nonprofit organizations or their members or agents.

(13) "Criminal street gang associate or member" means any person who actively participates in any criminal street gang and who intentionally promotes, furthers, or assists in any criminal act by the criminal street gang.

(14) "Criminal street gang-related offense" means any felony or misdemeanor offense, whether in this state or elsewhere, that is committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association with any criminal street gang, or is committed with the intent to promote, further, or assist in any criminal conduct by the gang, or is committed for one or more of the following reasons:

(a) To gain admission, prestige, or promotion within the gang;

(b) To increase or maintain the gang's size, membership, prestige, dominance, or control in any geographical area;

(c) To exact revenge or retribution for the gang or any member of the gang;

(d) To obstruct justice, or intimidate or eliminate any witness against the gang or any member of the gang;

(e) To directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement, gain, profit, or other advantage for the gang, its reputation, influence, or membership; or

(f) To provide the gang with any advantage in, or any control or dominance over any criminal market sector, including, but not limited to, manufacturing, delivering, or selling any controlled substance (chapter 69.50 RCW); arson (chapter 9A.48 RCW); trafficking in stolen property (chapter 9A.82 RCW); promoting prostitution (chapter 9A.88 RCW); human trafficking (RCW 9A.40.100); promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor (RCW 9.68A.101); or promoting pornography (chapter 9.68 RCW).

(15) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any dependents.

(16) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report daily to a specific location designated by the department or the sentencing court.

(17) "Department" means the department of corrections.

(18) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial confinement, of community custody, the number of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate sentence.

(19) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050, or Title 74 RCW.

(20) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 10.99.020 and 26.50.010.

(21) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option available to persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW 9.94A.660.

(22) "Drug offense" means:

(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);

(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance; or

(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(23) "Earned release" means earned release from confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728.

(24) "Escape" means:

(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW 9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful failure to be available for supervision by the department while in community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or

(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this subsection.

(25) "Felony traffic offense" means:

(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)); or

(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.

(26) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specific period of time.

(27) "First-time offender" means any person who has no prior convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.

(28) "Home detention" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private residence subject to electronic surveillance.

(29) "Homelessness" or "homeless" means a condition where an individual lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence and who has a primary nighttime residence that is:

(a) A supervised, publicly or privately operated shelter designed to provide temporary living accommodations;

(b) A public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings; or

(c) A private residence where the individual stays as a transient invitee.

(30) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal financial obligations which may include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense of an emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.

(31) "Minor child" means a biological or adopted child of the offender who is under age eighteen at the time of the offender's current offense.

(32) "Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:

(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b) Assault in the second degree;

(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;

(d) Child molestation in the second degree;

(e) Controlled substance homicide;

(f) Extortion in the first degree;

(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;

(h) Indecent liberties;

(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;

(j) Leading organized crime;

(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;

(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;

(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;

(n) Rape in the third degree;

(o) Robbery in the second degree;

(p) Sexual exploitation;

(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner;

(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation;

(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.825;

(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;

(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997, or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993, through July 27, 1997;

(w) Any out-of-state conviction for a felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation if the minimum sentence imposed was ten years or more; provided that the out-of-state felony offense must be comparable to a felony offense under this title and Title 9A RCW and the out-of-state definition of sexual motivation must be comparable to the definition of sexual motivation contained in this section.

(33) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.

(34) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. In addition, for the purpose of community custody requirements under this chapter, "offender" also means a misdemeanant or gross misdemeanant probationer ordered by a superior court to probation pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210 and supervised by the department pursuant to RCW 9.94A.501 and 9.94A.5011. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.

(35) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home detention or work crew has been ordered by the court or home detention has been ordered by the department as part of the parenting program, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and home detention.

(36) "Pattern of criminal street gang activity" means:

(a) The commission, attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation of, or any prior juvenile adjudication of or adult conviction of, two or more of the following criminal street gang-related offenses:

(i) Any "serious violent" felony offense as defined in this section, excluding Homicide by Abuse (RCW 9A.32.055) and Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120);

(ii) Any "violent" offense as defined by this section, excluding Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130);

(iii) Deliver or Possession with Intent to Deliver a Controlled Substance (chapter 69.50 RCW);

(iv) Any violation of the firearms and dangerous weapon act (chapter 9.41 RCW);

(v) Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300);

(vi) Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310);

(vii) Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080);

(viii) Harassment where a subsequent violation or deadly threat is made (RCW 9A.46.020(2)(b));

(ix) Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120);

(x) Any felony conviction by a person eighteen years of age or older with a special finding of involving a juvenile in a felony offense under RCW 9.94A.833;

(xi) Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025);

(xii) Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030);

(xiii) Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070);

(xiv) Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080);

(xv) Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065);

(xvi) Possession of a Stolen Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068);

(xvii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070);

(xviii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075);

(xix) Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120);

(xx) Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130);

(xxi) Intimidating a Witness (RCW 9A.72.110);

(xxii) Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120);

(xxiii) Reckless Endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);

(xxiv) Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);

(xxv) Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020); or

(xxvi) Malicious Mischief 3 (RCW 9A.48.090);

(b) That at least one of the offenses listed in (a) of this subsection shall have occurred after July 1, 2008;

(c) That the most recent committed offense listed in (a) of this subsection occurred within three years of a prior offense listed in (a) of this subsection; and

(d) Of the offenses that were committed in (a) of this subsection, the offenses occurred on separate occasions or were committed by two or more persons.

(37) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious offense; and

(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first degree, assault of a child in the second degree, or burglary in the first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection (37)(b)(i); and

(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older when the offender committed the offense.

(38) "Predatory" means: (a) The perpetrator of the crime was a stranger to the victim, as defined in this section; (b) the perpetrator established or promoted a relationship with the victim prior to the offense and the victimization of the victim was a significant reason the perpetrator established or promoted the relationship; or (c) the perpetrator was: (i) A teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person in authority in any public or private school and the victim was a student of the school under his or her authority or supervision. For purposes of this subsection, "school" does not include home-based instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; (ii) a coach, trainer, volunteer, or other person in authority in any recreational activity and the victim was a participant in the activity under his or her authority or supervision; (iii) a pastor, elder, volunteer, or other person in authority in any church or religious organization, and the victim was a member or participant of the organization under his or her authority; or (iv) a teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person in authority providing home-based instruction and the victim was a student receiving home-based instruction while under his or her authority or supervision. For purposes of this subsection: (A) "Home-based instruction" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; and (B) "teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person in authority" does not include the parent or legal guardian of the victim.

(39) "Private school" means a school regulated under chapter 28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.

(40) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.010.

(41) "Repetitive domestic violence offense" means any:

(a)(i) Domestic violence assault that is not a felony offense under RCW 9A.36.041;

(ii) Domestic violence violation of a no-contact order under chapter 10.99 RCW that is not a felony offense;

(iii) Domestic violence violation of a protection order under chapter 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 26.50 RCW that is not a felony offense;

(iv) Domestic violence harassment offense under RCW 9A.46.020 that is not a felony offense; or

(v) Domestic violence stalking offense under RCW 9A.46.110 that is not a felony offense; or

(b) Any federal, out-of-state, tribal court, military, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a repetitive domestic violence offense under (a) of this subsection.

(42) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include both public and private costs.

(43) "Risk assessment" means the application of the risk instrument recommended to the department by the Washington state institute for public policy as having the highest degree of predictive accuracy for assessing an offender's risk of reoffense.

(44) "Serious traffic offense" means:

(a) Nonfelony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), nonfelony actual physical control while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or

(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.

(45) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and means:

(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;

(ii) Homicide by abuse;

(iii) Murder in the second degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;

(v) Assault in the first degree;

(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;

(vii) Rape in the first degree;

(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or

(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of these felonies; or

(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a) of this subsection.

(46) "Sex offense" means:

(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than RCW 9A.44.132;

(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;

(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than RCW 9.68A.080;

(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes; or

(v) A felony violation of RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register as a sex offender) if the person has been convicted of violating RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register as a sex offender) or 9A.44.130 prior to June 10, 2010, on at least one prior occasion;

(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this subsection;

(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or

(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this subsection.

(47) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification.

(48) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(49) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.

(50) "Stranger" means that the victim did not know the offender twenty-four hours before the offense.

(51) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.

(52) "Transition training" means written and verbal instructions and assistance provided by the department to the offender during the two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of the work ethic camp program. The transition training shall include instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations during the offender's period of community custody.

(53) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the crime charged.

(54) "Violent offense" means:

(a) Any of the following felonies:

(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony;

(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;

(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;

(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;

(vii) Arson in the second degree;

(viii) Assault in the second degree;

(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;

(x) Extortion in the first degree;

(xi) Robbery in the second degree;

(xii) Drive-by shooting;

(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner; and

(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of this subsection; and

(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(55) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that complies with RCW 9.94A.725.

(56) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences, character-building work ethics training, life management skills development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy training, and basic adult education.

(57) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study at school.

Sec. 13. RCW 28A.300.147 and 2011 c 338 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The superintendent of public instruction shall publish on its web site, with a link to the safety center web page((,)):

(1) A revised and updated sample policy for schools to follow regarding students required to register as sex or kidnapping offenders; and

(2) Educational materials developed pursuant to RCW 28A.300.145.

Sec. 14. RCW 42.56.240 and 2013 c 315 s 2, 2013 c 190 s 7, and 2013 c 183 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The following investigative, law enforcement, and crime victim information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this chapter:

(1) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any person's right to privacy;

(2) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the commission, if disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical safety, or property. If at the time a complaint is filed the complainant, victim, or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or nondisclosure, such desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed with the commission about any elected official or candidate for public office must be made in writing and signed by the complainant under oath;

(3) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state, county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b);

(4) License applications under RCW 9.41.070; copies of license applications or information on the applications may be released to law enforcement or corrections agencies;

(5) Information revealing the identity of child victims of sexual assault who are under age eighteen. Identifying information means the child victim's name, address, location, photograph, and in cases in which the child victim is a relative or stepchild of the alleged perpetrator, identification of the relationship between the child and the alleged perpetrator;

(6) The statewide gang database referenced in RCW 43.43.762;

(7) Data from the electronic sales tracking system established in RCW 69.43.165;

(8) Information submitted to the statewide unified sex offender notification and registration program under RCW 36.28A.040(6) by a person for the purpose of receiving notification regarding a registered sex offender, including the person's name, residential address, and e-mail address;

(9) Information compiled and submitted for the purposes of sex offender and kidnapping offender registration pursuant to RCW 4.24.550 and 9A.44.130, or the statewide registered kidnapping and sex offender web site pursuant to RCW 4.24.550, regardless of whether the information is held by a law enforcement agency, the statewide unified sex offender notification and registration program under RCW 36.28A.040, the central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW 43.43.540, or another public agency;

(10) Personally identifying information collected by law enforcement agencies pursuant to local security alarm system programs and vacation crime watch programs. Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted so as to prohibit the legal owner of a residence or business from accessing information regarding his or her residence or business; ((and

(10))) (11) The felony firearm offense conviction database of felony firearm offenders established in RCW 43.43.822; ((and

(11))) (12) The identity of a state employee or officer who has in good faith filed a complaint with an ethics board, as provided in RCW 42.52.410, or who has in good faith reported improper governmental action, as defined in RCW 42.40.020, to the auditor or other public official, as defined in RCW 42.40.020; and

(((12))) (13) The following security threat group information collected and maintained by the department of corrections pursuant to RCW 72.09.745: (a) Information that could lead to the identification of a person's security threat group status, affiliation, or activities; (b) information that reveals specific security threats associated with the operation and activities of security threat groups; and (c) information that identifies the number of security threat group members, affiliates, or associates.

Sec. 15. RCW 72.09.345 and 2011 c 338 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any other information required to be released under this chapter, the department is authorized, pursuant to RCW 4.24.550, to release relevant information to a law enforcement agency that is necessary to protect the public concerning offenders convicted of sex offenses.

(2) In order for ((public)) law enforcement agencies to have the information necessary to notify the public as authorized in RCW 4.24.550, the secretary shall establish and administer an end-of-sentence review committee for the purposes of assigning risk levels, reviewing available release plans, and making appropriate referrals for sex offenders.

(3) The committee shall assess, on a case-by-case basis, the public risk posed by:

(a) Offenders preparing for release from confinement for a sex offense or sexually violent offense committed on or after July 1, 1984;

(b) Sex offenders accepted from another state under a reciprocal agreement under the interstate corrections compact authorized in chapter 72.74 RCW;

(c) Juveniles preparing for release from confinement for a sex offense and releasing from the department of social and health services juvenile rehabilitation administration;

(d) Juveniles, following disposition, under the jurisdiction of a county juvenile court for a registerable sex offense; and

(e) Juveniles found to have committed a sex offense and accepted from another state under a reciprocal agreement under the interstate compact for juveniles authorized in chapter 13.24 RCW.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the committee shall have access to all relevant records and information in the possession of public agencies relating to the offenders under review, including police reports; prosecutors' statements of probable cause; presentence investigations and reports; complete judgments and sentences; current classification referrals; criminal history summaries; violation and disciplinary reports; all psychological evaluations and psychiatric hospital reports; sex offender treatment program reports; and juvenile records. Records and information obtained under this subsection shall not be disclosed outside the committee unless otherwise authorized by law.

(5) The committee shall review each sex offender under its authority before the offender's release from confinement or start of the offender's term of community custody in order to: (a) Classify the offender into a risk level for the purposes of public notification under RCW 4.24.550; (b) where available, review the offender's proposed release plan in accordance with the requirements of RCW 72.09.340; and (c) make appropriate referrals.

(6) The committee shall classify as risk level I those sex offenders whose risk assessments indicate ((a)) they are at a low risk ((of reoffense)) to sexually reoffend within the community at large. The committee shall classify as risk level II those offenders whose risk assessments indicate ((a)) they are at a moderate risk ((of reoffense)) to sexually reoffend within the community at large. The committee shall classify as risk level III those offenders whose risk assessments indicate ((a)) they are at a high risk ((of reoffense)) to sexually reoffend within the community at large.

(7) The committee shall issue to appropriate law enforcement agencies, for their use in making public notifications under RCW 4.24.550, narrative notices regarding the pending release of sex offenders from the department's facilities. The narrative notices shall, at a minimum, describe the identity and criminal history behavior of the offender and shall include the department's risk level classification for the offender. For sex offenders classified as either risk level II or III, the narrative notices shall also include the reasons underlying the classification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. The attorney general shall evaluate the availability of data to determine the comparability of sex and kidnapping offenses among the states, federal government, and other jurisdictions as needed to facilitate the implementation of RCW 9A.44.128. The attorney general shall recommend whether the creation of such a database is advisable. The attorney general shall report his or her findings to the appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015.

--- END ---