BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the experiences that a child has before entering kindergarten are critical in shaping the child's foundation for learning. The legislature further finds that there is uneven access in Washington state to early learning programs that focus on American Indian and Alaska Native children.

The legislature recognizes that the department of early learning is collaborating with tribal nations to provide access to early learning resources and information, including developing agreements in 2010 with the federally recognized tribes on communication and consultation, providing a tribal liaison as the main point of contact for tribal nations, having four sites of the early childhood education and assistance program operated by tribal organizations, and offering a tribal certification process for child care licensing for tribes. However, the legislature recognizes that more could be done to promote and provide greater support to meet the early care and educational needs of American Indian and Alaska Native students.

Therefore, the legislature intends to create an office of Native early child care and education within the department of early learning to increase support, technical assistance, access, and advocacy for early child care and education for American Indian and Alaska Native students in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An office of Native early child care and education is created within the department. The director shall appoint an individual to be responsible for the office.

(2) With additional support of federal and local funds where authorized by law, the office shall:

(a) Provide assistance to families in meeting the early child care and educational needs of American Indian and Alaska Native children;

(b) Facilitate the development and implementation of curricula and instructional materials in native languages that promote pride in the unique heritage, culture, and history of tribal nations;

(c) Provide assistance to early child care and education providers in the acquisition of funding to develop curricula and instructional materials in conjunction with native language practitioners and tribal elders;

(d) Coordinate technical assistance for early child care and education programs that serve American Indian and Alaska Native students;

(e) Seek funds to develop, in conjunction with tribal nations, and implement support services for the purposes of the following:

(i) Expanding the number of licensed tribal child care providers;

(ii) Increasing the number of American Indian and Alaska Native early child care and education professionals; and

(iii) Providing continued professional development for early child care and education professionals serving American Indian and Alaska Native students;

(f) Facilitate the inclusion of native language programs in early child care and education programs serving American Indian and Alaska Native students;

(g) Work with all relevant agencies and committees to highlight the need for accurate, useful data that is appropriately disaggregated to provide a more accurate picture regarding American Indian and Alaska Native children; and

(h) Report to the governor, the legislature, and the governor's office of Indian affairs on an annual basis, beginning in December 2015, regarding the activities of the office of Native early child care and education, specifically noting system successes and accomplishments, deficiencies, and needs.

(3) The Native early child care and education public-private partnership account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The purpose of the account is to support the activities of the office of Native early child care and education within the department. Receipts from any appropriations made by the legislature for the purposes of this section, federal funds, gifts or grants from the private sector or foundations, and other sources must be deposited into the account. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

--- END ---