BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. In response to a recent department of health adjudication in In re Shultz, Master Case No. M2009-1189, the legislature intends to clarify that East Asian medicine practitioners may administer liquid vitamins and other sterile preparations in point injection therapy.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.06.010 and 2010 c 286 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The following terms in this chapter shall have the meanings set forth in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(1) "East Asian medicine" means a health care service utilizing East Asian medicine diagnosis and treatment to promote health and treat organic or functional disorders and includes the following:

(a) Acupuncture, including the use of acupuncture needles or lancets to directly and indirectly stimulate acupuncture points and meridians;

(b) Use of electrical, mechanical, or magnetic devices to stimulate acupuncture points and meridians;

(c) Moxibustion;

(d) Acupressure and reflexology;

(e) Cupping;

(f) Dermal friction technique;

(g) Infra-red;

(h) Sonopuncture;

(i) Laserpuncture;

(j) Point injection therapy (aquapuncture);

(k) Dietary advice and health education based on East Asian medical theory, including the recommendation and sale of herbs, vitamins, minerals, and dietary and nutritional supplements;

(l) Breathing, relaxation, and East Asian exercise techniques;

(m) Qi gong;

(n) East Asian massage and Tui na, which is a method of East Asian bodywork, characterized by the kneading, pressing, rolling, shaking, and stretching of the body and does not include spinal manipulation; and

(o) Superficial heat and cold therapies.

(2) "East Asian medicine practitioner" means a person licensed under this chapter.

(3) "Department" means the department of health.

(4) "Point injection therapy" and "aquapuncture" means the nonintravenous injection of sterile preparations into acupuncture points.

(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(6) "Sterile preparation" means saline, sterile water, herbs, minerals, vitamins in liquid form, and nutritional substances. "Sterile preparation" does not include controlled substances contained in Schedules I through V of the uniform controlled substances act, chapter 69.50 RCW.

Nothing in this chapter requires individuals to be licensed as an East Asian medicine practitioner in order to provide the techniques and services in subsection (1)(k) through (o) of this section or to sell herbal products.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.06.210 and 1985 c 326 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter shall not be construed as permitting the administration or prescription of drugs other than sterile preparations or in any way infringing upon the practice of medicine and surgery as defined in chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, except as authorized in this chapter.

Sec. 4. RCW 69.41.030 and 2013 c 71 s 1 and 2013 c 12 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, deliver, or possess any legend drug except upon the order or prescription of a physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a commissioned medical or dental officer in the United States armed forces or public health service in the discharge of his or her official duties, a duly licensed physician or dentist employed by the veterans administration in the discharge of his or her official duties, a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner under chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized by the nursing care quality assurance commission, a pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW to the extent permitted by drug therapy guidelines or protocols established under RCW 18.64.011 and authorized by the ((board of)) pharmacy quality assurance commission and approved by a practitioner authorized to prescribe drugs, an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW when authorized by the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by the medical quality assurance commission, or any of the following professionals in any province of Canada that shares a common border with the state of Washington or in any state of the United States: A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner, a licensed physician assistant, a licensed osteopathic physician assistant, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the above provisions shall not apply to sale, delivery, or possession by drug wholesalers or drug manufacturers, or their agents or employees, or to any practitioner acting within the scope of his or her license, or to a common or contract carrier or warehouse operator, or any employee thereof, whose possession of any legend drug is in the usual course of business or employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter or chapter 18.64 RCW shall prevent a family planning clinic that is under contract with the health care authority from selling, delivering, possessing, and dispensing commercially prepackaged oral contraceptives prescribed by authorized, licensed health care practitioners.

(2)(a) A violation of this section involving the sale, delivery, or possession with intent to sell or deliver is a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(b) A violation of this section involving possession is a misdemeanor.

(3) Nothing in this chapter prohibits an East Asian medicine practitioner from purchasing, possessing, or administering sterile preparations as part of point injection therapy. For purposes of this section, "East Asian medicine practitioner," "point injection therapy," and "sterile preparation" have the same meaning as in RCW 18.06.010.

--- END ---