BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.96A.080 and 2014 c 225 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In coordination with the health care authority, the department shall establish by appropriate means, a comprehensive and coordinated program for the treatment of persons with substance use disorders and their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons.

(2)(a) The program shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, a continuum of chemical dependency treatment services that includes:

(i) Withdrawal management;

(ii) Residential treatment; and

(iii) Outpatient treatment.

(b) The program may include peer support, supported housing, supported employment, crisis diversion, or recovery support services.

(3) All appropriate public and private resources shall be coordinated with and used in the program when possible.

(4) The department may contract for the use of an approved treatment program or other individual or organization if the secretary considers this to be an effective and economical course to follow.

(5) By April 1, 2016, treatment provided under this chapter must be purchased primarily through managed care contracts. Consistent with RCW 70.96A.350, services and funding provided through the criminal justice treatment account, except for the amount used to provide state matching funds for federal medicaid payments, are intended to be exempted from managed care contracting.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.96A.350 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 990 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The criminal justice treatment account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for: (a) Substance abuse treatment and treatment support services for offenders with an addiction or a substance abuse problem that, if not treated, would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a prosecuting attorney in Washington state; (b) the provision of drug and alcohol treatment services and treatment support services for nonviolent offenders within a drug court program; (c) the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court; and (d) during the 2011-2013 biennium, the legislature may appropriate up to three million dollars from the account in order to offset reductions in the state general fund for treatment services provided by counties. This amount is not subject to the requirements of subsections (5) through (9) of this section. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the criminal justice treatment account to the state general fund amounts as reflect the state savings associated with the implementation of the medicaid expansion of the federal affordable care act. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Treatment" means services that are critical to a participant's successful completion of his or her substance abuse treatment program, ((but does not include the following services: Housing other than that provided as part of an inpatient substance abuse treatment program, vocational training, and mental health counseling))including the services outlined in RCW 70.96A.080(2)(b), as amended by section 25, chapter 225, Laws of 2014, effective April 1, 2016; and

(b) "Treatment support" means transportation to or from inpatient or outpatient treatment services when no viable alternative exists, and child care services that are necessary to ensure a participant's ability to attend outpatient treatment sessions.

(3) Revenues to the criminal justice treatment account consist of: (a) Funds transferred to the account pursuant to this section; and (b) any other revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.

(4)(a) For the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2003, the state treasurer shall transfer eight million nine hundred fifty thousand dollars from the general fund into the criminal justice treatment account, divided into eight equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, and each subsequent fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer eight million two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the general fund to the criminal justice treatment account, divided into four equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, and each subsequent fiscal year, the amount transferred shall be increased on an annual basis by the implicit price deflator as published by the federal bureau of labor statistics.

(b) In each odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate the amount transferred to the criminal justice treatment account in (a) of this subsection to the division of alcohol and substance abuse for the purposes of subsection (5) of this section.

(5) Moneys appropriated to the division of alcohol and substance abuse from the criminal justice treatment account shall be distributed as specified in this subsection. The department shall serve as the fiscal agent for purposes of distribution. Until July 1, 2004, the department may not use moneys appropriated from the criminal justice treatment account for administrative expenses and shall distribute all amounts appropriated under subsection (4)(b) of this section in accordance with this subsection. Beginning in July 1, 2004, the department may retain up to three percent of the amount appropriated under subsection (4)(b) of this section for its administrative costs.

(a) Seventy percent of amounts appropriated to the division from the account shall be distributed to counties pursuant to the distribution formula adopted under this section. The division of alcohol and substance abuse, in consultation with the department of corrections, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, the superior court judges' association, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, representatives of the criminal defense bar, representatives of substance abuse treatment providers, and any other person deemed by the division to be necessary, shall establish a fair and reasonable methodology for distribution to counties of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account. County or regional plans submitted for the expenditure of formula funds must be approved by the panel established in (b) of this subsection.

(b) Thirty percent of the amounts appropriated to the division from the account shall be distributed as grants for purposes of treating offenders against whom charges are filed by a county prosecuting attorney. The division shall appoint a panel of representatives from the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges' association, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington defender's association or the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, substance abuse treatment providers, and the division. The panel shall review county or regional plans for funding under (a) of this subsection and grants approved under this subsection. The panel shall attempt to ensure that treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.

(6) The county alcohol and drug coordinator, county prosecutor, county sheriff, county superior court, a substance abuse treatment provider appointed by the county legislative authority, a member of the criminal defense bar appointed by the county legislative authority, and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of the drug court shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (5)(b) of this section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the criminal justice treatment account within that county. The funds shall be used solely to provide approved alcohol and substance abuse treatment pursuant to RCW 70.96A.090, treatment support services, and for the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court.

(a) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent on the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court.

(b) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent for treatment support services.

(7) Counties are encouraged to consider regional agreements and submit regional plans for the efficient delivery of treatment under this section.

(8) Moneys allocated under this section shall be used to supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds used for substance abuse treatment.

(9) Counties must meet the criteria established in RCW 2.28.170(3)(b).

(10) The authority under this section to use funds from the criminal justice treatment account for the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court expires June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act takes effect April 1, 2016.

--- END ---