BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 8.25 RCW to read as follows:

No private property shall be taken or damaged for public or private use that is to be transferred for use or possession by a governmental agency of another state. In the event of conflict between the provisions of this chapter and any other act, the provisions of this chapter shall govern. However, nothing in this section shall prevent the department of transportation from entering into cooperative agreements with prior legislative approval with an adjacent state for the maintenance, alteration, construction, or reconstruction of transportation infrastructure between the adjoining states. Such agreements may also allow for the acquisition of temporary property rights for equipment storage, haul routes, project staging, and the storage of necessary supplies.

--- END ---