BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1) As used in this section, "political subdivision" means the state, any county, city, public local entity, public-private partnership, and any other public entity of the state, a county, or city.

(2) The state of Washington and all political subdivisions may not adopt or implement policy recommendations that deliberately or inadvertently infringe or restrict private property rights without due process as may be required by policy recommendations originating in or traceable to Agenda 21, adopted by the United Nations in 1992 at its conference on environment and development, or any other international law or ancillary plan of action that contravenes the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of the state of Washington.

(3) Since the United Nations has accredited and enlisted numerous nongovernmental and intergovernmental organizations to assist in the implementation of its policies relative to Agenda 21 around the world, the state of Washington and all political subdivisions may not enter into any agreement, expend any sum of money, or receive funds contracting services or giving financial aid to or from the nongovernmental and intergovernmental organizations defined in Agenda 21.

--- END ---