BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 6.27.010 and 2012 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this chapter, the term "earnings" means compensation paid or payable to an individual for personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise, and includes periodic payments pursuant to a governmental or nongovernmental pension or retirement program.

(2) As used in this chapter, the term "disposable earnings" means that part of earnings remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any amounts required by law to be withheld. "Disposable earnings" does not include earnings spent on monthly health insurance premiums or on penalties for not maintaining minimum essential coverage as required by 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5000A, as it existed on the effective date of this section.

--- END ---