BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.80.050 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, biennial appropriations to the department of transportation to carry out the regional transportation planning program shall set forth the amounts to be allocated as follows:

(((1))) (a) A base amount per county for each county within each regional transportation planning organization, to be distributed to the lead planning agency;

(((2))) (b) An amount to be distributed to each lead planning agency on a per capita basis; and

(((3))) (c) An amount to be administered by the department of transportation as a discretionary grant program for special regional planning projects, including grants to allow counties which have significant transportation interests in common with an adjoining region to also participate in that region's planning efforts.

(2) State funds may not be provided to a regional transportation planning organization described under RCW 47.80.020 or an organization designated as a metropolitan planning organization for federal transportation planning purposes if either organization has received federal funds in the same biennium.

--- END ---