BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.80 RCW to read as follows:

A member of a regional transportation planning organization representing a government or organization outside the state of Washington may serve only as a nonvoting member of the regional transportation planning organization or any of its boards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 47.80.080 (Majority vote on state matters) and 2003 c 351 s 2 are each repealed.

--- END ---