BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.80.040 and 2003 c 351 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Each regional transportation planning organization shall create a transportation policy board. Transportation policy boards shall provide policy advice to the regional transportation planning organization and shall allow representatives of major employers within the region, the department of transportation, transit districts, port districts, and member cities, towns, and counties within the region to participate in policy making. Any members of the house of representatives or the state senate whose districts are wholly or partly within the boundaries of the regional transportation planning organization are considered ex officio, nonvoting policy board members of the regional transportation planning organization. ((This does not preclude legislators from becoming full-time, voting board members.))However, the most senior legislator from each respective district, based on years of service in the legislature, is considered a full-time, voting board member. Legislative members of the board are not considered for purposes of determining a quorum.

--- END ---