BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that school personnel are often the first responders when there is a violent threat or natural or man-made disaster at a school. The legislature further finds there is a need to develop training for school personnel to intervene and provide assistance during these emergency incidents. The legislature recognizes an educational service district has developed a model for a regional school safety and security center, which can provide this type of training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.310 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Educational service districts may implement a regional school safety and security program modeled after the educational service district that has developed a regional school safety and security center.

(2) The programs should include the following components:

(a) Establishment of a network of school safety coordinators for the educational service districts, which shall focus on prevention planning, intervention, mitigation, crisis response, and community recovery regarding emergency incidents in schools;

(b) Collaboration with the educational service district that developed the model for a regional school safety and security center to adopt its model for a regional school safety and security center;

(c) Creation of technology-based systems that enable more efficient and effective communication between schools and emergency response entities, including local law enforcement, local fire department, and state and federal responders;

(d) Provision of technology support to improve communication and data management between schools and emergency response entities;

(e) Ongoing training of school personnel and emergency responders to establish a system for preventative identification, intervention strategies, and management of risk behaviors;

(f) Development of a professional development to train school personnel as first responders until the arrival of emergency responders; and

(g) Building collaborative relationships between other educational service districts, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the school safety advisory committee.

--- END ---