BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that Washington state's elderly population is growing and the number of individuals with dementia is increasing. The legislature further finds that approximately sixty percent of individuals with dementia will wander at least once and that if not found within twenty-four hours, up to half of wandering seniors with dementia will suffer serious injury or death. The legislature further finds that the state of Washington has a compelling interest in protecting the safety of vulnerable citizens with cognitive impairments, regardless of age.

(2) The legislature intends to create a public notification system to broadcast information about missing persons with Alzheimer's disease, dementia, or other mental disabilities to aid in their safe return. Because there are many individuals who have been diagnosed with Alzheimer's disease before they have reached age sixty-five, this system must also address those people under the age of sixty-five with cognitive impairments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Law enforcement agency" means the law enforcement agency that has primary jurisdiction for locating the missing senior citizen.

(2) "Silver alert" means a quick response system designed to issue and coordinate alerts following the disappearance of a person who has been diagnosed with Alzheimer's disease, dementia, or other mental disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A law enforcement agency may request a silver alert for a person when the following conditions apply:

(1) The person suffers from a mental impairment verified by written documentation;

(2) The request is made within seventy-two hours of the person's disappearance;

(3) The disappearance poses a credible threat to the person's health and safety;

(4) There is sufficient information to provide the public to assist in locating the person; and

(5) A law enforcement investigation has ruled out alternative explanations for the disappearance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Within existing resources, the Washington state patrol shall develop and implement a plan, commonly known as a "silver alert plan" for voluntary cooperation between local, state, tribal, and other law enforcement agencies, state government agencies, radio and television stations, and cable and satellite systems to enhance the public's ability to assist in recovering people who have been diagnosed with Alzheimer's disease, dementia, or other mental disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---