BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW to read as follows:

A pharmacist is authorized, without consulting a physician or obtaining a new prescription or refill from a physician, to provide for one early refill of a prescription for topical ophthalmic products if all of the following criteria are met:

(1) The refill is requested by a patient at or after seventy percent of the predicted days of use of:

(a) The date the original prescription was dispensed to the patient; or

(b) The date that the last refill of the prescription was dispensed to the patient;

(2) The prescriber indicates on the original prescription that a specific number of refills will be needed; and

(3) The refill does not exceed the number of refills that the prescriber indicated under subsection (2) of this section.

--- END ---