BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.44.110 and 1995 c 369 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Smoke detection devices shall be installed inside all dwelling units:

(a) Occupied by persons other than the owner on and after December 31, 1981; or

(b) Built or manufactured in this state after December 31, 1980.

(2) The smoke detection devices shall be designed, manufactured, and installed inside dwelling units in conformance with:

(a) Nationally accepted standards; and

(b) As provided by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, rules and regulations promulgated by the ((chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection))state building code council.

(3) Installation of smoke detection devices shall be the responsibility of the owner. Maintenance of smoke detection devices, including the replacement of batteries where required for the proper operation of the smoke detection device, shall be the responsibility of the tenant, who shall maintain the device as specified by the manufacturer. At the time of a vacancy, the owner shall insure that the smoke detection device is operational prior to the reoccupancy of the dwelling unit.

(4) Any owner or tenant failing to comply with this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars.

(5) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Dwelling unit" means a single unit providing complete, independent living facilities for one or more persons including permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, and sanitation; and

(b) "Smoke detection device" means an assembly incorporating in one unit a device which detects visible or invisible particles of combustion, the control equipment, and the alarm-sounding device, operated from a power supply either in the unit or obtained at the point of installation.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.37.467 and 2014 c 216 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every automobile, truck, motorcycle, motor home, or off-road vehicle that is fueled by an alternative fuel source must bear a reflective placard issued by the national fire protection association indicating that the vehicle is so fueled. Violation of this subsection is a traffic infraction.

(2) As used in this section "alternative fuel source" includes propane, compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas, liquid petroleum gas, or any chemically similar gas but does not include gasoline or diesel fuel.

(((3) If a placard for a specific alternative fuel source has not been issued by the national fire protection association, a placard issued by the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, is required. The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, must develop rules for the design, size, and placement of the placard which remains effective until a specific placard is issued by the national fire protection association.))

Sec. 3. RCW 70.95I.080 and 1986 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((By January 1, 1987, the state fire protection board))The state building code council, in cooperation with the department of ecology, shall develop a statewide standard for the placement of above-ground tanks to collect used oil from private individuals for recycling purposes.

--- END ---