BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 34.05.620 and 1996 c 318 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

If the rules review committee finds by a majority vote of its members that a proposed rule is not within the intent of the legislature as expressed in the statute which the rule implements, or that an agency may not be adopting a proposed rule in accordance with all applicable provisions of law, the committee shall give the affected agency written notice of its decision. For purposes of review by the committee, a proposed rule includes any draft municipal storm water general permit issued by the department of ecology. The notice shall be given at least seven days prior to any hearing scheduled for consideration of or adoption of the proposed rule pursuant to RCW 34.05.320. The notice shall include a statement of the review committee's findings and the reasons therefor. When the agency holds a hearing on the proposed rule, the agency shall consider the review committee's decision.

Sec. 2. RCW 34.05.640 and 1998 c 21 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within seven days of an agency hearing held after notification of the agency by the rules review committee pursuant to RCW 34.05.620 or 34.05.630, the affected agency shall notify the committee of its intended action on a proposed or existing rule to which the committee objected or on a committee finding of the agency's failure to adopt rules.

(2) If the rules review committee finds by a majority vote of its members: (a) That the proposed or existing rule in question will not be modified, amended, withdrawn, or repealed by the agency so as to conform with the intent of the legislature, (b) that an existing rule was not adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions of law, or (c) that the agency will not replace the policy or interpretive statement, guideline, or document that is of general applicability, or its equivalent, with a rule, the rules review committee may, within thirty days from notification by the agency of its intended action, file with the code reviser notice of its objections together with a concise statement of the reasons therefor. Such notice and statement shall also be provided to the agency by the rules review committee.

(3)(a) If the rules review committee makes an adverse finding regarding ((an)) a proposed or existing rule under subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this section, the committee may, by a majority vote of its members, recommend suspension of rule-making proceedings for a proposed rule or suspension of the existing rule. Within seven days of such vote the committee shall transmit to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature, the governor, the code reviser, and the agency written notice of its objection and recommended suspension and the concise reasons therefor. Within thirty days of receipt of the notice, the governor shall transmit to the committee, the code reviser, and the agency written approval or disapproval of the recommended suspension. If the suspension is approved by the governor, it is effective from the date of that approval and continues until ninety days after the expiration of the next regular legislative session.

(b) If the rules review committee makes an adverse finding regarding a policy or interpretive statement, guideline, or document that is of general applicability, or its equivalent, under subsection (2)(c) of this section, the committee may, by a majority vote of its members, advise the governor of its finding.

(4) The code reviser shall publish transmittals from the rules review committee or the governor issued pursuant to subsection (2) or (3) of this section in the Washington state register and shall publish in the next supplement and compilation of the Washington Administrative Code a reference to the committee's objection or recommended suspension and the governor's action on it and to the issue of the Washington state register in which the full text thereof appears.

(5) The reference shall be removed from a rule published in the Washington Administrative Code if a subsequent adjudicatory proceeding determines that the rule is within the intent of the legislature or was adopted in accordance with all applicable laws, whichever was the objection of the rules review committee.

Sec. 3. RCW 34.05.655 and 1998 c 21 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person may petition the rules review committee for a review of a proposed or existing rule or a proposed or existing policy or interpretive statement, guideline, or document that is of general applicability, or its equivalent. A petition to review a statement, guideline, or document that is of general applicability, or its equivalent, may only be filed for the purpose of requesting the committee to determine whether the statement, guideline, or document that is of general applicability, or its equivalent, is being used as a rule that has not been adopted in accordance with all provisions of law. Within thirty days of the receipt of the petition, the rules review committee shall acknowledge receipt of the petition and describe any initial action taken. If the rules review committee rejects the petition, a written statement of the reasons for rejection shall be included.

(2) A person may petition the rules review committee under subsection (1) of this section requesting review of an existing rule only if the person has petitioned the agency to amend or repeal the rule under RCW 34.05.330(1) and such petition was denied.

(3) A petition for review of a rule under subsection (1) of this section shall:

(a) Identify with specificity the proposed or existing rule to be reviewed;

(b) Identify the specific statute identified by the agency as authorizing the rule, the specific statute which the rule interprets or implements, and, if applicable, the specific statute the department is alleged not to have followed in adopting the rule;

(c) State the reasons why the petitioner believes that the rule is not within the intent of the legislature, or that its adoption was not or is not in accordance with law, and provide documentation to support these statements;

(d) Identify any known judicial action regarding the rule or statutes identified in the petition.

A petition to review an existing rule shall also include a copy of the agency's denial of a petition to amend or repeal the rule issued under RCW 34.05.330(1) and, if available, a copy of the governor's denial issued under RCW 34.05.330(3).

(4) A petition for review of a policy or interpretive statement, guideline, or document that is of general applicability, or its equivalent, under subsection (1) of this section shall:

(a) Identify the specific policy or interpretative statement, guideline, or document that is of general applicability, or its equivalent, to be reviewed;

(b) Identify the specific statute which the rule interprets or implements;

(c) State the reasons why the petitioner believes that the policy or interpretive statement, guideline, or document that is of general applicability, or its equivalent, meets the definition of a rule under RCW 34.05.010 and should have been adopted according to the procedures of this chapter;

(d) Identify any known judicial action regarding the policy or interpretive statement, guideline, or document that is of general applicability, or its equivalent, or statutes identified in the petition.

(5) The rules review committee may not reject a petition that is signed by at least thirty members of the legislature and complies with all applicable requirements of this section, but in such cases the petitioners are not required to petition the agency to amend or repeal the rule under RCW 34.05.330(1) prior to petitioning the rules review committee.

(6) Within ninety days of receipt of the petition, the rules review committee shall make a final decision on the rule for which the petition for review was not previously rejected.

--- END ---