BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Part I

Eliminating obsolete and redundant statutory provisions

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 82.04.395 (Exemptions—Certain materials printed in school district and educational service district printing facilities) and 1979 ex.s. c 196 s 12;

(2) RCW 82.04.397 (Exemptions—Certain materials printed in county, city, or town printing facilities) and 1979 ex.s. c 196 s 14;

(3) RCW 82.04.4333 (Credit—Job training services—Approval) and 1996 c 1 s 4;

(4) RCW 82.04.4485 (Credit—Mechanical lifting devices purchased by hospitals) and 2006 c 165 s 5;

(5) RCW 82.08.0265 (Exemptions—Sales to nonresidents of tangible personal property which becomes a component of property of the nonresident by installing, repairing, etc.—Labor and services for installing, repairing, etc.) and 1980 c 37 s 32;

(6) RCW 82.14.220 (Figures for apportionments and distributions under RCW 82.14.200 and 82.14.210) and 1984 c 225 s 4; and

(7) RCW 82.24.235 (Rules) and 1995 c 278 s 15.

Sec. 102. RCW 84.41.030 and 2009 c 308 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county assessor ((shall)) must maintain an active and systematic program of revaluation on a continuous basis((, and shall establish a revaluation schedule which will result in revaluation of all taxable real property within the county at least once each four years and physical inspection of all taxable real property within the county at least once each six years)). All taxable real property within a county must be revalued annually, and all taxable real property within a county must be physically inspected at least once every six years. Each county assessor may disregard any program of revaluation, if requested by a property owner, and change, as appropriate, the valuation of real property upon the receipt of a notice of decision received under RCW 36.70B.130 or chapter 35.22, 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW pertaining to the value of the real property.

(2) ((Not later than January 1, 2014, all taxable real property within a county must be revalued annually and all taxable real property within a county must be physically inspected at least once each six years. This mandate is conditional upon the department of revenue providing the necessary guidance and financial assistance to those counties that are not on an annual revaluation cycle so that they may convert to an annual revaluation cycle including, but not limited to, appropriate data collection methods and coding, neighborhood and market delineation, statistical analysis, valuation guidelines, and training.)) The department will provide advisory appraisals of industrial properties valued at twenty-five million dollars or more in real and personal property value when requested by the county assessor.

(((3) In recognition of the need for immediate action, the department of revenue is directed to conduct a pilot project on at least one county that is prepared to move from cyclical to annual revaluation by December 31, 2009. The pilot project will develop the expertise necessary to provide counties with neighborhood and market delineation, statistical analysis, valuation guidelines, and training. The department of revenue must use the expertise gained in this pilot project to facilitate the conversion of cyclical counties to annual revaluation and ongoing refinement of assessment processes statewide. The department may contract with a local government association representing county assessors and other county elected officials in carrying out the requirements of this subsection.))

Sec. 103. RCW 84.41.041 and 2009 c 308 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county assessor ((shall)) must cause taxable real property to be physically inspected and valued at least once every six years in accordance with RCW 84.41.030, and in accordance with a plan filed with and approved by the department of revenue. Such revaluation plan ((shall)) must provide that ((a reasonable portion of)) all taxable real property within a county ((shall)) must be revalued and these newly determined values placed on the assessment rolls each year. ((Until January 1, 2014, the department may approve a plan that provides that all property in the county be revalued every two years. If the revaluation plan provides for physical inspection at least once each four years,)) Property must be valued at one hundred percent of its true and fair value and assessed on the same basis, in accordance with RCW 84.40.030, unless specifically provided otherwise by law. During the intervals between each physical inspection of real property, the valuation of such property may be adjusted to its current true and fair value, such adjustments to be based upon appropriate statistical data. If the revaluation plan provides for physical inspection less frequently than once each four years, during the intervals between each physical inspection of real property, the valuation of such property ((shall)) must be adjusted to its current true and fair value, such adjustments to be made once each year and to be based upon appropriate statistical data.

(2) The assessor may require property owners to submit pertinent data respecting taxable property in their control including data respecting any sale or purchase of said property within the past five years, the cost and characteristics of any improvement on the property and other facts necessary for appraisal of the property.

Sec. 104. RCW 84.48.034 and 1994 c 301 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

The board of equalization may enter an order that has effect up to the end of the assessment ((cycle used by the assessor)) year, if there has been no intervening change in the value during that time.

Part II

Promoting administrative efficiencies

Sec. 201. RCW 46.71.090 and 1993 c 424 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

When the department of revenue issues a registration certificate under RCW 82.32.030 to an automotive repair facility, it ((shall)) must give written notice to the person of the requirements of this chapter in a manner prescribed by the director of revenue, including by electronic means. The department of revenue ((shall thereafter give the notice on an annual basis in conjunction with the business and occupation tax return provided to each person holding a registration certificate as an automotive repair facility)) must also post information about the requirements of this chapter on its public web site.

Sec. 202. RCW 82.08.900 and 2006 c 151 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to an eligible person establishing or operating an anaerobic digester or to services rendered in respect to installing, constructing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving an anaerobic digester, or to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of the anaerobic digester. The anaerobic digester must be used primarily to treat livestock manure.

(2)(((a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the department and must contain information regarding the location of the facility and other information as the department may require.

(b))) A person claiming an exemption under this section must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. ((The exemption is available only when)) Sellers may make tax exempt sales under this section only if the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and RCW 82.12.900 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) "Anaerobic digester" means a facility that processes manure from livestock into biogas and dried manure using microorganisms in a decomposition process within a closed, oxygen-free container.

(b) "Eligible person" means any person establishing or operating an anaerobic digester to treat primarily livestock manure.

(c) "Primarily" means more than fifty percent measured by volume or weight.

Part III

Providing greater clarity and consistency

Sec. 301. RCW 82.04.627 and 2008 c 81 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, for purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter on the sale of parts to the manufacturer of a commercial airplane, the sale is deemed to take place at the site of the final testing or inspection ((as required by:

(a) An approved production inspection system)) under federal aviation regulation part 21, subpart F((; or

(b) A quality control system for which a production certificate has been issued under federal aviation regulation part 21, subpart)) or G.

(2) This section does not apply to:

(a) Sales of ((the types of parts listed in federal aviation regulation part 21, section 303(b)(2) through (4) or parts for which certification or approval under federal aviation regulation part 21 is not required; or

(b) Sales of parts in respect to which final testing or inspection as required by the approved production inspection system or quality control system)) a standard part, such as a nut or bolt, manufactured in compliance with a government or established industry specification;

(b) Sales of a product produced under a technical standard order authorization or letter of technical standard order design approval pursuant to federal aviation regulation part 21, subpart O; or

(c) Sales of parts in respect to which final testing or inspection under federal aviation regulation part 21, subpart F or G takes place in this state.

(3) "Commercial airplane" has the same meaning given in RCW 82.32.550.

Sec. 302. RCW 82.04.750 and 2011 c 55 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not apply ((to restaurants)) in respect to meals provided by a restaurant without specific charge to its employees.

(2) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in RCW 82.08.9995 apply.

Sec. 303. RCW 82.08.9995 and 2011 c 55 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to a meal provided without specific charge ((to an employee)) by a restaurant to its employees.

(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Meal" means one or more items of prepared food or beverages other than alcoholic beverages. For the purposes of this subsection, "alcoholic beverage" and "prepared food" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.08.0293.

(b) "Restaurant" means any establishment having special space and accommodation where food and beverages are regularly sold to the public for immediate, but not necessarily on-site, consumption, but excluding grocery stores, mini-markets, and convenience stores. Restaurant includes, but is not limited to, lunch counters, diners, coffee shops, espresso shops or bars, concession stands or counters, delicatessens, and cafeterias. It also includes space and accommodations where food and beverages are sold to the public for immediate consumption that are located within hotels, motels, lodges, boarding houses, bed and breakfast facilities, hospitals, office buildings, movie theaters, and schools, colleges, or universities, if a separate charge is made for such food or beverages. Mobile sales units that sell food or beverages for immediate consumption within a place, the entrance to which is subject to an admission charge, are "restaurants." So too are public and private carriers, such as trains and vessels, that sell food or beverages for immediate consumption if a separate charge for the food and/or beverages is made. A restaurant is open to the public for purposes of this section if members of the public can be served as guests. "Restaurant" does not include businesses making sales through vending machines or through mobile sales units such as catering trucks or sidewalk vendors of food or beverage items.

Sec. 304. RCW 82.12.9995 and 2011 c 55 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to a meal provided without specific charge ((to an employee)) by a restaurant to its employees.

(2) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in RCW 82.08.9995 apply.

Sec. 305. RCW 82.08.0262 and 2009 c 503 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to:

(a) Sales of airplanes (i) to the United States government; (ii) for use in conducting interstate or foreign commerce by transporting property or persons for hire or by performing services under a contract with the United States government; or (iii) for use in providing intrastate air transportation by a commuter air carrier;

(b) Sales of locomotives, railroad cars, or watercraft for use in conducting interstate or foreign commerce by transporting ((therein or therewith)) property ((and)) or persons for hire or for use in conducting commercial deep sea fishing operations outside the territorial waters of the state;

(c) Sales of tangible personal property that becomes a component part of such airplanes, locomotives, railroad cars, or watercraft, and of motor vehicles or trailers whether owned by or leased with or without drivers and used by the holder of a carrier permit issued by the interstate commerce commission or its successor agency authorizing transportation by motor vehicle across the boundaries of this state, in the course of constructing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the same; and

(d) Sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to such constructing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving.

(2) The term "commuter air carrier" means an air carrier holding authority under Title 14, Part 298 of the code of federal regulations that carries passengers on at least five round trips per week on at least one route between two or more points according to its published flight schedules that specify the times, days of the week, and places between which those flights are performed.

Sec. 306. RCW 82.12.0254 and 2010 c 161 s 905 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of:

(a) Any airplane used primarily in (i) conducting interstate or foreign commerce by transporting property or persons for hire or by performing services under a contract with the United States government or (ii) providing intrastate air transportation by a commuter air carrier as defined in RCW 82.08.0262;

(b) Any locomotive, railroad car, or watercraft used primarily in conducting interstate or foreign commerce by transporting ((therein or therewith)) property ((and)) or persons for hire or used primarily in commercial deep sea fishing operations outside the territorial waters of the state;

(c) Tangible personal property that becomes a component part of any such airplane, locomotive, railroad car, or watercraft in the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the same; and

(d) Labor and services rendered in respect to such repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving.

(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use by a nonresident of this state of any vehicle used exclusively in transporting persons or property across the boundaries of this state and in intrastate operations incidental thereto when such vehicle is registered in a foreign state and in respect to the use by a nonresident of this state of any vehicle so registered and used within this state for a period not exceeding fifteen consecutive days under such rules as the department must adopt. However, under circumstances determined to be justifiable by the department a second fifteen day period may be authorized consecutive with the first fifteen day period; and for the purposes of this exemption the term "nonresident" as used herein includes a user who has one or more places of business in this state as well as in one or more other states, but the exemption for nonresidents applies only to those vehicles which are most frequently dispatched, garaged, serviced, maintained, and operated from the user's place of business in another state.

(3) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use by the holder of a carrier permit issued by the interstate commerce commission or its successor agency of any vehicle whether owned by or leased with or without driver to the permit holder and used in substantial part in the normal and ordinary course of the user's business for transporting therein persons or property for hire across the boundaries of this state; and in respect to the use of any vehicle while being operated under the authority of a trip permit issued by the director of licensing pursuant to RCW 46.16A.320 and moving upon the highways from the point of delivery in this state to a point outside this state; and in respect to the use of tangible personal property which becomes a component part of any vehicle used by the holder of a carrier permit issued by the interstate commerce commission or its successor agency authorizing transportation by motor vehicle across the boundaries of this state whether such vehicle is owned by or leased with or without driver to the permit holder, in the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the same; also the use of labor and services rendered in respect to such repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving.

Sec. 307. RCW 82.24.550 and 2009 c 154 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board ((shall)) must enforce the provisions of this chapter. The board may adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary to enforce ((and administer)) the provisions of this chapter.

(2) The department may adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary to administer the provisions of this chapter. The board may revoke or suspend the license or permit of any wholesale or retail cigarette dealer in the state upon sufficient cause appearing of the violation of this chapter or upon the failure of such licensee to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter.

(3) A license ((shall)) may not be suspended or revoked except upon notice to the licensee and after a hearing as prescribed by the board. The board, upon finding that the licensee has failed to comply with any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, ((shall)) must, in the case of the first offense, suspend the license or licenses of the licensee for a period of not less than thirty consecutive business days, and, in the case of a second or further offense, ((shall)) must suspend the license or licenses for a period of not less than ninety consecutive business days nor more than twelve months, and, in the event the board finds the licensee has been guilty of willful and persistent violations, it may revoke the license or licenses.

(4) Any licenses issued under chapter 82.26 RCW to a person whose license or licenses have been suspended or revoked under this section ((shall)) must also be suspended or revoked during the period of suspension or revocation under this section.

(5) Any person whose license or licenses have been revoked under this section may reapply to the board at the expiration of one year from the date of revocation of the license or licenses. The license or licenses may be approved by the board if it appears to the satisfaction of the board that the licensee will comply with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter.

(6) A person whose license has been suspended or revoked ((shall)) may not sell cigarettes or tobacco products or permit cigarettes or tobacco products to be sold during the period of such suspension or revocation on the premises occupied by the person or upon other premises controlled by the person or others or in any other manner or form whatever.

(7) Any determination and order by the board, and any order of suspension or revocation by the board of the license or licenses issued under this chapter, or refusal to reinstate a license or licenses after revocation ((shall be)) is reviewable by an appeal to the superior court of Thurston county. The superior court ((shall)) must review the order or ruling of the board and may hear the matter de novo, having due regard to the provisions of this chapter and the duties imposed upon the board.

(8) If the board makes an initial decision to deny a license or renewal, or suspend or revoke a license, the applicant may request a hearing subject to the applicable provisions under Title 34 RCW.

(9) For purposes of this section, "tobacco products" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.26.010.

Sec. 308. RCW 82.26.220 and 2009 c 154 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board ((shall)) must enforce this chapter. The board may adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary to enforce ((and administer)) this chapter.

(2) The department may adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary to administer this chapter. The board may revoke or suspend the distributor's or retailer's license of any distributor or retailer of tobacco products in the state upon sufficient cause showing a violation of this chapter or upon the failure of the licensee to comply with any of the rules adopted under it.

(3) A license ((shall)) may not be suspended or revoked except upon notice to the licensee and after a hearing as prescribed by the board. The board, upon finding that the licensee has failed to comply with any provision of this chapter or of any rule adopted under it, ((shall)) must, in the case of the first offense, suspend the license or licenses of the licensee for a period of not less than thirty consecutive business days, and in the case of a second or further offense, suspend the license or licenses for a period of not less than ninety consecutive business days but not more than twelve months, and in the event the board finds the licensee has been guilty of willful and persistent violations, it may revoke the license or licenses.

(4) Any licenses issued under chapter 82.24 RCW to a person whose license or licenses have been suspended or revoked under this section ((shall)) must also be suspended or revoked during the period of suspension or revocation under this section.

(5) Any person whose license or licenses have been revoked under this section may reapply to the board at the expiration of one year of the license or licenses. The license or licenses may be approved by the board if it appears to the satisfaction of the board that the licensee will comply with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted under it.

(6) A person whose license has been suspended or revoked ((shall)) may not sell tobacco products or cigarettes or permit tobacco products or cigarettes to be sold during the period of suspension or revocation on the premises occupied by the person or upon other premises controlled by the person or others or in any other manner or form.

(7) Any determination and order by the board, and any order of suspension or revocation by the board of the license or licenses issued under this chapter, or refusal to reinstate a license or licenses after revocation is reviewable by an appeal to the superior court of Thurston county. The superior court ((shall)) must review the order or ruling of the board and may hear the matter de novo, having due regard to the provisions of this chapter and the duties imposed upon the board.

(8) If the board makes an initial decision to deny a license or renewal, or suspend or revoke a license, the applicant may request a hearing subject to the applicable provisions under Title 34 RCW.

Sec. 309. RCW 82.32.020 and 2009 c 535 s 1111 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of this chapter:

(1) The meaning attributed in chapters 82.01 through 82.27 RCW to the words and phrases "tax year," "taxable year," "person," "company," "gross proceeds of sales," "gross income of the business," "business," "engaging in business," "successor," "gross operating revenue," "gross income," "taxpayer," "retail sale," "seller," "buyer," "purchaser," "extended warranty," and "value of products" ((shall)) apply equally to the provisions of this chapter.

(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the term "tax" includes any monetary exaction, regardless of its label, that the department is responsible for collecting, but not including interest, penalties, the surcharge imposed in RCW 40.14.027, or fees incurred by the department and recouped from taxpayers.

(3) Whenever "property" or "personal property" is used, those terms must be construed to include digital goods and digital codes unless: (a) It is clear from the context that the term "personal property" is intended only to refer to tangible personal property; (b) it is clear from the context that the term "property" is intended only to refer to tangible personal property, real property, or both; or (c) to construe the term "property" or "personal property" as including digital goods and digital codes would yield unlikely, absurd, or strained consequences.

(((3))) (4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Agreement" means the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.

(b) "Associate member" means a petitioning state that is found to be in compliance with the agreement and changes to its laws, rules, or other authorities necessary to bring it into compliance are not in effect, but are scheduled to take effect on or before January 1, 2008. The petitioning states, by majority vote, may also grant associate member status to a petitioning state that does not receive an affirmative vote of three-fourths of the petitioning states upon a finding that the state has achieved substantial compliance with the terms of the agreement as a whole, but not necessarily each required provision, measured qualitatively, and there is a reasonable expectation that the state will achieve compliance by January 1, 2008.

(c) "Certified automated system" means software certified under the agreement to calculate the tax imposed by each jurisdiction on a transaction, determine the amount of tax to remit to the appropriate state, and maintain a record of the transaction.

(d) "Certified service provider" means an agent certified under the agreement to perform all of the seller's sales and use tax functions, other than the seller's obligation to remit tax on its own purchases.

(e)(i) "Member state" means a state that:

(A) Has petitioned for membership in the agreement and submitted a certificate of compliance; and

(B) Before the effective date of the agreement, has been found to be in compliance with the requirements of the agreement by an affirmative vote of three-fourths of the other petitioning states; or

(C) After the effective date of the agreement, has been found to be in compliance with the agreement by a three-fourths vote of the entire governing board of the agreement.

(ii) Membership by reason of (e)(i)(A) and (B) of this subsection is effective on the first day of a calendar quarter at least sixty days after at least ten states comprising at least twenty percent of the total population, as determined by the 2000 federal census, of all states imposing a state sales tax have petitioned for membership and have either been found in compliance with the agreement or have been found to be an associate member under section 704 of the agreement.

(iii) Membership by reason of (e)(i)(A) and (C) of this subsection is effective on the state's proposed date of entry or the first day of the calendar quarter after its petition is approved by the governing board, whichever is later, and is at least sixty days after its petition is approved.

(f) "Model 1 seller" means a seller that has selected a certified service provider as its agent to perform all the seller's sales and use tax functions, other than the seller's obligation to remit tax on its own purchases.

(g) "Model 2 seller" means a seller that has selected a certified automated system to perform part of its sales and use tax functions, but retains responsibility for remitting the tax.

(h) "Model 3 seller" means a seller that has sales in at least five member states, has total annual sales revenue of at least five hundred million dollars, has a proprietary system that calculates the amount of tax due each jurisdiction, and has entered into a performance agreement with the member states that establishes a tax performance standard for the seller. As used in this subsection (((3))) (4)(h), a seller includes an affiliated group of sellers using the same proprietary system.

(i) "Source" means the location in which the sale or use of tangible personal property, a digital good or digital code, an extended warranty, or a digital automated service or other service, subject to tax under chapter 82.08, 82.12, 82.14, or 82.14B RCW, is deemed to occur.

Sec. 310. RCW 82.32.070 and 2013 c 23 s 322 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every ((person liable for any fee or tax imposed by chapters 82.04 through 82.27 RCW shall)) taxpayer liable for any tax collected by the department must keep and preserve, for a period of five years, suitable records as may be necessary to determine the amount of any tax for which ((he or she)) the taxpayer may be liable((, which records shall)). Such records must include copies of all of the taxpayer's federal income tax and state tax returns and reports ((made by him or her. All his or her)). All of the taxpayer's books, records, and invoices ((shall)) must be open for examination at any time by the department of revenue. In the case of an out-of-state ((person or concern which)) taxpayer that does not keep the necessary books and records within this state, it ((shall be)) is sufficient if ((it)) the taxpayer produces within the state such books and records as ((shall be)) are required by the department of revenue, or permits the examination by an agent authorized or designated by the department of revenue at the place where such books and records are kept. Any ((person)) taxpayer who fails to comply with the requirements of this section ((shall be)) is forever barred from questioning, in any court action or proceedings, the correctness of any assessment of taxes made by the department of revenue based upon any period for which such books, records, and invoices have not been so kept and preserved.

(2) A person liable for any fee or tax imposed by chapters 82.04 through 82.27 RCW who contracts with another person or entity for work subject to chapter 18.27 or 19.28 RCW ((shall)) must obtain and preserve a record of the unified business identifier account number for the person or entity performing the work. Failure to obtain or maintain the record is subject to RCW 39.06.010 and to a penalty determined by the director, but not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars. The department ((shall)) must notify the taxpayer and collect the penalty in the same manner as penalties under RCW 82.32.100.

Sec. 311. RCW 82.32.080 and 2012 c 39 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When authorized by the department, payment of the tax may be made by uncertified check under such rules as the department prescribes, but, if a check so received is not paid by the bank on which it is drawn, the taxpayer, by whom such check is tendered, will remain liable for payment of the tax and for all legal penalties and interest, the same as if such check had not been tendered.

(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, payment of the tax must be made by electronic funds transfer, as defined in RCW 82.32.085. As an alternative to electronic funds transfer, the department may authorize other forms of electronic payment, such as payment by credit card. All taxes administered by this chapter are subject to this requirement, except that the department may exclude any taxes not reported on the combined excise tax return or any successor return from the electronic payment requirement in this subsection.

(b) The department may waive the electronic payment requirement in this subsection for any taxpayer or class of taxpayers, for good cause or for whom the department has assigned a reporting frequency that is less than quarterly. In the discretion of the department, a waiver under this subsection may be made temporary or permanent, and may be made on the department's own motion.

(c) The department is authorized to accept payment of taxes by electronic funds transfer or other acceptable forms of electronic payment from taxpayers that are not subject to the mandatory electronic payment requirements in this subsection.

(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, returns must be filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service or other method of electronic reporting as the department may authorize.

(b) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in this subsection for any taxpayer or class of taxpayers, for good cause or for whom the department has assigned a reporting frequency that is less than quarterly. In the discretion of the department, a waiver under this subsection may be made temporary or permanent, and may be made on the department's own motion.

(c) The department is authorized to allow electronic filing of returns from taxpayers that are not subject to the mandatory electronic filing requirements in this subsection.

(4)(a)(i) The department, for good cause shown, may extend the time for making and filing any return, and may grant such reasonable additional time within which to make and file returns as it may deem proper, but any permanent extension granting the taxpayer a reporting date without penalty more than ten days beyond the due date, and any extension in excess of thirty days must be conditional on deposit with the department of an amount to be determined by the department which is approximately equal to the estimated tax liability for the reporting period or periods for which the extension is granted. In the case of a permanent extension or a temporary extension of more than thirty days the deposit must be deposited within the state treasury with other tax funds and a credit recorded to the taxpayer's account which may be applied to taxpayer's liability upon cancellation of the permanent extension or upon reporting of the tax liability where an extension of more than thirty days has been granted.

(ii) The department must review the requirement for deposit at least annually and may require a change in the amount of the deposit required when it believes that such amount does not approximate the tax liability for the reporting period or periods for which the extension is granted.

(b) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer affected by the emergency, may extend the time for making or filing any return as the department deems proper. The department may not require any deposit as a condition for granting an extension under this subsection (4)(b).

(5)(a) The department must keep full and accurate records of all funds received and disbursed by it. Subject to the provisions of RCW 82.32.105, 82.32.052, and 82.32.350, the department must apply the payment of the taxpayer in the following order, without regard to any direction of the taxpayer: (i) Interest; (ii) penalties; (iii) fees that are not within the definition of tax in RCW 82.32.020; (iv) other nontax amounts; (v) taxes, except spirits taxes; and (vi) spirits taxes.

(b) For purposes of this subsection, "spirits taxes" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.155.

(6) The department may refuse to accept any return that is not accompanied by a remittance of the tax shown to be due thereon or that is not filed electronically as required in this section. When such return is not accepted, the taxpayer is deemed to have failed or refused to file a return and is subject to the procedures provided in RCW 82.32.100 and to the penalties provided in RCW 82.32.090. The above authority to refuse to accept a return may not apply when a return is timely filed electronically and a timely payment has been made by electronic funds transfer or other form of electronic payment as authorized by the department.

(7) Except for returns and remittances required to be transmitted to the department electronically under this section and except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a return or remittance that is transmitted to the department by United States mail is deemed filed or received on the date shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped upon the envelope containing it. A return or remittance that is transmitted to the department electronically is deemed filed or received according to procedures set forth by the department.

(8)(a) For purposes of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, "good cause" means the inability of a taxpayer to comply with the requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section because:

(i) The taxpayer does not have the equipment or software necessary to enable the taxpayer to comply with subsection (2) or (3) of this section;

(ii) The equipment or software necessary to enable the taxpayer to comply with subsection (2) or (3) of this section is not functioning properly;

(iii) The taxpayer does not have access to the internet using the taxpayer's own equipment;

(iv) The taxpayer does not have a bank account or a credit card;

(v) The taxpayer's bank is unable to send or receive electronic funds transfer transactions; or

(vi) Some other circumstance or condition exists that, in the department's judgment, prevents the taxpayer from complying with the requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section.

(b) "Good cause" also includes any circumstance that, in the department's judgment, supports the efficient or effective administration of the tax laws of this state, including providing relief from the requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section to any taxpayer that is voluntarily collecting and remitting this state's sales or use taxes on sales to Washington customers but has no legal requirement to be registered with the department.

Sec. 312. RCW 84.36.041 and 2008 c 6 s 707 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All real and personal property used by a nonprofit home for the aging that is reasonably necessary for the purposes of the home is exempt from taxation if the benefit of the exemption inures to the home and:

(a) At least fifty percent of the occupied dwelling units in the home are occupied by eligible residents; or

(b) The home is subsidized under a federal department of housing and urban development program. The department of revenue ((shall)) must provide by rule a definition of homes eligible for exemption under this subsection (1)(b), consistent with the purposes of this section.

(2) All real and personal property used by a nonprofit home for the aging that is reasonably necessary for the purposes of the home is exempt from taxation if the benefit of the exemption inures to the home and the construction, rehabilitation, acquisition, or refinancing of the home is financed under a program using bonds exempt from federal income tax if at least seventy-five percent of the total amount financed uses the tax exempt bonds and the financing program requires the home to reserve a percentage of all dwelling units so financed for low-income residents. The initial term of the exemption under this subsection ((shall)) must equal the term of the tax exempt bond used in connection with the financing program, or the term of the requirement to reserve dwelling units for low-income residents, whichever is shorter. If the financing program involves less than the entire home, only those dwelling units included in the financing program are eligible for total exemption. The department of revenue ((shall)) must provide by rule the requirements for monitoring compliance with the provisions of this subsection and the requirements for exemption including:

(a) The number or percentage of dwelling units required to be occupied by low-income residents, and a definition of low income;

(b) The type and character of the dwelling units, whether independent units or otherwise; and

(c) Any particular requirements for continuing care retirement communities.

(3) A home for the aging is eligible for a partial exemption on the real property and a total exemption for the home's personal property if the home does not meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section because fewer than fifty percent of the occupied dwelling units are occupied by eligible residents, as follows:

(a) A partial exemption ((shall)) must be allowed for each dwelling unit in a home occupied by a resident requiring assistance with activities of daily living.

(b) A partial exemption ((shall)) must be allowed for each dwelling unit in a home occupied by an eligible resident.

(c) A partial exemption ((shall)) must be allowed for an area jointly used by a home for the aging and by a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation currently exempt from property taxation under one of the other provisions of this chapter. The shared area must be reasonably necessary for the purposes of the nonprofit organization, association, or corporation exempt from property taxation under one of the other provisions of this chapter, such as kitchen, dining, and laundry areas.

(d) The amount of exemption ((shall)) must be calculated by multiplying the assessed value of the property reasonably necessary for the purposes of the home, less the assessed value of any area exempt under (c) of this subsection, by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the number of dwelling units occupied by eligible residents and by residents requiring assistance with activities of daily living. The denominator of the fraction is the total number of occupied dwelling units as of December 31st of the first assessment year the home becomes operational for which exemption is claimed and January 1st of each subsequent assessment year for which exemption is claimed.

(4) To be exempt under this section, the property must be used exclusively for the purposes for which the exemption is granted, except as provided in RCW 84.36.805.

(5) A home for the aging is exempt from taxation only if the organization operating the home is exempt from income tax under section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code as existing on January 1, 1989, or such subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent with the purposes of this section.

(6) In order for the home to be eligible for exemption under subsections (1)(a) and (3)(b) of this section, each eligible resident of a home for the aging ((shall)) must submit an income verification form to the county assessor by July 1st of the assessment year for which exemption is claimed. However, during the first year a home becomes operational, the county assessor ((shall)) must accept income verification forms from eligible residents up to December 31st of the assessment year. The income verification form ((shall)) must be prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue. An eligible resident who has filed a form for a previous year need not file a new form until there is a change in status affecting the person's eligibility.

(7) In determining the true and fair value of a home for the aging for purposes of the partial exemption provided by subsection (3) of this section, the assessor ((shall)) must apply the computation method provided by RCW 84.34.060 and ((shall)) may consider only the use to which such property is applied during the years for which such partial exemptions are available and ((shall)) may not consider potential uses of such property.

(8) As used in this section:

(a) "Eligible resident" means a person who:

(i) Occupied the dwelling unit as a principal place of residence as of December 31st of the first assessment year the home becomes operational. In each subsequent year, the eligible resident must occupy the dwelling unit as a principal place of residence as of January 1st of the assessment year for which the exemption is claimed. Confinement of the person to a hospital or nursing home does not disqualify the claim of exemption if the dwelling unit is temporarily unoccupied or if the dwelling unit is occupied by a spouse or a domestic partner, a person financially dependent on the claimant for support, or both; and

(ii) Is sixty-one years of age or older on December 31st of the year in which the exemption claim is filed, or is, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful employment by reason of ((physical)) disability as defined in RCW 84.36.383. Any surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of a person who was receiving an exemption at the time of the person's death ((shall qualify)) qualifies if the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner is fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise meets the requirements of this subsection; and

(iii) Has a combined disposable income of no more than the greater of twenty-two thousand dollars or eighty percent of the median income adjusted for family size as most recently determined by the federal department of housing and urban development for the county in which the person resides. For the purposes of determining eligibility under this section, a "cotenant" means a person who resides with an eligible resident and who shares personal financial resources with the eligible resident.

(b) "Combined disposable income" means the disposable income of the person submitting the income verification form, plus the disposable income of his or her spouse or domestic partner, and the disposable income of each cotenant occupying the dwelling unit for the preceding calendar year, less amounts paid by the person submitting the income verification form or his or her spouse or domestic partner or cotenant during the previous year for the treatment or care of either person received in the dwelling unit or in a nursing home. If the person submitting the income verification form was retired for two months or more of the preceding year, the combined disposable income of such person ((shall)) must be calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined disposable income of such person during the months such person was retired by twelve. If the income of the person submitting the income verification form is reduced for two or more months of the preceding year by reason of the death of the person's spouse or domestic partner, the combined disposable income of such person ((shall)) must be calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined disposable income of such person after the death of the spouse or domestic partner by twelve.

(c) "Disposable income" means adjusted gross income as defined in the federal internal revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989, or such subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent with the purpose of this section, plus all of the following items to the extent they are not included in or have been deducted from adjusted gross income:

(i) Capital gains, other than gain excluded from income under section 121 of the federal internal revenue code to the extent it is reinvested in a new principal residence;

(ii) Amounts deducted for loss;

(iii) Amounts deducted for depreciation;

(iv) Pension and annuity receipts;

(v) Military pay and benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(vi) Veterans benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(vii) Federal social security act and railroad retirement benefits;

(viii) Dividend receipts; and

(ix) Interest received on state and municipal bonds.

(d) "Resident requiring assistance with activities of daily living" means a person who requires significant assistance with the activities of daily living and who would be at risk of nursing home placement without this assistance.

(e) "Home for the aging" means a residential housing facility that (i) provides a housing arrangement chosen voluntarily by the resident, the resident's guardian or conservator, or another responsible person; (ii) has only residents who are at least sixty-one years of age or who have needs for care generally compatible with persons who are at least sixty-one years of age; and (iii) provides varying levels of care and supervision, as agreed to at the time of admission or as determined necessary at subsequent times of reappraisal.

(9) A for-profit home for the aging that converts to nonprofit status after June 11, 1992, and would otherwise be eligible for tax exemption under this section may not receive the tax exemption until five years have elapsed since the conversion. The exemption ((shall)) must then be ratably granted over the next five years.

Sec. 313. RCW 84.38.030 and 2008 c 6 s 702 are each amended to read as follows:

A claimant may defer payment of special assessments and/or real property taxes on up to eighty percent of the amount of the claimant's equity value in the claimant's residence if the following conditions are met:

(1) The claimant must meet all requirements for an exemption for the residence under RCW 84.36.381, other than the age and income limits under RCW 84.36.381.

(2) The claimant must be sixty years of age or older on December 31st of the year in which the deferral claim is filed, or must have been, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful employment by reason of ((physical)) disability((: PROVIDED, That)) as defined in RCW 84.36.383. However, any surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of a person who was receiving a deferral at the time of the person's death ((shall qualify)) qualifies if the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner is fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise meets the requirements of this section.

(3) The claimant must have a combined disposable income, as defined in RCW 84.36.383, of forty thousand dollars or less.

(4) The claimant must have owned, at the time of filing, the residence on which the special assessment and/or real property taxes have been imposed. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by a marital community, owned by domestic partners, or owned by cotenants ((shall be)) is deemed to be owned by each spouse, each domestic partner, or each cotenant. A claimant who has only a share ownership in cooperative housing, a life estate, a lease for life, or a revocable trust does not satisfy the ownership requirement.

(5) The claimant must have and keep in force fire and casualty insurance in sufficient amount to protect the interest of the state in the claimant's equity value((: PROVIDED, That)). However, if the claimant fails to keep fire and casualty insurance in force to the extent of the state's interest in the claimant's equity value, the amount deferred ((shall)) may not exceed one hundred percent of the claimant's equity value in the land or lot only.

(6) In the case of special assessment deferral, the claimant must have opted for payment of such special assessments on the installment method if such method was available.

Sec. 314. RCW 84.39.010 and 2005 c 253 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A person is entitled to a property tax exemption in the form of a grant as provided in this chapter. The person is entitled to assistance for the payment of all or a portion of the amount of excess and regular real property taxes imposed on the person's residence in the year in which a claim is filed in accordance with the following:

(1) The claimant must meet all requirements for an exemption for the residence under RCW 84.36.381, other than the income limits under RCW 84.36.381.

(2)(a) The person making the claim must be:

(i) Sixty-two years of age or older on December 31st of the year in which the claim is filed, or must have been, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful employment by reason of ((physical)) disability; and

(ii) A widow or widower of a veteran who:

(A) Died as a result of a service-connected disability;

(B) Was rated as one hundred percent disabled by the United States veterans' administration for the ten years prior to his or her death;

(C) Was a former prisoner of war as substantiated by the United States veterans' administration and was rated as one hundred percent disabled by the United States veterans' administration for one or more years prior to his or her death; or

(D) Died on active duty or in active training status as a member of the United States uniformed services, reserves, or national guard; and

(b) The person making the claim must not have remarried.

(3) The claimant must have a combined disposable income of forty thousand dollars or less.

(4) The claimant must have owned, at the time of filing, the residence on which the real property taxes have been imposed. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by cotenants ((shall be)) is deemed to be owned by each cotenant. A claimant who has only a share ownership in cooperative housing, a life estate, a lease for life, or a revocable trust does not satisfy the ownership requirement.

(5) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section is entitled to assistance in an amount equal to regular and excess property taxes imposed on the difference between the value of the residence eligible for exemption under RCW 84.36.381(5) and:

(a) The first one hundred thousand dollars of assessed value of the residence for a person who has a combined disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less;

(b) The first seventy-five thousand dollars of assessed value of the residence for a person who has a combined disposable income of thirty-five thousand dollars or less but greater than thirty thousand dollars; or

(c) The first fifty thousand dollars of assessed value of the residence for a person who has a combined disposable income of forty thousand dollars or less but greater than thirty-five thousand dollars.

(6) As used in this section:

(a) "Veteran" has the same meaning as provided under RCW 41.04.005.

(b) The meanings attributed in RCW 84.36.383 to the terms "residence," "combined disposable income," "disposable income," and "disability" apply equally to this section.

Sec. 315. RCW 84.64.060 and 2003 c 23 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person owning a recorded interest in lands or lots upon which judgment is prayed, as provided in this chapter, may in person or by agent pay the taxes, interest and costs due thereon to the county treasurer of the county in which the same are situated, at any time before the day of the sale; and for the amount so paid he or she ((shall)) will have a lien on the property liable for taxes, interest, and costs for which judgment is prayed; and the person or authority who ((shall)) collects or receives the same ((shall)) must give a receipt for such payment, or issue to such person a certificate showing such payment. If paying by agent, the agent ((shall)) must provide notarized documentation of the agency relationship.

(2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, a person need not pay the amount of any outstanding liens for amounts deferred under chapter 84.37 or 84.38 RCW, if such amounts have not become payable under RCW 84.37.080 or 84.38.130.

Sec. 316. RCW 84.64.070 and 2002 c 168 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Real property upon which certificates of delinquency have been issued under the provisions of this chapter, may be redeemed at any time before the close of business the day before the day of the sale, by payment, as prescribed by the county treasurer, to the county treasurer of the proper county, of the amount for which the certificate of delinquency was issued, together with interest at the statutory rate per annum charged on delinquent general real and personal property taxes from date of issuance of the certificate of delinquency until paid.

(2) The person redeeming such property ((shall)) must also pay the amount of all taxes, interest and costs accruing after the issuance of such certificate of delinquency, together with interest at the statutory rate per annum charged on delinquent general real and personal property taxes on such payment from the day the same was made.

(3) No fee ((shall)) may be charged for any redemption.

(4) Tenants in common or joint tenants ((shall)) must be allowed to redeem their individual interest in real property for which certificates of delinquency have been issued under the provisions of this chapter, in the manner and under the terms specified in RCW 84.64.060 for the redemption of real property other than that of persons adjudicated to be legally incompetent or minors for purposes of this section.

(5) If the real property of any minor, or any person adjudicated to be legally incompetent, be sold for nonpayment of taxes, the same may be redeemed at any time within three years after the date of sale upon the terms specified in this section, on the payment of interest at the statutory rate per annum charged on delinquent general real and personal property taxes on the amount for which the same was sold, from and after the date of sale, and in addition the redemptioner ((shall)) must pay the reasonable value of all improvements made in good faith on the property, less the value of the use thereof, which redemption may be made by themselves or by any person in their behalf.

(6) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, a person may redeem real property under this section without the payment of any outstanding liens for amounts deferred under chapter 84.37 or 84.38 RCW, if such amounts have not become payable under RCW 84.37.080 or 84.38.130.

Part IV

Taxability matrix

Sec. 401. RCW 82.32.740 and 2007 c 6 s 701 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department ((shall)) must complete a taxability matrix maintained by the member states of the agreement in downloadable format. The matrix contains terms defined in the agreement and the disclosure of the state's practices in the administration of sales and use taxes as required under section 335 of the agreement. The department ((shall)) must provide notice of changes in the taxability of products or services listed in the matrix. The department must also provide notice of changes in the state's treatment of practices identified in the matrix.

(2)(a) Sellers and certified service providers are relieved from liability to the state and to local jurisdictions for having charged or collected the incorrect amount of sales or use tax if the error resulted from reliance on erroneous information provided by the department in the taxability matrix.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, if the taxability matrix is amended, sellers and certified service providers are relieved from liability to the state and to local jurisdictions to the extent that the seller or certified service provider relied on the immediately preceding version of the state's taxability matrix. Relief under this subsection (2)(b) is available until the first day of the calendar month that is at least thirty days after the department submits notice of a change to the state's taxability matrix to the streamlined sales tax governing board.

--- END ---