BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.88.110 and 1988 c 146 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of patronizing a prostitute if:

(a) Pursuant to a prior understanding, he or she pays a fee to another person as compensation for such person or a third person having engaged in sexual conduct with him or her; or

(b) He or she pays or agrees to pay a fee to another person pursuant to an understanding that in return therefor such person will engage in sexual conduct with him or her; or

(c) He or she solicits or requests another person to engage in sexual conduct with him or her in return for a fee.

(2) For purposes of this section, "sexual conduct" has the meaning given in RCW 9A.88.030.

(3) Patronizing a prostitute is a misdemeanor, except that a third and any subsequent conviction thereafter within five years is a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---