BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.28.006 and 2013 c 23 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter.

(1) "Administrator" means a person designated by an electrical contractor to supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance with the rules adopted under this chapter.

(2) "Basic electrical work" means the work classified in (a) and (b) of this subsection as class A and class B basic electrical work:

(a) "Class A basic electrical work" means:

(i) The like-in-kind replacement of a: Contactor, relay, timer, starter, circuit board, or similar control component; household appliance; circuit breaker; fuse; residential luminaire; lamp; snap switch; dimmer; receptacle outlet; thermostat; heating element; luminaire ballast with an exact same ballast; ten horsepower or smaller motor; or wiring, appliances, devices, or equipment as specified by rule.

(ii) Work limited to installing in a one or two family dwelling no more than one power supply cable six feet or less in length from a listed class two transformer rated no greater than twenty-four volts in connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of one main control panel for a low voltage security, intrusion, or similar alarm system, excluding systems that monitor required fire or smoke detection devices.

(b) "Class B basic electrical work" means work other than class A basic electrical work that requires minimal electrical circuit modifications and has limited exposure hazards. Class B basic electrical work includes the following:

(i) Extension of not more than one branch electrical circuit limited to one hundred twenty volts and twenty amps each where:

(A) No cover inspection is necessary; and

(B) The extension does not supply more than two outlets;

(ii) Like-in-kind replacement of a single luminaire not exceeding two hundred seventy-seven volts and twenty amps;

(iii) Like-in-kind replacement of a motor larger than ten horsepower;

(iv) The following low voltage systems:

(A) Repair and replacement of devices not exceeding one hundred volt-amperes in Class 2, Class 3, or power limited low voltage systems in one and two-family dwellings;

(B) Repair and replacement of the following devices not exceeding one hundred volt-amperes in Class 2, Class 3, or power limited low voltage systems in other buildings, provided the equipment is not for fire alarm or nurse call systems and is not located in an area classified as hazardous by the national electrical code; or

(v) Wiring, appliances, devices, or equipment as specified by rule.

(3) "Board" means the electrical board under RCW 19.28.311.

(4) "Chapter" or "subchapter" means the subchapter, if no chapter number is referenced.

(5) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(6) "Director" means the director of the department or the director's designee.

(7) "Electrical construction trade" includes, but is not limited to, installing or maintaining electrical wires and equipment that are used for light, heat, or power and installing and maintaining remote control, signaling, power limited, or communication circuits or systems.

(8) "Electrical contractor" means a person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity that offers to undertake, undertakes, submits a bid for, or does the work of installing or maintaining wires or equipment that convey electrical current.

(9) "Equipment" means any equipment or apparatus that directly uses, conducts, insulates, or is operated by electricity but does not mean: Plug-in appliances; or plug-in equipment as determined by the department by rule.

(10) "Industrial control panel" means a factory-wired or user-wired assembly of industrial control equipment such as motor controllers, switches, relays, power supplies, computers, cathode ray tubes, transducers, and auxiliary devices. The panel may include disconnect means and motor branch circuit protective devices.

(11) "Journey level electrician" means a person who has been issued a journey level electrician certificate of competency by the department.

(12) "Like-in-kind" means having similar characteristics such as voltage requirements, current draw, and function, and being in the same location.

(13) "Master electrician" means either a master journey level electrician or master specialty electrician.

(14) "Master journey level electrician" means a person who has been issued a master journey level electrician certificate of competency by the department and who may be designated by an electrical contractor to supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter.

(15) "Master specialty electrician" means a person who has been issued a specialty electrician certificate of competency by the department and who may be designated by an electrical contractor to supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter.

(16) "Specialty electrician" means a person who has been issued a specialty electrician certificate of competency by the department.

--- END ---