BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the tax imposed under this chapter, the first one cent of the state portion of the tax for each dollar on which the tax is applied must be dedicated to and used for funding a public system of higher education within the state.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "tax" means any tax imposed on the retail sale of personal property under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the tax imposed under this chapter, the first one cent of the state portion of the tax for each dollar on which the tax is applied must be dedicated to and used for funding a public system of higher education within the state.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "tax" means any tax imposed on the use of personal property under this chapter.

--- END ---