BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.320.240 and 2014 c 217 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The purpose of this section is to identify quality criteria for school library ((media))information and technology programs that support the student learning goals under RCW 28A.150.210, the essential academic learning requirements under RCW 28A.655.070, and high school graduation requirements adopted under RCW 28A.230.090.

(2) Every board of directors shall provide resources and materials for the operation ((and stocking of such libraries))of school library information and technology programs as the board deems necessary for the proper education of the district's students or as otherwise required by law or rule of the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) "Teacher-librarian" means a ((certified))certificated teacher with a library media endorsement under rules adopted by the professional educator standards board.

(4) "School((-))library ((media))information and technology program" means a school-based program that is staffed by a certificated teacher-librarian and provides a ((variety of resources))broad, flexible array of services, resources, and instruction that support student mastery of the essential academic learning requirements and state standards in all subject areas and the implementation of the district's school improvement plan.

(5) The teacher-librarian, through the ((school-library media))school library information and technology program, shall collaborate as an instructional partner to help all students meet the content goals in all subject areas, and assist high school students completing high school and beyond plans required for graduation.

(6) The teacher-librarian's duties may include, but are not limited to, collaborating with his or her schools to:

(a) Integrate information and technology into curriculum and instruction, including but not limited to instructing other certificated staff about using and integrating information and technology literacy into instruction through workshops, modeling lessons, and individual peer coaching;

(b) Provide information management instruction to students and staff about how to effectively use emerging learning technologies for school and lifelong learning, as well as in the appropriate use of computers and mobile devices in an educational setting;

(c) Help teachers and students efficiently and effectively access the highest quality information available while using information ethically;

(d) Instruct students in digital citizenship including how to be critical consumers of information and provide guidance about thoughtful and strategic use of online resources; and

(e) Create a culture of reading in the school community by developing a diverse, student-focused collection of materials that ensures all students can find something of quality to read and by facilitating school-wide reading initiatives along with providing individual support and guidance for students.

--- END ---