BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The Washington academic, innovation, and mentoring program is established.

(2) The purpose of the program is to enable eligible neighborhood youth development entities to provide out-of-school time programs for youth ages six to eighteen years of age that include educational services, mentoring and linkages to positive, prosocial leisure, and recreational activities. The programs must be designed for mentoring and academic enrichment that include at least two of the following three activity areas:

(a) Science, technology, engineering, and math (STEM);

(b) Homework support and high-yield learning opportunities; and

(c) Career exploration.

(3) The goal of the Washington academic, innovation, and mentoring program is to provide the program in communities statewide.

(4) Each entity receiving funds to implement the program must report to the department on the number of youth served, the types of services, and the outcome of those services.

(5) The department shall administer the Washington academic, innovation, and mentoring program. Sixty percent or more of the participants must qualify for free or reduced-priced lunch. No more than four percent of the funding provided for the program may be used for administrative purposes.

(6) As used in this section, "eligible neighborhood youth development entity" means an entity that is exempt from taxation under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501 (c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of the effective date of this section, that is affiliated and in good standing with a national congressionally chartered organization's standards under 36 U.S.C., Subtitle II, Part B, and that:

(a) Is facility-based and provides proven and tested recreational, educational, and character building programs for children ages six to eighteen years of age;

(b) Provides after school and summer programs in a minimum of fifty communities statewide, with youth development services available at least twenty hours weekly during the school year, and for thirty hours weekly during summer programming;

(c) Has adopted standards for care that at a minimum include staff ratios, staff training, health and safety standards, and mechanisms for assessing and enforcing the program's compliance with the standards;

(d) Provides a process to receive and resolve parental complaints; and

(e) Conducts national criminal background checks for all employees and volunteers who work with children.

(7) The activities described in this section are eligible for receipt of state funds provided for the development of school district partnerships with community-based organizations in RCW 28A.165.035.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act may be known and cited as the Washington academic, innovation, and mentoring (AIM) program act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2015, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---