BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.17A.065 and 2010 c 204 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

((By July 1st of each year,)) The commission shall calculate the following performance measures((, provide a copy of the performance measures to the governor and appropriate legislative committees)) at least annually, and make the ((performance measures)) results available to the public on the commission's web site:

(1) The average number of days that elapse between the commission's receipt of reports filed under RCW 42.17A.205, 42.17A.225, 42.17A.235, and 42.17A.255 and the time that the report, a copy of the report, or a copy of the data or information included in the report, is first accessible to the general public (a) in the commission's office, and (b) via the commission's web site;

(2) The average number of days that elapse between the commission's receipt of reports filed under RCW 42.17A.265 and the time that the report, a copy of the report, or a copy of the data or information included in the report, is first accessible to the general public (a) in the commission's office, and (b) via the commission's web site;

(3) The average number of days that elapse between the commission's receipt of reports filed under RCW 42.17A.600, 42.17A.615, 42.17A.625, and 42.17A.630 and the time that the report, a copy of the report, or a copy of the data or information included in the report, is first accessible to the general public (a) in the commission's office, and (b) via the commission's web site;

(4) The percentage of candidates, categorized as statewide, legislative, or local, that have used each of the following methods to file reports under RCW 42.17A.235 or 42.17A.265: (a) Hard copy paper format; or (b) electronic format via the internet;

(5) The percentage of continuing political committees that have used each of the following methods to file reports under RCW 42.17A.225 or 42.17A.265: (a) Hard copy paper format; or (b) electronic format via the internet; and

(6) The percentage of lobbyists and lobbyists' employers that have used each of the following methods to file reports under RCW 42.17A.600, 42.17A.615, 42.17A.625, or 42.17A.630: (a) Hard copy paper format; or (b) electronic format via the internet.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.17A.105 and 2010 c 204 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall:

(1) Develop and provide forms for the reports and statements required to be made under this chapter;

(2) Prepare and publish a manual setting forth recommended uniform methods of bookkeeping and reporting for use by persons required to make reports and statements under this chapter;

(3) Compile and maintain a current list of all filed reports and statements;

(4) Investigate whether properly completed statements and reports have been filed within the times required by this chapter;

(5) Upon complaint or upon its own motion, investigate and report apparent violations of this chapter to the appropriate law enforcement authorities;

(6) ((Conduct a sufficient number of audits and field investigations to provide a statistically valid finding regarding the degree of compliance with the provisions of this chapter by all required filers. Any documents, records, reports, computer files, papers, or materials provided to the commission for use in conducting audits and investigations must be returned to the candidate, campaign, or political committee from which they were received within one week of the commission's completion of an audit or field investigation;

(7))) Prepare and publish ((an annual)) periodic reports to the governor and the legislature as to the effectiveness of this chapter and its enforcement by appropriate law enforcement authorities, which shall include the annual performance measurements required by RCW 42.17A.065;

(((8))) (7) Enforce this chapter according to the powers granted it by law;

(((9) Adopt rules governing the arrangement, handling, indexing, and disclosing of those reports required by this chapter to be filed with a county auditor or county elections official. The rules shall:

(a) Ensure ease of access by the public to the reports; and

(b) Include, but not be limited to, requirements for indexing the reports by the names of candidates or political committees and by the ballot proposition for or against which a political committee is receiving contributions or making expenditures;

(10))) (8) Adopt rules to carry out the policies of chapter 348, Laws of 2006. The adoption of these rules is not subject to the time restrictions of RCW 42.17A.110(1);

(((11))) (9) Adopt administrative rules establishing requirements for filer participation in any system designed and implemented by the commission for the electronic filing of reports; and

(((12))) (10) Maintain and make available to the public and political committees of this state a toll-free telephone number.

Sec. 3. RCW 42.17A.110 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 448 and 2011 c 60 s 20 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The commission may:

(1) Adopt, amend, and rescind suitable administrative rules to carry out the policies and purposes of this chapter, which rules shall be adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. Any rule relating to campaign finance, political advertising, or related forms that would otherwise take effect after June 30th of a general election year shall take effect no earlier than the day following the general election in that year;

(2) Appoint an executive director and set, within the limits established by the office of financial management under RCW 43.03.028, the executive director's compensation. The executive director shall perform such duties and have such powers as the commission may prescribe and delegate to implement and enforce this chapter efficiently and effectively. The commission shall not delegate its authority to adopt, amend, or rescind rules nor may it delegate authority to determine whether an actual violation of this chapter has occurred or to assess penalties for such violations;

(3) Prepare and publish reports and technical studies as in its judgment will tend to promote the purposes of this chapter, including reports and statistics concerning campaign financing, lobbying, financial interests of elected officials, and enforcement of this chapter;

(4) Conduct, as it deems appropriate within available resources, audits and field investigations. Any documents, records, reports, computer files, papers, or materials provided to the commission for use in conducting audits and investigations must be returned to the candidate, campaign, or political committee from which they were received within one week of the commission's completion of an audit or field investigation;

(5) Make public the time and date of any formal hearing set to determine whether a violation has occurred, the question or questions to be considered, and the results thereof;

(6) Administer oaths and affirmations, issue subpoenas, and compel attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any records relevant to any investigation authorized under this chapter, or any other proceeding under this chapter;

(7) Adopt a code of fair campaign practices;

(8) Adopt rules relieving candidates or political committees of obligations to comply with the election campaign provisions of this chapter, if they have not received contributions nor made expenditures in connection with any election campaign of more than five thousand dollars;

(9) Adopt rules prescribing reasonable requirements for keeping accounts of, and reporting on a quarterly basis, costs incurred by state agencies, counties, cities, and other municipalities and political subdivisions in preparing, publishing, and distributing legislative information. For the purposes of this subsection, "legislative information" means books, pamphlets, reports, and other materials prepared, published, or distributed at substantial cost, a substantial purpose of which is to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation. The state auditor in his or her regular examination of each agency under chapter 43.09 RCW shall review the rules, accounts, and reports and make appropriate findings, comments, and recommendations concerning those agencies; and

(10) Develop and provide to filers a system for ((certification of)) certifying, without a signature, reports required under this chapter which are transmitted by facsimile or electronically to the commission. Implementation of the program is contingent on the availability of funds.

Sec. 4. RCW 42.17A.120 and 2010 c 204 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission may suspend or modify any of the reporting requirements of this chapter if it finds that literal application of this chapter works a manifestly unreasonable hardship in a particular case and the suspension or modification will not frustrate the purposes of this chapter. The commission may suspend or modify reporting requirements only after a hearing is held and the suspension or modification receives approval from a majority of the commission. A suspension or modification of the financial affairs reporting requirements contained in RCW 42.17A.710 may be approved for an elected official's term of office, or for up to three years for an executive state officer, where no material change in the applicant's circumstances is anticipated. The commission shall act to suspend or modify any reporting requirements:

(a) Only if it determines that facts exist that are clear and convincing proof of the findings required under this section; and

(b) Only to the extent necessary to substantially relieve the hardship.

(2) A manifestly unreasonable hardship exists if reporting the name of an entity required to be reported under RCW 42.17A.710(1)(g)(ii) would be likely to adversely affect the competitive position of any entity in which the person filing the report, or any member of his or her immediate family, holds any office, directorship, general partnership interest, or an ownership interest of ten percent or more.

(3) Requests for renewals of reporting modifications may be heard in a brief adjudicative proceeding as set forth in RCW 34.05.482 through 34.05.494 and in accordance with the standards established in this section. No initial request may be heard in a brief adjudicative proceeding. No request for renewal may be heard in a brief adjudicative proceeding if the initial request was granted more than three years previously or if the applicant is holding an office or position of employment different from the office or position held when the initial request was granted.

(4) Any citizen has standing to bring an action in Thurston county superior court to contest the propriety of any order entered under this section within one year from the date of the entry of the order.

(5) The commission shall adopt rules governing the proceedings.

Sec. 5. RCW 42.17A.615 and 2010 c 204 s 804 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any lobbyist registered under RCW 42.17A.600 and any person who lobbies shall file with the commission monthly reports of his or her lobbying activities. The reports shall be made in the form and manner prescribed by the commission and must be ((signed)) certified by the lobbyist. The monthly report shall be filed within fifteen days after the last day of the calendar month covered by the report.

(2) The monthly report shall contain:

(a) The totals of all expenditures for lobbying activities made or incurred by the lobbyist or on behalf of the lobbyist by the lobbyist's employer during the period covered by the report. Expenditure totals for lobbying activities shall be segregated according to financial category, including compensation; food and refreshments; living accommodations; advertising; travel; contributions; and other expenses or services. Each individual expenditure of more than twenty-five dollars for entertainment shall be identified by date, place, amount, and the names of all persons taking part in the entertainment, along with the dollar amount attributable to each person, including the lobbyist's portion.

(b) In the case of a lobbyist employed by more than one employer, the proportionate amount of expenditures in each category incurred on behalf of each of the lobbyist's employers.

(c) An itemized listing of each contribution of money or of tangible or intangible personal property, whether contributed by the lobbyist personally or delivered or transmitted by the lobbyist, to any candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition, or for or on behalf of any candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition. All contributions made to, or for the benefit of, any candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition shall be identified by date, amount, and the name of the candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition receiving, or to be benefited by each such contribution.

(d) The subject matter of proposed legislation or other legislative activity or rule making under chapter 34.05 RCW, the state administrative procedure act, and the state agency considering the same, which the lobbyist has been engaged in supporting or opposing during the reporting period, unless exempt under RCW 42.17A.610(2).

(e) A listing of each payment for an item specified in RCW 42.52.150(5) in excess of fifty dollars and each item specified in RCW 42.52.010(((10))) (9) (d) and (f) made to a state elected official, state officer, or state employee. Each item shall be identified by recipient, date, and approximate value of the item.

(f) The total expenditures paid or incurred during the reporting period by the lobbyist for lobbying purposes, whether through or on behalf of a lobbyist or otherwise, for (i) political advertising as defined in RCW 42.17A.005; and (ii) public relations, telemarketing, polling, or similar activities if the activities, directly or indirectly, are intended, designed, or calculated to influence legislation or the adoption or rejection of a rule, standard, or rate by an agency under the administrative procedure act. The report shall specify the amount, the person to whom the amount was paid, and a brief description of the activity.

(3) Lobbyists are not required to report the following:

(a) Unreimbursed personal living and travel expenses not incurred directly for lobbying;

(b) Any expenses incurred for his or her own living accommodations;

(c) Any expenses incurred for his or her own travel to and from hearings of the legislature;

(d) Any expenses incurred for telephone, and any office expenses, including rent and salaries and wages paid for staff and secretarial assistance.

(4) The commission may adopt rules to vary the content of lobbyist reports to address specific circumstances, consistent with this section. Lobbyist reports are subject to audit by the commission.

Sec. 6. RCW 42.17A.645 and 2010 c 204 s 810 are each amended to read as follows:

If any person registered or required to be registered as a lobbyist, or any employer of any person registered or required to be registered as a lobbyist, employs a member or an employee of the legislature, a member of a state board or commission, or a full-time state employee, and that new employee remains in the partial employ of the state, the new employer must file within fifteen days after employment a certified statement with the commission((, signed under oath,)) setting out the nature of the employment, the name of the person employed, and the amount of pay or consideration.

Sec. 7. RCW 42.17A.710 and 2010 c 204 s 903 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The statement of financial affairs required by RCW 42.17A.700 shall disclose the following information for the reporting individual and each member of his or her immediate family:

(a) Occupation, name of employer, and business address;

(b)(i) Each bank account, savings account, and insurance policy in which a direct financial interest was held that exceeds ((twenty)) twenty-four thousand dollars at any time during the reporting period and its highest value during the reporting period; and

(ii) Each other item of intangible personal property in which a direct financial interest was held that exceeds ((two)) five thousand dollars during the reporting period((; the name, address, and nature of the entity; and the nature and highest value of each direct financial interest during the reporting period)). For each reportable interest under this subsection (1)(b)(ii), the disclosure must include the name and nature of the direct financial interest and its value. For purposes of reporting the value of any reportable direct financial interest held on December 31st of the reporting period, the year-end value may be used. When reporting the value of any reportable direct financial interest not held on December 31st of the reporting period, the highest value during the reporting period must be used. Ownership of shares of multiple mutual funds within the same mutual fund family may be disclosed by reporting the mutual fund family name;

(c) The name and address of each creditor to whom the value of two thousand four hundred dollars or more was owed; the original amount of each debt to each creditor; the amount of each debt owed to each creditor as of the date of filing; the terms of repayment of each debt; and the security given, if any, for each such debt. Debts arising from a "retail installment transaction" as defined in chapter 63.14 RCW (retail installment sales act) need not be reported;

(d) Every public or private office, directorship, and position held as trustee;

(e) All persons for whom any legislation, rule, rate, or standard has been prepared, promoted, or opposed for current or deferred compensation. For the purposes of this subsection, "compensation" does not include payments made to the person reporting by the governmental entity for which the person serves as an elected official or state executive officer or professional staff member for his or her service in office; the description of such actual or proposed legislation, rules, rates, or standards; and the amount of current or deferred compensation paid or promised to be paid;

(f) The name and address of each governmental entity, corporation, partnership, joint venture, sole proprietorship, association, union, or other business or commercial entity from whom compensation has been received in any form of a total value of two thousand four hundred dollars or more; the value of the compensation; and the consideration given or performed in exchange for the compensation;

(g) The name of any corporation, partnership, joint venture, association, union, or other entity in which is held any office, directorship, or any general partnership interest, or an ownership interest of ten percent or more; the name or title of that office, directorship, or partnership; the nature of ownership interest; and: (i) With respect to a governmental unit in which the official seeks or holds any office or position, if the entity has received compensation in any form during the preceding twelve months from the governmental unit, the value of the compensation and the consideration given or performed in exchange for the compensation; and (ii) the name of each governmental unit, corporation, partnership, joint venture, sole proprietorship, association, union, or other business or commercial entity from which the entity has received compensation in any form in the amount of ((ten)) twelve thousand dollars or more during the preceding twelve months and the consideration given or performed in exchange for the compensation. As used in (g)(ii) of this subsection, "compensation" does not include payment for water and other utility services at rates approved by the Washington state utilities and transportation commission or the legislative authority of the public entity providing the service. With respect to any bank or commercial lending institution in which is held any office, directorship, partnership interest, or ownership interest, it shall only be necessary to report either the name, address, and occupation of every director and officer of the bank or commercial lending institution and the average monthly balance of each account held during the preceding twelve months by the bank or commercial lending institution from the governmental entity for which the individual is an official or candidate or professional staff member, or all interest paid by a borrower on loans from and all interest paid to a depositor by the bank or commercial lending institution if the interest exceeds two thousand ((four)) nine hundred dollars;

(h) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds ((ten)) twelve thousand dollars in which any direct financial interest was acquired during the preceding calendar year, and a statement of the amount and nature of the financial interest and of the consideration given in exchange for that interest;

(i) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds ((ten)) twelve thousand dollars in which any direct financial interest was divested during the preceding calendar year, and a statement of the amount and nature of the consideration received in exchange for that interest, and the name and address of the person furnishing the consideration;

(j) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds ((ten)) twelve thousand dollars in which a direct financial interest was held. If a description of the property has been included in a report previously filed, the property may be listed, for purposes of this subsection (1)(j), by reference to the previously filed report;

(k) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds ((twenty)) twenty-four thousand dollars, in which a corporation, partnership, firm, enterprise, or other entity had a direct financial interest, in which corporation, partnership, firm, or enterprise a ten percent or greater ownership interest was held;

(l) A list of each occasion, specifying date, donor, and amount, at which food and beverage in excess of fifty dollars was accepted under RCW 42.52.150(5);

(m) A list of each occasion, specifying date, donor, and amount, at which items specified in RCW 42.52.010(((10))) (9) (d) and (f) were accepted; and

(n) Such other information as the commission may deem necessary in order to properly carry out the purposes and policies of this chapter, as the commission shall prescribe by rule.

(2)(a) Where an amount is required to be reported under subsection (1)(a) through (m) of this section, it ((shall be sufficient to comply with the requirement to report whether the amount is less than four thousand dollars, at least four thousand dollars but less than twenty thousand dollars, at least twenty thousand dollars but less than forty thousand dollars, at least forty thousand dollars but less than one hundred thousand dollars, or one hundred thousand dollars or more)) may be reported as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b)

Code A

Less than $30,000

Code B

At least $30,000 but less than $60,000

Code C

At least $60,000 but less than $100,000

Code D

At least $100,000 but less than $200,000

Code E

At least $200,000 but less than $500,000

Code F

At least $500,000 but less than $750,000

Code G

At least $750,000 but less than $1,000,000

Code H

$1,000,000 or more

(c) An amount of stock may be reported by number of shares instead of by market value.

(d) No provision of this subsection (2) may be interpreted to prevent any person from filing more information or more detailed information than required.

(3) Items of value given to an official's or employee's spouse, domestic partner, or family member are attributable to the official or employee, except the item is not attributable if an independent business, family, or social relationship exists between the donor and the spouse, domestic partner, or family member.

Sec. 8. RCW 42.17A.420 and 2010 c 204 s 604 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is a violation of this chapter for any person to make, or for any candidate or political committee to accept from any one person, contributions reportable under RCW 42.17A.240 in the aggregate exceeding fifty thousand dollars for any campaign for statewide office or exceeding five thousand dollars for any other ((campaign)) office subject to the provisions of this chapter within twenty-one days of a general election. This subsection does not apply to contributions made by, or accepted from, a bona fide political party as defined in this chapter, excluding the county central committee or legislative district committee.

(2) Contributions governed by this section include, but are not limited to, contributions made or received indirectly through a third party or entity whether the contributions are or are not reported to the commission as earmarked contributions under RCW 42.17A.270.

--- END ---