BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AGENCY

Sec. 101. RCW 43.41A.003 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 701 are each amended to read as follows:

Information technology is a tool used by state agencies to improve their ability to deliver public services efficiently and effectively. Advances in information technology ((-)), including advances in hardware, software, and business processes for implementing and managing these resources ((-)), offer new opportunities to improve the level of support provided to citizens and state agencies and to reduce the per-transaction cost of these services. These advances are one component in the process of reengineering how government delivers services to citizens.

To fully realize the service improvements and cost efficiency from the effective application of information technology to its business processes, state government must establish decision-making structures that connect business processes and information technology in an operating model. Many of these business practices transcend individual agency processes and should be worked at the enterprise level. To do this requires an effective partnership of executive management, business processes owners, and providers of support functions necessary to efficiently and effectively deliver services to citizens.

To maximize the potential for information technology to contribute to government business process reengineering, the state must establish clear central authority to plan, set enterprise policies and standards, and provide project oversight and management analysis of the various aspects of a business process.

Establishing ((the office of)) a state chief information officer ((and partnering it with the director of financial management)) as the director of the consolidated technology services agency will provide state government with the cohesive structure necessary to develop improved operating models with agency directors and reengineer business process to enhance service delivery while capturing savings.

To achieve maximum benefit from advances in information technology, the state establishes a centralized provider and procurer of certain information technology services as an agency to support the needs of public agencies. This agency shall be known as the consolidated technology services agency. To ensure maximum benefit to the state, state agencies shall rely on the consolidated technology services agency for those services with a business case of broad use, uniformity, scalability, and price sensitivity to aggregation and volume.

To successfully meet public agency needs and meet its obligation as the primary service provider for these services, the consolidated technology services agency must offer high quality services at the best value. It must be able to attract an adaptable and competitive workforce, be authorized to procure services where the business case justifies it, and be accountable to its customers for the efficient and effective delivery of critical business services.

The consolidated technology services agency is established with clear accountability to the agencies it serves and to the public. This accountability will come through enhanced transparency in the agency's operation and performance. The agency is also established with broad flexibility to adapt its operations and service catalog to address the needs of customer agencies, and to do so in the most cost-effective ways.

Sec. 102. RCW 43.105.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 802 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agency" means the consolidated technology services agency.

(2) "Board" means the technology services board.

(3) "Customer agencies" means all entities that purchase or use information technology resources, telecommunications, or services from the consolidated technology services agency.

(((3))) (4) "Director" means the state chief information officer, who is the director of the consolidated technology services agency.

(((4))) (5) "Equipment" means the machines, devices, and transmission facilities used in information processing, including but not limited to computers, terminals, telephones, wireless communications system facilities, cables, and any physical facility necessary for the operation of such equipment.

(((5))) (6) "Enterprise architecture" means an ongoing ((program)) activity for translating business vision and strategy into effective enterprise change. It is a continuous activity. Enterprise architecture creates, communicates, and improves the key principles and models that describe the enterprise's future state and enable its evolution.

(((6))) (7) "Information" includes, but is not limited to, data, text, voice, and video.

(8) "Information technology" includes, but is not limited to, all electronic technology systems and services, automated information handling, system design and analysis, conversion of data, computer programming, information storage and retrieval, telecommunications, requisite system controls, simulation, electronic commerce, radio technologies, and all related interactions between people and machines.

(((7))) (9) "Information technology portfolio" or "portfolio" means a strategic management process documenting relationships between agency missions and information technology and telecommunications investments.

(((8))) (10) "K-20 network" means the network established in RCW 43.41A.085 (as recodified by this act).

(11) "Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi-municipal corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of such corporations and subdivisions authorized to contract separately.

(((9))) (12) "Office" means the office of the state chief information officer within the consolidated technology services agency.

(13) "Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk analysis and management designed to ensure optimum use of information technology resources and telecommunications.

(((10))) (14) "Proprietary software" means that software offered for sale or license.

(((11))) (15) "Public agency" means any agency of this state or another state; any political subdivision or unit of local government of this state or another state including, but not limited to, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations, special purpose districts, and local service districts; any public benefit nonprofit corporation; any agency of the United States; and any Indian tribe recognized as such by the federal government.

(16) "Public benefit nonprofit corporation" means a public benefit nonprofit corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.005 that is receiving local, state, or federal funds either directly or through a public agency other than an Indian tribe or political subdivision of another state.

(17) "Public record" has the definitions in RCW 42.56.010 and chapter 40.14 RCW and includes legislative records and court records that are available for public inspection.

(18) "State agency" means every state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency, including offices headed by a statewide elected official.

(19) "Telecommunications" includes, but is not limited to, wireless or wired systems for transport of voice, video, and data communications, network systems, requisite facilities, equipment, system controls, simulation, electronic commerce, and all related interactions between people and machines. (("Telecommunications" does not include public safety communications.))

(20) "Utility-based infrastructure services" includes personal computer and portable device support, servers and server administration, security administration, network administration, telephony, email, and other information technology services commonly used by state agencies.

Sec. 103. RCW 43.105.047 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 803 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created the consolidated technology services agency, an agency of state government. The agency shall be headed by a director, who is the state chief information officer. The director shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate. The director shall serve at the governor's pleasure and shall receive such salary as determined by the governor. If a vacancy occurs in the position while the senate is not in session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting of the senate at which time he or she shall present to that body his or her nomination for the position.

(2) The director shall:

(((1))) (a) Appoint a confidential secretary and such deputy and assistant directors as needed to administer the agency; and

(((2))) (b) Appoint such professional, technical, and clerical assistants and employees as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed by this chapter in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided by law.

(3) The director may create such administrative structures as he or she deems appropriate and may delegate any power or duty vested in him or her by this chapter or other law.

(4) The director shall exercise all the powers and perform all the duties prescribed by law with respect to the administration of this chapter including:

(a) Reporting to the governor any matters relating to abuses and evasions of this chapter;

(b) Accepting and expending gifts and grants that are related to the purposes of this chapter;

(c) Applying for grants from public and private entities, and receiving and administering any grant funding received for the purpose and intent of this chapter; and

(d) Performing other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

Sec. 104. RCW 43.105.052 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 804 are each amended to read as follows:

The agency shall:

(1) Make available information services to public agencies and public benefit nonprofit corporations((. For the purposes of this section "public agency" means any agency of this state or another state; any political subdivision, or unit of local government of this state or another state including, but not limited to, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations, special purpose districts, and local service districts; any agency of the United States; and any Indian tribe recognized as such by the federal government and "public benefit nonprofit corporation" means a public benefit nonprofit corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.005 that is receiving local, state, or federal funds either directly or through a public agency other than an Indian tribe or political subdivision of another state));

(2) Establish rates and fees for services provided by the agency((. A billing rate plan shall be developed for a two-year period to coincide with the budgeting process. The rate plan shall be subject to review at least annually by the office of financial management. The rate plan shall show the proposed rates by each cost center and will show the components of the rate structure as mutually determined by the agency and the office of financial management. The rate plan and any adjustments to rates shall be approved by the office of financial management));

(3) ((With the advice of the board and customer agencies, develop a state strategic information technology plan and performance reports as required under RCW 43.41A.030;

(4))) Develop a billing rate plan for a two-year period to coincide with the budgeting process. The rate plan must be subject to review at least annually by the office of financial management. The rate plan must show the proposed rates by each cost center and show the components of the rate structure as mutually determined by the agency and the office of financial management. The rate plan and any adjustments to rates must be approved by the office of financial management;

(4) Develop a detailed business plan for any service or activity to be contracted under RCW 41.06.142(7)(b);

(5) Develop plans for the agency's achievement of statewide goals and objectives set forth in the state strategic information technology plan required under RCW 43.41A.030 (as recodified by this act);

(6) Enable the standardization and consolidation of information technology infrastructure across all state agencies to support enterprise-based system development and improve and maintain service delivery; and

(((5))) (7) Perform all other matters and things necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 105. RCW 43.105.111 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 806 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall set performance targets and approve plans for achieving measurable and specific goals for the agency. By January ((2012)) 2017, the appropriate organizational performance and accountability measures and performance targets shall be submitted to the governor. These measures and targets shall include measures of performance demonstrating specific and measurable improvements related to service delivery and costs, operational efficiencies, and overall customer satisfaction. The agency shall develop a dashboard of key performance measures that will be updated quarterly and made available on the agency public web site.

The director shall report to the governor on agency performance at least quarterly. The reports shall be included on the agency's web site and accessible to the public.

Sec. 106. RCW 43.105.825 and 2012 c 229 s 588 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In overseeing the technical aspects of the K-20 network, the ((information services)) board is not intended to duplicate the statutory responsibilities of the student achievement council, the superintendent of public instruction, the ((information services)) board, the state librarian, or the governing boards of the institutions of higher education.

(2) The board may not interfere in any curriculum or legally offered programming offered over the network.

(3) The responsibility to review and approve standards and common specifications for the network remains the responsibility of the ((information services)) board ((under RCW 43.105.041)).

(4) The coordination of telecommunications planning for the common schools remains the responsibility of the superintendent of public instruction. ((Except as set forth in RCW 43.105.041(1)(d),)) The board may recommend, but not require, revisions to the superintendent's telecommunications plans.

Sec. 107. RCW 41.07.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 441 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department of enterprise services)) consolidated technology services agency is authorized to administer, maintain, and operate the central personnel-payroll system and to provide its services for any state agency designated jointly by the ((director of the department of enterprise services)) consolidated technology services agency and the director of financial management.

((The system shall be operated through state data processing centers.)) State agencies shall convert personnel and payroll processing to the central personnel-payroll system as soon as administratively and technically feasible as determined by the office of financial management and the ((department of enterprise services)) consolidated technology services agency. It is the intent of the legislature to provide, through the central personnel-payroll system, for uniform reporting to the office of financial management and to the legislature regarding salaries and related costs, and to reduce present costs of manual procedures in personnel and payroll recordkeeping and reporting.

Sec. 108. RCW 43.41A.025 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 33 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((chief information officer)) director shall establish standards and policies to govern information technology in the state of Washington.

(2) The office shall have the following powers and duties related to information services:

(a) To develop statewide standards and policies governing the:

(i) Acquisition ((and disposition)) of equipment, software, and ((personal and purchased)) technology-related services((,));

(ii) Disposition of equipment;

(iii) Licensing of the radio spectrum by or on behalf of state agencies((,)); and

(iv) Confidentiality of computerized data;

(b) To develop statewide ((or)) and interagency technical policies, standards, and procedures;

(c) To review and approve standards and common specifications for new or expanded telecommunications networks proposed by agencies, public postsecondary education institutions, educational service districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 information technology services;

(d) ((To develop a detailed business plan for any service or activity to be contracted under RCW 41.06.142(7)(b) by the consolidated technology services agency;

(e) To)) With input from the legislature and the judiciary, provide direction concerning strategic planning goals and objectives for the state((. The office shall seek input from the legislature and the judiciary));

(((f))) (e) To establish policies for the periodic review by the ((office)) director of state agency performance which may include but are not limited to analysis of:

(i) Planning, management, control, and use of information services;

(ii) Training and education; ((and))

(iii) Project management; and

(iv) Cybersecurity;

(((g))) (f) To coordinate with state agencies with an annual information technology expenditure that exceeds ten million dollars to implement a technology business management program to identify opportunities for savings and efficiencies in information technology expenditures and to monitor ongoing financial performance of technology investments; and

(((h))) (g) In conjunction with the consolidated technology services agency, to develop statewide standards for agency purchases of technology networking equipment and services.

(3) Statewide technical standards to promote and facilitate electronic information sharing and access are an essential component of acceptable and reliable public access service and complement content-related standards designed to meet those goals. The office shall:

(a) Establish technical standards to facilitate electronic access to government information and interoperability of information systems, including wireless communications systems; and

(b) Require agencies to include an evaluation of electronic public access needs when planning new information systems or major upgrades of systems.

In developing these standards, the office is encouraged to include the state library, state archives, and appropriate representatives of state and local government.

(((4) The office shall perform other matters and things necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.))

Sec. 109. RCW 43.88.160 and 2012 c 230 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This section sets forth the major fiscal duties and responsibilities of officers and agencies of the executive branch. The regulations issued by the governor pursuant to this chapter shall provide for a comprehensive, orderly basis for fiscal management and control, including efficient accounting and reporting therefor, for the executive branch of the state government and may include, in addition, such requirements as will generally promote more efficient public management in the state.

(1) Governor; director of financial management. The governor, through the director of financial management, shall devise and supervise a modern and complete accounting system for each agency to the end that all revenues, expenditures, receipts, disbursements, resources, and obligations of the state shall be properly and systematically accounted for. The accounting system shall include the development of accurate, timely records and reports of all financial affairs of the state. The system shall also provide for central accounts in the office of financial management at the level of detail deemed necessary by the director to perform central financial management. The director of financial management shall adopt and periodically update an accounting procedures manual. Any agency maintaining its own accounting and reporting system shall comply with the updated accounting procedures manual and the rules of the director adopted under this chapter. An agency may receive a waiver from complying with this requirement if the waiver is approved by the director. Waivers expire at the end of the fiscal biennium for which they are granted. The director shall forward notice of waivers granted to the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The director of financial management may require such financial, statistical, and other reports as the director deems necessary from all agencies covering any period.

(2) Except as provided in chapter 43.88C RCW, the director of financial management is responsible for quarterly reporting of primary operating budget drivers such as applicable workloads, caseload estimates, and appropriate unit cost data. These reports shall be transmitted to the legislative fiscal committees or by electronic means to the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee. Quarterly reports shall include actual monthly data and the variance between actual and estimated data to date. The reports shall also include estimates of these items for the remainder of the budget period.

(3) The director of financial management shall report at least annually to the appropriate legislative committees regarding the status of all appropriated capital projects, including transportation projects, showing significant cost overruns or underruns. If funds are shifted from one project to another, the office of financial management shall also reflect this in the annual variance report. Once a project is complete, the report shall provide a final summary showing estimated start and completion dates of each project phase compared to actual dates, estimated costs of each project phase compared to actual costs, and whether or not there are any outstanding liabilities or unsettled claims at the time of completion.

(4) In addition, the director of financial management, as agent of the governor, shall:

(a) Develop and maintain a system of internal controls and internal audits comprising methods and procedures to be adopted by each agency that will safeguard its assets, check the accuracy and reliability of its accounting data, promote operational efficiency, and encourage adherence to prescribed managerial policies for accounting and financial controls. The system developed by the director shall include criteria for determining the scope and comprehensiveness of internal controls required by classes of agencies, depending on the level of resources at risk.

Each agency head or authorized designee shall be assigned the responsibility and authority for establishing and maintaining internal audits following the standards of internal auditing of the institute of internal auditors;

(b) Make surveys and analyses of agencies with the object of determining better methods and increased effectiveness in the use of manpower and materials; and the director shall authorize expenditures for employee training to the end that the state may benefit from training facilities made available to state employees;

(c) Establish policies for allowing the contracting of child care services;

(d) Report to the governor with regard to duplication of effort or lack of coordination among agencies;

(e) Review any pay and classification plans, and changes thereunder, developed by any agency for their fiscal impact: PROVIDED, That none of the provisions of this subsection shall affect merit systems of personnel management now existing or hereafter established by statute relating to the fixing of qualifications requirements for recruitment, appointment, or promotion of employees of any agency. The director shall advise and confer with agencies including appropriate standing committees of the legislature as may be designated by the speaker of the house and the president of the senate regarding the fiscal impact of such plans and may amend or alter the plans, except that for the following agencies no amendment or alteration of the plans may be made without the approval of the agency concerned: Agencies headed by elective officials;

(f) Fix the number and classes of positions or authorized employee years of employment for each agency and during the fiscal period amend the determinations previously fixed by the director except that the director shall not be empowered to fix the number or the classes for the following: Agencies headed by elective officials;

(g) Adopt rules to effectuate provisions contained in (a) through (f) of this subsection.

(5) The treasurer shall:

(a) Receive, keep, and disburse all public funds of the state not expressly required by law to be received, kept, and disbursed by some other persons: PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not apply to those public funds of the institutions of higher learning which are not subject to appropriation;

(b) Receive, disburse, or transfer public funds under the treasurer's supervision or custody;

(c) Keep a correct and current account of all moneys received and disbursed by the treasurer, classified by fund or account;

(d) Coordinate agencies' acceptance and use of credit cards and other payment methods, if the agencies have received authorization under RCW 43.41.180;

(e) Perform such other duties as may be required by law or by regulations issued pursuant to this law.

It shall be unlawful for the treasurer to disburse public funds in the treasury except upon forms or by alternative means duly prescribed by the director of financial management. These forms or alternative means shall provide for authentication and certification by the agency head or the agency head's designee that the services have been rendered or the materials have been furnished; or, in the case of loans or grants, that the loans or grants are authorized by law; or, in the case of payments for periodic maintenance services to be performed on state owned equipment, that a written contract for such periodic maintenance services is currently in effect; and the treasurer shall not be liable under the treasurer's surety bond for erroneous or improper payments so made. When services are lawfully paid for in advance of full performance by any private individual or business entity other than equipment maintenance providers or as provided for by RCW 42.24.035, such individual or entity other than central stores rendering such services shall make a cash deposit or furnish surety bond coverage to the state as shall be fixed in an amount by law, or if not fixed by law, then in such amounts as shall be fixed by the director of the department of enterprise services but in no case shall such required cash deposit or surety bond be less than an amount which will fully indemnify the state against any and all losses on account of breach of promise to fully perform such services. No payments shall be made in advance for any equipment maintenance services to be performed more than twelve months after such payment except that institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and the consolidated technology services agency created in RCW 43.105.006 may make payments in advance for equipment maintenance services to be performed up to sixty months after such payment. Any such bond so furnished shall be conditioned that the person, firm or corporation receiving the advance payment will apply it toward performance of the contract. The responsibility for recovery of erroneous or improper payments made under this section shall lie with the agency head or the agency head's designee in accordance with rules issued pursuant to this chapter. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit a public body to advance funds to a private service provider pursuant to a grant or loan before services have been rendered or material furnished.

(6) The state auditor shall:

(a) Report to the legislature the results of current post audits that have been made of the financial transactions of each agency; to this end the auditor may, in the auditor's discretion, examine the books and accounts of any agency, official, or employee charged with the receipt, custody, or safekeeping of public funds. Where feasible in conducting examinations, the auditor shall utilize data and findings from the internal control system prescribed by the office of financial management. The current post audit of each agency may include a section on recommendations to the legislature as provided in (c) of this subsection.

(b) Give information to the legislature, whenever required, upon any subject relating to the financial affairs of the state.

(c) Make the auditor's official report on or before the thirty-first of December which precedes the meeting of the legislature. The report shall be for the last complete fiscal period and shall include determinations as to whether agencies, in making expenditures, complied with the laws of this state. The state auditor is authorized to perform or participate in performance verifications and performance audits as expressly authorized by the legislature in the omnibus biennial appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan approved by the joint legislative audit and review committee. The state auditor, upon completing an audit for legal and financial compliance under chapter 43.09 RCW or a performance verification, may report to the joint legislative audit and review committee or other appropriate committees of the legislature, in a manner prescribed by the joint legislative audit and review committee, on facts relating to the management or performance of governmental programs where such facts are discovered incidental to the legal and financial audit or performance verification. The auditor may make such a report to a legislative committee only if the auditor has determined that the agency has been given an opportunity and has failed to resolve the management or performance issues raised by the auditor. If the auditor makes a report to a legislative committee, the agency may submit to the committee a response to the report. This subsection (6) shall not be construed to authorize the auditor to allocate other than de minimis resources to performance audits except as expressly authorized in the appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan. The results of a performance audit conducted by the state auditor that has been requested by the joint legislative audit and review committee must only be transmitted to the joint legislative audit and review committee.

(d) Be empowered to take exception to specific expenditures that have been incurred by any agency or to take exception to other practices related in any way to the agency's financial transactions and to cause such exceptions to be made a matter of public record, including disclosure to the agency concerned and to the director of financial management. It shall be the duty of the director of financial management to cause corrective action to be taken within six months, such action to include, as appropriate, the withholding of funds as provided in RCW 43.88.110. The director of financial management shall annually report by December 31st the status of audit resolution to the appropriate committees of the legislature, the state auditor, and the attorney general. The director of financial management shall include in the audit resolution report actions taken as a result of an audit including, but not limited to, types of personnel actions, costs and types of litigation, and value of recouped goods or services.

(e) Promptly report any irregularities to the attorney general.

(f) Investigate improper governmental activity under chapter 42.40 RCW.

In addition to the authority given to the state auditor in this subsection (6), the state auditor is authorized to conduct performance audits identified in RCW 43.09.470. Nothing in this subsection (6) shall limit, impede, or restrict the state auditor from conducting performance audits identified in RCW 43.09.470.

(7) The joint legislative audit and review committee may:

(a) Make post audits of the financial transactions of any agency and management surveys and program reviews as provided for in chapter 44.28 RCW as well as performance audits and program evaluations. To this end the joint committee may in its discretion examine the books, accounts, and other records of any agency, official, or employee.

(b) Give information to the legislature or any legislative committee whenever required upon any subject relating to the performance and management of state agencies.

(c) Make a report to the legislature which shall include at least the following:

(i) Determinations as to the extent to which agencies in making expenditures have complied with the will of the legislature and in this connection, may take exception to specific expenditures or financial practices of any agencies; and

(ii) Such plans as it deems expedient for the support of the state's credit, for lessening expenditures, for promoting frugality and economy in agency affairs, and generally for an improved level of fiscal management.

PART II

OFFICE OF THE STATE CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER

Sec. 201. RCW 43.41A.010 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 33 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of the state chief information officer is created within the ((office of financial management)) consolidated technology services agency.

(2) ((Powers, duties, and functions assigned to the department of information services as specified in this chapter shall be transferred to the office of chief information officer as provided in this chapter.

(3))) The primary duties of the office are:

(a) To prepare and lead the implementation of a strategic direction and enterprise architecture for information technology for state government;

(b) ((To enable the standardization and consolidation of information technology infrastructure across all state agencies to support enterprise-based system development and improve and maintain service delivery;

(c))) To establish standards and policies for the consistent and efficient operation of information technology services throughout state government;

(((d))) (c) To establish statewide enterprise architecture that will serve as the organizing standard for information technology for state agencies;

(((e))) (d) To educate and inform state managers and policymakers on technological developments, industry trends and best practices, industry benchmarks that strengthen decision making and professional development, and industry understanding for public managers and decision makers; and

(e) To perform all other matters and things necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

(((4))) (3) In the case of institutions of higher education, the powers of the office and the provisions of this chapter apply to business and administrative applications but do not apply to (a) academic and research applications; and (b) medical, clinical, and health care applications, including the business and administrative applications for such operations. However, institutions of higher education must disclose to the office any proposed academic applications that are enterprise-wide in nature relative to the needs and interests of other institutions of higher education. Institutions of higher education shall provide to the ((chief information officer)) director sufficient data and information on proposed expenditures on business and administrative applications to permit the ((chief information officer)) director to evaluate the proposed expenditures pursuant to RCW 43.88.092(3).

(((5))) (4) The legislature and the judiciary, which are constitutionally recognized as separate branches of government, are strongly encouraged to coordinate with the office and participate in shared services initiatives and the development of enterprise-based strategies, where appropriate. Legislative and judicial agencies of the state shall submit to the ((chief information officer)) director information on proposed information technology expenditures to allow the ((chief information officer)) director to evaluate the proposed expenditures on an advisory basis.

Sec. 202. RCW 43.41A.027 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 33 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office shall establish security standards and policies to ensure the confidentiality, availability, and integrity of the information transacted, stored, or processed in the state's information technology systems and infrastructure. The director shall appoint a state chief information security officer. Each state agency, institution of higher education, the legislature, and the judiciary must develop an information technology security ((plan and)) program.

(((1))) (2) Each state agency information technology security ((plan and)) program must adhere to the office's security standards and policies. Each state agency must review and update its ((plan and)) program annually and certify to the office that its ((plan and)) program is in compliance with the office's security standards and policies. The office ((may)) shall require ((an)) a state agency to obtain an independent compliance audit of its information technology security ((plan and)) program and controls at least once every three years to determine whether the state agency's information technology security program is in compliance with the standards and policies established by the agency and that security controls identified by the state agency in its security program are operating efficiently.

(((2))) (3) In the case of institutions of higher education, the judiciary, and the legislature, each information technology security ((plan and)) program must be comparable to the intended outcomes of the office's security standards and policies. ((Each institution, the legislature, and the judiciary shall submit their information technology security plan and program to the office annually for review and comment.))

Sec. 203. RCW 43.41A.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 707 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office shall prepare a state strategic information technology plan which shall establish a statewide mission, goals, and objectives for the use of information technology, including goals for electronic access to government records, information, and services. The plan shall be developed in accordance with the standards and policies established by the office. The office shall seek the advice of the board in the development of this plan.

The plan shall be updated as necessary and submitted to the governor and the legislature.

(2) The office shall prepare a biennial state performance report on information technology based on state agency performance reports required under RCW 43.41A.045 (as recodified by this act) and other information deemed appropriate by the office. The report shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) An analysis, based upon agency portfolios, of the state's information technology infrastructure, including its value, condition, and capacity;

(b) An evaluation of performance relating to information technology;

(c) An assessment of progress made toward implementing the state strategic information technology plan, including progress toward electronic access to public information and enabling citizens to have two-way access to public records, information, and services; and

(d) An analysis of the success or failure, feasibility, progress, costs, and timeliness of implementation of major information technology projects under RCW 43.41A.055 (as recodified by this act). At a minimum, the portion of the report regarding major technology projects must include:

(i) The total cost data for the entire life-cycle of the project, including capital and operational costs, broken down by staffing costs, contracted service, hardware purchase or lease, software purchase or lease, travel, and training. The original budget must also be shown for comparison;

(ii) The original proposed project schedule and the final actual project schedule;

(iii) Data regarding progress towards meeting the original goals and performance measures of the project;

(iv) Discussion of lessons learned on the project, performance of any contractors used, and reasons for project delays or cost increases; and

(v) Identification of benefits generated by major information technology projects developed under RCW 43.41A.055 (as recodified by this act).

Copies of the report shall be distributed biennially to the governor and the legislature. The major technology section of the report must examine major information technology projects completed in the previous biennium.

Sec. 204. RCW 43.41A.035 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

Management of information technology across state government requires managing resources and business processes across multiple agencies. It is no longer sufficient to pursue efficiencies within agency or individual business process boundaries. The state must manage the business process changes and information technology in support of business processes as a statewide portfolio. The ((chief information officer)) director will use agency information technology portfolio planning as input to develop a statewide portfolio to guide resource allocation and prioritization decisions.

Sec. 205. RCW 43.41A.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 709 are each amended to read as follows:

((An)) A state agency information technology portfolio shall serve as the basis for making information technology decisions and plans which may include, but are not limited to:

(1) System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;

(2) Setting goals and objectives for using information technology;

(3) Assessments of information processing performance, resources, and capabilities;

(4) Ensuring the appropriate transfer of technological expertise for the operation of new systems developed using external resources;

(5) Guiding new investment demand, prioritization, selection, performance, and asset value of technology and telecommunications; and

(6) Progress toward providing electronic access to public information.

Sec. 206. RCW 43.41A.045 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 710 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each state agency shall develop an information technology portfolio consistent with RCW 43.41A.110 (as recodified by this act). The superintendent of public instruction shall develop its portfolio in conjunction with educational service districts and statewide or regional providers of K-12 education information technology services.

(2) ((Agency portfolios shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) A baseline assessment of the agency's information technology resources and capabilities that will serve as the benchmark for subsequent planning and performance measures;

(b) A statement of the agency's mission, goals, and objectives for information technology, including goals and objectives for achieving electronic access to agency records, information, and services;

(c) An explanation of how the agency's mission, goals, and objectives for information technology support and conform to the state strategic information technology plan developed under RCW 43.41A.030;

(d) An implementation strategy to provide electronic access to public records and information. This implementation strategy must be assembled to include:

(i) Compliance with Title 40 RCW;

(ii) Adequate public notice and opportunity for comment;

(iii) Consideration of a variety of electronic technologies, including those that help transcend geographic locations, standard business hours, economic conditions of users, and disabilities;

(iv) Methods to educate both state employees and the public in the effective use of access technologies;

(e) Projects and resources required to meet the objectives of the portfolio; and

(f) Where feasible, estimated schedules and funding required to implement identified projects.

(3) Portfolios developed under subsection (1) of this section shall be submitted to the office for review and approval. The chief information officer may reject, require modification to, or approve portfolios as deemed appropriate. Portfolios submitted under this subsection shall be updated and submitted for review and approval as necessary.

(4) Each agency shall prepare and submit to the office a biennial performance report that evaluates progress toward the objectives articulated in its information technology portfolio and the strategic priorities of the state. The superintendent of public instruction shall develop its portfolio in conjunction with educational service districts and statewide or regional providers of K-12 education information technology services. The report shall include:

(a) An evaluation of the agency's performance relating to information technology;

(b) An assessment of progress made toward implementing the agency information technology portfolio;

(c) Progress toward electronic access to public information and enabling citizens to have two-way interaction for obtaining information and services from agencies; and

(d) An inventory of agency information services, equipment, and proprietary software.

(5) The office shall establish standards, elements, form, and format for plans and reports developed under this section.

(6) Agency activities to increase electronic access to public records and information, as required by this section, must be implemented within available resources and existing agency planning processes.

(7))) The ((office)) director may exempt any state agency from any or all of the requirements of this section.

Sec. 207. RCW 43.41A.050 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 711 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Pursuant to RCW 43.88.092(3), at the request of the director of financial management, the office shall evaluate both state agency information technology current spending and technology budget requests, including those proposed by the superintendent of public instruction, in conjunction with educational service districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 education information technology services. The office shall submit recommendations for funding all or part of such requests to the director of financial management. The office shall also submit recommendations regarding consolidation and coordination of similar proposals or other efficiencies it finds in reviewing proposals.

(2) The office shall establish criteria, consistent with portfolio-based information technology management, for the evaluation of agency budget requests under this section. Technology budget requests shall be evaluated in the context of the state's information technology portfolio; technology initiatives underlying budget requests are subject to review by the office. Criteria shall include, but not be limited to: Feasibility of the proposed projects, consistency with the state strategic information technology plan and the state enterprise architecture, consistency with information technology portfolios, appropriate provision for public electronic access to information, evidence of business process streamlining and gathering of business and technical requirements, services, duration of investment, costs, and benefits.

Sec. 208. RCW 43.41A.055 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 712 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office shall establish standards and policies governing the planning, implementation, and evaluation of major information technology projects, including those proposed by the superintendent of public instruction, in conjunction with educational service districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 education information technology services. The standards and policies shall:

(a) Establish criteria to identify projects which are subject to this section. Such criteria shall include, but not be limited to, significant anticipated cost, complexity, or statewide significance of the project; and

(b) Establish a model process and procedures which state agencies shall follow in developing and implementing projects within their information technology portfolios. This process may include project oversight experts or panels, as appropriate. State agencies may propose, for approval by the office, a process and procedures unique to the agency. The office may accept or require modification of such agency proposals or the office may reject ((such agency)) those proposals and require use of the model process and procedures established under this subsection. Any process and procedures developed under this subsection shall require (i) distinct and identifiable phases upon which funding may be based, (ii) user validation of products through system demonstrations and testing of prototypes and deliverables, and (iii) other elements identified by the office.

The ((chief information officer)) director may suspend or terminate a major project, and direct that the project funds be placed into unallotted reserve status, if the ((chief information officer)) director determines that the project is not meeting or is not expected to meet anticipated performance standards.

(2) The office of financial management shall establish policies and standards consistent with portfolio-based information technology management to govern the funding of projects developed under this section. The policies and standards shall provide for:

(a) Funding of a project under terms and conditions mutually agreed to by the ((chief information officer)) director, the director of financial management, and the head of the agency proposing the project. However, the office of financial management may require incremental funding of a project on a phase-by-phase basis whereby funds for a given phase of a project may be released only when the office of financial management determines, with the advice of the ((office)) director, that the previous phase is satisfactorily completed; and

(b) Other elements deemed necessary by the office of financial management.

Sec. 209. RCW 43.41A.060 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 713 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Prior to making a commitment to purchase, acquire, or develop a major information technology project or service, state agencies must provide a proposal to the office outlining the business case of the proposed product or service, including the up-front and ongoing cost of the proposal.

(2) Within ((sixty)) thirty days of receipt of a proposal, the office shall approve the proposal, reject it, or propose modifications.

(3) In reviewing a proposal, the office must determine whether the product or service is consistent with:

(a) The standards and policies developed by the ((office)) director pursuant to RCW 43.41A.025 (as recodified by this act); and

(b) The state's enterprise-based strategy.

(4) If a substantially similar product or service is offered by the ((consolidated technology services)) agency ((established in RCW 43.105.047)), the ((office)) director may require the state agency to procure the product or service through the ((consolidated technology services)) agency, if doing so would benefit the state as an enterprise.

(5) The office shall provide guidance to state agencies as to what threshold of information technology spending constitutes a major information technology product or service under this section.

Sec. 210. RCW 43.41A.065 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 714 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office shall develop an enterprise-based strategy for information technology in state government informed by portfolio management planning and information technology expenditure information collected from state agencies pursuant to RCW 43.88.092.

(2)(a) The office shall develop an ongoing enterprise architecture program for translating business vision and strategy into effective enterprise change. This program will create, communicate, and improve the key principles and models that describe the enterprise's future state and enable its evolution, in keeping with the priorities of government and the information technology strategic plan.

(b) The enterprise architecture program will facilitate business process collaboration among agencies statewide; improving the reliability, interoperability, and sustainability of the business processes that state agencies use.

In developing an enterprise-based strategy for the state, the office is encouraged to consider the following strategies as possible opportunities for achieving greater efficiency:

(i) Developing evaluation criteria for deciding which common enterprise-wide business processes should become managed as enterprise services;

(ii) Developing a roadmap of priorities for creating enterprise services;

(iii) Developing decision criteria for determining implementation criteria for centralized or decentralized enterprise services;

(iv) Developing evaluation criteria for deciding which technology investments to continue, hold, or drop; and

(v) Performing such other duties as may be ((assigned by the office)) needed to promote effective enterprise change.

(c) The ((program)) office will establish performance measurement criteria for each of its initiatives; will measure the success of those initiatives; and will assess its quarterly results with the ((chief information officer)) director to determine whether to continue, revise, or disband the initiative.

Sec. 211. RCW 43.41A.070 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 715 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The technology services board is created within the ((office of the chief information officer)) agency.

(((1))) (2) The board shall be composed of thirteen members. Six members shall be appointed by the governor, three of whom shall be representatives of state agencies or institutions, and three of whom shall be representatives of the private sector. Of the state agency representatives, at least one of the representatives must have direct experience using the software projects overseen by the board or reasonably expect to use the new software developed under the oversight of the board. Two members shall represent the house of representatives and shall be selected by the speaker of the house of representatives with one representative chosen from each major caucus of the house of representatives; two members shall represent the senate and shall be appointed by the president of the senate with one representative chosen from each major caucus of the senate. One member shall be the ((chief information officer)) director who shall be a voting member of the board and serve as chair. Two nonvoting members with information technology expertise must be appointed by the governor as follows:

(a) One member representing state agency bargaining units shall be selected from a list of three names submitted by each of the general government exclusive bargaining representatives; and

(b) One member representing local governments shall be selected from a list of three names submitted by commonly recognized local government organizations.

The governor may reject all recommendations and request new recommendations.

(((2))) (3) Of the initial members, three must be appointed for a one-year term, three must be appointed for a two-year term, and four must be appointed for a three-year term. Thereafter, members must be appointed for three-year terms.

(((3))) (4) Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner that the original appointments were made for the remainder of the member's term.

(((4))) (5) Members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(((5))) (6) The office shall provide staff support to the board.

Sec. 212. RCW 43.41A.075 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 716 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall have the following powers and duties related to information services:

(1) To review and approve standards and ((procedures)) policies, developed by the office ((of the chief information officer)), governing the acquisition and disposition of equipment, proprietary software, and purchased services, licensing of the radio spectrum by or on behalf of state agencies, and confidentiality of computerized data;

(2) To review and approve statewide or interagency technical policies((,)) and standards((, and procedures)) developed by the office ((of the chief information officer));

(3) To review, approve, and provide oversight of major information technology projects to ensure that no major information technology project proposed by a state agency is approved or authorized funding by the board without consideration of the technical and financial business case for the project, including a review of:

(a) The total cost of ownership across the life of the project;

(b) All major technical options and alternatives analyzed, and reviewed, if necessary, by independent technical sources; and

(c) Whether the project is technically and financially justifiable when compared against the state's enterprise-based strategy, long-term technology trends, and existing or potential partnerships with private providers or vendors;

(4) To review and approve standards and common specifications for new or expanded telecommunications networks proposed by state agencies, public postsecondary education institutions, educational service districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 information technology services, and to assure the cost-effective development and incremental implementation of a statewide video telecommunications system to serve: Public schools; educational service districts; vocational-technical institutes; community colleges; colleges and universities; state and local government; and the general public through public affairs programming;

(5) To develop a policy to determine whether a proposed project, product, or service should undergo an independent technical and financial analysis prior to submitting a request to the office of financial management for the inclusion in any proposed operating, capital, or transportation budget;

(6) To approve contracting for services and activities under RCW 41.06.142(7) for the ((consolidated technology service)) agency. To approve any service or activity to be contracted under RCW 41.06.142(7)(b), the board must also review the proposed business plan and recommendation submitted by the office;

(7) To consider, on an ongoing basis, ways to promote strategic investments in enterprise-level information technology projects that will result in service improvements and cost efficiency;

(8) To provide a forum to solicit external expertise and perspective on developments in information technology, enterprise architecture, standards, and policy development; and

(9) To provide a forum where ideas and issues related to information technology plans, policies, and standards can be reviewed.

Sec. 213. RCW 43.41A.080 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 717 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((chief information officer)) director shall appoint a state interoperability executive committee, the membership of which must include, but not be limited to, representatives of the military department, the Washington state patrol, the department of transportation, the office of the state chief information officer, the department of natural resources, city and county governments, state and local fire chiefs, police chiefs, and sheriffs, and state and local emergency management directors. The chair and legislative members of the board will serve as nonvoting ex officio members of the committee. Voting membership may not exceed fifteen members.

(2) The ((chief information officer)) director shall appoint the chair of the committee from among the voting members of the committee.

(3) The state interoperability executive committee has the following responsibilities:

(a) Develop policies and make recommendations to the office for technical standards for state wireless radio communications systems, including emergency communications systems. The standards must address, among other things, the interoperability of systems, taking into account both existing and future systems and technologies;

(b) Coordinate and manage on behalf of the office the licensing and use of state-designated and state-licensed radio frequencies, including the spectrum used for public safety and emergency communications, and serve as the point of contact with the federal communications commission and the first responders network authority on matters relating to allocation, use, and licensing of radio spectrum;

(c) Coordinate the purchasing of all state wireless radio communications system equipment to ensure that:

(i) After the transition from a radio over internet protocol network, any new trunked system shall be, at a minimum, project-25;

(ii) Any new system that requires advanced digital features shall be, at a minimum, project-25; and

(iii) Any new system or equipment purchases shall be, at a minimum, upgradable to project-25;

(d) Seek support, including possible federal or other funding, for state-sponsored wireless communications systems;

(e) Develop recommendations for legislation that may be required to promote interoperability of state wireless communications systems;

(f) Foster cooperation and coordination among public safety and emergency response organizations;

(g) Work with wireless communications groups and associations to ensure interoperability among all public safety and emergency response wireless communications systems; and

(h) Perform such other duties as may be assigned by the ((office)) director to promote interoperability of wireless communications systems.

(4) The office shall provide administrative support to the committee.

Sec. 214. RCW 43.41A.085 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 718 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office has the duty to govern and oversee the technical design, implementation, and operation of the K-20 network including, but not limited to, the following duties: Establishment and implementation of K-20 network technical policy, including technical standards and conditions of use; review and approval of network design; and resolving user/provider disputes.

(2) The office has the following powers and duties:

(a) In cooperation with the educational sectors and other interested parties, to establish goals and measurable objectives for the network;

(b) To ensure that the goals and measurable objectives of the network are the basis for any decisions or recommendations regarding the technical development and operation of the network;

(c) To adopt, modify, and implement policies to facilitate network development, operation, and expansion. Such policies may include but need not be limited to the following issues: Quality of educational services; access to the network by recognized organizations and accredited institutions that deliver educational programming, including public libraries; prioritization of programming within limited resources; prioritization of access to the system and the sharing of technological advances; network security; identification and evaluation of emerging technologies for delivery of educational programs; future expansion or redirection of the system; network fee structures; and costs for the development and operation of the network;

(d) To prepare and submit to the governor and the legislature a coordinated budget for network development, operation, and expansion. The budget shall include the ((chief information officer's)) director of the consolidated technology services agency's recommendations on (i) any state funding requested for network transport and equipment, distance education facilities and hardware or software specific to the use of the network, and proposed new network end sites, (ii) annual copayments to be charged to public educational sector institutions and other public entities connected to the network, and (iii) charges to nongovernmental entities connected to the network;

(e) To adopt and monitor the implementation of a methodology to evaluate the effectiveness of the network in achieving the educational goals and measurable objectives;

(f) To establish by rule acceptable use policies governing user eligibility for participation in the K-20 network, acceptable uses of network resources, and procedures for enforcement of such policies. The office shall set forth appropriate procedures for enforcement of acceptable use policies, that may include suspension of network connections and removal of shared equipment for violations of network conditions or policies. The office shall have sole responsibility for the implementation of enforcement procedures relating to technical conditions of use.

Sec. 215. RCW 43.41A.095 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 720 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((chief information officer)) office, in conjunction with the K-20 network users, shall maintain a technical plan of the K-20 telecommunications system and ongoing system enhancements. The office shall ensure that the technical plan adheres to the goals and objectives established under RCW 43.41A.025 (as recodified by this act). The technical plan shall provide for:

(1) A telecommunications backbone connecting educational service districts, the main campuses of public baccalaureate institutions, the branch campuses of public research institutions, and the main campuses of community colleges and technical colleges.

(2)(a) Connection to the K-20 network by entities that include, but need not be limited to: School districts, public higher education off-campus and extension centers, and branch campuses of community colleges and technical colleges, as prioritized by the chief information officer; (b) distance education facilities and components for entities listed in this subsection and subsection (1) of this section; and (c) connection for independent nonprofit institutions of higher education, provided that:

(i) The ((chief information officer)) office and each independent nonprofit institution of higher education to be connected agree in writing to terms and conditions of connectivity. The terms and conditions shall ensure, among other things, that the provision of K-20 services does not violate Article VIII, section 5 of the state Constitution and that the institution shall adhere to K-20 network policies; and

(ii) The ((chief information officer)) office determines that inclusion of the independent nonprofit institutions of higher education will not significantly affect the network's eligibility for federal universal service fund discounts or subsidies.

(3) Subsequent phases may include, but need not be limited to, connections to public libraries, state and local governments, community resource centers, and the private sector.

Sec. 216. RCW 43.41A.105 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 722 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The education technology revolving fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from billings under subsection (2) of this section must be deposited in the revolving fund. Only the ((chief information officer)) director or the ((chief information officer's)) director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund. The revolving fund shall be used to pay for K-20 network operations, transport, equipment, software, supplies, and services, maintenance and depreciation of on-site data, and shared infrastructure, and other costs incidental to the development, operation, and administration of shared educational information technology services, telecommunications, and systems. The revolving fund shall not be used for the acquisition, maintenance, or operations of local telecommunications infrastructure or the maintenance or depreciation of on-premises video equipment specific to a particular institution or group of institutions.

(2) The revolving fund and all disbursements from the revolving fund are subject to the allotment procedure under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. The office shall, subject to the review and approval of the office of financial management, establish and implement a billing structure for network services identified in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The office shall charge those public entities connected to the K-20 telecommunications system under RCW 43.41A.095 (as recodified by this act) an annual copayment per unit of transport connection as determined by the legislature after consideration of the board's recommendations. This copayment shall be deposited into the revolving fund to be used for the purposes in subsection (1) of this section. It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate to the revolving fund such moneys as necessary to cover the costs for transport, maintenance, and depreciation of data equipment located at the individual public institutions, maintenance and depreciation of the K-20 network backbone, and services provided to the network under RCW 43.41A.085 (as recodified by this act).

Sec. 217. RCW 43.41A.130 and 1996 c 171 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Funding to meet the costs of providing access, including the building of the necessary information systems, the digitizing of information, developing the ability to mask nondisclosable information, and maintenance and upgrade of information access systems should come primarily from state and local appropriations, federal dollars, grants, private funds, cooperative ventures among governments, nonexclusive licensing, and public/private partnerships. ((Agencies should not offer customized electronic access services as the primary way of responding to requests or as a primary source of revenue. Fees for staff time to respond to requests, and other direct costs may be included in costs of providing customized access.))

State agencies and local governments are encouraged to pool resources and to form cooperative ventures to provide electronic access to government records and information. State agencies are encouraged to seek federal and private grants for projects that provide increased efficiency and improve government delivery of information and services.

Sec. 218. RCW 43.41A.140 and 2011 c 60 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

State agencies and local governments that collect and enter information concerning individuals into electronic records and information systems that will be widely accessible by the public under RCW 42.56.010 shall ensure the accuracy of this information to the extent possible. To the extent possible, information must be collected directly from, and with the consent of, the individual who is the subject of the data. State agencies shall establish procedures for correcting inaccurate information, including establishing mechanisms for individuals to review information about themselves and recommend changes in information they believe to be inaccurate. The inclusion of personal information in electronic public records that is widely available to the public should include information on the date when the database was created or most recently updated. If personally identifiable information is included in electronic public records that are made widely available to the public, state agencies must follow retention and archival schedules in accordance with chapter 40.14 RCW, retaining personally identifiable information only as long as needed to carry out the purpose for which it was collected. At least once every five years, each agency that collects information must review the information collected and justify why it is being collected and for what purpose.

Sec. 219. RCW 43.41A.150 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 735 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, state agencies shall locate all existing and new servers in the state data center.

(2) State agencies with a service requirement that requires servers to be located outside the state data center must receive a waiver from the office. Waivers must be based upon written justification from the requesting state agency citing specific service or performance requirements for locating servers outside the state's common platform.

(3) The office, in consultation with the office of financial management, shall continue to develop the business plan and migration schedule for moving all state agencies into the state data center.

(4) The legislature and the judiciary, which are constitutionally recognized as separate branches of government, may enter into an interagency agreement with the office to migrate its servers into the state data center.

(5) This section does not apply to institutions of higher education.

Sec. 220. RCW 43.41A.152 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 736 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office shall conduct a needs assessment and develop a migration strategy to ensure that, over time, all state agencies are moving towards using the ((consolidated technology services)) agency ((established in RCW 43.105.047)) as their central service provider for all utility-based infrastructure services, including centralized PC and infrastructure support. State agency-specific application services shall remain managed within individual agencies.

(2) The office shall develop short-term and long-term objectives as part of the migration strategy.

(3) ((For the purposes of this section, "utility-based infrastructure services" includes personal computer and portable device support, servers and server administration, security administration, network administration, telephony, e-mail, and other information technology services commonly utilized by state agencies.

(4))) This section does not apply to institutions of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221. RCW 43.41A.003, 43.41A.010, 43.41A.025, 43.41A.027, 43.41A.030, 43.41A.035, 43.41A.040, 43.41A.045, 43.41A.050, 43.41A.055, 43.41A.060, 43.41A.065, 43.41A.070, 43.41A.075, 43.41A.080, 43.41A.110, 43.41A.115, 43.41A.130, 43.41A.135, 43.41A.140, 43.41A.150, 43.41A.152, 43.41A.900, and 43.105.047 are each recodified as sections in chapter 43.105 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222. RCW 43.41A.085, 43.41A.090, 43.41A.095, 43.41A.100, and 43.41A.105 are each recodified as sections in chapter 43.41 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223. RCW 43.41A.125 is decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.41A.006 (Definitions) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 705;

(2) RCW 43.41A.015 (Chief information officer—Executive head and appointing authority) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 703;

(3) RCW 43.41A.020 (Chief information officer—Duties) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 704;

(4) RCW 43.41A.120 (Electronic access to public records—Definitions) and 2011 c 60 s 38 & 1996 c 171 s 2; and

(5) RCW 43.105.340 (Consumer protection web site) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 12 & 2008 c 151 s 2.

PART III

OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT REALIGNMENT

Sec. 301. RCW 43.82.055 and 2015 c 225 s 76 are each amended to read as follows:

The office of financial management shall:

(1) Work with the department of enterprise services and all other state agencies to determine the long-term facility needs of state government; ((and))

(2) Develop and submit a six-year facility plan to the legislature by January 1st of every odd-numbered year((, beginning January 1, 2009,)) that includes state agency space requirements and other pertinent data necessary for cost-effective facility planning. The department of enterprise services shall assist with this effort as required by the office of financial management; and

(3) Establish and enforce policies and workplace strategies that promote the efficient use of state facilities.

Sec. 302. RCW 43.82.150 and 2007 c 506 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of financial management shall develop and maintain an inventory system to account for all facilities owned or leased ((facilities utilized)) by state government. At a minimum, the inventory system must include the facility owner, location, type, condition, use data, and size of each facility. In addition, for owned facilities, the inventory system must include the date and cost of original construction and the cost of any major remodeling or renovation. The inventory must be updated by all agencies, departments, boards, commissions, and institutions by June 30th of each year. The office of financial management shall publish a report summarizing information contained in the inventory system for each agency by October 1st of each year, beginning in 2010 and shall submit this report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.

(2) ((All agencies, departments, boards, commissions, and institutions of the state of Washington shall provide to the office of financial management a complete inventory of owned and leased facilities by September 1, 2010. The inventory must be updated and submitted to the office of financial management by September 1st of each subsequent year.)) The ((inventories)) inventory required under this subsection must be submitted in a standard format prescribed by the office of financial management.

(3) ((The office of financial management shall report to the legislature by September 1, 2008, on recommended improvements to the inventory system, redevelopment costs, and an implementation schedule for the redevelopment of the inventory system. The report shall also make recommendations on other improvements that will improve accountability and assist in the evaluation of budget requests and facility management by the governor and the legislature.

(4))) For the purposes of this section, "facilities" means buildings and other structures with walls and a roof. "Facilities" does not mean roads, bridges, parking areas, utility systems, and other similar improvements to real property.

Sec. 303. RCW 43.88.160 and 2012 c 230 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This section sets forth the major fiscal duties and responsibilities of officers and agencies of the executive branch. The regulations issued by the governor pursuant to this chapter shall provide for a comprehensive, orderly basis for fiscal management and control, including efficient accounting and reporting therefor, for the executive branch of the state government and may include, in addition, such requirements as will generally promote more efficient public management in the state.

(1) Governor; director of financial management. The governor, through the director of financial management, shall devise and supervise a modern and complete accounting system for each agency to the end that all revenues, expenditures, receipts, disbursements, resources, and obligations of the state shall be properly and systematically accounted for. The accounting system shall include the development of accurate, timely records and reports of all financial affairs of the state. The system shall also provide for central accounts in the office of financial management at the level of detail deemed necessary by the director to perform central financial management. The director of financial management shall adopt and periodically update an accounting procedures manual. Any agency maintaining its own accounting and reporting system shall comply with the updated accounting procedures manual and the rules of the director adopted under this chapter. An agency may receive a waiver from complying with this requirement if the waiver is approved by the director. Waivers expire at the end of the fiscal biennium for which they are granted. The director shall forward notice of waivers granted to the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The director of financial management may require such financial, statistical, and other reports as the director deems necessary from all agencies covering any period.

(2) Except as provided in chapter 43.88C RCW, the director of financial management is responsible for quarterly reporting of primary operating budget drivers such as applicable workloads, caseload estimates, and appropriate unit cost data. These reports shall be transmitted to the legislative fiscal committees or by electronic means to the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee. Quarterly reports shall include actual monthly data and the variance between actual and estimated data to date. The reports shall also include estimates of these items for the remainder of the budget period.

(3) The director of financial management shall report at least annually to the appropriate legislative committees regarding the status of all appropriated capital projects, including transportation projects, showing significant cost overruns or underruns. If funds are shifted from one project to another, the office of financial management shall also reflect this in the annual variance report. Once a project is complete, the report shall provide a final summary showing estimated start and completion dates of each project phase compared to actual dates, estimated costs of each project phase compared to actual costs, and whether or not there are any outstanding liabilities or unsettled claims at the time of completion.

(4) In addition, the director of financial management, as agent of the governor, shall:

(a) Develop and maintain a system of internal controls and internal audits comprising methods and procedures to be adopted by each agency that will safeguard its assets, check the accuracy and reliability of its accounting data, promote operational efficiency, and encourage adherence to prescribed managerial policies for accounting and financial controls. The system developed by the director shall include criteria for determining the scope and comprehensiveness of internal controls required by classes of agencies, depending on the level of resources at risk.

((Each)) (i) For those agencies that the director determines internal audit is required, the agency head or authorized designee shall be assigned the responsibility and authority for establishing and maintaining internal audits following ((the)) professional audit standards ((of internal auditing of)) including generally accepted government auditing standards or standards adopted by the institute of internal auditors, or both.

(ii) For those agencies that the director determines internal audit is not required, the agency head or authorized designee may establish and maintain internal audits following professional audit standards including generally accepted government auditing standards or standards adopted by the institute of internal auditors, or both, but at a minimum must comply with policies as established by the director to assess the effectiveness of the agency's systems of internal controls and risk management processes;

(b) Make surveys and analyses of agencies with the object of determining better methods and increased effectiveness in the use of manpower and materials; and the director shall authorize expenditures for employee training to the end that the state may benefit from training facilities made available to state employees;

(c) Establish policies for allowing the contracting of child care services;

(d) Report to the governor with regard to duplication of effort or lack of coordination among agencies;

(e) Review any pay and classification plans, and changes thereunder, developed by any agency for their fiscal impact: PROVIDED, That none of the provisions of this subsection shall affect merit systems of personnel management now existing or hereafter established by statute relating to the fixing of qualifications requirements for recruitment, appointment, or promotion of employees of any agency. The director shall advise and confer with agencies including appropriate standing committees of the legislature as may be designated by the speaker of the house and the president of the senate regarding the fiscal impact of such plans and may amend or alter the plans, except that for the following agencies no amendment or alteration of the plans may be made without the approval of the agency concerned: Agencies headed by elective officials;

(f) Fix the number and classes of positions or authorized employee years of employment for each agency and during the fiscal period amend the determinations previously fixed by the director except that the director shall not be empowered to fix the number or the classes for the following: Agencies headed by elective officials;

(g) Adopt rules to effectuate provisions contained in (a) through (f) of this subsection.

(5) The treasurer shall:

(a) Receive, keep, and disburse all public funds of the state not expressly required by law to be received, kept, and disbursed by some other persons: PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not apply to those public funds of the institutions of higher learning which are not subject to appropriation;

(b) Receive, disburse, or transfer public funds under the treasurer's supervision or custody;

(c) Keep a correct and current account of all moneys received and disbursed by the treasurer, classified by fund or account;

(d) Coordinate agencies' acceptance and use of credit cards and other payment methods, if the agencies have received authorization under RCW 43.41.180;

(e) Perform such other duties as may be required by law or by regulations issued pursuant to this law.

It shall be unlawful for the treasurer to disburse public funds in the treasury except upon forms or by alternative means duly prescribed by the director of financial management. These forms or alternative means shall provide for authentication and certification by the agency head or the agency head's designee that the services have been rendered or the materials have been furnished; or, in the case of loans or grants, that the loans or grants are authorized by law; or, in the case of payments for periodic maintenance services to be performed on state owned equipment, that a written contract for such periodic maintenance services is currently in effect; and the treasurer shall not be liable under the treasurer's surety bond for erroneous or improper payments so made. When services are lawfully paid for in advance of full performance by any private individual or business entity other than equipment maintenance providers or as provided for by RCW 42.24.035, such individual or entity other than central stores rendering such services shall make a cash deposit or furnish surety bond coverage to the state as shall be fixed in an amount by law, or if not fixed by law, then in such amounts as shall be fixed by the director of the department of enterprise services but in no case shall such required cash deposit or surety bond be less than an amount which will fully indemnify the state against any and all losses on account of breach of promise to fully perform such services. No payments shall be made in advance for any equipment maintenance services to be performed more than twelve months after such payment except that institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 may make payments in advance for equipment maintenance services to be performed up to sixty months after such payment. Any such bond so furnished shall be conditioned that the person, firm or corporation receiving the advance payment will apply it toward performance of the contract. The responsibility for recovery of erroneous or improper payments made under this section shall lie with the agency head or the agency head's designee in accordance with rules issued pursuant to this chapter. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit a public body to advance funds to a private service provider pursuant to a grant or loan before services have been rendered or material furnished.

(6) The state auditor shall:

(a) Report to the legislature the results of current post audits that have been made of the financial transactions of each agency; to this end the auditor may, in the auditor's discretion, examine the books and accounts of any agency, official, or employee charged with the receipt, custody, or safekeeping of public funds. Where feasible in conducting examinations, the auditor shall utilize data and findings from the internal control system prescribed by the office of financial management. The current post audit of each agency may include a section on recommendations to the legislature as provided in (c) of this subsection.

(b) Give information to the legislature, whenever required, upon any subject relating to the financial affairs of the state.

(c) Make the auditor's official report on or before the thirty-first of December which precedes the meeting of the legislature. The report shall be for the last complete fiscal period and shall include determinations as to whether agencies, in making expenditures, complied with the laws of this state. The state auditor is authorized to perform or participate in performance verifications and performance audits as expressly authorized by the legislature in the omnibus biennial appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan approved by the joint legislative audit and review committee. The state auditor, upon completing an audit for legal and financial compliance under chapter 43.09 RCW or a performance verification, may report to the joint legislative audit and review committee or other appropriate committees of the legislature, in a manner prescribed by the joint legislative audit and review committee, on facts relating to the management or performance of governmental programs where such facts are discovered incidental to the legal and financial audit or performance verification. The auditor may make such a report to a legislative committee only if the auditor has determined that the agency has been given an opportunity and has failed to resolve the management or performance issues raised by the auditor. If the auditor makes a report to a legislative committee, the agency may submit to the committee a response to the report. This subsection (6) shall not be construed to authorize the auditor to allocate other than de minimis resources to performance audits except as expressly authorized in the appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan. The results of a performance audit conducted by the state auditor that has been requested by the joint legislative audit and review committee must only be transmitted to the joint legislative audit and review committee.

(d) Be empowered to take exception to specific expenditures that have been incurred by any agency or to take exception to other practices related in any way to the agency's financial transactions and to cause such exceptions to be made a matter of public record, including disclosure to the agency concerned and to the director of financial management. It shall be the duty of the director of financial management to cause corrective action to be taken within six months, such action to include, as appropriate, the withholding of funds as provided in RCW 43.88.110. The director of financial management shall annually report by December 31st the status of audit resolution to the appropriate committees of the legislature, the state auditor, and the attorney general. The director of financial management shall include in the audit resolution report actions taken as a result of an audit including, but not limited to, types of personnel actions, costs and types of litigation, and value of recouped goods or services.

(e) Promptly report any irregularities to the attorney general.

(f) Investigate improper governmental activity under chapter 42.40 RCW.

In addition to the authority given to the state auditor in this subsection (6), the state auditor is authorized to conduct performance audits identified in RCW 43.09.470. Nothing in this subsection (6) shall limit, impede, or restrict the state auditor from conducting performance audits identified in RCW 43.09.470.

(7) The joint legislative audit and review committee may:

(a) Make post audits of the financial transactions of any agency and management surveys and program reviews as provided for in chapter 44.28 RCW as well as performance audits and program evaluations. To this end the joint committee may in its discretion examine the books, accounts, and other records of any agency, official, or employee.

(b) Give information to the legislature or any legislative committee whenever required upon any subject relating to the performance and management of state agencies.

(c) Make a report to the legislature which shall include at least the following:

(i) Determinations as to the extent to which agencies in making expenditures have complied with the will of the legislature and in this connection, may take exception to specific expenditures or financial practices of any agencies; and

(ii) Such plans as it deems expedient for the support of the state's credit, for lessening expenditures, for promoting frugality and economy in agency affairs, and generally for an improved level of fiscal management.

Sec. 304. RCW 47.04.280 and 2013 c 199 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to establish policy goals for the planning, operation, performance of, and investment in, the state's transportation system. The policy goals established under this section are deemed consistent with the benchmark categories adopted by the state's blue ribbon commission on transportation on November 30, 2000. Public investments in transportation should support achievement of these policy goals:

(a) Economic vitality: To promote and develop transportation systems that stimulate, support, and enhance the movement of people and goods to ensure a prosperous economy;

(b) Preservation: To maintain, preserve, and extend the life and utility of prior investments in transportation systems and services;

(c) Safety: To provide for and improve the safety and security of transportation customers and the transportation system;

(d) Mobility: To improve the predictable movement of goods and people throughout Washington state;

(e) Environment: To enhance Washington's quality of life through transportation investments that promote energy conservation, enhance healthy communities, and protect the environment; and

(f) Stewardship: To continuously improve the quality, effectiveness, and efficiency of the transportation system.

(2) The powers, duties, and functions of state transportation agencies must be performed in a manner consistent with the policy goals set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) These policy goals are intended to be the basis for establishing detailed and measurable objectives and related performance measures.

(4) It is the intent of the legislature that the ((office of financial management)) department of transportation establish objectives and performance measures for the department ((of transportation)) and other state agencies with transportation-related responsibilities to ensure transportation system performance at local, regional, and state government levels progresses toward the attainment of the policy goals set forth in subsection (1) of this section. ((The office of financial management shall submit initial objectives and performance measures to the legislature for its review and shall provide copies of the same to the commission during the 2008 legislative session.)) The ((office of financial management)) department of transportation shall submit objectives and performance measures to the legislature for its review and shall provide copies of the same to the commission during each regular session of the legislature during an even-numbered year thereafter.

(5) A local or regional agency engaging in transportation planning may voluntarily establish objectives and performance measures to demonstrate progress toward the attainment of the policy goals set forth in subsection (1) of this section or any other transportation policy goals established by the local or regional agency. A local or regional agency engaging in transportation planning is encouraged to provide local and regional objectives and performance measures to be included with the objectives and performance measures submitted to the legislature pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

(6) This section does not create a private right of action.

Sec. 305. RCW 47.64.170 and 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 707 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any ferry employee organization certified as the bargaining representative shall be the exclusive representative of all ferry employees in the bargaining unit and shall represent all such employees fairly.

(2) A ferry employee organization or organizations and the governor may each designate any individual as its representative to engage in collective bargaining negotiations.

(3) Negotiating sessions, including strategy meetings of the employer or employee organizations, mediation, and the deliberative process of arbitrators are exempt from the provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW. Hearings conducted by arbitrators may be open to the public by mutual consent of the parties.

(4) Terms of any collective bargaining agreement may be enforced by civil action in Thurston county superior court upon the initiative of either party.

(5) Ferry system employees or any employee organization shall not negotiate or attempt to negotiate directly with anyone other than the person who has been appointed or authorized a bargaining representative for the purpose of bargaining with the ferry employees or their representative.

(6)(a) Within ten working days after the first Monday in September of every odd-numbered year, the parties shall attempt to agree on an interest arbitrator to be used if the parties are not successful in negotiating a comprehensive collective bargaining agreement. If the parties cannot agree on an arbitrator within the ten-day period, either party may request a list of seven arbitrators from the federal mediation and conciliation service. The parties shall select an interest arbitrator using the coin toss/alternate strike method within thirty calendar days of receipt of the list. Immediately upon selecting an interest arbitrator, the parties shall cooperate to reserve dates with the arbitrator for potential arbitration between August 1st and September 15th of the following even-numbered year. The parties shall also prepare a schedule of at least five negotiation dates for the following year, absent an agreement to the contrary. The parties shall execute a written agreement before November 1st of each odd-numbered year setting forth the name of the arbitrator and the dates reserved for bargaining and arbitration. This subsection (6)(a) imposes minimum obligations only and is not intended to define or limit a party's full, good faith bargaining obligation under other sections of this chapter.

(b) The negotiation of a proposed collective bargaining agreement by representatives of the employer and a ferry employee organization shall commence on or about February 1st of every even-numbered year.

(c) For negotiations covering the 2009-2011 biennium and subsequent biennia, the time periods specified in this section, and in RCW 47.64.210 and 47.64.300 through 47.64.320, must ensure conclusion of all agreements on or before October 1st of the even-numbered year next preceding the biennial budget period during which the agreement should take effect. These time periods may only be altered by mutual agreement of the parties in writing. Any such agreement and any impasse procedures agreed to by the parties under RCW 47.64.200 must include an agreement regarding the new time periods that will allow final resolution by negotiations or arbitration by October 1st of each even-numbered year.

(7) It is the intent of this section that the collective bargaining agreement or arbitrator's award shall commence on July 1st of each odd-numbered year and shall terminate on June 30th of the next odd-numbered year to coincide with the ensuing biennial budget year, as defined by RCW 43.88.020(7), to the extent practical. It is further the intent of this section that all collective bargaining agreements be concluded by October 1st of the even-numbered year before the commencement of the biennial budget year during which the agreements are to be in effect. After the expiration date of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter, except to the extent provided in subsection (11) of this section and RCW 47.64.270(4), all of the terms and conditions specified in the collective bargaining agreement remain in effect until the effective date of a subsequently negotiated agreement, not to exceed one year from the expiration date stated in the agreement. Thereafter, the employer may unilaterally implement according to law.

(8) The office of financial management shall conduct a salary survey, for use in collective bargaining and arbitration((, which must be conducted through a contract with a firm nationally recognized in the field of human resources management consulting except during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium)).

(9) Except as provided in subsection (11) of this section:

(a) The governor shall submit a request either for funds necessary to implement the collective bargaining agreements including, but not limited to, the compensation and fringe benefit provisions or for legislation necessary to implement the agreement, or both. Requests for funds necessary to implement the collective bargaining agreements shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless such requests:

(i) Have been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1st before the legislative session at which the requests are to be considered; and

(ii) Have been certified by the director of the office of financial management as being feasible financially for the state.

(b) The governor shall submit a request either for funds necessary to implement the arbitration awards or for legislation necessary to implement the arbitration awards, or both. Requests for funds necessary to implement the arbitration awards shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless such requests:

(i) Have been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1st before the legislative session at which the requests are to be considered; and

(ii) Have been certified by the director of the office of financial management as being feasible financially for the state.

(c) The legislature shall approve or reject the submission of the request for funds necessary to implement the collective bargaining agreements or arbitration awards as a whole for each agreement or award. The legislature shall not consider a request for funds to implement a collective bargaining agreement or arbitration award unless the request is transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060. If the legislature rejects or fails to act on the submission, either party may reopen all or part of the agreement and award or the exclusive bargaining representative may seek to implement the procedures provided for in RCW 47.64.210 and 47.64.300.

(10) If, after the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of an agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.

(11)(a) For the collective bargaining agreements negotiated for the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may consider a request for funds to implement a collective bargaining agreement even if the request for funds was not received by the office of financial management by October 1st and was not transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060.

(b) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, a collective bargaining agreement related to employee health care benefits negotiated between the employer and coalition pursuant to RCW 41.80.020(3) regarding the dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee must be a separate agreement for which the governor may request funds necessary to implement the agreement. The legislature may act upon a 2013-2015 collective bargaining agreement related to employee health care benefits if an agreement is reached and submitted to the office of financial management and legislative budget committees before final legislative action on the biennial or supplemental operating budget by the sitting legislature.

(c) For the collective bargaining agreements negotiated for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may consider a request for funds to implement a collective bargaining agreement reached after October 1st after a determination of financial infeasibility by the director of the office of financial management if the request for funds is transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060.

Sec. 306. RCW 47.64.360 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((office of financial management)) department of transportation shall complete a government management and accountability performance report that provides a baseline assessment of current performance on the performance measures identified in RCW 47.64.355 ((and section 11 of this act)) using final 2009-2011 data. This report must be presented to the legislature by November 1, 2011, through the attainment report required in RCW 47.01.071(5) and 47.04.280.

(2) By December 31, 2012, and each year thereafter, the ((office of financial management)) department of transportation shall complete a performance report for the prior fiscal year. This report must be reviewed by the joint transportation committee.

(3) Management shall lead implementation of the performance measures in RCW 47.64.355 ((and section 11 of this act)).

Sec. 307. RCW 79.44.060 and 2003 c 334 s 508 are each amended to read as follows:

When the chief administrative officer of an agency of state government is satisfied that an assessing district has complied with all the conditions precedent to the levy of assessments for district purposes, pursuant to this chapter against lands occupied, used, or under the jurisdiction of the officer's agency, he or she shall pay them, together with any interest thereon from any funds specifically appropriated to the agency therefor or from any funds of the agency which under existing law have been or are required to be expended to pay assessments on a current basis. ((In all other cases, the chief administrative officer shall certify to the director of financial management that the assessment is one properly chargeable to the state. The director of financial management shall pay such assessments from funds available or appropriated for this purpose.))

Except as provided in RCW 79.44.190 no lands of the state shall be subject to a lien for unpaid assessments, nor shall the interest of the state in any land be sold for unpaid assessments where assessment liens attached to the lands prior to state ownership.

Sec. 308. RCW 28A.345.060 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 467 are each amended to read as follows:

The association shall contract with ((the human resources director in)) the office of financial management to audit in odd-numbered years the association's staff classifications and employees' salaries. The association shall give copies of the audit reports to the office of financial management and the committees of each house of the legislature dealing with common schools.

Sec. 309. RCW 34.05.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 431 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter shall not apply to:

(a) The state militia, or

(b) The board of clemency and pardons, or

(c) The department of corrections or the indeterminate sentencing review board with respect to persons who are in their custody or are subject to the jurisdiction of those agencies.

(2) The provisions of RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 shall not apply:

(a) To adjudicative proceedings of the board of industrial insurance appeals except as provided in RCW 7.68.110 and 51.48.131;

(b) Except for actions pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, to the denial, suspension, or revocation of a driver's license by the department of licensing;

(c) To the department of labor and industries where another statute expressly provides for review of adjudicative proceedings of a department action, order, decision, or award before the board of industrial insurance appeals;

(d) To actions of the Washington personnel resources board, the ((human resources)) director((, or the office)) of financial management, and the department of enterprise services when carrying out their duties under chapter 41.06 RCW;

(e) To adjustments by the department of revenue of the amount of the surcharge imposed under RCW 82.04.261; or

(f) To the extent they are inconsistent with any provisions of chapter 43.43 RCW.

(3) Unless a party makes an election for a formal hearing pursuant to RCW 82.03.140 or 82.03.190, RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 do not apply to a review hearing conducted by the board of tax appeals.

(4) The rule-making provisions of this chapter do not apply to:

(a) Reimbursement unit values, fee schedules, arithmetic conversion factors, and similar arithmetic factors used to determine payment rates that apply to goods and services purchased under contract for clients eligible under chapter 74.09 RCW; and

(b) Adjustments by the department of revenue of the amount of the surcharge imposed under RCW 82.04.261.

(5) All other agencies, whether or not formerly specifically excluded from the provisions of all or any part of the administrative procedure act, shall be subject to the entire act.

Sec. 310. RCW 34.12.100 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 469 are each amended to read as follows:

The chief administrative law judge shall be paid a salary fixed by the governor after recommendation of the ((human resources)) director ((in the office)) of financial management. The salaries of administrative law judges appointed under the terms of this chapter shall be determined by the chief administrative law judge after recommendation of the ((department of personnel)) director of financial management.

Sec. 311. RCW 41.04.340 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 432 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 39 s 12 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) An attendance incentive program is established for all eligible employees. As used in this section the term "eligible employee" means any employee of the state, other than eligible employees of the community and technical colleges and the state board for community and technical colleges identified in RCW 28B.50.553, and teaching and research faculty at the state and regional universities and The Evergreen State College, entitled to accumulate sick leave and for whom accurate sick leave records have been maintained. No employee may receive compensation under this section for any portion of sick leave accumulated at a rate in excess of one day per month. The state and regional universities and The Evergreen State College shall maintain complete and accurate sick leave records for all teaching and research faculty.

(2) In January of the year following any year in which a minimum of sixty days of sick leave is accrued, and each January thereafter, any eligible employee may receive remuneration for unused sick leave accumulated in the previous year at a rate equal to one day's monetary compensation of the employee for each four full days of accrued sick leave in excess of sixty days. Sick leave for which compensation has been received shall be deducted from accrued sick leave at the rate of four days for every one day's monetary compensation.

From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, the rate of monetary compensation for the purposes of this subsection shall not be reduced by any temporary salary reduction.

(3) At the time of separation from state service due to retirement or death, an eligible employee or the employee's estate may elect to receive remuneration at a rate equal to one day's current monetary compensation of the employee for each four full days of accrued sick leave. From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, the rate of monetary compensation for the purposes of this subsection shall not be reduced by any temporary salary reduction.

(4) Remuneration or benefits received under this section shall not be included for the purpose of computing a retirement allowance under any public retirement system in this state.

(5) Except as provided in subsections (7) through (9) of this section for employees not covered by chapter 41.06 RCW, this section shall be administered, and rules shall be adopted to carry out its purposes, by the ((human resources)) director of financial management for persons subject to chapter 41.06 RCW((: PROVIDED, That determination of classes of eligible employees shall be subject to approval by the office of financial management)).

(6) Should the legislature revoke any remuneration or benefits granted under this section, no affected employee shall be entitled thereafter to receive such benefits as a matter of contractual right.

(7) In lieu of remuneration for unused sick leave at retirement as provided in subsection (3) of this section, an agency head or designee may with equivalent funds, provide eligible employees with a benefit plan that provides for reimbursement for medical expenses. This plan shall be implemented only after consultation with affected groups of employees. For eligible employees covered by chapter 41.06 RCW, procedures for the implementation of these plans shall be adopted by the ((human resources)) director of the state health care authority. For eligible employees exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, ((and classified employees who have opted out of coverage of chapter 41.06 RCW as provided in RCW 41.56.201,)) implementation procedures shall be adopted by an agency head having jurisdiction over the employees.

(8) Implementing procedures adopted by the ((human resources)) director of the state health care authority or agency heads shall require that each medical expense plan authorized by subsection (7) of this section apply to all eligible employees in any one of the following groups: (a) Employees in an agency; (b) employees in a major organizational subdivision of an agency; (c) employees at a major operating location of an agency; (d) exempt employees under the jurisdiction of an elected or appointed Washington state executive; (e) employees of the Washington state senate; (f) employees of the Washington state house of representatives; (g) classified employees in a bargaining unit established by the ((director of personnel)) public employment relations commission; or (h) other group of employees defined by an agency head that is not designed to provide an individual-employee choice regarding participation in a medical expense plan. However, medical expense plans for eligible employees in any of the groups under (a) through (h) of this subsection who are covered by a collective bargaining agreement shall be implemented only by written agreement with the bargaining unit's exclusive representative and a separate medical expense plan may be provided for unrepresented employees.

(9) Medical expense plans authorized by subsection (7) of this section must require as a condition of participation in the plan that employees in the group affected by the plan sign an agreement with the employer. The agreement must include a provision to hold the employer harmless should the United States government find that the employer or the employee is in debt to the United States as a result of the employee not paying income taxes due on the equivalent funds placed into the plan, or as a result of the employer not withholding or deducting a tax, assessment, or other payment on the funds as required by federal law. The agreement must also include a provision that requires an eligible employee to forfeit remuneration under subsection (3) of this section if the employee belongs to a group that has been designated to participate in the medical expense plan permitted under this section and the employee refuses to execute the required agreement.

Sec. 312. RCW 41.04.665 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 435 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An agency head may permit an employee to receive leave under this section if:

(a)(i) The employee suffers from, or has a relative or household member suffering from, an illness, injury, impairment, or physical or mental condition which is of an extraordinary or severe nature;

(ii) The employee has been called to service in the uniformed services;

(iii) A state of emergency has been declared anywhere within the United States by the federal or any state government and the employee has needed skills to assist in responding to the emergency or its aftermath and volunteers his or her services to either a governmental agency or to a nonprofit organization engaged in humanitarian relief in the devastated area, and the governmental agency or nonprofit organization accepts the employee's offer of volunteer services; or

(iv) The employee is a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking; ((or

(v) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium only, the employee is eligible to use leave in lieu of temporary layoff under section 3(5), chapter 32, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.;))

(b) The illness, injury, impairment, condition, call to service, emergency volunteer service, or consequence of domestic violence, sexual assault, temporary layoff under section 3(5), chapter 32, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess., or stalking has caused, or is likely to cause, the employee to:

(i) Go on leave without pay status; or

(ii) Terminate state employment;

(c) The employee's absence and the use of shared leave are justified;

(d) The employee has depleted or will shortly deplete his or her:

(i) Annual leave and sick leave reserves if he or she qualifies under (a)(i) of this subsection;

(ii) Annual leave and paid military leave allowed under RCW 38.40.060 if he or she qualifies under (a)(ii) of this subsection; or

(iii) Annual leave if he or she qualifies under (a)(iii)((,)) or (iv)((, or (v))) of this subsection;

(e) The employee has abided by agency rules regarding:

(i) Sick leave use if he or she qualifies under (a)(i) or (iv) of this subsection; or

(ii) Military leave if he or she qualifies under (a)(ii) of this subsection; and

(f) The employee has diligently pursued and been found to be ineligible for benefits under chapter 51.32 RCW if he or she qualifies under (a)(i) of this subsection.

(2) The agency head shall determine the amount of leave, if any, which an employee may receive under this section. However, an employee shall not receive a total of more than five hundred twenty-two days of leave, except that, a supervisor may authorize leave in excess of five hundred twenty-two days in extraordinary circumstances for an employee qualifying for the shared leave program because he or she is suffering from an illness, injury, impairment, or physical or mental condition which is of an extraordinary or severe nature. Shared leave received under the uniformed service shared leave pool in RCW 41.04.685 is not included in this total.

(3) An employee may transfer annual leave, sick leave, and his or her personal holiday, as follows:

(a) An employee who has an accrued annual leave balance of more than ten days may request that the head of the agency for which the employee works transfer a specified amount of annual leave to another employee authorized to receive leave under subsection (1) of this section. In no event may the employee request a transfer of an amount of leave that would result in his or her annual leave account going below ten days. For purposes of this subsection (3)(a), annual leave does not accrue if the employee receives compensation in lieu of accumulating a balance of annual leave.

(b) An employee may transfer a specified amount of sick leave to an employee requesting shared leave only when the donating employee retains a minimum of one hundred seventy-six hours of sick leave after the transfer.

(c) An employee may transfer, under the provisions of this section relating to the transfer of leave, all or part of his or her personal holiday, as that term is defined under RCW 1.16.050, or as such holidays are provided to employees by agreement with a school district's board of directors if the leave transferred under this subsection does not exceed the amount of time provided for personal holidays under RCW 1.16.050.

(4) An employee of an institution of higher education under RCW 28B.10.016, school district, or educational service district who does not accrue annual leave but does accrue sick leave and who has an accrued sick leave balance of more than twenty-two days may request that the head of the agency for which the employee works transfer a specified amount of sick leave to another employee authorized to receive leave under subsection (1) of this section. In no event may such an employee request a transfer that would result in his or her sick leave account going below twenty-two days. Transfers of sick leave under this subsection are limited to transfers from employees who do not accrue annual leave. Under this subsection, "sick leave" also includes leave accrued pursuant to RCW 28A.400.300(((2)))(1)(b) or 28A.310.240(1) with compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies.

(5) Transfers of leave made by an agency head under subsections (3) and (4) of this section shall not exceed the requested amount.

(6) Leave transferred under this section may be transferred from employees of one agency to an employee of the same agency or, with the approval of the heads of both agencies, to an employee of another state agency.

(7) While an employee is on leave transferred under this section, he or she shall continue to be classified as a state employee and shall receive the same treatment in respect to salary, wages, and employee benefits as the employee would normally receive if using accrued annual leave or sick leave.

(a) All salary and wage payments made to employees while on leave transferred under this section shall be made by the agency employing the person receiving the leave. The value of leave transferred shall be based upon the leave value of the person receiving the leave.

(b) In the case of leave transferred by an employee of one agency to an employee of another agency, the agencies involved shall arrange for the transfer of funds and credit for the appropriate value of leave.

(i) Pursuant to rules adopted by the office of financial management, funds shall not be transferred under this section if the transfer would violate any constitutional or statutory restrictions on the funds being transferred.

(ii) The office of financial management may adjust the appropriation authority of an agency receiving funds under this section only if and to the extent that the agency's existing appropriation authority would prevent it from expending the funds received.

(iii) Where any questions arise in the transfer of funds or the adjustment of appropriation authority, the director of financial management shall determine the appropriate transfer or adjustment.

(8) Leave transferred under this section shall not be used in any calculation to determine an agency's allocation of full time equivalent staff positions.

(9) The value of any leave transferred under this section which remains unused shall be returned at its original value to the employee or employees who transferred the leave when the agency head finds that the leave is no longer needed or will not be needed at a future time in connection with the illness or injury for which the leave was transferred or for any other qualifying condition. Before the agency head makes a determination to return unused leave in connection with an illness or injury, or any other qualifying condition, he or she must receive from the affected employee a statement from the employee's doctor verifying that the illness or injury is resolved. To the extent administratively feasible, the value of unused leave which was transferred by more than one employee shall be returned on a pro rata basis.

(10) An employee who uses leave that is transferred to him or her under this section may not be required to repay the value of the leave that he or she used.

(11) The ((human resources)) director of financial management may adopt rules as necessary to implement subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 313. RCW 41.04.680 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 437 are each amended to read as follows:

The office of financial management and other personnel authorities shall adopt rules or policies governing the accumulation and use of sick leave for state agency and department employees, expressly for the establishment of a plan allowing participating employees to pool sick leave and allowing any sick leave thus pooled to be used by any participating employee who has used all of the sick leave, annual leave, and compensatory leave that has been personally accrued by him or her. Each department or agency of the state may allow employees to participate in a sick leave pool established by the office of financial management and other personnel authorities.

(1) For purposes of calculating maximum sick leave that may be donated or received by any one employee, pooled sick leave:

(a) Is counted and converted in the same manner as sick leave under the Washington state leave sharing program as provided in this chapter; and

(b) Does not create a right to sick leave in addition to the amount that may be donated or received under the Washington state leave sharing program as provided in this chapter.

(2) The office of financial management and other personnel authorities, except the personnel authorities for higher education institutions, shall adopt rules which provide:

(a) That employees are eligible to participate in the sick leave pool after one year of employment with the state or agency of the state if the employee has accrued a minimum amount of unused sick leave, to be established by rule;

(b) That participation in the sick leave pool shall, at all times, be voluntary on the part of the employees;

(c) That any sick leave pooled shall be removed from the personally accumulated sick leave balance of the employee contributing the leave;

(d) That any sick leave in the pool that is used by a participating employee may be used only for the employee's personal illness, accident, or injury;

(e) That a participating employee is not eligible to use sick leave accumulated in the pool until all of his or her personally accrued sick, annual, and compensatory leave has been used;

(f) A maximum number of days of sick leave in the pool that any one employee may use;

(g) That a participating employee who uses sick leave from the pool is not required to recontribute such sick leave to the pool, except as otherwise provided in this section;

(h) That an employee who cancels his or her membership in the sick leave pool is not eligible to withdraw the days of sick leave contributed by that employee to the pool;

(i) That an employee who transfers from one position in state government to another position in state government may transfer from one pool to another if the eligibility criteria of the pools are comparable and the administrators of the pools have agreed on a formula for transfer of credits;

(j) That alleged abuse of the use of the sick leave pool shall be investigated, and, on a finding of wrongdoing, the employee shall repay all of the sick leave credits drawn from the sick leave pool and shall be subject to such other disciplinary action as is determined by the agency head;

(k) That sick leave credits may be drawn from the sick leave pool by a part-time employee on a pro rata basis; and

(l) That each department or agency shall maintain accurate and reliable records showing the amount of sick leave which has been accumulated and is unused by employees, in accordance with guidelines established by the ((department of personnel)) office of financial management.

(3) Personnel authorities for higher education institutions shall adopt policies consistent with the needs of the employees under their respective jurisdictions.

Sec. 314. RCW 41.06.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 401 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the words used in this chapter have the meaning given in this section.

(1) "Affirmative action" means a procedure by which racial minorities, women, persons in the protected age category, persons with disabilities, Vietnam-era veterans, and disabled veterans are provided with increased employment opportunities. It shall not mean any sort of quota system.

(2) "Agency" means an office, department, board, commission, or other separate unit or division, however designated, of the state government and all personnel thereof; it includes any unit of state government established by law, the executive officer or members of which are either elected or appointed, upon which the statutes confer powers and impose duties in connection with operations of either a governmental or proprietary nature.

(3) "Board" means the Washington personnel resources board established under the provisions of RCW 41.06.110, except that this definition does not apply to the words "board" or "boards" when used in RCW 41.06.070.

(4) "Career development" means the progressive development of employee capabilities to facilitate productivity, job satisfaction, and upward mobility through work assignments as well as education and training that are both state-sponsored and are achieved by individual employee efforts, all of which shall be consistent with the needs and obligations of the state and its agencies.

(5) "Classified service" means all positions in the state service subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(6) "Comparable worth" means the provision of similar salaries for positions that require or impose similar responsibilities, judgments, knowledge, skills, and working conditions.

(7) "Competitive service" means all positions in the classified service for which a competitive examination is required as a condition precedent to appointment.

(8) "Department" means an agency of government that has as its governing officer a person, or combination of persons such as a commission, board, or council, by law empowered to operate the agency responsible either to (a) no other public officer or (b) the governor.

(9) "Director" means the ((human resources)) director ((within the office)) of financial management ((and appointed under RCW 43.41.113)) or the director's designee.

(10) "Institutions of higher education" means the University of Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.

(11) "Noncompetitive service" means all positions in the classified service for which a competitive examination is not required.

(12) "Related boards" means the state board for community and technical colleges; and such other boards, councils, and commissions related to higher education as may be established.

(13) "Training" means activities designed to develop job-related knowledge and skills of employees.

Sec. 315. RCW 41.06.157 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 411 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To promote the most effective use of the state's workforce and improve the effectiveness and efficiency of the delivery of services to the citizens of the state, the director shall adopt and maintain a comprehensive classification plan for all positions in the classified service. The classification plan must:

(a) Be simple and streamlined;

(b) Support state agencies in responding to changing technologies, economic and social conditions, and the needs of its citizens;

(c) Value workplace diversity;

(d) Facilitate the reorganization and decentralization of governmental services;

(e) Enhance mobility and career advancement opportunities; and

(f) Consider rates in other public employment and private employment in the state.

(2) An appointing authority and an employee organization representing classified employees of the appointing authority for collective bargaining purposes may jointly request the ((human resources)) director of financial management to initiate a classification study.

(3) For institutions of higher education and related boards, the director may adopt special salary ranges to be competitive with positions of a similar nature in the state or the locality in which the institution of higher education or related board is located.

(4) The director may undertake salary surveys of positions in other public and private employment to establish market rates. Any salary survey information collected from private employers which identifies a specific employer with salary rates which the employer pays to its employees shall not be subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 316. RCW 41.06.167 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 413 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((human resources)) director of financial management shall undertake comprehensive compensation surveys for officers and entry-level officer candidates of the Washington state patrol, with such surveys to be conducted in the year prior to the convening of every other one hundred five day regular session of the state legislature. Salary and fringe benefit survey information collected from private employers which identifies a specific employer with the salary and fringe benefit rates which that employer pays to its employees shall not be subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 317. RCW 42.17A.705 and 2012 c 229 s 582 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW 42.17A.700, "executive state officer" includes:

(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of agriculture, the director of the department of services for the blind, the chief information officer of the office of chief information officer, the director of the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of commerce, the director of the consolidated technology services agency, the secretary of corrections, the director of early learning, the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment security, the chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the director of enterprise services, the secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling commission, the secretary of health, the administrator of the Washington state health care authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, ((the human resources director,)) the executive secretary of the human rights commission, the executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the executive director of the state investment board, the director of labor and industries, the director of licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the director of the office of minority and women's business enterprises, the director of parks and recreation, the executive director of the public disclosure commission, the executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, the director of the recreation and conservation office, the director of retirement systems, the director of revenue, the secretary of social and health services, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the secretary of the utilities and transportation commission, the director of veterans affairs, the president of each of the regional and state universities and the president of The Evergreen State College, and each district and each campus president of each state community college;

(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;

(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and

(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of trustees of each community college and each technical college, each member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state convention and trade center board of directors, Eastern Washington University board of trustees, Washington economic development finance authority, Washington energy northwest executive board, The Evergreen State College board of trustees, executive ethics board, fish and wildlife commission, forest practices appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities authority, student achievement council, higher education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review board, board of industrial insurance appeals, state investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics board, life sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, liquor control board, lottery commission, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and recreation commission, Washington personnel resources board, board of pilotage commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure commission, public employees' benefits board, recreation and conservation funding board, salmon recovery funding board, shorelines hearings board, board of tax appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington board of regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington State University board of regents, and Western Washington University board of trustees.

Sec. 318. RCW 41.80.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 972 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the matters subject to bargaining include wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment, and the negotiation of any question arising under a collective bargaining agreement.

(2) The employer is not required to bargain over matters pertaining to:

(a) Health care benefits or other employee insurance benefits, except as required in subsection (3) of this section;

(b) Any retirement system or retirement benefit; or

(c) Rules of the ((human resources)) director of financial management, the director of enterprise services, or the Washington personnel resources board adopted under RCW 41.06.157.

(3) Matters subject to bargaining include the number of names to be certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits. However, except as provided otherwise in this subsection for institutions of higher education, negotiations regarding the number of names to be certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits shall be conducted between the employer and one coalition of all the exclusive bargaining representatives subject to this chapter. The exclusive bargaining representatives for employees that are subject to chapter 47.64 RCW shall bargain the dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits with the employer as part of the coalition under this subsection. Any such provision agreed to by the employer and the coalition shall be included in all master collective bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties. For institutions of higher education, promotional preferences and the number of names to be certified for vacancies shall be bargained under the provisions of RCW 41.80.010(4). For agreements covering the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, any agreement between the employer and the coalition regarding the dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits is a separate agreement and shall not be included in the master collective bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties.

(4) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall not agree to any proposal that would prevent the implementation of approved affirmative action plans or that would be inconsistent with the comparable worth agreement that provided the basis for the salary changes implemented beginning with the 1983-1985 biennium to achieve comparable worth.

(5) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall not bargain over matters pertaining to management rights established in RCW 41.80.040.

(6) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a conflict exists between an executive order, administrative rule, or agency policy relating to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment and a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter, the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A provision of a collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the terms of a statute is invalid and unenforceable.

(7) This section does not prohibit bargaining that affects contracts authorized by RCW 41.06.142.

Sec. 319. RCW 43.03.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 39 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to RCW 41.04.820, the directors of the several departments and members of the several boards and commissions, whose salaries are fixed by the governor and the chief executive officers of the agencies named in RCW 43.03.028(1) as now or hereafter amended shall each severally receive such salaries, payable in monthly installments, as shall be fixed by the governor or the appropriate salary fixing authority, in an amount not to exceed the recommendations of the ((department of personnel)) office of financial management. From February 18, 2009, through June 30, 2013, a salary or wage increase shall not be granted to any position under this section, except that increases may be granted for positions for which the employer has demonstrated difficulty retaining qualified employees if the following conditions are met:

(1) The salary increase can be paid within existing resources;

(2) The salary increase will not adversely impact the provision of client services; and

(3) For any state agency of the executive branch, not including institutions of higher education, the salary increase is approved by the director of the office of financial management.

Any agency granting a salary increase from February 15, 2010, through June 30, 2011, to a position under this section shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than July 31, 2011, detailing the positions for which salary increases were granted, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the increases.

Any agency granting a salary increase from July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2013, to a position under this section shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by July 31, 2012, and July 31, 2013, detailing the positions for which salary increases were granted during the preceding fiscal year, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the increases.

Sec. 320. RCW 43.06.013 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 454 are each amended to read as follows:

When requested by the governor or the director of the department of enterprise services, nonconviction criminal history fingerprint record checks shall be conducted through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section and the federal bureau of investigation on applicants for agency head positions appointed by the governor. Information received pursuant to this section shall be confidential and made available only to the governor or director of ((the department of personnel)) financial management or their employees directly involved in the selection, hiring, or background investigation of the subject of the record check. When necessary, applicants may be employed on a conditional basis pending completion of the criminal history record check. "Agency head" as used in this section has the same definition as provided in RCW 34.05.010.

Sec. 321. RCW 43.41.113 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 430 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of financial management shall direct and supervise the personnel policy and application of the civil service laws, chapter 41.06 RCW.

(2) ((The human resources director is created in the office of financial management. The human resources director shall be appointed by the governor, and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall receive a salary in an amount fixed by the governor.

(3))) The ((human resources)) director or the director's designee has the authority and shall perform the functions as prescribed in chapter 41.06 RCW, or as otherwise prescribed by law.

(((4))) (3) The ((human resources)) director may delegate to any agency the authority to perform administrative and technical personnel activities if the agency requests such authority and the ((human resources)) director is satisfied that the agency has the personnel management capabilities to effectively perform the delegated activities. The ((human resources)) director shall prescribe standards and guidelines for the performance of delegated activities. If the ((human resources)) director determines that an agency is not performing delegated activities within the prescribed standards and guidelines, the director shall withdraw the authority from the agency to perform such activities.

Sec. 322. RCW 43.131.090 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 459 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the legislature specifies a shorter period of time, a terminated entity shall continue in existence until June 30th of the next succeeding year for the purpose of concluding its affairs: PROVIDED, That the powers and authority of the entity shall not be reduced or otherwise limited during this period. Unless otherwise provided:

(1) All employees of terminated entities classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, shall be transferred as appropriate or as otherwise provided in the procedures adopted by the ((human resources)) director of financial management pursuant to RCW 41.06.150;

(2) All documents and papers, equipment, or other tangible property in the possession of the terminated entity shall be delivered to the custody of the entity assuming the responsibilities of the terminated entity or if such responsibilities have been eliminated, documents and papers shall be delivered to the state archivist and equipment or other tangible property to the department of enterprise services;

(3) All funds held by, or other moneys due to, the terminated entity shall revert to the fund from which they were appropriated, or if that fund is abolished to the general fund;

(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 34.05.020, all rules made by a terminated entity shall be repealed, without further action by the entity, at the end of the period provided in this section, unless assumed and reaffirmed by the entity assuming the related legal responsibilities of the terminated entity;

(5) All contractual rights and duties of an entity shall be assigned or delegated to the entity assuming the responsibilities of the terminated entity, or if there is none to such entity as the governor shall direct.

Sec. 323. RCW 48.37.060 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 460 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When the commissioner determines that other market conduct actions identified in RCW 48.37.040(4)(a) have not sufficiently addressed issues raised concerning company activities in Washington state, the commissioner has the discretion to conduct market conduct examinations in accordance with the NAIC market conduct uniform examination procedures and the NAIC market regulation handbook.

(2)(a) In lieu of an examination of an insurer licensed in this state, the commissioner shall accept an examination report of another state, unless the commissioner determines that the other state does not have laws substantially similar to those of this state, or does not have a market oversight system that is comparable to the market conduct oversight system set forth in this law.

(b) The commissioner's determination under (a) of this subsection is discretionary with the commissioner and is not subject to appeal.

(c) If the insurer to be examined is part of an insurance holding company system, the commissioner may also seek to simultaneously examine any affiliates of the insurer under common control and management which are licensed to write the same lines of business in this state.

(3) Before commencement of a market conduct examination, market conduct oversight personnel shall prepare a work plan consisting of the following:

(a) The name and address of the insurer being examined;

(b) The name and contact information of the examiner-in-charge;

(c) The name of all market conduct oversight personnel initially assigned to the market conduct examination;

(d) The justification for the examination;

(e) The scope of the examination;

(f) The date the examination is scheduled to begin;

(g) Notice of any noninsurance department personnel who will assist in the examination;

(h) A time estimate for the examination;

(i) A budget for the examination if the cost of the examination is billed to the insurer; and

(j) An identification of factors that will be included in the billing if the cost of the examination is billed to the insurer.

(4)(a) Within ten days of the receipt of the information contained in subsection (3) of this section, insurers may request the commissioner's discretionary review of any alleged conflict of interest, pursuant to RCW 48.37.090(2), of market conduct oversight personnel and noninsurance department personnel assigned to a market conduct examination. The request for review shall specifically describe the alleged conflict of interest in the proposed assignment of any person to the examination.

(b) Within five business days of receiving a request for discretionary review of any alleged conflict of interest in the proposed assignment of any person to a market conduct examination, the commissioner or designee shall notify the insurer of any action regarding the assignment of personnel to a market conduct examination based on the insurer's allegation of conflict of interest.

(5) Market conduct examinations shall, to the extent feasible, use desk examinations and data requests before an on-site examination.

(6) Market conduct examinations shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions set forth in the NAIC market regulation handbook and the NAIC market conduct uniform examinations procedures, subject to the precedence of the provisions of chapter 82, Laws of 2007.

(7) The commissioner shall use the NAIC standard data request.

(8) Announcement of the examination shall be sent to the insurer and posted on the NAIC's examination tracking system as soon as possible but in no case later than sixty days before the estimated commencement of the examination, except where the examination is conducted in response to extraordinary circumstances as described in RCW 48.37.050(2)(a). The announcement sent to the insurer shall contain the examination work plan and a request for the insurer to name its examination coordinator.

(9) If an examination is expanded significantly beyond the original reasons provided to the insurer in the notice of the examination required by subsection (3) of this section, the commissioner shall provide written notice to the insurer, explaining the expansion and reasons for the expansion. The commissioner shall provide a revised work plan if the expansion results in significant changes to the items presented in the original work plan required by subsection (3) of this section.

(10) The commissioner shall conduct a preexamination conference with the insurer examination coordinator and key personnel to clarify expectations at least thirty days before commencement of the examination, unless otherwise agreed by the insurer and the commissioner.

(11) Before the conclusion of the field work for market conduct examination, the examiner-in-charge shall review examination findings to date with insurer personnel and schedule an exit conference with the insurer, in accordance with procedures in the NAIC market regulation handbook.

(12)(a) No later than sixty days after completion of each market conduct examination, the commissioner shall make a full written report of each market conduct examination containing only facts ascertained from the accounts, records, and documents examined and from the sworn testimony of individuals, and such conclusions and recommendations as may reasonably be warranted from such facts.

(b) The report shall be certified by the commissioner or by the examiner-in-charge of the examination, and shall be filed in the commissioner's office subject to (c) of this subsection.

(c) The commissioner shall furnish a copy of the market conduct examination report to the person examined not less than ten days and, unless the time is extended by the commissioner, not more than thirty days prior to the filing of the report for public inspection in the commissioner's office. If the person so requests in writing within such period, the commissioner shall hold a hearing to consider objections of such person to the report as proposed, and shall not so file the report until after such hearing and until after any modifications in the report deemed necessary by the commissioner have been made.

(d) Within thirty days of the end of the period described in (c) of this subsection, unless extended by order of the commissioner, the commissioner shall consider the report, together with any written submissions or rebuttals and any relevant portions of the examiner's work papers and enter an order:

(i) Adopting the market conduct examination report as filed or with modification or corrections. If the market conduct examination report reveals that the company is operating in violation of any law, rule, or order of the commissioner, the commissioner may order the company to take any action the commissioner considers necessary and appropriate to cure that violation;

(ii) Rejecting the market conduct examination report with directions to the examiners to reopen the examination for purposes of obtaining additional data, documentation, or information, and refiling under this subsection; or

(iii) Calling for an investigatory hearing with no less than twenty days' notice to the company for purposes of obtaining additional documentation, data, information, and testimony.

(e) All orders entered under (d) of this subsection must be accompanied by findings and conclusions resulting from the commissioner's consideration and review of the market conduct examination report, relevant examiner work papers, and any written submissions or rebuttals. The order is considered a final administrative decision and may be appealed under the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and must be served upon the company by certified mail or certifiable electronic means, together with a copy of the adopted examination report. A copy of the adopted examination report must be sent by certified mail or certifiable electronic means to each director at the director's residential address or to a personal e-mail account.

(f)(i) Upon the adoption of the market conduct examination report under (d) of this subsection, the commissioner shall continue to hold the content of the examination report as private and confidential information for a period of five days except that the order may be disclosed to the person examined. Thereafter, the commissioner may open the report for public inspection so long as no court of competent jurisdiction has stayed its publication.

(ii) If the commissioner determines that regulatory action is appropriate as a result of any market conduct examination, he or she may initiate any proceedings or actions as provided by law.

(iii) Nothing contained in this subsection requires the commissioner to disclose any information or records that would indicate or show the existence or content of any investigation or activity of a criminal justice agency.

(g) The insurer's response shall be included in the commissioner's order adopting the final report as an exhibit to the order. The insurer is not obligated to submit a response.

(13) The commissioner may withhold from public inspection any examination or investigation report for so long as he or she deems it advisable.

(14)(a) Market conduct examinations within this state of any insurer domiciled or having its home offices in this state, other than a title insurer, made by the commissioner or the commissioner's examiners and employees shall, except as to fees, mileage, and expense incurred as to witnesses, be at the expense of the state.

(b) Every other examination, whatsoever, or any part of the market conduct examination of any person domiciled or having its home offices in this state requiring travel and services outside this state, shall be made by the commissioner or by examiners designated by the commissioner and shall be at the expense of the person examined; but a domestic insurer shall not be liable for the compensation of examiners employed by the commissioner for such services outside this state.

(c) When making a market conduct examination under this chapter, the commissioner may contract, in accordance with applicable state contracting procedures, for qualified attorneys, appraisers, independent certified public accountants, contract actuaries, and other similar individuals who are independently practicing their professions, even though those persons may from time to time be similarly employed or retained by persons subject to examination under this chapter, as examiners as the commissioner deems necessary for the efficient conduct of a particular examination. The compensation and per diem allowances paid to such contract persons shall be reasonable in the market and time incurred, shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the compensation and per diem allowances for examiners set forth in the guidelines adopted by the national association of insurance commissioners, unless the commissioner demonstrates that one hundred twenty-five percent is inadequate under the circumstances of the examination, and subject to the provisions of (a) of this subsection.

(d)(i) The person examined and liable shall reimburse the state upon presentation of an itemized statement thereof, for the actual travel expenses of the commissioner's examiners, their reasonable living expenses allowance, and their per diem compensation, including salary and the employer's cost of employee benefits, at a reasonable rate approved by the commissioner, incurred on account of the examination. Per diem, salary, and expenses for employees examining insurers domiciled outside the state of Washington shall be established by the commissioner on the basis of the national association of insurance commissioner's recommended salary and expense schedule for zone examiners, or the salary schedule ((established by the human resources director)) and the expense schedule established by the office of financial management, whichever is higher. A domestic title insurer shall pay the examination expense and costs to the commissioner as itemized and billed by the commissioner.

(ii) The commissioner or the commissioner's examiners shall not receive or accept any additional emolument on account of any examination.

(iii) Market conduct examination fees subject to being reimbursed by an insurer shall be itemized and bills shall be provided to the insurer on a monthly basis for review prior to submission for payment, or as otherwise provided by state law.

(e) Nothing contained in this chapter limits the commissioner's authority to terminate or suspend any examination in order to pursue other legal or regulatory action under the insurance laws of this state. Findings of fact and conclusions made pursuant to any examination are prima facie evidence in any legal or regulatory action.

(f) The commissioner shall maintain active management and oversight of market conduct examination costs, including costs associated with the commissioner's own examiners, and with retaining qualified contract examiners necessary to perform an examination. Any agreement with a contract examiner shall:

(i) Clearly identify the types of functions to be subject to outsourcing;

(ii) Provide specific timelines for completion of the outsourced review;

(iii) Require disclosure to the insurer of contract examiners' recommendations;

(iv) Establish and use a dispute resolution or arbitration mechanism to resolve conflicts with insurers regarding examination fees; and

(v) Require disclosure of the terms of the contracts with the outside consultants that will be used, specifically the fees and/or hourly rates that can be charged.

(g) The commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, shall review and affirmatively endorse detailed billings from the qualified contract examiner before the detailed billings are sent to the insurer.

Sec. 324. RCW 49.74.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 463 are each amended to read as follows:

If the commission reasonably believes that a state agency, an institution of higher education, or the state patrol has failed to comply with an affirmative action rule adopted under RCW 41.06.150 or 43.43.340, the commission shall notify the director of the state agency, president of the institution of higher education, or chief of the Washington state patrol of the noncompliance, as well as the ((human resources)) director of financial management. The commission shall give the director of the state agency, president of the institution of higher education, or chief of the Washington state patrol an opportunity to be heard on the failure to comply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 325. RCW 43.41.130, 43.41.140, 43.41.150, 43.41.370, and 43.41.380 are each recodified as sections in chapter 43.19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 326. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.41.190 (Community network programs—Recommended legislation) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 318; and

(2) RCW 43.41.195 (Community networks—Fund distribution formula) and 1999 c 372 s 8 & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 319.

PART IV

CORRECTION OF OBSOLETE REFERENCES

Sec. 401. RCW 2.36.057 and 2015 c 225 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The supreme court is requested to adopt court rules ((to be effective by September 1, 1994,)) regarding methodology and standards for merging the list of registered voters in Washington state with the list of licensed drivers and identicard holders in Washington state for purposes of creating an expanded jury source list. The rules should specify the standard electronic format or formats in which the lists will be provided to requesting superior courts by the ((department of enterprise services)) consolidated technology services agency. In the interim, and until such court rules become effective, the methodology and standards provided in RCW 2.36.054 shall apply. An expanded jury source list shall be available to the courts for use by September 1, 1994.

Sec. 402. RCW 2.36.0571 and 2015 c 225 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

((Not later than January 1, 1994,)) The secretary of state, the department of licensing, and the ((department of enterprise services)) consolidated technology services agency shall adopt administrative rules as necessary to provide for the implementation of the methodology and standards established pursuant to RCW 2.36.057 and 2.36.054 or by supreme court rule.

Sec. 403. RCW 2.68.060 and 2015 c 225 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The administrative office of the courts, under the direction of the judicial information system committee, shall:

(1) Develop a judicial information system information technology portfolio consistent with the provisions of RCW 43.41A.110 (as recodified by this act);

(2) Participate in the development of an enterprise-based statewide information technology strategy;

(3) Ensure the judicial information system information technology portfolio is organized and structured to clearly indicate participation in and use of enterprise-wide information technology strategies;

(4) As part of the biennial budget process, submit the judicial information system information technology portfolio to the chair and ranking member of the ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the senate, the office of financial management, and the ((office of the chief information officer)) consolidated technology services agency.

Sec. 404. RCW 19.34.100 and 2015 c 225 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To obtain or retain a license, a certification authority must:

(a) Provide proof of identity to the secretary;

(b) Employ only certified operative personnel in appropriate positions;

(c) File with the secretary an appropriate, suitable guaranty, unless the certification authority is a city or county that is self-insured or the ((department of enterprise services)) consolidated technology services agency;

(d) Use a trustworthy system;

(e) Maintain an office in this state or have established a registered agent for service of process in this state; and

(f) Comply with all further licensing and practice requirements established by rule by the secretary.

(2) The secretary may by rule create license classifications according to specified limitations, and the secretary may issue licenses restricted according to the limits of each classification.

(3) The secretary may impose license restrictions specific to the practices of an individual certification authority. The secretary shall set forth in writing and maintain as part of the certification authority's license application file the basis for such license restrictions.

(4) The secretary may revoke or suspend a certification authority's license, in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, for failure to comply with this chapter or for failure to remain qualified under subsection (1) of this section. The secretary may order the summary suspension of a license pending proceedings for revocation or other action, which must be promptly instituted and determined, if the secretary includes within a written order a finding that the certification authority has either:

(a) Utilized its license in the commission of a violation of a state or federal criminal statute or of chapter 19.86 RCW; or

(b) Engaged in conduct giving rise to a serious risk of loss to public or private parties if the license is not immediately suspended.

(5) The secretary may recognize by rule the licensing or authorization of certification authorities by other governmental entities, in whole or in part, provided that those licensing or authorization requirements are substantially similar to those of this state. If licensing by another government is so recognized:

(a) RCW 19.34.300 through 19.34.350 apply to certificates issued by the certification authorities licensed or authorized by that government in the same manner as it applies to licensed certification authorities of this state; and

(b) The liability limits of RCW 19.34.280 apply to the certification authorities licensed or authorized by that government in the same manner as they apply to licensed certification authorities of this state.

(6) A certification authority that has not obtained a license is not subject to the provisions of this chapter, except as specifically provided.

Sec. 405. RCW 36.28A.070 and 2015 c 225 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs in consultation with the Washington state emergency management office, the Washington association of county officials, the Washington association of cities, the ((office of the chief information officer)) director of the consolidated technology services agency, the Washington state fire chiefs' association, and the Washington state patrol shall convene a committee to establish guidelines related to the statewide first responder building mapping information system. The committee shall have the following responsibilities:

(a) Develop the type of information to be included in the statewide first responder building mapping information system. The information shall include, but is not limited to: Floor plans, fire protection information, evacuation plans, utility information, known hazards, and text and digital images showing emergency personnel contact information;

(b) Develop building mapping software standards that must be utilized by all entities participating in the statewide first responder building mapping information system;

(c) Determine the order in which buildings shall be mapped when funding is received;

(d) Develop guidelines on how the information shall be made available. These guidelines shall include detailed procedures and security systems to ensure that the information is only made available to the government entity that either owns the building or is responding to an incident at the building;

(e) Recommend training guidelines regarding using the statewide first responder building mapping information system to the criminal justice training commission and the Washington state patrol fire protection bureau.

(2)(a) Nothing in this section supersedes the authority of the ((office of the chief information officer)) consolidated technology services agency or the technology services board under chapter ((43.41A)) 43.105 RCW.

(b) Nothing in this section supersedes the authority of state agencies and local governments to control and maintain access to information within their independent systems.

Sec. 406. RCW 42.17A.705 and 2012 c 229 s 582 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW 42.17A.700, "executive state officer" includes:

(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of agriculture, the director of the department of services for the blind, ((the chief information officer of the office of chief information officer,)) the director of the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of commerce, the director of the consolidated technology services agency, the secretary of corrections, the director of early learning, the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment security, the chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the director of enterprise services, the secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling commission, the secretary of health, the administrator of the Washington state health care authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the human resources director, the executive secretary of the human rights commission, the executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the executive director of the state investment board, the director of labor and industries, the director of licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the director of the office of minority and women's business enterprises, the director of parks and recreation, the executive director of the public disclosure commission, the executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, the director of the recreation and conservation office, the director of retirement systems, the director of revenue, the secretary of social and health services, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the secretary of the utilities and transportation commission, the director of veterans affairs, the president of each of the regional and state universities and the president of The Evergreen State College, and each district and each campus president of each state community college;

(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;

(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and

(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of trustees of each community college and each technical college, each member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state convention and trade center board of directors, Eastern Washington University board of trustees, Washington economic development finance authority, Washington energy northwest executive board, The Evergreen State College board of trustees, executive ethics board, fish and wildlife commission, forest practices appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities authority, student achievement council, higher education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review board, board of industrial insurance appeals, state investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics board, life sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, liquor control board, lottery commission, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and recreation commission, Washington personnel resources board, board of pilotage commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure commission, public employees' benefits board, recreation and conservation funding board, salmon recovery funding board, shorelines hearings board, board of tax appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington board of regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington State University board of regents, and Western Washington University board of trustees.

Sec. 407. RCW 43.19.794 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 602 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department of enterprise)) consolidated technology services agency may become a licensed certification authority, under chapter 19.34 RCW, for the purpose of providing services to agencies, local governments, and other entities and persons for purposes of official state business. The department is not subject to RCW 19.34.100(1)(a). The department shall only issue certificates, as defined in RCW 19.34.020, in which the subscriber is:

(1) The state of Washington or a department, office, or agency of the state;

(2) A city, county, district, or other municipal corporation, or a department, office, or agency of the city, county, district, or municipal corporation;

(3) An agent or employee of an entity described by subsection (1) or (2) of this section, for purposes of official public business;

(4) Any other person or entity engaged in matters of official public business, however, such certificates shall be limited only to matters of official public business. The department may issue certificates to such persons or entities only if after issuing a request for proposals from certification authorities licensed under chapter 19.34 RCW and review of the submitted proposals, makes a determination that such private services are not sufficient to meet the department's published requirements. The department must set forth in writing the basis of any such determination and provide procedures for challenge of the determination as provided by the state procurement requirements; or

(5) An applicant for a license as a certification authority for the purpose of compliance with RCW 19.34.100(1)(a).

Sec. 408. RCW 43.70.054 and 1997 c 274 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To promote the public interest consistent with chapter 267, Laws of 1995, the department of health, in cooperation with the ((information services board established under RCW 43.105.032)) director of the consolidated technology services agency established in RCW 43.105.047 (as recodified by this act), shall develop health care data standards to be used by, and developed in collaboration with, consumers, purchasers, health carriers, providers, and state government as consistent with the intent of chapter 492, Laws of 1993 as amended by chapter 267, Laws of 1995, to promote the delivery of quality health services that improve health outcomes for state residents. The data standards shall include content, coding, confidentiality, and transmission standards for all health care data elements necessary to support the intent of this section, and to improve administrative efficiency and reduce cost. Purchasers, as allowed by federal law, health carriers, health facilities and providers as defined in chapter 48.43 RCW, and state government shall utilize the data standards. The information and data elements shall be reported as the department of health directs by rule in accordance with data standards developed under this section.

(2) The health care data collected, maintained, and studied by the department under this section or any other entity: (a) Shall include a method of associating all information on health care costs and services with discrete cases; (b) shall not contain any means of determining the personal identity of any enrollee, provider, or facility; (c) shall only be available for retrieval in original or processed form to public and private requesters; (d) shall be available within a reasonable period of time after the date of request; and (e) shall give strong consideration to data standards that achieve national uniformity.

(3) The cost of retrieving data for state officials and agencies shall be funded through state general appropriation. The cost of retrieving data for individuals and organizations engaged in research or private use of data or studies shall be funded by a fee schedule developed by the department that reflects the direct cost of retrieving the data or study in the requested form.

(4) All persons subject to this section shall comply with departmental requirements established by rule in the acquisition of data, however, the department shall adopt no rule or effect no policy implementing the provisions of this section without an act of law.

(5) The department shall submit developed health care data standards to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 1995.

Sec. 409. RCW 43.88.090 and 2015 c 225 s 86 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of developing budget proposals to the legislature, the governor shall have the power, and it shall be the governor's duty, to require from proper agency officials such detailed estimates and other information in such form and at such times as the governor shall direct. The governor shall communicate statewide priorities to agencies for use in developing biennial budget recommendations for their agency and shall seek public involvement and input on these priorities. The estimates for the legislature and the judiciary shall be transmitted to the governor and shall be included in the budget without revision. The estimates for state pension contributions shall be based on the rates provided in chapter 41.45 RCW. Copies of all such estimates shall be transmitted to the standing committees on ways and means of the house and senate at the same time as they are filed with the governor and the office of financial management.

The estimates shall include statements or tables which indicate, by agency, the state funds which are required for the receipt of federal matching revenues. The estimates shall be revised as necessary to reflect legislative enactments and adopted appropriations and shall be included with the initial biennial allotment submitted under RCW 43.88.110. The estimates must reflect that the agency considered any alternatives to reduce costs or improve service delivery identified in the findings of a performance audit of the agency by the joint legislative audit and review committee. Nothing in this subsection requires performance audit findings to be published as part of the budget.

(2) Each state agency shall define its mission and establish measurable goals for achieving desirable results for those who receive its services and the taxpayers who pay for those services. Each agency shall also develop clear strategies and timelines to achieve its goals. This section does not require an agency to develop a new mission or goals in place of identifiable missions or goals that meet the intent of this section. The mission and goals of each agency must conform to statutory direction and limitations.

(3) For the purpose of assessing activity performance, each state agency shall establish quality and productivity objectives for each major activity in its budget. The objectives must be consistent with the missions and goals developed under this section. The objectives must be expressed to the extent practicable in outcome-based, objective, and measurable form unless an exception to adopt a different standard is granted by the office of financial management and approved by the legislative committee on performance review. Objectives must specifically address the statutory purpose or intent of the program or activity and focus on data that measure whether the agency is achieving or making progress toward the purpose of the activity and toward statewide priorities. The office of financial management shall provide necessary professional and technical assistance to assist state agencies in the development of strategic plans that include the mission of the agency and its programs, measurable goals, strategies, and performance measurement systems.

(4) Each state agency shall adopt procedures for and perform continuous self-assessment of each activity, using the mission, goals, objectives, and measurements required under subsections (2) and (3) of this section. The assessment of the activity must also include an evaluation of major information technology systems or projects that may assist the agency in achieving or making progress toward the activity purpose and statewide priorities. The evaluation of proposed major information technology systems or projects shall be in accordance with the standards and policies established by the ((office of the chief information officer)) technology services board. Agencies' progress toward the mission, goals, objectives, and measurements required by subsections (2) and (3) of this section is subject to review as set forth in this subsection.

(a) The office of financial management shall regularly conduct reviews of selected activities to analyze whether the objectives and measurements submitted by agencies demonstrate progress toward statewide results.

(b) The office of financial management shall consult with: (i) The four-year institutions of higher education in those reviews that involve four-year institutions of higher education; and (ii) the state board for community and technical colleges in those reviews that involve two-year institutions of higher education.

(c) The goal is for all major activities to receive at least one review each year.

(d) The ((office of the chief information officer)) consolidated technology services agency shall review major information technology systems in use by state agencies periodically.

(5) It is the policy of the legislature that each agency's budget recommendations must be directly linked to the agency's stated mission and program, quality, and productivity goals and objectives. Consistent with this policy, agency budget proposals must include integration of performance measures that allow objective determination of an activity's success in achieving its goals. When a review under subsection (4) of this section or other analysis determines that the agency's objectives demonstrate that the agency is making insufficient progress toward the goals of any particular program or is otherwise underachieving or inefficient, the agency's budget request shall contain proposals to remedy or improve the selected programs. The office of financial management shall develop a plan to merge the budget development process with agency performance assessment procedures. The plan must include a schedule to integrate agency strategic plans and performance measures into agency budget requests and the governor's budget proposal over three fiscal biennia. The plan must identify those agencies that will implement the revised budget process in the 1997-1999 biennium, the 1999-2001 biennium, and the 2001-2003 biennium. In consultation with the legislative fiscal committees, the office of financial management shall recommend statutory and procedural modifications to the state's budget, accounting, and reporting systems to facilitate the performance assessment procedures and the merger of those procedures with the state budget process. The plan and recommended statutory and procedural modifications must be submitted to the legislative fiscal committees by September 30, 1996.

(6) In reviewing agency budget requests in order to prepare the governor's biennial budget request, the office of financial management shall consider the extent to which the agency's activities demonstrate progress toward the statewide budgeting priorities, along with any specific review conducted under subsection (4) of this section.

(7) In the year of the gubernatorial election, the governor shall invite the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee to attend all hearings provided in RCW 43.88.100; and the governor shall furnish the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee with such information as will enable the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee to gain an understanding of the state's budget requirements. The governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee may ask such questions during the hearings and require such information as the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee deems necessary and may make recommendations in connection with any item of the budget which, with the governor-elect's reasons therefor, shall be presented to the legislature in writing with the budget document. Copies of all such estimates and other required information shall also be submitted to the standing committees on ways and means of the house and senate.

Sec. 410. RCW 43.88.092 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 33 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As part of the biennial budget process, the office of financial management shall collect from agencies, and agencies shall provide, information to produce reports, summaries, and budget detail sufficient to allow review, analysis, and documentation of all current and proposed expenditures for information technology by state agencies. Information technology budget detail must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required pursuant to RCW 43.88.030.

(2) The office of financial management must collect, and present as part of the biennial budget documentation, information for all existing information technology projects as defined by technology services board policy. The office of financial management must work with the office of the state chief information officer to maximize the ability to draw this information from the information technology portfolio management data collected by the consolidated technology services agency. Connecting project information collected through the portfolio management process with financial data developed under subsection (1) of this section provides transparency regarding expenditure data for existing technology projects.

(3) The ((chief information officer)) director of the consolidated technology services agency shall evaluate proposed information technology expenditures and establish priority ranking categories of the proposals. No more than one-third of the proposed expenditures shall be ranked in the highest priority category.

(4) The biennial budget documentation submitted by the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 43.88.030 must include an information technology plan and a technology budget for the state identifying current baseline funding for information technology, proposed and ongoing major information technology projects, and their associated costs. This plan and technology budget must be presented using a method similar to the capital budget, identifying project costs through stages of the project and across fiscal periods and biennia from project initiation to implementation. This information must be submitted electronically, in a format to be determined by the office of financial management and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.

(5) The office of financial management shall also institute a method of accounting for information technology-related expenditures, including creating common definitions for what constitutes an information technology investment.

(6) For the purposes of this section, "major information technology projects" includes projects that have a significant anticipated cost, complexity, or are of statewide significance, such as enterprise-level solutions, enterprise resource planning, and shared services initiatives.

Sec. 411. RCW 44.68.065 and 2015 c 225 s 96 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative service center, under the direction of the joint legislative systems committee and the joint legislative systems administrative committee, shall:

(1) Develop a legislative information technology portfolio consistent with the provisions of RCW 43.41A.110 (as recodified by this act);

(2) Participate in the development of an enterprise-based statewide information technology strategy;

(3) Ensure the legislative information technology portfolio is organized and structured to clearly indicate participation in and use of enterprise-wide information technology strategies;

(4) As part of the biennial budget process, submit the legislative information technology portfolio to the chair and ranking member of the ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the senate, the office of financial management, and the ((office of the chief information officer)) consolidated technology services agency.

Sec. 412. RCW 70.58.005 and 2015 c 225 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Business days" means Monday through Friday except official state holidays.

(2) "Department" means the department of health.

(3) "Electronic approval" or "electronically approve" means approving the content of an electronically filed vital record through the processes provided by the department. Electronic approval processes shall be consistent with policies, standards, and procedures developed by the ((office of the chief information officer)) director of the consolidated technology services agency.

(4) "Embalmer" means a person licensed as required in chapter 18.39 RCW and defined in RCW 18.39.010.

(5) "Funeral director" means a person licensed as required in chapter 18.39 RCW and defined in RCW 18.39.010.

(6) "Vital records" means records of birth, death, fetal death, marriage, dissolution, annulment, and legal separation, as maintained under the supervision of the state registrar of vital statistics.

PART V

INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY ACCOUNTING REVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 501. A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The consolidated technology services revolving account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from agency fees and charges for services collected from public agencies must be deposited into the account. The account must be used for the:

(a) Acquisition of equipment, software, supplies, and services; and

(b) Payment of salaries, wages, and other costs incidental to the acquisition, development, maintenance, operation, and administration of: (i) Information services; (ii) telecommunications; (iii) systems; (iv) software; (v) supplies; and (vi) equipment, including the payment of principal and interest on debt by the agency and other users as determined by the office of financial management.

(2) The director or the director's designee, with the approval of the technology services board, is authorized to expend up to one million dollars per fiscal biennium for the technology services board to conduct independent technical and financial analysis of proposed information technology projects.

(3) Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Expenditures for the strategic planning and policy component of the agency are subject to appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502. A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The statewide information technology system development revolving account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from legislative appropriations and assessments to agencies for the development and acquisition of enterprise information technology systems must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. The account must be used solely for the development and acquisition of enterprise information technology systems that are consistent with the enterprise-based strategy established by the consolidated technology services agency in RCW 43.105.047 (as recodified by this act). Expenditures from the account may not be used for maintenance and operations of enterprise information technology systems. The account may be used for the payment of salaries, wages, and other costs directly related to the development and acquisition of enterprise information technology systems.

(2) All payment of principal and interest on debt issued for enterprise information technology systems must be paid from the account.

(3) The office may contract for the development or acquisition of enterprise information technology systems.

(4) For the purposes of this section and section 503 of this act, "enterprise information technology system" means an information technology system that serves agencies with a certain business need or process that are required to use the system unless the agency has received a waiver from the state chief information officer. "Enterprise information technology system" also includes projects that are of statewide significance including enterprise-level solutions, enterprise resource planning, and shared services initiatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503. A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The statewide information technology system maintenance and operations revolving account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from fees, charges for services, and assessments to agencies for the maintenance and operations of enterprise information technology systems must be deposited into the account. The account must be used solely for the maintenance and operations of enterprise information technology systems.

(2) Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditure.

(3) The office may contract with the consolidated technology services agency for the billing of fees, charges for services, and assessments to agencies, and for the maintenance and operations of enterprise information technology systems.

(4) "Enterprise information technology system" has the definition in section 502 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504. A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The shared information technology system revolving account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from fees, charges for services, and assessments to agencies for shared information technology systems must be deposited into the account.

(2) Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditure.

(3) The office may contract with the consolidated technology services agency for the billing of fees, charges for services, and assessments to agencies, and for the development, maintenance, and operations of shared information technology systems.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "shared information technology system" means an information technology system that is available to, but not required for use by, agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505. The office of financial management must convene a work group consisting of representatives of the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, legislative staff of the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate, consolidated technology services agency, and the department of enterprise services. The purpose of the work group is to review and update the central services model that allocates state funds for budgeting the costs of central services. The work group must review the services and activities performed by each agency and develop a system of rates and charges to fund these services and activities. In addition, the work group must review each agency's chart of accounts and propose a structure to better align the budget reporting systems with each agency's current operational structure and to provide greater transparency in revenues and expenditures. These tasks should be completed in anticipation of the governor's 2017-2019 biennial budget submission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506. RCW 43.19.791 (Data processing revolving fund—Created—Use) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 976 & 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 906 are each repealed, effective January 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507. No later than December 31, 2015, any residual balance of funds remaining in the data processing revolving fund repealed by section 506 of this act shall be apportioned by the director of financial management to the appropriate accounts created in sections 501 through 504 of this act.

PART VI

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 601. (1) All powers, duties, and functions of the office of the chief information officer within the office of financial management pertaining to the office of the chief information officer are transferred to the consolidated technology services agency.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the office of the chief information officer within the office of financial management pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the consolidated technology services agency. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the office of the chief information officer within the office of financial management in carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be made available to the consolidated technology services agency. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be assigned to the consolidated technology services agency.

(b) Any appropriations made to the office of the chief information officer within the office of financial management for carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the consolidated technology services agency.

(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All rules and all pending business before the office of the chief information officer within the office of financial management pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the consolidated technology services agency. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the consolidated technology services agency.

(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the office of the chief information officer within the office of financial management shall not affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of this section.

(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(6) All exempt employees of the office of the chief information officer within the office of financial management engaged in performing the powers, duties, and functions transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the consolidated technology services agency. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the consolidated technology services agency to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602. (1) All powers, duties, and functions of the department of enterprise services pertaining to statewide information technology services and applications are transferred to the consolidated technology services agency.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of enterprise services pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the consolidated technology services agency. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of enterprise services in carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be made available to the consolidated technology services agency. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be assigned to the consolidated technology services agency.

(b) Any appropriations made to the department of enterprise services for carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the consolidated technology services agency.

(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All rules and all pending business before the department of enterprise services pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the consolidated technology services agency. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the consolidated technology services agency.

(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of enterprise services shall not affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of this section.

(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(6) All employees of the department of enterprise services engaged in performing the powers, duties, and functions transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the consolidated technology services agency. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the consolidated technology services agency to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(7) Positions in any bargaining unit within the consolidated technology services agency existing on the effective date of this section will not be removed from the existing bargaining unit as a result of this section unless and until modified by the public employment relations commission pursuant to a petition filed under Title 391 WAC. No positions will be added to any bargaining unit within the consolidated technology services agency as a result of this section unless and until the parties have fulfilled their bargaining obligation and the bargaining unit is modified by the public employment relations commission pursuant to a petition filed under Title 391 WAC.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603. Sections 401 through 405, 409, 411, and 412 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 24, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604. Sections 101 through 109, 201 through 224, 406 through 408, 410, 501 through 507, 601, and 602 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---