BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The bright futures guidelines issued by the American academy of pediatrics outline recommended well-child visit schedules and universal screening of children for autism and developmental delays. Private health plans established after March 2010 are required to comply with the bright futures guidelines as the standard for preventive services. The federal law does not require medicaid programs to follow the guidelines; however, thirty states completely cover the bright futures guidelines, six states cover all but one well-child screen, and six additional states cover all but developmental and autism screens as part of their medicaid programs.

(2) The 2012 Washington state legislature directed the Washington state institute for public policy to assess the costs and benefits of implementing the guidelines. The research indicates that fewer than half of children with developmental delays are identified before starting school and roughly half of children with autism spectrum disorder are diagnosed only after entering school, by which time significant delays may have occurred and opportunities for treatment may have been missed. Adopting the universal screening guidelines improves early diagnosis and enables early intervention with appropriate therapies and services. The annual cost to society for caring for children with autism or developmental delays can be significant, including cost of services, special education, informal care, and lost productivity. Early intervention and access to appropriate therapies mitigate long-term societal costs and improve the health and opportunity for the child.

(3) The more adverse experiences a child has, such as the burden of family economic hardship and social bias, the greater the likelihood of developmental delays and later health problems. Over forty-six percent of Washington's children have medicaid apple health for kids and have a much greater likelihood of reporting poor to very poor health compared to children who have commercial insurance. Disparities also exist in the diagnosis and initiation of treatment services for children of color. Research shows that children of color are diagnosed later and begin receiving early intervention services later. This health equity gap can be addressed by identifying and supporting children early through universal screening.

(4) Primary care providers currently see ninety-nine percent of children between birth and three years of age and are uniquely situated to access nearly all children with universal screening.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.09.520 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The term "medical assistance" may include the following care and services subject to rules adopted by the authority or department: (a) Inpatient hospital services; (b) outpatient hospital services; (c) other laboratory and X-ray services; (d) nursing facility services; (e) physicians' services, which shall include prescribed medication and instruction on birth control devices; (f) medical care, or any other type of remedial care as may be established by the secretary or director; (g) home health care services; (h) private duty nursing services; (i) dental services; (j) physical and occupational therapy and related services; (k) prescribed drugs, dentures, and prosthetic devices; and eyeglasses prescribed by a physician skilled in diseases of the eye or by an optometrist, whichever the individual may select; (l) personal care services, as provided in this section; (m) hospice services; (n) other diagnostic, screening, preventive, and rehabilitative services; and (o) like services when furnished to a child by a school district in a manner consistent with the requirements of this chapter. For the purposes of this section, neither the authority nor the department may cut off any prescription medications, oxygen supplies, respiratory services, or other life-sustaining medical services or supplies.

"Medical assistance," notwithstanding any other provision of law, shall not include routine foot care, or dental services delivered by any health care provider, that are not mandated by Title XIX of the social security act unless there is a specific appropriation for these services.

(2) The department shall adopt, amend, or rescind such administrative rules as are necessary to ensure that Title XIX personal care services are provided to eligible persons in conformance with federal regulations.

(a) These administrative rules shall include financial eligibility indexed according to the requirements of the social security act providing for medicaid eligibility.

(b) The rules shall require clients be assessed as having a medical condition requiring assistance with personal care tasks. Plans of care for clients requiring health-related consultation for assessment and service planning may be reviewed by a nurse.

(c) The department shall determine by rule which clients have a health-related assessment or service planning need requiring registered nurse consultation or review. This definition may include clients that meet indicators or protocols for review, consultation, or visit.

(3) The department shall design and implement a means to assess the level of functional disability of persons eligible for personal care services under this section. The personal care services benefit shall be provided to the extent funding is available according to the assessed level of functional disability. Any reductions in services made necessary for funding reasons should be accomplished in a manner that assures that priority for maintaining services is given to persons with the greatest need as determined by the assessment of functional disability.

(4) Effective July 1, 1989, the authority shall offer hospice services in accordance with available funds.

(5) For Title XIX personal care services administered by aging and disability services administration of the department, the department shall contract with area agencies on aging:

(a) To provide case management services to individuals receiving Title XIX personal care services in their own home; and

(b) To reassess and reauthorize Title XIX personal care services or other home and community services as defined in RCW 74.39A.009 in home or in other settings for individuals consistent with the intent of this section:

(i) Who have been initially authorized by the department to receive Title XIX personal care services or other home and community services as defined in RCW 74.39A.009; and

(ii) Who, at the time of reassessment and reauthorization, are receiving such services in their own home.

(6) In the event that an area agency on aging is unwilling to enter into or satisfactorily fulfill a contract or an individual consumer's need for case management services will be met through an alternative delivery system, the department is authorized to:

(a) Obtain the services through competitive bid; and

(b) Provide the services directly until a qualified contractor can be found.

(7) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the authority may offer medicare part D prescription drug copayment coverage to full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries.

(8) Effective January 1, 2016, the authority shall require universal screening and provider payment for autism and developmental delays as recommended by the bright futures guidelines of the American academy of pediatrics, as they existed on the effective date of this section. This requirement is subject to the availability of funds.

--- END ---