BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.92.005 and 2014 c 53 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Community and technical colleges shall provide financial aid application due dates and information on whether or not financial aid will be awarded on a rolling basis to their admitted students at the time of acceptance. State universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall provide financial aid application due dates and information in written or electronic form for prospective and admitted students. All institutions of higher education eligible to participate in the state need grant program under this chapter are encouraged to post financial aid application dates and distribution policies on their web sites.

--- END ---