BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

When an authority constructs or operates a transportation facility, it must consider the potential impacts of that facility on parking availability for residents nearby and develop mitigation strategies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

A city with a population of more than six hundred thousand that has implemented restricted parking zones in residential areas as a direct result of the parking impacts of a regional transit authority facility must:

(1) Honor all requests for restricted parking zone permits;

(2) Charge no more than five dollars per year for restricted parking zone permits; and

(3) Allow restricted parking zone permits for registered nonprofits located within a restricted parking zone.

--- END ---