BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When requested by first responders during an emergency, employees of companies providing personal emergency response services must provide to first responders the name, address, and any other information necessary for first responders to contact subscribers within the jurisdiction of the emergency.

(2) Companies providing personal emergency response services may adopt policies to respond to requests from first responders to release subscriber contact information during an emergency. Policies may include procedures to:

(a) Verify that the requester is a first responder;

(b) Verify that the request is made pursuant to an emergency;

(c) Fulfill the request by providing the subscriber contact information; and

(d) Deny the request if no emergency exists or if the requester is not a first responder.

(3) Information received by a first responder under subsection (1) of this section is confidential and exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW, and may be used only in responding to the emergency that prompted the request for information. Any first responder receiving the information must destroy it at the end of the emergency.

(4) It is not a violation of this section if a personal emergency response services company or an employee makes a good faith effort to comply with this section. In addition, the company or employee is immune from civil liability for a good faith effort to comply with this section. Should a company or employee prevail upon the defense provided in this section, the company or employee is entitled to recover expenses and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in establishing the defense.

(5) First responders and their employing jurisdictions are not liable for failing to request the information in subsection (1) of this section. In addition, this act does not create a private right of action nor does it create any civil liability on the part of the state or any of its subdivisions, including first responders.

(6) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Emergency" means an occurrence that renders the personal emergency response services system inoperable for a period of twenty-four or more continuous hours, and that requires the attention of first responders acting within the scope of their official duties.

(b) "First responder" means firefighters, law enforcement officers, and emergency medical personnel, as licensed or certificated by this state.

(c) "Personal emergency response services" means a service provided for profit that allows persons in need of emergency assistance to contact a call center by activating a wearable device, such as a pendant or bracelet.

(7) This section does not require a personal emergency response services company to:

(a) Provide first responders with subscriber contact information in nonemergency situations; or

(b) Provide subscriber contact information to entities other than first responders.

--- END ---