BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.34.030 and 2009 c 202 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any power or powers, privileges or authority exercised or capable of exercise by a public agency of this state may be exercised and enjoyed jointly with any other public agency of this state having the power or powers, privilege or authority, and jointly with any public agency of any other state or of the United States to the extent that laws of such other state or of the United States permit such joint exercise or enjoyment. Any agency of the state government when acting jointly with any public agency may exercise and enjoy all of the powers, privileges and authority conferred by this chapter upon a public agency.

(2) Any two or more public agencies may enter into agreements with one another for joint or cooperative action pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, except that any such joint or cooperative action by public agencies which are educational service districts and/or school districts shall comply with the provisions of RCW 28A.320.080. Appropriate action by ordinance, resolution or otherwise pursuant to law of the governing bodies of the participating public agencies shall be necessary before any such agreement may enter into force.

(3) Any such agreement shall specify the following:

(a) Its duration;

(b) The precise organization, composition and nature of any separate legal or administrative entity created thereby together with the powers delegated thereto, provided such entity may be legally created. Such entity may include a nonprofit corporation organized pursuant to chapter 24.03 or 24.06 RCW whose membership is limited solely to the participating public agencies or a partnership organized pursuant to chapter 25.04 or 25.05 RCW whose partners are limited solely to participating public agencies, or a limited liability company organized under chapter 25.15 RCW whose membership is limited solely to participating public agencies, and the funds of any such corporation, partnership, or limited liability company shall be subject to audit in the manner provided by law for the auditing of public funds;

(c) Its purpose or purposes;

(d) The manner of financing the joint or cooperative undertaking and of establishing and maintaining a budget therefor;

(e) The permissible method or methods to be employed in accomplishing the partial or complete termination of the agreement and for disposing of property upon such partial or complete termination; and

(f) Any other necessary and proper matters.

(4) In the event that the agreement does not establish a separate legal entity to conduct the joint or cooperative undertaking, the agreement shall contain, in addition to provisions specified in subsection (3)(a), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section, the following:

(a) Provision for an administrator or a joint board responsible for administering the joint or cooperative undertaking. In the case of a joint board, public agencies that are party to the agreement shall be represented; and

(b) The manner of acquiring, holding and disposing of real and personal property used in the joint or cooperative undertaking. Any joint board is authorized to establish a special fund with a state, county, city, or district treasurer servicing an involved public agency designated "Operating fund of . . . . . . joint board".

(5) No agreement made pursuant to this chapter relieves any public agency of any obligation or responsibility imposed upon it by law except that:

(a) To the extent of actual and timely performance thereof by a joint board or other legal or administrative entity created by an agreement made pursuant to this chapter, the performance may be offered in satisfaction of the obligation or responsibility; and

(b) With respect to one or more public agencies purchasing or otherwise contracting through a bid, proposal, or contract awarded by another public agency or by a group of public agencies, any statutory obligation to provide notice for bids or proposals that applies to the public agencies involved is satisfied if the public agency or group of public agencies that awarded the bid, proposal, or contract complied with its own statutory requirements and either (i) posted the bid or solicitation notice on a web site established and maintained by a public agency, purchasing cooperative, or similar service provider, for purposes of posting public notice of bid or proposal solicitations, or (ii) provided an access link on the state's web portal to the notice.

(6)(a) Any two or more public agencies may enter into a contract providing for the joint utilization of architectural or engineering services if:

(i) The agency contracting with the architectural or engineering firm complies with the requirements for contracting for such services under chapter 39.80 RCW; and

(ii) The services to be provided to the other agency or agencies are related to, and within the general scope of, the services the architectural or engineering firm was selected to perform.

(b) Any agreement providing for the joint utilization of architectural or engineering services under this subsection must be executed for a scope of work specifically detailed in the agreement and must be entered into prior to commencement of procurement of such services under chapter 39.80 RCW.

(7) Financing of joint projects by agreement shall be as provided by law.

--- END ---