BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of fish and wildlife must establish a pilot program to coordinate the statewide collection and recycling of fishing line or monofilament. The program must consist of indoor and outdoor collection bins located at or near established fishing areas, boat ramps, and other interested locations. The department must provide signage to each collection point explaining the program and the benefits of monofilament recycling.

(2) The department of fish and wildlife may work cooperatively with other state agencies and interested parties to establish a system to check the collection bins regularly and remove monofilament for recycling and to encourage volunteer participation in the program.

(3) The department of fish and wildlife must submit a report to the legislature by December 1, 2017, on the following:

(a) A description of the level of coordination between the department and other state agencies and interested parties;

(b) Collection point locations;

(c) Data collected about the monofilament, including the amount collected by weight or by another reasonable measurement;

(d) A description of monofilament recycling-related community outreach or education efforts conducted by the department or its program partners;

(e) A plan to establish the monofilament recycling program on a permanent basis, including action items for the legislature to consider; and

(f) An estimate of costs and resources required to implement the plan identified in (e) of this subsection.

(4) This section expires December 31, 2017.

--- END ---