BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

2015-2017 FISCAL BIENNIUM

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The transportation budget of the state is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the several amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and for other specified purposes, including the payment of any final judgments arising out of such activities, for the period ending June 30, 2017.

(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act.

(a) "Fiscal year 2016" or "FY 2016" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016.

(b) "Fiscal year 2017" or "FY 2017" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017.

(c) "FTE" means full-time equivalent.

(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.

(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

(f) "Reappropriation" means appropriation and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, is subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations.

(g) "LEAP" means the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.

(h) "TEIS" means the transportation executive information system.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES—OPERATING

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$492,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation is provided solely for staffing costs to be dedicated to state transportation activities. Staff hired to support transportation activities must have practical experience with complex construction projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102. FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Grade Crossing Protective Account—State Appropriation. . . .$504,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$926,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$185,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,111,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $70,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the state's share of the marine salary survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105. FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$563,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106. FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,858,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107. FOR THE SENATE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,695,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$25,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$986,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$502,000

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES—OPERATING

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201. FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,081,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$27,535,000

Highway Safety Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$118,000

School Zone Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,600,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$32,334,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202. FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,007,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$2,370,000

County Arterial Preservation Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$1,525,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,902,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Transportation Improvement Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$4,027,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204. FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$958,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205. FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,101,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$4,210,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation. . . .$112,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,322,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Consistent with RCW 43.135.055 and 47.46.100, during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature authorizes the transportation commission to periodically review and, if necessary, adjust the schedule of toll charges applicable to the Tacoma Narrows bridge only in amounts not greater than those sufficient to support (a) any required costs for operating and maintaining the toll bridge, including the cost of insurance, (b) any amount required by law to meet the redemption of bonds and applicable interest payments, and (c) repayment of the motor vehicle fund.

(2) Consistent with RCW 43.135.055 and 47.56.880, during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature authorizes the transportation commission to set, periodically review, and, if necessary, adjust the schedule of toll charges applicable to the Interstate 405 express toll lanes.

(3) $1,800,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of a pilot road usage charge system in Washington state.

(a) The transportation commission must serve as lead coordinator of a pilot project to identify and evaluate operational aspects and public acceptance issues related to a potential road usage charge system.

(b) The pilot project must be carried out statewide, including participants who reside in diverse geographies across the state, to ensure representative participation from dense metropolitan regions, suburban areas, population centers bordering another state or Canada, and rural areas.

(c) The pilot project must:

(i) Include at least three payment choices, including one charge measurement and payment alternative that does not rely on electronic vehicle location data;

(ii) Ensure the processes for collecting, managing, storing, transmitting, and destroying data are in place to protect the integrity of the data and safeguard the driver's privacy both during and after the pilot test period;

(iii) Must assess public acceptance before, during, and after the test period, and report the results to the governor and legislature.

(d) The transportation commission must prepare and submit a report of its findings based on the results of the pilot project to the governor and the house of representatives and senate transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2017. At a minimum, the report must address the following issues:

(i) Cost of implementation and operation, and opportunities for cost reduction;

(ii) Privacy protection and data security measures;

(iii) Cross-jurisdictional issues;

(iv) Compliance and enforcement, including processes and security measures necessary to minimize fraud and tax evasion;

(v) Administrative and operational issues, including any necessary updates or changes to existing agency processes or systems upon which a road usage charge system would rely;

(vi) Mileage reporting technologies, including the advantages and disadvantages of various types of mileage reporting techniques;

(vii) Potential for additional driver services; and

(viii) Public acceptance.

(e) The Washington road usage charge steering committee must be provided quarterly updates on the pilot project and its results.

(f) The transportation commission must convene a technical working group comprised of personnel from other state agencies that potentially have a role in administering or enforcing, or both, a road usage charge system. The purpose of the working group is to ensure interagency coordination in the successful implementation and completion of the road usage charge pilot project.

(4) $200,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the voice of Washington survey program. The funding must be utilized for continued program maintenance, annual ferry rider opinion group surveys, and two transportation surveys for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation. . . .$427,699,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$13,348,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Private/Local

Appropriation. . . .$3,850,000

Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$510,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation. . . .$276,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$445,683,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $800,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the justice information data exchange. The e-trip governance committee must continue to administer the justice information data exchange program and work with the consolidated technology services agency to find ways to make the justice information data exchange more efficient and less expensive in fiscal year 2017.

(2) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed employment providing traffic control services to the department of transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol must be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol.

(3) $510,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the ignition interlock program at the Washington state patrol to provide funding for two staff to work and provide support for the program in working with manufacturers, service centers, technicians, and participants in the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account—State Appropriation. . . .$34,000

Motorcycle Safety Education Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$4,504,000

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,018,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$195,573,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$3,573,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$87,201,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$362,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,544,000

Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$5,110,000

Department of Licensing Services Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$6,748,000

License Plate Technology Account—State Appropriation. . . .$7,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$312,667,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department must convene a work group to explore options and incentives to increase the online utilization rate for any transaction requiring paper or postage. The department must draft a report, outlining options to achieve fifty percent, seventy-five percent, and one hundred percent online utilization, including the advantages and drawbacks of each option being considered. The department must present the report to the office of financial management and the transportation chairs of the legislature by October 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE—PROGRAM B

High Occupancy Toll Lanes Operations Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$2,739,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,612,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$44,403,000

State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$4,032,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$26,422,000

Interstate 405 Express Toll Lanes Operations

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$9,931,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$89,139,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,300,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation and $8,157,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of addressing unforeseen operations and maintenance costs on the Tacoma Narrows bridge and the state route number 520 bridge, respectively. The office of financial management shall place the amounts provided in this section, which represent a portion of the required minimum fund balance under the policy of the state treasurer, in unallotted status. The office may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for operations and maintenance purposes have been exhausted.

(2) $4,156,000 of the state route number 520 civil penalties account—state appropriation and $780,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation are provided solely for expenditures related to the toll adjudication process. The department shall report on the civil penalty process to the office of financial management and the house of representatives and senate transportation committees by the end of each calendar quarter. The reports must include a summary table for each toll facility that includes: The number of notices of civil penalty issued; the number of recipients who pay before the notice becomes a penalty; the number of recipients who request a hearing and the number who do not respond; workload costs related to hearings; the cost and effectiveness of debt collection activities; and revenues generated from notices of civil penalty.

(3) The department shall make detailed quarterly expenditure reports available to the transportation commission and to the public on the department's web site using current department resources. The reports must include a summary of toll revenue by facility on all operating toll facilities and high occupancy toll lane systems, and an itemized depiction of the use of that revenue.

(4) The department shall make detailed quarterly reports to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature on the use of consultants in the tolling program. The reports must include the name of the contractor, the scope of work, the type of contract, timelines, deliverables, any new task orders, and any extensions to existing consulting contracts.

(5) $596,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, $1,124,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, and $56,000 of the high occupancy toll lanes operations account—state appropriation are provided solely in anticipation of, and to prepare for, the procurement of a new tolling customer service center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY—PROGRAM C

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$1,460,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$69,391,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$263,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation. . . .$2,883,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation. . . .$1,460,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$75,457,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND CONSTRUCTION—PROGRAM D—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$27,949,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$34,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$27,983,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Predesign funds are provided solely to develop plans to renovate the department's northwest regional headquarters office building in Shoreline, Washington. Up to $169,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation must be used to develop the predesign to house the department's northwest regional headquarters, tenants from the department of ecology's northwest regional headquarters, and other small agencies as space allows. The predesign must be developed in collaboration with representatives from the department of ecology and the office of financial management's facilities oversight program. The predesign must identify the best use of existing space in a modern open office configuration supporting alternative workplace strategies. The predesign must identify any required mitigation, parking and road improvements, and schedule and cost of construction. The predesign must document the anticipated financing structure and repayment plan, including the expected lease costs for the department of ecology. The predesign must be provided to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—AVIATION—PROGRAM F

Aeronautics Account—State Appropriation. . . .$7,591,000

Aeronautics Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$4,100,000

Aeronautics Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$60,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$11,751,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL CLIMATE INITIATIVES—PROGRAM G

Local Green Initiatives Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,750,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department must create a steering committee composed of members from the department of transportation, the department of ecology, the department of commerce, the association of Washington cities, and the Washington state association of counties to establish a grant program to cities, counties, tribes, transit organizations, and nonprofit transportation providers to enhance their energy efficiency efforts including, but not limited to, conversion to electric vehicle fleets, establishment of electric vehicle charging stations, practical design training, conversion to LED lights, and other energy efficiency uses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT—PROGRAM H

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$55,386,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$500,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation. . . .$250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$56,136,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The real estate services division of the department must recover the cost of its efforts from sale proceeds and fund additional future sales from those proceeds.

(2) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department shall create a quality assurance position. This position must provide independent project quality assurance validation and ensure that quality assurance audit functions are accountable at the highest level of the organization.

(3) $673,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely to support increased departmental efforts to dispose of surplus property as directed in subsection (1) of this section. These additional funds are expected to result in up to $5,000,000 per fiscal biennium in additional revenues through increasing the sale of surplus property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS—PROGRAM K

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$604,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,500,000

Transportation Innovative Partnership Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$2,232,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,336,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The economic partnerships program must continue to explore retail partnerships at state-owned park-and-ride facilities, as authorized in RCW 47.04.295.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE—PROGRAM M

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$10,000,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$405,622,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$7,000,000

Sustainability Account—State Appropriation. . . .$11,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$433,622,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,000,000 of the sustainability account—state appropriation and $3,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for inventorying risks to critical transportation infrastructure by using aerial light detection and ranging (LiDAR) imaging data to identify dangerous landslide slopes, tsunami, and flood problem areas. The department must partner with the department of natural resources to accomplish this task.

(2) The department must make signage for low-height bridges a high priority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRAFFIC OPERATIONS—PROGRAM Q—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$53,610,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,050,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$250,000

Sustainability Account—State Appropriation. . . .$4,200,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$60,110,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT—PROGRAM S

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$28,023,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,003,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,131,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$31,157,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH—PROGRAM T

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$22,524,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$24,885,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,180,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation. . . .$2,809,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local

Appropriation. . . .$100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$53,498,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES—PROGRAM U

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$73,603,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$500,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,082,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$77,185,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION—PROGRAM V

State Vehicle Parking Account—State Appropriation. . . .$754,000

Regional Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$85,000,000

Rural Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$17,000,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$51,065,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation. . . .$3,242,000

Public Transportation Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$25,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$182,061,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $30,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of transportation.

(2) $17,000,000 of the rural mobility grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to aid small cities in rural areas as prescribed in RCW 47.66.100.

(3) $6,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (a) Public transit agencies to add vanpools or replace vans; and (b) incentives for employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; operating costs for public transit agencies are not eligible for funding under this grant program. Additional employees may not be hired from the funds provided in this section for the vanpool grant program, and supplanting of transit funds currently funding vanpools is not allowed. The department shall encourage grant applicants and recipients to leverage funds other than state funds.

(4) $85,000,000 of the regional mobility grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for the regional mobility grant program. The department shall review all projects receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project that has been awarded funds, but does not report activity on the project within one year of the grant award, must be reviewed by the department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The department shall promptly close out grants when projects have been completed.

(5) Funds provided for the commute trip reduction (CTR) program may also be used for the growth and transportation efficiency center program.

(6)(a) $12,424,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to local jurisdictions, selected by the CTR board, for the purpose of assisting employers meet CTR goals;

(b) $754,000 of the state vehicle parking account—state appropriation is provided solely for CTR-related expenditures, including all expenditures related to the guaranteed ride home program and the STAR pass program.

(7) $200,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is contingent on the timely development of an annual report summarizing the status of public transportation systems as identified under RCW 35.58.2796.

(8) $25,000,000 of the public transportation grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for capital transit projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—MARINE—PROGRAM X

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$509,703,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—Private/Local

Appropriation. . . .$121,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$509,824,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of financial management budget instructions require agencies to recast enacted budgets into activities. The Washington state ferries shall include a greater level of detail in its 2015-2017 supplemental and 2017-2019 omnibus transportation appropriations act requests, as determined jointly by the office of financial management, the Washington state ferries, and the transportation committees of the legislature. This level of detail must include the administrative functions in the operating as well as capital programs.

(2) For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the department may enter into a distributor controlled fuel hedging program and other methods of hedging approved by the fuel hedging committee.

(3) $102,564,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for auto ferry vessel operating fuel in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. The amount provided in this subsection represent the fuel budget for the purposes of calculating any ferry fare fuel surcharge.

(4) When purchasing uniforms that are required by collective bargaining agreements, the department shall contract with the lowest cost provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—RAIL—PROGRAM Y—OPERATING

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$60,044,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z—OPERATING

Complete Streets Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$9,750,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$9,399,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,567,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$21,716,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $9,750,000 of the complete streets grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to cities and towns for streets that are comprehensively designed to include convenient access to community destinations and public places whether walking, driving, bicycling, or taking public transportation.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES—CAPITAL

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301. FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Freight Mobility Investment Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$12,147,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$2,250,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$84,000

Freight Mobility Multimodal Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$14,496,000

Freight Mobility Multimodal Account—Private/Local

Appropriation. . . .$1,065,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$30,042,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,200,000 of the freight mobility investment account—state appropriation and $7,200,000 of the freight mobility multimodal account—state appropriation are provided solely for at-grade railroad crossing projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation. . . .$5,636,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $400,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for unforeseen emergency repairs on facilities.

(2) $560,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of the roofs of the Shelton academy multipurpose building, Tacoma district office building, Kennewick detachment building, and Ridgefield and Plymouth buildings.

(3) $326,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for upgrades to scales at Vernita and Goldendale required to meet current certification requirements and to complete an engineering study to support future development at Home Valley.

(4) $2,350,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for funding to repair and replace the academy asphalt emergency vehicle operation course.

(5) $500,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacement of generators at Marysville, Baw Faw, Gardner, Pilot Rock, and Ridpath.

(6) $150,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for painting and caulking in several locations.

(7) $350,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for pavement preservation at the Wenatchee district office and the Spokane district office.

(8) $700,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for energy upgrades at two district offices and two detachments.

(9) $300,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for repair of the academy training tank.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303. FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$48,000,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$706,000

County Arterial Preservation Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$33,333,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$82,039,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $2,083,000 of county arterial preservation account—state appropriation is provided solely for enhanced rural arterial projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Small City Pavement and Sidewalk Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$8,017,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$10,000,000

Transportation Improvement Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$233,972,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$251,989,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for:

(a) The arterial preservation program to help low tax-based, medium-sized cities preserve arterial pavements;

(b) The small city pavement program to help cities meet urgent preservation needs; and

(c) The small city low-energy street light retrofit demonstration program.

(2) $6,000,000 of the transportation improvement account—state appropriation is provided solely for enhanced urban arterial projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—FACILITIES—PROGRAM D—(DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)—CAPITAL

Transportation Partnership Account—State Appropriation. . . .$211,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$5,930,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$6,141,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—IMPROVEMENTS—PROGRAM I

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$1,034,309,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$137,168,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$254,838,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$168,271,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$368,100,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—Federal

Appropriation. . . .$104,801,000

State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$23,000,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$21,388,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$50,110,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation. . . .$154,367,000

Sustainability Account—State Appropriation. . . .$43,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,359,352,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in TEIS List 15GOV003, Program - Highway Improvement Program (I). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601 of this act.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in TEIS List 15GOV003, Program - Highway Improvement Program (I). The department shall apply any federal funds gained through efficiencies or the redistribution process in an amount up to $27,200,000 for cost overruns related to the pontoon design errors on the SR 520 Bridge Replacement and HOV project (8BI1003).

(3) Within the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, the department may transfer funds between programs I and P, except for funds that are otherwise restricted in this act.

(4) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation includes up to $145,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.861.

(5) The transportation partnership account—state appropriation includes up to $920,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PRESERVATION—PROGRAM P

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$12,057,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$10,000,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$63,660,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$323,508,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$8,104,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$1,723,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$5,296,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation. . . .$40,458,000

Sustainability Account—State Appropriation. . . .$88,700,000

Recreational Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,509,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$555,015,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in TEIS List 15GOV003, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601 of this act.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in TEIS List 15GOV003, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). The department shall apply any federal funds gained through efficiencies or the redistribution process in an amount up to $27,200,000 for cost overruns related to the pontoon design errors on the SR 520 Bridge Replacement and HOV project (8BI1003).

(3) Within the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, the department may transfer funds between programs I and P, except for funds that are otherwise restricted in this act.

(4) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation includes up to $20,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.843.

(5) The motor vehicle account—state appropriation includes up to $5,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.843.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRAFFIC OPERATIONS—PROGRAM Q—CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$5,898,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$6,131,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$200,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$12,229,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION—PROGRAM W

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$45,228,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—Federal

Appropriation. . . .$131,523,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—Private/Local

Appropriation. . . .$10,331,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,779,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation. . . .$90,990,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State Appropriation. . . .$86,000,000

Sustainability Account—State Appropriation. . . .$12,100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$379,951,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed in TEIS List 15GOV003, Program - Washington State Ferries Capital Program (W).

(2) The Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation includes up to $21,600,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.843.

(3) $4,935,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for emergency capital repair costs (project 999910K). Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.

(4) $4,026,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the reservation and communications system projects (L200041 & L200042).

(5) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation includes up to $40,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.861.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—RAIL—PROGRAM Y—CAPITAL

Essential Rail Assistance Account—State Appropriation. . . .$820,000

Transportation Infrastructure Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$6,665,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation. . . .$11,658,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation. . . .$363,318,000

Sustainability Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,700,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$386,161,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in TEIS List 15GOV003, Program - Rail Program (Y).

(2) $2,500,000 of the sustainability account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional Palouse river and Coulee City rail line projects.

(3) $1,200,000 of the sustainability account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional freight rail assistance projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z—CAPITAL

Highway Infrastructure Account—State Appropriation. . . .$782,000

Highway Infrastructure Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$202,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$2,373,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$9,532,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$21,462,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$14,343,000

Bicycle and Pedestrian Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$12,500,000

Safe Routes to School Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$6,667,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$67,861,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in TEIS List 15GOV003, Program - Local Programs (Z).

(2) $10,527,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, $2,373,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, $13,965,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, and $9,532,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the base bicycle and pedestrian and safe routes to school grant programs.

(3) $6,667,000 of the safe routes to school grant program account—state appropriation is for an enhanced safe routes to school grant program.

(4) $12,500,000 of the bicycle and pedestrian grant program account—state appropriation is for an enhanced bicycle and pedestrian grant program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312. ANNUAL REPORTING REQUIREMENTS FOR CAPITAL PROGRAM

(1) As part of its budget submittal for the 2017 biennial budget, the department of transportation shall provide an update to the report provided to the legislature in 2013 that: (a) Compares the original project cost estimates approved in the 2003 and 2005 project lists to the completed cost of the project, or the most recent legislatively approved budget and total project costs for projects not yet completed; (b) identifies highway projects that may be reduced in scope and still achieve a functional benefit; (c) identifies highway projects that have experienced scope increases and that can be reduced in scope; (d) identifies highway projects that have lost significant local or regional contributions that were essential to completing the project; and (e) identifies contingency amounts allocated to projects.

(2) As part of its budget submittal for the 2017 biennial budget, the department of transportation shall provide an annual report on the number of toll credits the department has accumulated and how the department has used the toll credits.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 401. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$4,077,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$558,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation. . . .$103,000

Highway Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$1,227,974,000

Ferry Bond Retirement Account—State Appropriation. . . .$29,230,000

Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$16,128,000

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—

State Appropriation. . . .$26,848,000

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$82,838,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation. . . .$831,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,388,587,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Transportation Partnership Account—State Appropriation. . . .$817,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$112,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation. . . .$23,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation. . . .$168,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,120,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT TO BE PAID BY STATUTORILY PRESCRIBED REVENUE

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$200,638,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For

motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to cities

and counties. . . .$487,553,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For

motor vehicle fuel tax refunds and statutory

transfers. . . .$1,264,064,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING—TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For

motor vehicle fuel tax refunds and transfers. . . .$144,168,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—ADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS

(1) License Plate Technology Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Highway Safety

Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

(2) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the State Patrol Highway Account—State. . . .$27,000,000

(3) Sustainability Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Transportation Innovative

Partnership Account—State.. . . .$1,200,000

(4) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Puget Sound Capital Construction

Account—State. . . .$10,200,000

(5) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Highway Safety

Account—State. . . .$60,000,000

(6) Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry Operations

Account—State. . . .$35,000,000

(7) Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Ignition Interlock Device Revolving

Account—State.. . . .$1,625,000

(8) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry

Operations Account—State. . . .$17,000,000

(9) Rural Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Multimodal

Transportation Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

(10) State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the State

Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

(11) Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Transportation 2003

Account (Nickel Account)—State. . . .$21,209,000

(12) Sustainability Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Multimodal Transportation

Account—State. . . .$16,000,000

(13) Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle

Account—State. . . .$950,000

(14) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle

Account—State. . . .$16,000,000

COMPENSATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 501. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS NOT IMPAIRED

Nothing in this act prohibits the expenditure of any funds by an agency or institution of the state for benefits guaranteed by any collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS

Sections 503 through 516 of this act represent the results of the 2015-2017 collective bargaining process required under chapters 47.64, 41.80, and 41.56 RCW. Provisions of the collective bargaining agreements contained in sections 503 through 516 of this act are described in general terms. Only major economic terms are included in the descriptions. These descriptions do not contain the complete contents of the agreements. The collective bargaining agreements contained in sections 503 through 516 of this act may also be funded by expenditures from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—OPEIU

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the office and professional employees international union local eight (OPEIU) through an interest arbitration decision pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a two and one-half percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. The agreement also includes and funding is provided to move the relief dispatcher classification to the next higher classification and increase in call back pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—FASPAA

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the ferry agents, supervisors, and project administrators association through an interest arbitration decision pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for an increase in the vacation accrual rate schedule for employees hired before June 30, 2011, effective July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—SEIU LOCAL 6

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the service employees international union local six pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the negotiated three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for an increase in shift premium and foreman pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—CARPENTERS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Pacific Northwest regional council of carpenters through an interest arbitration award pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—METAL TRADES

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Puget Sound metal trades council through an interest arbitration decision pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a four percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—MEBA-UL

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the marine engineers' beneficial association unlicensed engine room employees through an interest arbitration decision pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded four percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a two and three-quarters percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for an increase in holiday pay from eight hours to twelve hours per holiday, an increase in maintenance and cure payments to injured employees, and an increase in the contribution to the training school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—MEBA-L

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the marine engineers' beneficial association licensed engineer officers through an interest arbitration decision pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded four percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a two and three-quarters percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for an increase holiday pay from eight hours to twelve hours per holiday, reimbursement for the cost of obtaining specified credentials, an increase in the contribution to temporary relief for employee's health care, an increase in maintenance and cure payments to injured employees, and an increase in the contribution to the training school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—MM&P MATES

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the masters, mates, and pilots - mates through an interest arbitration decision pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for an increase in call back pay and an increase in the Friday Harbor stipend. The agreement also eliminates a two-tiered vacation accrual schedule, replacing it with one schedule that includes increased accrual rates, effective July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—MM&P MASTERS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the masters, mates, and pilots - masters through an interest arbitration decision pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for increased vacation accrual rates for those employees hired before June 30, 2011, effective July 1, 2015, an increase in call back pay, an increase in assignment pay, and an increase in the Friday Harbor stipend.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—MM&P WATCH SUPERVISORS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the masters, mates, and pilots - watch supervisors through an interest arbitration decision pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded five percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and five percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for an increase in the basic shift premium, effective July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—IBU

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the inlandboatmen's union of the Pacific through an interest arbitration decision pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded two and one-half percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a two and one-half percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. The agreement also eliminates the entry level rate schedule and moves those employees to the higher temporary rate schedule, for which funding is provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—PTE LOCAL 17

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the professional and technical employees local seventeen under chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the negotiated three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase or a one percent general wage increase plus a flat twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective July 1, 2016. The agreement also includes targeted job classification specific increases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—WSP TROOPERS ASSOCIATION

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington state patrol troopers association through an interest arbitration decision under chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded seven percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. Funding is also provided for a three percent specialty pay for breath alcohol concentration technicians.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—WSP LIEUTENANTS ASSOCIATION

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington state patrol lieutenants association through an interest arbitration decision under chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded five percent salary increase effective July 1, 2015, and a five percent salary increase effective July 1, 2016. Funding is also provided to increase the annual clothing allowance and increase accumulated holiday credits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517. COMPENSATION—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—SUPER COALITION—INSURANCE BENEFITS

An agreement was reached for the 2015-2017 biennium between the governor and the health care super coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. Appropriations in this act for state agencies, including institutions of higher education are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2015-2017 collective bargaining agreement, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, must not exceed $913 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2016. For fiscal year 2017, the monthly employer funding rate must not exceed $947 per eligible employee.

(b) Except as provided by the parties' health care agreement, in order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the public employees' benefits board must require any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065.

(c) The health care authority must deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts must not be used for administrative expenditures.

(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board, must provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2016 and 2017, the subsidy must be up to $150.00 per month.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 518. COMPENSATION—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE SUPER COALITION—INSURANCE BENEFITS

Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for represented employees outside the super coalition for health benefits, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, must not exceed $913 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2016. For fiscal year 2017, the monthly employer funding rate must not exceed $947 per eligible employee.

(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the public employees' benefits board must require any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065.

(c) The health care authority must deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts must not be used for administrative expenditures.

(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board, must provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2016 and 2017, the subsidy must be up to $150.00 per month.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 519. COMPENSATION—NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—INSURANCE BENEFITS

Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for nonrepresented state employee health benefits for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan must not exceed $913 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2016. For fiscal year 2017, the monthly employer funding rate must not exceed $947 per eligible employee.

(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the public employees' benefits board must require any of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065.

(c) The health care authority must deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts must not be used for administrative expenditures.

(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board, must provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2016 and 2017, the subsidy must be up to $150.00 per month.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 520. GENERAL WAGE INCREASES

(1) Funding provided for state agency employee compensation for employees who are not represented or who bargain under statutory authority other than chapter 41.80 or 47.64 RCW or RCW 41.56.473 or 41.56.475 is sufficient for general wage increases.

(2) Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, for all classified employees, as specified in subsection (1) of this section. Also included are employees in the Washington management service and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the director of the office of financial management. The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a three percent salary increase effective July 1, 2015, for executive, legislative, and judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected officials.

(3) Funding is provided for a general wage increase of one and eight-tenths percent or a one percent general wage increase plus twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective July 1, 2016, for all classified employees, as specified in subsection (1) of this section. Also included are employees in the Washington management service and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the director of the office of financial management. The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a one and eight-tenths percent salary increase effective July 1, 2016, for executive, legislative, and judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected officials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 521. COMPENSATION AND BENEFITS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$196,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for wage increases and insurance benefits for legislative and judicial branch employees, as provided in sections 519 and 520 of this act, as shown in OFM Document 2015-01.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 522. TARGETED COMPENSATION INCREASES

Funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications, as specified by the office of financial management, of classified state employees, except those represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapters 41.80 and 47.64 RCW and RCW 41.56.473 and 41.56.475.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 523. COMPENSATION—REVISE PENSION CONTRIBUTION RATES

The appropriations for school districts and state agencies, including institutions of higher education, are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Appropriations are adjusted to reflect changes to agency appropriations to reflect pension contribution rates adopted by the pension funding council and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 board.

IMPLEMENTING PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 601. FUND TRANSFERS

(1) The transportation 2003 projects or improvements and the 2005 transportation partnership projects or improvements are listed in the TEIS list titled GOV2015 as developed December 17, 2014, which consists of a list of specific projects by fund source and amount over a ten-year period. Current fiscal biennium funding for each project is a line-item appropriation, while the outer year funding allocations represent a ten-year plan. The department is expected to use the flexibility provided in this section to assist in the delivery and completion of all transportation partnership account and transportation 2003 account (nickel account) projects on the LEAP transportation documents referenced in this act. However, this section does not apply to the I-5/Columbia River Crossing project (400506A). For the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 project appropriations, unless otherwise provided in this act, the director of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority between projects funded with transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriations, or transportation partnership account appropriations, in order to manage project spending and efficiently deliver all projects in the respective program under the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Transfers may only be made within each specific fund source referenced on the respective project list;

(b) Transfers from a project may not be made as a result of the reduction of the scope of a project or be made to support increases in the scope of a project;

(c) Each transfer between projects may only occur if the director of financial management finds that any resulting change will not hinder the completion of the projects as approved by the legislature. Until the legislature reconvenes to consider the 2014 supplemental omnibus transportation appropriations act, any unexpended 2011-2013 appropriation balance as approved by the office of financial management, in consultation with the legislative staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees, may be considered when transferring funds between projects;

(d) Transfers from a project may be made if the funds appropriated to the project are in excess of the amount needed to complete the project;

(e) Transfers may not occur for projects not identified on the applicable project list;

(f) Transfers may not be made while the legislature is in session; and

(g) Transfers between projects may be made, without the approval of the director of the office of financial management, by the department of transportation until the transfer amount by project exceeds two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or ten percent of the total project, whichever is less. These transfers must be reported quarterly to the director of financial management and the chairs of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees.

(2) At the time the department submits a request to transfer funds under this section, a copy of the request must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature.

(3) The office of financial management shall work with legislative staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees to review the requested transfers in a timely manner.

(4) The office of financial management shall document approved transfers and schedule changes in the transportation executive information system, compare changes to the legislative baseline funding and schedules identified by project identification number identified in the LEAP transportation documents referenced in this act, and transmit revised project lists to chairs of the transportation committees of the legislature on a quarterly basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

Except as otherwise provided in this act, the department may enter into a new agreement with King county for the purpose of public transportation mitigation for the SR 99/Alaskan Way Viaduct -Replacement project through the end of the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

(1) The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature detailing engineering errors on highway construction projects resulting in project cost increases in excess of five hundred thousand dollars. The department must submit a full report within ninety days of the negotiated change order resulting from the engineering error.

(2) The department's full report must include an assessment and review of:

(a) How the engineering error happened;

(b) The department of the employee or employees responsible for the engineering error, without disclosing the name of the employee or employees;

(c) What corrective action was taken;

(d) The estimated total cost of the engineering error and how the department plans to mitigate that cost;

(e) Whether the cost of the engineering error will impact the overall project financial plan; and

(f) What action the secretary has recommended to avoid similar engineering errors in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

The department must evaluate the transition of costs and staff from the improvement program to other agency operating programs, including maintenance, traffic operations, highway management, facility maintenance, tolling, and traffic operations. The evaluation should include the transfer of responsibilities for such areas as variable message signs, gantries, ramp meters, traffic management, tolling equipment, and general road maintenance. The evaluation must include an analysis of how responsibilities and costs are currently transferred from one program area to another and how this impacts budgeting and accounting. The department must make recommendations for more transparent program roles and responsibilities. By October 2015, the department must submit a report that addresses how completed improvements projects will be addressed by the remainder of the agency once the project is complete.

MISCELLANEOUS

Sec. 701. RCW 43.19.642 and 2013 c 306 s 701 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Effective June 1, 2006, for agencies complying with the ultra-low sulfur diesel mandate of the United States environmental protection agency for on-highway diesel fuel, agencies shall use biodiesel as an additive to ultra-low sulfur diesel for lubricity, provided that the use of a lubricity additive is warranted and that the use of biodiesel is comparable in performance and cost with other available lubricity additives. The amount of biodiesel added to the ultra-low sulfur diesel fuel shall be not less than two percent.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, effective June 1, 2009, state agencies are required to use a minimum of twenty percent biodiesel as compared to total volume of all diesel purchases made by the agencies for the operation of the agencies' diesel-powered vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment.

(3) All state agencies using biodiesel fuel shall, beginning on July 1, 2006, file biannual reports with the department of enterprise services documenting the use of the fuel and a description of how any problems encountered were resolved.

(4) By December 1, 2009, the department of enterprise services shall:

(a) Report to the legislature on the average true price differential for biodiesel by blend and location; and

(b) Examine alternative fuel procurement methods that work to address potential market barriers for in-state biodiesel producers and report these findings to the legislature.

(5) During the 2011-2013 ((and)), 2013-2015, and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the Washington state ferries is required to use a minimum of five percent biodiesel as compared to total volume of all diesel purchases made by the Washington state ferries for the operation of the Washington state ferries diesel-powered vessels, as long as the price of a B5 biodiesel blend does not exceed the price of conventional diesel fuel by five percent or more.

Sec. 702. RCW 46.68.060 and 2013 c 306 s 717 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund to be known as the highway safety fund to the credit of which must be deposited all moneys directed by law to be deposited therein. This fund must be used for carrying out the provisions of law relating to driver licensing, driver improvement, financial responsibility, cost of furnishing abstracts of driving records and maintaining such case records, and to carry out the purposes set forth in RCW 43.59.010, and chapters 46.72 and 46.72A RCW. During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the highway safety fund to the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the motor vehicle fund, and the multimodal transportation account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the highway safety fund. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the highway safety fund to the Puget Sound ferry operations account and the ignition interlock device revolving account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the highway safety fund.

Sec. 703. RCW 46.68.325 and 2013 c 306 s 706 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The rural mobility grant program account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the grants provided under RCW 47.66.100.

(2) Beginning September 2011, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the rural mobility grant program account two million five hundred thousand dollars.

(3) During the ((2011-2013 and)) 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the rural mobility grant program account to the multimodal transportation account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the rural mobility grant program account.

Sec. 704. RCW 46.68.370 and 2013 c 306 s 713 are each amended to read as follows:

The license plate technology account is created in the state treasury. All receipts collected under RCW 46.17.015 must be deposited into this account. Expenditures from this account must support current and future license plate technology and systems integration upgrades for both the department and correctional industries. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Additionally, the moneys in this account may be used to reimburse the motor vehicle account for any appropriation made to implement the digital license plate system. During the ((2011-2013 and)) 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the license plate technology account to the highway safety account [fund] such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the license plate technology account.

Sec. 705. RCW 47.28.030 and 2014 c 222 s 701 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A state highway shall be constructed, altered, repaired, or improved, and improvements located on property acquired for right-of-way purposes may be repaired or renovated pending the use of such right-of-way for highway purposes, by contract or state forces. The work or portions thereof may be done by state forces when the estimated costs thereof are less than fifty thousand dollars and effective July 1, 2005, sixty thousand dollars.

(b) When delay of performance of such work would jeopardize a state highway or constitute a danger to the traveling public, the work may be done by state forces when the estimated cost thereof is less than eighty thousand dollars and effective July 1, 2005, one hundred thousand dollars.

(c) When the department of transportation determines to do the work by state forces, it shall enter a statement upon its records to that effect, stating the reasons therefor.

(d) To enable a larger number of small businesses and veteran, minority, and women contractors to effectively compete for department of transportation contracts, the department may adopt rules providing for bids and award of contracts for the performance of work, or furnishing equipment, materials, supplies, or operating services whenever any work is to be performed and the engineer's estimate indicates the cost of the work would not exceed eighty thousand dollars and effective July 1, 2005, one hundred thousand dollars.

(2) The rules adopted under this section:

(a) Shall provide for competitive bids to the extent that competitive sources are available except when delay of performance would jeopardize life or property or inconvenience the traveling public; and

(b) Need not require the furnishing of a bid deposit nor a performance bond, but if a performance bond is not required then progress payments to the contractor may be required to be made based on submittal of paid invoices to substantiate proof that disbursements have been made to laborers, material suppliers, mechanics, and subcontractors from the previous partial payment; and

(c) May establish prequalification standards and procedures as an alternative to those set forth in RCW 47.28.070, but the prequalification standards and procedures under RCW 47.28.070 shall always be sufficient.

(3) The department of transportation shall comply with such goals and rules as may be adopted by the office of minority and women's business enterprises to implement chapter 39.19 RCW with respect to contracts entered into under this chapter. The department may adopt such rules as may be necessary to comply with the rules adopted by the office of minority and women's business enterprises under chapter 39.19 RCW.

(4)(a) For the period of March 15, ((2014))2015, through June 30, ((2015))2017, work for less than one hundred twenty thousand dollars may be performed on ferry vessels and terminals by state forces.

(b) The department shall hire a disinterested, third party to conduct an independent analysis to identify methods of reducing out-of-service times for vessel maintenance, preservation, and improvement projects. The analysis must include options that consider consolidating work while vessels are at shipyards by having state forces perform services traditionally performed at Eagle Harbor at the shipyard and decreasing the allowable time at shipyards. The analysis must also compare the out-of-service vessel times of performing services by state forces versus contracting out those services which in turn must be used to form a recommendation as to what the threshold of work performed on ferry vessels and terminals by state forces should be. This analysis must be presented to the transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1, 2010.

(c) The department shall develop a proposed ferry vessel maintenance, preservation, and improvement program and present it to the transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1, 2010. The proposed program must:

(i) Improve the basis for budgeting vessel maintenance, preservation, and improvement costs and for projecting those costs into a sixteen-year financial plan;

(ii) Limit the amount of planned out-of-service time to the greatest extent possible, including options associated with department staff as well as commercial shipyards; and

(iii) Be based on the service plan in the capital plan, recognizing that vessel preservation and improvement needs may vary by route.

(d) In developing the proposed ferry vessel maintenance, preservation, and improvement program, the department shall consider the following, related to reducing vessel out-of-service time:

(i) The costs compared to benefits of Eagle Harbor repair and maintenance facility operations options to include staffing costs and benefits in terms of reduced out-of-service time;

(ii) The maintenance requirements for on-vessel staff, including the benefits of a systemwide standard;

(iii) The costs compared to benefits of staff performing preservation or maintenance work, or both, while the vessel is underway, tied up between sailings, or not deployed;

(iv) A review of the department's vessel maintenance, preservation, and improvement program contracting process and contractual requirements;

(v) The costs compared to benefits of allowing for increased costs associated with expedited delivery;

(vi) A method for comparing the anticipated out-of-service time of proposed projects and other projects planned during the same construction period;

(vii) Coordination with required United States coast guard dry dockings;

(viii) A method for comparing how proposed projects relate to the service requirements of the route on which the vessel normally operates; and

(ix) A method for evaluating the ongoing maintenance and preservation costs associated with proposed improvement projects.

Sec. 706. RCW 47.56.876 and 2013 c 306 s 710 are each amended to read as follows:

A special account to be known as the state route number 520 civil penalties account is created in the state treasury. All state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV program civil penalties generated from the nonpayment of tolls on the state route number 520 corridor must be deposited into the account, as provided under RCW 47.56.870(4)(b)(vii). Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used to fund any project within the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV program, including mitigation. During the ((2011-2013 and)) 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the state route number 520 civil penalties account to the state route number 520 corridor account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the state route number 520 civil penalties account. Funds transferred must be used solely for capital expenditures for the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project (8BI1003).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---