BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the governor by executive order or either house of the legislature by resolution declares any administrative rule or policy of the department to be abrogated, such a rule or policy is null and void and of no force or effect.

(2) The abrogation takes effect immediately upon the issuance of the executive order or passage of the resolution in either house of the legislature, unless the executive order or resolution expressly states that it is to be effective retroactively to an earlier date.

--- END ---