BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.51A.010 and 2010 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Designated provider" means a person who:

(a) Is eighteen years of age or older;

(b) Has been designated in writing by a patient to serve as a designated provider under this chapter;

(c) Is prohibited from consuming marijuana obtained for the personal, medical use of the patient for whom the individual is acting as designated provider; and

(d) Is the designated provider to only one patient at any one time.

(2) "Health care professional," for purposes of this chapter only, means a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, a physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, an osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, an osteopathic physicians' assistant licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, or an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.

(3) "Medical use of marijuana" means the production, possession, or administration of marijuana, as defined in RCW 69.50.101(((q)))(t), for the exclusive benefit of a qualifying patient in the treatment of his or her terminal or debilitating illness.

(4) "Qualifying patient" means a person who:

(a) Is a patient of a health care professional;

(b) Has been diagnosed by that health care professional as having a terminal or debilitating medical condition;

(c) Is a resident of the state of Washington at the time of such diagnosis;

(d) Has been advised by that health care professional about the risks and benefits of the medical use of marijuana; and

(e) Has been advised by that health care professional that they may benefit from the medical use of marijuana.

(5) "Tamper-resistant paper" means paper that meets one or more of the following industry-recognized features:

(a) One or more features designed to prevent copying of the paper;

(b) One or more features designed to prevent the erasure or modification of information on the paper; or

(c) One or more features designed to prevent the use of counterfeit valid documentation.

(6) "Terminal or debilitating medical condition" means:

(a) Cancer, human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), multiple sclerosis, epilepsy or other seizure disorder, or spasticity disorders; ((or))

(b) Intractable pain, limited for the purpose of this chapter to mean pain unrelieved by standard medical treatments and medications; ((or))

(c) Glaucoma, either acute or chronic, limited for the purpose of this chapter to mean increased intraocular pressure unrelieved by standard treatments and medications; ((or))

(d) Crohn's disease with debilitating symptoms unrelieved by standard treatments or medications; ((or))

(e) Hepatitis C with debilitating nausea or intractable pain unrelieved by standard treatments or medications; ((or))

(f) Diseases, including anorexia, which result in nausea, vomiting, wasting, appetite loss, cramping, seizures, muscle spasms, or spasticity, when these symptoms are unrelieved by standard treatments or medications; ((or))

(g) Posttraumatic stress disorder; or

(h) Any other medical condition duly approved by the Washington state medical quality assurance commission in consultation with the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as directed in this chapter.

(7) "Valid documentation" means:

(a) A statement signed and dated by a qualifying patient's health care professional written on tamper-resistant paper, which states that, in the health care professional's professional opinion, the patient may benefit from the medical use of marijuana; and

(b) Proof of identity such as a Washington state driver's license or identicard, as defined in RCW 46.20.035.

--- END ---