BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.50.810 and 2012 c 229 s 816 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The college board may select community or technical colleges to develop and offer programs of study leading to applied baccalaureate degrees. Colleges may submit applications to the college board. The college board shall review the applications and select the colleges using objective criteria((,)) including, but not limited to:

(a) The college demonstrates the capacity to make a long-term commitment of resources to build and sustain a high quality program;

(b) The college has or can readily engage faculty appropriately qualified to develop and deliver a high quality curriculum at the baccalaureate level;

(c) The college can demonstrate demand for the proposed program from a sufficient number of students within its service area to make the program cost-effective and feasible to operate;

(d) The college can demonstrate that employers demand the level of technical training proposed within the program, making it cost-effective for students to seek the degree; and

(e) The proposed program fills a gap in options available for students because it is not offered by a public four-year institution of higher education in the college's geographic area.

(2) A college selected under this section may develop the curriculum for and design and deliver courses leading to an applied baccalaureate degree. However, degree programs developed under this section are subject to approval by the college board under RCW 28B.50.090.

(3) By March 15, 2016, the state board for community and technical colleges shall submit to the professional educator standards board up to five proposals from community and technical college sites at which applied baccalaureate degree programs in education and leading to teacher certification via a professional educator standards board-approved alternative route program will be provided. Programs with proposals approved by the professional educator standards board shall admit candidates no later than the fall 2016 term.

--- END ---