BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to reward schools that are recognized for exemplary performance by providing greater flexibility and empowering the schools and the school districts in which the schools are located to comply with fewer state mandates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.657 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A school district with at least one school that is recognized for exemplary performance based on the Washington achievement index under RCW 28A.657.110 may submit to the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education a resolution adopted by the board of directors in a public meeting notifying the superintendent and the state board that the school qualifies to operate under this section during the next full school year after being selected for the award.

(2) Any school that is recognized for exemplary performance based on the Washington achievement index under RCW 28A.657.110 is authorized to operate exclusively under this section if the school district board of directors has submitted a resolution under this section. Such schools are not subject to and are exempt from all other state statutes and rules applicable to schools and school districts.

(3) Schools operating under this section must:

(a) Comply with local, state, and federal health, safety, parents' rights, civil rights, and nondiscrimination laws applicable to school districts to the same extent as school districts, including but not limited to chapter 28A.642 RCW, discrimination prohibition and chapter 28A.640 RCW, sexual equality;

(b) Provide basic education, as provided in RCW 28A.150.210, including instruction in the essential academic learning requirements, and participate in the statewide student assessment system as developed under RCW 28A.655.070;

(c) Employ certificated instructional staff as required in RCW 28A.410.025, however a school that qualifies under this section may hire noncertificated instructional staff of unusual competence and in exceptional cases as specified in RCW 28A.150.203(7);

(d) Comply with the employee record check requirements in RCW 28A.400.303;

(e) Adhere to generally accepted accounting principles and be subject to financial examinations and audits as determined by the state auditor, including annual audits for legal and fiscal compliance;

(f) Comply with the annual performance report under RCW 28A.655.110;

(g) Be subject to the performance improvement goals adopted by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.130; and

(h) Comply with the open public meetings act in chapter 42.30RCW and public records requirements in chapter 42.56 RCW.

(4) No school that qualifies under this section may engage in any sectarian practices in its educational program, admissions or employment policies, or operations.

(5) Schools that qualify under this section are subject to the supervision of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education, including accountability measures, to the same extent as other public schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, except as provided in section 2(3) of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 28A.160 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 28A.165 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 28A.170 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 28A.175 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 28A.180 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 28A.185 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 28A.190 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 28A.193 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. A new section is added to chapter 28A.194 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. A new section is added to chapter 28A.215 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. A new section is added to chapter 28A.220 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. A new section is added to chapter 28A.225 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. A new section is added to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. A new section is added to chapter 28A.235 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. A new section is added to chapter 28A.245 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. A new section is added to chapter 28A.250 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21. A new section is added to chapter 28A.305 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, except as provided in section 2(3) of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23. A new section is added to chapter 28A.325 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24. A new section is added to chapter 28A.335 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25. A new section is added to chapter 28A.340 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26. A new section is added to chapter 28A.345 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27. A new section is added to chapter 28A.400 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, except as provided in section 2(3) of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28. A new section is added to chapter 28A.405 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29. A new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, except as provided in section 2(3) of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30. A new section is added to chapter 28A.415 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31. A new section is added to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32. A new section is added to chapter 28A.605 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33. A new section is added to chapter 28A.620 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34. A new section is added to chapter 28A.623 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35. A new section is added to chapter 28A.625 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36. A new section is added to chapter 28A.630 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37. A new section is added to chapter 28A.635 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38. A new section is added to chapter 28A.650 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39. A new section is added to chapter 28A.655 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, except as provided in section 2(3) of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40. A new section is added to chapter 28A.700 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent and for the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises its authority under section 2 of this act, a school that qualifies under section 2 of this act is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related rules.

--- END ---