BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.445 and 2013 c 3 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful to open a package containing marijuana, useable marijuana, ((or a)) marijuana-infused products, or marijuana concentrate, or consume marijuana, useable marijuana, ((or a)) marijuana-infused products, or marijuana concentrate, in view of the general public or a public place.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "public place" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 66.04.010, but the exclusions in RCW 66.04.011 do not apply.

(3) A person who violates this section is guilty of a class 3 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW.

--- END ---