BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A nonrefundable additional fee is imposed on all applications and renewals of licenses and permits relating to spirits, wine, and beer required under chapters 66.20 and 66.24 RCW, with the exception of license issuance fees of seventeen percent of revenues owed by spirits retail licensees under RCW 66.24.630(4)(a), and the five to ten percent license issuance fee for spirits distributors under RCW 66.24.055(3). The fee applies to all applications and license modifications received on or after the effective date of this section and renewals where the date of license expiration is on or after June 30, 2015. The fee is equal to eleven percent of the licensing or permit fee due under chapters 66.20 and 66.24 RCW. If the fee is not a whole dollar amount, the fee must be rounded up to the next whole dollar.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) Beginning July 1, 2015, a nonrefundable additional fee is imposed on all applications and renewals of licenses relating to marijuana required under chapter 69.50 RCW. The fee applies to all applications and license modifications received on or after the effective date of this section and renewals where the date of license expiration is on or after June 30, 2015. The fee is equal to eleven percent of the licensing or permit fee otherwise due under chapter 69.50 RCW. If the fee is not a whole dollar amount, the fee must be rounded up to the next whole dollar.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The licensing and enforcement system modernization project account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from sections 1 and 2 of this act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be only used for the expenses of replacing and modernizing the board's licensing, enforcement, and imaging system. The expenditures may be expended for automation of licenses and permits, electronic payments, data warehousing, project management and system testing, consulting, contracting, and staff time, and any necessary data conversion, software, hardware, and related equipment costs. Only the director of the board or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect May 15, 2015.

--- END ---