BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 88.02.560 and 2011 c 171 s 129 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An application for a vessel registration must be made by the owner or the owner's authorized representative to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director on a form furnished or approved by the department. The application must contain:

(a) The name and address of each owner of the vessel;

(b) Other information the department may require; and

(c) The signature of at least one owner.

(2) The application for vessel registration must be accompanied by the:

(a) Vessel registration fee required under RCW 88.02.640(1)(((i)))(k);

(b) Derelict vessel and invasive species removal fee under RCW 88.02.640(((3)))(1)(b) and derelict vessel removal surcharge required under RCW 88.02.640(((4)))(1)(c);

(c) Filing fee required under RCW 88.02.640(1)(((e)))(f);

(d) License plate technology fee required under RCW 88.02.640(1)(((f)))(g);

(e) License service fee required under RCW 88.02.640(1)(((g)))(h); ((and))

(f) Watercraft excise tax required under chapter 82.49 RCW; and

(g) Service fee required under RCW 46.17.040.

(3) Upon receipt of an application for vessel registration and the required fees and taxes, the department shall assign a registration number and issue a decal for each vessel. The registration number and decal must be issued and affixed to the vessel in a manner prescribed by the department consistent with the standard numbering system for vessels required in 33 C.F.R. Part 174. A valid decal affixed as prescribed must indicate compliance with the annual registration requirements of this chapter.

(4) Vessel registrations and decals are valid for a period of one year, except that the director may extend or diminish vessel registration periods and vessel decals for the purpose of staggered renewal periods. For registration periods of more or less than one year, the department may collect prorated annual registration fees and excise taxes based upon the number of months in the registration period.

(5) Vessel registrations are renewable every year in a manner prescribed by the department upon payment of the fees and taxes described in subsection (2) of this section. Upon renewing a vessel registration, the department shall issue a new decal to be affixed as prescribed by the department.

(6) When the department issues either a notice to renew a vessel registration or a decal for a new or renewed vessel registration, it shall also provide information on the location of marine oil recycling tanks and sewage holding tank pumping stations. This information must be provided to the department by the state parks and recreation commission in a form ready for distribution. The form must be developed and prepared by the state parks and recreation commission with the cooperation of the department of ecology. The department, the state parks and recreation commission, and the department of ecology shall enter into a memorandum of agreement to implement this process.

(7) A person acquiring a vessel from a dealer or a vessel already validly registered under this chapter shall, within fifteen days of the acquisition or purchase of the vessel, apply to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director for transfer of the vessel registration, and the application must be accompanied by a transfer fee as required in RCW 88.02.640(1)(((l)))(o).

Sec. 2. RCW 88.02.640 and 2013 c 291 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any other fees and taxes required by law, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall charge the following vessel fees and surcharge:

FEE

AMOUNT

AUTHORITY

DISTRIBUTION

(a) Dealer temporary permit

$5.00

RCW 88.02.800(2)

General fund

(b) Derelict vessel and invasive species removal

Subsection (3) of this section

Subsection (3) of this section

Subsection (3) of this section

(c) Derelict vessel removal surcharge

$1.00

Subsection (4) of this section

Subsection (4) of this section

(d) Duplicate certificate of title

$1.25

RCW 88.02.530(1)(c)

General fund

(e) Duplicate registration

$1.25

RCW 88.02.590(1)(c)

General fund

(f) Filing

RCW 46.17.005

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.400

(g) License plate technology

RCW 46.17.015

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.370

(h) License service

RCW 46.17.025

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.220

(i) Nonresident vessel permit

$25.00

RCW 88.02.620(3)

Subsection (5) of this section

(j) Quick title service

$50.00

RCW 88.02.540(3)

Subsection (7) of this section

(k) Registration

$10.50

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 88.02.650

(l) Replacement decal

$1.25

RCW 88.02.595(1)(c)

General fund

(m) Service fee

RCW 46.17.040

RCW 88.02.515 and 88.02.560(2)

RCW 88.02.650

(n) Title application

$5.00

RCW 88.02.515

General fund

(((n)))(o) Transfer

$1.00

RCW 88.02.560(7)

General fund

(((o)))(p) Vessel visitor permit

$30.00

RCW 88.02.610(3)

Subsection (6) of this section

(2) The five dollar dealer temporary permit fee required in subsection (1) of this section must be credited to the payment of registration fees at the time application for registration is made.

(3) The derelict vessel and invasive species removal fee required in subsection (1) of this section is five dollars and must be distributed as follows:

(a) One dollar and fifty cents must be deposited in the aquatic invasive species prevention account created in RCW 77.12.879;

(b) One dollar must be deposited into the aquatic algae control account created in RCW 43.21A.667;

(c) Fifty cents must be deposited into the aquatic invasive species enforcement account created in RCW 43.43.400; and

(d) Two dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100.

(4) In addition to other fees required in this section, an annual derelict vessel removal surcharge of one dollar must be charged with each vessel registration. The surcharge is to address the significant backlog of derelict vessels accumulated in Washington waters that pose a threat to the health and safety of the people and to the environment and must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100.

(5) The twenty-five dollar nonresident vessel permit fee must be paid by the vessel owner to the department for the cost of providing the identification document by the department. Any moneys remaining from the fee after the payment of costs must be allocated to counties by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.650.

(6) The thirty dollar vessel visitor permit fee must be distributed as follows:

(a) Five dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100;

(b) The department may keep an amount to cover costs for providing the vessel visitor permit;

(c) Any moneys remaining must be allocated to counties by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.650; and

(d) Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW 46.17.005 are in addition to any other fee or tax due for the titling and registration of vessels.

(7)(a) The fifty dollar quick title service fee must be distributed as follows:

(i) If the fee is paid to the director, the fee must be deposited to the general fund.

(ii) If the fee is paid to the participating county auditor or other agent or subagent appointed by the director, twenty-five dollars must be deposited to the general fund. The remainder must be retained by the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by the county auditor.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "quick title" has the same meaning as in RCW 88.02.540.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act applies to vessel registrations that are due or become due on or after January 1, 2016, and certificate of title transactions that are processed on or after January 1, 2016.

--- END ---