BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds that the teen employment rate in Washington is consistently lower than the national rate. The legislature further finds that while the employment rate for teens increases during the summer, a seasonal teen wage would further increase the teen employment rate and would help a greater number of teens develop valuable work skills and experience and create a work ethic that will carry throughout the teen's working life. The legislature therefore intends to maximize teen summer employment by creating a seasonal wage applicable to new employees age fourteen to nineteen who are employed during the summer months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW to read as follows:

Employers may pay teen wages to new employees fourteen to nineteen years of age at the minimum wage rate established in section 206, subsection (a)(1) of the federal fair labor standards act. Teen wages can only be paid to those new employees hired on a temporary or seasonal basis, and for work performed during the period starting the first day of June and ending the last day of August.

--- END ---