BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.17.200 and 2014 c 80 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to all other fees and taxes required by law, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall charge:

(a) ((The following license plate fees for each license plate, unless the owner or type of vehicle is exempt from payment:

FEE TYPE

FEE

DISTRIBUTION

Original issue

$ 10.00

RCW 46.68.070

Reflectivity

$ 2.00

RCW 46.68.070

Replacement

$ 10.00

RCW 46.68.070

Original issue, motorcycle

$ 4.00

RCW 46.68.070

Replacement, motorcycle

$ 4.00

RCW 46.68.070

Original issue, moped

$1.50

RCW 46.68.070))

A license plate fee that is set by the department by rule and that does not exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the cost of the license plate paid by the department. The fee must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.

(b) A license plate retention fee, as required under RCW 46.16A.200(9)(a), of twenty dollars if the owner wishes to retain the current license plate number upon license plate replacement, unless the owner or type of vehicle is exempt from payment. The twenty dollar fee must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.

(c) A ten dollar license plate transfer fee, as required under RCW 46.16A.200(8)(a), when transferring standard issue license plates from one vehicle to another, unless the owner or type of vehicle is exempt from payment. The ten dollar license plate transfer fee must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.

(d) Former prisoner of war license plates, as described in RCW 46.18.235, may be transferred to a replacement vehicle upon payment of a five dollar license plate fee, in addition to any other fee required by law.

(2) The department may, upon request, provide license plates that have been used and returned to the department to individuals for nonvehicular use. The department may charge a fee of up to five dollars per license plate to cover costs or recovery for postage and handling. The department may waive the fee for license plates used in educational projects and may, by rule, provide standards for the fee waiver and restrictions on the number of license plates provided to any one person. The fee must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.

Sec. 2. RCW 39.26.251 and 2012 c 220 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) State agencies, the legislature, and departments shall purchase for their use all goods and services required by the legislature, agencies, or departments that are produced or provided in whole or in part from class II inmate work programs operated by the department of corrections through state contract. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, these goods and services shall not be purchased from any other source unless, upon application by the department or agency: (a) The department finds that the articles or products do not meet the reasonable requirements of the agency or department, (b) are not of equal or better quality, or (c) the price of the product or service is higher than that produced by the private sector. However, the criteria contained in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection for purchasing goods and services from sources other than correctional industries do not apply to goods and services produced by correctional industries that primarily replace goods manufactured or services obtained from outside the state. The department of corrections and department shall adopt administrative rules that implement this section.

(2) During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, and in conformance with section 223(11), chapter 470, Laws of 2009 and section 221(2), chapter 367, Laws of 2011, this section does not apply to the purchase of uniforms by the Washington state ferries.

(3)(a) Effective July 1, 2012, this section does not apply to the purchase of uniforms for correctional officers employed with the Washington state department of corrections.

(b) This section does not apply to the purchase of license plates by the department of licensing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect January 1, 2016.

--- END ---