BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) A joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability is established, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) Four members of the senate, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members, who are voting members;

(ii) Four members of the house of representatives, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members, who are voting members;

(iii) A member from the office of the governor, appointed by the governor, who shall serve as an ex officio member;

(iv) The secretary of the department of social and health services or his or her designee, who shall serve as an ex officio member;

(v) The director of the health care authority or his or her designee, who shall serve as an ex officio member; and

(vi) The director of the department of retirement systems or his or her designee, who shall serve as an ex officio member.

(b) The cochairs must be selected from among the members who are legislators. The cochairs who served as the cochairs of the joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability created in section 206, chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. must convene the initial meeting of the committee. All meetings of the committee are open to the public.

(c) The purpose of the committee is to identify key strategic actions to prepare for the aging of the population in Washington, including state budget and policy options, by conducting at least, but not limited to, the following tasks:

(i) Establish a profile of Washington's current population of older people and people with disabilities and a projection of population growth through 2030;

(ii) Establish an inventory of services and supports currently available to older people and people with disabilities from the health care and long-term services and support systems and other community resources such as housing, transportation, income support, and protection for vulnerable adults;

(iii) Identify state budget and policy options to more effectively use state, federal, and private resources to, over time, reduce the growth rate in state expenditures that would otherwise occur by continuing current policy in light of significant population growth;

(iv) Identify strategies to better serve the health care needs of an aging population and people with disabilities and promote healthy living;

(v) Identify policy options to create financing mechanisms for long-term services and supports that will promote additional private responsibility for individuals and families to meet their needs for

service;

(vi) Identify policies to promote financial security in retirement, support people who wish to stay in the workplace longer, and expand the availability of workplace retirement savings plans; and

(vii) Identify policy options to help communities adapt to the aging demographic in planning for housing, land use, and transportation.

(d) The committee shall consult with the office of the insurance commissioner, the caseload forecast council, the health care authority, and other appropriate entities with specialized knowledge of the needs and growth trends of the aging population and people with disabilities.

(e) The office of program research, senate committee services, the office of financial management, and the department of social and health services shall provide staff support for the committee.

(f) Within existing appropriations, the cost of meetings must be paid jointly by the senate, the house of representatives, and the office of financial management. Joint committee expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees. The committee members may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter 44.04 RCW as appropriate. Advisory committee members may not receive compensation or reimbursement for travel and expenses.

(2) This section expires December 1, 2017.

--- END ---