BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A health benefit plan issued or renewed after December 31, 2015, that provides coverage for prescription drugs must implement a medication synchronization policy for the dispensing of prescription drugs to the plan's enrollees.

(2) A health plan must adjust the enrollee cost-sharing for a prescription drug with a coinsurance that is dispensed for less than the standard refill amount for the purpose of synchronizing the medications.

(3) Upon request of an enrollee, the prescribing provider or pharmacist shall:

(a) Determine that filling or refilling the prescription is in the best interest of the enrollee, taking into account the appropriateness of synchronization for the drug being dispensed;

(b) Inform the enrollee that the prescription will be filled to less than the standard refill amount for the purpose of synchronizing his or her medications; and

(c) Deny synchronization on the grounds of threat to patient safety or suspected fraud or abuse.

(4) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) "Medication synchronization" means the coordination of medication refills for a patient taking two or more medications for a chronic condition such that the patient's medications are refilled on the same schedule for a given time period.

(b) "Prescription" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.64.011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A health benefit plan offered to public employees and their covered dependents under this chapter that is not subject to chapter 48.43 RCW, that is issued or renewed after December 31, 2015, and that provides coverage for prescription drugs must implement a medication synchronization policy for the dispensing of prescription drugs to the plan's enrollees.

(2) A health plan must adjust the enrollee cost-sharing for a prescription drug with a coinsurance that is dispensed for less than the standard refill amount for the purpose of synchronizing the medications.

(3) Upon request of an enrollee, the prescribing provider or pharmacist shall:

(a) Determine that filling or refilling the prescription is in the best interest of the enrollee, taking into account the appropriateness of synchronization for the drug being dispensed;

(b) Inform the enrollee that the prescription will be filled to less than the standard refill amount for the purpose of synchronizing his or her medications; and

(c) Deny synchronization on the grounds of threat to patient safety or suspected fraud or abuse.

(4) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) "Medication synchronization" means the coordination of medication refills for a patient taking two or more medications for a chronic condition such that the patient's medications are refilled on the same schedule for a given time period.

(b) "Prescription" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.64.011.

--- END ---