BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the development of electric vehicle infrastructure is a critical step in creating jobs, fostering economic growth, reducing greenhouse gas emissions, and spurring electric vehicle usage across the state. Limited driving distance between battery charges is a fundamental disadvantage and obstacle to broad consumer adoption of vehicles powered by electricity. To eliminate this fundamental disadvantage and dramatically increase consumer usage of electric vehicles, it is essential that an infrastructure of convenient electric vehicle charging opportunities be developed. It is the intent of the legislature with this act to encourage the transition to electric vehicle use and to expedite the establishment of a convenient, cost-effective electric vehicle infrastructure that such a transition necessitates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 47.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A Washington electric vehicle infrastructure bank is hereby established. The Washington electric vehicle infrastructure bank must provide financial assistance for the installation of publicly accessible electric vehicle charging stations within the state.

(2) Electric vehicle infrastructure receiving financial assistance must include both DC fast-charging stations and level 1 or 2 electric vehicle supply equipment. The department must confer with the Washington department of commerce, and seek input from experts representing local government, public utilities, electric vehicle manufacturer representatives, and current Washington state electric vehicle drivers to review information and advise the department on policies and priorities for deployment of public charging station locations.

(3) The department's public-private partnerships office must administer all funds dispersed and received, including any funds received under RCW 46.17.323 and deposited into the transportation innovative partnership account created under RCW 47.29.230. Prior to providing any financial assistance for electric vehicle infrastructure projects, the department must submit a business plan to the house of representatives and senate transportation committees and to the governor's office.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2025.

--- END ---