BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The medical quality assurance commission shall do a study of the effects of long-term antibiotic therapy on patients who have been diagnosed with posttreatment Lyme disease syndrome. The study should include a review of:

(a) The antibiotics that are commonly used, prescribed, and administered for the long-term treatment of Lyme disease;

(b) The side effects associated with long-term antibiotic therapy;

(c) The effectiveness of long-term antibiotic therapy of controlling symptoms for patients who have posttreatment Lyme disease syndrome;

(d) Whether allowing physicians in Washington state to administer long-term antibiotic therapy for treating Lyme disease would be beneficial to the health and safety of Washington residents; and

(e) Any other aspects of long-term antibiotic therapy that the commission deems important for the health and safety of patients who may receive these treatments.

(2) The medical quality assurance commission shall report its findings to the governor and the health care committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2016.

--- END ---