BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any physician or osteopathic physician who performs laser in-situ keratomileusis surgery must report any patient infection caused or likely to have been caused as a consequence to the laser in-situ keratomileusis procedure to the department.

(2) The department must publish a report on the department's web site that compares the infection rates of physicians or osteopathic physicians who perform laser in-situ keratomileusis surgery. The report must disclose data in a format that does not release health information about any individual patient.

(3) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---