BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of unlawfully engaging in fishing guide activity if the person holds a game fish guide license issued under RCW 77.65.480 or has a license issued under RCW 77.65.010 to operate a charter boat or act as a food fish guide, and the person:

(a) Fails to perform any duty of a charter boat or guide operator established in RCW 77.32.430; or

(b) Violates any rule of the commission or director regarding the sale, possession, issuance, or reporting of temporary fishing licenses, temporary short-term charter stamps, or catch record cards.

(2) Unlawfully engaging in fishing guide activity is a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---