BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 51.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Moneys used for administrative expenses to assist employers with developing a stay-at-work program and other related services that respond to employer needs or employee needs, or both, in the stay-at-work program as they arise is subject to the allotment of all expenditures pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW. However, an appropriation is not required for expenditures. Administrative expenses include, but are not limited to, the salaries and expenses of staff required to implement the services and travel, goods, and services necessary to conduct these activities. The department must use stay-at-work program premiums to pay for these services. The department must seek the advice of the workers' compensation advisory committee prior to accessing these funds.

(2) The director must appoint a stay-at-work advisory committee composed of six members: Three representing large and small employers and three representing labor. At least one member of the committee must be a small business owner as defined by RCW 34.05.110(9)(a) or must represent a group primarily made up of small businesses. Appointed members representing employers must have experience working directly with the stay-at-work program. Statewide business and labor organizations, representing large and small employers, must provide the director with recommendations for people to serve on the committee. The department must provide staff support for this committee.

(3) The members must serve three-year terms. Terms of the members representing employers and labor must be staggered such that the director must designate one member from each group initially appointed whose term must expire after one year and one member from each group whose term must expire after two years. The remainder of the initial group must be appointed for three-year terms. Thereafter, members must be appointed for three-year terms.

(4) The members must serve without compensation, but must be entitled to travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. All expenses of this committee must be paid by the department.

(5) This committee must review department proposals, submitted by the director, to spend nonappropriated stay-at-work program premiums for administrative expenses as defined under subsection (1) of this section, and make recommendations to the workers' compensation advisory committee for their consideration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 51.44 RCW to read as follows:

Moneys used for administrative costs for one-time projects requested by self-insured employers and that will support the self-insured employer program is subject to the allotment of all expenditures pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW. However, an appropriation is not required for expenditures. Administrative costs include, but are not limited to, the salaries and expenses of staff required to implement the one-time projects and travel, goods, and services necessary to conduct these activities. The department must use self-insured employer administrative assessments to cover the costs of these services. The department must seek support from self-insured employers prior to accessing these funds.

--- END ---