BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each municipality may contract for asset management service of its water storage assets in accordance with this section. Each municipality shall publish notice of its requirements to procure asset management service of its water storage assets. Such service may include the inspection, cleaning, maintenance, repair, and testing of its water storage assets. The announcement must concisely state the scope and nature of the equipment and services for which a water storage asset management service contract is required and encourage firms to submit proposals to meet these requirements.

(2) The municipality may negotiate a fair and reasonable water storage asset management service contract for equipment and services with the firm that submits the best proposal based on criteria that is established by the municipality.

(3) If the municipality is unable to negotiate a satisfactory water storage asset management service contract with the firm that submits the best proposal, negotiations with that firm must formally be terminated and the municipality may select another firm in accordance with this section and continue negotiation until a water storage asset management service contract is reached or the selection process is terminated.

(4) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Water storage asset management services" means the financing, designing, improving, operating, maintaining, administering, or managing, or any combination thereof, of a water storage asset.

(b) "Water storage asset" means water storage structures and associated distribution systems, such as the water tank, tower, well, meter, or water filter.

--- END ---