BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.06.480 and 2007 c 69 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governor is authorized to enter into a timber harvest excise tax agreement with the Quinault Nation and the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation. Agreements adopted under this section must provide that the tribal timber harvest excise tax rate be one hundred percent of the state timber harvest excise tax.

(2) A timber harvest excise tax agreement under this section is subject to RCW 43.06.475.

--- END ---