BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.47.030 and 1991 c 173 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The entire proceeds of the tax imposed under this chapter, less refunds authorized by the resolution imposing such tax and less amounts deducted by the border area jurisdiction for administration and collection expenses, shall be used solely for the purposes of border area jurisdiction ((street maintenance and construction))transportation improvements, as defined in RCW 36.73.015.

--- END ---