BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.22 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that the dissemination of social security numbers of process servers is not in the public interest.

(2) A county auditor collecting social security numbers from process servers required to register under RCW 18.180.010 shall not display or release a process server's social security number on any document or web site issued or maintained by the auditor. Social security numbers of process servers required to register under RCW 18.180.010 are confidential, are exempt from public inspection and copying, and shall not be disclosed except as otherwise explicitly required to be disclosed under federal law.

--- END ---