BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.17A.442 and 2011 c 145 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A political committee may make a contribution to another political committee only when the contributing political committee has received contributions of ten dollars or more each from at least ten persons registered to vote in Washington state.

(2) A political committee may not receive seventy percent or more of its aggregate funds from another political committee, directly or through any combination of other political committees.

--- END ---