BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. Any person who enters into a commercial transaction for a product, that is delivered by subscription, that person must be able to cancel or revoke the product subscription by the same means as the original transaction occurred, including whether in-person, by telephone, through the mail, or by electronic means.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The legislature finds that the failure to allow the cancellation or revocation of a product subscription as provided in section 1 of this act are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of section 1 of this act is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and constitutes an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

(2) Any person suffering a financial injury for a violation of section 1 of this act may bring a civil action in superior court, under the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW, to enjoin further violations, to recover the actual damages sustained by him or her, together with the costs of the suit, including reasonable attorneys' fees. In addition, the court may, in its discretion, increase the award of damages up to an amount not to exceed three times the actual damages sustained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act may be known and cited as the "revocation parity act."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---