BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 1.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that eighty-four people died waiting for an organ transplant in Washington state in 2013. The legislature further finds that more than two thousand six hundred people are currently waiting for a life-saving organ transplant in Washington state. Forty of those patients waiting are under the age of eighteen and more than two hundred of those patients have been waiting for more than five years for their life-saving gift. The legislature further finds that organ donation is a very rare and precious gift. Less than one percent of all people who die are eligible to donate their organs due to the unique circumstances needed at death to donate organs. Every donor is a critical donation to those waiting.

(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to update the gift of life award to recognize all Washington citizens who have donated critical life-saving organs.

Sec. 2. RCW 1.50.010 and 2008 c 139 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Organ donor" means an individual who makes an anatomical gift ((as specified in))of an organ under chapter 68.64 RCW.

(2) "Organ procurement organization" has the same meaning as in RCW 68.64.010.

(((3) "Person" means a person specified in RCW 68.64.080.))

Sec. 3. RCW 1.50.030 and 1999 c 264 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governor's office shall annually present the Washington gift of life award to ((six eligible)) families ((or persons per year under the following:))of donors who have donated organs in accordance with chapter 68.64 RCW.

(((1) The))Organ procurement organizations may nominate the ((six)) individuals ((or persons)) eligible under this section to represent all those who have donated organs during the previous calendar year and may submit documentation supporting the eligibility of the individuals((or person)) to the governor's office. If more than one organ procurement organization is involved, they shall coordinate in harmony to designate by consensus the organ procurement organization among them to have primary administrative responsibility under this chapter.

(2) The governor's office shall present the awards on an annual basis to each eligible organ donor's family in coordination with the organ procurement organization. Only one award may be presented to the family of an organ donor.

(3) Organ procurement organizations shall seek permission from the family of organ donors selected to receive the gift of life award to release the name of the organ donor to the governor's office for printing of a gift of life certificate and use at any gift of life ceremonies or events.

Sec. 4. RCW 1.50.040 and 1999 c 264 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington gift of life award shall consist of the seal of the state of Washington and be inscribed with the words: "For the greatest act of kindness in donating organs to ((enhance))save the lives of others."

--- END ---