BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.160 RCW to read as follows:

A school bus driver who has a valid commercial driver's license issued in accordance with chapter 46.25 RCW is immune from civil or criminal liability for acts that (1) the driver reasonably believes are necessary, (2) are taken in good faith and without gross negligence, (3) are taken during the course of his or her duties, and (4) are taken when coming to the aid of another person that the driver reasonably believes is in imminent danger of bodily injury or death.

--- END ---