BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.64A.030 and 2013 c 19 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall adopt, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, rules governing the extent to which pharmacy ancillary personnel may perform services associated with the practice of pharmacy. These rules shall provide for the certification of pharmacy technicians and registration of pharmacy assistants by the department at a fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250:

(1) "Pharmacy technicians" may assist in performing, under the supervision and control of a licensed pharmacist, manipulative, nondiscretionary functions associated with the practice of pharmacy and other such duties and subject to such restrictions as the commission may by rule adopt.

(2) "Pharmacy assistants" may perform, under the supervision of a licensed pharmacist, duties including, but not limited to, typing of prescription labels, filing, refiling, bookkeeping, pricing, stocking, delivery, nonprofessional phone inquiries, and documentation of third-party reimbursements and other such duties and subject to such restrictions as the commission may by rule adopt.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.64A.050 and 2013 c 19 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the grounds under RCW 18.130.170 and 18.130.180, the commission may take disciplinary action against the certificate of any pharmacy technician or the registration of any pharmacy assistant upon proof that:

(1) His or her certificate or registration was procured through fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit;

(2) He or she has been found guilty of any offense in violation of the laws of this state relating to drugs, poisons, cosmetics, or drug sundries by any court of competent jurisdiction. Nothing herein shall be construed to affect or alter the provisions of RCW 9.96A.020;

(3) He or she has exhibited gross incompetency in the performance of his or her duties;

(4) He or she has willfully or repeatedly violated any of the rules and regulations of the commission or of the department;

(5) He or she has willfully or repeatedly performed duties beyond the scope of his or her certificate or registration in violation of the provisions of this chapter; or

(6) He or she has impersonated a licensed pharmacist.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.64A.055 and 1993 c 367 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of certificates and registrations and the discipline of certificants and registrants under this chapter.

--- END ---