BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a producer, retailer, or stewardship organization for an environmental handling charge that is:

(a) Added to the purchase price of mercury-containing lights by a producer, retailer, or a retailer under an agreement with the producer as authorized under RCW 70.275.050;

(b) Retained by a retailer as reimbursement for any costs associated with the collection and remittance of an environmental handling charge; or

(c) Received by a stewardship organization from a producer or retailer.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "environmental handling charge" and "mercury-containing lights" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 70.275.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is not subject to the requirements of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808. This act is not subject to an expiration date.

--- END ---