BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to exercise the rights granted under the uniform time act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 260a(a), and exempt the state of Washington from daylight saving time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The standard time in Washington shall be the solar time of the one hundred twentieth meridian west of Greenwich, commonly known as pacific standard time.

(2) This section shall not be construed to affect the standard time established by United States law governing the movements of common carriers engaged in interstate commerce or the time for performance of an act by an officer or department of the United States, as established by a statute, lawful order, rule, or regulation of the United States or an agency thereof.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law contrary by the United States government relating to adoption of daylight saving time by all of the states, the state of Washington elects to reject such time and elects to continue in force the terms of subsection (1) of this section, relating to standard time in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. RCW 1.20.051 (Daylight saving time) and 1963 c 14 s 1 & 1961 c 3 s 1 are each repealed.

--- END ---