BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 30A.22 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A payor financial institution shall pay a check drawn on it against an account with a sufficient balance at face value without regard to whether the payee holds an account at the bank and may not charge a fee to the payee for payment of the check.

(2) This section does not prohibit a bank from requiring commercially reasonable verification of the payee's identity before settlement of the check.

--- END ---