BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that an estimated six hundred fifty thousand to seven hundred thousand Washington adults lack the knowledge and skills needed to compete in today's economy and meaningfully participate in this state's democracy. The legislature further finds that by 2016, nearly three-fourths of available jobs in this state will require at least a postsecondary credential and that meeting this workforce need will require educating older adults who lack basic education skills.

The legislature further finds it will be necessary to educate older adults who lack basic education skills to meet the goals expressed in section 2, chapter 209, Laws of 2014: "All adults in Washington ages twenty-five to forty-four will have a high school diploma or equivalent by 2023; and at least seventy percent of Washington adults ages twenty-five to forty-four will have a postsecondary credential by 2023."

As provided in RCW 28B.50.020 and 28B.50.090, the community and technical colleges are responsible for providing basic skills and literacy education to adults. The colleges fulfill this responsibility by teaching reading, writing, mathematics, technology, and English language to adults who have academic skills below high school level or who need English language skills. Basic education for adults programs prepare students to earn high school diplomas or to pass high school equivalency certificates; teach employability skills, such as critical thinking, communication, problem solving, and decision making; and offer clear and direct pathways to college-level education and credentials.

As required by RCW 28B.50.020, the community and technical colleges offer an open door to every citizen, regardless of his or her academic background or experience, at a cost normally within his or her economic means. Acknowledging that adult students enrolled in basic education courses lack the economic means to pay regular tuition, the state board for community and technical colleges has provided a tuition waiver for these students. The absence of tuition revenue from basic skills students creates a financial challenge for the colleges as they seek to serve the diverse needs of their communities.

The legislature further finds that a regular, dependable source of funding to provide basic education for adults will increase access to educational pathways that will lead to postsecondary credentials, living wage jobs, and meaningful participation in this state's democracy. The legislature intends to provide a regular, dependable source of funding to provide basic education for adults by providing funding for each full-time equivalent student enrolled at a community or technical college created under chapter 28B.50 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) State appropriations to the college board shall include a separate appropriation to provide basic education for adults. The appropriation to provide basic education for adults shall be determined by multiplying the total full-time equivalent enrollment in basic education for adults courses by the statewide average per full-time equivalent high school student allocation under RCW 28A.150.260 multiplied by the following factors:

(a) For the 2015-16 academic year, the factor shall be .5;

(b) For the 2016-17 academic year, the factor shall be .6;

(c) For the 2017-18 academic year, the factor shall be .7;

(d) For the 2018-19 academic year, the factor shall be .8;

(e) For the 2019-20 academic year, the factor shall be .9; and

(f) For the 2020-21 academic year and thereafter, the factor shall be 1.

(2) The caseload forecast council shall estimate the anticipated number of full-time equivalent students who will enroll in basic education for adults courses in community and technical colleges under this chapter and shall submit this forecast as specified in RCW 43.88C.020.

(3) The college board shall submit a budget request each year to adjust the college board's appropriation to ensure full funding for the actual number of full-time equivalent students who enroll in basic education for adults courses in community and technical colleges under this chapter.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.88C.010 and 2013 c 332 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The caseload forecast council is hereby created. The council shall consist of two individuals appointed by the governor and four individuals, one of whom is appointed by the chairperson of each of the two largest political caucuses in the senate and house of representatives. The chair of the council shall be selected from among the four caucus appointees. The council may select such other officers as the members deem necessary.

(2) The council shall employ a caseload forecast supervisor to supervise the preparation of all caseload forecasts. As used in this chapter, "supervisor" means the caseload forecast supervisor.

(3) Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five members of the council is required for any decisions regarding employment of the supervisor. Employment of the supervisor shall terminate after each term of three years. At the end of the first year of each three-year term the council shall consider extension of the supervisor's term by one year. The council may fix the compensation of the supervisor. The supervisor shall employ staff sufficient to accomplish the purposes of this section.

(4) The caseload forecast council shall oversee the preparation of and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four members, the official state caseload forecasts prepared under RCW 43.88C.020. If the council is unable to approve a forecast before a date required in RCW 43.88C.020, the supervisor shall submit the forecast without approval and the forecast shall have the same effect as if approved by the council.

(5) A councilmember who does not cast an affirmative vote for approval of the official caseload forecast may request, and the supervisor shall provide, an alternative forecast based on assumptions specified by the member.

(6) Members of the caseload forecast council shall serve without additional compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative members of the council shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(7) "Caseload," as used in this chapter, means:

(a) The number of persons expected to meet entitlement requirements and require the services of public assistance programs, state correctional institutions, state correctional noninstitutional supervision, state institutions for juvenile offenders, the common school system, long-term care, medical assistance, foster care, and adoption support;

(b) The number of students who are eligible for the Washington college bound scholarship program and are expected to attend an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030; and

(c) The number of students expected to enroll in basic education for adults courses at community and technical colleges created under chapter 28B.50 RCW.

(8) The caseload forecast council shall forecast the temporary assistance for needy families and the working connections child care programs as a courtesy.

(9) The caseload forecast council shall forecast youth participating in the extended foster care program pursuant to RCW 74.13.031 separately from other children who are residing in foster care and who are under eighteen years of age.

(10) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions provided in RCW 43.88.020 apply to this chapter.

--- END ---