BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79A.80.010 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agency" or "agencies" means the department of fish and wildlife, the department of natural resources, and the parks and recreation commission.

(2) "Annual natural investment permit" means the annual permit issued by the parks and recreation commission for the purpose of launching boats from the designated state parks boat launch sites.

(3) "Camper registration" means proof of payment of a camping fee on recreational lands managed by the parks and recreation commission.

(4) "Day-use permit" means the permit created in RCW 79A.80.030.

(5) "Discover pass" means the annual pass created in RCW 79A.80.020.

(6) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 46.04.320 and which are required to be registered under chapter 46.16A RCW. "Motor vehicle" does not include those motor vehicles exempt from registration under RCW 46.16A.080, wheeled all-terrain vehicles registered for use under RCW 46.09.442, ((and)) state and publicly owned motor vehicles as provided in RCW 46.16A.170, or vehicles displaying a valid off-road vehicle decal as provided under chapter 46.09 RCW and the rules adopted under that chapter at locations where off-road vehicle activity is allowed.

(7) "Recreation site or lands" means a state park, state lands and state forest lands as those terms are defined in RCW 79.02.010, natural resources conservation areas as that term is defined in RCW 79.71.030, natural area preserves as that term is defined in RCW 79.70.020, and fish and wildlife conservation sites including water access areas, boat ramps, wildlife areas, parking areas, roads, and trailheads.

(8) "Sno-park seasonal permit" means the seasonal permit issued by the parks and recreation commission for providing access to winter recreational facilities for the period of November 1st through March 31st.

(9) "Vehicle access pass" means the pass created in RCW 79A.80.040.

--- END ---