BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.501 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 35 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall supervise the following offenders who are sentenced to probation in superior court, pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210:

(a) Offenders convicted of:

(i) Sexual misconduct with a minor second degree;

(ii) Custodial sexual misconduct second degree;

(iii) Communication with a minor for immoral purposes; and

(iv) Violation of RCW 9A.44.132(2) (failure to register); and

(b) Offenders who have:

(i) A current conviction for a repetitive domestic violence offense where domestic violence has been plead and proven after August 1, 2011; and

(ii) A prior conviction for a repetitive domestic violence offense or domestic violence felony offense where domestic violence has been plead and proven after August 1, 2011.

(2) Misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor offenders supervised by the department pursuant to this section shall be placed on community custody.

(3) The department shall supervise every felony offender sentenced to community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701 or 9.94A.702 whose risk assessment classifies the offender as one who is at a high risk to reoffend.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the department shall supervise an offender sentenced to community custody regardless of risk classification if the offender:

(a) Has a current conviction for a sex offense or a serious violent offense and was sentenced to a term of community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701, 9.94A.702, or 9.94A.507;

(b) Has been identified by the department as a dangerous mentally ill offender pursuant to RCW 72.09.370;

(c) Has an indeterminate sentence and is subject to parole pursuant to RCW 9.95.017;

(d) Has a current conviction for violating RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register) and was sentenced to a term of community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701;

(e) Has a current conviction for a domestic violence felony offense where domestic violence has been plead and proven after August 1, 2011, and a prior conviction for a repetitive domestic violence offense or domestic violence felony offense where domestic violence has been plead and proven after August 1, 2011;

(f) Was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650, 9.94A.655, 9.94A.660, or 9.94A.670;

(g) Is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745; or

(h) Was convicted and sentenced under RCW 46.61.520 (vehicular homicide), RCW 46.61.522 (vehicular assault), RCW 46.61.502(6) (felony DUI), or RCW 46.61.504(6) (felony physical control).

(5) The department is not authorized to, and may not, supervise any offender sentenced to a term of community custody or any probationer unless the offender or probationer is one for whom supervision is required under this section or RCW 9.94A.5011.

(6) The department shall conduct a risk assessment for every felony offender sentenced to a term of community custody who may be subject to supervision under this section or RCW 9.94A.5011.

(7) The period of time the department is authorized to supervise an offender under this section may be reduced by the earned award of positive time pursuant to section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1) If an offender sentenced under this chapter or chapter 9.94B RCW is supervised by the department, the offender may earn positive time in accordance with procedures that are developed and adopted by the department. The positive time is for good behavior and good performance, as determined by the department. For each month of community custody served, offenders are qualified to earn positive time as follows:

(a) Offenders classified as being at low or moderate risk to reoffend: Thirty days;

(b) Offenders classified as being at high risk to offend: Fifteen days.

(2) An offender is not eligible to earn positive time if he or she:

(a) Was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507;

(b) Was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650, 9.94A.655, 9.94A.660, or 9.94A.670; or

(c) Is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The department of corrections has discretion to implement this act over a period of time not to exceed twelve months. For any offender under active supervision by the department as of the effective date of this section, he or she is not eligible to earn for positive time pursuant to section 1 of this act until after receiving an orientation by the department regarding positive time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---