BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW to read as follows:

The coordinator for the helmets to hardhats program is created in the department of veterans affairs, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose. The department shall establish procedures for coordinating with the federal helmets to hardhats program and other opportunities for veterans to obtain skilled training and employment in the construction industry.

--- END ---