BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.92.080 and 2012 c 229 s 605 are each amended to read as follows:

Except for opportunity internship graduates whose eligibility is provided under RCW 28B.92.084, for a student to be eligible for a state need grant a student must:

(1) Be a "needy student" or "disadvantaged student" as determined by the office in accordance with RCW 28B.92.030 (((1)))(2) and (((4)))(5);

(2) Have been domiciled within the state of Washington for at least one year;

(3) Be enrolled or accepted for enrollment ((on at least a half-time basis))for at least three quarter credits or the equivalent semester credits at an institution of higher education in Washington as defined in RCW 28B.92.030(((3)))(4); and

(4) ((Until June 30, 2011, to the extent funds are specifically appropriated for this purpose, and subject to any terms and conditions specified in the omnibus appropriations act, be enrolled or accepted for enrollment for at least three quarter credits or the equivalent semester credits at an institution of higher education in Washington as defined in RCW 28B.92.030(3); and

(5))) Have complied with all the rules adopted by the council for the administration of this chapter.

--- END ---