BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 11.88 RCW to read as follows:

A county may create a guardianship courthouse facilitator program to provide basic services to pro se litigants in guardianship cases. The legislative authority of any county may impose user fees or may impose a surcharge of up to twenty dollars, or both, on superior court cases filed under chapters 11.88, 11.92, and 73.36 RCW to pay for the expenses of the guardianship courthouse facilitator program. Fees collected under this section shall be collected and deposited in the same manner as other county funds are collected and deposited, and shall be maintained in a separate guardianship courthouse facilitator account to be used as provided in this section.

--- END ---