BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 80.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A local rural mover license is created.

(2) A local rural mover is defined as a mover who:

(a) Is engaged in the transportation of household goods moving within a city with a population of ten thousand or fewer or a county with a population of one hundred thousand or fewer, and transports goods within a fifty-six mile radius of the location of his or her primary business address; and

(b) Earns gross revenue derived from the local cartage of household goods in his or her designated cartage area that does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars per year.

(3) A local rural mover is required to carry a minimum of cargo insurance in the amount of ten thousand dollars.

(4) A local rural mover is required to carry a minimum of liability insurance in the amount of five hundred thousand dollars.

(5) The commission may adopt rules to implement this section and set licensing fees.

--- END ---