BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 19.86 RCW to read as follows:

(1) It is a violation of RCW 19.86.020 for any person or entity to distribute, dispense, manufacture, display for sale, offer for sale, attempt to sell, or sell to a purchaser any product that contains any amount of any synthetic cannabinoid, cathinone, or methcathinone as identified in RCW 69.50.204(e) (3) and (5).

(2) "Synthetic cannabinoid" includes any chemical compound identified in RCW 69.50.204(c)(30) or by the pharmacy quality assurance commission under RCW 69.50.201.

Sec. 2. RCW 69.50.204 and 2010 c 177 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless specifically excepted by state or federal law or regulation or more specifically included in another schedule, the following controlled substances are listed in Schedule I:

(a) Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation:

(1) Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide);

(2) Acetylmethadol;

(3) Allylprodine;

(4) Alphacetylmethadol, except levo-alphacetylmethadol, also known as levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM;

(5) Alphameprodine;

(6) Alphamethadol;

(7) Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl) ethyl-4-piperidyl] propionanilide); (1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanilido) piperidine);

(8) Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

(9) Benzethidine;

(10) Betacetylmethadol;

(11) Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

(12) Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl, some trade or other names: N-[1-(2-hydrox-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide;

(13) Betameprodine;

(14) Betamethadol;

(15) Betaprodine;

(16) Clonitazene;

(17) Dextromoramide;

(18) Diampromide;

(19) Diethylthiambutene;

(20) Difenoxin;

(21) Dimenoxadol;

(22) Dimepheptanol;

(23) Dimethylthiambutene;

(24) Dioxaphetyl butyrate;

(25) Dipipanone;

(26) Ethylmethylthiambutene;

(27) Etonitazene;

(28) Etoxeridine;

(29) Furethidine;

(30) Hydroxypethidine;

(31) Ketobemidone;

(32) Levomoramide;

(33) Levophenacylmorphan;

(34) 3-Methylfentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylprop anamide);

(35) 3-Methylthiofentanyl (N-[(3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

(36) Morpheridine;

(37) MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine);

(38) Noracymethadol;

(39) Norlevorphanol;

(40) Normethadone;

(41) Norpipanone;

(42) Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl] propanamide);

(43) PEPAP(1-(-2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine);

(44) Phenadoxone;

(45) Phenampromide;

(46) Phenomorphan;

(47) Phenoperidine;

(48) Piritramide;

(49) Proheptazine;

(50) Properidine;

(51) Propiram;

(52) Racemoramide;

(53) Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-propanaminde);

(54) Tilidine;

(55) Trimeperidine.

(b) Opium derivatives. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following opium derivatives, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

(1) Acetorphine;

(2) Acetyldihydrocodeine;

(3) Benzylmorphine;

(4) Codeine methylbromide;

(5) Codeine-N-Oxide;

(6) Cyprenorphine;

(7) Desomorphine;

(8) Dihydromorphine;

(9) Drotebanol;

(10) Etorphine, except hydrochloride salt;

(11) Heroin;

(12) Hydromorphinol;

(13) Methyldesorphine;

(14) Methyldihydromorphine;

(15) Morphine methylbromide;

(16) Morphine methylsulfonate;

(17) Morphine-N-Oxide;

(18) Myrophine;

(19) Nicocodeine;

(20) Nicomorphine;

(21) Normorphine;

(22) Pholcodine;

(23) Thebacon.

(c) Hallucinogenic substances. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic substances, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation. For the purposes of this subsection only, the term "isomer" includes the optical, position, and geometric isomers:

(1) Alpha-ethyltryptamine: Some trade or other names: Etryptamine; monase; a-ethyl-1H-indole-3-ethanamine; 3-(2-aminobutyl) indole; a-ET; and AET;

(2) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine: Some trade or other names: 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; 4-bromo-2,5-DMA;

(3) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine: Some trade or other names: 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-1-aminoethane; alpha-desmethyl DOB; 2C-B, nexus;

(4) 2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine: Some trade or other names: 2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; 2,5-DMA;

(5) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine (DOET);

(6) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine: Other name: 2C-T-7;

(7) 4-methoxyamphetamine: Some trade or other names: 4-methoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; paramethoxyamphetamine, PMA;

(8) 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine;

(9) 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine: Some trade and other names: 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; "DOM"; and "STP";

(10) 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;

(11) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA);

(12) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine, also known as N-ethyl-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine, N-ethyl MDA, MDE, MDEA;

(13) N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine also known as N-hydroxy-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine,N-hydroxy MDA;

(14) 3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine;

(15) Alpha-methyltryptamine: Other name: AMT;

(16) Bufotenine: Some trade or other names: 3-(beta-Dimethylaminoethyl)-5-hydroxindole; 3-(2-dimethylaminoethyl)-5-indolol; N, N-dimethylserotonin; 5-hydroxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine; mappine;

(17) Diethyltryptamine: Some trade or other names: N,N-Diethyltryptamine; DET;

(18) Dimethyltryptamine: Some trade or other names: DMT;

(19) 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine: Other name: 5-MeO-DIPT;

(20) Ibogaine: Some trade or other names: 7-Ethyl-6,6 beta,7,8,9,10,12,13,-octahydro-2-methoxy-6,9-methano-5H-pyndo (1',2' 1,2) azepino (5,4-b) indole; Tabernanthe iboga;

(21) Lysergic acid diethylamide;

(22) Marihuana or marijuana;

(23) Mescaline;

(24) Parahexyl-7374: Some trade or other names: 3-Hexyl-1-hydroxy-7, 8, 9, 10-tetrahydro-6, 6, 9-trimethyl-6H-dibenzo[b,d]pyran; synhexyl;

(25) Peyote, meaning all parts of the plant presently classified botanically as Lophophora Williamsii Lemaire, whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, any extract from any part of such plant, and every compound, manufacture, salts, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its seeds, or extracts; (interprets 21 U.S.C. Sec. 812 (c), Schedule I (c)(12));

(26) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;

(27) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;

(28) Psilocybin;

(29) Psilocyn;

(30) Tetrahydrocannabinols, meaning tetrahydrocannabinols naturally contained in a plant of the genus Cannabis (cannabis plant), as well as synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the plant, or in the resinous extractives of Cannabis, species, and/or synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure and pharmacological activity such as the following:

(i) 1 - cis - or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers, excluding tetrahydrocannabinol in sesame oil and encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a drug product approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration;

(ii) 6 - cis - or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers;

(iii) 3,4 - cis - or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers; or

(iv) That is chemically synthesized and either:

(a) Has been demonstrated to have binding activity at one or more cannabinoid receptors; or

(b) Is a chemical analog or isomer of a compound that has been demonstrated to have binding activity at one or more cannabinoid receptors;

(Since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of numerical designation of atomic positions covered.)

(31) Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine: Some trade or other names: N-ethyl-1phenylcyclohexalymine, (1-phenylcyclohexl) ethylamine; N-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)ethylamine; cyclohexamine; PCE;

(32) Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine: Some trade or other names: 1-(1-phencyclohexyl)pyrrolidine; PCPy; PHP;

(33) Thiophene analog of phencyclidine: Some trade or other names: 1-(1-[2-thenyl]-cyclohexly)-pipendine; 2-thienylanalog of phencyclidine; TPCP; TCP;

(34) 1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl]pyrrolidine: A trade or other name is TCPy.

(d) Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation.

(1) Gamma-hydroxybutyric acid: Some other names include GHB; gamma-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutanoic acid; sodium oxybate; sodium oxybutyrate;

(2) Mecloqualone;

(3) Methaqualone.

(e) Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers:

(1) Aminorex: Some other names: aminoxaphen; 2-amino-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline; or 4, 5-dihydro-5-phenly-2-oxazolamine;

(2) N-Benzylpiperazine: Some other names: BZP,1-benzylpiperazine;

(3) Cathinone, also known as 2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone, alpha-aminopropiophenone, 2-aminopropiophenone and norephedrone;

(4) Fenethylline;

(5) Methcathinone: Some other names: 2-(methylamino)-propiophenone; alpha-(methylamino)propiophenone; 2-(methylamino)-1-phenylpropan-1-one; alpha-N-methylaminopropiophenone; monomethylpropion; ephedrone; N-methylcathinone; methylcathinone; AL-464; AL-422; AL-463 and UR1432, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of optical isomers;

(6) (+-)cis-4-methylaminorex ((+-)cis-4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine);

(7) N-ethylamphetamine;

(8) N,N-dimethylamphetamine: Some trade or other names: N,N-alpha-trimethyl-benzeneethanamine; N,N-alpha-trimethylphenoethylene.

The controlled substances in this section may be added, rescheduled, or deleted as provided for in RCW 69.50.201.

Sec. 3. RCW 69.50.430 and 2003 c 53 s 345 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person convicted of a felony violation of RCW 69.50.401 through 69.50.4013, 69.50.4015, 69.50.402, 69.50.403, 69.50.406, 69.50.407, 69.50.410, or 69.50.415 shall be fined one thousand dollars in addition to any other fine or penalty imposed. Unless the court finds the person to be indigent, this additional fine shall not be suspended or deferred by the court.

(2) On a second or subsequent conviction for violation of any of the laws listed in subsection (1) of this section, the person shall be fined two thousand dollars in addition to any other fine or penalty imposed. Unless the court finds the person to be indigent, this additional fine shall not be suspended or deferred by the court.

(3) In addition to any other civil or criminal penalty, every person who violates or causes another to violate RCW 69.50.401 by distributing, dispensing, manufacturing, displaying for sale, offering for sale, attempting to sell, or selling to a purchaser any product that contains any amount of any synthetic cannabinoid, cathinone, or methcathinone, as identified in RCW 69.50.204, shall be fined not less than ten thousand dollars and not more than five hundred thousand dollars. If, however, the person who violates or causes another to violate RCW 69.50.401 by distributing, dispensing, manufacturing, displaying for sale, offering for sale, attempting to sell, or selling any product that contains any amount of any synthetic cannabinoid, cathinone, or methcathinone, as identified in RCW 69.50.204, to a purchaser under the age of eighteen, the minimum penalty shall be twenty-five thousand dollars if the person is at least two years older than the minor. Unless the court finds the person to be indigent, this additional fine shall not be suspended or deferred by the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) The Washington state patrol shall create a pilot program that uses technologies and protocols to instantly identify synthetic cannabinoids, cathinones, and methcathinones (synthetic drugs), as well as other illicit drugs. The pilot program shall focus on using technology capable of presumptive identification of illicit drugs in the field.

(2) A minimum of five separate districts in the state shall be equipped to operate the pilot program. The state patrol may choose to have one or more of the pilot sites located within a city or county police department.

(3) Prior to July 30, 2016, the state patrol shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature outlining the findings of the pilot program, and make any recommendation on whether the technologies and protocols selected for the pilot program may be used to help prevent the growth of synthetic drugs and other illicit drugs throughout the state. Specifically, the evaluation shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) A review of technical capabilities and accuracy rates of technologies and protocols selected for the pilot program;

(b) A description of the impact to state and local crime lab backlogs if the technologies and protocols selected could eliminate the need to send synthetic drugs, or other illicit drugs, to the crime lab for presumptive testing, including the potential cost savings to state and local governments;

(c) A description of the status of courts' acceptance of the technologies and protocols selected for the pilot program for the presumptive identification of synthetic drugs and other illicit drugs.

--- END ---