BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature showed its commitment to equity in education by passing legislation creating a seal of biliteracy, requiring world language for high school graduation, and easing the transitions of English language learners. The legislature intends to establish a cradle to career approach to support English language learners by creating grant programs to expand dual language programs and bilingual education for early learners, elementary students, and secondary students; and by creating a scholarship to meet the present and future demand for bilingual teachers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The K-12 dual language expansion grant program is created to build and expand well-implemented, sustainable dual language programs and create state-level infrastructure dedicated to dual language instruction. Established programs are incentivized to mentor new programs, with funds provided for expansion and implementation.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall administer the grant program. Subject to appropriations made for this purpose, the superintendent shall award no less than two grants to pairs of school districts: One with an established dual language program with a plan for expansion, and the other with the desire to implement a new dual language program. The superintendent shall prioritize grants to districts with dual language programming for English language learners and migrant students that support instruction in the students' native languages. The superintendent shall also consider a district's sustainability plan for continuing the program beyond the grant period, the geographic location of a district to ensure diversity in the location of grant program funds, the opportunity gap between subgroup populations in a district, and the level of economic hardship in a district. The languages chosen for each dual language program must reflect the languages spoken by a district's English language learner population.

(3) The grant period is two years. Grant funds may be used for professional development, supplemental materials, training, administrative staffing of the program, site visits, recruiting bilingual teachers and instructional aides, program evaluation, and coaching.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall dedicate at least one full-time staff member to provide technical assistance and support for the expansion and implementation of high quality dual language programs in school districts. This staff member shall also provide specific recommendations for any schools and districts with a dual language program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The dual language teacher pipeline scholarship program is created to build capacity for bilingual and dual language programming by developing a pipeline for dual language teachers, from early childhood to K-12 education. The professional educator standards board shall prioritize grants to candidates with a foreign degree or credential who are willing to work in programs awarded grants to expand dual language instruction, as provided in section 2 of this act.

(2) Subject to appropriations made for this purpose, the professional educator standards board shall award scholarships to bilingual professionals wishing to teach in a bilingual program and enrolled in alternative route programs operating routes two, three, or four, as described in RCW 28A.660.040.

(3) The professional educator standards board shall dedicate at least one full-time staff member to support the recruitment and development of bilingual teachers through alternative routes to teacher certification two, three, and four, as described in RCW 28A.660.040. This specialist must administer the scholarship described in this section and provide outreach and assistance to bilingual professionals with bachelor's degrees to support their pathways to teacher certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The early learning bilingual and dual language grant program is created to (a) provide the technical and financial support needed to increase bilingual and dual language instruction in early learning settings where there are a high number of English language learners and (b) create a statewide strategy for increasing bilingual education among providers enrolled in the early achievers quality rating and improvement system.

(2) The department shall administer the grant program. Subject to appropriations made for this purpose, the department shall award small capacity-building grants to providers who are participants in the early achievers program under RCW 43.215.100 and members of nonprofit organizations that provide child care and early learning program referrals throughout the state.

(3) The department shall dedicate at least one full-time lead coach to act as a liaison to nonprofit organizations that provide child care and early learning program referrals throughout the state and to provide dual language training to early achievers coaches working with head start programs and early childhood education and assistance providers under this chapter.

(4) The department shall provide funds to nonprofit organizations that provide child care and early learning program referrals throughout the state to hire at least three full-time lead coaches to provide specialized training and consultation to early achievers coaches working with home-based and center-based programs in bilingual and dual language instruction. The lead coaches must be content experts on supporting English language learners, language acquisition, and effective bilingual and dual language prekindergarten instructional models.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. By November 1, 2018, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator standards board, and the department of early learning shall submit a combined report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes information on grants awarded, student outcome data, and in the case of scholarships, the number of scholarships funded and the demographic data on participants.

--- END ---