BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.56.280 and 1991 c 245 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, immediately after the last day of each month, the county treasurer ((shall)) must pay over to the state treasurer the amount collected by the county treasurer and credited to the various state funds, but every such payment ((shall be)) is subject to correction for error discovered. If they are not paid to the state treasurer before the twentieth day of the month the state treasurer ((shall)) must make a sight draft on the county treasurer for such amount. Should any county treasurer fail or refuse to honor the draft or make payment of the amount thereon, except for manifest error or other good and sufficient cause, the county treasurer ((shall be)) is guilty of nonfeasance in office and upon conviction thereof ((shall)) must be punished according to law.

(2) The county treasurer must place a percentage of property taxes collected for all taxing districts, other than the state and county, in the county current expense fund to defray the costs of collection, as follows:

(a) For taxes levied for collection in calendar years 2016 and 2017, .25 percent;

(b) For taxes levied for collection in calendar years 2018 and 2019, .50 percent; and

(c) For taxes levied for collection in calendar year 2020 and thereafter, one percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act applies to taxes collected by a county treasurer on or after August 1, 2015.

--- END ---