BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of the legislature to increase the number of family medicine physicians in shortage areas in the state by providing a fiscal incentive for hospitals and clinics to develop or expand residency programs in these areas. The legislature also intends to encourage family medicine residents to work in shortage areas by funding the health professional loan repayment and scholarship program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall conduct a performance audit and evaluation of the family medicine residency programs created in chapter 70.112 RCW.

(2) The audit must:

(a) Determine the locations of the residency programs, whether the programs are in health professional shortage areas as defined in RCW 70.112.010 and how the distribution of programs changes over time;

(b) Compare the number of family medical residents who attended an in-state versus an out-of-state medical school;

(c) Compare the number of residents in family medicine versus specialty areas; and

(d) Determine whether graduates of the residency programs in health professional shortage areas continue to work within shortage areas.

(3) The department shall report to the appropriate legislative committees of the house of representatives and the senate the results of its findings by November 1, 2016, and November 1st every even year thereafter.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.112.010 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 41 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Advisory board" means the family medicine education advisory board created in section 5 of this act.

(2) "Affiliated" means established or developed in cooperation with the school of medicine.

(((2) "Family practice unit" means the community facility or classroom used for training of ambulatory health skills within a residency training program.))

(3) "Health professional shortage areas" has the same definition as in RCW 28B.115.020.

(4) "Residency programs" ((mean[s]))means community-based ((family practice)) residency educational programs in family medicine, either in existence or established under this chapter and that are certified by the accreditation council for graduate medical education or by the American osteopathic association.

(((4)))(5) "Schools of medicine" means the University of Washington school of medicine located in Seattle, Washington; the Pacific Northwest University of Health Sciences located in Yakima, Washington; and any other such medical schools that are accredited by the liaison committee on medical education or the American osteopathic association's commission on osteopathic college accreditation, and that locate their entire four-year medical program in Washington.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.112.020 and 2012 c 117 s 426 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is established a statewide medical education system for the purpose of training resident physicians in family ((practice))medicine.

(2) The deans of the school of medicine shall be responsible for implementing the development and expansion of residency programs in cooperation with the medical profession, hospitals, and clinics located throughout the state. The ((chair of the department of family medicine in the)) schools of medicine shall ((determine where affiliated residency programs shall exist;))support development of high quality, accredited, affiliated residency programs, giving consideration to communities in the state where the population, hospital facilities, number of physicians, and interest in medical education indicate the potential success of the residency program and prioritizing support for health professional shortage areas in the state.

(3) The medical education system shall provide financial support for residents in training for those programs which are affiliated with the schools of medicine and shall establish positions for appropriate faculty to staff these programs.

(4) The schools of medicine shall coordinate with the office of student financial assistance to notify prospective family medicine students and residents of their eligibility for the health professional loan repayment and scholarship program under chapter 28B.115 RCW.

(5) The number of programs shall be determined by the board and be in keeping with the needs of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 70.112 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is created a family medicine education advisory board, which must consist of the following nine members:

(a) One member appointed by the dean of the school of medicine at the University of Washington school of medicine;

(b) One member appointed by the dean of the school of medicine at the Pacific Northwest University of Health Sciences;

(c) Two citizen members, one from west of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one from east of the crest of the Cascade mountains, to be appointed by the governor;

(d) One member appointed by the Washington state medical association;

(e) One member appointed by the Washington osteopathic medical association;

(f) One member appointed by the Washington state academy of family physicians;

(g) One hospital administrator representing those Washington hospitals with family medicine residency programs, appointed by the Washington state hospital association; and

(h) One director representing the directors of community-based family medicine residency programs, appointed by the family medicine residency network.

(2) The two members of the advisory board appointed by the deans of the schools of medicine shall serve as chairs of the advisory board.

(3) The cochairs of the advisory board, appointed by the deans of the schools of medicine, shall serve as permanent members of the advisory board without specified term limits. The deans of the schools of medicine have the authority to replace the chair representing their school. The deans of the schools of medicine shall appoint a new member in the event that the member representing their school vacates his or her position.

(4) Other members must be initially appointed as follows: Terms of the two public members must be two years; terms of the members appointed by the medical association and the hospital association must be three years; and the remaining members must be four years. Thereafter, terms for the nonpermanent members must be four years. Members may serve two consecutive terms. New appointments must be filled in the same manner as for original appointments. Vacancies must be filled for an unexpired term in the manner of the original appointment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 70.112 RCW to read as follows:

The advisory board shall consider and provide recommendations on the selection of the areas within the state where affiliate residency programs could exist, the allocation of funds appropriated under this chapter, and the procedures for review and evaluation of the residency programs.

--- END ---