BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW to read as follows:

An advanced registered nurse practitioner may sign and attest to any certificates, cards, forms, or other required documentation that a physician may sign, so long as it is within the advanced registered nurse practitioner's scope of practice.

--- END ---