BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except when a state agency is excluded under RCW 34.05.030 or chapter 34.12 RCW, whenever a statute or rule provides for a state agency to conduct or preside over a hearing or an adjudicative proceeding as defined in RCW 34.05.010, and that state agency is also a party to the hearing or proceeding, the hearing or proceeding shall be presided over by an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW. The administrative law judge shall issue a final decision or final order, including findings of fact and conclusions of law and all matters required by RCW 34.05.461(3), which is appealable only by judicial review. Relief ordered by an administrative law judge under this section may be enforced by petition to a court.

(2) Appeals to the department of revenue under Title 82 or 84 are not subject to the provisions of this act.

Sec. 2. RCW 34.05.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 431 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter shall not apply to:

(a) The state militia, or

(b) The board of clemency and pardons, or

(c) The department of corrections or the indeterminate sentencing review board with respect to persons who are in their custody or are subject to the jurisdiction of those agencies.

(2) The provisions of RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 shall not apply:

(a) To adjudicative proceedings of the board of industrial insurance appeals except as provided in RCW 7.68.110 and 51.48.131;

(b) ((Except for actions pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, to the denial, suspension, or revocation of a driver's license by the department of licensing;

(c))) To the department of labor and industries where another statute expressly provides for review of adjudicative proceedings of a department action, order, decision, or award before the board of industrial insurance appeals;

(((d)))(c) Unless section 1 of this act applies, to actions of the Washington personnel resources board, the human resources director, or the office of financial management and the department of enterprise services when carrying out their duties under chapter 41.06 RCW;

(((e)))(d) To adjustments by the department of revenue of the amount of the surcharge imposed under RCW 82.04.261; or

(((f)))(e) To the extent they are inconsistent with any provisions of chapter 43.43 RCW.

(3) Unless a party makes an election for a formal hearing pursuant to RCW 82.03.140 or 82.03.190, RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 do not apply to a review hearing conducted by the board of tax appeals.

(4) The rule-making provisions of this chapter do not apply to:

(a) Reimbursement unit values, fee schedules, arithmetic conversion factors, and similar arithmetic factors used to determine payment rates that apply to goods and services purchased under contract for clients eligible under chapter 74.09 RCW; and

(b) Adjustments by the department of revenue of the amount of the surcharge imposed under RCW 82.04.261.

(5) All other agencies, whether or not formerly specifically excluded from the provisions of all or any part of the administrative procedure act, shall be subject to the entire act.

Sec. 3. RCW 34.05.425 and 2013 c 109 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section((,)):

(a) Where the agency is not a party to the administrative hearing, in the discretion of the agency head, the presiding officer in an administrative hearing shall be:

(((a)))(i) The agency head or one or more members of the agency head;

(((b)))(ii) If the agency has statutory authority to do so, a person other than the agency head or an administrative law judge designated by the agency head to make the final decision and enter the final order;

(((c)))(iii) One or more administrative law judges assigned by the office of administrative hearings in accordance with chapter 34.12 RCW; or

(((d)))(iv) A person or persons designated by the secretary of health pursuant to RCW 43.70.740.

(b) Where the agency is a party to the administrative hearing, the presiding officer in an administrative hearing shall be an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW, or a person or persons designated by the secretary of health pursuant to RCW 43.70.740.

(2) An agency expressly exempted under RCW 34.12.020(4) or other statute from the provisions of chapter 34.12 RCW or an institution of higher education shall designate a presiding officer as provided by rules adopted by the agency.

(3) Any individual serving or designated to serve alone or with others as presiding officer is subject to disqualification for bias, prejudice, interest, or any other cause provided in this chapter or for which a judge is disqualified.

(4) Any party may petition for the disqualification of an individual promptly after receipt of notice indicating that the individual will preside or, if later, promptly upon discovering facts establishing grounds for disqualification.

(5) The individual whose disqualification is requested shall determine whether to grant the petition, stating facts and reasons for the determination.

(6) When the presiding officer is an administrative law judge, the provisions of this section regarding disqualification for cause are in addition to the motion of prejudice available under RCW 34.12.050.

(7) If a substitute is required for an individual who becomes unavailable as a result of disqualification or any other reason, the substitute must be appointed by the appropriate appointing authority.

(8) Any action taken by a duly appointed substitute for an unavailable individual is as effective as if taken by the unavailable individual.

Sec. 4. RCW 34.05.461 and 2013 c 110 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section:

(a) If the presiding officer is the agency head or one or more members of the agency head, the presiding officer may enter an initial order if further review is available within the agency, or a final order if further review is not available;

(b) If the presiding officer is a person designated by the agency to make the final decision and enter the final order, the presiding officer shall enter a final order; and

(c) If the presiding officer is one or more administrative law judges, the presiding officer shall enter an initial order unless the hearing is subject to section 1 of this act, and then the presiding officer shall enter a final order.

(2) With respect to agencies exempt from chapter 34.12 RCW or an institution of higher education, the presiding officer shall transmit a full and complete record of the proceedings, including such comments upon demeanor of witnesses as the presiding officer deems relevant, to each agency official who is to enter a final or initial order after considering the record and evidence so transmitted.

(3) Initial and final orders shall include a statement of findings and conclusions, and the reasons and basis therefor, on all the material issues of fact, law, or discretion presented on the record, including the remedy or sanction and, if applicable, the action taken on a petition for a stay of effectiveness. Any findings based substantially on credibility of evidence or demeanor of witnesses shall be so identified. Findings set forth in language that is essentially a repetition or paraphrase of the relevant provision of law shall be accompanied by a concise and explicit statement of the underlying evidence of record to support the findings. The order shall also include a statement of the available procedures and time limits for seeking reconsideration or other administrative relief. An initial order shall include a statement of any circumstances under which the initial order, without further notice, may become a final order.

(4) Findings of fact shall be based exclusively on the evidence of record in the adjudicative proceeding and on matters officially noticed in that proceeding. Findings shall be based on the kind of evidence on which reasonably prudent persons are accustomed to rely in the conduct of their affairs. Findings may be based on such evidence even if it would be inadmissible in a civil trial. However, the presiding officer shall not base a finding exclusively on such inadmissible evidence unless the presiding officer determines that doing so would not unduly abridge the parties' opportunities to confront witnesses and rebut evidence. The basis for this determination shall appear in the order.

(5) Where it bears on the issues presented, the agency's experience, technical competency, and specialized knowledge may be used in the evaluation of evidence.

(6) If a person serving or designated to serve as presiding officer becomes unavailable for any reason before entry of the order, a substitute presiding officer shall be appointed as provided in RCW 34.05.425. The substitute presiding officer shall use any existing record and may conduct any further proceedings appropriate in the interests of justice.

(7) The presiding officer may allow the parties a designated time after conclusion of the hearing for the submission of memos, briefs, or proposed findings.

(8)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, initial or final orders shall be served in writing within ninety days after conclusion of the hearing or after submission of memos, briefs, or proposed findings in accordance with subsection (7) of this section unless this period is waived or extended for good cause shown. The initial or final order may be served on a party via electronic distribution, with a party's agreement.

(b) This subsection does not apply to the final order of the shorelines hearings board on appeal under RCW 90.58.180(3).

(9) The presiding officer shall cause copies of the order to be served on each party and the agency.

Sec. 5. RCW 34.12.040 and 2013 c 109 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Except pursuant to RCW 43.70.740, unless a hearing is subject to section 1 of this act, whenever a state agency conducts a hearing which is not presided over by officials of the agency who are to render the final decision, the hearing shall be conducted by an administrative law judge assigned under this chapter. In assigning administrative law judges, the chief administrative law judge shall wherever practical (1) use personnel having expertise in the field or subject matter of the hearing, and (2) assign administrative law judges primarily to the hearings of particular agencies on a long-term basis.

Sec. 6. RCW 34.12.060 and 2011 c 336 s 763 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in section 1 of this act, when an administrative law judge presides at a hearing under this chapter and a majority of the officials of the agency who are to render the final decision have not heard substantially all of the oral testimony and read all exhibits submitted by any party, it shall be the duty of such judge, or in the event of his or her unavailability or incapacity, of another judge appointed by the chief administrative law judge, to issue an initial decision or proposal for decision including findings of fact and conclusions of law in accordance with RCW 34.05.461 or 34.05.485. However, this section does not apply to a state patrol disciplinary hearing conducted under RCW 43.43.090.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 34.12 RCW to read as follows:

For state agency hearings where the state agency is exclusively or principally also a party to the hearing:

(1) All state employees who have exclusively or principally conducted or presided over hearings for state agencies prior to July 1, 2015, shall be transferred to the office.

(2) All state employees who have exclusively or principally served as support staff for those employees transferred under subsection (1) of this section shall be transferred to the office.

(3) All equipment or other tangible property in possession of state agencies, used or held exclusively or principally by personnel transferred under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be transferred to the office unless the office of financial management, in consultation with the head of the agency and the chief administrative law judge, determines that the equipment or property will be more efficiently used by the agency if such property is not transferred.

Sec. 8. RCW 9.46.140 and 1989 c 175 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission or its authorized representative may:

(a) Make necessary public or private investigations within or outside of this state to determine whether any person has violated or is about to violate this chapter or any rule or order hereunder, or to aid in the enforcement of this chapter or in the prescribing of rules and forms hereunder; and

(b) Inspect the books, documents, and records of any person lending money to or in any manner financing any license holder or applicant for a license or receiving any income or profits from the use of such license for the purpose of determining compliance or noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(2) Except as required under section 1 of this act, for the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under this chapter, the commission or an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW may conduct hearings, administer oaths or affirmations, or upon the commission's or administrative law judge's motion or upon request of any party may subpoena witnesses, compel attendance, take depositions, take evidence, or require the production of any matter which is relevant to the investigation or proceeding, including but not limited to the existence, description, nature, custody, condition, or location of any books, documents, or other tangible things, or the identity or location of persons having knowledge or relevant facts, or any other matter reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of material evidence.

(3) Upon failure to obey a subpoena or to answer questions propounded by the administrative law judge and upon reasonable notice to all persons affected thereby, the director may apply to the superior court for an order compelling compliance.

(4) The administrative law judges appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW ((may))shall conduct hearings with authority to render final decisions respecting the suspension, revocation, or denial of licenses, who may administer oaths, admit or deny admission of evidence, compel the attendance of witnesses, issue subpoenas, issue orders, and exercise all other powers and perform all other functions set out in RCW 34.05.446, 34.05.449, and 34.05.452.

(5) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all proceedings under this chapter shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 9. RCW 9.46.231 and 2008 c 6 s 629 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following are subject to seizure and forfeiture and no property right exists in them:

(a) All gambling devices as defined in this chapter;

(b) All furnishings, fixtures, equipment, and stock, including without limitation furnishings and fixtures adaptable to nongambling uses and equipment and stock for printing, recording, computing, transporting, or safekeeping, used in connection with professional gambling or maintaining a gambling premises;

(c) All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels, that are used, or intended for use, in any manner to facilitate the sale, delivery, receipt, or operation of any gambling device, or the promotion or operation of a professional gambling activity, except that:

(i) A conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business as a common carrier is not subject to forfeiture under this section unless it appears that the owner or other person in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a violation of this chapter;

(ii) A conveyance is not subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of any act or omission established by the owner thereof to have been committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent;

(iii) A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission; and

(iv) If the owner of a conveyance has been arrested under this chapter the conveyance in which the person is arrested may not be subject to forfeiture unless it is seized or process is issued for its seizure within ten days of the owner's arrest;

(d) All books, records, and research products and materials, including formulas, microfilm, tapes, and electronic data that are used, or intended for use, in violation of this chapter;

(e) All moneys, negotiable instruments, securities, or other tangible or intangible property of value at stake or displayed in or in connection with professional gambling activity or furnished or intended to be furnished by any person to facilitate the promotion or operation of a professional gambling activity;

(f) All tangible or intangible personal property, proceeds, or assets acquired in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to professional gambling activity and all moneys, negotiable instruments, and securities used or intended to be used to facilitate any violation of this chapter. A forfeiture of money, negotiable instruments, securities, or other tangible or intangible property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if, at the time the security interest was created, the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission. Personal property may not be forfeited under this subsection (1)(f), to the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission that that owner establishes was committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent; and

(g) All real property, including any right, title, and interest in the whole of any lot or tract of land, and any appurtenances or improvements that:

(i) Have been used with the knowledge of the owner for the manufacturing, processing, delivery, importing, or exporting of any illegal gambling equipment, or operation of a professional gambling activity that would constitute a felony violation of this chapter; or

(ii) Have been acquired in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to a professional gambling activity, if the activity is not less than a class C felony.

Real property forfeited under this chapter that is encumbered by a bona fide security interest remains subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party, at the time the security interest was created, neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission. Property may not be forfeited under this subsection, to the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent.

(2)(a) A law enforcement officer of this state may seize real or personal property subject to forfeiture under this chapter upon process issued by any superior court having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure of real property includes the filing of a lis pendens by the seizing agency. Real property seized under this section may not be transferred or otherwise conveyed until ninety days after seizure or until a judgment of forfeiture is entered, whichever is later, but real property seized under this section may be transferred or conveyed to any person or entity who acquires title by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a bona fide security interest.

(b) Seizure of personal property without process may be made if:

(i) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant;

(ii) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon this chapter;

(iii) A law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property is directly or indirectly dangerous to health or safety; or

(iv) The law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of this chapter.

(3) In the event of seizure under subsection (2) of this section, proceedings for forfeiture are deemed commenced by the seizure. The law enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure was made shall cause notice to be served within fifteen days following the seizure on the owner of the property seized and the person in charge thereof and any person having any known right or interest therein, including any community property interest, of the seizure and intended forfeiture of the seized property. Service of notice of seizure of real property must be made according to the rules of civil procedure. However, the state may not obtain a default judgment with respect to real property against a party who is served by substituted service absent an affidavit stating that a good faith effort has been made to ascertain if the defaulted party is incarcerated within the state, and that there is no present basis to believe that the party is incarcerated within the state. Notice of seizure in the case of property subject to a security interest that has been perfected by filing a financing statement in accordance with chapter 62A.9A RCW, or a certificate of title, must be made by service upon the secured party or the secured party's assignee at the address shown on the financing statement or the certificate of title. The notice of seizure in other cases may be served by any method authorized by law or court rule including but not limited to service by certified mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail is deemed complete upon mailing within the fifteen-day period following the seizure.

(4) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of items specified in subsection (1) of this section within forty-five days of the seizure in the case of personal property and ninety days in the case of real property, the item seized is deemed forfeited. The community property interest in real property of a person whose spouse or domestic partner committed a violation giving rise to seizure of the real property may not be forfeited if the person did not participate in the violation.

(5) If any person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of items specified in subsection (1) of this section within forty-five days of the seizure in the case of personal property and ninety days in the case of real property, the person or persons must be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to the claim or right. The hearing must be before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or the chief law enforcement officer's designee, except if the seizing agency is a state agency as defined in RCW 34.12.020(4), the hearing must be before ((the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or)) an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW with authority to render a final decision, except that any person asserting a claim or right may remove the matter to a court of competent jurisdiction. Removal of any matter involving personal property may only be accomplished according to the rules of civil procedure. The person seeking removal of the matter must serve process against the state, county, political subdivision, or municipality that operates the seizing agency, and any other party of interest, in accordance with RCW 4.28.080 or 4.92.020, within forty-five days after the person seeking removal has notified the seizing law enforcement agency of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession. The court to which the matter is to be removed must be the district court if the aggregate value of personal property is within the jurisdictional limit set forth in RCW 3.66.020. A hearing before the seizing agency and any appeal therefrom must be under Title 34 RCW. In a court hearing between two or more claimants to the article or articles involved, the prevailing party is entitled to a judgment for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees. In cases involving personal property, the burden of producing evidence is upon the person claiming to be the lawful owner or the person claiming to have the lawful right to possession of the property. In cases involving property seized under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the only issues to be determined by the tribunal are whether the item seized is a gambling device, and whether the device is an antique device as defined by RCW 9.46.235. In cases involving real property, the burden of producing evidence is upon the law enforcement agency. The burden of proof that the seized real property is subject to forfeiture is upon the law enforcement agency. The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly return the article or articles to the claimant upon a final determination by the administrative law judge or court that the claimant is the present lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession thereof of items specified in subsection (1) of this section.

(6) If property is forfeited under this chapter the seizing law enforcement agency may:

(a) Retain it for official use or upon application by any law enforcement agency of this state release the property to the agency for training or use in enforcing this chapter;

(b) Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and which is not harmful to the public; or

(c) Destroy any articles that may not be lawfully possessed within the state of Washington, or that have a fair market value of less than one hundred dollars.

(7)(a) If property is forfeited, the seizing agency shall keep a record indicating the identity of the prior owner, if known, a description of the property, the disposition of the property, the value of the property at the time of seizure, and the amount of proceeds realized from disposition of the property. The net proceeds of forfeited property is the value of the forfeitable interest in the property after deducting the cost of satisfying any bona fide security interest to which the property is subject at the time of seizure, and in the case of sold property, after deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable fees or commissions paid to independent selling agents.

(b) Each seizing agency shall retain records of forfeited property for at least seven years.

(8) The seizing law enforcement agency shall retain forfeited property and net proceeds exclusively for the expansion and improvement of gambling-related law enforcement activity. Money retained under this section may not be used to supplant preexisting funding sources.

(9) Gambling devices that are possessed, transferred, sold, or offered for sale in violation of this chapter are contraband and must be seized and summarily forfeited to the state. Gambling equipment that is seized or comes into the possession of a law enforcement agency, the owners of which are unknown, are contraband and must be summarily forfeited to the state.

(10) Upon the entry of an order of forfeiture of real property, the court shall forward a copy of the order to the assessor of the county in which the property is located. The superior court shall enter orders for the forfeiture of real property, subject to court rules. The seizing agency shall file such an order in the county auditor's records in the county in which the real property is located.

(11)(a) A landlord may assert a claim against proceeds from the sale of assets seized and forfeited under subsection (6)(b) of this section, only if:

(i) A law enforcement officer, while acting in his or her official capacity, directly caused damage to the complaining landlord's property while executing a search of a tenant's residence; and

(ii) The landlord has applied any funds remaining in the tenant's deposit, to which the landlord has a right under chapter 59.18 RCW, to cover the damage directly caused by a law enforcement officer before asserting a claim under this section.

(A) Only if the funds applied under (a)(ii) of this subsection are insufficient to satisfy the damage directly caused by a law enforcement officer, may the landlord seek compensation for the damage by filing a claim against the governmental entity under whose authority the law enforcement agency operates within thirty days after the search; and

(B) Only if the governmental entity denies or fails to respond to the landlord's claim within sixty days of the date of filing, may the landlord collect damages under this subsection by filing within thirty days of denial or the expiration of the sixty-day period, whichever occurs first, a claim with the seizing law enforcement agency. The seizing law enforcement agency shall notify the landlord of the status of the claim by the end of the thirty-day period. This section does not require the claim to be paid by the end of the sixty-day or thirty-day period.

(b) For any claim filed under (a)(ii) of this subsection, the law enforcement agency shall pay the claim unless the agency provides substantial proof that the landlord either:

(i) Knew or consented to actions of the tenant in violation of this chapter; or

(ii) Failed to respond to a notification of the illegal activity, provided by a law enforcement agency within seven days of receipt of notification of the illegal activity.

(12) The landlord's claim for damages under subsection (11) of this section may not include a claim for loss of business and is limited to:

(a) Damage to tangible property and clean-up costs;

(b) The lesser of the cost of repair or fair market value of the damage directly caused by a law enforcement officer;

(c) The proceeds from the sale of the specific tenant's property seized and forfeited under subsection (6)(b) of this section; and

(d) The proceeds available after the seizing law enforcement agency satisfies any bona fide security interest in the tenant's property and costs related to sale of the tenant's property as provided by subsection (7)(a) of this section.

(13) Subsections (11) and (12) of this section do not limit any other rights a landlord may have against a tenant to collect for damages. However, if a law enforcement agency satisfies a landlord's claim under subsection (11) of this section, the rights the landlord has against the tenant for damages directly caused by a law enforcement officer under the terms of the landlord and tenant's contract are subrogated to the law enforcement agency.

(14) Liability is not imposed by this section upon any authorized state, county, or municipal officer, including a commission special agent, in the lawful performance of his or her duties.

Sec. 10. RCW 9A.88.150 and 2014 c 188 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following are subject to seizure and forfeiture and no property right exists in them:

(a) Any property or other interest acquired or maintained in violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070 to the extent of the investment of funds, and any appreciation or income attributable to the investment, from a violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070;

(b) All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels, which are used, or intended for use, in any manner to facilitate a violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070, except that:

(i) No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture under this section unless it appears that the owner or other person in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070;

(ii) No conveyance is subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of any act or omission established by the owner thereof to have been committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent;

(iii) A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission; and

(iv) When the owner of a conveyance has been arrested for a violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070, the conveyance in which the person is arrested may not be subject to forfeiture unless it is seized or process is issued for its seizure within ten days of the owner's arrest;

(c) Any property, contractual right, or claim against property used to influence any enterprise that a person has established, operated, controlled, conducted, or participated in the conduct of, in violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070;

(d) All proceeds traceable to or derived from an offense defined in RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070 and all moneys, negotiable instruments, securities, and other things of value significantly used or intended to be used significantly to facilitate commission of the offense;

(e) All books, records, and research products and materials, including formulas, microfilm, tapes, and data which are used, or intended for use, in violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070;

(f) All moneys, negotiable instruments, securities, or other tangible or intangible property of value furnished or intended to be furnished by any person in exchange for a violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070, all tangible or intangible personal property, proceeds, or assets acquired in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to an exchange or series of exchanges in violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070, and all moneys, negotiable instruments, and securities used or intended to be used to facilitate any violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070. A forfeiture of money, negotiable instruments, securities, or other tangible or intangible property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if, at the time the security interest was created, the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission. No personal property may be forfeited under this subsection (1)(f), to the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission, which that owner establishes was committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent; and

(g) All real property, including any right, title, and interest in the whole of any lot or tract of land, and any appurtenances or improvements which are being used with the knowledge of the owner for a violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070, or which have been acquired in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to an exchange or series of exchanges in violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070, if a substantial nexus exists between the violation and the real property. However:

(i) No property may be forfeited pursuant to this subsection (1)(g), to the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent;

(ii) A forfeiture of real property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party, at the time the security interest was created, neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission.

(2) Real or personal property subject to forfeiture under this section may be seized by any law enforcement officer of this state upon process issued by any superior court having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure of real property shall include the filing of a lis pendens by the seizing agency. Real property seized under this section shall not be transferred or otherwise conveyed until ninety days after seizure or until a judgment of forfeiture is entered, whichever is later: PROVIDED, That real property seized under this section may be transferred or conveyed to any person or entity who acquires title by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a security interest. Seizure of personal property without process may be made if:

(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant;

(b) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding; or

(c) The law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070.

(3) In the event of seizure pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, proceedings for forfeiture shall be deemed commenced by the seizure. The law enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure was made shall cause notice to be served within fifteen days following the seizure on the owner of the property seized and the person in charge thereof and any person having any known right or interest therein, including any community property interest, of the seizure and intended forfeiture of the seized property. Service of notice of seizure of real property shall be made according to the rules of civil procedure. However, the state may not obtain a default judgment with respect to real property against a party who is served by substituted service absent an affidavit stating that a good faith effort has been made to ascertain if the defaulted party is incarcerated within the state, and that there is no present basis to believe that the party is incarcerated within the state. Notice of seizure in the case of property subject to a security interest that has been perfected by filing a financing statement, or a certificate of title, shall be made by service upon the secured party or the secured party's assignee at the address shown on the financing statement or the certificate of title. The notice of seizure in other cases may be served by any method authorized by law or court rule including, but not limited to, service by certified mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail shall be deemed complete upon mailing within the fifteen day period following the seizure.

(4) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of items specified in subsection (1) of this section within forty-five days of the service of notice from the seizing agency in the case of personal property and ninety days in the case of real property, the item seized shall be deemed forfeited. The community property interest in real property of a person whose spouse or domestic partner committed a violation giving rise to seizure of the real property may not be forfeited if the person did not participate in the violation.

(5) If any person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of items specified in subsection (1) of this section within forty-five days of the service of notice from the seizing agency in the case of personal property and ninety days in the case of real property, the person or persons shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to the claim or right. The notice of claim may be served by any method authorized by law or court rule including, but not limited to, service by first-class mail. Service by mail shall be deemed complete upon mailing within the forty-five day period following service of the notice of seizure in the case of personal property and within the ninety day period following service of the notice of seizure in the case of real property. The hearing shall be before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or the chief law enforcement officer's designee, except where the seizing agency is a state agency as defined in RCW 34.12.020(4), the hearing shall be before ((the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or)) an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW with authority to render a final decision, except that any person asserting a claim or right may remove the matter to a court of competent jurisdiction. Removal of any matter involving personal property may only be accomplished according to the rules of civil procedure. The person seeking removal of the matter must serve process against the state, county, political subdivision, or municipality that operates the seizing agency, and any other party of interest, in accordance with RCW 4.28.080 or 4.92.020, within forty-five days after the person seeking removal has notified the seizing law enforcement agency of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession. The court to which the matter is to be removed shall be the district court when the aggregate value of personal property is within the jurisdictional limit set forth in RCW 3.66.020. A hearing before the seizing agency and any appeal therefrom shall be under Title 34 RCW. In all cases, the burden of proof is upon the law enforcement agency to establish, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the property is subject to forfeiture.

The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly return the article or articles to the claimant upon a determination by the administrative law judge or court that the claimant is the present lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession thereof of items specified in subsection (1) of this section.

(6) In any proceeding to forfeit property under this title, where the claimant substantially prevails, the claimant is entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees reasonably incurred by the claimant. In addition, in a court hearing between two or more claimants to the article or articles involved, the prevailing party is entitled to a judgment for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.

(7) When property is forfeited under this chapter, the seizing law enforcement agency may:

(a) Retain it for official use or upon application by any law enforcement agency of this state release the property to that agency for the exclusive use of enforcing this chapter or chapter 9.68A RCW;

(b) Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and which is not harmful to the public; or

(c) Request the appropriate sheriff or director of public safety to take custody of the property and remove it for disposition in accordance with law.

(8)(a) When property is forfeited, the seizing agency shall keep a record indicating the identity of the prior owner, if known, a description of the property, the disposition of the property, the value of the property at the time of seizure, and the amount of proceeds realized from disposition of the property.

(b) Each seizing agency shall retain records of forfeited property for at least seven years.

(c) Each seizing agency shall file a report including a copy of the records of forfeited property with the state treasurer each calendar quarter.

(d) The quarterly report need not include a record of forfeited property that is still being held for use as evidence during the investigation or prosecution of a case or during the appeal from a conviction.

(9)(a) By January 31st of each year, each seizing agency shall remit to the state treasurer an amount equal to ten percent of the net proceeds of any property forfeited during the preceding calendar year. Money remitted shall be deposited in the prostitution prevention and intervention account under RCW 43.63A.740.

(b) The net proceeds of forfeited property is the value of the forfeitable interest in the property after deducting the cost of satisfying any bona fide security interest to which the property is subject at the time of seizure; and in the case of sold property, after deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable fees or commissions paid to independent selling agents, and the cost of any valid landlord's claim for damages under subsection (12) of this section.

(c) The value of sold forfeited property is the sale price. The value of destroyed property and retained firearms or illegal property is zero.

(10) Net proceeds not required to be paid to the state treasurer shall be used for payment of all proper expenses of the investigation leading to the seizure, including any money delivered to the subject of the investigation by the law enforcement agency, and of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure, maintenance of custody, advertising, actual costs of the prosecuting or city attorney, and court costs. Money remaining after payment of these expenses shall be retained by the seizing law enforcement agency for the exclusive use of enforcing the provisions of this chapter or chapter 9.68A RCW.

(11) Upon the entry of an order of forfeiture of real property, the court shall forward a copy of the order to the assessor of the county in which the property is located. Orders for the forfeiture of real property shall be entered by the superior court, subject to court rules. Such an order shall be filed by the seizing agency in the county auditor's records in the county in which the real property is located.

(12) A landlord may assert a claim against proceeds from the sale of assets seized and forfeited under subsection (9) of this section, only if:

(a) A law enforcement officer, while acting in his or her official capacity, directly caused damage to the complaining landlord's property while executing a search of a tenant's residence;

(b) The landlord has applied any funds remaining in the tenant's deposit, to which the landlord has a right under chapter 59.18 RCW, to cover the damage directly caused by a law enforcement officer prior to asserting a claim under the provisions of this section:

(i) Only if the funds applied under (b) of this subsection are insufficient to satisfy the damage directly caused by a law enforcement officer, may the landlord seek compensation for the damage by filing a claim against the governmental entity under whose authority the law enforcement agency operates within thirty days after the search;

(ii) Only if the governmental entity denies or fails to respond to the landlord's claim within sixty days of the date of filing, may the landlord collect damages under this subsection by filing within thirty days of denial or the expiration of the sixty day period, whichever occurs first, a claim with the seizing law enforcement agency. The seizing law enforcement agency must notify the landlord of the status of the claim by the end of the thirty day period. Nothing in this section requires the claim to be paid by the end of the sixty day or thirty day period; and

(c) For any claim filed under (b) of this subsection, the law enforcement agency shall pay the claim unless the agency provides substantial proof that the landlord either:

(i) Knew or consented to actions of the tenant in violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070; or

(ii) Failed to respond to a notification of the illegal activity, provided by a law enforcement agency under RCW 59.18.075, within seven days of receipt of notification of the illegal activity.

(13) The landlord's claim for damages under subsection (12) of this section may not include a claim for loss of business and is limited to:

(a) Damage to tangible property and clean-up costs;

(b) The lesser of the cost of repair or fair market value of the damage directly caused by a law enforcement officer;

(c) The proceeds from the sale of the specific tenant's property seized and forfeited under subsection (9) of this section; and

(d) The proceeds available after the seizing law enforcement agency satisfies any bona fide security interest in the tenant's property and costs related to sale of the tenant's property as provided by subsection (12) of this section.

(14) Subsections (12) and (13) of this section do not limit any other rights a landlord may have against a tenant to collect for damages. However, if a law enforcement agency satisfies a landlord's claim under subsection (12) of this section, the rights the landlord has against the tenant for damages directly caused by a law enforcement officer under the terms of the landlord and tenant's contract are subrogated to the law enforcement agency.

Sec. 11. RCW 10.105.010 and 2009 c 479 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following are subject to seizure and forfeiture and no property right exists in them: All personal property, including, but not limited to, any item, object, tool, substance, device, weapon, machine, vehicle of any kind, money, security, or negotiable instrument, which has been or was actually employed as an instrumentality in the commission of, or in aiding or abetting in the commission of any felony, or which was furnished or was intended to be furnished by any person in the commission of, as a result of, or as compensation for the commission of, any felony, or which was acquired in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to the commission of a felony. No property may be forfeited under this section until after there has been a superior court conviction of the owner of the property for the felony in connection with which the property was employed, furnished, or acquired.

A forfeiture of property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if at the time the security interest was created, the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the commission of the felony.

(2) Personal property subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be seized by any law enforcement officer of this state upon process issued by any superior court having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure of personal property without process may be made if:

(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant;

(b) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding;

(c) A law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property is directly dangerous to health or safety; or

(d) The law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used in the commission of a felony.

(3) In the event of seizure pursuant to this section, proceedings for forfeiture shall be deemed commenced by the seizure. The law enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure was made shall cause notice to be served within fifteen days following the seizure on the owner of the property seized and the person in charge thereof and any person having any known right or interest therein, including any community property interest, of the seizure and intended forfeiture of the seized property. The notice of seizure may be served by any method authorized by law or court rule including but not limited to service by certified mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail shall be deemed complete upon mailing within the fifteen day period following the seizure. Notice of seizure in the case of property subject to a security interest that has been perfected by filing a financing statement in accordance with chapter 62A.9A RCW, or a certificate of title shall be made by service upon the secured party or the secured party's assignee at the address shown on the financing statement or the certificate of title.

(4) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of items specified in subsection (1) of this section within forty-five days of the seizure, the item seized shall be deemed forfeited.

(5) If a person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of the seized property within forty-five days of the seizure, the law enforcement agency shall give the person or persons a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to the claim or right. The hearing shall be before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or the chief law enforcement officer's designee, except where the seizing agency is a state agency as defined in RCW 34.12.020(4), the hearing shall be before ((the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or)) an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW with authority to render a final decision, except that any person asserting a claim or right may remove the matter to a court of competent jurisdiction. Removal may only be accomplished according to the rules of civil procedure. The person seeking removal of the matter must serve process against the state, county, political subdivision, or municipality that operates the seizing agency, and any other party of interest, in accordance with RCW 4.28.080 or 4.92.020, within forty-five days after the person seeking removal has notified the seizing law enforcement agency of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession. The court to which the matter is to be removed shall be the district court when the aggregate value of the property is within the jurisdictional limit set forth in RCW 3.66.020. A hearing before the seizing agency and any appeal therefrom shall be under Title 34 RCW. In a court hearing between two or more claimants to the property involved, the prevailing party shall be entitled to a judgment for costs and reasonable attorney's fees. The burden of producing evidence shall be upon the person claiming to be the lawful owner or the person claiming to have the lawful right to possession of the property. The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly return the property to the claimant upon a determination by the administrative law judge or court that the claimant is the present lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession of the property.

(6) When property is forfeited under this chapter, after satisfying any court-ordered victim restitution, the seizing law enforcement agency may:

(a) Retain it for official use or upon application by any law enforcement agency of this state release such property to such agency for the exclusive use of enforcing the criminal law;

(b) Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and which is not harmful to the public.

(7) By January 31st of each year, each seizing agency shall remit to the state treasurer an amount equal to ten percent of the net proceeds of any property forfeited during the preceding calendar year. Money remitted shall be deposited in the state general fund.

(a) The net proceeds of forfeited property is the value of the forfeitable interest in the property after deducting the cost of satisfying any bona fide security interest to which the property is subject at the time of seizure; and in the case of sold property, after deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable fees or commissions paid to independent selling agents.

(b) The value of sold forfeited property is the sale price. The value of retained forfeited property is the fair market value of the property at the time of seizure, determined when possible by reference to an applicable commonly used index, such as the index used by the department of licensing for valuation of motor vehicles. A seizing agency may use, but need not use, an independent qualified appraiser to determine the value of retained property. If an appraiser is used, the value of the property appraised is net of the cost of the appraisal. The value of destroyed property and retained firearms or illegal property is zero.

(c) Retained property and net proceeds not required to be paid to the state treasurer, or otherwise required to be spent under this section, shall be retained by the seizing law enforcement agency exclusively for the expansion and improvement of law enforcement activity. Money retained under this section may not be used to supplant preexisting funding sources.

Sec. 12. RCW 18.27.225 and 1987 c 419 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If, upon inspection or investigation, the director or authorized compliance inspector reasonably believes that a contractor has failed to register in accordance with this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter, the director shall issue an order immediately restraining further construction work at the job site by the contractor. The order shall describe the specific violation that necessitated issuance of the restraining order. The contractor or representative to whom the restraining order is directed may request a hearing before an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW with authority to render a final decision, such hearing to be conducted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. A request for hearing shall not stay the effect of the restraining order.

(2) In addition to and after having invoked the powers of restraint vested in the director as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the director, through the attorney general, may petition the superior court of the state of Washington to enjoin any activity in violation of this chapter. A prima facie case for issuance of an injunction shall be established by affidavits and supporting documentation demonstrating that a restraining order was served upon the contractor and that the contractor continued to work after service of the order. Upon the filing of the petition, the superior court shall have jurisdiction to grant injunctive or other appropriate relief, pending the outcome of enforcement proceedings under this chapter, or to enforce restraining orders issued by the director. If the contractor fails to comply with any court order, the director shall request the attorney general to petition the superior court for an order holding the contractor in contempt of court and for any other appropriate relief.

Sec. 13. RCW 18.27.310 and 2007 c 436 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW shall conduct contractors' notice of infraction cases pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) The burden of proof is on the department to establish the commission of the infraction by a preponderance of the evidence, unless the infraction is issued against an unregistered contractor in which case the burden of proof is on the contractor. The notice of infraction shall be dismissed if the appellant establishes that, at the time the advertising occurred, offer or bid was made, or work was performed, the appellant was registered by the department, without suspension, or was exempt from registration.

(3) After consideration of the evidence and argument, the administrative law judge shall determine whether the infraction was committed. If it has not been established that the infraction was committed, an order dismissing the notice shall be entered in the record of the proceedings. If it has been established that the infraction was committed, the administrative law judge shall issue findings of fact and conclusions of law in its decision and order determining whether the infraction was committed.

(4) An appeal from the administrative law judge's determination or order shall be to the superior court. The decision of the superior court is subject only to discretionary review pursuant to Rule 2.3 of the Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Sec. 14. RCW 18.130.050 and 2013 c 109 s 1 and 2013 c 86 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in RCW 18.130.062, the disciplining authority has the following authority:

(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind such rules as are deemed necessary to carry out this chapter;

(2) To investigate all complaints or reports of unprofessional conduct as defined in this chapter;

(3) To hold hearings as provided in this chapter;

(4) To issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any investigation, consideration of an application for license, hearing, or proceeding held under this chapter;

(5) To take or cause depositions to be taken and use other discovery procedures as needed in any investigation, hearing, or proceeding held under this chapter;

(6) To compel attendance of witnesses at hearings;

(7) In the course of investigating a complaint or report of unprofessional conduct, to conduct practice reviews and to issue citations and assess fines for failure to produce documents, records, or other items in accordance with RCW 18.130.230;

(8) To take emergency action ordering summary suspension of a license, or restriction or limitation of the license holder's practice pending proceedings by the disciplining authority. Within fourteen days of a request by the affected license holder, the disciplining authority must provide a show cause hearing in accordance with the requirements of RCW 18.130.135. In addition to the authority in this subsection, a disciplining authority shall:

(a) Consistent with RCW 18.130.370, issue a summary suspension of the license or temporary practice permit of a license holder prohibited from practicing a health care profession in another state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction because of an act of unprofessional conduct that is substantially equivalent to an act of unprofessional conduct prohibited by this chapter or any of the chapters specified in RCW 18.130.040. The summary suspension remains in effect until proceedings by the Washington disciplining authority have been completed;

(b) Consistent with RCW 18.130.400, issue a summary suspension of the license or temporary practice permit if, under RCW 74.39A.051, the license holder is prohibited from employment in the care of vulnerable adults based upon a department of social and health services' final finding of abuse or neglect of a minor or abuse, abandonment, neglect, or financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult. The summary suspension remains in effect until proceedings by the disciplining authority have been completed;

(9) To conduct show cause hearings in accordance with RCW 18.130.062 or 18.130.135 to review an action taken by the disciplining authority to suspend a license or restrict or limit a license holder's practice pending proceedings by the disciplining authority;

(10) Except as required by section 1 of this act, to use a presiding officer as authorized in RCW 18.130.095(3) or the office of administrative hearings as authorized in chapter 34.12 RCW to conduct hearings. Disciplining authorities identified in RCW 18.130.040(2) shall make the final decision regarding disposition of the license unless the disciplining authority elects to delegate in writing the final decision to the presiding officer. Disciplining authorities identified in RCW 18.130.040(2)(b) may not delegate the final decision regarding disposition of the license or imposition of sanctions to a presiding officer in any case pertaining to standards of practice or where clinical expertise is necessary, including deciding any motion that results in dismissal of any allegation contained in the statement of charges. Presiding officers acting on behalf of the secretary shall enter initial orders. The secretary may, by rule, provide that initial orders in specified classes of cases may become final without further agency action unless, within a specified time period:

(a) The secretary upon his or her own motion determines that the initial order should be reviewed; or

(b) A party to the proceedings files a petition for administrative review of the initial order;

(11) To use individual members of the boards to direct investigations and to authorize the issuance of a citation under subsection (7) of this section. However, the member of the board shall not subsequently participate in the hearing of the case;

(12) To enter into contracts for professional services determined to be necessary for adequate enforcement of this chapter;

(13) To contract with license holders or other persons or organizations to provide services necessary for the monitoring and supervision of license holders who are placed on probation, whose professional activities are restricted, or who are for any authorized purpose subject to monitoring by the disciplining authority;

(14) To adopt standards of professional conduct or practice;

(15) To grant or deny license applications, and in the event of a finding of unprofessional conduct by an applicant or license holder, to impose any sanction against a license applicant or license holder provided by this chapter. After January 1, 2009, all sanctions must be issued in accordance with RCW 18.130.390;

(16) To restrict or place conditions on the practice of new licensees in order to protect the public and promote the safety of and confidence in the health care system;

(17) To designate individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and statements of charges;

(18) To establish panels consisting of three or more members of the board to perform any duty or authority within the board's jurisdiction under this chapter;

(19) To review and audit the records of licensed health facilities' or services' quality assurance committee decisions in which a license holder's practice privilege or employment is terminated or restricted. Each health facility or service shall produce and make accessible to the disciplining authority the appropriate records and otherwise facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall not be subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action pursuant to RCW 70.41.200(3).

Sec. 15. RCW 18.235.030 and 2002 c 86 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

The disciplinary authority has the power to:

(1) Adopt, amend, and rescind rules as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, rules regarding standards of professional conduct and practice;

(2) Investigate complaints or reports of unprofessional conduct and hold hearings as provided in this chapter;

(3) Issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any investigation, hearing, or proceeding held under this chapter;

(4) Take or cause depositions to be taken and use other discovery procedures as needed in an investigation, hearing, or proceeding held under this chapter;

(5) Compel attendance of witnesses at hearings;

(6) Conduct practice reviews in the course of investigating a complaint or report of unprofessional conduct, unless the disciplinary authority is authorized to audit or inspect applicants or licensees under the chapters specified in RCW 18.235.020;

(7) Take emergency action ordering summary suspension of a license, or restriction or limitation of the licensee's practice or business pending proceedings by the disciplinary authority;

(8) Except as required by section 1 of this act, appoint a presiding officer or authorize the office of administrative hearings, as provided in chapter 34.12 RCW, to conduct hearings. The disciplinary authority may make the final decision regarding disposition of the license unless the disciplinary authority elects to delegate, in writing, the final decision to the presiding officer;

(9) Use individual members of the boards and commissions to direct investigations. However, the member of the board or commission may not subsequently participate in the hearing of the case;

(10) Enter into contracts for professional services determined to be necessary for adequate enforcement of this chapter;

(11) Grant or deny license applications, secure the return of a license obtained through the mistake or inadvertence of the department or the disciplinary authority after providing the person so licensed with an opportunity for an adjudicative proceeding, and, in the event of a finding of unprofessional conduct by an applicant or license holder, impose any sanction against a license applicant or license holder provided by this chapter;

(12) Designate individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and statements of charges;

(13) Establish panels consisting of three or more members of the board or commission to perform any duty or authority within the board's or commission's jurisdiction under this chapter; and

(14) Contract with licensees, registrants, endorsement or permit holders, or any other persons or organizations to provide services necessary for the monitoring or supervision of licensees, registrants, or endorsement or permit holders who are placed on probation, whose professional or business activities are restricted, or who are for an authorized purpose subject to monitoring by the disciplinary authority. If the subject licensee, registrant, or endorsement or permit holders may only practice or operate a business under the supervision of another licensee, registrant, or endorsement or permit holder under the terms of the law regulating that occupation or business, the supervising licensee, registrant, or endorsement or permit holder must consent to the monitoring or supervision under this subsection, unless the supervising licensee, registrant, or endorsement or permit holder is, at the time, the subject of a disciplinary order.

Sec. 16. RCW 19.28.131 and 2014 c 190 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Until July 1, 2007, the department shall issue a written warning to any specialty contractor, performing the scope of work defined by rule for the pump and irrigation or domestic pump specialties, not having a valid electrical contractor license. The warning will state that the contractor must be qualified for and apply for a specialty electrical contractor license under the requirements in RCW 19.28.041 within thirty calendar days of the warning. Only one warning will be issued to any contractor. If the contractor fails to comply with this section, the department shall issue a penalty or penalties as authorized in this section to the contractor. Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the provisions of RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361 shall be assessed a penalty of not less than fifty dollars or more than ten thousand dollars. The department shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for violating RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361. The department shall notify the person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the provisions of RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361 of the amount of the penalty and of the specific violation using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed sent to the last known address of the assessed party. Any penalty is subject to review by an appeal to the board. The filing of an appeal stays the effect of the penalty until the board makes its decision. The appeal shall be filed within twenty days after notice of the penalty is given to the assessed party using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed, sent to the last known address of the assessed party and shall be made by filing a written notice of appeal with the department. The notice shall be accompanied by a certified check for two hundred dollars or ten percent of the penalty amount, whichever is less, but in no event less than one hundred dollars, which shall be returned to the assessed party if the decision of the department is not sustained by the board. If the board sustains the decision of the department, the amount of the check shall be applied by the department to the payment of the per diem and expenses of the members of the board incurred in the matter, and any balance remaining after payment of per diem and expenses shall be paid into the electrical license fund. The hearing and review procedures shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall assign its hearings to an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW to conduct the hearing and issue a ((proposed))final decision and order. The board shall be allowed a minimum of twenty days to review a proposed decision and shall issue its decision no later than the next regularly scheduled board meeting.

Sec. 17. RCW 19.28.490 and 2014 c 190 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the provisions of this chapter may be assessed a penalty of not less than one hundred dollars or more than ten thousand dollars per violation. The department, after consulting with the board and receiving the board's recommendations, shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for violating this chapter. The department shall notify the person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of these provisions of the amount of the penalty and of the specific violation. The notice shall be sent using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the last known address of the assessed party. Penalties are subject to review by an appeal to the board. The filing of an appeal stays the effect of the penalty until the board makes its decision. The appeal shall be filed within twenty days after notice of the penalty is given to the assessed party, and shall be made by filing a written notice of appeal with the department. The notice shall be accompanied by a certified check for two hundred dollars or ten percent of the penalty amount, whichever is less, but in no event less than one hundred dollars. The check shall be returned to the assessed party if the decision of the department is not sustained by the board. If the board sustains the decision of the department, the amount of the check shall be applied by the department to the payment of the per diem and expenses of the members of the board incurred in the matter, and any balance remaining after payment of per diem and expenses shall be paid into the electrical license fund. The hearing and review procedures shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall assign its hearings to an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW to conduct the hearing and issue a ((proposed))final decision and order. The board shall be allowed a minimum of twenty days to review a proposed decision and shall issue its decision no later than the next regularly scheduled board meeting.

Sec. 18. RCW 19.290.230 and 2013 c 322 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following personal property is subject to seizure and forfeiture and no property right exists in them: All personal property including, but not limited to, any item, object, tool, substance, device, weapon, machine, vehicle of any kind, money, security, or negotiable instrument, which the seizing agency proves by a preponderance of the evidence was used or intended to be used by its owner or the person in charge to knowingly or intentionally facilitate the commission of, or to knowingly or intentionally abet the commission of, a crime involving theft, trafficking, or unlawful possession of commercial metal property, or which the seizing agency proves by a preponderance of the evidence was knowingly or intentionally furnished or was intended to be furnished by any person in the commission of, as a result of, or as compensation for the commission of, a crime involving theft, trafficking, or the unlawful possession of commercial metal property, or which the property owner acquired in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to a knowing or intentional commission of a crime involving the theft, trafficking, or unlawful possession of commercial metal property provided that such activity is not less than a class C felony; except that:

(a) No vehicle used by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture under this section unless the seizing agency proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the owner or other person in charge of the vehicle is a consenting party or is privy to any crime involving theft, trafficking, or the unlawful possession of commercial metal property;

(b) A forfeiture of property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party neither had actual or constructive knowledge of nor consented to the commission of any crime involving the theft, trafficking, or unlawful possession of commercial metal property; and

(c) A property owner's property is not subject to seizure if an employee or agent of that property owner uses the property owner's property to knowingly or intentionally facilitate the commission of, or to knowingly or intentionally aid and abet the commission of, a crime involving theft, trafficking, or unlawful possession of commercial metal property, in violation of that property owner's instructions or policies against such activity, and without the property owner's knowledge or consent.

(2) The following real property is subject to seizure and forfeiture and no property right exists in them: All real property, including any right, title, and interest in the whole of any lot or tract of land, and any appurtenances or improvements, that the seizing agency proves by a preponderance of the evidence are being used with the knowledge of the owner for the intentional commission of any crime involving the theft, trafficking, or unlawful possession of commercial metal property, or which have been acquired in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to the commission of any crime involving the trafficking, theft, or unlawful possession of commercial metal, if such activity is not less than a class C felony and a substantial nexus exists between the commission of the violation or crime and the real property. However:

(a) No property may be forfeited pursuant to this subsection (2), to the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission committed or omitted without the owner's actual or constructive knowledge; and further, a property owner's real property is not subject to seizure if an employee or agent of that property owner uses the property owner's real property to knowingly or intentionally facilitate the commission of, or to knowingly or intentionally aid and abet the commission of, a crime involving theft, trafficking, or unlawful possession of commercial metal property, in violation of that property owner's instructions or policies against such activity, and without the property owner's knowledge or consent; and

(b) A forfeiture of real property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party, neither had actual or constructive knowledge, nor consented to the act or omission.

(3) Property subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be seized by any law enforcement officer of this state upon process issued by any superior court having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure of real property shall include the filing of a lis pendens by the seizing agency. Real property seized under this section shall not be transferred or otherwise conveyed until ninety days after seizure or until a judgment of forfeiture is entered, whichever is later: PROVIDED, That real property seized under this section may be transferred or conveyed to any person or entity who acquires title by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a security interest. Seizure of personal property without process may be made if:

(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant; or

(b) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding.

(4) In the event of seizure pursuant to this section, proceedings for forfeiture shall be deemed commenced by the seizure. The law enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure was made shall cause notice to be served within fifteen days following the seizure on the owner of the property seized and the person in charge thereof and any person having any known right or interest therein, including any community property interest, of the seizure and intended forfeiture of the seized property. Service of notice of seizure of real property shall be made according to the rules of civil procedure. However, the state may not obtain a default judgment with respect to real property against a party who is served by substituted service absent an affidavit stating that a good faith effort has been made to ascertain if the defaulted party is incarcerated within the state, and that there is no present basis to believe that the party is incarcerated within the state. The notice of seizure of personal property may be served by any method authorized by law or court rule including but not limited to service by certified mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail shall be deemed complete upon mailing within the fifteen-day period following the seizure. Notice of seizure in the case of property subject to a security interest that has been perfected by filing a financing statement in accordance with chapter 62A.9A RCW, or a certificate of title shall be made by service upon the secured party or the secured party's assignee at the address shown on the financing statement or the certificate of title.

(5) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of items specified in subsection (1) of this section within forty-five days of the seizure in the case of personal property and ninety days in the case of real property, the item seized shall be deemed forfeited. The community property interest in real property of a person whose spouse or domestic partner committed a violation giving rise to seizure of the real property may not be forfeited if the person did not participate in the violation.

(6) If a person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of the seized property within forty-five days of the seizure in the case of personal property and ninety days in the case of real property, the law enforcement agency shall give the person or persons a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to the claim or right. The hearing shall be before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or the chief law enforcement officer's designee, except where the seizing agency is a state agency as defined in RCW 34.12.020(4), the hearing shall be before ((the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or)) an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW with authority to render a final decision, except that any person asserting a claim or right may remove the matter to a court of competent jurisdiction. Removal may only be accomplished according to the rules of civil procedure. The person seeking removal of the matter must serve process against the state, county, political subdivision, or municipality that operates the seizing agency, and any other party of interest, in accordance with RCW 4.28.080 or 4.92.020, within forty-five days after the person seeking removal has notified the seizing law enforcement agency of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession. The court to which the matter is to be removed shall be the district court when the aggregate value of the property is within the jurisdictional limit set forth in RCW 3.66.020. A hearing before the seizing agency and any appeal therefrom shall be under Title 34 RCW. In a court hearing between two or more claimants to the property involved, the prevailing party shall be entitled to a judgment for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees. The burden of producing evidence shall be upon the person claiming to be the lawful owner or the person claiming to have the lawful right to possession of the property.

(7) At the hearing, the seizing agency has the burden of proof to establish by a preponderance of the evidence that seized property is subject to forfeiture, and that the use or intended use of the seized property in connection with a crime pursuant to this section occurred with the owner's actual or constructive knowledge or consent. The person claiming to be the lawful owner or the person claiming to have the lawful right to possession of the property has the burden of proof to establish by a preponderance of the evidence that the person owns or has a right to possess the seized property. The possession of bare legal title is not sufficient to establish ownership of seized property if the seizing agency proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the person claiming ownership or right to possession is a nominal owner and did not actually own or exert a controlling interest in the property.

The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly return the property to the claimant upon a determination by the administrative law judge or court that the claimant is the present lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession of the property.

(8) When property is forfeited under this chapter, after satisfying any court-ordered victim restitution, the seizing law enforcement agency may:

(a) Retain it for official use or, upon application by any law enforcement agency of this state, release such property to such agency; or

(b) Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and which is not harmful to the public.

(9)(a) Within one hundred twenty days after the entry of an order of forfeiture, each seizing agency shall remit to, if known, the victim of the crime involving the seized property, an amount equal to fifty percent of the net proceeds of any property forfeited.

(b) Retained property and net proceeds not required to be paid to victims shall be retained by the seizing law enforcement agency exclusively for the expansion and improvement of law enforcement activity. Money retained under this section may not be used to supplant preexisting funding sources.

(c) The net proceeds of forfeited property is the value of the forfeitable interest in the property after deducting the cost of satisfying any bona fide security interest to which the property is subject at the time of seizure; and in the case of sold property, after deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable fees or commissions paid to independent selling agents, and the cost of any valid landlord's claim for damages.

(d) The value of sold forfeited property is the sale price. The value of retained forfeited property is the fair market value of the property at the time of seizure, determined when possible by reference to an applicable commonly used index, such as the index used by the department of licensing for valuation of motor vehicles. A seizing agency may use, but need not use, an independent qualified appraiser to determine the value of retained property. If an appraiser is used, the value of the property appraised is net of the cost of the appraisal. The value of destroyed property and retained firearms or illegal property is zero.

(10) Upon the entry of an order of forfeiture of real property, the court shall forward a copy of the order to the assessor of the county in which the property is located. Orders for the forfeiture of real property shall be entered by the superior court, subject to court rules. Such an order shall be filed by the seizing agency in the county auditor's records in the county in which the real property is located.

Sec. 19. RCW 26.23.120 and 2005 c 274 s 242 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any information or records concerning individuals who owe a support obligation or for whom support enforcement services are being provided which are obtained or maintained by the Washington state support registry, the division of child support, or under chapter 74.20 RCW shall be private and confidential and shall only be subject to public disclosure as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The secretary of the department of social and health services may adopt rules:

(a) That specify what information is confidential;

(b) That specify the individuals or agencies to whom this information and these records may be disclosed;

(c) Limiting the purposes for which the information may be disclosed;

(d) Establishing procedures to obtain the information or records; or

(e) Establishing safeguards necessary to comply with federal law requiring safeguarding of information.

(3) The rules adopted under subsection (2) of this section shall provide for disclosure of the information and records, under appropriate circumstances, which shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) When authorized or required by federal statute or regulation governing the support enforcement program;

(b) To the person the subject of the records or information, unless the information is exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW;

(c) To government agencies, whether state, local, or federal, and including federally recognized tribes, law enforcement agencies, prosecuting agencies, and the executive branch, if the disclosure is necessary for child support enforcement purposes or required under Title IV-D of the federal social security act;

(d) To the parties in a judicial or adjudicative proceeding upon a specific written finding by the presiding officer that the need for the information outweighs any reason for maintaining the privacy and confidentiality of the information or records;

(e) To private persons, federally recognized tribes, or organizations if the disclosure is necessary to permit private contracting parties to assist in the management and operation of the department;

(f) Disclosure of address and employment information to the parties to an action for purposes relating to a child support order, subject to the limitations in subsections (4) and (5) of this section;

(g) Disclosure of information or records when necessary to the efficient administration of the support enforcement program or to the performance of functions and responsibilities of the support registry and the division of child support as set forth in state and federal statutes; or

(h) Disclosure of the information or records when authorized under RCW 74.04.060.

(4) Prior to disclosing the whereabouts of a physical custodian, custodial parent or a child to the other parent or party, a notice shall be mailed, if appropriate under the circumstances, to the parent or physical custodian whose whereabouts are to be disclosed, at that person's last known address. The notice shall advise the parent or physical custodian that a request for disclosure has been made and will be complied with unless the department:

(a) Receives a copy of a court order within thirty days which enjoins the disclosure of the information or restricts or limits the requesting party's right to contact or visit the parent or party whose address is to be disclosed or the child;

(b) Receives a hearing request within thirty days under subsection (5) of this section; or

(c) Has reason to believe that the release of the information may result in physical or emotional harm to the physical custodian whose whereabouts are to be released, or to the child.

(5) A person receiving notice under subsection (4) of this section may request an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW, at which the person may show that there is reason to believe that release of the information may result in physical or emotional harm to the person or the child. ((The))An administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW with authority to render a final decision shall determine whether the whereabouts of the person or child should be disclosed based on subsection (4)(c) of this section, however no hearing is necessary if the department has in its possession a protective order or an order limiting visitation or contact.

(6) The notice and hearing process in subsections (4) and (5) of this section do not apply to protect the whereabouts of a noncustodial parent, unless that parent has requested notice before whereabouts information is released. A noncustodial parent may request such notice by submitting a written request to the division of child support.

(7) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting or restricting the effect of RCW 42.56.070(9). Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the disclosure of information and records if all details identifying an individual are deleted or the individual consents to the disclosure.

(8) It shall be unlawful for any person or agency in violation of this section to solicit, publish, disclose, receive, make use of, or to authorize, knowingly permit, participate in or acquiesce in the use of any lists of names for commercial or political purposes or the use of any information for purposes other than those purposes specified in this section. A violation of this section shall be a gross misdemeanor as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 20. RCW 28A.300.120 and 1985 c 225 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever a statute or rule provides for a formal administrative hearing before the superintendent of public instruction under chapter 34.05 RCW, the superintendent of public instruction may contract with the office of administrative hearings to conduct the hearing under chapter 34.12 RCW ((and may delegate to a designee of the superintendent of public instruction the))with authority to render the final decision.

Sec. 21. RCW 41.05.021 and 2012 c 87 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state health care authority is created within the executive branch. The authority shall have a director appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director may employ a deputy director, and such assistant directors and special assistants as may be needed to administer the authority, who shall be exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are necessary to administer this chapter. The director may delegate any power or duty vested in him or her by law, including authority to make final decisions and enter final orders in hearings conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW, except as required by section 1 of this act. The primary duties of the authority shall be to: Administer state employees' insurance benefits and retired or disabled school employees' insurance benefits; administer the basic health plan pursuant to chapter 70.47 RCW; administer the children's health program pursuant to chapter 74.09 RCW; study state purchased health care programs in order to maximize cost containment in these programs while ensuring access to quality health care; implement state initiatives, joint purchasing strategies, and techniques for efficient administration that have potential application to all state-purchased health services; and administer grants that further the mission and goals of the authority. The authority's duties include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) To administer health care benefit programs for employees and retired or disabled school employees as specifically authorized in RCW 41.05.065 and in accordance with the methods described in RCW 41.05.075, 41.05.140, and other provisions of this chapter;

(b) To analyze state purchased health care programs and to explore options for cost containment and delivery alternatives for those programs that are consistent with the purposes of those programs, including, but not limited to:

(i) Creation of economic incentives for the persons for whom the state purchases health care to appropriately utilize and purchase health care services, including the development of flexible benefit plans to offset increases in individual financial responsibility;

(ii) Utilization of provider arrangements that encourage cost containment, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems, utilization review, and prospective payment methods, and that ensure access to quality care, including assuring reasonable access to local providers, especially for employees residing in rural areas;

(iii) Coordination of state agency efforts to purchase drugs effectively as provided in RCW 70.14.050;

(iv) Development of recommendations and methods for purchasing medical equipment and supporting services on a volume discount basis;

(v) Development of data systems to obtain utilization data from state purchased health care programs in order to identify cost centers, utilization patterns, provider and hospital practice patterns, and procedure costs, utilizing the information obtained pursuant to RCW 41.05.031; and

(vi) In collaboration with other state agencies that administer state purchased health care programs, private health care purchasers, health care facilities, providers, and carriers:

(A) Use evidence-based medicine principles to develop common performance measures and implement financial incentives in contracts with insuring entities, health care facilities, and providers that:

(I) Reward improvements in health outcomes for individuals with chronic diseases, increased utilization of appropriate preventive health services, and reductions in medical errors; and

(II) Increase, through appropriate incentives to insuring entities, health care facilities, and providers, the adoption and use of information technology that contributes to improved health outcomes, better coordination of care, and decreased medical errors;

(B) Through state health purchasing, reimbursement, or pilot strategies, promote and increase the adoption of health information technology systems, including electronic medical records, by hospitals as defined in RCW 70.41.020(4), integrated delivery systems, and providers that:

(I) Facilitate diagnosis or treatment;

(II) Reduce unnecessary duplication of medical tests;

(III) Promote efficient electronic physician order entry;

(IV) Increase access to health information for consumers and their providers; and

(V) Improve health outcomes;

(C) Coordinate a strategy for the adoption of health information technology systems using the final health information technology report and recommendations developed under chapter 261, Laws of 2005;

(c) To analyze areas of public and private health care interaction;

(d) To provide information and technical and administrative assistance to the board;

(e) To review and approve or deny applications from counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state to provide state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to their employees in accordance with the provisions of RCW 41.04.205 and (g) of this subsection, setting the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined in RCW 41.05.050;

(f) To review and approve or deny the application when the governing body of a tribal government applies to transfer their employees to an insurance or self-insurance program administered under this chapter. In the event of an employee transfer pursuant to this subsection (1)(f), members of the governing body are eligible to be included in such a transfer if the members are authorized by the tribal government to participate in the insurance program being transferred from and subject to payment by the members of all costs of insurance for the members. The authority shall: (i) Establish the conditions for participation; (ii) have the sole right to reject the application; and (iii) set the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined in RCW 41.05.050. Approval of the application by the authority transfers the employees and dependents involved to the insurance, self-insurance, or health care program approved by the authority;

(g) To ensure the continued status of the employee insurance or self-insurance programs administered under this chapter as a governmental plan under section 3(32) of the employee retirement income security act of 1974, as amended, the authority shall limit the participation of employees of a county, municipal, school district, educational service district, or other political subdivision, the Washington health benefit exchange, or a tribal government, including providing for the participation of those employees whose services are substantially all in the performance of essential governmental functions, but not in the performance of commercial activities;

(h) To establish billing procedures and collect funds from school districts in a way that minimizes the administrative burden on districts;

(i) To publish and distribute to nonparticipating school districts and educational service districts by October 1st of each year a description of health care benefit plans available through the authority and the estimated cost if school districts and educational service district employees were enrolled;

(j) To apply for, receive, and accept grants, gifts, and other payments, including property and service, from any governmental or other public or private entity or person, and make arrangements as to the use of these receipts to implement initiatives and strategies developed under this section;

(k) To issue, distribute, and administer grants that further the mission and goals of the authority;

(l) To adopt rules consistent with this chapter as described in RCW 41.05.160 including, but not limited to:

(i) Setting forth the criteria established by the board under RCW 41.05.065 for determining whether an employee is eligible for benefits;

(ii) Establishing an appeal process in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW by which an employee may appeal an eligibility determination;

(iii) Establishing a process to assure that the eligibility determinations of an employing agency comply with the criteria under this chapter, including the imposition of penalties as may be authorized by the board;

(m)(i) To administer the medical services programs established under chapter 74.09 RCW as the designated single state agency for purposes of Title XIX of the federal social security act;

(ii) To administer the state children's health insurance program under chapter 74.09 RCW for purposes of Title XXI of the federal social security act;

(iii) To enter into agreements with the department of social and health services for administration of medical care services programs under Titles XIX and XXI of the social security act. The agreements shall establish the division of responsibilities between the authority and the department with respect to mental health, chemical dependency, and long-term care services, including services for persons with developmental disabilities. The agreements shall be revised as necessary, to comply with the final implementation plan adopted under section 116, chapter 15, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.;

(iv) To adopt rules to carry out the purposes of chapter 74.09 RCW;

(v) To appoint such advisory committees or councils as may be required by any federal statute or regulation as a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the authority. The director may appoint statewide committees or councils in the following subject areas: (A) Health facilities; (B) children and youth services; (C) blind services; (D) medical and health care; (E) drug abuse and alcoholism; (F) rehabilitative services; and (G) such other subject matters as are or come within the authority's responsibilities. The statewide councils shall have representation from both major political parties and shall have substantial consumer representation. Such committees or councils shall be constituted as required by federal law or as the director in his or her discretion may determine. The members of the committees or councils shall hold office for three years except in the case of a vacancy, in which event appointment shall be only for the remainder of the unexpired term for which the vacancy occurs. No member shall serve more than two consecutive terms. Members of such state advisory committees or councils may be paid their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended;

(n) To review and approve or deny the application from the governing board of the Washington health benefit exchange to provide state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to employees of the exchange. The authority shall (i) establish the conditions for participation; (ii) have the sole right to reject an application; and (iii) set the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined in RCW 41.05.050.

(2) On and after January 1, 1996, the public employees' benefits board may implement strategies to promote managed competition among employee health benefit plans. Strategies may include but are not limited to:

(a) Standardizing the benefit package;

(b) Soliciting competitive bids for the benefit package;

(c) Limiting the state's contribution to a percent of the lowest priced qualified plan within a geographical area;

(d) Monitoring the impact of the approach under this subsection with regards to: Efficiencies in health service delivery, cost shifts to subscribers, access to and choice of managed care plans statewide, and quality of health services. The health care authority shall also advise on the value of administering a benchmark employer-managed plan to promote competition among managed care plans.

Sec. 22. RCW 43.19.008 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The executive powers and management of the department shall be administered as described in this section.

(2) The executive head and appointing authority of the department is the director. The director is appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by the senate. The director serves at the pleasure of the governor. The director is paid a salary fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040. If a vacancy occurs in the position of director while the senate is not in session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting of the senate at which time he or she shall present to that body his or her nomination for the position.

(3) The director may employ staff members, who are exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are necessary to administer this chapter, and such other duties as may be authorized by law. The director may delegate any power or duty vested in him or her by chapter 43, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. or other law, including authority to make final decisions and enter final orders in hearings conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW, except as required by section 1 of this act.

(4) The internal affairs of the department are under the control of the director in order that the director may manage the department in a flexible and intelligent manner as dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless specifically limited by law, the director has complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The director may create the administrative structures as the director deems appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law, and the director may employ personnel as may be necessary in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided by law.

(5) Until June 30, 2018, at the beginning of each fiscal biennium, the office of financial management shall conduct a review of the programs and services that are performed by the department to determine whether the program or service may be performed by the private sector in a more cost-efficient and effective manner than being performed by the department. In conducting this review, the office of financial management shall:

(a) Examine the existing activities currently being performed by the department, including but not limited to an examination of services for their performance, staffing, capital requirements, and mission. Programs may be broken down into discrete services or activities or reviewed as a whole; and

(b) Examine the activities to determine which specific services are available in the marketplace and what potential for efficiency gains or savings exist.

(i) As part of the review in this subsection (5), the office of financial management shall select up to six activities or services that have been determined as an activity that may be provided by the private sector in a cost-effective and efficient manner, including for the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium the bulk printing services. The office of financial management may consult with affected industry stakeholders in making its decision on which activities to contract for services. Priority for selection shall be given to agency activities or services that are significant, ongoing functions.

(ii) The office of financial management must consider the consequences and potential mitigation of improper or failed performance by the contractor.

(iii) For each of the selected activities, the department shall use a request for information, request for proposal, or other procurement process to determine if a contract for the activity would result in the activity being provided at a reduced cost and with greater efficiency.

(iv) The request for information, request for proposal, or other procurement process must contain measurable standards for the performance of the contract.

(v) The department may contract with one or more vendors to provide the service as a result of the procurement process.

(vi) If the office of financial management determines via the procurement process that the activity cannot be provided by the private sector at a reduced cost and greater efficiency, the department of enterprise services may cancel the procurement without entering into a contract and shall promptly notify the legislative fiscal committees of such a decision.

(vii) The department of enterprise services, in consultation with the office of financial management, must establish a contract monitoring process to measure contract performance, costs, service delivery quality, and other contract standards, and to cancel contracts that do not meet those standards. No contracts may be renewed without a review of these measures.

(viii) The office of financial management shall prepare a biennial report summarizing the results of the examination of the agency's programs and services. In addition to the programs and services examined and the result of the examination, the report shall provide information on any procurement process that does not result in a contract for the services. During each regular legislative session held in odd-numbered years, the legislative fiscal committees shall hold a public hearing on the report and the department's activities under this section.

(ix) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct an audit of the implementation of this subsection (5), and report to the legislature by January 1, 2018, on the results of the audit. The report must include an estimate of additional costs or savings to taxpayers as a result of the contracting out provisions.

Sec. 23. RCW 43.43.395 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 35 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state patrol shall by rule provide standards for the certification, installation, repair, maintenance, monitoring, inspection, and removal of ignition interlock devices, as defined under RCW 46.04.215, and equipment as outlined under this section, and may inspect the records and equipment of manufacturers and vendors during regular business hours for compliance with statutes and rules and may suspend or revoke certification for any noncompliance.

(2)(a) When a certified service provider or individual installer of ignition interlock devices is found to be out of compliance, the installation privileges of that certified service provider or individual installer may be suspended or revoked until the certified service provider or individual installer comes into compliance. During any suspension or revocation period, the certified service provider or individual installer is responsible for notifying affected customers of any changes in their service agreement.

(b) A certified service provider or individual installer whose certification is suspended or revoked for noncompliance has a right to an administrative hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW presided over by an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW to contest the suspension or revocation, or both. For the administrative hearing, the procedure and rules of evidence are as specified in chapter 34.05 RCW, except as otherwise provided in this chapter. Any request for an administrative hearing must be made in writing and must be received by the state patrol within twenty days after the receipt of the notice of suspension or revocation. The administrative law judge shall render a final decision, appealable to the superior court.

(3)(a) An ignition interlock device must employ fuel cell technology. For the purposes of this subsection, "fuel cell technology" consists of the following electrochemical method: An electrolyte designed to oxidize the alcohol and release electrons to be collected by an active electrode; a current flow is generated within the electrode proportional to the amount of alcohol oxidized on the fuel cell surface; and the electrical current is measured and reported as breath alcohol concentration. Fuel cell technology is highly specific for alcohols.

(b) When reasonably available in the area, as determined by the state patrol, an ignition interlock device must employ technology capable of taking a photo identification of the user giving the breath sample and recording on the photo the time the breath sample was given.

(c) To be certified, an ignition interlock device must:

(i) Meet or exceed the minimum test standards according to rules adopted by the state patrol. Only a notarized statement from a laboratory that is certified by the international organization of standardization and is capable of performing the tests specified will be accepted as proof of meeting or exceeding the standards. The notarized statement must include the name and signature of the person in charge of the tests under the certification statement. The state patrol must adopt by rule the required language of the certification statement that must, at a minimum, outline that the testing meets or exceeds all specifications listed in the federal register adopted in rule by the state patrol; and

(ii) Be maintained in accordance with the rules and standards adopted by the state patrol.

Sec. 24. RCW 43.215.030 and 2006 c 265 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The executive head and appointing authority of the department is the director. The director shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The governor shall solicit input from all parties involved in the private-public partnership concerning this appointment. The director shall be paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040. If a vacancy occurs in the position of director while the senate is not in session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting of the senate when the governor's nomination for the office of director shall be presented.

(2) The director may employ staff members, who shall be exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are necessary to administer this chapter. The director may delegate any power or duty vested in him or her by this chapter, including authority to make final decisions and enter final orders in hearings conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW, except as required by section 1 of this act subject to the limits in RCW 43.215.310.

Sec. 25. RCW 46.12.735 and 2011 c 171 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person may submit a written request for a hearing to establish a claim of ownership or right to lawful possession of the vehicle, watercraft, camper, or component part thereof seized pursuant to this section.

(2) Upon receipt of a request for hearing, one shall be held before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except if the seizing agency is a state agency as defined in RCW 34.12.020(4), the hearing must be before an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW with authority to render a final decision.

(3) Such hearing shall be held within a reasonable time after receipt of a request therefor. Reasonable investigative activities, including efforts to establish the identity of the article or articles and the identity of the person entitled to the lawful possession or custody of the article or articles shall be considered in determining the reasonableness of the time within which a hearing must be held.

(4) The hearing and any appeal therefrom shall be conducted in accordance with Title 34 RCW.

(5) The burden of producing evidence shall be upon the person claiming to be the lawful owner or to have the lawful right of possession to the article or articles.

(6) Any person claiming ownership or right to possession of an article or articles subject to disposition under RCW 46.12.725 through 46.12.740 may remove the matter to a court of competent jurisdiction if the aggregate value of the article or articles involved is two hundred dollars or more. In a court hearing between two or more claimants to the article or articles involved, the prevailing party shall be entitled to judgment for costs and reasonable attorney's fees. For purposes of this section the seizing law enforcement agency shall not be considered a claimant.

(7) The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly release the article or articles to the claimant upon a determination by the administrative law judge or court that the claimant is the present lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession thereof.

Sec. 26. RCW 46.20.331 and 1989 c 175 s 111 are each amended to read as follows:

The director ((may))shall appoint ((a designee, or designees,))an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW to preside over hearings in adjudicative proceedings ((that may result in the denial, restriction, suspension, or revocation of a driver's license or driving privilege, or in the imposition of requirements to be met prior to issuance or reissuance of a driver's license,)) under Title 46 RCW. ((The director may delegate to any such designees the authority to render the final decision of the department in such proceedings. Chapter 34.12 RCW shall not apply to such proceedings.))The administrative law judge shall render a final decision, appealable to the superior court.

Sec. 27. RCW 46.55.180 and 1989 c 111 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The director or the chief of the state patrol ((may))shall use ((a hearing officer or))an administrative law judge, assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW with authority to render a final decision, for presiding over a hearing regarding licensing provisions under this chapter or rules adopted under it.

Sec. 28. RCW 48.04.010 and 2000 c 221 s 8 and 2000 c 79 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as required under section 1 of this act, the commissioner may hold a hearing for any purpose within the scope of this code as he or she may deem necessary. The commissioner shall hold a hearing:

(a) If required by any provision of this code; or

(b) Except under RCW 48.13.475, upon written demand for a hearing made by any person aggrieved by any act, threatened act, or failure of the commissioner to act, if such failure is deemed an act under any provision of this code, or by any report, promulgation, or order of the commissioner other than an order on a hearing of which such person was given actual notice or at which such person appeared as a party, or order pursuant to the order on such hearing.

(2) Any such demand for a hearing shall specify in what respects such person is so aggrieved and the grounds to be relied upon as basis for the relief to be demanded at the hearing.

(3) Unless a person aggrieved by a written order of the commissioner demands a hearing thereon within ninety days after receiving notice of such order, or in the case of a licensee under Title 48 RCW within ninety days after the commissioner has mailed the order to the licensee at the most recent address shown in the commissioner's licensing records for the licensee, the right to such hearing shall conclusively be deemed to have been waived.

(4) If a hearing is demanded by a licensee whose license has been temporarily suspended pursuant to RCW 48.17.540, the commissioner shall hold such hearing demanded within thirty days after receipt of the demand or within thirty days of the effective date of a temporary license suspension issued after such demand, unless postponed by mutual consent.

(5) A licensee under this title may request that a hearing authorized under this section be presided over by an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW. Any such request shall not be denied.

(6) Any hearing held relating to RCW 48.20.025, 48.44.017, or 48.46.062 shall be presided over by an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW.

Sec. 29. RCW 49.12.285 and 1988 c 236 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may issue a notice of infraction if the department reasonably believes that an employer has failed to comply with RCW 49.12.270 or 49.12.275. The form of the notice of infraction shall be adopted by rule pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. An employer who is found to have committed an infraction under RCW 49.12.270 or 49.12.275 may be assessed a monetary penalty not to exceed two hundred dollars for each violation. An employer who repeatedly violates RCW 49.12.270 or 49.12.275 may be assessed a monetary penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars for each violation. For purposes of this section, the failure to comply with RCW 49.12.275 as to an employee or the failure to comply with RCW 49.12.270 as to a period of leave sought by an employee shall each constitute separate violations. An employer has twenty days to appeal the notice of infraction. Any appeal of a violation determined to be an infraction shall be heard and determined by an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW with authority to render a final decision. Monetary penalties collected under this section shall be deposited into the general fund.

Sec. 30. RCW 49.48.084 and 2010 c 42 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person, firm, or corporation aggrieved by a citation and notice of assessment or a determination of compliance issued by the department under RCW 49.48.083 or the assessment of civil penalty due to a determination of status as a repeat willful violator may appeal the citation and notice of assessment, the determination of compliance, or the assessment of civil penalty to the director by filing a notice of appeal with the director within thirty days of the department's issuance of the citation and notice of assessment, the determination of compliance, or the assessment of civil penalty. A citation and notice of assessment, a determination of compliance, or an assessment of a civil penalty not appealed within thirty days is final and binding, and not subject to further appeal.

(2) A notice of appeal filed with the director under this section shall stay the effectiveness of the citation and notice of assessment, the determination of compliance, or the assessment of civil penalty pending final review of the appeal by the director as provided for in chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) Upon receipt of a notice of appeal, the director shall assign the hearing to an administrative law judge of the office of administrative hearings to conduct the hearing and issue ((an initial))a final decision or order. The hearing and review procedures shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, and the standard of review by the administrative law judge of an appealed citation and notice of assessment, an appealed determination of compliance, or an appealed assessment of civil penalty shall be de novo. ((Any party who seeks to challenge an initial order shall file a petition for administrative review with the director within thirty days after service of the initial order. The director shall conduct administrative review in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.))

(4) ((The director shall issue all final orders after appeal of the initial order.)) The final order ((of the director)) is subject to judicial review in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(5) Orders that are not appealed within the time period specified in this section and chapter 34.05 RCW are final and binding, and not subject to further appeal.

(6) An employer who fails to allow adequate inspection of records in an investigation by the department under this chapter within a reasonable time period may not use such records in any appeal under this section to challenge the correctness of any determination by the department of wages owed or penalty assessed.

Sec. 31. RCW 49.60.250 and 2008 c 266 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In case of failure to reach an agreement for the elimination of such unfair practice, and upon the entry of findings to that effect, the entire file, including the complaint and any and all findings made, shall be certified to the chairperson of the commission. The chairperson of the commission shall thereupon request the appointment of an administrative law judge ((under Title 34 RCW)), assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW with authority to render a final decision, to hear the complaint and shall cause to be issued and served in the name of the commission a written notice, together with a copy of the complaint, as the same may have been amended, requiring the respondent to answer the charges of the complaint at a hearing before the administrative law judge, at a time and place to be specified in such notice.

(2) The place of any such hearing may be the office of the commission or another place designated by it. The case in support of the complaint shall be presented at the hearing by counsel for the commission: PROVIDED, That the complainant may retain independent counsel and submit testimony and be fully heard. No member or employee of the commission who previously made the investigation or caused the notice to be issued shall participate in the hearing except as a witness, nor shall the member or employee participate in the deliberations of the administrative law judge in such case. Any endeavors or negotiations for conciliation shall not be received in evidence.

(3) The respondent shall file a written answer to the complaint and appear at the hearing in person or otherwise, with or without counsel, and submit testimony and be fully heard. The respondent has the right to cross-examine the complainant.

(4) The administrative law judge conducting any hearing may permit reasonable amendment to any complaint or answer. Testimony taken at the hearing shall be under oath and recorded.

(5) If, upon all the evidence, the administrative law judge finds that the respondent has engaged in any unfair practice, the administrative law judge shall state findings of fact and shall issue and file with the commission and cause to be served on such respondent an order requiring such respondent to cease and desist from such unfair practice and to take such affirmative action, including, (but not limited to) hiring, reinstatement or upgrading of employees, with or without back pay, an admission or restoration to full membership rights in any respondent organization, or to take such other action as, in the judgment of the administrative law judge, will effectuate the purposes of this chapter, including action that could be ordered by a court, except that damages for humiliation and mental suffering shall not exceed twenty thousand dollars, and including a requirement for report of the matter on compliance. Relief available for violations of RCW 49.60.222 through 49.60.224 shall be limited to the relief specified in RCW 49.60.225.

(6) If a determination is made that retaliatory action, as defined in RCW 42.40.050, has been taken against a whistleblower, as defined in RCW 42.40.020, the administrative law judge may, in addition to any other remedy, require restoration of benefits, back pay, and any increases in compensation that would have occurred, with interest; impose a civil penalty upon the retaliator of up to five thousand dollars; and issue an order to the state employer to suspend the retaliator for up to thirty days without pay. At a minimum, the administrative law judge shall require that a letter of reprimand be placed in the retaliator's personnel file. No agency shall issue any nondisclosure order or policy, execute any nondisclosure agreement, or spend any funds requiring information that is public under the public records act, chapter 42.56 RCW, be kept confidential; except that nothing in this section shall affect any state or federal law requiring information be kept confidential. All penalties recovered shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the general fund.

(7) The final order of the administrative law judge shall include a notice to the parties of the right to obtain judicial review of the order by appeal in accordance with the provisions of RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598, and that such appeal must be served and filed within thirty days after the service of the order on the parties.

(8) If, upon all the evidence, the administrative law judge finds that the respondent has not engaged in any alleged unfair practice, the administrative law judge shall state findings of fact and shall similarly issue and file an order dismissing the complaint.

(9) An order dismissing a complaint may include an award of reasonable attorneys' fees in favor of the respondent if the administrative law judge concludes that the complaint was frivolous, unreasonable, or groundless.

(10) The commission shall establish rules of practice to govern, expedite, and effectuate the foregoing procedure.

(11) Instead of filing with the commission, a complainant may pursue arbitration conducted by the American arbitration association or another arbitrator mutually agreed by the parties, with the cost of arbitration shared equally by the complainant and the respondent.

Sec. 32. RCW 49.70.165 and 1985 c 409 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW establishing criteria for evaluating the validity of trade secret claims and procedures for issuing a trade secret exemption. Manufacturers or importers that make a trade secret claim to the department must notify direct purchasers if a trade secret claim has been made on a product being offered for sale.

(2) If a trade secret claim exists, a manufacturer, importer, or employer may require a written statement of need or confidentiality agreement before the specific chemical identity of a hazardous substance is released. However, if a treating physician or nurse determines that a medical emergency exists and the specific chemical identity of a hazardous substance is necessary for emergency or first aid treatment, the manufacturer, importer, or employer shall immediately disclose the specific chemical identity to that treating physician or nurse, regardless of the existence of a written statement of need or a confidentiality agreement. The chemical manufacturer, importer, or employer may require a written statement of need and confidentiality agreement, as defined by rule, as soon as circumstances permit.

(3) Any challenge to the denial of a trade secret claim shall be heard by an administrative law judge, assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW with authority to render a final decision, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 33. RCW 49.74.040 and 2002 c 354 s 248 are each amended to read as follows:

If no agreement can be reached under RCW 49.74.030, the commission ((may))shall refer the matter to ((the))an administrative law judge, assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW with authority to render a final decision, for hearing pursuant to RCW 49.60.250. If the administrative law judge finds that the state agency, institution of higher education, or state patrol has not made a good faith effort to correct the noncompliance, the administrative law judge shall order the state agency, institution of higher education, or state patrol to comply with this chapter. The administrative law judge may order any action that may be necessary to achieve compliance, provided such action is not inconsistent with the rules adopted under RCW 41.06.150(((6)))(5) and 43.43.340(5), whichever is appropriate.

An order by the administrative law judge may be appealed to superior court.

Sec. 34. RCW 49.86.120 and 2007 c 357 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person aggrieved by a decision of the department under this chapter must file a notice of appeal with the director, by mail or personally, within thirty days after the date on which a copy of the department's decision was communicated to the person. Upon receipt of the notice of appeal, the director shall request the assignment of an administrative law judge ((in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW)), under chapter 34.12 RCW, to conduct a hearing and issue a ((proposed))final decision and order. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW subject to judicial review as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) ((The administrative law judge's proposed decision and order shall be final and not subject to further appeal unless, within thirty days after the decision is communicated to the interested parties, a party petitions for review by the director. If the director's review is timely requested, the director may order additional evidence by the administrative law judge. On the basis of the evidence before the administrative law judge and such additional evidence as the director may order to be taken, the director shall render a decision affirming, modifying, or setting aside the administrative law judge's decision. The director's decision becomes final and not subject to further appeal unless, within thirty days after the decision is communicated to the interested parties, a party files a petition for judicial review as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.)) The director or department is a party to any judicial action involving the ((director's))department's decision and shall be represented in the action by the attorney general.

(3) If, upon administrative or judicial review, the final decision of the department is reversed or modified, the administrative law judge or the court in its discretion may award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to the prevailing party. Attorneys' fees and costs owed by the department, if any, are payable from the family leave insurance account.

Sec. 35. RCW 66.24.010 and 2012 c 39 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every license must be issued in the name of the applicant, and the holder thereof may not allow any other person to use the license.

(2) For the purpose of considering any application for a license, or the renewal of a license, the board may cause an inspection of the premises to be made, and may inquire into all matters in connection with the construction and operation of the premises. For the purpose of reviewing any application for a license and for considering the denial, suspension, revocation, or renewal or denial thereof, of any license, the liquor control board may consider any prior criminal conduct of the applicant including an administrative violation history record with the board and a criminal history record information check. The board may submit the criminal history record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The board must require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation. The provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of chapter 9.96A RCW do not apply to such cases. Subject to the provisions of this section, the board may, in its discretion, grant or deny the renewal or license applied for. Denial may be based on, without limitation, the existence of chronic illegal activity documented in objections submitted pursuant to subsections (8)(d) and (12) of this section. Authority to approve an uncontested or unopposed license may be granted by the board to any staff member the board designates in writing. Conditions for granting such authority must be adopted by rule. No retail license of any kind may be issued to:

(a) A person doing business as a sole proprietor who has not resided in the state for at least one month prior to receiving a license, except in cases of licenses issued to dining places on railroads, boats, or aircraft;

(b) A copartnership, unless all of the members thereof are qualified to obtain a license, as provided in this section;

(c) A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager or agent, unless such manager or agent possesses the same qualifications required of the licensee;

(d) A corporation or a limited liability company, unless it was created under the laws of the state of Washington or holds a certificate of authority to transact business in the state of Washington.

(3)(a) The board may, in its discretion, subject to the provisions of RCW 66.08.150, suspend or cancel any license; and all rights of the licensee to keep or sell liquor thereunder must be suspended or terminated, as the case may be.

(b) The board must immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate is automatic upon the board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

(c) Upon written notification by the department of revenue in accordance with RCW 82.08.155 that a person is more than thirty days delinquent in reporting or remitting spirits taxes to the department, the board must suspend all spirits licenses held by that person. The board must also refuse to renew any existing spirits license of, or issue any new spirits license to, the person or any other applicant controlled directly or indirectly by that person. The board may not reinstate a person's spirits license or renew or issue a new spirits license to that person, or an applicant controlled directly or indirectly by that person, until such time as the department of revenue notifies the board that the person is current in reporting and remitting spirits taxes or that the department consents to the reinstatement or renewal of the person's spirits license or the issuance of a new spirits license to the person. For purposes of this section: (i) "Spirits license" means any license issued by the board under the authority of this chapter that authorizes the licensee to sell spirits; and (ii) "spirits taxes" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.155.

(d) The board may request the appointment of administrative law judges under chapter 34.12 RCW who must have power to administer oaths, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony, examine witnesses, and to receive testimony in any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, under such rules and regulations as the board may adopt.

(e) Witnesses are allowed fees and mileage each way to and from any such inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding at the rate authorized by RCW 34.05.446. Fees need not be paid in advance of appearance of witnesses to testify or to produce books, records, or other legal evidence.

(f) In case of disobedience of any person to comply with the order of the board or a subpoena issued by the board, or any of its members, or administrative law judges, or on the refusal of a witness to testify to any matter regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, the judge of the superior court of the county in which the person resides, on application of any member of the board or administrative law judge, must compel obedience by contempt proceedings, as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from said court or a refusal to testify therein.

(4) Upon receipt of notice of the suspension or cancellation of a license, the licensee must forthwith deliver up the license to the board. Where the license has been suspended only, the board must return the license to the licensee at the expiration or termination of the period of suspension. The board must notify all vendors in the city or place where the licensee has its premises of the suspension or cancellation of the license; and no employee may allow or cause any liquor to be delivered to or for any person at the premises of that licensee.

(5)(a) At the time of the original issuance of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, the board must prorate the license fee charged to the new licensee according to the number of calendar quarters, or portion thereof, remaining until the first renewal of that license is required.

(b) Unless sooner canceled, every license issued by the board must expire at midnight of the thirtieth day of June of the fiscal year for which it was issued. However, if the board deems it feasible and desirable to do so, it may establish, by rule pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, a system for staggering the annual renewal dates for any and all licenses authorized by this chapter. If such a system of staggered annual renewal dates is established by the board, the license fees provided by this chapter must be appropriately prorated during the first year that the system is in effect.

(6) Every license issued under this section is subject to all conditions and restrictions imposed by this title or by rules adopted by the board. All conditions and restrictions imposed by the board in the issuance of an individual license may be listed on the face of the individual license along with the trade name, address, and expiration date. Conditions and restrictions imposed by the board may also be included in official correspondence separate from the license. All spirits licenses are subject to the condition that the spirits license holder must report and remit to the department of revenue all spirits taxes by the date due.

(7) Every licensee must post and keep posted its license, or licenses, and any additional correspondence containing conditions and restrictions imposed by the board in a conspicuous place on the premises.

(8)(a) Unless (b) of this subsection applies, before the board issues a new or renewal license to an applicant it must give notice of such application to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town, if the application is for a license within an incorporated city or town, or to the county legislative authority, if the application is for a license outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns.

(b) If the application for a special occasion license is for an event held during a county, district, or area fair as defined by RCW 15.76.120, and the county, district, or area fair is located on property owned by the county but located within an incorporated city or town, the county legislative authority must be the entity notified by the board under (a) of this subsection. The board must send a duplicate notice to the incorporated city or town within which the fair is located.

(c) The incorporated city or town through the official or employee selected by it, or the county legislative authority or the official or employee selected by it, has the right to file with the board within twenty days after the date of transmittal of such notice for applications, or at least thirty days prior to the expiration date for renewals, written objections against the applicant or against the premises for which the new or renewal license is asked. The board may extend the time period for submitting written objections.

(d) The written objections must include a statement of all facts upon which such objections are based, and in case written objections are filed, the city or town or county legislative authority may request and the liquor control board may in its discretion hold a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If the board makes an initial decision to deny a license or renewal based on the written objections of an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority, the applicant may request a hearing ((subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW))before an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW with authority to render a final decision. If such a hearing is held at the request of the applicant, liquor control board representatives must present and defend the board's initial decision to deny a license or renewal.

(e) Upon the granting of a license under this title the board must send written notification to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town in which the license is granted, or to the county legislative authority if the license is granted outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns. When the license is for a special occasion license for an event held during a county, district, or area fair as defined by RCW 15.76.120, and the county, district, or area fair is located on county-owned property but located within an incorporated city or town, the written notification must be sent to both the incorporated city or town and the county legislative authority.

(9)(a) Before the board issues any license to any applicant, it shall give (i) due consideration to the location of the business to be conducted under such license with respect to the proximity of churches, schools, and public institutions and (ii) written notice, with receipt verification, of the application to public institutions identified by the board as appropriate to receive such notice, churches, and schools within five hundred feet of the premises to be licensed. The board may not issue a liquor license for either on-premises or off-premises consumption covering any premises not now licensed, if such premises are within five hundred feet of the premises of any tax-supported public elementary or secondary school measured along the most direct route over or across established public walks, streets, or other public passageway from the main entrance of the school to the nearest public entrance of the premises proposed for license, and if, after receipt by the school of the notice as provided in this subsection, the board receives written objection, within twenty days after receiving such notice, from an official representative or representatives of the school within five hundred feet of said proposed licensed premises, indicating to the board that there is an objection to the issuance of such license because of proximity to a school. The board may extend the time period for submitting objections. For the purpose of this section, "church" means a building erected for and used exclusively for religious worship and schooling or other activity in connection therewith. For the purpose of this section, "public institution" means institutions of higher education, parks, community centers, libraries, and transit centers.

(b) No liquor license may be issued or reissued by the board to any motor sports facility or licensee operating within the motor sports facility unless the motor sports facility enforces a program reasonably calculated to prevent alcohol or alcoholic beverages not purchased within the facility from entering the facility and such program is approved by local law enforcement agencies.

(c) It is the intent under this subsection (9) that a retail license may not be issued by the board where doing so would, in the judgment of the board, adversely affect a private school meeting the requirements for private schools under Title 28A RCW, which school is within five hundred feet of the proposed licensee. The board must fully consider and give substantial weight to objections filed by private schools. If a license is issued despite the proximity of a private school, the board must state in a letter addressed to the private school the board's reasons for issuing the license.

(10) The restrictions set forth in subsection (9) of this section do not prohibit the board from authorizing the assumption of existing licenses now located within the restricted area by other persons or licenses or relocations of existing licensed premises within the restricted area. In no case may the licensed premises be moved closer to a church or school than it was before the assumption or relocation.

(11)(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the board, in its discretion, from issuing a temporary retail or distributor license to an applicant to operate the retail or distributor premises during the period the application for the license is pending. The board may establish a fee for a temporary license by rule.

(b) A temporary license issued by the board under this section must be for a period not to exceed sixty days. A temporary license may be extended at the discretion of the board for additional periods of sixty days upon payment of an additional fee and upon compliance with all conditions required in this section.

(c) Refusal by the board to issue or extend a temporary license shall not entitle the applicant to request a hearing. A temporary license may be canceled or suspended summarily at any time if the board determines that good cause for cancellation or suspension exists. RCW 66.08.130 applies to temporary licenses.

(d) Application for a temporary license must be on such form as the board shall prescribe. If an application for a temporary license is withdrawn before issuance or is refused by the board, the fee which accompanied such application must be refunded in full.

(12) In determining whether to grant or deny a license or renewal of any license, the board must give substantial weight to objections from an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority based upon chronic illegal activity associated with the applicant's operations of the premises proposed to be licensed or the applicant's operation of any other licensed premises, or the conduct of the applicant's patrons inside or outside the licensed premises. "Chronic illegal activity" means (a) a pervasive pattern of activity that threatens the public health, safety, and welfare of the city, town, or county including, but not limited to, open container violations, assaults, disturbances, disorderly conduct, or other criminal law violations, or as documented in crime statistics, police reports, emergency medical response data, calls for service, field data, or similar records of a law enforcement agency for the city, town, county, or any other municipal corporation or any state agency; or (b) an unreasonably high number of citations for violations of RCW 46.61.502 associated with the applicant's or licensee's operation of any licensed premises as indicated by the reported statements given to law enforcement upon arrest.

Sec. 36. RCW 69.50.331 and 2013 c 3 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of considering any application for a license to produce, process, or sell marijuana, or for the renewal of a license to produce, process, or sell marijuana, the state liquor control board may cause an inspection of the premises to be made, and may inquire into all matters in connection with the construction and operation of the premises. For the purpose of reviewing any application for a license and for considering the denial, suspension, revocation, or renewal or denial thereof, of any license, the state liquor control board may consider any prior criminal conduct of the applicant including an administrative violation history record with the state liquor control board and a criminal history record information check. The state liquor control board may submit the criminal history record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The state liquor control board shall require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation. The provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of chapter 9.96A RCW shall not apply to these cases. Subject to the provisions of this section, the state liquor control board may, in its discretion, grant or deny the renewal or license applied for. Denial may be based on, without limitation, the existence of chronic illegal activity documented in objections submitted pursuant to subsections (7)(c) and (9) of this section. Authority to approve an uncontested or unopposed license may be granted by the state liquor control board to any staff member the board designates in writing. Conditions for granting this authority shall be adopted by rule. No license of any kind may be issued to:

(a) A person under the age of twenty-one years;

(b) A person doing business as a sole proprietor who has not lawfully resided in the state for at least three months prior to applying to receive a license;

(c) A partnership, employee cooperative, association, nonprofit corporation, or corporation unless formed under the laws of this state, and unless all of the members thereof are qualified to obtain a license as provided in this section; or

(d) A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager or agent, unless the manager or agent possesses the same qualifications required of the licensee.

(2)(a) The state liquor control board may, in its discretion, subject to the provisions of RCW 69.50.334, suspend or cancel any license; and all protections of the licensee from criminal or civil sanctions under state law for producing, processing, or selling marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products thereunder shall be suspended or terminated, as the case may be.

(b) The state liquor control board shall immediately suspend the license of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license shall be automatic upon the state liquor control board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

(c) The state liquor control board may request the appointment of administrative law judges under chapter 34.12 RCW who shall have power to administer oaths, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony, examine witnesses, and to receive testimony in any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, under rules and regulations the state liquor control board may adopt.

(d) Witnesses shall be allowed fees and mileage each way to and from any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding at the rate authorized by RCW 34.05.446. Fees need not be paid in advance of appearance of witnesses to testify or to produce books, records, or other legal evidence.

(e) In case of disobedience of any person to comply with the order of the state liquor control board or a subpoena issued by the state liquor control board, or any of its members, or administrative law judges, or on the refusal of a witness to testify to any matter regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, the judge of the superior court of the county in which the person resides, on application of any member of the board or administrative law judge, shall compel obedience by contempt proceedings, as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from said court or a refusal to testify therein.

(3) Upon receipt of notice of the suspension or cancellation of a license, the licensee shall forthwith deliver up the license to the state liquor control board. Where the license has been suspended only, the state liquor control board shall return the license to the licensee at the expiration or termination of the period of suspension. The state liquor control board shall notify all other licensees in the county where the subject licensee has its premises of the suspension or cancellation of the license; and no other licensee or employee of another licensee may allow or cause any marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products to be delivered to or for any person at the premises of the subject licensee.

(4) Every license issued under chapter 3, Laws of 2013 shall be subject to all conditions and restrictions imposed by chapter 3, Laws of 2013 or by rules adopted by the state liquor control board to implement and enforce chapter 3, Laws of 2013. All conditions and restrictions imposed by the state liquor control board in the issuance of an individual license shall be listed on the face of the individual license along with the trade name, address, and expiration date.

(5) Every licensee shall post and keep posted its license, or licenses, in a conspicuous place on the premises.

(6) No licensee shall employ any person under the age of twenty-one years.

(7)(a) Before the state liquor control board issues a new or renewed license to an applicant it shall give notice of the application to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town, if the application is for a license within an incorporated city or town, or to the county legislative authority, if the application is for a license outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns.

(b) The incorporated city or town through the official or employee selected by it, or the county legislative authority or the official or employee selected by it, shall have the right to file with the state liquor control board within twenty days after the date of transmittal of the notice for applications, or at least thirty days prior to the expiration date for renewals, written objections against the applicant or against the premises for which the new or renewed license is asked. The state liquor control board may extend the time period for submitting written objections.

(c) The written objections shall include a statement of all facts upon which the objections are based, and in case written objections are filed, the city or town or county legislative authority may request, and the state liquor control board may in its discretion hold, a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If the state liquor control board makes an initial decision to deny a license or renewal based on the written objections of an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority, the applicant may request a hearing ((subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW))before an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW with authority to render a final decision. If a hearing is held at the request of the applicant, state liquor control board representatives shall present and defend the state liquor control board's initial decision to deny a license or renewal.

(d) Upon the granting of a license under this title the state liquor control board shall send written notification to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town in which the license is granted, or to the county legislative authority if the license is granted outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns.

(8) The state liquor control board shall not issue a license for any premises within one thousand feet of the perimeter of the grounds of any elementary or secondary school, playground, recreation center or facility, child care center, public park, public transit center, or library, or any game arcade admission to which is not restricted to persons aged twenty-one years or older.

(9) In determining whether to grant or deny a license or renewal of any license, the state liquor control board shall give substantial weight to objections from an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority based upon chronic illegal activity associated with the applicant's operations of the premises proposed to be licensed or the applicant's operation of any other licensed premises, or the conduct of the applicant's patrons inside or outside the licensed premises. "Chronic illegal activity" means (a) a pervasive pattern of activity that threatens the public health, safety, and welfare of the city, town, or county including, but not limited to, open container violations, assaults, disturbances, disorderly conduct, or other criminal law violations, or as documented in crime statistics, police reports, emergency medical response data, calls for service, field data, or similar records of a law enforcement agency for the city, town, county, or any other municipal corporation or any state agency; or (b) an unreasonably high number of citations for violations of RCW 46.61.502 associated with the applicant's or licensee's operation of any licensed premises as indicated by the reported statements given to law enforcement upon arrest.

Sec. 37. RCW 74.09.741 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following persons have the right to an adjudicative proceeding:

(a) Any applicant or recipient who is aggrieved by a decision of the authority or an authorized agency of the authority; or

(b) A current or former recipient who is aggrieved by the authority's claim that he or she owes a debt for overpayment of assistance.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Applicant" means any person who has made a request, or on behalf of whom a request has been made to the authority for any medical services program established under chapter 74.09 RCW.

(b) "Recipient" means a person who is receiving benefits from the authority for any medical services program established in this chapter.

(3) An applicant or recipient has no right to an adjudicative proceeding when the sole basis for the authority's decision is a federal or state law requiring an assistance adjustment for a class of applicants or recipients.

(4) An applicant or recipient may file an application for an adjudicative proceeding with either the authority or the department and must do so within ninety calendar days after receiving notice of the aggrieving decision. The authority shall determine which agency is responsible for representing the state of Washington in the hearing, in accordance with agreements entered pursuant to RCW 41.05.021.

(5)(a) The adjudicative proceeding is governed by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and this subsection. The following requirements shall apply to adjudicative proceedings in which an appellant seeks review of decisions made by more than one agency. When an appellant files a single application for an adjudicative proceeding seeking review of decisions by more than one agency, this review shall be conducted initially in one adjudicative proceeding. The presiding officer may sever the proceeding into multiple proceedings on the motion of any of the parties, when:

(i) All parties consent to the severance; or

(ii) Either party requests severance without another party's consent, and the presiding officer finds there is good cause for severing the matter and that the proposed severance is not likely to prejudice the rights of an appellant who is a party to any of the severed proceedings.

(b) If there are multiple adjudicative proceedings involving common issues or parties where there is one appellant and both the authority and the department are parties, upon motion of any party or upon his or her own motion, the presiding offer may consolidate the proceedings if he or she finds that the consolidation is not likely to prejudice the rights of the appellant who is a party to any of the consolidated proceedings.

(c) The adjudicative proceeding shall be conducted by an administrative law judge, serving as the presiding officer, assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW with authority to render a final decision, at the local community services office or other location in Washington convenient to the applicant or recipient and, upon agreement by the applicant or recipient, may be conducted telephonically.

(d) The applicant or recipient, or his or her representative, has the right to inspect his or her file from the authority and, upon request, to receive copies of authority documents relevant to the proceedings free of charge.

(e) The applicant or recipient has the right to a copy of the audio recording of the adjudicative proceeding free of charge.

(f) If a final adjudicative order is issued in favor of an applicant, medical services benefits must be provided from the date of earliest eligibility, the date of denial of the application for assistance, or forty-five days following the date of application, whichever is soonest. If a final adjudicative order is issued in favor of a recipient, medical services benefits must be provided from the effective date of the authority's decision.

(g) The authority is limited to recovering an overpayment arising from assistance being continued pending the adjudicative proceeding to the amount recoverable up to the sixtieth day after the director's receipt of the application for an adjudicative proceeding.

(6) If the director requires that a party seek administrative review of an initial order to an adjudicative proceeding governed by this section, in order for the party to exhaust administrative remedies pursuant to RCW 34.05.534, the director shall adopt and implement rules in accordance with this subsection.

(a) The director, in consultation with the secretary, shall adopt rules to create a process for parties to seek administrative review of initial orders issued pursuant to RCW 34.05.461 in adjudicative proceedings governed by this subsection when multiple agencies are parties.

(b) This process shall seek to minimize any procedural complexities imposed on appellants that result from multiple agencies being parties to the matter, without prejudicing the rights of parties who are public assistance applicants or recipients.

(c) Nothing in this subsection shall impose or modify any legal requirement that a party seek administrative review of initial orders in order to exhaust administrative remedies pursuant to RCW 34.05.534.

(7) This subsection only applies to an adjudicative proceeding in which the appellant is an applicant for or recipient of medical services programs established under this chapter and the issue is his or her eligibility or ineligibility due to the assignment or transfer of a resource. The burden is on the authority or its authorized agency to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the person knowingly and willingly assigned or transferred the resource at less than market value for the purpose of qualifying or continuing to qualify for medical services programs established under this chapter. If the prevailing party in the adjudicative proceeding is the applicant or recipient, he or she is entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees.

(8) When an applicant or recipient files a petition for judicial review as provided in RCW 34.05.514 of an adjudicative order entered with respect to the medical services program, no filing fee may be collected from the person and no bond may be required on any appeal. In the event that the superior court, the court of appeals, or the supreme court renders a decision in favor of the applicant or recipient, the person is entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees and costs. If a decision of the court is made in favor of an applicant, assistance shall be paid from the date of earliest eligibility, the date of the denial of the application for assistance, or forty-five days following the date of application, whichever is soonest. If a decision of the court is made in favor of a recipient, assistance shall be paid from the effective date of the authority's decision.

(9) The provisions of RCW 74.08.080 do not apply to adjudicative proceedings requested or conducted with respect to the medical services program pursuant to this section.

(10) The authority shall adopt any rules it deems necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 38. RCW 82.24.550 and 2009 c 154 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall enforce the provisions of this chapter. The board may adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary to enforce and administer the provisions of this chapter.

(2) The department may adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary to administer the provisions of this chapter. The board may revoke or suspend the license or permit of any wholesale or retail cigarette dealer in the state upon sufficient cause appearing of the violation of this chapter or upon the failure of such licensee to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter.

(3) A license shall not be suspended or revoked except upon notice to the licensee and after a hearing as prescribed by the board. The board, upon finding that the licensee has failed to comply with any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, shall, in the case of the first offense, suspend the license or licenses of the licensee for a period of not less than thirty consecutive business days, and, in the case of a second or further offense, shall suspend the license or licenses for a period of not less than ninety consecutive business days nor more than twelve months, and, in the event the board finds the licensee has been guilty of willful and persistent violations, it may revoke the license or licenses.

(4) Any licenses issued under chapter 82.26 RCW to a person whose license or licenses have been suspended or revoked under this section shall also be suspended or revoked during the period of suspension or revocation under this section.

(5) Any person whose license or licenses have been revoked under this section may reapply to the board at the expiration of one year from the date of revocation of the license or licenses. The license or licenses may be approved by the board if it appears to the satisfaction of the board that the licensee will comply with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter.

(6) A person whose license has been suspended or revoked shall not sell cigarettes or tobacco products or permit cigarettes or tobacco products to be sold during the period of such suspension or revocation on the premises occupied by the person or upon other premises controlled by the person or others or in any other manner or form whatever.

(7) Any determination and order by the board, and any order of suspension or revocation by the board of the license or licenses issued under this chapter, or refusal to reinstate a license or licenses after revocation shall be reviewable by an appeal to the superior court of Thurston county. The superior court shall review the order or ruling of the board and may hear the matter de novo, having due regard to the provisions of this chapter and the duties imposed upon the board.

(8) If the board makes an initial decision to deny a license or renewal, or suspend or revoke a license, the applicant may request a hearing ((subject to the applicable provisions under Title 34 RCW))before an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW with authority to render a final decision.

(9) For purposes of this section, "tobacco products" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.26.010.

Sec. 39. RCW 82.26.220 and 2009 c 154 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall enforce this chapter. The board may adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary to enforce and administer this chapter.

(2) The department may adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary to administer this chapter. The board may revoke or suspend the distributor's or retailer's license of any distributor or retailer of tobacco products in the state upon sufficient cause showing a violation of this chapter or upon the failure of the licensee to comply with any of the rules adopted under it.

(3) A license shall not be suspended or revoked except upon notice to the licensee and after a hearing as prescribed by the board. The board, upon finding that the licensee has failed to comply with any provision of this chapter or of any rule adopted under it, shall, in the case of the first offense, suspend the license or licenses of the licensee for a period of not less than thirty consecutive business days, and in the case of a second or further offense, suspend the license or licenses for a period of not less than ninety consecutive business days but not more than twelve months, and in the event the board finds the licensee has been guilty of willful and persistent violations, it may revoke the license or licenses.

(4) Any licenses issued under chapter 82.24 RCW to a person whose license or licenses have been suspended or revoked under this section shall also be suspended or revoked during the period of suspension or revocation under this section.

(5) Any person whose license or licenses have been revoked under this section may reapply to the board at the expiration of one year of the license or licenses. The license or licenses may be approved by the board if it appears to the satisfaction of the board that the licensee will comply with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted under it.

(6) A person whose license has been suspended or revoked shall not sell tobacco products or cigarettes or permit tobacco products or cigarettes to be sold during the period of suspension or revocation on the premises occupied by the person or upon other premises controlled by the person or others or in any other manner or form.

(7) Any determination and order by the board, and any order of suspension or revocation by the board of the license or licenses issued under this chapter, or refusal to reinstate a license or licenses after revocation is reviewable by an appeal to the superior court of Thurston county. The superior court shall review the order or ruling of the board and may hear the matter de novo, having due regard to the provisions of this chapter and the duties imposed upon the board.

(8) If the board makes an initial decision to deny a license or renewal, or suspend or revoke a license, the applicant may request a hearing ((subject to the applicable provisions under Title 34 RCW))before an administrative law judge under chapter 34.12 RCW with authority to render a final decision.

Sec. 40. RCW 88.16.090 and 2009 c 470 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person may pilot any vessel subject to this chapter on waters covered by this chapter only if licensed to pilot such vessels on such waters under this chapter.

(2)(a) A person is eligible to be licensed as a pilot or a pilot trainee if the person:

(i) Is a citizen of the United States;

(ii) Is over the age of twenty-five years and under the age of seventy years;

(iii)(A) Holds at the time of application, as a minimum, a United States government license as master of steam or motor vessels of not more than one thousand six hundred gross register tons (three thousand international tonnage convention tons) upon oceans, near coastal waters, or inland waters; or the then most equivalent federal license as determined by the board; any such license to have been held by the applicant for a period of at least two years before application;

(B) Holds at the time of licensure as a pilot, after successful completion of the board-required training program, a first class United States endorsement without restrictions on the United States government license for the pilotage district in which the pilot applicant desires to be licensed; however, all applicants for a pilot examination scheduled to be given before July 1, 2008, must have the United States pilotage endorsement at the time of application; and

(C) The board may require that applicants and pilots have federal licenses and endorsements as it deems appropriate; and

(iv) Successfully completes a board-specified training program.

(b) In addition to the requirements of (a) of this subsection, a pilot applicant must meet such other qualifications as may be required by the board.

(c) A person applying for a license under this section shall not have been convicted of an offense involving drugs or the personal consumption of alcohol in the twelve months prior to the date of application. This restriction does not apply to license renewals under this section.

(3) The board may establish such other training license and pilot license requirements as it deems appropriate.

(4) Pilot applicants shall be evaluated and may be ranked for entry into a board-specified training program in a manner specified by the board based on their performance on a written examination or examinations established by the board, performance on other evaluation exercises as may be required by the board, and other criteria or qualifications as may be set by the board.

When the board determines that the demand for pilots requires entry of an applicant into the training program it shall issue a training license to that applicant, but under no circumstances may an applicant be issued a training license more than four years after taking the written entry examination. The training license authorizes the trainee to do such actions as are specified in the training program.

After the completion of the training program the board shall evaluate the trainee's performance and knowledge. The board, as it deems appropriate, may then issue a pilot license, delay the issuance of the pilot license, deny the issuance of the pilot license, or require further training and evaluation.

(5) The board may (a) appoint a special independent committee or (b) contract with private or governmental entities knowledgeable and experienced in the development, administration, and grading of licensing examinations or simulator evaluations for marine pilots, or (c) do both. Active, licensed pilots designated by the board may participate in the development, administration, and grading of examinations and other evaluation exercises. If the board does appoint a special examination or evaluation development committee, it is authorized to pay the members of the committee the same compensation and travel expenses as received by members of the board. Any person who willfully gives advance knowledge of information contained on a pilot examination or other evaluation exercise is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(6) This subsection applies to the review of a pilot applicant's written examinations and evaluation exercises to qualify to be placed on a waiting list to become a pilot trainee. Failure to comply with the process set forth in this subsection renders the results of the pilot applicant's written examinations and evaluation exercises final. A pilot applicant may seek board review, administrative review, and judicial review of the results of the written examinations and evaluation exercises in the following manner:

(a) A pilot applicant who seeks a review of the results of his or her written examinations or evaluation exercises must request from the board-appointed or board-designated examination committee an administrative review of the results of his or her written examinations or evaluation exercises as set forth by board rule.

(b) The determination of the examination committee's review of a pilot applicant's examination results becomes final after thirty days from the date of service of written notification of the committee's determination unless a full adjudicative hearing before an administrative law judge has been requested by the pilot applicant before the thirty-day period has expired, as set forth by board rule.

(c) When a full adjudicative hearing has been requested by the pilot applicant, the board shall request the appointment of an administrative law judge under chapter 34.12 RCW who has sufficient experience and familiarity with pilotage matters to be able to conduct a fair and impartial hearing. The hearing shall be governed by chapter 34.05 RCW. The administrative law judge shall issue ((an initial order))a final decision or order subject to judicial review under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(((d) The initial order of the administrative law judge is final unless within thirty days of the date of service of the initial order the board or pilot applicant requests review of the initial order under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(e) The board may appoint a person to review the initial order and to prepare and enter a final order as governed by chapter 34.05 RCW and as set forth by board rule. The person appointed by the board under this subsection (6)(e) is called the board reviewing officer.))

(7) Pilots are licensed under this section for a term of five years from and after the date of the issuance of their respective state licenses. Licenses must thereafter be renewed as a matter of course, unless the board withholds the license for good cause. Each pilot shall pay to the state treasurer an annual license fee in an amount set by the board by rule. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the fees established under this subsection may be increased through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2011. The fees must be deposited in the pilotage account. The board may assess partially active or inactive pilots a reduced fee.

(8) All pilots and pilot trainees are subject to an annual physical examination by a physician chosen by the board. The physician shall examine the pilot's or pilot trainee's heart, blood pressure, circulatory system, lungs and respiratory system, eyesight, hearing, and such other items as may be prescribed by the board. After consultation with a physician and the United States coast guard, the board shall establish minimum health standards to ensure that pilots and pilot trainees licensed by the state are able to perform their duties. Within ninety days of the date of each annual physical examination, and after review of the physician's report, the board shall make a determination of whether the pilot or pilot trainee is fully able to carry out the duties of a pilot or pilot trainee under this chapter. The board may in its discretion check with the appropriate authority for any convictions of or information regarding offenses by a licensed pilot or pilot trainee involving drugs or the personal consumption of alcohol in the prior twelve months.

(9) The board may require vessel simulator training for a pilot trainee and shall require vessel simulator training for a licensed pilot subject to RCW 88.16.105. The board shall also require vessel simulator training in the first year of active duty for a new pilot and at least once every five years for all active pilots.

(10) The board shall prescribe, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, such reporting requirements and review procedures as may be necessary to assure the accuracy and validity of license and service claims. Willful misrepresentation of such required information by a pilot applicant shall result in disqualification of the pilot applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 46.20.332 (Formal hearing—Evidence—Subpoenas—Reexamination—Findings and recommendations) and 2010 c 8 s 9023, 1972 ex.s. c 29 s 2, & 1965 ex.s. c 121 s 37; and

(2) RCW 46.20.333 (Decision after formal hearing) and 2010 c 8 s 9024, 1972 ex.s. c 29 s 3, & 1965 ex.s. c 121 s 38.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42. This act takes effect July 1, 2016.

--- END ---