BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A city or town that exercises its authority under chapter 7.48 RCW, RCW 35.22.280, 35.23.440, or 35.27.410, or other applicable law to abate a nuisance which threatens health or safety must provide prior notice to the property owner that abatement is pending and a special assessment may be levied on the property for the expense of abatement. Such special assessment authority is supplemental to any existing authority of a city or town to levy an assessment or obtain a lien for costs of abatement. The notice must be sent by regular mail.

(2) A city or town that exercises its authority under chapter 7.48 RCW, RCW 35.22.280, 35.23.440, or 35.27.410, or other applicable law to declare a nuisance, abate a nuisance, or impose fines or costs upon persons who create, continue, or maintain a nuisance may levy a special assessment on the land or premises where the nuisance is situated to reimburse the city or town for the expense of abatement. A city or town must, before levying a special assessment, notify the property owner and any identifiable mortgage holder that a special assessment will be levied on the property and provide the estimated amount of the special assessment. The notice must be sent by regular mail.

(3) The special assessment authorized by this section constitutes a lien against the property and is binding upon successors in title only from the date the lien is recorded in the county where the affected real property is located. Up to two thousand dollars of the recorded lien is of equal rank with state, county, and municipal taxes.

(4) A city or town levying a special assessment under this section may contract with the county treasurer to collect the special assessment in accordance with RCW 84.56.035.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A code city that exercises its authority under chapter 7.48 RCW, RCW 35.22.280, 35.23.440, or 35.27.410, or other applicable law to abate a nuisance which threatens health or safety must provide prior notice to the property owner that abatement is pending and a special assessment may be levied on the property for the expense of abatement. Such special assessment authority is supplemental to any existing authority of a code city to levy an assessment or obtain a lien for costs of abatement. The notice must be sent by regular mail.

(2) A code city that exercises its authority under chapter 7.48 RCW, RCW 35.22.280, 35.23.440, or 35.27.410, or other applicable law to declare a nuisance, abate a nuisance, or impose fines or costs upon persons who create, continue, or maintain a nuisance may levy a special assessment on the land or premises where the nuisance is situated to reimburse the code city for the expense of abatement. A code city must, before levying a special assessment, notify the property owner and any identifiable mortgage holder that a special assessment will be levied on the property and provide the estimated amount of the special assessment. The notice must be sent by regular mail.

(3) The special assessment authorized by this section constitutes a lien against the property and is binding upon successors in title only from the date the lien is recorded in the county where the affected real property is located. Up to two thousand dollars of the recorded lien is of equal rank with state, county, and municipal taxes.

(4) A code city levying a special assessment under this section may contract with the county treasurer to collect the special assessment in accordance with RCW 84.56.035.

--- END ---