BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission must establish and maintain an advisory committee to represent the interests of small scale mineral prospectors and miners to the commission and the department on matters including, but not limited to, issues relating to individual hydraulic project approval permit processing under this chapter, relevant rules and proposed rule changes under this chapter, and the gold and fish pamphlet established under RCW 77.55.091. The advisory committee must serve as a collaborative forum for regular communication of both ongoing and emergent issues relating to mineral prospecting and mining.

(2) In determining the size and membership of the advisory committee, the commission must consult with and consider nominations from appropriate small scale mineral prospecting and mining groups. The committee must consist of between five and nine members, as determined by the commission. Each member of the advisory committee shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3) The advisory committee must meet at least quarterly, and at other appropriate times to address emergent issues or proposed rule changes under this chapter relevant to small scale mineral prospecting and mining.

(4) For purposes of this act, small scale mineral prospectors and miners means individuals who engage in small scale prospecting and mining as defined by RCW 77.55.011(21).

--- END ---