BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The Washington student achievement council, the state board for community and technical colleges, the council of presidents, the institutions of higher education, the private independent higher education institutions, state law enforcement, and the Washington attorney general's office shall collaborate to carry out the following goals:

(a) Develop a set of best practices that institutions of higher education and private independent higher education institutions may employ to promote the awareness of campus sexual violence, reduce the occurrence of campus sexual violence, and enhance student safety;

(b) Develop recommendations for institutions of higher education and private independent higher education institutions for improving institutional campus sexual violence policies and procedures; and

(c) Develop recommendations for improving collaboration on campus sexual violence issues among institutions of higher education and between institutions of higher education and law enforcement.

(2) The task force on preventing campus sexual violence is established.

(a) The task force includes the following members:

(i) One representative from the student achievement council;

(ii) One representative from the state board for community and technical colleges;

(iii) One representative from the council of presidents;

(iv) One representative from each of the state universities, the regional universities, and the state college, who is the Title IX coordinator or who has expertise with Title IX and sexual violence prevention efforts;

(v) One representative from the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(vi) One representative from the independent colleges of Washington;

(vii) One representative from the Washington state attorney general's office; and

(viii) One representative from the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys.

(b) The task force shall select a coordinator to facilitate its progress.

(c) The purpose of the task force is to coordinate and implement the goals in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The task force shall report to the legislature and the institutions of higher education on its goals and recommendations annually by December 31st.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "institutions of higher education" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.10.016.

(5) This section expires July 1, 2017.

--- END ---