BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.32.030 and 2005 c 100 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Account" means one of the three accounts created in RCW 48.32.040.

(2) "Association" means the Washington insurance guaranty association created in RCW 48.32.040.

(3) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of this state.

(4) "Covered claim" means:

(a) Except for longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance, an unpaid claim, including one for unearned premiums, that arises out of and is within the coverage of an insurance policy to which this chapter applies issued by an insurer, if such insurer becomes an insolvent insurer after the first day of April, 1971 and (i) the claimant or insured is a resident of this state at the time of the insured event; or (ii) the property from which the claim arises is permanently located in this state. "Covered claim" does not include any amount due any reinsurer, insurer, insurance pool, or underwriting association, as subrogation recoveries or otherwise. However, a claim for any such amount asserted against a person insured under a policy issued by an insurer which has become an insolvent insurer, which, if it were not a claim by or for the benefit of a reinsurer, insurer, insurance pool, or underwriting association, would be a "covered claim" may be filed directly with the receiver of the insolvent insurer, but in no event may any such claim be asserted in any legal action against the insured of such insolvent insurer. In addition, "covered claim" does not include any claim filed with the association subsequent to the final date set by the court for the filing of claims against the liquidator or receiver of an insolvent insurer; and

(b) For longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance, an unpaid claim, excluding one for unearned premiums, for benefits due an injured worker under the longshore and harbor workers' compensation act that is within the coverage of an insurance policy to which this chapter applies issued by an insurer, if that insurer becomes an insolvent insurer after April 20, 2005, and (i) the worksite from which the injury occurred is within this state or on the navigable waters within or immediately offshore of this state, or (ii) the worksite from which the injury occurred is outside this state, the injured worker is a permanent resident of this state, the injured worker is temporarily working at the worksite from which the injury occurred, and the injured worker is not covered under a policy of longshore and harbor workers' compensation insurance issued in another state. "Covered claim" does not include any amount due any insurer, reinsurer, insurance pool, or underwriting association, as subrogation recoveries or otherwise.

(5) "Insolvent insurer" means:

(a) An insurer (i) authorized to transact insurance in this state either at the time the policy was issued or when the insured event occurred and (ii) determined to be insolvent and ordered liquidated by a court of competent jurisdiction, and which adjudication was subsequent to the first day of April, 1971; and

(b) In the case of an insurer writing longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance, an insurer (i) authorized to write this class of insurance at the time the policy was written and (ii) determined to be insolvent and ordered liquidated by a court of competent jurisdiction subsequent to April 20, 2005.

(6) "Longshore and harbor workers' compensation act" means the longshore and harbor workers' compensation act as defined in U.S.C. Title 33, Chapter 18, 901 et seq. and its extensions commonly known as the defense base act, outer continental shelf lands act, nonappropriated funds instrumentalities act, District of Columbia workers' compensation act, and the war hazards act.

(7) "Member insurer" means any person who (a) writes any kind of insurance to which this chapter applies under RCW 48.32.020, including the exchange of reciprocal or interinsurance contracts, and (b) holds a certificate of authority to transact insurance in this state.

(8) "Net direct written premiums" means direct gross premiums written in this state on insurance policies to which this chapter applies, less return premiums thereon and dividends paid or credited to policyholders on such direct business. "Net direct written premiums" does not include premiums on contracts between insurers or reinsurers and does not include premiums on policies issued through the Washington longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance assigned risk plan by its servicing carrier.

(9) "Person" means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, or voluntary organization.

--- END ---