BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Part I

Cigarette Tax

Sec. 101. RCW 82.24.026 and 2011 c 334 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the tax imposed upon the sale, use, consumption, handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes set forth in RCW 82.24.020, there is imposed a tax in an amount equal to three cents per cigarette through June 30, 2015, and five and one-half cents per cigarette beginning July 1, 2015.

((Beginning July 1, 2010,))(2) The revenue collected under this section must be deposited into the general fund.

Part II

Miscellaneous Provisions

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---