BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 39.12 RCW to read as follows:

Distinct prevailing wage rates shall be calculated and paid to workers employed in residential construction. "Residential construction" means construction alteration, repair improvement, or maintenance of single-family dwellings, duplexes, apartments, condominiums, and other residential structures not to exceed four stories in height, and all incidental items such as site work, parking areas, utilities, and streets and sidewalks, pursuant to the United States department of labor's "All Agency Memorandum No. 130: Application of the Standard of Comparison "Projects of a Character Similar" under the Davis-Bacon and Related Acts," dated March 17, 1978.

--- END ---