BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

The department must remove graffiti from all state-owned transportation facilities within twenty-four hours of the graffiti being reported to the department.

--- END ---