BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.71.080 and 2011 c 178 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Every person licensed to practice medicine in this state shall pay licensing fees and renew his or her license in accordance with administrative procedures and administrative requirements adopted as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(b) The commission shall request licensees to submit information about their current professional practice at the time of license renewal and licensees must provide the information requested. This information may include practice setting, medical specialty, board certification, or other relevant data determined by the commission.

(c) A physician who resides and practices in Washington and obtains or renews a retired active license shall be exempt from licensing fees imposed under this section. The commission may establish rules governing mandatory continuing education requirements which shall be met by physicians applying for renewal of licenses. The rules shall provide that mandatory continuing education requirements may be met in part by physicians showing evidence of the completion of approved activities relating to professional liability risk management. The number of hours of continuing education for a physician holding a retired active license shall not exceed fifty hours per year.

(2) The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the commission with information on methods of recognizing victims of human trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to minor victims. The commission shall disseminate this information to licensees by: Providing the information on the commission's web site; including the information in newsletters; holding trainings at meetings attended by organization members; or another distribution method determined by the commission. The commission shall report to the office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses to distribute information under this subsection.

(3) The commission, in its sole discretion, may permit an applicant who has not renewed his or her license to be licensed without examination if it is satisfied that such applicant meets all the requirements for licensure in this state, and is competent to engage in the practice of medicine.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.71A.020 and 2011 c 178 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall adopt rules fixing the qualifications and the educational and training requirements for licensure as a physician assistant or for those enrolled in any physician assistant training program. The requirements shall include completion of an accredited physician assistant training program approved by the commission and within one year successfully take and pass an examination approved by the commission, if the examination tests subjects substantially equivalent to the curriculum of an accredited physician assistant training program. An interim permit may be granted by the department of health for one year provided the applicant meets all other requirements. Physician assistants licensed by the board of medical examiners, or the medical quality assurance commission as of July 1, 1999, shall continue to be licensed.

(2)(a) The commission shall adopt rules governing the extent to which:

(i) Physician assistant students may practice medicine during training; and

(ii) Physician assistants may practice after successful completion of a physician assistant training course.

(b) Such rules shall provide:

(i) That the practice of a physician assistant shall be limited to the performance of those services for which he or she is trained; and

(ii) That each physician assistant shall practice medicine only under the supervision and control of a physician licensed in this state, but such supervision and control shall not be construed to necessarily require the personal presence of the supervising physician or physicians at the place where services are rendered.

(3) Applicants for licensure shall file an application with the commission on a form prepared by the secretary with the approval of the commission, detailing the education, training, and experience of the physician assistant and such other information as the commission may require. The application shall be accompanied by a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. A surcharge of fifty dollars per year shall be charged on each license renewal or issuance of a new license to be collected by the department and deposited into the impaired physician account for physician assistant participation in the impaired physician program. Each applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to the commission of the following:

(a) That the applicant has completed an accredited physician assistant program approved by the commission and is eligible to take the examination approved by the commission;

(b) That the applicant is of good moral character; and

(c) That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of practicing medicine as a physician assistant with reasonable skill and safety. The commission may require an applicant to submit to such examination or examinations as it deems necessary to determine an applicant's physical or mental capability, or both, to safely practice as a physician assistant.

(4)(a) The commission may approve, deny, or take other disciplinary action upon the application for license as provided in the Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW.

(b) The license shall be renewed as determined under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The commission shall request licensees to submit information about their current professional practice at the time of license renewal and licensees must provide the information requested. This information may include practice setting, medical specialty, or other relevant data determined by the commission.

(c) The commission may authorize the use of alternative supervisors who are licensed either under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

(5) All funds in the impaired physician account shall be paid to the contract entity within sixty days of deposit.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.57.050 and 1996 c 191 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board may establish rules and regulations governing mandatory continuing education requirements which shall be met by physicians applying for renewal of licenses. Administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees for applications and renewals shall be established as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The board shall determine prerequisites for relicensing.

(2) The board must request licensees to submit information about their current professional practice at the time of license renewal and licensees must provide the information requested. This information may include practice setting, medical specialty, board certification, or other relevant data determined by the board.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.57A.020 and 1999 c 127 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall adopt rules fixing the qualifications and the educational and training requirements for licensure as an osteopathic physician assistant or for those enrolled in any physician assistant training program. The requirements shall include completion of an accredited physician assistant training program approved by the board and within one year successfully take and pass an examination approved by the board, providing such examination tests subjects substantially equivalent to the curriculum of an accredited physician assistant training program. An interim permit may be granted by the department of health for one year provided the applicant meets all other requirements. Physician assistants licensed by the board of osteopathic medicine as of July 1, 1999, shall continue to be licensed.

(2)(a) The board shall adopt rules governing the extent to which:

(i) Physician assistant students may practice medicine during training; and

(ii) Physician assistants may practice after successful completion of a training course.

(b) Such rules shall provide:

(i) That the practice of an osteopathic physician assistant shall be limited to the performance of those services for which he or she is trained; and

(ii) That each osteopathic physician assistant shall practice osteopathic medicine only under the supervision and control of an osteopathic physician licensed in this state, but such supervision and control shall not be construed to necessarily require the personal presence of the supervising physicians at the place where services are rendered. The board may authorize the use of alternative supervisors who are licensed either under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

(3) Applicants for licensure shall file an application with the board on a form prepared by the secretary with the approval of the board, detailing the education, training, and experience of the physician assistant and such other information as the board may require. The application shall be accompanied by a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. A surcharge of twenty-five dollars per year may be charged on each license renewal or issuance of a new license to be collected by the department of health for physician assistant participation in an impaired practitioner program. Each applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board of the following:

(a) That the applicant has completed an accredited physician assistant program approved by the board and is eligible to take the examination approved by the board;

(b) That the applicant is of good moral character; and

(c) That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of practicing osteopathic medicine as an osteopathic physician assistant with reasonable skill and safety. The board may require any applicant to submit to such examination or examinations as it deems necessary to determine an applicant's physical and/or mental capability to safely practice as an osteopathic physician assistant.

(4) The board may approve, deny, or take other disciplinary action upon the application for a license as provided in the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW. The license shall be renewed as determined under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(5) The board must request licensees to submit information about their current professional practice at the time of license renewal and licensees must provide the information requested. This information may include practice setting, medical specialty, board certification, or other relevant data determined by the board.

--- END ---