BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.08A.060 and 1997 c 58 s 110 are each amended to read as follows:

Single adults without dependents between eighteen and fifty years of age shall comply with federal food stamp work requirements as a condition of eligibility. ((The department may exempt any counties or subcounty areas from the federal food stamp work requirements in P.L. 104-193, unless the department receives written evidence of official action by a county or subcounty governing entity, taken after noticed consideration, that indicates that a county or subcounty area chooses not to use an exemption to the federal food stamp work requirements.))The state may not seek, accept, or maintain any waivers from the federal food stamp work requirements in P.L. 104-193. The state shall terminate any federal work requirement waivers in existence on the effective date of this section.

--- END ---