BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A peace officer who responds to a report of threatened or attempted suicide and does not take the person who is the subject of the report into custody may note in the incident report that the person is in need of a mental health evaluation.

(2) An incident report noting a need for a mental health evaluation must be forwarded to a local designated mental health professional agency within twelve hours of entry of the incident report.

(3) As soon as possible, but no later than twelve hours from receiving the report, a designated mental health professional must attempt to contact the person who is the subject of the report to assess whether or not the person meets initial detention criteria under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153. Documentation of the designated mental health professional's attempt to contact and assess the person must be maintained by the designated mental health professional agency.

(4) By January 1, 2016, law enforcement agencies must have a system in place for officers to document, as part of an incident report, the need for a mental health evaluation of a person who is the subject of a report of threatened or attempted suicide. The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs must assist local jurisdictions in establishing systems and protocols to satisfy this requirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act may be known and cited as Sheena's law.

--- END ---