BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any peace officer has authority to assist the department with the supervisions of offenders.

(2) If a peace officer has reasonable cause to believe an offender is in violation of the terms of supervision, the peace officer may conduct a search as provided under RCW 9.94A.631, of the offender's person, automobile, or other personal property to search for evidence of the violation. A peace officer may assist a community corrections officer with a search of the offender's residence if requested to do so by the community corrections officer.

(3) A peace officer may arrest and detain any offender who violates a condition of community custody and place him or her in total confinement pending disposition of the alleged violation.

(4) A report summarizing the arrest and supporting evidence shall be provided to the department within twenty-four hours of the arrest, excluding weekends and holidays for the department to consider sanctions pursuant to this chapter. If the department does not pursue sanctions, the offender shall be released on the violation.

(5) Nothing in this section prevents a peace officer from arresting an offender for any new crime found as a result of the offender's arrest or search authorized by this section.

(6) For the purposes of this section, "peace officer" refers to a limited or general authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020.

--- END ---