BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.46.310 and 1981 c 139 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person shall manufacture, and no person shall sell, distribute, furnish or supply to any other person, any gambling device, including but not limited to punchboards and pull-tabs, in this state, or for use within this state, without first obtaining a license to do so from the commission under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, such licenses shall not be issued by the commission except respecting devices which are designed and permitted for use in connection with activities authorized under this chapter: PROVIDED, That this requirement for licensure shall apply only insofar as the commission has adopted, or may adopt, rules implementing it as to particular categories of gambling devices and related equipment.

(3) The commission may adopt rules and issue licenses to allow a person to possess a gambling device, which is designed and permitted for use in connection with gambling activities authorized under this chapter, for the sole purpose of manufacturing or repairing gambling devices or to be used in research and development of gambling devices. The rules must provide restrictions that prevent the use of the gambling devices for gambling activities while the devices are located in this state.

--- END ---