BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that extensive research has demonstrated that teacher quality is the most significant in-school factor impacting student outcomes. The legislature recognizes that one of the most positive strategies to improve student achievement is to address teacher effectiveness statewide so that all students have access to highly effective teachers. The legislature further finds that the Washington state institute for public policy conducted a meta-analysis to evaluate educator professional development and reported that targeted professional development focusing on improving teaching in a particular content area or a particular grade has a greater impact on positive student outcomes than just providing more time and funding for professional development without directing how those resources are used.

The legislature intends to strategically invest in targeted professional development to build systemic capacity across Washington state to implement with fidelity the recent revisions to the teacher and principal evaluations and the newly adopted essential academic learning requirements in language arts and mathematics and to support educators through these transitions. The legislature further intends to provide funding sufficient to provide two days outside of the required one hundred eighty day school year for teachers and principals to receive this targeted professional development.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.415.350 and 2009 c 539 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:

(1) Create partnerships with the educational service districts or public or private institutions of higher education with approved educator preparation programs to develop and deliver professional development learning opportunities for educators that fulfill the goals and address the activities described in ((sections 3 through 6 of this act and)) RCW 28A.415.360. The partnerships shall:

(a) Support school districts by providing professional development leadership, courses, and consultation services to school districts in their implementation of professional development activities, including the activities described in ((sections 3 through 6 of this act and)) RCW 28A.415.360; and

(b) Support one another in the delivery of state-level and regional-level professional development activities such as state conferences and regional accountability institutes; and

(2) Enter into a performance agreement with each educational service district to clearly articulate partner responsibilities and assure fidelity for the delivery of targeted professional development initiatives including job-embedded practices. Components of such performance agreements shall include:

(a) Participation in the development of various professional development workshops, programs, and activities;

(b) Characteristics and qualifications of professional development staff supported by the program;

(c) Methods to ensure consistent delivery of professional development services; and

(d) Reporting responsibilities related to services provided, program participation, outcomes, and recommendations for service improvement.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.415.360 and 2009 c 548 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, targeted professional development programs((, to be known as learning improvement days,)) are authorized to further the development of outstanding ((mathematics, science, and reading)) teaching and learning opportunities in the state of Washington and to close the opportunity gap. The intent of this section is to provide guidance for the ((learning improvement days in the omnibus appropriations act))targeted professional development provided in accordance with this section. The ((learning improvement days))targeted professional development authorized in this section shall not be considered part of the definition of basic education.

(2) If funding is provided under subsection (1) of this section, a school district is eligible to receive funding ((for learning improvement days that are))sufficient to provide for two professional development days outside of the required one hundred eighty day school year for teachers and principals. The professional development should entail structured practice, implementation, observation, reflection, and a feedback cycle. School districts must involve teachers in the planning for professional development and the feedback loop. The professional development should be job-embedded and differentiated based on instructional challenges.

(3) The professional development days funded under this section shall be limited to specific activities related to the teacher and principal evaluations or to improve student learning ((that contribute to))of the essential academic learning requirements and to close the achievement gap. The targeted professional development must contribute to at least one of the following outcomes:

(a) Provision of meaningful, targeted professional development for all teachers ((in mathematics, science, or reading))and principals to increase understanding of the revised teacher and principal evaluations, including at a minimum:

(i) Examination of the instructional framework;

(ii) The relationship of the state criteria and rubrics to the instructional framework;

(iii) The use of multiple measures;

(iv) The relationship between the teacher and principal evaluation systems; and

(v) Other topics necessary for the successful implementation of the teacher and principal evaluation system;

(b) Increased knowledge and instructional skill of the essential academic learning requirements for mathematics, science, or ((reading))English language arts teachers;

(c) Increased use of curriculum materials with supporting diagnostic and supplemental materials that align with state standards;

(d) Skillful guidance for students participating in alternative assessment activities;

(e) Increased rigor of course offerings especially in mathematics, science, and ((reading))English language arts;

(f) Increased student opportunities for focused, applied mathematics and science classes;

(g) Increased student success on state achievement measures; and

(h) Increased student appreciation of the value and uses of mathematics, science, and ((reading))English language arts knowledge and exploration of related careers.

(((3)))(4) School districts receiving resources under this section shall submit reports to the superintendent of public instruction documenting how the use of the funds contributes to measurable improvement in the outcomes described under subsection (((2)))(3) of this section; and how other professional development resources and programs authorized in statute or in the omnibus appropriations act contribute to the expected outcomes. The superintendent of public instruction and the office of financial management shall collaborate on required report content and format.

--- END ---