BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.04.040 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Persons eligible for appointment as members of the commission shall have general knowledge of the habits and distribution of fish and wildlife and shall not hold another state, county, or municipal elective or appointive office.

(2) In making these appointments, the governor shall ((seek to)):

(a) Maintain a balance reflecting all aspects of fish and wildlife, including representation recommended by organized groups representing ((sportfishers))recreational fishers, commercial fishers, hunters, private landowners, and environmentalists; and

(b) In carrying out subsection (1) of this section, ensure an equitable balance amongst the commissioners between those with specific background, experience, and knowledge relevant to recreational fishing and those with specific background, experience, and knowledge relevant to commercial fishing.

(3) Persons eligible for appointment as fish and wildlife commissioners shall comply with the provisions of chapters 42.52 and ((42.17))42.56 RCW.

--- END ---