BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning in the 2015-16 school year, each school district with at least one thousand students or more shall implement lean management and Baldrige performance excellence principles. Beginning in the 2016-17 school year, each school district shall report the results of the implementation of the lean management and Baldrige performance excellence principles to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. School districts shall continue to implement the principles and report the results every three years to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:

(1) Develop a standardized manner for school districts to use to report the results of the implementation of the lean management and Baldrige performance excellence principles as required under section 1 of this act; and

(2) Analyze the school district reports to identify areas of waste to eliminate and improve the school district results. The analysis must be shared with the school districts.

--- END ---