BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.27.090 and 2013 c 23 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The registration provisions of this chapter do not apply to:

(1) An authorized representative of the United States government, the state of Washington, or any incorporated city, town, county, township, irrigation district, reclamation district, or other municipal or political corporation or subdivision of this state;

(2) Officers of a court when they are acting within the scope of their office;

(3) Public utilities operating under the regulations of the utilities and transportation commission in construction, maintenance, or development work incidental to their own business;

(4) Any construction, repair, or operation incidental to the discovering or producing of petroleum or gas, or the drilling, testing, abandoning, or other operation of any petroleum or gas well or any surface or underground mine or mineral deposit when performed by an owner or lessee;

(5) The sale of any finished products, materials, or articles of merchandise that are not fabricated into and do not become a part of a structure under the common law of fixtures;

(6) Any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair of personal property performed by the registered or legal owner, or by a mobile/manufactured home retail dealer or manufacturer licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW who shall warranty service and repairs under chapter 46.70 RCW;

(7) Any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair carried on within the limits and boundaries of any site or reservation under the legal jurisdiction of the federal government;

(8) Any person who only furnished materials, supplies, or equipment without fabricating them into, or consuming them in the performance of, the work of the contractor;

(9) Any work or operation on one undertaking or project by one or more contracts, the aggregate contract price of which for labor and materials and all other items is less than five hundred dollars, such work or operations being considered as of a casual, minor, or inconsequential nature. The exemption prescribed in this subsection does not apply in any instance wherein the work or construction is only a part of a larger or major operation, whether undertaken by the same or a different contractor, or in which a division of the operation is made into contracts of amounts less than five hundred dollars for the purpose of evasion of this chapter or otherwise. The exemption prescribed in this subsection does not apply to a person who advertises or puts out any sign or card or other device which might indicate to the public that he or she is a contractor, or that he or she is qualified to engage in the business of contractor;

(10) Any construction or operation incidental to the construction and repair of irrigation and drainage ditches of regularly constituted irrigation districts or reclamation districts; or to farming, dairying, agriculture, viticulture, horticulture, or stock or poultry raising; or to clearing or other work upon land in rural districts for fire prevention purposes; except when any of the above work is performed by a registered contractor;

(11) An owner who contracts for a project with a registered contractor, except that this exemption shall not deprive the owner of the protections of this chapter against registered and unregistered contractors. The exemption prescribed in this subsection does not apply to a person who performs the activities of a contractor for the purpose of leasing or selling improved property he or she has owned for less than twelve months;

(12) Any person working on his or her own property, whether occupied by him or her or not, and any person working on his or her personal residence, whether owned by him or her or not but this exemption shall not apply to any person who performs the activities of a contractor on his or her own property for the purpose of selling, demolishing, or leasing the property;

(13) An owner who performs maintenance, repair, and alteration work in or upon his or her own properties, or who uses his or her own employees to do such work;

(14) A licensed architect or civil or professional engineer acting solely in his or her professional capacity, an electrician certified under the laws of the state of Washington, or a plumber certified under the laws of the state of Washington or licensed by a political subdivision of the state of Washington while operating within the boundaries of such political subdivision. The exemption provided in this subsection is applicable only when the person certified is operating within the scope of his or her certification;

(15) Any person who engages in the activities herein regulated as an employee of a registered contractor with wages as his or her sole compensation or as an employee with wages as his or her sole compensation;

(16) Contractors on highway projects who have been prequalified as required by RCW 47.28.070, with the department of transportation to perform highway construction, reconstruction, or maintenance work;

(17) A mobile/manufactured home dealer or manufacturer who subcontracts the installation, set-up, or repair work to actively registered contractors. This exemption only applies to the installation, set-up, or repair of the mobile/manufactured homes that were manufactured or sold by the mobile/manufactured home dealer or manufacturer;

(18) An entity who holds a valid electrical contractor's license under chapter 19.28 RCW that employs a certified journey level electrician, a certified residential specialty electrician, a certified HVAC/refrigeration specialty electrician as defined in RCW 19.28.006, a certified appliance repair specialty electrician as defined in RCW 19.28.006, or an electrical trainee meeting the requirements of chapter 19.28 RCW to perform plumbing work that is incidentally, directly, and immediately appropriate to the like-in-kind replacement of a household appliance or other small household utilization equipment that requires ((limited electric power and)) limited waste and/or water connections. An electrical trainee must be supervised by a certified electrician while performing plumbing work.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.106.150 and 2013 c 23 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require that a person obtain a license or a certified plumber in order to do plumbing work at his or her residence or farm or place of business or on other property owned by him or her.

(2) A current certificate of competency or apprentice permit is not required for:

(a) Persons performing plumbing work on a farm; or

(b) Certified journey level electricians, certified residential specialty electricians, certified HVAC/refrigeration specialty electricians as defined in RCW 19.28.006, certified appliance repair specialty electricians as defined in RCW 19.28.006, or electrical trainees working for an electrical contractor and performing exempt work under RCW 18.27.090(18).

(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be intended to derogate from or dispense with the requirements of any valid plumbing code enacted by a political subdivision of the state, except that no code shall require the holder of a certificate of competency to demonstrate any additional proof of competency or obtain any other license or pay any fee in order to engage in the trade of plumbing.

(4) This chapter shall not apply to common carriers subject to Part I of the Interstate Commerce Act, nor to their officers and employees.

(5) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to any farm, business, industrial plant, or corporation doing plumbing work on premises it owns or operates.

(6) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict the right of any householder to assist or receive assistance from a friend, neighbor, relative, or other person when none of the individuals doing such plumbing hold themselves out as engaged in the trade or business of plumbing.

Sec. 3. RCW 19.28.006 and 2013 c 23 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter.

(1) "Administrator" means a person designated by an electrical contractor to supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance with the rules adopted under this chapter.

(2) "Basic electrical work" means the work classified in (a) and (b) of this subsection as class A and class B basic electrical work:

(a) "Class A basic electrical work" means the like-in-kind replacement of a: Contactor, relay, timer, starter, circuit board, or similar control component; household appliance; circuit breaker; fuse; residential luminaire; lamp; snap switch; dimmer; receptacle outlet; thermostat; heating element; luminaire ballast with an exact same ballast; ten horsepower or smaller motor; or wiring, appliances, devices, or equipment as specified by rule.

(b) "Class B basic electrical work" means work other than class A basic electrical work that requires minimal electrical circuit modifications and has limited exposure hazards. Class B basic electrical work includes the following:

(i) Extension of not more than one branch electrical circuit limited to one hundred twenty volts and twenty amps each where:

(A) No cover inspection is necessary; and

(B) The extension does not supply more than two outlets;

(ii) Like-in-kind replacement of a single luminaire not exceeding two hundred seventy-seven volts and twenty amps;

(iii) Like-in-kind replacement of a motor larger than ten horsepower;

(iv) The following low voltage systems:

(A) Repair and replacement of devices not exceeding one hundred volt-amperes in Class 2, Class 3, or power limited low voltage systems in one and two-family dwellings;

(B) Repair and replacement of the following devices not exceeding one hundred volt-amperes in Class 2, Class 3, or power limited low voltage systems in other buildings, provided the equipment is not for fire alarm or nurse call systems and is not located in an area classified as hazardous by the national electrical code; or

(v) Wiring, appliances, devices, or equipment as specified by rule.

(3) "Board" means the electrical board under RCW 19.28.311.

(4) "Chapter" or "subchapter" means the subchapter, if no chapter number is referenced.

(5) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(6) "Director" means the director of the department or the director's designee.

(7) "Electrical construction trade" includes, but is not limited to, installing or maintaining electrical wires and equipment that are used for light, heat, or power and installing and maintaining remote control, signaling, power limited, or communication circuits or systems.

(8) "Electrical contractor" means a person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity that offers to undertake, undertakes, submits a bid for, or does the work of installing or maintaining wires or equipment that convey electrical current.

(9) "Equipment" means any equipment or apparatus that directly uses, conducts, insulates, or is operated by electricity but does not mean: Plug-in appliances; or plug-in equipment as determined by the department by rule.

(10) "Industrial control panel" means a factory-wired or user-wired assembly of industrial control equipment such as motor controllers, switches, relays, power supplies, computers, cathode ray tubes, transducers, and auxiliary devices. The panel may include disconnect means and motor branch circuit protective devices.

(11) "Journey level electrician" means a person who has been issued a journey level electrician certificate of competency by the department.

(12) "Like-in-kind" means having similar characteristics such as voltage requirements, current draw, and function, and being in the same location.

(13) "Master electrician" means either a master journey level electrician or master specialty electrician.

(14) "Master journey level electrician" means a person who has been issued a master journey level electrician certificate of competency by the department and who may be designated by an electrical contractor to supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter.

(15) "Master specialty electrician" means a person who has been issued a specialty electrician certificate of competency by the department and who may be designated by an electrical contractor to supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter.

(16) "Specialty electrician" means a person who has been issued a specialty electrician certificate of competency by the department.

(17) "HVAC/refrigeration specialty electrician" means a person who has been issued an HVAC/refrigeration specialty electrician certificate of competency by the department that requires at least four thousand hours of supervised work experience, or the equivalent military training or work experience, prior to certification.

(18) "Appliance repair specialty electrician" means a person who has been issued an appliance repair specialty electrician certificate of competency by the department.

Sec. 4. RCW 19.28.091 and 2003 c 399 s 301 and 2003 c 242 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) No license under the provision of this chapter shall be required from any utility or any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity employed by a utility because of work in connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by or under the control of a utility and used for transmission or distribution of electricity from the source of supply to the point of contact at the premises and/or property to be supplied and service connections and meters and other apparatus or appliances used in the measurement of the consumption of electricity by the customer.

(2) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be required from any utility because of work in connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of the following:

(a) Lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment used in the lighting of streets, alleys, ways, or public areas or squares;

(b) Lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by a commercial, industrial, or public institution customer that are an integral part of a transmission or distribution system, either overhead or underground, providing service to such customer and located outside the building or structure: PROVIDED, That a utility does not initiate the sale of services to perform such work;

(c) Lines and wires, together with ancillary apparatus, and equipment, owned by a customer that is an independent power producer who has entered into an agreement for the sale of electricity to a utility and that are used in transmitting electricity from an electrical generating unit located on premises used by such customer to the point of interconnection with the utility's system.

(3) Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity licensed under RCW 19.28.041 may enter into a contract with a utility for the performance of work under subsection (2) of this section.

(4) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity because of the work of installing and repairing ignition or lighting systems for motor vehicles.

(5) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity because of work in connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of wires and equipment, and installations thereof, exempted in RCW 19.28.010.

(6) The department may by rule exempt from licensing requirements under this chapter work performed on premanufactured electric power generation equipment assemblies and control gear involving the testing, repair, modification, maintenance, or installation of components internal to the power generation equipment, the control gear, or the transfer switch.

(7) This chapter does not require an electrical contractor license if: (a) An appropriately certified electrician or a properly supervised certified electrical trainee is performing the installation, repair, or maintenance of wires and equipment for a nonprofit corporation that holds a current tax exempt status as provided under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or a nonprofit religious organization; (b) the certified electrician or certified electrical trainee is not compensated for the electrical work; and (c) the value of the electrical work does not exceed thirty thousand dollars.

(8) An entity that currently holds a valid specialty or general plumbing contractor's registration under chapter 18.27 RCW may employ a certified plumber, a certified residential plumber, or a plumber trainee meeting the requirements of chapter 18.106 RCW, or an entity that currently holds a valid electrical contractor's license under this chapter may employ a certified HVAC/refrigeration specialty electrician, or a certified appliance repair specialty electrician, to perform electrical work that is incidentally, directly, and immediately appropriate to the like-in-kind replacement of a household appliance or other small household utilization equipment that requires ((limited electric power and)) limited waste and/or water connections. A plumber trainee must be supervised by a certified plumber or a certified residential plumber while performing electrical work. The electrical work is subject to the permitting and inspection requirements of this chapter.

--- END ---