BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that low-income students who enroll in the college bound scholarship program are more likely to graduate from high school. It also finds that high-quality programming offered by nonprofit organizations can dramatically improve outcomes for low-income students in Washington state. Research has shown that the cost of high-quality programs offered by nonprofit organizations represent a small fraction of the public and personal financial benefit created when a low-income student graduates from high school.

Therefore, the legislature intends to create a competitive grant program to fund high-quality, evidence-based outreach programs to low-income students enrolled in Washington's college bound scholarship program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish a competitive grant program and provide grants to high-quality, evidence-based outreach programs that offer student support services for college bound scholarship students.

(2) By December 31, 2015, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop a selection process for grant applicants. The selected programs must demonstrate success in improving high school graduation rates. Additionally, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must consider high-quality, evidence-based outreach programs that:

(a) Intentionally focus on student success in secondary and postsecondary levels;

(b) Contain an evaluation process for the success of the program;

(c) Serve students who are underrepresented in degree attainment, including but not limited to low-income students, students of color, and potential first-generation college students;

(d) Serve middle school and high school-age students;

(e) Provide academic advising, tutoring, and mentoring services;

(f) Offer students with continuous multiyear support; and

(g) Serve geographic regions with unmet needs.

(3) Grants may be awarded to programs that are developed by local coalitions to achieve improved student outcomes.

(4) Grants shall only be disbursed to nonprofit organizations exempt from tax under section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code that can provide matching funds or in-kind services.

(5) Beginning December 1, 2016, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually submit a report of the student services provided as a result of the grant program established under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) The sum of five million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016, from the general fund to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the purposes of this act.

(2) The sum of five million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the general fund to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---