BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the public is entitled to complete disclosure regarding the influence of money in politics. Therefore, the legislature intends to increase disclosure by requiring electronic filing by lobbyists.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 42.17A RCW to read as follows:

(1) All agencies required to report under RCW 42.17A.635 must file all reports required by this chapter electronically over the internet as provided by the commission under RCW 42.17A.055.

(2) No later than January 1, 2017, all lobbyists and lobbyists' employers required to file reports under RCW 42.17A.600, 42.17A.615, 42.17A.625, or 42.17A.630 must file all reports required by this chapter electronically over the internet as provided by the commission under RCW 42.17A.055.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 42.17A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The following persons and individuals must pay an annual fee to the commission:

(a) Every political committee and candidate must pay a fee to the commission, not to exceed one hundred dollars, each calendar year that the political committee or candidate is required to report under RCW 42.17A.205, 42.17A.210, 42.17A.220, 42.17A.225, 42.17A.235, or 42.17A.250;

(b) Every lobbyist whose total reportable accrued compensation for lobbying, whether from or on behalf of one or more lobbyists' employers, was ten thousand dollars or more for the previous calendar year must pay a fee to the commission, not to exceed one hundred dollars, each calendar year that it is required to report under RCW 42.17A.600, 42.17A.615, 42.17A.630, or 42.17A.640;

(c) Every lobbyist employer whose total reportable accrued expenses and payments for lobbying, including those through or on behalf of one or more lobbyists, was ten thousand dollars or more for the previous calendar year, must pay a fee to the commission, not to exceed one hundred dollars, each calendar year that it is required to report under RCW 42.17A.600, 42.17A.615, 42.17A.630, or 42.17A.640; and

(d) Every government entity that employs more than fifty full-time equivalent employees must pay a fee to the commission, not to exceed one hundred dollars, each calendar year that it is required to report under RCW 42.17A.635(5).

(2) No person or individual may be required to pay more than one fee in a calendar year under this section. Any person may appeal a fee to the commission if more than one fee under this section is imposed on the person in a calendar year.

(3) The commission shall adopt rules and procedures to implement this section.

(4) The commission shall adopt procedures for waiver of all or part of the fee required under subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section based on the size, frequency, and complexity of campaign or lobbying activity.

(5) The legislature shall have the authority to adjust fees commensurate to the amount appropriate to support the functions of this program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 42.17A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The public disclosure electronic filing account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from fees paid under section 3 of this act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for costs incurred as a result of the design, development, implementation, and maintenance of:

(a) Computer hardware and software or other applications to accommodate electronic filing of the reports required by this chapter; and

(b) A database and query system compatible with current architecture, technology, and operating systems that result in readily available data to the public for review and analysis.

(2) Only the executive director of the commission, or the executive director's designee, may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

--- END ---