BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.26.164 and 2005 c 67 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No later than July 1, 2005, the department shall adopt rules to allow a member who meets the criteria set forth in subsection (2) of this section to choose an actuarially equivalent benefit that pays the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such portion of the member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule designates shall be continued throughout the life of a spouse ineligible for survivor benefits under RCW 41.26.160 or 41.26.161.

(2) To choose an actuarially equivalent benefit according to subsection (1) of this section, a member shall:

(a) Have a portion of the retirement allowance payable to the retiree that is not subject to periodic payments pursuant to a property division obligation as provided for in RCW 41.50.670; and

(b) Choose an actuarially reduced benefit equivalent to that portion not subject to periodic payments under (a) of this subsection during a one-year period beginning one year after the date of marriage to the survivor benefit-ineligible spouse.

(3)(a) A member who married a spouse ineligible for survivor benefits under RCW 41.26.160 or 41.26.161 prior to the effective date of the rules adopted under this section and satisfies subsection (2)(a) of this section has one year to designate their spouse as a survivor beneficiary following the adoption of the rules.

(b) A member who married a spouse ineligible for survivor benefits under RCW 41.26.160 or 41.26.161, has been married to that spouse for at least two years prior to September 1, 2015, and satisfies subsection (2)(a) of this section has one year from September 1, 2015, to designate their spouse as a survivor beneficiary. The office of the state actuary must provide the department with administrative factors to ensure that the benefits provided under this section are actuarially equivalent.

(c) A deceased member's spouse who was eligible to be provided a survivor benefit under RCW 41.26.164(1) but the member did not select a survivor benefit, and who prior to March 1, 2015, exhausted all administrative remedies with the department for establishing eligibility for a benefit under RCW 41.26.164, is eligible beginning August 1, 2015, for a retirement allowance equal to two-thirds of the gross monthly retirement allowance the retired member received at the time of death.

(4) No benefit provided to a child survivor beneficiary under RCW 41.26.160 or 41.26.161 is affected or reduced by the member's selection of the actuarially reduced spousal survivor benefit provided by this section.

(5)(a) Any member who chose to receive a reduced retirement allowance under subsection (1) of this section is entitled to receive a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of this subsection if:

(i) The retiree's survivor spouse designated in subsection (1) of this section predeceases the retiree; and

(ii) The retiree provides to the department proper proof of the designated beneficiary's death.

(b) The retirement allowance payable to the retiree from the beginning of the month following the date of the beneficiary's death shall be increased by the following:

(i) One hundred percent multiplied by the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection converted to a percent;

(ii) Subtract one from the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and survivor option factor.

--- END ---