BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that more information and analysis is required in order to understand the full implications of retiring eligible coal plants.

(2) The energy division of the department of commerce, in consultation with the appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives, shall study the costs and benefits of retiring an eligible coal plant, including any environmental benefits and any effects on electric rates and reliability. The study shall also include an examination of the regulatory and financial mechanisms and means that would be required to facilitate such retirement. The department of commerce shall coordinate the study with relevant government authorities in Washington and any state where an eligible generating unit is located.

(3) A report must be delivered to the legislature by December 11, 2015.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "eligible coal plant" means a coal-fired electric generating facility that: (a) Had two or less generating units as of January 1, 1980; (b) is owned by more than one electrical company as of the effective date of this section; and (c) provides, as a portion of the load served by the coal-fired electric generating facility, electricity paid for in rates by retail electric customers in the state of Washington.

--- END ---