BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that human trafficking is a horrific problem in the United States and in the state of Washington. The number of persons who are trafficked in the United States may number in the hundreds of thousands. In the Seattle area alone, five hundred children and youth may be forced into commercial sexual exploitation at any given time. Trafficked persons live in constant terror and fear of being abused, beaten, raped, or murdered if they try to leave. Children involved in commercial sexual exploitation are forty times more likely to die, and women are two hundred times more likely to die, when compared with counterparts who are not in the sex trade. There are few survivors of the trade.

(2) Although recent laws have made improvements in the tools afforded to law enforcement to arrest and prosecute offenders, more should be done to identify and rescue survivors by those who may come into contact with persons forced to engage in the sex trade. The legislature finds that those employed in industries related to liquor and adult entertainment should be required to receive training to identify human trafficking survivors. Those employees of other industries and establishments who have the opportunity to come into contact with persons forced to engage in the sex trade are encouraged to receive the same training. These include hospitality and specialty industries such as: Spas, hotels, tattoo parlors, retail stores in malls, internet advertisement or dating services, truck stops, and restaurants and convenience stores not required to have a liquor license. In addition, those who serve as first responders or in medical or public service, such as hospital staff, abortion clinics, schools, or child protective services are also in the unique position to identify and rescue victims and are encouraged to receive training to identify human trafficking survivors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A joint task force on training resources to combat human trafficking is established, with members as provided in this subsection.

(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;

(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(c) One representative from each of the following public, private, and community-based organizations: State liquor and cannabis board, association of Washington counties, Washington coalition of crime victims advocates, Washington engage, shared hope, the businesses ending slavery and trafficking alliance, Washington restaurant association, Washington lodging association, national federation of independent businesses, Washington association of neighborhood stores, and the northwest grocery association;

(2) The task force shall identify and recommend a curriculum for a one-hour online training. The task force shall also consider possible funding sources for developing and providing the training. The training is for workers at establishments that are required to operate with a valid liquor license from the state liquor and cannabis board, or are required to operate with an adult entertainment license or endorsement; businesses and industries whose workers have the opportunity to come into contact with persons forced to work in the sex trade such as spas, hotels, tattoo parlors, retail stores in malls, internet advertisements or dating services, truck stops, and restaurants and convenience stores not required to have a liquor license; and persons who serve as first responders or who are in medical or public service, such as hospital staff, abortion clinics, schools, or child protective services.

(3) The task force shall report its findings and make recommendations to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2016.

(4) The members of the task force shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, within available resources.

(5) This section expires June 30, 2017.

--- END ---