BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.32.550 and 2007 c 254 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A group fishing permit allows a group of individuals to fish, and harvest shellfish, without individual licenses or the payment of individual license fees. The department must also provide, without charge, any applicable catch record cards.

(2) The director must issue a group fishing permit on a seasonal basis to: A state-operated facility or state-licensed nonprofit facility or program for persons with physical or mental disabilities, hospital patients, seriously or terminally ill persons, persons who are dependent on the state because of emotional or physical developmental disabilities, or senior citizens who are in the care of the facility; or a state or local agency or nonprofit organization operating a program for at-risk youth. The permit is valid only for use during open season.

(3) The director may set conditions and issue a group fishing permit to groups working in partnership with and participating in department outdoor education programs. At the discretion of the director, a processing fee may be applied.

(4) The commission may adopt rules that provide the conditions under which a group fishing permit is issued.

--- END ---