BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND INTENT. The legislature finds that the 1063 block replacement project has increased in cost from its original proposal. About eighty percent of the operating budget impact of the project if reauthorized would be imposed on the transportation budget appropriation for the state patrol. The legislature intends to coordinate the consideration of the authorization of the new building with the consideration and development of the transportation budget.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum of ten million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2017, from the state building construction account--state to the department of enterprise services for the continued development of the 1063 block replacement project and is subject to provisions of section 1109, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. (1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements, or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of enterprise services and the state treasurer's office to develop requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include charges for services rendered.

(2) Department of enterprise services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $69,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a new office building at 1063 Capitol Way South, Olympia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---