BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The sale or commercial display of human remains is offensive to community standards of decency. The public outcry against the sale and display of human remains reminds us of the basic dignity that all human remains should be granted. The legislature through this act does not intend to prevent legitimate medical or educational endeavors and believes the respectful treatment and disposal of human remains is compatible with those aims. The legislature does intend to prohibit the sale for profit of human remains and any commercial display for advertising or other benefit.

Sec. 2. RCW 68.50.130 and 2005 c 365 s 139 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person who performs a disposition of any human remains, except as otherwise provided by law, in any place, except in a cemetery or a building dedicated exclusively for religious purposes, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) A person who sells or commercially displays human remains is guilty of a class C felony.

(3) Disposition of cremated human remains may also occur on private property, with the consent of the property owner; and on public or government lands or waters with the approval of the government agency that has either jurisdiction or control, or both, of the lands or waters.

(4) Nothing in this section prohibits the possession of human remains by authorized search and rescue personnel for the purpose of training human remains detection canines. For the purposes of this subsection, "authorized search and rescue personnel" means personnel registered as emergency workers with their county's department of emergency management who deploy at the direction of law enforcement agencies.

(5) Nothing in this section prohibits the possession, exhibition, or display of human remains for educational or artistic purposes at a public or private museum or gallery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect September 1, 2015.

--- END ---