BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds medical examinations are important for children who may be victims of physical abuse. The legislature finds that contributing to the cost of these examinations will incentivize timely evaluations, lead to early identification of abuse, and potentially prevent a child from further traumatization or injury.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 7.68 RCW to read as follows:

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department must pay, secondary to other insurance benefits, all costs incurred by an institution as defined by RCW 26.44.020 for the examination of a suspected victim of assault of a child when the examination is conducted within seventy-five days of the filing of a petition for dependency under chapter 13.34 or 26.44 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act expires June 30, 2019.

--- END ---