BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.37.020 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every vehicle upon a highway within this state at any time from a half hour after sunset to a half hour before sunrise ((and at any other time when, due to insufficient light or unfavorable atmospheric conditions, persons and vehicles on the highway are not clearly discernible at a distance of one thousand feet ahead shall))must display lighted headlights, other lights, and illuminating devices as hereinafter respectively required for different classes of vehicles, subject to exceptions with respect to parked vehicles, and such stop lights, turn signals, and other signaling devices shall be lighted as prescribed for the use of such devices.

(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, from thirty minutes before sunrise to thirty minutes after sunset, every vehicle operating on a highway within this state must:

(a) Use head lamps lit at low beam, if the vehicle was manufactured before January 1, 2018, and is not equipped with daytime running head lamps; or

(b) Use daytime running head lamps, if the vehicle is equipped with daytime running head lamps.

(3) Head lamps lit at low beam or high beam must be used at any time when, due to insufficient light or unfavorable atmospheric conditions, persons and vehicles on the highway are not clearly discernible at a distance of one thousand feet ahead.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.37.040 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every motor vehicle shall be equipped with at least two head lamps with at least one on each side of the front of the motor vehicle, which head lamps shall comply with the requirements and limitations set forth in this chapter.

(2) Every head lamp upon every motor vehicle shall be located at a height measured from the center of the head lamp of not more than fifty-four inches nor less than twenty-four inches to be measured as set forth in RCW 46.37.030(2).

(3) Every motor vehicle offered for sale in Washington, manufactured after January 1, 2018, must be equipped with daytime running head lamps.

--- END ---