BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.12.063 and 2011 c 376 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to continue the department's policy giving priority consideration to abutting property owners in agricultural areas when disposing of property through its surplus property program under this section.

(2) Whenever the department determines that any real property owned by the state of Washington and under the jurisdiction of the department is no longer required for transportation purposes ((and that it is in the public interest to do so)), the department ((may))shall, within five years of making the determination, sell the property or exchange it in full or part consideration for land or improvements or for construction of improvements at fair market value to any person through the solicitation of written bids through public advertising in the manner prescribed under RCW 47.28.050 or in the manner prescribed under RCW 47.12.283.

(3) The department may forego the processes prescribed by RCW 47.28.050 and 47.12.283 and sell the real property to any of the following entities or persons at fair market value:

(a) Any other state agency;

(b) The city or county in which the property is situated;

(c) Any other municipal corporation;

(d) Regional transit authorities created under chapter 81.112 RCW;

(e) The former owner of the property from whom the state acquired title;

(f) In the case of residentially improved property, a tenant of the department who has resided thereon for not less than six months and who is not delinquent in paying rent to the state;

(g) Any abutting private owner but only after each other abutting private owner (if any), as shown in the records of the county assessor, is notified in writing of the proposed sale. If more than one abutting private owner requests in writing the right to purchase the property within fifteen days after receiving notice of the proposed sale, the property shall be sold at public auction in the manner provided in RCW 47.12.283;

(h) To any other owner of real property required for transportation purposes;

(i) In the case of property suitable for residential use, any nonprofit organization dedicated to providing affordable housing to very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510 and is eligible to receive assistance through the Washington housing trust fund created in chapter 43.185 RCW; or

(j) A federally recognized Indian tribe within whose reservation boundary the property is located.

(4) When selling real property pursuant to RCW 47.12.283, the department may withhold or withdraw the property from an auction when requested by one of the entities or persons listed in subsection (3) of this section and only after the receipt of a nonrefundable deposit equal to ten percent of the fair market value of the real property or five thousand dollars, whichever is less. This subsection does not prohibit the department from exercising its discretion to withhold or withdraw the real property from an auction if the department determines that the property is no longer surplus or chooses to sell the property through one of the other means listed in subsection (2) of this section. If a transaction under this subsection is not completed within sixty days, the real property must be put back up for sale.

(5) Sales to purchasers may at the department's option be for cash, by real estate contract, or exchange of land or improvements. Transactions involving the construction of improvements must be conducted pursuant to chapter 47.28 RCW and Title 39 RCW, as applicable, and must comply with all other applicable laws and rules.

(6) Conveyances made pursuant to this section shall be by deed executed by the secretary of transportation and shall be duly acknowledged.

(7) Unless otherwise provided, all moneys received pursuant to the provisions of this section less any real estate broker commissions paid pursuant to RCW 47.12.320 shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.12.283 and 2010 c 8 s 10006 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the department of transportation determines that any real property owned by the state of Washington and under the jurisdiction of the department is no longer required for highway purposes ((and that it is in the public interest to do so)), the department ((may, in its discretion))shall, within five years of making the determination, sell the property under RCW 47.12.063 or under subsections (2) through (6) of this section.

(2) Whenever the department determines to sell real property under its jurisdiction at public auction, the department shall first give notice thereof by publication on the same day of the week for two consecutive weeks, with the first publication at least two weeks prior to the date of the auction, in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the area where the property to be sold is located. The notice shall be placed in both the legal notices section and the real estate classified section of the newspaper. The notice shall contain a description of the property, the time and place of the auction, and the terms of the sale. The sale may be for cash or by real estate contract.

(3) The department shall sell the property at the public auction, in accordance with the terms set forth in the notice, to the highest and best bidder providing the bid is equal to or higher than the appraised fair market value of the property.

(4) If no bids are received at the auction or if all bids are rejected, the department may, in its discretion, enter into negotiations for the sale of the property or may list the property with a licensed real estate broker. No property shall be sold by negotiations or through a broker for less than the property's appraised fair market value. Any offer to purchase real property pursuant to this subsection shall be in writing and may be rejected at any time prior to written acceptance by the department.

(5) Before the department shall approve any offer for the purchase of real property having an appraised value of more than ten thousand dollars, pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the department shall first publish a notice of the proposed sale in a local newspaper of general circulation in the area where the property is located. The notice shall include a description of the property, the selling price, the terms of the sale, including the price and interest rate if sold by real estate contract, and the name and address of the department employee or the real estate broker handling the transaction. The notice shall further state that any person may, within ten days after the publication of the notice, deliver to the designated state employee or real estate broker a written offer to purchase the property for not less than ten percent more than the negotiated sale price, subject to the same terms and conditions. A subsequent offer shall not be considered unless it is accompanied by a deposit of twenty percent of the offer in the form of cash, money order, cashiers check, or certified check payable to the Washington state treasurer, to be forfeited to the state (for deposit in the motor vehicle fund) if the offeror fails to complete the sale if the offeror's offer is accepted. If a subsequent offer is received, the first offeror shall be informed by registered or certified mail sent to the address stated in his or her offer. The first offeror shall then have ten days, from the date of mailing the notice of the increased offer, in which to file with the designated state employee or real estate broker a higher offer than that of the subsequent offeror. After the expiration of the ten-day period, the department shall approve in writing the highest and best offer which the department then has on file.

(6) All moneys received pursuant to this section, less any real estate broker's commissions paid pursuant to RCW 47.12.320, shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

--- END ---