BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The state liquor control board may not issue, transfer, or renew a marijuana retail license for any business that operates or intends to operate a drive through purchase facility where marijuana, marijuana concentrates, marijuana-infused products, or useable marijuana are to be sold at retail and dispensed through a window or door to a purchaser in or on a motor vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The state liquor control board may not issue, transfer, or renew a marijuana retail license for any business that operates or intends to operate a vending machine, as defined in RCW 82.08.080(3), for the sale of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, marijuana-infused products, or useable marijuana at retail.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. It is unlawful to sell marijuana, marijuana concentrates, marijuana-infused products, or useable marijuana through a drive through purchase facility that dispenses through a window or door to a purchaser in or on a motor vehicle. A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. It is unlawful to sell marijuana, marijuana concentrates, marijuana-infused products, or useable marijuana in a vending machine, as defined in RCW 82.08.080(3). A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 4 of this act are each added to chapter 69.50 RCW.

--- END ---