BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that academic and postsecondary school outcomes for students with disabilities in Washington can be improved by the identification and dissemination of nationally recognized best practices and model program efforts within the state, and through the development and implementation of a clearinghouse for parents, schools, and school districts.

(2) The legislature further finds that the special education state advisory council was established by rule in the office of the superintendent of public instruction to advise the superintendent and make recommendations on all matters related to special education.

(3) To help improve academic and postsecondary school outcomes for students with disabilities, the legislature intends that the superintendent of public instruction implement a plan of state-identified measurable results to be phased in over a period of five years.

(4) The legislature further intends to enable the superintendent of public instruction's special education state advisory council to facilitate and monitor these actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The special education state advisory council is established in the office of the superintendent of public instruction to help facilitate the provision of special education and related services to meet the unique needs of special education students.

(2) The duties of the special education state advisory council include the following:

(a) Advising the superintendent of public instruction in the development and support of a best practices and model programs clearinghouse for special educational instructional strategies available to parents, schools, and districts;

(b) Monitoring the development and implementation of a plan of state-identified measurable results in special education to be phased in over a period of five years; and

(c) Reporting by December 1, 2017, and December 1, 2019, to the superintendent of public instruction regarding the council's recommendations for making systemic changes to improve academic and postsecondary outcomes for students with disabilities. The superintendent of public instruction shall disseminate the report to the governor and the legislature. The report must identify successful school district or school models and service delivery.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall staff the special education state advisory council and establish technical work groups to accomplish any of these duties for a period of five years.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

The superintendent of public instruction shall provide for training of an additional twenty leaders per year for fiscal year 2016 and fiscal year 2017 in the area of special education administration at the University of Washington-Bothell.

--- END ---