BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.87.130 and 1969 ex.s. c 185 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

((No county shall vacate a county road or part thereof which abuts on a body of salt or freshwater unless the purpose of the vacation is to enable any public authority to acquire the vacated property for port purposes, boat moorage or launching sites, or for park, viewpoint, recreational, educational or other public purposes, or unless the property is zoned for industrial uses.))

A county legislative authority may vacate a county road or any portion of the road if it abuts a body of freshwater or salt water only if:

(1) The vacation is sought to acquire the property for port purposes, for beach or water access, for boat moorage or launching sites, for places of recreation, parks, or public viewing, or for educational purposes;

(2) The property is zoned or abuts property zoned for industrial uses;

(3) The road is not suitable for any of the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section; or

(4) The county adopts a plan to provide comparable or improved public access to the same body of water to which the road sought to be vacated abuts.

--- END ---