BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 10.77 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If the defendant is charged with a nonfelony offense, and the issue of competency to stand trial is raised by the court or a party under RCW 10.77.060, the prosecutor may continue with the competency process or dismiss the charges without prejudice and refer the defendant for assessment by a mental health professional, chemical dependency professional, or developmental disabilities professional to determine the appropriate service needs for the defendant.

(2) This section does not apply to defendants with a current charge or prior conviction for a serious violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

--- END ---