BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.12.020 and 2007 c 169 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The hourly wages to be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics, upon all public works and under all public building service maintenance contracts of the state or any county, municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws, shall be not less than the prevailing rate of wage for an hour's work in the same trade or occupation in the locality within the state where such labor is performed. For a contract in excess of ten thousand dollars, a contractor required to pay the prevailing rate of wage shall post in a location readily visible to workers at the job site: PROVIDED, That on road construction, sewer line, pipeline, transmission line, street, or alley improvement projects for which no field office is needed or established, a contractor may post the prevailing rate of wage statement at the contractor's local office, gravel crushing, concrete, or asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a copy of the wage statement to any employee on request:

(((1))) (a) A copy of a statement of intent to pay prevailing wages approved by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries under RCW 39.12.040; and

(((2))) (b) The address and telephone number of the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries where a complaint or inquiry concerning prevailing wages may be made.

(2) This chapter shall not apply to:

(a) Workers or other persons regularly employed by the state, or any county, municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws; or

(b)(i) Public works projects designed for youth recreational activities, including the exposure to positive sports, programming, and cultural activities, with the purpose of: Increasing opportunities for gang prevention, intervention, and suppression; reducing the impacts of gang involvement and recruitment; building supportive ties and affiliations between youth and the local community; and creating a unified effort among parents and community, educational, criminal justice, and employment systems.

(ii) This exemption is limited to projects where a municipality, as defined in RCW 39.04.010, has held a public hearing regarding the uses and benefits of the public works project, and passed an ordinance or resolution identifying the project as meeting the purposes of this subsection (2)(b).

--- END ---