BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes the important task of fostering the conditions for growing a vibrant economy in Washington. Washington enjoys many benefits as a region that make it a desirable location including a skilled workforce, world class research institutions, strong and vibrant basic economic sectors, and a diverse international trade sector. Washington competes in a global economy, and many states and regions offer a variety of economic incentives, infrastructure investments, workforce training, and other tools to support business development to their region. Through the establishment of a joint legislative task force, the legislature intends to identify best practices for fostering an investment ecosystem that grows local business and attracts new business development in targeted high growth, high wage industries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A legislative task force on middle market business and retaining and creating jobs in Washington is established, with eleven members appointed as follows:

(a) The president of the senate must appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;

(b) The speaker of the house of representatives must appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives;

(c) The director of the department of commerce or the director's designee;

(d) A representative from an organization specializing in driving middle market growth, appointed by the chair or cochairs;

(e) A representative from an organization representing Washington manufacturers, appointed by the chair or cochairs;

(f) A representative of workforce development, appointed by the chair or cochairs;

(g) A representative from a local economic development organization, appointed by the chair or cochairs;

(h) A representative of the business community, appointed by the chair or cochairs; and

(i) A representative of labor, appointed by the chair or cochairs.

(2) The task force must:

(a) Choose a chair or cochairs from among its legislative membership at its initial meeting. The initial meeting must be called by agreement of a majority of the appointed members;

(b) Review current efforts to promote business expansion and job retention and creation in Washington and compare those programs to other states and regions to find best practices;

(c) Provide any recommendations identified by the task force that involve statutory changes, funding recommendations, or administrative action to the legislature. If statutory changes are recommended, the task force must provide the recommendations in the form of draft legislation. Task force recommendations require the approval of a majority of the appointed members;

(d) Ensure that the task force provides ample opportunity for input from interested stakeholders including basic industry leaders in supply chains and market expansion.

(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by senate committee services and the office of program research. The department of commerce, and other relevant state agencies identified by the task force during the course of its work, must cooperate with the task force and provide information and assistance at the request of the task force.

(4) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.

(5) Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(6) The task force must provide recommendations, if any, to the appropriate legislative committees, as described under subsection (2)(c) of this section and consistent with RCW 43.01.036 by November 1, 2015.

(7) This section expires June 30, 2016.

--- END ---