BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that due to a shortage of primary care physicians, many rural and economically disadvantaged urban communities are medically underserved.

(2) The legislature further finds that the Washington state department of health has established individuals living in rural areas of Washington state are more likely to suffer from preventable conditions and engage in activities that threaten health, such as smoking cigarettes, and according to the United States centers for disease control and prevention, communities of color, who live in greater numbers in underserved urban areas, experience higher rates of obesity, cancer, diabetes, and AIDS.

(3) The legislature finds community health centers provide valuable primary and preventive health care services for people living in rural and urban medically underserved communities, and such service is provided regardless of a patient's ability to pay.

(4) The legislature further finds prevention education and access to consistent primary health care can reduce health care costs in the long term and improve general productivity.

(5) Consequently, it is to the benefit of not only underserved communities but the state as a whole to invest in measures that reduce primary care shortages and increase access to health care and preventative medicine.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Sections 3 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Within funds appropriated to the department of health for this purpose, and with the goal of increasing the number of family medicine residency positions at community health centers, and thereby increasing the number of family medicine physicians working in underserved settings, a family medicine residency training grant program is created. Grant funds provided for the purpose of increasing the number of family medicine residency positions at community health centers must be disbursed by the department of health to at least three accredited, three-year family medicine residency programs sponsored or sited at community health centers in rural or urban medically underserved areas. In the first year, and each subsequent year thereafter, family medicine residency programs to which the grant funds are awarded shall offer at least two first-year postgraduate residency positions in family medicine. In the second year, and each subsequent year thereafter, these family medicine residency programs shall also offer at least two second-year postgraduate residency positions in family medicine. In the third year, and each subsequent year thereafter, these family medicine residency programs shall also offer at least two third-year postgraduate residency positions in family medicine.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a performance audit and evaluation of the family medicine residency training grant program created in section 3 of this act every five years. The first audit must be conducted by December 31, 2021. The audit must include a comparison of family medicine physicians who did their postgraduate family medicine residency training at community health centers with those who did their postgraduate family medicine residency training in other programs to determine whether the location of the family medicine residency training influenced or affected where the resident ultimately chose to work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) The family medicine residency training account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. No appropriation is required for expenditures of funds from the account. The account is not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW except for moneys used for program administration.

(2) The department of health shall deposit into the account all moneys received from private contributions for the program. The account must be self-sustaining and consist of private contributions for the family medicine residency training grant program.

(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for grants to family medicine residency programs sponsored or sited in community health centers in rural or urban medically underserved areas and costs associated with program administration by the department of health.

(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the authorization of the department of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 82.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An additional tax is imposed upon the sale, use, consumption, handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes, in an amount equal to seven and one-half cents per pack.

(2) The revenue collected under this section must deposited in the family medicine residency training account created in section 5 of this act.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2013 c 251 s 5 and 2013 c 88 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury for cash management and cash balance purposes.

(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.

(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings credited to the investment income account to the state general fund except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.

(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the accessible communities account, the community and technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the county enhanced 911 excise tax account, the toll collection account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the family medicine residency training account, the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the industrial insurance rainy day fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the multiagency permitting team account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar pool account, the regional transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual development account program account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account, the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss account, the school for the blind account, the Millersylvania park trust fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund, and the radiation perpetual maintenance fund.

(c) The following accounts and funds must receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---