BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.410.010 and 2014 c 50 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The Washington professional educator standards board shall establish, publish, and enforce rules determining eligibility for and certification of personnel employed in the common schools of this state, including certification for emergency or temporary, substitute or provisional duty and under such certificates or permits as the board shall deem proper or as otherwise prescribed by law.

(b)(i) By December 1, 2015, the board must amend or adopt rules that provide for the issuance of the certification necessary to serve as substitute teachers, other than emergency substitute certification, to adjunct faculty currently employed in institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.07.020 and 28B.10.016, who meet the following criteria:

(A) A minimum of a master's degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education;

(B) Three or more years of demonstrated successful experience instructing students; and

(C) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness requirements adopted by rule for teachers.

(ii) Individuals who meet the criteria established in (b)(i) of this subsection are not required to have completed an approved teacher preparation program or to hold or have held a regular teaching certificate.

(c) The rules shall require that the initial application for certification shall require a record check of the applicant through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system and through the federal bureau of investigation at the applicant's expense. The record check shall include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint card. An individual who holds a valid portable background check clearance card issued by the department of early learning consistent with RCW 43.215.215 is exempt from the office of the superintendent of public instruction fingerprint background check if the individual provides a true and accurate copy of his or her Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation background report results to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent of public instruction may waive the record check for any applicant who has had a record check within the two years before application. The rules shall permit a holder of a lapsed certificate but not a revoked or suspended certificate to be employed on a conditional basis by a school district with the requirement that the holder must complete any certificate renewal requirements established by the state board of education within two years of initial reemployment.

(((b))) (d) In establishing rules pertaining to the qualifications of instructors of American sign language the board shall consult with the national association of the deaf, "sign instructors guidance network" (s.i.g.n.), and the Washington state association of the deaf for evaluation and certification of sign language instructors.

(((c))) (e) The board shall develop rules consistent with RCW 18.340.020 for the certification of spouses of military personnel.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall act as the administrator of any such rules and have the power to issue any certificates or permits and revoke the same in accordance with board rules.

--- END ---