BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

If a new revenue package is passed by the legislature after January 1, 2015, the department may not expend any funds from the new revenue package on the state route number 99 Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project. The department may not expend more than the maximum amount for the state contribution provided in RCW 47.01.402(6)(b).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---