BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of fish and wildlife must amend the existing wolf conservation and management plan, as adopted in December 2011, to better address the wolf recovery rate and uneven distribution that has occurred since the initial adoption of the plan.

(2) The department of fish and wildlife must amend the wolf conservation and management plan as the department best sees fit to manage the state's growing wolf population. However, the amendments must include, at a minimum:

(a) The identification of a management result, based on a minimum number of wolves and an appropriate distribution pattern in two of the three recovery zones identified in the plan, that allows recovery to be deemed successful; and

(b) A change in the metric for identifying successful wolf recovery that is based on the number of wolf packs in the state and not on the number of breeding pairs.

(3) The amendments to the wolf conservation and management plan made under this section are not subject to the provision of RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c).

(4) The amendments to the wolf conservation and management plan required under this section must be completed by June 30, 2017.

(5) This section expires June 30, 2018.

--- END ---