BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the public discussion and setting of education policy in the state of Washington is primarily the duty of the legislature. Between the legislature and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, all necessary policy-making authority and corresponding implementation of that policy can be dispatched efficiently, fairly, and with utmost accountability to the public. The legislature also finds that it has delegated policy-setting authority to a board that is not a publicly elected entity, nor are the members on the board, with rare exception, practitioners in the field over which the board has purview, nor do they have technical expertise in educational policy. The legislature further finds that the policies that were delegated to the state board of education have now been completed, leaving the board with duties that can easily be transferred to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to eliminate the state board of education effective December 2015 and that such duties and functions still within the authority of the state board of education be transferred to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.300.020 and 2005 c 497 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

The superintendent of public instruction may appoint assistant superintendents of public instruction, a deputy superintendent of public instruction, and may employ such other assistants and clerical help as are necessary to carry out the duties of the superintendent ((and the state board of education. However, the superintendent shall employ without undue delay the executive director of the state board of education and other state board of education office assistants and clerical help, appointed by the state board under RCW 28A.305.130, whose positions are allotted and funded in accordance with moneys appropriated exclusively for the operation of the state board of education. The rate of compensation and termination of any such executive director, state board office assistants, and clerical help shall be subject to the prior consent of the state board of education)). The assistant superintendents, deputy superintendent, and such other officers and employees as are exempted from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW, shall serve at the pleasure of the superintendent ((or at the pleasure of the superintendent and the state board of education as provided in this section. Expenditures by the superintendent of public instruction for direct and indirect support of the state board of education are valid operational expenditures by and in behalf of the office of the superintendent of public instruction)).

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.300.035 and 1994 c 113 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If the superintendent of public instruction ((or the state board of education)), in carrying out ((their)) the superintendent's powers and duties under Title 28A RCW, request the service of any certificated or classified employee of a school district upon any committee formed for the purpose of furthering education within the state, or within any school district therein, and such service would result in a need for a school district to employ a substitute for such certificated or classified employee during such service, payment for such a substitute may be made by the superintendent of public instruction from funds appropriated by the legislature for the current use of the common schools and such payments shall be construed as amounts needed for state support to the common schools under RCW 28A.150.380. If such substitute is paid by the superintendent of public instruction, no deduction shall be made from the salary of the certificated or classified employee. In no event shall a school district deduct from the salary of a certificated or classified employee serving on such committee more than the amount paid the substitute employed by the district.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.300.041 and 2009 c 310 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that a statewide student assessment system should improve and inform classroom instruction, support accountability, and provide useful information to all levels of the educational system, including students, parents, teachers, schools, school districts, and the state. The legislature intends to redesign the current statewide system, in accordance with the recommendations of the Washington assessment of student learning legislative work group, to:

(a) Include multiple assessment formats, including both formative and summative, as necessary to provide information to help improve instruction and inform accountability;

(b) Enable collection of data that allows both statewide and nationwide comparisons of student learning and achievement; and

(c) Be balanced so that the information used to make significant decisions that affect school accountability or student educational progress includes many data points and does not rely on solely the results of a single assessment.

(2) The legislature further finds that one component of the assessment system should be instructionally supportive formative assessments. The key design elements or characteristics of an instructionally supportive assessment must:

(a) Be aligned to state standards in areas that are being assessed;

(b) Measure student growth and competency at multiple points throughout the year in a manner that allows instructors to monitor student progress and have the necessary trend data with which to improve instruction;

(c) Provide rapid feedback;

(d) Link student growth with instructional elements in order to gauge the effectiveness of educators and curricula;

(e) Provide tests that are appropriate to the skill level of the student;

(f) Support instruction for students of all abilities, including highly capable students and students with learning disabilities;

(g) Be culturally, linguistically, and cognitively relevant, appropriate, and understandable to each student taking the assessment;

(h) Inform parents and draw parents into greater participation of the student's study plan;

(i) Provide a way to analyze the assessment results relative to characteristics of the student such as, but not limited to, English language learners, gender, ethnicity, poverty, age, and disabilities;

(j) Strive to be computer-based and adaptive; and

(k) Engage students in their learning.

(3) The legislature further finds that a second component of the assessment system should be a state-administered summative achievement assessment that can be used as a check on the educational system in order to guide state expectations for the instruction of children and satisfy legislative demands for accountability. The key design elements or characteristics of the state administered achievement assessment must:

(a) Be aligned to state standards in areas that are being assessed;

(b) Maintain and increase academic rigor;

(c) Measure student learning growth over years; and

(d) Strengthen curriculum.

(4) The legislature further finds that a third component of the assessment system should include classroom-based assessments, which may be formative, summative, or both. Depending on their use, classroom-based assessments should have the same design elements and characteristics described in this section for formative and summative assessments.

(5) The legislature further finds that to sustain a strong and viable assessment system, preservice and ongoing training should be provided for teachers and administrators on the effective use of different types of assessments.

(6) The legislature further finds that as the statewide data system is developed, data should be collected for all state-required statewide assessments to be used for accountability and to monitor overall student achievement.

(7) The superintendent of public instruction((, in consultation with the state board of education,)) shall begin design and development of an overall assessment system that meets the principles and characteristics described in this section. In designing formative and summative assessments, the superintendent shall solicit bids for the use of computerized adaptive testing methodologies.

(8) Beginning December 1, 2009, and annually thereafter, the superintendent ((and state board)) shall ((jointly)) report to the legislature regarding the assessment system, including a cost analysis of any changes and costs to expand availability and use of instructionally supportive formative assessments.

Sec. 5. RCW 28A.305.130 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

((The purpose of the state board of education is to provide advocacy and strategic oversight of public education; implement a standards-based accountability framework that creates a unified system of increasing levels of support for schools in order to improve student academic achievement; provide leadership in the creation of a system that personalizes education for each student and respects diverse cultures, abilities, and learning styles; and promote achievement of the goals of RCW 28A.150.210. In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the state board of education shall:

(1) Hold regularly scheduled meetings at such time and place within the state as the board shall determine and may hold such special meetings as may be deemed necessary for the transaction of public business;

(2) Form committees as necessary to effectively and efficiently conduct the work of the board;

(3) Seek advice from the public and interested parties regarding the work of the board;

(4))) For purposes of statewide kindergarten through grade twelve accountability, the superintendent shall:

(((a))) (1) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading, writing, science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level, once assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical education programs; and student attendance, ((as the board deems)) appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the requirements of the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998, each as amended. The goals may be established for all students, economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient students, students with disabilities, and students from disproportionately academically underachieving racial and ethnic backgrounds. The ((board)) superintendent may establish school and school district goals addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction goals for students in grades seven through twelve. The ((board)) superintendent shall adopt the goals by rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the ((board)) superintendent shall present the goal to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment in a time frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature;

(((b)(i))) (2) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the standard on the statewide student assessment and, for high school students, to obtain a certificate of academic achievement. The ((board)) superintendent shall also determine student scores that identify levels of student performance below and beyond the standard. The ((board)) superintendent shall consider the incorporation of the standard error of measurement into the decision regarding the award of the certificates. The ((board)) superintendent shall set such performance standards ((and levels in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction)) and after consideration of any recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that may be established for this purpose((.

(ii) By the end of the 2014-15 school year, establish the scores students must achieve to meet the standard and earn a certificate of academic achievement on the tenth grade English language arts assessment and the end-of-course mathematics assessments developed in accordance with RCW 28A.655.070 to be used as the state transitions to high school assessments developed with a multistate consortium.

(iii) By the end of the 2014-15 school year, establish the scores students must achieve to meet the standard and earn a certificate of academic achievement on the high school English language arts assessment and the comprehensive mathematics assessment developed with a multistate consortium in accordance with RCW 28A.655.070. To determine the appropriate score, the state board shall review the transition experience of Washington students to the consortium-developed assessments, examine the student scores used in other states that are administering the consortium-developed assessments, and review the scores in other states that require passage of an eleventh grade assessment as a high school graduation requirement. The scores established by the state board of education for the purposes of earning a certificate of academic achievement and graduation from high school may be different from the scores used for the purpose of determining a student's career and college readiness.

(iv) The legislature shall be advised of the initial performance standards for the high school statewide student assessment. Any changes recommended by the board in the performance standards for the high school assessment shall be presented to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate by November 30th of the school year in which the changes will take place to permit the legislature to take statutory action before the changes are implemented if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature. The legislature shall be advised of the initial performance standards and any changes made to the elementary level performance standards and the middle school level performance standards. The board must provide an explanation of and rationale for all initial performance standards and any changes, for all grade levels of the statewide student assessment. If the board changes the performance standards for any grade level or subject, the superintendent of public instruction must recalculate the results from the previous ten years of administering that assessment regarding students below, meeting, and beyond the state standard, to the extent that this data is available, and post a comparison of the original and recalculated results on the superintendent's web site));

(((c))) (3) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique populations of students, and ((a recommendation to the superintendent of public instruction of)) recommend any improvements needed to the system; ((and

(d) Include in the biennial report required under RCW 28A.305.035,)) (4) Annually report to the legislature information on the progress that has been made in achieving adopted goals ((adopted by the board));

(5) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and procedures as may be established by the ((state board of education)) superintendent, all private schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a program for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve. However, no private school may be approved that operates a kindergarten program only and no private school shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school officials; and

(6) Articulate with the institutions of higher education, workforce representatives, and early learning policymakers and providers to coordinate and unify the work of the public school system((;

(7) Hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for administrative purposes. Any other personnel of the board shall be appointed as provided by RCW 28A.300.020. The board may delegate to the executive director by resolution such duties as deemed necessary to efficiently carry on the business of the board including, but not limited to, the authority to employ necessary personnel and the authority to enter into, amend, and terminate contracts on behalf of the board. The executive director, administrative assistant, and all but one of the other personnel of the board are exempt from civil service, together with other staff as now or hereafter designated as exempt in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW; and

(8) Adopt a seal that shall be kept in the office of the superintendent of public instruction)).

Sec. 6. RCW 28A.310.010 and 2009 c 381 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the intent and purpose of this chapter to establish educational service districts as regional agencies which are intended to:

(1) Provide cooperative and informational services to local school districts and to other education providers as appropriate;

(2) Assist the superintendent of public instruction ((and the state board of education)) in the performance of ((their respective)) the superintendent's statutory or constitutional duties; and

(3) Provide services to school districts and to the Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss and the school for the blind to assure equal educational opportunities and to other education providers as appropriate.

Sec. 7. RCW 28A.310.280 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to other powers and duties as provided by law, each educational service district superintendent shall:

(1) Perform such recordkeeping, including such annual reports as may be required, and liaison and informational services to local school districts, and the superintendent of public instruction as required by rule ((or regulation)) of the superintendent of public instruction ((or state board of education: PROVIDED, That the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education)) may require some or all of the school districts to report information directly when such reporting procedures are deemed desirable or feasible.

(2) Keep records of official acts of the educational service district board and superintendents in accordance with RCW ((28A.21.120, as now or hereafter amended)) 28A.310.310.

(3) Preserve carefully all reports of school officers and teachers and deliver to the successor of the office all records, books, documents, and papers belonging to the office either personally or through a personal representative, taking a receipt for the same, which shall be filed in the office of the county auditor in the county where the office is located.

Sec. 8. RCW 28A.310.340 and 1990 c 33 s 286 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the legislature that a basic core of uniform services be provided by educational service districts and be identified in statute so that biennial budget requests for educational service districts may be based upon measurable goals and needs. Educational service districts as noted in RCW 28A.310.010, are intended primarily to:

(1) Provide cooperative and informational services to local districts and to perform functions for those districts when such functions are more effectively or economically administered from the regional level;

(2) Assist the state educational agencies((,)) and the office of the superintendent of public instruction ((and the state board of education)) in the legal performance of their duties; and

(3) Assist in providing pupils with equal educational opportunities.

The purpose of RCW 28A.310.350 and 28A.310.360 is to further identify those core services in order to prepare educational service district budgets for the 1979-81 biennium, and those bienniums beyond.

Sec. 9. RCW 28A.315.005 and 2013 c 2 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Under the constitutional framework and the laws of the state of Washington, the governance structure for the state's public common school system is comprised of the following bodies: The legislature, the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, ((the state board of education,)) the Washington charter school commission, the educational service district boards of directors, and local school district boards of directors. The respective policy and administrative roles of each body are determined by the state Constitution and statutes.

(2) Local school districts are political subdivisions of the state and the organization of such districts, including the powers, duties, and boundaries thereof, may be altered or abolished by laws of the state of Washington.

Sec. 10. RCW 28A.315.115 and 1985 c 385 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Persons possessing the status of any of the following positions shall not be eligible to be a member of a regional committee: The superintendent of public instruction, ((a member of the state board of education,)) an educational service district superintendent, a member of a board of directors of a school district, a member of an educational service district board, a member of a governing board of either a private school or a private school district which conducts any grades kindergarten through twelve, officers appointed by any such governing board, and employees of a school district, an educational service district, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, a private school, or a private school district.

Sec. 11. RCW 28A.410.010 and 2014 c 50 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The Washington professional educator standards board shall establish, publish, and enforce rules determining eligibility for and certification of personnel employed in the common schools of this state, including certification for emergency or temporary, substitute or provisional duty and under such certificates or permits as the professional educator standards board shall deem proper or as otherwise prescribed by law. The rules shall require that the initial application for certification shall require a record check of the applicant through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system and through the federal bureau of investigation at the applicant's expense. The record check shall include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint card. An individual who holds a valid portable background check clearance card issued by the department of early learning consistent with RCW 43.215.215 is exempt from the office of the superintendent of public instruction fingerprint background check if the individual provides a true and accurate copy of his or her Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation background report results to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent of public instruction may waive the record check for any applicant who has had a record check within the two years before application. The rules shall permit a holder of a lapsed certificate but not a revoked or suspended certificate to be employed on a conditional basis by a school district with the requirement that the holder must complete any certificate renewal requirements established by the ((state board of education)) professional educator standards board within two years of initial reemployment.

(b) In establishing rules pertaining to the qualifications of instructors of American sign language the professional educator standards board shall consult with the national association of the deaf, "sign instructors guidance network" (s.i.g.n.), and the Washington state association of the deaf for evaluation and certification of sign language instructors.

(c) The professional educator standards board shall develop rules consistent with RCW 18.340.020 for the certification of spouses of military personnel.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall act as the administrator of any such rules and have the power to issue any certificates or permits and revoke the same in accordance with professional educator standards board rules.

Sec. 12. RCW 28A.410.210 and 2009 c 531 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The purpose of the professional educator standards board is to establish policies and requirements for the preparation and certification of educators that provide standards for competency in professional knowledge and practice in the areas of certification; a foundation of skills, knowledge, and attitudes necessary to help students with diverse needs, abilities, cultural experiences, and learning styles meet or exceed the learning goals outlined in RCW 28A.150.210; knowledge of research-based practice; and professional development throughout a career. The Washington professional educator standards board shall:

(1) Establish policies and practices for the approval of programs of courses, requirements, and other activities leading to educator certification including teacher, school administrator, and educational staff associate certification;

(2) Establish policies and practices for the approval of the character of work required to be performed as a condition of entrance to and graduation from any educator preparation program including teacher, school administrator, and educational staff associate preparation program as provided in subsection (1) of this section;

(3) Establish a list of accredited institutions of higher education of this and other states whose graduates may be awarded educator certificates as teacher, school administrator, and educational staff associate and establish criteria and enter into agreements with other states to acquire reciprocal approval of educator preparation programs and certification, including teacher certification from the national board for professional teaching standards;

(4) Establish policies for approval of nontraditional educator preparation programs;

(5) Conduct a review of educator program approval standards at least every five years, beginning in 2006, to reflect research findings and assure continued improvement of preparation programs for teachers, administrators, and school specialized personnel;

(6) Specify the types and kinds of educator certificates to be issued and conditions for certification in accordance with subsection (1) of this section ((and)), RCW 28A.410.010, and as authorized by law;

(7) Apply for and receive federal or other funds on behalf of the state for purposes related to the duties of the professional educator standards board;

(8) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that are necessary for the effective and efficient implementation of this chapter;

(9) Maintain data concerning educator preparation programs and their quality, educator certification, educator employment trends and needs, and other data deemed relevant by the professional educator standards board;

(10) Serve as an advisory body to the superintendent of public instruction on issues related to educator recruitment, hiring, mentoring and support, professional growth, retention, educator evaluation including but not limited to peer evaluation, and revocation and suspension of licensure;

(11) Submit, by October 15th of each even-numbered year, a ((joint)) report ((with the state board of education)) to the legislative education committees, the governor, and the superintendent of public instruction((. The report shall address the progress the boards have made and the obstacles they have encountered, individually and collectively, in the work of achieving the goals set out in RCW 28A.150.210)) regarding the work accomplished by the professional educator standards board as directed by this chapter and any recommendations for improvements related to the effective and efficient discharge of these duties and the programs administered;

(12) Establish the prospective teacher assessment system for basic skills and subject knowledge that shall be required to obtain residency certification pursuant to RCW 28A.410.220 through 28A.410.240;

(13) By January 2010, set performance standards and develop, pilot, and implement a uniform and externally administered professional-level certification assessment based on demonstrated teaching skill. In the development of this assessment, consideration shall be given to changes in professional certification program components such as the culminating seminar; and

(14) Conduct meetings under the provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW.

Sec. 13. RCW 43.06B.010 and 2013 c 23 s 82 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created the office of the education ombuds within the office of the governor for the purposes of providing information to parents, students, and others regarding their rights and responsibilities with respect to the state's public elementary and secondary education system, and advocating on behalf of elementary and secondary students.

(2)(a) The governor shall appoint an ombuds who shall be a person of recognized judgment, independence, objectivity, and integrity and shall be qualified by training or experience or both in the following areas:

(i) Public education law and policy in this state;

(ii) Dispute resolution or problem resolution techniques, including mediation and negotiation; and

(iii) Community outreach.

(b) The education ombuds may not be an employee of any school district((,)) or the office of the superintendent of public instruction((, or the state board of education)) while serving as an education ombuds.

(3) Before the appointment of the education ombuds, the governor shall share information regarding the appointment to a six-person legislative committee appointed and comprised as follows:

(a) The committee shall consist of three senators and three members of the house of representatives from the legislature.

(b) The senate members of the committee shall be appointed by the president of the senate. Two members shall represent the majority caucus and one member the minority caucus.

(c) The house of representatives members of the committee shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. Two members shall represent the majority caucus and one member the minority caucus.

(4) If sufficient appropriations are provided, the education ombuds shall delegate and certify regional education ombuds. The education ombuds shall ensure that the regional ombuds selected are appropriate to the community in which they serve and hold the same qualifications as in subsection (2)(a) of this section. The education ombuds may not contract with the superintendent of public instruction, or any school, school district, or current employee of a school, school district, or the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the provision of regional ombuds services.

Sec. 14. RCW 43.06B.030 and 2013 c 23 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Neither the education ombuds nor any regional educational ombuds are liable for good faith performance of responsibilities under this chapter.

(2) No discriminatory, disciplinary, or retaliatory action may be taken against any student or employee of any school district((,)) or the office of the superintendent of public instruction((, or the state board of education,)) for any communication made, or information given or disclosed, to aid the education ombuds in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities, unless the same was done without good faith or maliciously. This subsection is not intended to infringe upon the rights of a school district to supervise, discipline, or terminate an employee for other reasons or to discipline a student for other reasons.

(3) All communications by the education ombuds or the ombuds's staff or designee, if reasonably related to the education ombuds's duties and responsibilities and done in good faith, are privileged and that privilege shall serve as a defense to any action in libel or slander.

Sec. 15. RCW 43.06B.050 and 2013 c 23 s 86 are each amended to read as follows:

The education ombuds shall report on the work and accomplishment of the office and advise and make recommendations to the governor((,)) and the legislature((, and the state board of education)) annually((. The initial report to the governor, the legislature, and the state board of education shall be made by September 1, 2007, and there shall be annual reports)) by September 1st ((each year thereafter)). The annual reports shall provide at least the following information:

(1) How the education ombuds's services have been used and by whom;

(2) Methods for the education ombuds to increase and enhance family and community involvement in public education;

(3) Recommendations to eliminate barriers and obstacles to meaningful family and community involvement in public education; and

(4) Strategies to improve the educational opportunities for all students in the state, including recommendations from organizations and groups provided in RCW 43.06B.020(8).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 28A.305.011 (Board membership—Terms—Compensation) and 2006 c 263 s 105 & 2005 c 497 s 101;

(2) RCW 28A.305.021 (Election of board members—Restrictions) and 2005 c 497 s 102;

(3) RCW 28A.305.035 (Joint report to the legislature) and 2006 c 263 s 103 & 2005 c 497 s 103; and

(4) RCW 28A.310.480 (Delegation to ESD of state board of education program, project or service—Contract) and 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. RCW 28A.305.902 is decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. This act takes effect December 15, 2015.

--- END ---