BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 39.26 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When purchasing seed, all agencies must require suppliers of seed to ensure the identity and purity of the seed through appropriate testing performed by the Washington state department of agriculture or by any other agency authorized under the laws of any state, territory, or possession that has standards and procedures approved by the United States secretary of agriculture to ensure the identity and purity of seed.

(2) All contracts for purchasing of seed by an agency must include the agency's expectations for the germination or viability of the seed as an essential element of the supplier's performance under the terms of the contract.

(3) For the purposes of this section, tree seed and seed of woody species are not included.

--- END ---