BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning in calendar year 2016, and every year thereafter, the lottery will offer up to four statewide raffle tickets to benefit traffic congestion relief by improving the predictable movement of goods and people on highways throughout Washington state. The raffle tickets will go on sale on a date as determined by the commission, with a drawing to occur in conjunction with President's day, the fourth of July, Thanksgiving, and an additional day as determined by the commission. All net revenues from raffle ticket sales must go towards specific state route highway improvement expenditures that focus solely on traffic congestion relief as the primary objective.

Sec. 2. RCW 67.70.240 and 2013 c 136 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The moneys in the state lottery account may be used only:

(a) For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning lottery tickets or shares;

(b) For purposes of making deposits into the reserve account created by RCW 67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative account created by RCW 67.70.260;

(c) For purposes of making deposits into the Washington opportunity pathways account created in RCW 28B.76.526. Moneys in the state lottery account deposited in the Washington opportunity pathways account are included in "general state revenues" under RCW 39.42.070;

(d) For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account, created in RCW 43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW 43.99N.070, six million dollars must be distributed under this subsection during the calendar year 1998. During subsequent years, such distribution must equal the prior year's distributions increased by four percent. No distribution may be made under this subsection after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of the bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this subsection must cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than December 31, 2020;

(e) For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services; ((and))

(f) For transfer to the traffic congestion relief account created in section 3 of this act. The net revenues received from the sale of the traffic congestion relief raffle tickets conducted under section 1 of this act must be deposited into the traffic congestion relief account. For purposes of this subsection, "net revenues" means all revenues received from the sale of raffle tickets less the sum of the amount paid out in prizes and the actual administration expenses of the lottery solely related to the raffle tickets; and

(g) For the payment of agent compensation.

(2) The office of financial management shall require the allotment of all expenses paid from the account and shall report to the ways and means committees of the senate and house of representatives any changes in the allotments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW to read as follows:

The traffic congestion relief account is created in the motor vehicle fund. All receipts from the sale of the traffic congestion relief raffle tickets conducted under section 1 of this act must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for purposes of funding the construction of state highway traffic congestion relief improvement projects that focus on capacity improvements to the corridor.

--- END ---