BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101. A new section is added to chapter 28B.04 RCW to read as follows:

DISPLACED HOMEMAKER ACT. This chapter expires August 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102. A new section is added to chapter 28B.06 RCW to read as follows:

PROJECT EVEN START. This chapter expires August 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103. 1972 COMMUNITY COLLEGES FACILITIES AID—BOND ISSUE. RCW 28B.56.010, 28B.56.020, 28B.56.040, 28B.56.050, 28B.56.070, 28B.56.080, 28B.56.090, 28B.56.100, 28B.56.110, and 28B.56.120 are each decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104. 1975 COMMUNITY COLLEGE SPECIAL CAPITAL PROJECTS BOND ACT. RCW 28B.57.010, 28B.57.020, 28B.57.030, 28B.57.040, 28B.57.060, 28B.57.070, 28B.57.080, 28B.57.090, and 28B.57.100 are each decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105. 1975 COMMUNITY COLLEGE GENERAL CAPITAL PROJECTS BOND ACT. RCW 28B.58.010, 28B.58.020, 28B.58.030, 28B.58.040, 28B.58.050, 28B.58.060, 28B.58.070, 28B.58.080, and 28B.58.090 are each decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106. 1976 COMMUNITY COLLEGE CAPITAL PROJECTS BOND ACT. RCW 28B.59.010, 28B.59.020, 28B.59.030, 28B.59.040, 28B.59.050, 28B.59.060, 28B.59.070, 28B.59.080, and 28B.59.090 are each decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107. 1977 COMMUNITY COLLEGE CAPITAL PROJECTS BOND ACT. RCW 28B.59B.010, 28B.59B.020, 28B.59B.030, 28B.59B.040, 28B.59B.050, 28B.59B.060, 28B.59B.070, 28B.59B.080, and 28B.59B.090 are each decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108. 1979 COMMUNITY COLLEGE CAPITAL PROJECTS BOND ACT. RCW 28B.59C.010, 28B.59C.020, 28B.59C.030, 28B.59C.040, 28B.59C.050, 28B.59C.060, 28B.59C.070, and 28B.59C.080 are each decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109. 1981 COMMUNITY COLLEGE CAPITAL PROJECTS BOND ACT. RCW 28B.59D.010, 28B.59D.020, 28B.59D.030, 28B.59D.040, 28B.59D.050, 28B.59D.060, and 28B.59D.070 are each decodified.

Sec. 110. RCW 28B.15.546 and 1987 c 231 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Students receiving the Washington award for vocational excellence in 1987 and thereafter are eligible for a second-year waiver.

(2) This section expires August 1, 2015.

Sec. 111. RCW 28B.50.1401 and 2011 c 118 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created a board of trustees for district twenty-six and Lake Washington Vocational-Technical Institute, hereafter known as Lake Washington Institute of Technology. The members of the board shall be appointed pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.50.100.

(2) This section expires August 1, 2015.

Sec. 112. RCW 28B.50.1402 and 1991 c 238 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created a board of trustees for district twenty-seven and Renton Vocational-Technical Institute, hereafter known as Renton Technical College. The members of the board shall be appointed pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.50.100.

(2) This section expires August 1, 2015.

Sec. 113. RCW 28B.50.1403 and 1991 c 238 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created a board of trustees for district twenty-five and Bellingham Vocational-Technical Institute, hereafter known as Bellingham Technical College. The members of the board shall be appointed pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.50.100.

(2) This section expires August 1, 2015.

Sec. 114. RCW 28B.50.1404 and 1991 c 238 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created a new board of trustees for district twenty-eight and Bates Vocational-Technical Institute, hereafter known as Bates Technical College. The members of the board shall be appointed pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.50.100.

(2) This section expires August 1, 2015.

Sec. 115. RCW 28B.50.1405 and 1991 c 238 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created a new board of trustees for district twenty-nine and Clover Park Vocational-Technical Institute, hereafter known as Clover Park Technical College. The members of the board shall be appointed pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.50.100.

(2) This section expires August 1, 2015.

Sec. 116. RCW 28B.50.1406 and 1994 c 217 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created a board of trustees for district thirty and Cascadia Community College. The members of the board shall be appointed pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.50.100.

(2) This section expires August 1, 2015.

Sec. 117. RCW 28B.50.256 and 1991 c 238 s 132 are each amended to read as follows:

If, before September 1, 1991, the use of a single building facility is being shared between an existing vocational-technical institute program and a K-12 program, the respective boards shall continue to share the use of the facility until such time as it is convenient to remove one of the two programs to another facility. The determination of convenience shall be based solely upon the best interests of the students involved.

If a vocational-technical institute district board and a common school district board are sharing the use of a single facility, the program occupying the majority of the space of such facility, exclusive of space utilized equally by both, shall determine which board will be charged with the administration and control of such facility. The determination of occupancy shall be based upon the space occupied as of January 1, 1990.

The board charged with the administration and control of such facility may share expenses with the other board for the use of the facility.

In the event that the two boards are unable to agree upon which board is to administer and control the facility or upon a fair share of expenses for the use of the facility, the governor shall appoint an arbitrator to settle the matter. The decisions of the arbitrator shall be final and binding upon both boards. The expenses of the arbitration shall be divided equally by each board.

This section expires August 1, 2015.

Sec. 118. RCW 28B.50.285 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 24 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By July 1, 2010, and within existing resources, the college board may create a single web site for the purpose of advertising the availability of opportunity express funding to Washington citizens; explaining that opportunity express helps people who want to pursue college and apprenticeship for certain targeted industries; and explaining that opportunity express includes the following tracks: Worker retraining for unemployed adults; training programs approved by the commissioner of the employment security department, training programs administered by labor and management partnerships, and training programs prioritized by industry, for unemployed adults and incumbent workers; opportunity internships for high school students; and opportunity grants for low-income adults. The web site may also direct interested individuals to the appropriate local intake office. The web site may also include a link to the Washington state department of labor and industries apprenticeship program.

(2) This section expires August 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119. TITLE TO OR ALL INTEREST IN REAL ESTATE AND ASSETS OBTAINED FOR VOCATIONAL-TECHNICAL INSTITUTE PURPOSES. RCW 28B.50.301 and 28B.50.302 are each decodified.

Sec. 120. RCW 28B.50.327 and 1991 c 238 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 28B.15 RCW, technical colleges and the Seattle Vocational Institute may continue to collect student tuition and fees per their standard operating procedures in effect on September 1, 1991. The applicability of existing community college rules and statutes pursuant to chapter 28B.15 RCW regarding tuition and fees shall be determined by the state board for community and technical colleges within two years of September 1, 1991.

This section expires August 1, 2015.

Sec. 121. RCW 28B.50.482 and 1991 c 238 s 136 are each amended to read as follows:

Sick leave accumulated by employees of vocational-technical institutes shall be transferred to the college districts without loss of time subject to the provisions of RCW 28B.50.551 and the further provisions of any negotiated agreements then in force.

This section expires August 1, 2015.

Sec. 122. RCW 28B.50.534 and 2007 c 355 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A pilot program is created for two community or technical colleges to make available courses or a program of study, on the college campus, designed to enable students under the age of twenty-one who have completed all state and local high school graduation requirements except the certificate of academic achievement or certificate of individual achievement to complete their high school education and obtain a high school diploma.

(a) The colleges participating in the pilot program in this section may make courses or programs under this section available by entering into contracts with local school districts to deliver the courses or programs. Colleges participating in the pilot program that offer courses or programs under contract shall be reimbursed for each enrolled eligible student as provided in the contract, and the high school diploma shall be issued by the local school district;

(b) Colleges participating in the pilot program may deliver courses or programs under this section directly. Colleges that deliver courses or programs directly shall be reimbursed for each enrolled eligible student as provided in RCW 28A.600.405, and the high school diploma shall be issued by the college;

(c) Colleges participating in the pilot program may make courses or programs under this section available through a combination of contracts with local school districts, collaboration with educational service districts, and direct service delivery. Colleges participating in the pilot program may also make courses or programs under this section available for students at locations in addition to the college campus; or

(d) Colleges participating in the pilot program may enter into regional partnerships to carry out the provisions of this subsection (1).

(2) Regardless of the service delivery method chosen, colleges participating in the pilot program shall ensure that all eligible students located in school districts within their college district as defined in RCW 28B.50.040 have an opportunity to enroll in a course or program under this section.

(3) Colleges participating in the pilot program shall not require students enrolled under this section to pay tuition or services and activities fees; however this waiver of tuition and services and activities fees shall be in effect only for those courses that lead to a high school diploma.

(4) Nothing in this section or RCW 28A.600.405 precludes a community or technical college from offering courses or a program of study for students other than eligible students as defined by RCW 28A.600.405 to obtain a high school diploma, nor is this section or RCW 28A.600.405 intended to restrict diploma completion programs offered by school districts or educational service districts. Community and technical colleges and school districts are encouraged to consult with educational service districts in the development and delivery of programs and courses required under this section.

(5) Community and technical colleges participating in the pilot program shall not be required to administer the ((Washington)) statewide student assessment ((of student learning)).

(6) This section expires August 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123. TRANSFERS OF POWERS. RCW 28B.50.914 and 28B.50.915 are each decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124. EFFECTIVE DATES. RCW 28B.50.917 is decodified.

PART II

Sec. 201. RCW 28B.10.025 and 2005 c 36 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state arts commission shall, in consultation with the boards of regents of the University of Washington and Washington State University and with the boards of trustees of the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical college districts, determine the amount to be made available for the purchases of art under RCW 28B.10.027, and payment therefor shall be made in accordance with law. The designation of projects and sites, the selection, contracting, purchase, commissioning, reviewing of design, execution and placement, acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange, or disposition of works of art shall be the responsibility of the Washington state arts commission in consultation with the board of regents or trustees.

Sec. 202. RCW 28B.10.280 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The boards of regents of the state universities and the boards of trustees of regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and community and technical college districts may each create student loan funds, and qualify and participate in the National Defense Education Act of 1958 and such other similar federal student aid programs as are or may be enacted from time to time, and to that end may comply with all of the laws of the United States, and all of the rules, regulations and requirements promulgated pursuant thereto.

Sec. 203. RCW 28B.10.570 and 2003 c 53 s 171 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person, singly or in concert with others, to interfere by force or violence with any administrator, faculty member, or student of any university, college, or community or technical college who is in the peaceful discharge or conduct of his or her duties or studies.

(2) A person violating this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars, or imprisoned in jail not more than six months, or both such fine and imprisonment.

Sec. 204. RCW 28B.10.571 and 2003 c 53 s 172 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person, singly or in concert with others, to intimidate by threat of force or violence any administrator, faculty member, or student of any university, college, or community or technical college who is in the peaceful discharge or conduct of his or her duties or studies.

(2) A person violating this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars, or imprisoned in jail not more than six months, or both such fine and imprisonment.

Sec. 205. RCW 28B.10.650 and 2004 c 275 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the legislature that when the state and regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and community and technical colleges grant professional leaves to faculty and exempt staff, such leaves be for the purpose of providing opportunities for study, research, and creative activities for the enhancement of the institution's instructional and research programs.

The boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of trustees of the regional universities and of The Evergreen State College and the board of trustees of each community or technical college district may grant remunerated professional leaves to faculty members and exempt staff, as defined in RCW 41.06.070, in accordance with regulations adopted by the respective governing boards for periods not to exceed twelve consecutive months in accordance with the following provisions:

(1) The remuneration from state general funds and general local funds for any such leave granted for any academic year shall not exceed the average of the highest quartile of a rank order of salaries of all full time teaching faculty holding academic year contracts or appointments at the institution or in the district.

(2) Remunerated professional leaves for a period of more or less than an academic year shall be compensated at rates not to exceed a proportional amount of the average salary as otherwise calculated for the purposes of subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The grant of any such professional leave shall be contingent upon a signed contractual agreement between the respective governing board and the recipient providing that the recipient shall return to the granting institution or district following his or her completion of such leave and serve in a professional status for a period commensurate with the amount of leave so granted. Failure to comply with the provisions of such signed agreement shall constitute an obligation of the recipient to repay to the institution any remuneration received from the institution during the leave.

(4) The aggregate cost of remunerated professional leaves awarded at the institution or district during any year, including the cost of replacement personnel, shall not exceed the cost of salaries which otherwise would have been paid to personnel on leaves: PROVIDED, That for community or technical college districts the aggregate cost shall not exceed one hundred fifty percent of the cost of salaries which would have otherwise been paid to personnel on leaves: PROVIDED FURTHER, That this subsection shall not apply to any community or technical college district with fewer than seventy-five full time faculty members and granting fewer than three individuals such leaves in any given year.

(5) The average number of annual remunerated professional leaves awarded at any such institution or district shall not exceed four percent of the total number of full time equivalent faculty, as defined by the office of financial management, who are engaged in instruction, and exempt staff as defined in RCW 41.06.070.

(6) Negotiated agreements made in accordance with chapter 28B.52 RCW and entered into after July 1, 1977, shall be in conformance with the provisions of this section.

(7) The respective institutions and districts shall maintain such information which will ensure compliance with the provisions of this section.

Sec. 206. RCW 28B.10.679 and 2007 c 396 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1) By September 1, 2008, the state board for community and technical colleges, the council of presidents, the higher education coordinating board, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, under the leadership of the transition math project and in collaboration with representatives of public two and four-year institutions of higher education, shall jointly revise the Washington mathematics placement test to serve as a common college readiness test for all two and four-year institutions of higher education.

(2) The revised mathematics college readiness test shall be implemented by all public two and four-year institutions of higher education by September 1, 2009.)) All public two and four-year institutions of higher education must use a common performance standard on the mathematics placement test for purposes of determining college readiness in mathematics. The performance standard must be publicized to all high schools in the state.

Sec. 207. RCW 28B.15.012 and 2014 c 183 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever used in this chapter:

(1) The term "institution" shall mean a public university, college, or community or technical college within the state of Washington.

(2) The term "resident student" shall mean:

(a) A financially independent student who has had a domicile in the state of Washington for the period of one year immediately prior to the time of commencement of the first day of the semester or quarter for which the student has registered at any institution and has in fact established a bona fide domicile in this state primarily for purposes other than educational;

(b) A dependent student, if one or both of the student's parents or legal guardians have maintained a bona fide domicile in the state of Washington for at least one year immediately prior to commencement of the semester or quarter for which the student has registered at any institution;

(c) A student classified as a resident based upon domicile by an institution on or before May 31, 1982, who was enrolled at a state institution during any term of the 1982-1983 academic year, so long as such student's enrollment (excepting summer sessions) at an institution in this state is continuous;

(d) Any student who has spent at least seventy-five percent of both his or her junior and senior years in high schools in this state, whose parents or legal guardians have been domiciled in the state for a period of at least one year within the five-year period before the student graduates from high school, and who enrolls in a public institution of higher education within six months of leaving high school, for as long as the student remains continuously enrolled for three quarters or two semesters in any calendar year;

(e) Any person who has completed the full senior year of high school and obtained a high school diploma, both at a Washington public high school or private high school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or a person who has received the equivalent of a diploma; who has lived in Washington for at least three years immediately prior to receiving the diploma or its equivalent; who has continuously lived in the state of Washington after receiving the diploma or its equivalent and until such time as the individual is admitted to an institution of higher education under subsection (1) of this section; and who provides to the institution an affidavit indicating that the individual will file an application to become a permanent resident at the earliest opportunity the individual is eligible to do so and a willingness to engage in any other activities necessary to acquire citizenship, including but not limited to citizenship or civics review courses;

(f) Any person who has lived in Washington, primarily for purposes other than educational, for at least one year immediately before the date on which the person has enrolled in an institution, and who holds lawful nonimmigrant status pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Sec. (a)(15) (E)(iii), (H)(i), or (L), or who holds lawful nonimmigrant status as the spouse or child of a person having nonimmigrant status under one of those subsections, or who, holding or having previously held such lawful nonimmigrant status as a principal or derivative, has filed an application for adjustment of status pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1255(a);

(g) A student who is on active military duty stationed in the state or who is a member of the Washington national guard;

(h) A student who is on active military duty or a member of the national guard who entered service as a Washington resident and who has maintained Washington as his or her domicile but is not stationed in the state;

(i) A student who is the spouse or a dependent of a person who is on active military duty or a member of the national guard who entered service as a Washington resident and who has maintained Washington as his or her domicile but is not stationed in the state. If the person on active military duty is reassigned out-of-state, the student maintains the status as a resident student so long as the student is continuously enrolled in a degree program;

(j) A student who resides in the state of Washington and is the spouse or a dependent of a person who is a member of the Washington national guard;

(k) A student who has separated from the military under honorable conditions after at least two years of service, and who enters an institution of higher education in Washington within one year of the date of separation who:

(i) At the time of separation designated Washington as his or her intended domicile; or

(ii) Has Washington as his or her official home of record; or

(iii) Moves to Washington and establishes a domicile as determined in RCW 28B.15.013;

(l) A student who is the spouse or a dependent of an individual who has separated from the military under honorable conditions after at least two years of service who:

(i) At the time of discharge designates Washington as his or her intended domicile; and

(ii) Has Washington as his or her primary domicile as determined in RCW 28B.15.013; and

(iii) Enters an institution of higher education in Washington within one year of the date of discharge;

(m) A student of an out-of-state institution of higher education who is attending a Washington state institution of higher education pursuant to a home tuition agreement as described in RCW 28B.15.725;

(n) A student who meets the requirements of RCW 28B.15.0131: PROVIDED, That a nonresident student enrolled for more than six hours per semester or quarter shall be considered as attending for primarily educational purposes, and for tuition and fee paying purposes only such period of enrollment shall not be counted toward the establishment of a bona fide domicile of one year in this state unless such student proves that the student has in fact established a bona fide domicile in this state primarily for purposes other than educational;

(o) A student who resides in Washington and is on active military duty stationed in the Oregon counties of Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco, or Washington; or

(p) A student who resides in Washington and is the spouse or a dependent of a person who resides in Washington and is on active military duty stationed in the Oregon counties of Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco, or Washington. If the person on active military duty moves from Washington or is reassigned out of the Oregon counties of Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco, or Washington, the student maintains the status as a resident student so long as the student resides in Washington and is continuously enrolled in a degree program.

(3) The term "nonresident student" shall mean any student who does not qualify as a "resident student" under the provisions of this section and RCW 28B.15.013. Except for students qualifying under subsection (2)(e) or (m) of this section, a nonresident student shall include:

(a) A student attending an institution with the aid of financial assistance provided by another state or governmental unit or agency thereof, such nonresidency continuing for one year after the completion of such semester or quarter.

(b) A person who is not a citizen of the United States of America who does not have permanent or temporary resident status or does not hold "Refugee-Parolee" or "Conditional Entrant" status with the United States citizenship immigration services or is not otherwise permanently residing in the United States under color of law and who does not also meet and comply with all the applicable requirements in this section and RCW 28B.15.013.

(4) The term "domicile" shall denote a person's true, fixed and permanent home and place of habitation. It is the place where the student intends to remain, and to which the student expects to return when the student leaves without intending to establish a new domicile elsewhere. The burden of proof that a student, parent or guardian has established a domicile in the state of Washington primarily for purposes other than educational lies with the student.

(5) The term "dependent" shall mean a person who is not financially independent. Factors to be considered in determining whether a person is financially independent shall be set forth in rules adopted by the student achievement council and shall include, but not be limited to, the state and federal income tax returns of the person and/or the student's parents or legal guardian filed for the calendar year prior to the year in which application is made and such other evidence as the council may require.

(6) The term "active military duty" means the person is serving on active duty in:

(a) The armed forces of the United States government; or

(b) The Washington national guard; or

(c) The coast guard, merchant mariners, or other nonmilitary organization when such service is recognized by the United States government as equivalent to service in the armed forces.

Sec. 208. RCW 28B.15.014 and 2000 c 117 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges may exempt the following nonresidents from paying all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential:

(1) Any person who resides in the state of Washington and who holds a graduate service appointment designated as such by a public institution of higher education or is employed for an academic department in support of the instructional or research programs involving not less than twenty hours per week during the term such person shall hold such appointment.

(2) Any faculty member, classified staff member or administratively exempt employee holding not less than a half time appointment at an institution who resides in the state of Washington, and the dependent children and spouse of such persons.

(3) Any immigrant refugee and the spouse and dependent children of such refugee, if the refugee (a) is on parole status, or (b) has received an immigrant visa, or (c) has applied for United States citizenship.

(4) Any dependent of a member of the United States congress representing the state of Washington.

Sec. 209. RCW 28B.15.025 and 1985 c 390 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The term "building fees" means the fees charged students registering at the state's colleges and universities, which fees are to be used as follows: At the University of Washington, solely for the purposes provided in RCW 28B.15.210; at Washington State University, solely for the purposes provided in RCW 28B.15.310; at each of the regional universities and at The Evergreen State College, solely for the purposes provided in RCW 28B.35.370; and at the community and technical colleges, for the purposes provided in RCW 28B.50.320, 28B.50.360 and 28B.50.370. The term "building fees" is a renaming of the "general tuition fee," and shall not be construed to affect otherwise moneys pledged to, or used for bond retirement purposes.

Sec. 210. RCW 28B.15.041 and 1985 c 390 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The term "services and activities fees" as used in this chapter is defined to mean fees, other than tuition fees, charged to all students registering at the state's community colleges, technical colleges, regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and state universities. Services and activities fees shall be used as otherwise provided by law or by rule or regulation of the board of trustees or regents of each of the state's community colleges, technical colleges, The Evergreen State College, the regional universities, or the state universities for the express purpose of funding student activities and programs of their particular institution. Student activity fees, student use fees, student building use fees, special student fees, or other similar fees charged to all full time students, or to all students, as the case may be, registering at the state's colleges or universities and pledged for the payment of bonds heretofore or hereafter issued for, or other indebtedness incurred to pay, all or part of the cost of acquiring, constructing or installing any lands, buildings, or facilities of the nature described in RCW 28B.10.300 as now or hereafter amended, shall be included within and deemed to be services and activities fees.

Sec. 211. RCW 28B.15.067 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 958 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) Beginning in the 2011-12 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition fees shall be as provided in the omnibus appropriations act for resident undergraduate students at community and technical colleges. The governing boards of the state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College; and the state board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates, including nonresident students, summer school students, and students in other self-supporting degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition may exceed the fiscal growth factor. Except during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the state board for community and technical colleges may pilot or institute differential tuition models. The board may define scale, scope, and rationale for the models.

(3)(a) Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year and through the end of the 2014-15 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students, including summer school students and students in other self-supporting degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or students; however, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, reductions or increases in tuition must be uniform among resident undergraduate students.

(b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with existing student associations or organizations with student undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of potential tuition increases. Each governing board shall make public its proposal for tuition and fee increases twenty-one days before the governing board of the institution considers adoption and allow opportunity for public comment. However, the requirement to make public a proposal for tuition and fee increases twenty-one days before the governing board considers adoption shall not apply if the omnibus appropriations act has not passed the legislature by May 15th. Governing boards shall be required to provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving financial aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of attendance paid for by aid.

(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year, the state board for community and technical college system shall consult with existing student associations or organizations with undergraduate student representation regarding the impacts of potential tuition increases. The state board for community and technical colleges shall provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving financial aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of attendance paid for by aid.

(4) Beginning with the 2015-16 academic year through the 2018-19 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College may set tuition for resident undergraduates as follows:

(a) If state funding for a college or university falls below the state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year 2011, the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in (d) of this subsection, reduce enrollments, or both;

(b) If state funding for a college or university is at least at the level of state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year 2011, the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in (d) of this subsection and shall continue to at least maintain the actual enrollment levels for fiscal year 2011 or increase enrollments as required in the omnibus appropriations act;

(c) If state funding is increased so that combined with resident undergraduate tuition the sixtieth percentile of the total per-student funding at similar public institutions of higher education in the global challenge states under RCW 28B.15.068 is exceeded, the governing board shall decrease tuition by the amount needed for the total per-student funding to be at the sixtieth percentile under RCW 28B.15.068; and

(d) The amount of tuition set by the governing board for an institution under this subsection (4) may not exceed the sixtieth percentile of the resident undergraduate tuition of similar public institutions of higher education in the global challenge states.

(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.

(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement program through an interlocal agreement between a school district and a community or technical college under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.110.

(7) ((The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose of obtaining a high school diploma.

(8))) Beginning in the 2019-20 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduates at four-year institutions of higher education shall be as provided in the omnibus appropriations act.

(((9))) (8) The legislative advisory committee to the committee on advanced tuition payment established in RCW 28B.95.170 shall:

(a) Review the impact of differential tuition rates on the funded status and future unit price of the Washington advanced college tuition payment program; and

(b) No later than January 14, 2013, make a recommendation to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding how differential tuition should be addressed in order to maintain the ongoing solvency of the Washington advanced college tuition payment program.

Sec. 212. RCW 28B.15.069 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 959 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The building fee for each academic year shall be a percentage of total tuition fees. This percentage shall be calculated by the office of financial management and be based on the actual percentage the building fee is of total tuition for each tuition category in the 1994-95 academic year, rounded up to the nearest half percent.

(2) The governing boards of each institution of higher education, ((except for the technical colleges,)) shall charge to and collect from each student a services and activities fee. A governing board may increase the existing fee annually, consistent with budgeting procedures set forth in RCW 28B.15.045, by a percentage not to exceed the annual percentage increase in student tuition fees for resident undergraduate students: PROVIDED, That such percentage increase shall not apply to that portion of the services and activities fee previously committed to the repayment of bonded debt. These rate adjustments may exceed the fiscal growth factor. For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, each governing board is authorized to increase the services and activities fees by amounts judged reasonable and necessary by the services and activities fee committee and the governing board consistent with the budgeting procedures set forth in RCW 28B.15.045. The services and activities fee committee provided for in RCW 28B.15.045 may initiate a request to the governing board for a fee increase.

(3) Tuition and services and activities fees consistent with subsection (2) of this section shall be set by the state board for community and technical colleges for community and technical college summer school students unless the ((community)) college charges fees in accordance with RCW 28B.15.515.

(4) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, each governing board of a community or technical college may charge such fees for ungraded courses, noncredit courses, community services courses, and self-supporting courses as it, in its discretion, may determine, consistent with the rules of the state board for community and technical colleges.

(5) The governing board of a college offering an applied baccalaureate degree program under RCW 28B.50.810 may charge tuition fees for those courses above the associate degree level at rates consistent with rules adopted by the state board for community and technical colleges, not to exceed tuition fee rates at the regional universities.

Sec. 213. RCW 28B.15.100 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 151 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges shall charge to and collect from each of the students registering at the particular institution for any quarter or semester such tuition fees and services and activities fees, and other fees as such board shall in its discretion determine. For the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College, the total of all fees shall be rounded to the nearest whole dollar amount: PROVIDED, That such tuition fees shall be established in accordance with RCW 28B.15.067.

(2) Part-time students shall be charged tuition and services and activities fees proportionate to full-time student rates established for residents and nonresidents: PROVIDED, That except for students registered at community and technical colleges, students registered for fewer than two credit hours shall be charged tuition and services and activities fees at the rate established for two credit hours: PROVIDED FURTHER, That, subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, residents of Idaho or Oregon who are enrolled in community college district number twenty for six or fewer credits during any quarter or semester may be exempted from payment of all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential upon a declaration by the office of student financial assistance that it finds Washington residents from the community college district are afforded substantially equivalent treatment by such other states.

(3) Full-time students registered for more than eighteen credit hours shall be charged an additional operating fee for each credit hour in excess of eighteen hours at the applicable established per credit hour tuition fee rate for part-time students: PROVIDED, That, subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities and the community and technical colleges may exempt all or a portion of the additional charge, for students who are registered exclusively in first professional programs in medicine, dental medicine, veterinary medicine, doctor of pharmacy, or law, or who are registered exclusively in required courses in vocational preparatory programs.

Sec. 214. RCW 28B.15.385 and 2008 c 188 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW 28B.15.380 ((and 28B.15.520)), the phrase "totally disabled" means a person who has become totally and permanently disabled for life by bodily injury or disease, and is thereby prevented from performing any occupation or gainful pursuit.

Sec. 215. RCW 28B.15.395 and 2013 c 175 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the conditions in subsection (2) of this section and the limitations in RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges, must waive all tuition and fees for the following persons:

(a) A wrongly convicted person; and

(b) Any child or stepchild of a wrongly convicted person who was born or became the stepchild of, or was adopted by, the wrongly convicted person before compensation is awarded under RCW 4.100.060.

(2) The following conditions apply to waivers under subsection (1) of this section:

(a) A wrongly convicted person must be a Washington domiciliary to be eligible for the tuition waiver.

(b) A child must be a Washington domiciliary ages seventeen through twenty-six years to be eligible for the tuition waiver. A child's marital status does not affect eligibility.

(c) Each recipient's continued participation is subject to the school's satisfactory progress policy.

(d) Tuition waivers for graduate students are not required for those who qualify under subsection (1) of this section but are encouraged.

(e) Recipients who receive a waiver under subsection (1) of this section may attend full time or part time. Total credits earned using the waiver may not exceed two hundred quarter credits, or the equivalent of semester credits.

(3) Private vocational schools and private higher education institutions are encouraged to provide waivers consistent with the terms of this section.

(4) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Child" means a biological child, stepchild, or adopted child who was born of, became the stepchild of, or was adopted by a wrongly convicted person before compensation is awarded under RCW 4.100.060.

(b) "Fees" includes all assessments for costs incurred as a condition to a student's full participation in coursework and related activities at an institution of higher education.

(c) "Washington domiciliary" means a person whose true, fixed, and permanent house and place of habitation is the state of Washington. In ascertaining whether a wrongly convicted person or child is domiciled in the state of Washington, public institutions of higher education must, to the fullest extent possible, rely upon the standards provided in RCW 28B.15.013.

(d) "Wrongly convicted person" means a Washington domiciliary who was awarded damages under RCW 4.100.060.

Sec. 216. RCW 28B.15.515 and 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 13 and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The boards of trustees of the community and technical college districts may operate summer schools on either a self-supporting or a state-funded basis.

If summer school is operated on a self-supporting basis, the fees charged shall be retained by the colleges, and shall be sufficient to cover the direct costs, which are instructional salaries and related benefits, supplies, publications, and records.

Community and technical colleges that have self-supporting summer schools shall continue to receive general fund state support for vocational programs that require that students enroll in a four quarter sequence of courses that includes summer quarter due to clinical or laboratory requirements and for ungraded courses limited to adult basic education, vocational apprenticeship, aging and retirement, small business management, industrial first aid, and parent education.

(2) The board of trustees of a community or technical college district may permit the district's state-funded, full-time equivalent enrollment level, as provided in the omnibus state appropriations act, to vary. If the variance is above the state-funded level, the district may charge those students above the state-funded level a fee equivalent to the amount of tuition and fees that are charged students enrolled in state-funded courses. These fees shall be retained by the colleges.

(3) The state board for community and technical colleges shall ensure compliance with this section.

Sec. 217. RCW 28B.15.520 and 2010 c 261 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the community and technical colleges ((may)):

(1)(((a))) May waive all or a portion of tuition fees and services and activities fees for((:

(i))) students nineteen years of age or older who are eligible for resident tuition and fee rates as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 through 28B.15.015, who enroll in a course of study or program which will enable them to finish their high school education and obtain a high school diploma or certificate, but who are not eligible students as defined by RCW 28A.600.405; ((and))

(2)(a) Shall waive all of tuition fees and services and activities fees for:

(((ii))) (i) Children of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 41.26 RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26 or 41.24 RCW, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full time or volunteer fire department in this state: PROVIDED, That such persons may receive the waiver only if they begin their course of study at a community or technical college within ten years of their graduation from high school; and

(((iii))) (ii) Surviving spouses of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 41.26 RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26 or 41.24 RCW, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full time or volunteer fire department in this state.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "totally disabled" means a person who has become totally and permanently disabled for life by bodily injury or disease, and is thereby prevented from performing any occupation or gainful pursuit.

(c) The governing boards of the community and technical colleges shall report to the state board for community and technical colleges on the annual cost of tuition fees and services and activities fees waived for surviving spouses and children under ((parts (a)(ii) and (iii))) (a) of this subsection. The state board for community and technical colleges shall consolidate the reports of the waived fees and annually report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature; and

(((2))) (3) May waive all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential for:

(a) Nonresident students enrolled in a community or technical college course of study or program which will enable them to finish their high school education and obtain a high school diploma or certificate but who are not eligible students as defined by RCW 28A.600.405. The waiver shall be in effect only for those courses which lead to a high school diploma or certificate; and

(b) Up to forty percent of the students enrolled in the regional education program for deaf students, subject to federal funding of such program.

Sec. 218. RCW 28B.15.522 and 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governing boards of the community and technical colleges may waive all or a portion of the tuition and services and activities fees for persons under subsection (2) of this section pursuant to the following conditions:

(a) Such persons shall register for and be enrolled in courses on a space available basis and new course sections shall not be created as a result of the registration;

(b) Enrollment information on persons registered pursuant to this section shall be maintained separately from other enrollment information and shall not be included in official enrollment reports, nor shall such persons be considered in any enrollment statistics which would affect budgetary determinations; and

(c) Persons who enroll under this section shall have the same access to support services as do all other students and shall be subject to all course prerequisite requirements.

(2) A person is eligible for the waiver under subsection (1) of this section if the person:

(a) Meets the requirements for a resident student under RCW 28B.15.011 through 28B.15.015;

(b) Is twenty-one years of age or older;

(c) At the time of initial enrollment under subsection (1) of this section, has not attended an institution of higher education for the previous six months;

(d) Is not receiving or is not entitled to receive unemployment compensation of any nature under Title 50 RCW; and

(e) Has an income at or below the need standard established under chapter 74.04 RCW by the department of social and health services.

(3) The state board for community and technical colleges shall adopt rules to carry out this section.

Sec. 219. RCW 28B.15.543 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 152 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community colleges shall waive tuition and service and activities fees for students named by the office of student financial assistance on or before June 30, 1994, as recipients of the Washington scholars award under RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150. The waivers shall be used only for undergraduate studies. To qualify for the waiver, recipients shall enter the college or university within three years of high school graduation and maintain a minimum grade point average at the college or university equivalent to 3.30. Students shall be eligible to receive a maximum of twelve quarters or eight semesters of waivers and may transfer among state-supported institutions of higher education during that period and continue to have the tuition and services and activities fees waived by the state-supported institution of higher education that the student attends. Should the student's cumulative grade point average fall below 3.30 during the first three quarters or two semesters, that student may petition the office of student financial assistance which shall have the authority to establish a probationary period until such time as the student's grade point average meets required standards.

(2))) Students named by the office of student financial assistance after June 30, 1994, as recipients of the Washington scholars award under RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150 shall be eligible to receive a grant for undergraduate coursework as authorized under RCW 28B.76.660.

Sec. 220. RCW 28B.15.545 and 2004 c 275 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community colleges shall waive tuition and services and activities fees for a maximum of two years for those recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence established under RCW 28C.04.520 through 28C.04.540 who received their awards before June 30, 1994. Each recipient shall not receive a waiver for more than six quarters or four semesters. To qualify for the waiver, recipients shall enter the college or university within three years of receiving the award. A minimum grade point average at the college or university equivalent to 3.00, or an above-average rating at a technical college, shall be required in the first year to qualify for the second-year waiver. The tuition waiver shall be granted for undergraduate studies only.

(2))) Students named by the workforce training and education coordinating board after June 30, 1994, as recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence under RCW 28C.04.520 through 28C.04.550 shall be eligible to receive a grant for undergraduate coursework as authorized under RCW 28B.76.670.

Sec. 221. RCW 28B.15.558 and 2007 c 461 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges may waive all or a portion of the tuition and services and activities fees for state employees as defined under subsection (2) of this section and teachers and other certificated instructional staff under subsection (3) of this section. The enrollment of these persons is pursuant to the following conditions:

(a) Such persons shall register for and be enrolled in courses on a space available basis and no new course sections shall be created as a result of the registration;

(b) Enrollment information on persons registered pursuant to this section shall be maintained separately from other enrollment information and shall not be included in official enrollment reports, nor shall such persons be considered in any enrollment statistics that would affect budgetary determinations; and

(c) Persons registering on a space available basis shall be charged a registration fee of not less than five dollars.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "state employees" means persons employed half-time or more in one or more of the following employee classifications:

(a) Permanent employees in classified service under chapter 41.06 RCW;

(b) Permanent employees governed by chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the exercise of the option under RCW 41.56.201;

(c) Permanent classified employees and exempt paraprofessional employees of technical colleges; and

(d) Faculty, counselors, librarians, and exempt professional and administrative employees at institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

(3) The waivers available to state employees under this section shall also be available to teachers and other certificated instructional staff employed at public common and vocational schools, holding or seeking a valid endorsement and assignment in a state-identified shortage area.

(4) In awarding waivers, an institution of higher education may award waivers to eligible persons employed by the institution before considering waivers for eligible persons who are not employed by the institution.

(5) If an institution of higher education exercises the authority granted under this section, it shall include all eligible state employees in the pool of persons eligible to participate in the program.

(6) In establishing eligibility to receive waivers, institutions of higher education may not discriminate between full-time employees and employees who are employed half-time or more.

Sec. 222. RCW 28B.15.621 and 2009 c 316 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that active military and naval veterans, reserve military and naval veterans, and national guard members called to active duty have served their country and have risked their lives to defend the lives of all Americans and the freedoms that define and distinguish our nation. The legislature intends to honor active military and naval veterans, reserve military and naval veterans, and national guard members who have served on active military or naval duty for the public service they have provided to this country.

(2) Subject to the limitations in RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges, may waive all or a portion of tuition and fees for an eligible veteran or national guard member.

(3) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges, may waive all or a portion of tuition and fees for a military or naval veteran who is a Washington domiciliary, but who did not serve on foreign soil or in international waters or in another location in support of those serving on foreign soil or in international waters and who does not qualify as an eligible veteran or national guard member under subsection (8) of this section. However, there shall be no state general fund support for waivers granted under this subsection.

(4) Subject to the conditions in subsection (5) of this section and the limitations in RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges, shall waive all tuition and fees for the following persons:

(a) A child and the spouse or the domestic partner or surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of an eligible veteran or national guard member who became totally disabled as a result of serving in active federal military or naval service, or who is determined by the federal government to be a prisoner of war or missing in action; and

(b) A child and the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of an eligible veteran or national guard member who lost his or her life as a result of serving in active federal military or naval service.

(5) The conditions in this subsection (5) apply to waivers under subsection (4) of this section.

(a) A child must be a Washington domiciliary between the age of seventeen and twenty-six to be eligible for the tuition waiver. A child's marital status does not affect eligibility.

(b)(i) A surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner must be a Washington domiciliary.

(ii) Except as provided in (b)(iii) of this subsection, a surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner has ten years from the date of the death, total disability, or federal determination of prisoner of war or missing in action status of the eligible veteran or national guard member to receive benefits under the waiver. Upon remarriage or registration in a subsequent domestic partnership, the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner is ineligible for the waiver of all tuition and fees.

(iii) If a death results from total disability, the surviving spouse has ten years from the date of death in which to receive benefits under the waiver.

(c) Each recipient's continued participation is subject to the school's satisfactory progress policy.

(d) Tuition waivers for graduate students are not required for those who qualify under subsection (4) of this section but are encouraged.

(e) Recipients who receive a waiver under subsection (4) of this section may attend full-time or part-time. Total credits earned using the waiver may not exceed two hundred quarter credits, or the equivalent of semester credits.

(6) Required waivers of all tuition and fees under subsection (4) of this section shall not affect permissive waivers of tuition and fees under subsection (3) of this section.

(7) Private vocational schools and private higher education institutions are encouraged to provide waivers consistent with the terms in subsections (2) through (5) of this section.

(8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Child" means a biological child, adopted child, or stepchild.

(b) "Eligible veteran or national guard member" means a Washington domiciliary who was an active or reserve member of the United States military or naval forces, or a national guard member called to active duty, who served in active federal service, under either Title 10 or Title 32 of the United States Code, in a war or conflict fought on foreign soil or in international waters or in another location in support of those serving on foreign soil or in international waters, and if discharged from service, has received an honorable discharge.

(c) "Totally disabled" means a person who has been determined to be one hundred percent disabled by the federal department of veterans affairs.

(d) "Washington domiciliary" means a person whose true, fixed, and permanent house and place of habitation is the state of Washington. "Washington domiciliary" includes a person who is residing in rental housing or residing in base housing. In ascertaining whether a child or surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner is domiciled in the state of Washington, public institutions of higher education shall, to the fullest extent possible, rely upon the standards provided in RCW 28B.15.013.

(9) As used in subsection (4) of this section, "fees" includes all assessments for costs incurred as a condition to a student's full participation in coursework and related activities at an institution of higher education.

(10) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges shall report to the higher education committees of the legislature by November 15, 2010, and every two years thereafter, regarding the status of implementation of the waivers under subsection (4) of this section. The reports shall include the following data and information:

(a) Total number of waivers;

(b) Total amount of tuition waived;

(c) Total amount of fees waived;

(d) Average amount of tuition and fees waived per recipient;

(e) Recipient demographic data that is disaggregated by distinct ethnic categories within racial subgroups; and

(f) Recipient income level, to the extent possible.

Sec. 223. RCW 28B.15.740 and 1997 c 207 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges may waive all or a portion of tuition and fees for needy students who are eligible for resident tuition and fee rates pursuant to RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013. Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges may waive all or a portion of tuition and fees for other students at the discretion of the governing boards, except on the basis of participation in intercollegiate athletic programs, not to exceed three-fourths of one percent of gross authorized operating fees revenue under RCW 28B.15.910 for the community and technical colleges considered as a whole and not to exceed two percent of gross authorized operating fees revenue for the other institutions of higher education.

(2) In addition to the tuition and fee waivers provided in subsection (1) of this section and subject to the provisions of RCW 28B.15.455, 28B.15.460, and 28B.15.910, a total dollar amount of tuition and fee waivers awarded by any state university, regional university, or state college under this chapter, not to exceed one percent, as calculated in subsection (1) of this section, may be used for the purpose of achieving or maintaining gender equity in intercollegiate athletic programs. At any institution that has an underrepresented gender class in intercollegiate athletics, any such waivers shall be awarded:

(a) First, to members of the underrepresented gender class who participate in intercollegiate athletics, where such waivers result in saved or displaced money that can be used for athletic programs for the underrepresented gender class. Such saved or displaced money shall be used for programs for the underrepresented gender class; and

(b) Second, (i) to nonmembers of the underrepresented gender class who participate in intercollegiate athletics, where such waivers result in saved or displaced money that can be used for athletic programs for members of the underrepresented gender class. Such saved or displaced money shall be used for programs for the underrepresented gender class; or (ii) to members of the underrepresented gender class who participate in intercollegiate athletics, where such waivers do not result in any saved or displaced money that can be used for athletic programs for members of the underrepresented gender class.

Sec. 224. RCW 28B.15.910 and 2008 c 188 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of providing state general fund support to public institutions of higher education, except for revenue waived under programs listed in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus state appropriations act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or reduced by a state university, a regional university, The Evergreen State College, or the community and technical colleges as a whole, shall not exceed the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this subsection. As used in this section, "gross authorized operating fees revenue" means the estimated gross operating fees revenue as estimated under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of financial management, before granting any waivers. This limitation applies to all tuition waiver programs established before or after July 1, 1992.

(a) University of Washington. . . .21 percent

(b) Washington State University. . . .20 percent

(c) Eastern Washington University. . . .11 percent

(d) Central Washington University. . . .10 percent

(e) Western Washington University. . . .10 percent

(f) The Evergreen State College. . . .10 percent

(g) Community and technical colleges as a whole. . . .35 percent

(2) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in operating fees contained in the following:

(a) RCW 28B.15.014;

(b) RCW 28B.15.100;

(c) RCW 28B.15.225;

(d) RCW 28B.15.380;

(e) RCW 28B.15.520;

(f) RCW 28B.15.526;

(g) RCW 28B.15.527;

(h) ((RCW 28B.15.543;

(i) RCW 28B.15.545;

(j))) RCW 28B.15.555;

(((k))) (i) RCW 28B.15.556;

(((l))) (j) RCW 28B.15.615;

(((m))) (k) RCW 28B.15.621 (2) and (4);

(((n))) (l) RCW 28B.15.730;

(((o))) (m) RCW 28B.15.740;

(((p))) (n) RCW 28B.15.750;

(((q))) (o) RCW 28B.15.756;

(((r))) (p) RCW 28B.50.259; and

(((s))) (q) RCW 28B.70.050.

(3) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees contained in the following:

(a) RCW 28B.15.522;

(b) RCW 28B.15.540;

(c) RCW 28B.15.558; and

(d) RCW 28B.15.621(3).

(4) The total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or reduced by institutions of higher education participating in the western interstate commission for higher education western undergraduate exchange program under RCW 28B.15.544 shall not exceed the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this subsection.

(a) Washington State University. . . .1 percent

(b) Eastern Washington University. . . .3 percent

(c) Central Washington University. . . .3 percent

(5) The institutions of higher education will participate in outreach activities to increase the number of veterans who receive tuition waivers. Colleges and universities shall revise the application for admissions so that all applicants shall have the opportunity to advise the institution that they are veterans who need assistance. If a person indicates on the application for admissions that the person is a veteran who is in need of assistance, then the institution of higher education shall ask the person whether they have any funds disbursed in accordance with the Montgomery GI Bill available to them. Each institution shall encourage veterans to utilize funds available to them in accordance with the Montgomery GI Bill prior to providing the veteran a tuition waiver.

Sec. 225. RCW 28B.15.915 and 2000 c 152 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges, subject to state board policy, may waive all or a portion of the operating fees for any student. There shall be no state general fund support for waivers granted under this section.

By January 31st of each odd-numbered year, the institutions of higher education shall prepare a report of the costs and benefits of waivers granted under chapter 152, Laws of 2000 and shall transmit copies of their report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature.

Sec. 226. RCW 28B.50.030 and 2012 c 229 s 536 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Adult education" means all education or instruction, including academic, vocational education or training, basic skills and literacy training, and "occupational education" provided by public educational institutions, including common school districts for persons who are eighteen years of age and over or who hold a high school diploma or certificate. However, "adult education" shall not include academic education or instruction for persons under twenty-one years of age who do not hold a high school degree or diploma and who are attending a public high school for the sole purpose of obtaining a high school diploma or certificate, nor shall "adult education" include education or instruction provided by any four-year public institution of higher education.

(2) "Applied baccalaureate degree" means a baccalaureate degree awarded by a college under RCW 28B.50.810 for successful completion of a program of study that is:

(a) Specifically designed for individuals who hold an associate of applied science degree, or its equivalent, in order to maximize application of their technical course credits toward the baccalaureate degree; and

(b) Based on a curriculum that incorporates both theoretical and applied knowledge and skills in a specific technical field.

(3) "Board" means the workforce training and education coordinating board.

(4) "Board of trustees" means the local community and technical college board of trustees established for each college district within the state.

(5) "Center of excellence" means a community or technical college designated by the college board as a statewide leader in industry-specific, community and technical college workforce education and training.

(6) "College board" means the state board for community and technical colleges created by this chapter.

(7) "Common school board" means a public school district board of directors.

(8) "Community college" includes those higher education institutions that conduct education programs under RCW 28B.50.020.

(9) "Director" means the administrative director for the state system of community and technical colleges.

(10) "Dislocated forest product worker" means a forest products worker who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of termination from employment and is unlikely to return to employment in the individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of a diminishing demand for his or her skills in that occupation or industry; or (ii) is self-employed and has been displaced from his or her business because of the diminishing demand for the business' services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation from employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources impact area.

(11) "Dislocated salmon fishing worker" means a finfish products worker who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of termination from employment and is unlikely to return to employment in the individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of a diminishing demand for his or her skills in that occupation or industry; or (ii) is self-employed and has been displaced from his or her business because of the diminishing demand for the business's services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation from employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources impact area.

(12) "District" means any one of the community and technical college districts created by this chapter.

(13) "Forest products worker" means a worker in the forest products industries affected by the reduction of forest fiber enhancement, transportation, or production. The workers included within this definition shall be determined by the employment security department, but shall include workers employed in the industries assigned the major group standard industrial classification codes "24" and "26" and the industries involved in the harvesting and management of logs, transportation of logs and wood products, processing of wood products, and the manufacturing and distribution of wood processing and logging equipment. The commissioner may adopt rules further interpreting these definitions. For the purposes of this subsection, "standard industrial classification code" means the code identified in RCW 50.29.025(3).

(14) "High employer demand program of study" means an apprenticeship, or an undergraduate or graduate certificate or degree program in which the number of students prepared for employment per year from in-state institutions is substantially less than the number of projected job openings per year in that field, statewide or in a substate region.

(15) "K-12 system" means the public school program including kindergarten through the twelfth grade.

(16) "Occupational education" means education or training that will prepare a student for employment that does not require a baccalaureate degree, and education and training that will prepare a student for transfer to bachelor's degrees in professional fields, subject to rules adopted by the college board.

(17) "Qualified institutions of higher education" means:

(a) Washington public community and technical colleges;

(b) Private career schools that are members of an accrediting association recognized by rule of the student achievement council for the purposes of chapter 28B.92 RCW; and

(c) Washington state apprenticeship and training council-approved apprenticeship programs.

(18) "Rural natural resources impact area" means:

(a) A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that meets three of the five criteria set forth in subsection (19) of this section;

(b) A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty thousand in the 1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five criteria as set forth in subsection (19) of this section; or

(c) A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that is located in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five criteria set forth in subsection (19) of this section.

(19) For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact areas, the following criteria shall be considered:

(a) A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or above the state average;

(b) A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or above the state average;

(c) Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses of one hundred positions or more;

(d) Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses of one hundred positions or more; and

(e) An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state average. The counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by the employment security department for the most recent year for which data is available. For the purposes of administration of programs under this chapter, the United States post office five-digit zip code delivery areas will be used to determine residence status for eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition, a zip code delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an urbanized area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by zip codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also considered nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make available a zip code listing of the areas to all agencies and organizations providing services under this chapter.

(20) "Salmon fishing worker" means a worker in the finfish industry affected by 1994 or future salmon disasters. The workers included within this definition shall be determined by the employment security department, but shall include workers employed in the industries involved in the commercial and recreational harvesting of finfish including buying and processing finfish. The commissioner may adopt rules further interpreting these definitions.

(21) "System" means the state system of community and technical colleges, which shall be a system of higher education.

(22) "Technical college" includes those higher education institutions with the mission of conducting occupational education, basic skills, literacy programs, and offering on short notice, when appropriate, programs that meet specific industry needs. For purposes of this chapter, technical colleges shall include ((Lake Washington Vocational-Technical Institute, Renton Vocational-Technical Institute, Bates Vocational-Technical Institute, Clover Park Vocational Institute, and Bellingham Vocational-Technical Institute)) the following college districts as created in RCW 28B.50.040: The twenty-fifth college district, the twenty-sixth college district, the twenty-seventh college district, the twenty-eighth college district, and the twenty-ninth college district.

Sec. 227. RCW 28B.50.455 and 1991 c 238 s 158 are each amended to read as follows:

Each community and technical college shall ((have written procedures which include provisions for the vocational education of individuals with disabilities. These written procedures shall include a plan to provide services to individuals with disabilities, a written plan of how the technical college will)) comply with relevant ((state and)) federal requirements for ((providing vocational education to individuals with disabilities, a written plan of how the technical college will provide on-site appropriate instructional support staff in compliance with P.L. 94-142, and as since amended, and)) implementing section 504 of the rehabilitation act of 1973, and as thereafter amended, Title VI of the civil rights act of 1964, and as thereafter amended, and Title IX of education amendments of 1972, and as thereafter amended.

Sec. 228. RCW 28B.50.850 and 1991 c 238 s 67 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the purpose of RCW 28B.50.850 through 28B.50.869 to establish a system of faculty tenure which protects the concepts of faculty employment rights and faculty involvement in the protection of those rights in the state system of community and technical colleges. RCW 28B.50.850 through 28B.50.869 shall define a reasonable and orderly process for appointment of faculty members to tenure status and the dismissal of the tenured faculty member.

((Employees of the Seattle Vocational Institute are exempt from this section until July 1, 1993.))

Sec. 229. RCW 28B.50.851 and 1993 c 188 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in RCW 28B.50.850 through 28B.50.869:

(1) "Tenure" shall mean a faculty appointment for an indefinite period of time which may be revoked only for adequate cause and by due process;

(2)(a) "Faculty appointment", except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, shall mean full time employment as a teacher, counselor, librarian or other position for which the training, experience and responsibilities are comparable as determined by the appointing authority, except administrative appointments; "faculty appointment" shall also mean department heads, division heads and administrators to the extent that such department heads, division heads or administrators have had or do have status as a teacher, counselor, or librarian; faculty appointment shall also mean employment on a reduced work load basis when a faculty member has retained tenure under RCW 28B.50.859;

(b) "Faculty appointment" shall not mean special faculty appointment as a teacher, counselor, librarian, or other position as enumerated in (a) of this subsection, when such employment results from special funds provided to a community or technical college district from federal moneys or other special funds which other funds are designated as "special funds" by the college board: PROVIDED, That such "special funds" so designated by the college board for purposes of this section shall apply only to teachers, counselors and librarians hired from grants and service agreements and teachers, counselors and librarians hired in nonformula positions. A special faculty appointment resulting from such special financing may be terminated upon a reduction or elimination of funding or a reduction or elimination of program: PROVIDED FURTHER, That "faculty appointees" holding faculty appointments pursuant to subsections (1) or (2)(a) of this section who have been subsequently transferred to positions financed from "special funds" pursuant to (b) of this subsection and who thereafter lose their positions upon reduction or elimination of such "special funding" shall be entitled to be returned to previous status as faculty appointees pursuant to subsection (1) or (2)(a) of this section depending upon their status prior to the "special funding" transfer. Notwithstanding the fact that tenure shall not be granted to anyone holding a special faculty appointment, the termination of any such faculty appointment prior to the expiration of the term of such faculty member's individual contract for any cause which is not related to elimination or reduction of financing or the elimination or reduction of program shall be considered a termination for cause subject to the provisions of this chapter;

(3) "Probationary faculty appointment" shall mean a faculty appointment for a designated period of time which may be terminated without cause upon expiration of the probationer's terms of employment;

(4) "Probationer" shall mean an individual holding a probationary faculty appointment;

(5) "Administrative appointment" shall mean employment in a specific administrative position as determined by the appointing authority;

(6) "Appointing authority" shall mean the board of trustees of a college district;

(7) "Review committee" shall mean a committee composed of the probationer's faculty peers, a student representative, and the administrative staff of the community or technical college: PROVIDED, That the majority of the committee shall consist of the probationer's faculty peers.

Sec. 230. RCW 28B.50.862 and 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

Sufficient cause shall also include aiding and abetting or participating in: (1) Any unlawful act of violence; (2) Any unlawful act resulting in destruction of community or technical college property; or (3) Any unlawful interference with the orderly conduct of the educational process.

--- END ---