BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.26.430 and 2000 c 247 s 904 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT.

(a) For persons who first became employed by an employer in an eligible position prior to July 1, 2015, any member with at least five service credit years of service who has attained at least age fifty-three shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.26.420.

(b) For persons who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2015, any member with at least five service credit years of service who has attained at least age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.26.420.

(2) EARLY RETIREMENT.

(a) For persons who first became employed by an employer in an eligible position prior to July 1, 2015, any member who has completed at least twenty service credit years of service and has attained age fifty shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.26.420, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age fifty-three.

(b) For persons who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2015, any member who has completed at least twenty service credit years of service and has attained age fifty shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.26.420, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age fifty-five.

(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT.

(a) For persons who first became employed by an employer in an eligible position prior to July 1, 2015, any member who has completed at least twenty service credit years and has attained age fifty shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.26.420, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age fifty-three.

(b) For persons who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2015, any member who has completed at least twenty service credit years and has attained age fifty shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.26.420, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age fifty-five.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.26.470 and 2013 c 287 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer as determined by the director shall be eligible to receive an allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.26.410 through 41.26.550. Such member shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW 41.26.420 and shall have such allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at disability and the attainment of age fifty-three for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, and between the age at disability and the attainment of age fifty-five for persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015, except under subsection (7) of this section.

(2) Any member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be subject to such comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department. If such medical examinations reveal that such a member has recovered from the incapacitating disability and the member is no longer entitled to benefits under Title 51 RCW, the retirement allowance shall be canceled and the member shall be restored to duty in the same civil service rank, if any, held by the member at the time of retirement or, if unable to perform the duties of the rank, then, at the member's request, in such other like or lesser rank as may be or become open and available, the duties of which the member is then able to perform. In no event shall a member previously drawing a disability allowance be returned or be restored to duty at a salary or rate of pay less than the current salary attached to the rank or position held by the member at the date of the retirement for disability. If the department determines that the member is able to return to service, the member is entitled to notice and a hearing. Both the notice and the hearing shall comply with the requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

(3) Those members subject to this chapter who became disabled in the line of duty on or after July 23, 1989, and who receive benefits under RCW 41.04.500 through 41.04.530 or similar benefits under RCW 41.04.535 shall receive or continue to receive service credit subject to the following:

(a) No member may receive more than one month's service credit in a calendar month.

(b) No service credit under this section may be allowed after a member separates or is separated without leave of absence.

(c) Employer contributions shall be paid by the employer at the rate in effect for the period of the service credited.

(d) Employee contributions shall be collected by the employer and paid to the department at the rate in effect for the period of service credited.

(e) State contributions shall be as provided in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.067.

(f) Contributions shall be based on the regular compensation which the member would have received had the disability not occurred.

(g) The service and compensation credit under this section shall be granted for a period not to exceed six consecutive months.

(h) Should the legislature revoke the service credit authorized under this section or repeal this section, no affected employee is entitled to receive the credit as a matter of contractual right.

(4)(a) If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust, or organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the director, or, if there is no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the surviving spouse or domestic partner, or, if there is neither such designated person or persons still living at the time of his or her death nor a surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to his or her legal representative.

(b) If a recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section died before April 27, 1989, and before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equaled the amount of his or her accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the department shall pay the balance of the accumulated contributions to the member's surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, then in equal shares to the member's children. If there is no surviving spouse or children, the department shall retain the contributions.

(5) Should the disability retirement allowance of any disability beneficiary be canceled for any cause other than reentrance into service or retirement for service, he or she shall be paid the excess, if any, of the accumulated contributions at the time of retirement over all payments made on his or her behalf under this chapter.

(6) A member who becomes disabled in the line of duty, and who ceases to be an employee of an employer except by service or disability retirement, may request a refund of one hundred fifty percent of the member's accumulated contributions. Any accumulated contributions attributable to restorations made under RCW 41.50.165(2) shall be refunded at one hundred percent. A person in receipt of this benefit is a retiree.

(7) A member who becomes disabled in the line of duty shall be entitled to receive a minimum retirement allowance equal to ten percent of such member's final average salary. The member shall additionally receive a retirement allowance equal to two percent of such member's average final salary for each year of service beyond five.

(8) A member who became disabled in the line of duty before January 1, 2001, and is receiving an allowance under RCW 41.26.430 or subsection (1) of this section shall be entitled to receive a minimum retirement allowance equal to ten percent of such member's final average salary. The member shall additionally receive a retirement allowance equal to two percent of such member's average final salary for each year of service beyond five, and shall have the allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at disability and the attainment of age fifty-three. An additional benefit shall not result in a total monthly benefit greater than that provided in subsection (1) of this section.

(9) A member who is totally disabled in the line of duty is entitled to receive a retirement allowance equal to seventy percent of the member's final average salary. The allowance provided under this subsection shall be offset by:

(a) Temporary disability wage-replacement benefits or permanent total disability benefits provided to the member under Title 51 RCW; and

(b) Federal social security disability benefits, if any;

so that such an allowance does not result in the member receiving combined benefits that exceed one hundred percent of the member's final average salary. However, the offsets shall not in any case reduce the allowance provided under this subsection below the member's accrued retirement allowance.

A member is considered totally disabled if he or she is unable to perform any substantial gainful activity due to a physical or mental condition that may be expected to result in death or that has lasted or is expected to last at least twelve months. Substantial gainful activity is defined as average earnings in excess of eight hundred sixty dollars a month in 2006 adjusted annually as determined by the director based on federal social security disability standards. The department may require a person in receipt of an allowance under this subsection to provide any financial records that are necessary to determine continued eligibility for such an allowance. A person in receipt of an allowance under this subsection whose earnings exceed the threshold for substantial gainful activity shall have their benefit converted to a line-of-duty disability retirement allowance as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

Any person in receipt of an allowance under the provisions of this section is subject to comprehensive medical examinations as may be required by the department under subsection (2) of this section in order to determine continued eligibility for such an allowance.

(10)(a) In addition to the retirement allowance provided in subsection (9) of this section, the retirement allowance of a member who is totally disabled in the line of duty shall include reimbursement for any payments made by the member after June 10, 2010, for premiums on employer-provided medical insurance, insurance authorized by the consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1985 (COBRA), medicare part A (hospital insurance), and medicare part B (medical insurance). A member who is entitled to medicare must enroll and maintain enrollment in both medicare part A and medicare part B in order to remain eligible for the reimbursement provided in this subsection. The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal the benefits provided in this subsection in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to receive any distribution not granted prior to that time.

(b) The retirement allowance of a member who is not eligible for reimbursement provided in (a) of this subsection shall include reimbursement for any payments made after June 30, 2013, for premiums on other medical insurance. However, in no instance shall the reimbursement exceed the amount reimbursed for premiums authorized by the consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1985 (COBRA).

Sec. 3. RCW 41.32.765 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 7 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT.

(a) For persons who first became employed by an employer in an eligible position prior to July 1, 2015, any member with at least five service credit years of service who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760.

(b) For persons who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2015, any member with at least five service credit years of service who has attained at least age sixty-seven shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760.

(2) EARLY RETIREMENT.

(a) For persons who first became employed by an employer in an eligible position prior to July 1, 2015, any member who has completed at least twenty service credit years of service who has attained at least age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b) For persons who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2015, any member who has completed at least twenty service credit years of service and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-seven.

(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT.

(a) Any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b) On or after September 1, 2008, any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection (3)(b) shall have the retirement allowance reduced as follows:

Retirement

Age

Percent

Reduction

55

20%

56

17%

57

14%

58

11%

59

8%

60

5%

61

2%

62

0%

63

0%

64

0%

Any member who retires under the provisions of this subsection is ineligible for the postretirement employment provisions of RCW 41.32.802(2) until the retired member has reached sixty-five years of age. For purposes of this subsection, employment with an employer also includes any personal service contract, service by an employer as a temporary or project employee, or any other similar compensated relationship with any employer included under the provisions of RCW 41.32.800(1).

The subsidized reductions for alternate early retirement in this subsection as set forth in section 2, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 were intended by the legislature as replacement benefits for gain-sharing. ((Until there is legal certainty with respect to the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW, the right to retire under this subsection is noncontractual, and the legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this subsection. Legal certainty includes, but is not limited to, the expiration of any: Applicable limitations on actions; and periods of time for seeking appellate review, up to and including reconsideration by the Washington supreme court and the supreme court of the United States. Until that time, eligible members may still retire under this subsection, and upon receipt of the first installment of a retirement allowance computed under this subsection, the resulting benefit becomes contractual for the recipient. If the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW is held to be invalid in a final determination of a court of law, and the court orders reinstatement of gain-sharing or other alternate benefits as a remedy, then retirement benefits for any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five but has not yet received the first installment of a retirement allowance under this subsection shall be computed using the reductions in (a) of this subsection.))

(c) Members who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after May 1, 2013, are not eligible for the alternate early retirement provisions of (a) or (b) of this subsection. Any member who first becomes employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after May 1, 2013, and has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by five percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, and between the age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-seven for persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015.

Sec. 4. RCW 41.32.790 and 1995 c 144 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer as determined by the department upon recommendation of the department shall be eligible to receive an allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.32.755 through 41.32.825. The member shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW 41.32.760 and shall have the allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-five for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, and between the age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-seven for persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015.

Any member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department. If medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the allowance.

(2)(a) If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or persons, trust, or organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the director, or, if there is no designated person or persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the surviving spouse, or, if there is neither a designated person or persons still living at the time of his or her death nor a surviving spouse, then to his or her legal representative.

(b) If a recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section died before April 27, 1989, and before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equaled the amount of his or her accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the department shall pay the balance of the accumulated contributions to the member's surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, then in equal shares to the member's children. If there is no surviving spouse or children, the department shall retain the contributions.

Sec. 5. RCW 41.32.875 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 7 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT.

(a) For persons who first became employed by an employer in an eligible position prior to July 1, 2015, any member who is at least age sixty-five and who has:

(((a))) (i) Completed ten service credit years; or

(((b))) (ii) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service credit months after attaining age forty-four; or

(((c))) (iii) Completed five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817;

shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840.

(b) For persons who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2015, any member who is at least age sixty-seven and who has:

(i) Completed ten service credit years; or

(ii) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service credit months after attaining age forty-four;

shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840.

(2) EARLY RETIREMENT.

(a) For persons who first became employed by an employer in an eligible position prior to July 1, 2015, any member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has completed at least ten years of service shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b) For persons who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2015, any member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has completed at least ten years of service shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-seven.

(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT.

(a) Any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b) On or after September 1, 2008, any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection (3)(b) shall have the retirement allowance reduced as follows:

Retirement

Age

Percent

Reduction

55

20%

56

17%

57

14%

58

11%

59

8%

60

5%

61

2%

62

0%

63

0%

64

0%

Any member who retires under the provisions of this subsection is ineligible for the postretirement employment provisions of RCW 41.32.862(2) until the retired member has reached sixty-five years of age. For purposes of this subsection, employment with an employer also includes any personal service contract, service by an employer as a temporary or project employee, or any other similar compensated relationship with any employer included under the provisions of RCW 41.32.860(1).

The subsidized reductions for alternate early retirement in this subsection as set forth in section 4, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 were intended by the legislature as replacement benefits for gain-sharing. ((Until there is legal certainty with respect to the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW, the right to retire under this subsection is noncontractual, and the legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this subsection. Legal certainty includes, but is not limited to, the expiration of any: Applicable limitations on actions; and periods of time for seeking appellate review, up to and including reconsideration by the Washington supreme court and the supreme court of the United States. Until that time, eligible members may still retire under this subsection, and upon receipt of the first installment of a retirement allowance computed under this subsection, the resulting benefit becomes contractual for the recipient. If the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW is held to be invalid in a final determination of a court of law, and the court orders reinstatement of gain-sharing or other alternate benefits as a remedy, then retirement benefits for any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five but has not yet received the first installment of a retirement allowance under this subsection shall be computed using the reductions in (a) of this subsection.))

(c) Members who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after May 1, 2013, are not eligible for the alternate early retirement provisions of (a) or (b) of this subsection. Any member who first becomes employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after May 1, 2013, and has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by five percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, and between the age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-seven for persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015.

Sec. 6. RCW 41.32.880 and 1995 c 239 s 114 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer as determined by the department shall be eligible to receive an allowance under the provisions of plan 3. The member shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW 41.32.840 and shall have this allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-five for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, and between the age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-seven for persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015.

Any member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department. If these medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the allowance.

(2) If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies, any further benefit payments shall be conditioned by the payment option selected by the retiree as provided in RCW 41.32.851.

Sec. 7. RCW 41.35.420 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 7 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT.

(a) For persons who first became employed by an employer in an eligible position prior to July 1, 2015, any member with at least five service credit years who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400.

(b) For persons who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2015, any member with at least five service credit years of service who has attained at least age sixty-seven shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400.

(2) EARLY RETIREMENT.

(a) For persons who first became employed by an employer in an eligible position prior to July 1, 2015, any member who has completed at least twenty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b) For persons who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2015, any member who has completed at least twenty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-seven.

(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT.

(a) Any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b) On or after September 1, 2008, any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection (3)(b) shall have the retirement allowance reduced as follows:

Retirement

Age

Percent

Reduction

55

20%

56

17%

57

14%

58

11%

59

8%

60

5%

61

2%

62

0%

63

0%

64

0%

Any member who retires under the provisions of this subsection is ineligible for the postretirement employment provisions of RCW 41.35.060(2) until the retired member has reached sixty-five years of age. For purposes of this subsection, employment with an employer also includes any personal service contract, service by an employer as a temporary or project employee, or any other similar compensated relationship with any employer included under the provisions of RCW 41.35.230(1).

The subsidized reductions for alternate early retirement in this subsection as set forth in section 6, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 were intended by the legislature as replacement benefits for gain-sharing. ((Until there is legal certainty with respect to the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW, the right to retire under this subsection is noncontractual, and the legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this subsection. Legal certainty includes, but is not limited to, the expiration of any: Applicable limitations on actions; and periods of time for seeking appellate review, up to and including reconsideration by the Washington supreme court and the supreme court of the United States. Until that time, eligible members may still retire under this subsection, and upon receipt of the first installment of a retirement allowance computed under this subsection, the resulting benefit becomes contractual for the recipient. If the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW is held to be invalid in a final determination of a court of law, and the court orders reinstatement of gain-sharing or other alternate benefits as a remedy, then retirement benefits for any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five but has not yet received the first installment of a retirement allowance under this subsection shall be computed using the reductions in (a) of this subsection.))

(c) Members who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after May 1, 2013, are not eligible for the alternate early retirement provisions of (a) or (b) of this subsection. Any member who first becomes employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after May 1, 2013, and has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by five percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, and between the age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-seven for persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015.

Sec. 8. RCW 41.35.440 and 1998 c 341 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer as determined by the department upon recommendation of the department shall be eligible to receive an allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.35.400 through 41.35.599. The member shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW 41.35.400 and shall have this allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-five for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, and between the age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-seven for persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015.

Any member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department. If these medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the allowance.

(2) If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or persons, trust, or organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the director, or, if there is no designated person or persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the surviving spouse, or, if there is no designated person or persons still living at the time of his or her death nor a surviving spouse, then to his or her legal representative.

Sec. 9. RCW 41.35.680 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 7 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT.

(a) For persons who first became employed by an employer in an eligible position prior to July 1, 2015, any member who is at least age sixty-five and who has:

(((a))) (i) Completed ten service credit years; or

(((b))) (ii) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service credit months after attaining age forty-four; or

(((c))) (iii) Completed five service credit years by September 1, 2000, under the public employees' retirement system plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510;

shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620.

(b) For persons who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2015, any member who is at least age sixty-seven and who has:

(i) Completed ten service credit years; or

(ii) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service credit months after attaining age forty-four;

shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620.

(2) EARLY RETIREMENT.

(a) For persons who first became employed by an employer in an eligible position prior to July 1, 2015, any member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has completed at least ten years of service shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b) For persons who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2015, any member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has completed at least ten years of service shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-seven.

(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT.

(a) Any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b) On or after September 1, 2008, any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection (3)(b) shall have the retirement allowance reduced as follows:

Retirement

Age

Percent

Reduction

55

20%

56

17%

57

14%

58

11%

59

8%

60

5%

61

2%

62

0%

63

0%

64

0%

Any member who retires under the provisions of this subsection is ineligible for the postretirement employment provisions of RCW 41.35.060(2) until the retired member has reached sixty-five years of age. For purposes of this subsection, employment with an employer also includes any personal service contract, service by an employer as a temporary or project employee, or any other similar compensated relationship with any employer included under the provisions of RCW 41.35.230(1).

The subsidized reductions for alternate early retirement in this subsection as set forth in section 8, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 were intended by the legislature as replacement benefits for gain-sharing. ((Until there is legal certainty with respect to the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW, the right to retire under this subsection is noncontractual, and the legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this subsection. Legal certainty includes, but is not limited to, the expiration of any: Applicable limitations on actions; and periods of time for seeking appellate review, up to and including reconsideration by the Washington supreme court and the supreme court of the United States. Until that time, eligible members may still retire under this subsection, and upon receipt of the first installment of a retirement allowance computed under this subsection, the resulting benefit becomes contractual for the recipient. If the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW is held to be invalid in a final determination of a court of law, and the court orders reinstatement of gain-sharing or other alternate benefits as a remedy, then retirement benefits for any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five but has not yet received the first installment of a retirement allowance under this subsection shall be computed using the reductions in (a) of this subsection.))

(c) Members who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after May 1, 2013, are not eligible for the alternate early retirement provisions of (a) or (b) of this subsection. Any member who first becomes employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after May 1, 2013, and has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by five percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, and between the age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-seven for persons who first became members on or after July 1, 2015.

Sec. 10. RCW 41.35.690 and 1998 c 341 s 210 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer as determined by the department shall be eligible to receive an allowance under the provisions of plan 3. The member shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW 41.35.620 and shall have this allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-five for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, and between the age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-seven for persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015.

Any member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department. If these medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the allowance.

(2) If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies, any further benefit payments shall be conditioned by the payment option selected by the retiree as provided in RCW 41.35.220.

Sec. 11. RCW 41.37.210 and 2004 c 242 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT.

Any member with at least five service credit years who has attained at least age sixty-five for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, or has attained at least age sixty-seven for persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015, shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to RCW 41.37.190.

(2) UNREDUCED RETIREMENT.

Any member who has completed at least ten service credit years in the public safety employees' retirement system and has attained age sixty for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, or has attained age sixty-two for persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015, shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to RCW 41.37.190.

(3) EARLY RETIREMENT.

Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit years and has attained age fifty-three shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to RCW 41.37.190, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, and between the age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-two for persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015.

Sec. 12. RCW 41.37.230 and 2004 c 242 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A member of the retirement system with at least ten years of service in the public safety employees' retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment as an employee by an employer, as determined by the department, shall be eligible to receive an allowance under RCW 41.37.190 through 41.37.290. The member shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW 41.37.190 and shall have this allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at disability and the attainment of age sixty for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, and between the age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-two for persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015.

(b) A member of the retirement system with less than ten years of service who becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer, as determined by the department, shall be eligible to receive an allowance under RCW 41.37.190 through 41.37.290. The member shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW 41.37.190 and shall have this allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(2) Any member who receives an allowance under this section shall be subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department. If these medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the allowance.

(3) If the recipient of a monthly allowance under this section dies before the total of the allowance payments equal the amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or persons, trust, or organization the recipient has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the director. If there is no designated person or persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the surviving spouse, or, if there is no designated person or persons still living at the time of his or her death nor a surviving spouse, then to his or her legal representative.

Sec. 13. RCW 41.40.630 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 7 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT.

(a) For persons who first became employed by an employer in an eligible position prior to July 1, 2015, any member with at least five service credit years who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620.

(b) For persons who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2015, any member with at least five service credit years of service who has attained at least age sixty-seven shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620.

(2) EARLY RETIREMENT.

(a) For persons who first became employed by an employer in an eligible position prior to July 1, 2015, any member who has completed at least twenty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b) For persons who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2015, any member who has completed at least twenty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-seven.

(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT.

(a) Any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b) On or after July 1, 2008, any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection (3)(b) shall have the retirement allowance reduced as follows:

Retirement

Age

Percent

Reduction

55

20%

56

17%

57

14%

58

11%

59

8%

60

5%

61

2%

62

0%

63

0%

64

0%

Any member who retires under the provisions of this subsection is ineligible for the postretirement employment provisions of RCW 41.40.037(2)(((d))) until the retired member has reached sixty-five years of age. For purposes of this subsection, employment with an employer also includes any personal service contract, service by an employer as a temporary or project employee, or any other similar compensated relationship with any employer included under the provisions of RCW 41.40.690(1).

The subsidized reductions for alternate early retirement in this subsection as set forth in section 9, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 were intended by the legislature as replacement benefits for gain-sharing. ((Until there is legal certainty with respect to the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW, the right to retire under this subsection is noncontractual, and the legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this subsection. Legal certainty includes, but is not limited to, the expiration of any: Applicable limitations on actions; and periods of time for seeking appellate review, up to and including reconsideration by the Washington supreme court and the supreme court of the United States. Until that time, eligible members may still retire under this subsection, and upon receipt of the first installment of a retirement allowance computed under this subsection, the resulting benefit becomes contractual for the recipient. If the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW is held to be invalid in a final determination of a court of law, and the court orders reinstatement of gain-sharing or other alternate benefits as a remedy, then retirement benefits for any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five but has not yet received the first installment of a retirement allowance under this subsection shall be computed using the reductions in (a) of this subsection.))

(c) Members who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after May 1, 2013, are not eligible for the alternate early retirement provisions of (a) or (b) of this subsection. Any member who first becomes employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after May 1, 2013, and has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by five percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, and between the age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-seven for persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015.

Sec. 14. RCW 41.40.670 and 1995 c 144 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer as determined by the department upon recommendation of the department shall be eligible to receive an allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.40.610 through 41.40.740. The member shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW 41.40.620 and shall have this allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-five for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, and between the age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-seven for persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015.

Any member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department. If these medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the allowance.

(2) The retirement for disability of a judge, who is a member of the retirement system, by the supreme court under Article IV, section 31 of the Constitution of the state of Washington (Amendment 71), with the concurrence of the department, shall be considered a retirement under subsection (1) of this section.

(3)(a) If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or persons, trust, or organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the director, or, if there is no designated person or persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the surviving spouse, or, if there is no designated person or persons still living at the time of his or her death nor a surviving spouse, then to his or her legal representative.

(b) If a recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section died before April 27, 1989, and before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equaled the amount of his or her accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the department shall pay the balance of the accumulated contributions to the member's surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, then in equal shares to the member's children. If there is no surviving spouse or children, the department shall retain the contributions.

Sec. 15. RCW 41.40.820 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 7 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT.

(a) For persons who first became employed by an employer in an eligible position prior to July 1, 2015, any member who is at least age sixty-five and who has:

(((a))) (i) Completed ten service credit years; or

(((b))) (ii) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service credit months after attaining age forty-four; or

(((c))) (iii) Completed five service credit years by the transfer payment date specified in RCW 41.40.795, under the public employees' retirement system plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.40.795;

shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790.

(b) For persons who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2015, any member who is at least age sixty-seven and who has:

(i) Completed ten service credit years; or

(ii) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service credit months after attaining age forty-four;

shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790.

(2) EARLY RETIREMENT.

(a) For persons who first became employed by an employer in an eligible position prior to July 1, 2015, any member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has completed at least ten years of service shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b) For persons who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2015, any member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has completed at least ten years of service shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-seven.

(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT.

(a) Any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b) On or after July 1, 2008, any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection (3)(b) shall have the retirement allowance reduced as follows:

Retirement

Age

Percent

Reduction

55

20%

56

17%

57

14%

58

11%

59

8%

60

5%

61

2%

62

0%

63

0%

64

0%

Any member who retires under the provisions of this subsection is ineligible for the postretirement employment provisions of RCW 41.40.037(2)(((d))) until the retired member has reached sixty-five years of age. For purposes of this subsection, employment with an employer also includes any personal service contract, service by an employer as a temporary or project employee, or any other similar compensated relationship with any employer included under the provisions of RCW 41.40.850(1).

The subsidized reductions for alternate early retirement in this subsection as set forth in section 10, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 were intended by the legislature as replacement benefits for gain-sharing. ((Until there is legal certainty with respect to the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW, the right to retire under this subsection is noncontractual, and the legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this subsection. Legal certainty includes, but is not limited to, the expiration of any: Applicable limitations on actions; and periods of time for seeking appellate review, up to and including reconsideration by the Washington supreme court and the supreme court of the United States. Until that time, eligible members may still retire under this subsection, and upon receipt of the first installment of a retirement allowance computed under this subsection, the resulting benefit becomes contractual for the recipient. If the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW is held to be invalid in a final determination of a court of law, and the court orders reinstatement of gain-sharing or other alternate benefits as a remedy, then retirement benefits for any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five but has not yet received the first installment of a retirement allowance under this subsection shall be computed using the reductions in (a) of this subsection.))

(c) Members who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after May 1, 2013, are not eligible for the alternate early retirement provisions of (a) or (b) of this subsection. Any member who first becomes employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after May 1, 2013, and has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by five percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, and between the age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-seven for persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015.

Sec. 16. RCW 41.40.825 and 2000 c 247 s 310 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer as determined by the department shall be eligible to receive an allowance under the provisions of plan 3. The member shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW 41.40.790 and shall have this allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-five for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, and between the age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-seven for persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015.

Any member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department. If these medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the allowance.

(2) If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies, any further benefit payments shall be conditioned by the payment option selected by the retiree as provided in RCW 41.40.845.

Sec. 17. RCW 43.43.250 and 2007 c 87 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Until July 1, 2007, any member who has attained the age of sixty years shall be retired on the first day of the calendar month next succeeding that in which the member has attained the age of sixty. However, the requirement to retire at age sixty does not apply to a member serving as chief of the Washington state patrol.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2007, any active member who has obtained the age of sixty-five years shall be retired on the first day of the calendar month next succeeding that in which the member has attained the age of sixty-five. However, the requirement to retire at age sixty-five does not apply to a member serving as chief of the Washington state patrol.

(2)(a) For persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, any member who has completed twenty-five years of credited service or has attained the age of fifty-five may apply to retire as provided in RCW 43.43.260, by completing and submitting an application form to the department, setting forth at what time the member desires to be retired.

(b) For persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015, any member who has completed twenty-seven years of credited service or has attained the age of fifty-seven may apply to retire as provided in RCW 43.43.260, by completing and submitting an application form to the department, setting forth at what time the member desires to be retired.

Sec. 18. RCW 43.43.280 and 2009 c 522 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a member dies before retirement, and has no surviving spouse or domestic partner or children under the age of eighteen years, all contributions made by the member, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), with interest as determined by the director, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to such person or persons as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department, or if there be no such designated person or persons, then to the member's legal representative.

(2) If a member should cease to be an employee before attaining age sixty for reasons other than the member's death, or retirement, the individual shall thereupon cease to be a member except as provided under RCW 43.43.130 (2), (3), and (4) and, the individual may withdraw the member's contributions to the retirement fund, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), with interest as determined by the director, by making application therefor to the department, except that: A member who ceases to be an employee after having completed at least five years of service shall remain a member during the period of the member's absence from employment for the exclusive purpose only of receiving a retirement allowance to begin at attainment of age sixty for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, and beginning at attainment of age sixty-two for persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015, however such a member may upon written notice to the department elect to receive a reduced retirement allowance on or after age fifty-five which allowance shall be the actuarial equivalent of the sum necessary to pay regular retirement benefits as of age sixty for persons who first became members prior to July 1, 2015, or as of age sixty-two for persons who first become members on or after July 1, 2015: PROVIDED, That if such member should withdraw all or part of the member's accumulated contributions, the individual shall thereupon cease to be a member and this subsection shall not apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---