BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) County legislative authorities of multiple counties may conduct joint meetings to transact business of participating counties if a meeting agenda item or items are of shared interest or concern to citizens of participating counties. The joint meeting may be held outside of a county seat at a location within one of the participating counties.

(2) All participating county legislative authorities must provide notice of the joint meeting at least twenty days before the joint meeting. Notice must, at a minimum, be:

(a) Posted on each county's web site;

(b) Published in a newspaper of general circulation in each county; and

(c) Sent via electronic transmission to any resident of each county who has chosen to receive notice of county legislative authority meetings at an email address.

(3) A county legislative authority meeting outside of its county may not take final action, as defined in RCW 42.30.020, at a joint meeting conducted pursuant to this section.

(4) This section does not apply to joint meetings of county legislative authorities conducted pursuant to RCW 27.12.100, 36.54.040, 86.13.050, or 90.82.130.

--- END ---