BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.04.214 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Newspaper" means:

(a) A publication issued regularly at stated intervals at least twice a month and printed on newsprint in tabloid or broadsheet format folded loosely together without stapling, glue, or any other binding of any kind, including any supplement of a printed newspaper; and

(b) An electronic version of a printed newspaper that:

(i) Shares content with the printed newspaper; and

(ii) Is prominently identified by the same name as the printed newspaper or otherwise conspicuously indicates that it is a complement to the printed newspaper.

(2) For purposes of this section, "supplement" means a printed publication, including a magazine or advertising section, that is:

(a) Labeled and identified as part of the printed newspaper; and

(b) Circulated or distributed:

(i) As an insert or attachment to the printed newspaper; or

(ii) Separate and apart from the printed newspaper so long as the distribution is within the general circulation area of the newspaper.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. 2012 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

((Part VI)) Section 602 of this act expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---