BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that children are more vulnerable than adults to the hazardous effects of pesticide exposure. The intent of this act is to protect children and staff by making it easier for school districts to adopt child-friendly pest management strategies. This may be accomplished in part through development and use of an integrated pest management program that emphasizes use of nonchemical pest control measures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. By January 1, 2016, the Washington state school directors' association, in consultation with the department of health and the superintendent of public instruction, shall develop a model integrated pest management policy that emphasizes the use of nonchemical pest control measures. The model integrated pest management policy must be disseminated to all school districts. The model integrated pest management policy shall, at a minimum, incorporate the "IPM Standards for Schools: Tactics and Resources for Reducing Pest and Pesticide Risks in Schools and Other Sensitive Environments" as published by the IPM institute of North America, inc. as of the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. By September 1, 2016, each school district shall have adopted an integrated pest management policy and begin implementation of an integrated pest management program that is based on the model integrated pest management policy developed under section 2 of this act. Each school district may phase in implementation of its integrated pest management program. However, each school district shall obtain the IPM STAR certification pursuant to the "IPM Standards for Schools: Tactics and Resources for Reducing Pest and Pesticide Risks in Schools and Other Sensitive Environments" by September 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) Any appropriation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016, from the general fund for the purposes of providing technical assistance to each school district regarding implementation of each school district's integrated pest management program shall go to the Washington State University urban integrated pest management program.

(2) If Washington State University is provided funding under subsection (1) of this section, Washington State University must prepare an annual report to the legislature for fiscal year 2016 and each year thereafter during which Washington State University has received funding regarding the technical assistance it has provided to school districts. The report must include, but is not limited to, information on:

(a) The districts that have received technical assistance;

(b) The nature and extent of the assistance;

(c) Each district's progress on obtaining IPM STAR certification; and

(d) The amount and nature of costs incurred by Washington State University in providing technical assistance to school districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 2 and 3 of this act are each added to chapter 28A.345 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2015, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---