BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.27.095 and 1991 c 281 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A valid and fully complete building permit application for a structure, that is permitted under the zoning or other land use control ordinances in effect on the date of the application shall be considered under the building permit ordinance in effect at the time of application, and the zoning or other land use control ordinances in effect on the date of application.

(2) The requirements for a fully completed application shall be defined by local ordinance but for any construction project costing more than five thousand dollars the application shall include, at a minimum:

(a) The legal description, or the tax parcel number assigned pursuant to RCW 84.40.160, and the street address if available, and may include any other identification of the construction site by the prime contractor;

(b) The property owner's name, address, and phone number;

(c) The prime contractor's business name, address, phone number, current state contractor registration number; ((and))

(d) Either:

(i) The name, address, and phone number of the office of the lender administering the interim construction financing, if any; or

(ii) The name and address of the firm that has issued a payment bond, if any, on behalf of the prime contractor for the protection of the owner, if the bond is for an amount not less than fifty percent of the total amount of the construction project; and

(e) A risk assessment of possible impacts to the drinking water supply of the surrounding property owners, if the building permit application is for a structure that is outside the urban growth area as defined in RCW 36.70A.030 and is not connected to a public sewer system. The risk assessment must include a mitigation plan that provides that the quality and quantity of drinking water remains the same for the surrounding property owners. The risk assessment must be mailed by first-class mail to the surrounding property owners that may be impacted by the construction as identified in the risk assessment, to any federally recognized Indian tribe that may be impacted by the construction as identified in the risk assessment, and to any agency or community group that the city or county may identify as having an interest in the risk assessment.

(3) The information required on the building permit application by subsection (2)(a) through (((d))) (e) of this section shall be set forth on the building permit document which is issued to the owner, and on the inspection record card which shall be posted at the construction site.

(4) The information required by subsection (2) of this section and information supplied by the applicant after the permit is issued under subsection (5) of this section shall be kept on record in the office where building permits are issued and made available to any person on request. If a copy is requested, a reasonable charge may be made.

(5) If any of the information required by subsection (2)(d) of this section is not available at the time the application is submitted, the applicant shall so state and the application shall be processed forthwith and the permit issued as if the information had been supplied, and the lack of the information shall not cause the application to be deemed incomplete for the purposes of vesting under subsection (1) of this section. However, the applicant shall provide the remaining information as soon as the applicant can reasonably obtain such information.

(6) The limitations imposed by this section shall not restrict conditions imposed under chapter 43.21C RCW.

--- END ---