BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 34.05.461 and 2013 c 110 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section:

(a) If the presiding officer is the agency head or one or more members of the agency head, the presiding officer ((may)) shall enter ((an initial order if further review is available within the agency, or)) a final order ((if further review is not available));

(b) If the presiding officer is a person designated by the agency ((to make the final decision and enter the final order)) other than under (c) of this subsection, the presiding officer shall enter a final order; and

(c) If the presiding officer is one or more administrative law judges assigned by the office of administrative hearings in accordance with chapter 34.12 RCW, the presiding officer shall enter ((an initial)) a final order.

(2) With respect to agencies exempt from chapter 34.12 RCW or an institution of higher education, the presiding officer shall ((transmit a full and complete record of the proceedings, including such comments upon demeanor of witnesses as the presiding officer deems relevant, to each agency official who is to)) enter a final ((or initial)) order ((after considering the record and evidence so transmitted)).

(3) ((Initial and)) Final orders shall include a statement of findings and conclusions, and the reasons and basis therefor, on all the material issues of fact, law, or discretion presented on the record, including the remedy or sanction and, if applicable, the action taken on a petition for a stay of effectiveness. Any findings based substantially on credibility of evidence or demeanor of witnesses shall be so identified. Findings set forth in language that is essentially a repetition or paraphrase of the relevant provision of law shall be accompanied by a concise and explicit statement of the underlying evidence of record to support the findings. The order shall also include a statement of the available procedures and time limits for seeking reconsideration or other administrative relief. ((An initial order shall include a statement of any circumstances under which the initial order, without further notice, may become a final order.))

(4) Findings of fact shall be based exclusively on the evidence of record in the adjudicative proceeding and on matters officially noticed in that proceeding. Findings shall be based on the kind of evidence on which reasonably prudent persons are accustomed to rely in the conduct of their affairs. Findings may be based on such evidence even if it would be inadmissible in a civil trial. However, the presiding officer shall not base a finding exclusively on such inadmissible evidence unless the presiding officer determines that doing so would not unduly abridge the parties' opportunities to confront witnesses and rebut evidence. The basis for this determination shall appear in the order.

(5) Where it bears on the issues presented, the agency's experience, technical competency, and specialized knowledge may be used in the evaluation of evidence.

(6) If a person serving or designated to serve as presiding officer becomes unavailable for any reason before entry of the order, a substitute presiding officer shall be appointed as provided in RCW 34.05.425. The substitute presiding officer shall use any existing record and may conduct any further proceedings appropriate in the interests of justice.

(7) The presiding officer may allow the parties a designated time after conclusion of the hearing for the submission of memos, briefs, or proposed findings.

(8)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, ((initial or)) final orders shall be served in writing within ninety days after conclusion of the hearing or after submission of memos, briefs, or proposed findings in accordance with subsection (7) of this section unless this period is waived or extended for good cause shown. The ((initial or)) final order may be served on a party via electronic distribution, with a party's agreement.

(b) This subsection does not apply to the final order of the shorelines hearings board on appeal under RCW 90.58.180(3).

(9) The presiding officer shall cause copies of the order to be served on each party and the agency.

Sec. 2. RCW 34.12.060 and 2011 c 336 s 763 are each amended to read as follows:

When an administrative law judge presides at a hearing under this chapter ((and a majority of the officials of the agency who are to render the final decision have not heard substantially all of the oral testimony and read all exhibits submitted by any party)), it shall be the duty of such judge, or in the event of his or her unavailability or incapacity, of another judge appointed by the chief administrative law judge, to issue ((an initial)) a final decision or proposal for decision including findings of fact and conclusions of law in accordance with RCW 34.05.461 or 34.05.485. However, this section does not apply to a state patrol disciplinary hearing conducted under RCW 43.43.090.

Sec. 3. RCW 34.05.455 and 1988 c 288 s 416 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A presiding officer may not communicate, directly or indirectly, regarding any issue in the proceeding other than communications necessary to procedural aspects of maintaining an orderly process, with any person employed by the agency without notice and opportunity for all parties to participate, except as provided in this subsection:

(a) Where the ultimate legal authority of an agency is vested in a multimember body, and where that body presides at an adjudication, members of the body may communicate with one another regarding the proceeding;

(b) Any presiding officer may receive aid from legal counsel, or from staff assistants who are subject to the presiding officer's supervision; and

(c) Presiding officers may communicate with other employees or consultants of the agency who have not participated in the proceeding in any manner, and who are not engaged in any investigative or prosecutorial functions in the same or a factually related case; provided this subsection shall not allow communication with an agency employee that requires as part of an employment evaluation that a presiding officer shall decide cases according to the agency head's unwritten policies.

(d) This subsection does not apply to communications required for the disposition of ex parte matters specifically authorized by statute.

(2) Unless required for the disposition of ex parte matters specifically authorized by statute or unless necessary to procedural aspects of maintaining an orderly process, a presiding officer may not communicate, directly or indirectly, regarding any issue in the proceeding, with any person not employed by the agency who has a direct or indirect interest in the outcome of the proceeding, without notice and opportunity for all parties to participate.

(3) Unless necessary to procedural aspects of maintaining an orderly process, persons to whom a presiding officer may not communicate under subsections (1) and (2) of this section may not communicate with presiding officers without notice and opportunity for all parties to participate.

(4) If, before serving as presiding officer in an adjudicative proceeding, a person receives an ex parte communication of a type that could not properly be received while serving, the person, promptly after starting to serve, shall disclose the communication in the manner prescribed in subsection (5) of this section.

(5) A presiding officer who receives an ex parte communication in violation of this section shall place on the record of the pending matter all written communications received, all written responses to the communications, and a memorandum stating the substance of all oral communications received, all responses made, and the identity of each person from whom the presiding officer received an ex parte communication. The presiding officer shall advise all parties that these matters have been placed on the record. Upon request made within ten days after notice of the ex parte communication, any party desiring to rebut the communication shall be allowed to place a written rebuttal statement on the record. Portions of the record pertaining to ex parte communications or rebuttal statements do not constitute evidence of any fact at issue in the matter unless a party moves the admission of any portion of the record for purposes of establishing a fact at issue and that portion is admitted pursuant to RCW 34.05.452.

(6) If necessary to eliminate the effect of an ex parte communication received in violation of this section, a presiding officer who receives the communication may be disqualified, and the portions of the record pertaining to the communication may be sealed by protective order.

(7) The agency shall, and any party may, report any violation of this section to appropriate authorities for any disciplinary proceedings provided by law. In addition, each agency by rule may provide for appropriate sanctions, including default, for any violations of this section.

--- END ---