BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.44 RCW to read as follows:

A proposition to ratify the strategic alliance agreement between public hospital district No. 1 of King county and UW Medicine effective June 30, 2011, must be submitted to the voters of public hospital district No. 1 of King county at the next general election. The text of the proposition to ratify the agreement, an explanatory statement describing the measure, and statements for and against the measure must be included in the local voter's pamphlet as provided in RCW 29A.32.210 through 29A.32.280. The election must be conducted as provided in Title 29A RCW. The costs of the election must be paid by public hospital district No. 1 of King county and UW Medicine. If the strategic alliance agreement is not ratified by a majority of the votes cast on the proposition, the agreement is terminated.

--- END ---