BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.24.010 and 2010 c 60 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Administrative fund" means the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund created under RCW 41.24.030.

(2) "Appropriate legislation" means an ordinance when an ordinance is the means of legislating by any municipality, and resolution in all other cases.

(3) "Board of trustees" or "local board" means: (a) For matters affecting firefighters, a firefighter board of trustees created under RCW 41.24.060; (b) for matters affecting an emergency worker, an emergency medical service district board of trustees created under RCW 41.24.330; ((or)) (c) for matters affecting reserve officers, a reserve officer board of trustees created under RCW 41.24.460; or (d) for matters affecting volunteer emergency workers, the nonprofit ambulance service provider board of trustees created pursuant to section 13 of this act.

(4) "Emergency worker" means any emergency medical service personnel, regulated by chapters 18.71 and 18.73 RCW, who is a member of an emergency medical service district but shall not include emergency medical service personnel who are eligible for participation in the Washington public employees' retirement system, with respect to periods of service rendered in such capacity.

(5) "Fire department" means any regularly organized fire department or emergency medical service district consisting wholly of volunteer firefighters, or any part-paid and part-volunteer fire department duly organized and maintained by any municipality: PROVIDED, That any such municipality wherein a part-paid fire department is maintained may by appropriate legislation permit the full-paid members of its department to come under the provisions of chapter 41.16 RCW.

(6) "Firefighter" includes any firefighter or emergency worker who is a member of any fire department of any municipality but shall not include firefighters who are eligible for participation in the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system or the Washington public employees' retirement system, with respect to periods of service rendered in such capacity.

(7) "Municipal corporation" or "municipality" includes any county, city, town or combination thereof, fire protection district, local law enforcement agency, or any emergency medical service district or other special district, authorized by law to protect life or property within its boundaries through a fire department, emergency workers, or reserve officers.

(8) "Nonprofit ambulance service provider" means any ground ambulance service that is a qualified 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) corporation and registered with the Washington state secretary of state to operate as a nonprofit corporation within the state of Washington for the purpose of providing ambulance service within its boundaries, who has elected to participate in the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension fund.

(9) "Participant" means: (a) For purposes of relief, any reserve officer who is or may become eligible for relief under this chapter or any firefighter ((or)), emergency worker, or volunteer emergency worker; and (b) for purposes of retirement pension, any firefighter, emergency worker, ((or)) reserve officer, or volunteer emergency worker who is or may become eligible to receive a benefit of any type under the retirement provisions of this chapter, or whose beneficiary may be eligible to receive any such benefit.

(((9))) (10) "Performance of duty" or "performance of service" shall be construed to mean and include any work in and about company quarters, any fire station, any law enforcement office or precinct, or any other place under the direction or general orders of the chief or other officer having authority to order such member to perform such work; performing other officially assigned duties that are secondary to his or her duties as a firefighter, emergency worker, ((or)) reserve officer, or volunteer emergency worker such as maintenance, public education, inspections, investigations, court testimony, and fund-raising for the benefit of the department; being on call or on standby under the orders of the chief or designated officer of the department, except at the individual's home or place of business; responding to, working at, or returning from an alarm of fire, emergency call, or law enforcement duties; drill or training; or any work performed of an emergency nature in accordance with the rules and regulations of the fire department, emergency medical service district, nonprofit ambulance service provider, or local law enforcement agency, and within all applicable local and state rules, regulations, and laws.

(((10))) (11) "Principal fund" means the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund created under RCW 41.24.030.

(((11))) (12) "Relief" means all medical, death, and disability benefits available under this chapter that are made necessary from death, sickness, injury, or disability arising in the performance of duty, including benefits provided under RCW 41.24.110, 41.24.150, 41.24.160, 41.24.175, 41.24.220, and 41.24.230, but does not include retirement pensions provided under this chapter.

(((12))) (13) "Reserve officer" means the same as defined by the Washington state criminal justice training commission under chapter 43.101 RCW, but shall not include enforcement officers who are eligible for participation in the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system or the Washington public employees' retirement system, with respect to periods of service rendered in such capacity.

(((13))) (14) "Retired participant" means any participant who is at least sixty-five years of age and has been retired by the board of trustees under RCW 41.24.170 and has been in receipt of a monthly pension for no less than three months.

(((14))) (15) "Retirement pension" means retirement payments for the performance of service, as provided under RCW 41.24.170, 41.24.172, 41.24.175, 41.24.180, and 41.24.185.

(((15))) (16) "State board" means the state board for volunteer firefighters and reserve officers.

(17) "Volunteer emergency worker" means any emergency medical service personnel certified to render prehospital basic life support emergency care by the department of health and regulated by chapter 18.73 RCW, and who is a member of a nonprofit ambulance service provider, but does not include emergency medical technicians that receive payment for such services or are certified to render advanced life support emergency care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 41.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every nonprofit ambulance service provider maintaining and operating regularly organized ambulance service may make provision by appropriate legislation for the enrollment of every volunteer emergency worker under the relief provisions of this chapter for the purpose of providing protection for all its volunteer emergency workers and their families from death, sickness, injury, or disability arising in the performance of their duties as volunteer emergency workers. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit any nonprofit ambulance service provider from providing such additional protection for relief as it may deem proper.

(2) Any nonprofit ambulance service provider maintaining and operating regularly organized ambulance service that has elected to participate in the relief provisions of this chapter may make provision by appropriate legislation allowing any volunteer emergency worker to enroll under the retirement pension provisions of this chapter.

(3) A nonprofit ambulance service provider cannot participate in the pension provisions of this chapter unless it elects to participate in the relief provisions of this chapter.

(4) Every nonprofit ambulance service provider shall make provisions for the collection and payment of the fees provided under this chapter, and shall continue to make such provisions for all volunteer emergency workers who come under this chapter as long as they continue to be members of the nonprofit ambulance service provider.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.24.030 and 2005 c 37 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund is created in the state treasury as a trust fund for the benefit of the participants covered by this chapter consisting of:

(a) All bequests, fees, gifts, emoluments, or donations given or paid to the fund.

(b) An annual fee for each member of its fire department to be paid by each municipal corporation for the purpose of affording relief provided in this chapter for firefighters as follows:

(i) Thirty dollars for each volunteer or part-paid member of its fire department;

(ii) A sum equal to one and one-half of one percent of the annual salary attached to the rank of each full-paid member of its fire department, prorated for 1970 on the basis of services prior to March 1, 1970.

(c) An annual fee for each emergency worker of an emergency medical service district paid by the district that is sufficient to pay the full costs of covering the emergency worker under the relief provisions of this chapter, including operating expenses. The state board shall determine the amount of this fee based on the latest actuarial valuation of the system.

(d) An annual fee for each volunteer emergency worker of a nonprofit ambulance service provider paid by the provider that is sufficient to pay the full costs of covering the volunteer emergency worker under the relief provisions of this chapter, including operating expenses. The state board shall determine the amount of this fee based on the latest actuarial valuation of the system.

(e) Where a municipal corporation has elected to make relief provisions of this chapter available to its reserve officers, an annual fee for each reserve officer paid by the municipal corporation that is sufficient to pay the full costs of covering the reserve officer under the relief provisions of this chapter, including operating expenses. The state board shall determine the amount of this fee based on the latest actuarial valuation of the system.

(((e))) (f) Where a municipal corporation has elected to make the retirement pension provisions of this chapter available to members of its fire department, an annual fee of sixty dollars for each of its firefighters electing to enroll, thirty dollars of which shall be paid by the municipality and thirty dollars of which shall be paid by the firefighter. However, nothing in this section prohibits any municipality from voluntarily paying the firefighters' fee for this retirement pension coverage.

(((f))) (g) Where an emergency medical service district has elected to make the retirement pension provisions of this chapter available to its emergency workers, for each emergency worker electing to enroll: (i) An annual fee of thirty dollars shall be paid by the emergency worker; and (ii) an annual fee paid by the emergency medical service district that, together with the thirty dollar fee per emergency worker, is sufficient to pay the full costs of covering the emergency worker under the retirement pension benefits provided under this chapter, including operating expenses. The state board shall determine the amount of this fee based on the latest actuarial valuation of the system. However, nothing in this section prohibits any emergency medical service district from voluntarily paying the emergency workers' fees for this retirement pension coverage.

(((g))) (h) Where a nonprofit ambulance service provider has elected to make the retirement pension provisions of this chapter available to its volunteer emergency workers, for each volunteer emergency worker electing to enroll: (i) An annual fee of thirty dollars shall be paid by the volunteer emergency worker; and (ii) an annual fee shall be paid by the nonprofit ambulance service provider that, together with the thirty dollar fee per volunteer emergency worker, is sufficient to pay the full costs of covering the volunteer emergency worker under the retirement pension benefits provided under this chapter, including operating expenses. The state board shall determine the amount of this fee based on the latest actuarial valuation of the system. However, nothing in this section prohibits any nonprofit ambulance service provider from voluntarily paying the volunteer emergency workers' fees for this retirement pension coverage.

(i) Where a municipal corporation has elected to make the retirement pension provisions of this chapter available to its reserve officers, for each reserve officer electing to enroll: (i) An annual fee of thirty dollars shall be paid by the reserve officer; and (ii) an annual fee paid by the municipal corporation that, together with the thirty dollar fee per reserve officer, is sufficient to pay the full costs of covering the reserve officer under the retirement pension benefits provided under this chapter, including operating expenses. The state board shall determine the amount of this fee based on the latest actuarial valuation of the system. However, nothing in this section prohibits any municipal corporation from voluntarily paying the reserve officers' fees for this retirement pension coverage.

(((h))) (j) Moneys transferred from the administrative fund, as provided under subsection (4) of this section, which may only be used to pay relief and retirement pensions for firefighters.

(((i))) (k) Earnings from the investment of moneys in the principal fund.

(2) The state investment board, upon request of the state treasurer shall have full power to invest, reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or exchange investments acquired from that portion of the amounts credited to the principal fund as is not, in the judgment of the state board, required to meet current withdrawals. Investments shall be made in the manner prescribed by RCW 43.84.150 and not otherwise.

All bonds, investments, or other obligations purchased by the state investment board shall be placed in the custody of the state treasurer, and he or she shall collect the principal thereof and interest thereon when due.

The state investment board may sell any of the bonds, investments, or obligations so acquired and the proceeds thereof shall be paid to the state treasurer.

(3) The interest, earnings, and proceeds from the sale and redemption of any investments held by the principal fund and invested by the state investment board shall be credited to and form a part of the principal fund, less the allocation to the state investment board expense account pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160.

Subject to restrictions contained in this chapter, all amounts credited to the principal fund shall be available for making the benefit payments required by this chapter.

The state treasurer shall make an annual report showing the condition of the fund.

(4) The volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the fund, including unanticipated revenues under RCW 43.79.270, may be spent only after appropriation, and may be used only for operating expenses of the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the operating expenses of the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, or for transfer from the administrative fund to the principal fund.

(a) Forty percent of all moneys received by the state from taxes on fire insurance premiums shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the administrative fund.

(b) The state board shall compute a percentage of the amounts credited to the administrative fund to be paid into the principal fund.

(c) For the purpose of providing amounts to be used to defray the cost of administration of the principal and administrative funds, the state board shall ascertain at the beginning of each biennium and request from the legislature an appropriation from the administrative fund sufficient to cover estimated expenses for the biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 41.24 RCW to read as follows:

On or before the first day of March of each year, every nonprofit ambulance service provider shall pay such amount as shall be due from it to the principal fund, together with the amounts collected from the participants. A participant shall not forfeit his or her right to participate in the relief provisions of this chapter by reason of the municipal corporation failing to pay the amount due from it. A participant shall not forfeit his or her right to participate in the retirement pension provisions of this chapter until after March 1st of the year in which the municipality fails to make the required payments. Where a nonprofit ambulance service provider has failed to pay or remit the annual fees required within the time provided, such delinquent payment shall bear interest at the rate of one percent per month from March 1st until paid or remitted. Where a participant has forfeited his or her right to participate in the retirement provisions of this chapter that participant may be reinstated so as to participate to the same extent as if all fees had been paid by the payment of all back fees with interest at the rate of one percent per month provided he or she has at all times been otherwise eligible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 41.24 RCW to read as follows:

The chair of the county legislative authority, or the chair's designee, shall be chair of the nonprofit ambulance service provider board of trustees, and the county auditor, or the auditor's designee, shall be the secretary-treasurer of the nonprofit ambulance service provider board of trustees.

The secretary shall keep a public record of all proceedings and of all receipts and disbursements made by the nonprofit ambulance service provider board of trustees, shall make an annual report of its expenses and disbursements with a full list of the beneficiaries of the principal fund in the county, and shall make all required reports to the state board. The state board shall provide all necessary forms to nonprofit ambulance service provider boards of trustees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 41.24 RCW to read as follows:

The board of trustees created under section 13 of this act shall provide for enrollment of all volunteer emergency workers of the nonprofit ambulance service provider under the relief provisions of this chapter; provide for enrollment of all volunteer emergency workers of the nonprofit ambulance service provider under the relief provisions of this chapter; receive all applications for the enrollment under the retirement pension provisions of this chapter when the nonprofit ambulance service provider has extended these retirement pension provisions to its volunteer emergency workers; provide for disbursements of relief; determine the eligibility of volunteer emergency workers for retirement pensions; and pass on all claims and direct payment thereof from the principal fund to those entitled thereto. Vouchers shall be issued to the persons entitled thereto by the local board. It shall send to the state board, after each meeting, a voucher for each person entitled to payment from the principal fund, stating the amount of such payment and for what granted, which voucher shall be certified and signed by the chair and secretary of the local board. The state board, after review and approval, shall cause a warrant to be issued on the principal fund for the amount specified and approved on each voucher. However, in retirement pension cases after the applicant's eligibility for pension is verified, the state board shall authorize the regular issuance of monthly warrants or electronic transfers of funds in payment of the retirement pension without further action of the board of trustees.

Sec. 7. RCW 41.24.170 and 2003 c 62 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in RCW 41.24.410, whenever any participant has been a member and served honorably for a period of ten years or more as an active member in any capacity, of any regularly organized fire department or law enforcement agency of any municipality in this state, and which municipality has adopted appropriate legislation allowing its firefighters or reserve officers to enroll in the retirement pension provisions of this chapter, and the participant has enrolled under the retirement pension provisions and has reached the age of sixty-five years, the board of trustees shall order and direct that he or she be retired and be paid a monthly pension from the principal fund as provided in this section.

Whenever a participant has been a member, and served honorably for a period of twenty-five years or more as an active member in any capacity, of any regularly organized volunteer fire department or law enforcement agency of any municipality in this state, and he or she has reached the age of sixty-five years, and the annual retirement fee has been paid for a period of twenty-five years, the board of trustees shall order and direct that he or she be retired and such participant be paid a monthly pension of three hundred dollars from the fund for the balance of that participant's life.

Whenever any participant has been a member, and served honorably for a period of twenty-five years or more as an active member in any capacity, of any regularly organized volunteer fire department, emergency medical service district, or law enforcement agency of any municipality in this state, and the participant has reached the age of sixty-five years, and the annual retirement fee has been paid for a period of less than twenty-five years, the board of trustees shall order and direct that he or she be retired and that such participant shall receive a minimum monthly pension of fifty dollars increased by the sum of ten dollars each month for each year the annual fee has been paid, but not to exceed the maximum monthly pension provided in this section, for the balance of the participant's life.

Whenever any participant has been a member, and served honorably for a period of ten years or more as an active volunteer emergency worker of a nonprofit ambulance service provider and which nonprofit ambulance service provider has adopted appropriate legislation allowing its volunteer emergency workers to enroll in the retirement pension provisions of this chapter, and the participant has enrolled under the retirement pension provisions and has reached the age of sixty-five years, the board of trustees shall order and direct that he or she be retired and be paid a monthly pension from the principal fund as provided in this section.

Whenever a participant has been a member, and served honorably for a period of twenty-five years or more as an active volunteer emergency worker of a nonprofit ambulance service provider, and he or she has reached the age of sixty-five years, and the annual retirement fee has been paid for a period of twenty-five years, the board of trustees shall order and direct that he or she be retired and such participant be paid a monthly pension of three hundred dollars from the fund for the balance of that participant's life.

Whenever any participant has been a member, and served honorably for a period of twenty-five years or more as an active volunteer emergency worker of a nonprofit ambulance service provider and the participant has reached the age of sixty-five years, and the annual retirement fee has been paid for a period of less than twenty-five years, the board of trustees shall order and direct that he or she be retired and that such participant shall receive a minimum monthly pension of fifty dollars increased by the sum of ten dollars each month for each year the annual fee has been paid, but not to exceed the maximum monthly pension provided in this section, for the balance of the participant's life.

No pension provided in this section may become payable before the sixty-fifth birthday of the participant, nor for any service less than twenty-five years: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That:

(1) Any participant, who is older than fifty-nine years of age, less than sixty-five years of age, and has completed twenty-five years or more of service may irrevocably elect a reduced monthly pension in lieu of the pension that participant would be entitled to under this section at age sixty-five. The participant who elects this option shall receive the reduced pension for the balance of his or her life. The reduced monthly pension is calculated as a percentage of the pension the participant would be entitled to at age sixty-five. The percentage used in the calculation is based upon the age of the participant at the time of retirement as follows:

Age 60 Sixty percent

Age 61 Sixty-eight percent

Age 62 Seventy-six percent

Age 63 Eighty-four percent

Age 64 Ninety-two percent

(2) If a participant is age sixty-five or older but has less than twenty-five years of service, the participant is entitled to a reduced benefit. The reduced benefit shall be computed as follows:

(a) Upon completion of ten years, but less than fifteen years of service, a monthly pension equal to twenty percent of such pension as the participant would have been entitled to receive at age sixty-five after twenty-five years of service;

(b) Upon completion of fifteen years, but less than twenty years of service, a monthly pension equal to thirty-five percent of such pension as the participant would have been entitled to receive at age sixty-five after twenty-five years of service; and

(c) Upon completion of twenty years, but less than twenty-five years of service, a monthly pension equal to seventy-five percent of such pension as the participant would have been entitled to receive at age sixty-five after twenty-five years of service.

(3) If a participant with less than twenty-five years of service elects to retire after turning age sixty but before turning age sixty-five, the participant's retirement allowance is subject:

(a) First to the reduction under subsection (2) of this section based upon the participant's years of service; and

(b) Second to the reduction under subsection (1) of this section based upon the participant's age.

Sec. 8. RCW 41.24.175 and 1989 c 91 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Payments to persons who are now receiving, or who may hereafter receive any disability or retirement payments under the provisions of this chapter (( 41.24 RCW)) shall be computed in accordance with the last act enacted by the legislature relative thereto: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That nothing herein contained shall be construed as reducing the amount of any pension to which any firefighter, emergency worker, volunteer emergency worker, or law enforcement officer shall have been eligible to receive under the provisions of section 1, chapter 103, Laws of 1951.

Sec. 9. RCW 41.24.180 and 1999 c 148 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The board of trustees of any municipal corporation or nonprofit ambulance service provider shall direct payment from the principal fund in the following cases:

(1) To any participant, upon his or her request, upon attaining the age of sixty-five years, who, for any reason, is not qualified to receive the monthly retirement pension provided under this chapter and who was enrolled in the retirement provisions and on whose behalf annual fees for retirement pension were paid, a lump sum amount equal to the amount paid into the fund by the participant.

(2) If any participant who has not completed at least ten years of service dies without having requested a lump sum payment under subsection (1) or (3) of this section, there shall be paid to the participant's surviving spouse, or if there be no surviving spouse, then to such participant's legal representatives, a lump sum amount equal to the amount paid into the fund by the participant. If any participant who has completed at least ten years of service dies other than as the result of injuries received or sickness contracted in consequence or as the result of the performance of his or her duties, without having requested a lump sum payment under subsection (1) or (3) of this section and before beginning to receive the monthly pension provided for in this chapter, the participant's surviving spouse shall elect to receive either:

(a) A monthly pension computed as provided for in RCW 41.24.170 actuarially adjusted to reflect option 2 of RCW 41.24.172 and further actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between the participant's age at death and age sixty-five; ((or))

(b) A lump sum amount equal to the amount paid into the principal fund by the participant and the municipality or municipalities in whose department he or she has served; or

(c) A lump sum amount equal to the amount paid into the principal fund by the participant and the nonprofit ambulance service provider in whose service he or she has served.

If there be no such surviving spouse, then there shall be paid to the participant's legal representatives a lump sum amount equal to the amount paid into the fund by the participant.

(3) If any participant retires from service before attaining the age of sixty-five years, the participant may make application for the return in a lump sum of the amount paid into the fund by himself or herself.

Sec. 10. RCW 41.24.200 and 1999 c 148 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The aggregate term of service of any participant need not be continuous nor need it be confined to a single fire department, emergency medical service district, nonprofit ambulance service provider, or law enforcement agency nor a single municipality in this state to entitle such participant to a retirement pension if the participant has been duly enrolled in a fire department, emergency medical service district, nonprofit ambulance service provider, or law enforcement agency ((of a municipality)) which has elected to extend the retirement pension provisions of this chapter to its firefighters, emergency workers, volunteer emergency workers, or reserve officers at the time he or she becomes eligible for the retirement pension and has paid all fees prescribed. To be eligible to the full pension a participant must have an aggregate of twenty-five years service, have made twenty-five annual payments into the fund, and be sixty-five years of age at the time the participant commences drawing the pension provided for by this chapter, all of which twenty-five years service must have been in the fire department, emergency medical service district, nonprofit ambulance service provider, or law enforcement agency of a municipality or municipalities which have elected to extend the retirement pension provisions of this chapter to its firefighters, emergency workers, volunteer emergency workers, or reserve officers. Nothing in this chapter shall require any participant having twenty-five years active service to continue as a firefighter, emergency worker, volunteer emergency worker, or reserve officer and no participant who has completed twenty-five years of active service for which annual retirement pension fees have been paid and who continues as a firefighter, emergency worker, volunteer emergency worker, or reserve officer shall be required to pay any additional annual pension fees.

Sec. 11. RCW 41.24.215 and 2005 c 37 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If an injured volunteer seeks damages from a third party, the state board may also seek recovery of actual costs from the responsible third party. A volunteer seeking damages from a third party is required to notify the state board about the legal proceeding.

(2) The state board is responsible for its proportionate share of the costs and attorneys' fees of the legal proceedings.

(3) Any recovery is subject to a lien by the state board for its share under this section.

(4) This section does not restrict or prohibit the state board's right to seek recovery from a third party when a volunteer ((firefighter)) is injured.

Sec. 12. RCW 41.24.290 and 1999 c 148 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

The state board shall:

(1) Generally supervise and control the administration of this chapter;

(2) Promulgate, amend, or repeal rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter for the purpose of effecting a uniform and efficient manner of carrying out the provisions of this chapter and the purposes to be accomplished thereby, and for the government of boards of trustees of the municipalities or nonprofit ambulance service providers of this state in the discharge of their functions under this chapter;

(3) Review any action, and hear and determine any appeal which may be taken from the decision of the board of trustees of any municipality or nonprofit ambulance service provider made pursuant to this chapter;

(4) Take such action as may be necessary to secure compliance of the municipalities or nonprofit ambulance service providers governed by this chapter and to provide for the collection of all fees and penalties which are, or may be, due and delinquent from any such municipality or nonprofit ambulance service provider;

(5) Review the action of the board of trustees of any municipality or nonprofit ambulance service provider authorizing any pension as provided by this chapter; and authorize the regular issuance of monthly warrants in payment thereof without further action of the board of trustees of such municipality or nonprofit ambulance service provider;

(6) Require periodic reports from the recipient of any benefits under this chapter for the purpose of determining their continued eligibility therefor;

(7) Maintain such records as may be necessary and proper for the proper maintenance and operation of the principal fund, including records of the names of every person enrolled under this chapter, and provide all necessary forms to enable local boards of trustees to effectively carry out their duties as provided by this chapter;

(8) Compel the taking of testimony from witnesses under oath before the state board, or any member or the secretary thereof, or before the local board of trustees or any member thereof, for the purpose of obtaining evidence, at any time, in connection with any claim or pension pending or authorized for payment. For such purpose the state board shall have the same power of subpoena as prescribed in RCW 51.52.100. Failure of any claimant to appear and give any testimony as herein provided shall suspend any rights or eligibility to receive payments for the period of such failure to appear and testify;

(9) Appoint a secretary to hold office at the pleasure of the state board, fix the secretary's compensation at such sum as it shall deem appropriate, and prescribe the secretary's duties not otherwise provided by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. A new section is added to chapter 41.24 RCW to read as follows:

A nonprofit ambulance service provider board of trustees is created to administer this chapter in every county in which a nonprofit ambulance service provider operates. The nonprofit ambulance service provider board shall consist of two of the members of the county legislative authority or their designees, the county auditor or the auditor's designee, the head of each nonprofit ambulance service provider, and one volunteer emergency worker from each nonprofit ambulance service provider to be elected by the volunteer emergency workers of each nonprofit ambulance service provider for a term of one year and annually thereafter.

The secretary of the board of trustees shall keep a public record of all proceedings and of all receipts and disbursements made by the nonprofit ambulance service provider board of trustees, shall make an annual report of its expenses and disbursements with a full list of the beneficiaries of the principal fund, and shall make all required reports to the state board. The state board shall provide all necessary forms to emergency nonprofit ambulance service provider boards of trustees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. A new section is added to chapter 41.24 RCW to read as follows:

Credit for service as a volunteer emergency worker shall not be counted for purposes of RCW 41.24.170 except as stated in this section. Within one year of an election to volunteer emergency workers under the retirement provisions of this chapter, the nonprofit ambulance service provider must elect, on a one-time basis, one of the following:

(1) To count credit for service and pay for fees only after July 1, 2016; or

(2) To count credit for all service as an emergency medical technician, but only if the actuarial cost, as determined by the state board, is paid by the nonprofit ambulance service provider. The nonprofit ambulance service provider may charge volunteer emergency workers for any portion of the cost.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. A new section is added to chapter 41.24 RCW to read as follows:

A nonprofit ambulance service provider employing volunteer emergency workers may adopt appropriate legislation extending the relief provisions of this chapter to its volunteer emergency workers. The relief provisions of this chapter may not be extended to volunteer emergency workers if the nonprofit ambulance service provider has extended industrial insurance coverage to its volunteer emergency workers under RCW 51.12.140 or 51.12.035(2), or any other provision of law. A nonprofit ambulance service provider that adopts appropriate legislation extending the relief provisions of this chapter to its volunteer emergency workers shall enjoy the same extent of immunity from civil actions for personal injuries to its volunteer emergency workers that arises if the volunteer emergency workers were covered under Title 51 RCW.

--- END ---