BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Public works contracts awarded or managed by the department of enterprise services must include a provision requiring the contractor and each and every subcontractor on the project to submit to the department, at least twice per month, the following information:

(a) Current and complete certified payroll information for all work on the project subject to prevailing wage requirements under chapter 39.12 RCW; and

(b) Apprentice utilization information.

(2) Certified payroll information must be submitted in an electronic form to the department of enterprise services or to the public agency managing the public works project. Subcontractors may submit their payroll records to the prime contractor on the public works project, who must then submit the records to the department of enterprise services or the public agency managing the project. The electronic submission must meet minimum payroll data requirements.

(3) Upon request from the department of labor and industries, the recipient of the electronic certified payroll records must provide the electronic certified payroll data to the department of labor and industries.

(4) This section applies to contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2016.

(5) The department of enterprise services may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---