BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.155.050 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 983 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning loans.

(2) During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to the general fund, the water pollution control revolving account, and the drinking water assistance account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for economic development, innovation, and export grants, including brownfields; main street improvement grants; and the loan program consolidation board. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to the education legacy trust account such amounts as specified by the legislature. During the 2015-2017 and 2017-2019 fiscal biennia, the legislature may not transfer money from the public works assistance account for any of the purposes described in this subsection and may only use the account for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---