BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.29.071 and 1996 c 191 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall establish the administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees for renewal of licenses as provided in this chapter and in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(2) The licensee must provide information on primary place of practice as requested by the secretary at the time of license renewal.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.32.180 and 1999 c 364 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person licensed to practice dentistry in this state shall renew his or her license and comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, continuing education requirements, and fees as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The commission, in its sole discretion, may permit the applicant to be licensed without examination, and with or without conditions, if it is satisfied that the applicant meets all the requirements for licensure in this state and is competent to engage in the practice of dentistry.

(2) The licensee must provide information on primary place of practice as requested by the secretary at the time of license renewal.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.50.102 and 2014 c 187 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A licensed midwife must renew his or her license according to the following requirements:

(a) Completion of a minimum of thirty hours of continuing education, approved by the secretary, every three years;

(b) Proof of participation in a Washington state coordinated quality improvement program as detailed in rule;

(c) Proof of participation in data submission on perinatal outcomes to a national or state research organization, as detailed in rule; and

(d) Fees determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(2) The secretary shall write rules regarding the renewal requirements and the department's process for verification of the third-party data submission. The licensee must provide information on primary place of practice as requested by the secretary at the time of license renewal.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.64.080 and 2013 c 19 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may license as a pharmacist any person who has filed an application therefor, subscribed by the person under oath or affirmation, containing such information as the commission may by regulation require, and who—

(a) Is at least eighteen years of age;

(b) Has satisfied the commission that he or she is of good moral and professional character, that he or she will carry out the duties and responsibilities required of a pharmacist, and that he or she is not unfit or unable to practice pharmacy by reason of the extent or manner of his or her proven use of alcoholic beverages, drugs, or controlled substances, or by reason of a proven physical or mental disability;

(c) Holds a baccalaureate degree in pharmacy or a doctor of pharmacy degree granted by a school or college of pharmacy which is accredited by the commission;

(d) Has completed or has otherwise met the internship requirements as set forth in commission rules;

(e) Has satisfactorily passed the necessary examinations approved by the commission and administered by the department.

(2) The department shall, at least once in every calendar year, offer an examination to all applicants for a pharmacist license who have completed their educational and internship requirements pursuant to rules promulgated by the commission. The examination shall be determined by the commission. In case of failure at a first examination, the applicant shall have within three years the privilege of a second and third examination. In case of failure in a third examination, the applicant shall not be eligible for further examination until he or she has satisfactorily completed additional preparation as directed and approved by the commission. The applicant must pay the examination fee determined by the secretary for each examination taken. Upon passing the required examinations and complying with all the rules and regulations of the commission and the provisions of this chapter, the department shall grant the applicant a license as a pharmacist and issue to him or her a certificate qualifying him or her to enter into the practice of pharmacy.

(3) Any person enrolled as a student of pharmacy in an accredited college may file with the department an application for registration as a pharmacy intern in which application he or she shall be required to furnish such information as the commission may, by regulation, prescribe and, simultaneously with the filing of said application, shall pay to the department a fee to be determined by the secretary. All certificates issued to pharmacy interns shall be valid for a period to be determined by the commission, but in no instance shall the certificate be valid if the individual is no longer making timely progress toward graduation, provided however, the commission may issue an intern certificate to a person to complete an internship to be eligible for initial licensure or for the reinstatement of a previously licensed pharmacist.

(4) To assure adequate practical instruction, pharmacy internship experience as required under this chapter shall be obtained after registration as a pharmacy intern by practice in any licensed pharmacy or other program meeting the requirements promulgated by regulation of the commission, and shall include such instruction in the practice of pharmacy as the commission by regulation shall prescribe.

(5) The department may, without examination other than one in the laws relating to the practice of pharmacy, license as a pharmacist any person who, at the time of filing application therefor, is currently licensed as a pharmacist in any other state, territory, or possession of the United States. The person shall produce evidence satisfactory to the department of having had the required secondary and professional education and training and who was licensed as a pharmacist by examination in another state prior to June 13, 1963, shall be required to satisfy only the requirements which existed in this state at the time he or she became licensed in such other state, and that the state in which the person is licensed shall under similar conditions grant reciprocal licenses as pharmacist without examination to pharmacists duly licensed by examination in this state. Every application under this subsection shall be accompanied by a fee determined by the department.

(6)(a) The department shall provide for, regulate, and require all persons licensed as pharmacists to renew their license periodically, and shall prescribe the form of such license and information required to be submitted by all applicants.

(b) The licensees must provide information on primary place of practice as requested by the secretary at the time of license renewal.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.71.080 and 2015 c 252 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Every person licensed to practice medicine in this state shall pay licensing fees and renew his or her license in accordance with administrative procedures and administrative requirements adopted as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(b) The commission shall request licensees to submit information about their current professional practice at the time of license renewal and licensees must provide the information requested. This information must include the licensees' primary place of practice and may include practice setting, medical specialty, board certification, or other relevant data determined by the commission.

(c) A physician who resides and practices in Washington and obtains or renews a retired active license shall be exempt from licensing fees imposed under this section. The commission may establish rules governing mandatory continuing education requirements which shall be met by physicians applying for renewal of licenses. The rules shall provide that mandatory continuing education requirements may be met in part by physicians showing evidence of the completion of approved activities relating to professional liability risk management. The number of hours of continuing education for a physician holding a retired active license shall not exceed fifty hours per year.

(2) The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the commission with information on methods of recognizing victims of human trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to minor victims. The commission shall disseminate this information to licensees by: Providing the information on the commission's web site; including the information in newsletters; holding trainings at meetings attended by organization members; or another distribution method determined by the commission. The commission shall report to the office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses to distribute information under this subsection.

(3) The commission, in its sole discretion, may permit an applicant who has not renewed his or her license to be licensed without examination if it is satisfied that such applicant meets all the requirements for licensure in this state, and is competent to engage in the practice of medicine.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.71A.020 and 2015 c 252 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall adopt rules fixing the qualifications and the educational and training requirements for licensure as a physician assistant or for those enrolled in any physician assistant training program. The requirements shall include completion of an accredited physician assistant training program approved by the commission and within one year successfully take and pass an examination approved by the commission, if the examination tests subjects substantially equivalent to the curriculum of an accredited physician assistant training program. An interim permit may be granted by the department of health for one year provided the applicant meets all other requirements. Physician assistants licensed by the board of medical examiners, or the medical quality assurance commission as of July 1, 1999, shall continue to be licensed.

(2)(a) The commission shall adopt rules governing the extent to which:

(i) Physician assistant students may practice medicine during training; and

(ii) Physician assistants may practice after successful completion of a physician assistant training course.

(b) Such rules shall provide:

(i) That the practice of a physician assistant shall be limited to the performance of those services for which he or she is trained; and

(ii) That each physician assistant shall practice medicine only under the supervision and control of a physician licensed in this state, but such supervision and control shall not be construed to necessarily require the personal presence of the supervising physician or physicians at the place where services are rendered.

(3) Applicants for licensure shall file an application with the commission on a form prepared by the secretary with the approval of the commission, detailing the education, training, and experience of the physician assistant and such other information as the commission may require. The application shall be accompanied by a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. A surcharge of fifty dollars per year shall be charged on each license renewal or issuance of a new license to be collected by the department and deposited into the impaired physician account for physician assistant participation in the impaired physician program. Each applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to the commission of the following:

(a) That the applicant has completed an accredited physician assistant program approved by the commission and is eligible to take the examination approved by the commission;

(b) That the applicant is of good moral character; and

(c) That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of practicing medicine as a physician assistant with reasonable skill and safety. The commission may require an applicant to submit to such examination or examinations as it deems necessary to determine an applicant's physical or mental capability, or both, to safely practice as a physician assistant.

(4)(a) The commission may approve, deny, or take other disciplinary action upon the application for license as provided in the Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW.

(b) The license shall be renewed as determined under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The commission shall request licensees to submit information about their current professional practice at the time of license renewal and licensees must provide the information requested. This information must include the licensees' primary place of practice and may include practice setting, medical specialty, or other relevant data determined by the commission.

(c) The commission may authorize the use of alternative supervisors who are licensed either under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

(5) All funds in the impaired physician account shall be paid to the contract entity within sixty days of deposit.

Sec. 7. RCW 18.79.210 and 1996 c 191 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A license issued under this chapter must be renewed, except as provided in this chapter. The licensee shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees as determined under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(2) The licensee must provide information on primary place of practice as requested by the secretary at the time of license renewal.

Sec. 8. RCW 18.225.150 and 2008 c 135 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall establish by rule the procedural requirements and fees for renewal of a license or associate license. Failure to renew shall invalidate the license or associate license and all privileges granted by the license. If an associate license has lapsed, the person shall submit an updated declaration, in accordance with rules adopted by the department, that the person is working toward full licensure. If a license has lapsed for a period longer than three years, the person shall demonstrate competence to the satisfaction of the secretary by taking continuing education courses, or meeting other standards determined by the secretary. If an associate license has lapsed, the person shall submit an updated declaration, in accordance with rules adopted by the department, that the person is working toward full licensure.

(2) The licensee must provide information on primary place of practice as requested by the secretary at the time of license renewal.

Sec. 9. RCW 18.83.090 and 2009 c 492 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall establish rules governing mandatory continuing education requirements which shall be met by any psychologist applying for a license renewal.

(2) The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the board with information on methods of recognizing victims of human trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to minor victims. The board shall disseminate this information to licensees by: Providing the information on the board's web site; including the information in newsletters; holding trainings at meetings attended by organization members; or ((through)) another distribution method determined by the board. The board shall report to the office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses to distribute information under this subsection.

(3) Administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees for renewal and reissue of licenses shall be established as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(4) The licensee must provide information on primary place of practice as requested by the secretary at the time of license renewal.

Sec. 10. RCW 18.205.120 and 1998 c 243 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Applications for certification shall be submitted on forms provided by the secretary. The secretary may require any information and documentation that reasonably relates to the need to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for certification provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. Each applicant shall pay a fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The fee shall accompany the application. Applicants for certification must provide information on primary place of practice as requested by the secretary at the time of license renewal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. This act takes effect September 30, 2016.

--- END ---