BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The sum of one million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016, from the general fund to the department of agriculture for the purposes of revitalizing the department of agriculture's farm-to-school program, RCW 15.64.060, and the small farm direct marketing assistance program, RCW 15.64.050.

--- END ---