BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

During the design process for state highway projects that include the construction of a new bridge or the rehabilitation or reconstruction of an existing bridge across a navigable river or another transportation facility that is adjacent to or crosses a waterway, the department must consider and report on the feasibility of providing a means of public access to the navigable river or waterway for public recreational purposes.

--- END ---