BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in the following sections, the several amounts specified in parts I through IX of this act, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for salaries, wages, and other expenses of the agencies and offices of the state and for other specified purposes for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2015, and ending June 30, 2017, except as otherwise provided, out of the several funds of the state hereinafter named. The state general fund expenditures in this act for fiscal years 2015, 2016, and 2017 constitute the state expenditure limit for the purposes of chapter 43.135 RCW.

(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this act.

(a) "Fiscal year 2016" or "FY 2016" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016.

(b) "Fiscal year 2017" or "FY 2017" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017.

(c) "FTE" means full time equivalent.

(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.

(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose which is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101. FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$32,673,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$33,453,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,858,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$67,984,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102. FOR THE SENATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$22,956,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$25,184,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,695,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$49,835,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103. FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

Performance Audit of Government Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$6,858,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may adjust the due dates for projects included on the committee's 2015-17 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.

(2) The committee shall conduct an analysis of how school districts use school days. The analysis must include:

(a) How school districts define classroom time, nonclassroom time, instructional time, noninstructional time, and any other definitions of how the school day is divided or used;

(b) Estimates of time in each category;

(c) How noninstructional time is distributed over the annual number of school days;

(d) When noninstructional hours occur;

(e) How noninstructional hours are used, including how much noninstructional time is devoted to professional development for the purposes of teacher and principal evaluation training or common core state standards training; and

(f) The extent to which the use of each category of time is identified or defined in collective bargaining agreements.

To the extent data is not available at the statewide level, the committee may use case studies or other methods to conduct the analysis. The committee shall submit a report of its findings to the education committees of the legislature by December 1, 2016.

(3) The committee shall analyze the forest fire protection assessment established in chapter 76.04 RCW. The analysis shall include:

(a) The process the department of natural resources uses to determine the assessments;

(b) The statutory framework for assessing based on parcels and being considered forest land;

(c) The cost efficiency of the administrative processes to collect assessments and issue refunds;

(d) The rates of the assessment for forest fire protection, including the costs of county assessor participation;

(e) The historical relationship between the rates and protection expenditures or anticipated expenditures and eventual suppression expenditures;

(f) How other states assess for protection or suppression;

(g) Parcels assessed as forest lands that have become developed properties and are not covered, serviced, or taxed by a fire protection district.

A report on the results of the analysis with any findings and recommendations shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 2016.

(4) $307,000 of the performance audit of government account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5944 (periodic review of new state spending programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) The joint legislative audit and review committee is directed to conduct an audit of the state medicaid fraud false claims act, chapter 74.66 RCW. The purpose of the audit is to examine the operation and performance of the medicaid fraud false claims act. A complete report with audit data and conclusions shall be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015. The audit shall include data collection and analysis of the costs and revenues of the act. The audit must achieve the following:

(a) Determine the amount of recovery received by the state under the medicaid fraud false claims act. This information must include the total amounts recovered, amounts recovered by year, and amounts recovered in the following categories:

(i) Actions in which the state was part of larger federal action or multistate effort (e.g., through the national association of medicaid fraud control units);

(ii) Actions that the state undertook on its own;

(iii) Actions that the state undertook as a result of suit filed by qui tam plaintiffs in which the state intervened; and

(iv) Actions that the state undertook as a result of suit filed by qui tam plaintiffs in which the state did not intervene;

(b) Determine the number of qui tam plaintiff suits filed, including the number of those in which the state intervened, the number of cases in which the state declined intervention, the number of cases in which the intervention decision is pending, the number of actions dismissed without recovery, the number of cases in which litigation is proceeding (after the intervention decision), and the number of cases in which the allegations have been dismissed as frivolous;

(c) Determine the amount of costs and attorneys' fees recovered by qui tam plaintiffs in settlements versus amounts of costs and attorneys' fees recovered by defendants in actions involving qui tam plaintiffs; and

(d) Assess whether the medicaid fraud false claims act is operating within legislative intent, is operating in an efficient manner, and is meeting any performance goals or targets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104. FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

Performance Audit of Government Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$3,584,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105. FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$8,835,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$8,573,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$17,408,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$296,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$296,000

State Health Care Authority Administrative

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$394,000

Department of Retirement Systems Expense

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$4,512,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,498,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $296,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $296,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $394,000 of the state health care administration account appropriation are to improve the legislature's access to independent and objective health care actuarial analysis for the state medicaid and public employee benefits programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107. FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$4,082,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$4,552,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$8,634,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108. FOR THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$3,740,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$4,128,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$7,868,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109. LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES

In order to achieve operating efficiencies within the financial resources available to the legislative branch, the executive rules committee of the house of representatives and the facilities and operations committee of the senate by joint action may transfer funds among the house of representatives, senate, joint legislative audit and review committee, legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, joint transportation committee, office of the state actuary, joint legislative systems committee, statute law committee, and office of legislative support services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110. FOR THE SUPREME COURT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$6,828,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$6,775,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$13,603,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111. FOR THE LAW LIBRARY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$1,551,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$1,539,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$3,090,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112. FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$1,111,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$1,034,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,145,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113. FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$16,464,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$17,170,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$33,634,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $627,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5449 (court of appeals tax division). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114. FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$50,232,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$50,182,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,137,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$661,000

Judicial Information Systems Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$53,346,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$6,691,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$163,249,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

(2) $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for school districts for petitions to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. The administrator for the courts shall develop an interagency agreement with the superintendent of public instruction to allocate the funding provided in this subsection. Allocation of this money to school districts shall be based on the number of petitions filed. This funding includes amounts school districts may expend on the cost of serving petitions filed under RCW 28A.225.030 by certified mail or by personal service or for the performance of service of process for any hearing associated with RCW 28A.225.030.

(3)(a) $7,313,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $7,313,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per-petition processing costs.

(b) Each fiscal year during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate fiscal committees no later than 60 days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(4) $313,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation is provided solely for the content management system for the appellate courts.

(5) $6,080,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for continued implementation of the superior court case management system project.

(6) $6,518,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for continued implementation of the superior court case management system. The steering committee for the superior court case management system, the office of administrator of the courts, and county clerks shall work with the case management system vendor to develop cost estimates for modifications to the superior court case management system to address security and document management concerns raised by county clerks. If the cost estimates are not provided to the fiscal committees of the legislature by January 1, 2016, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) The existing steering committee for the superior court case management system shall continue oversight responsibilities throughout the various phases of the project to include, but not be limited to, vendor management, contract and deliverable management, assuring reasonable satisfaction of the business and technical needs at the local level, receipt of stakeholder feedback, and communication between the various stakeholder groups and the judicial information systems committee. Issues of significant scope, schedule or budget changes, and risk mitigation strategies must be escalated to the judicial information systems committee for consideration. In the event that a majority of the steering committee members cannot reach a decision, the issue must be escalated to the judicial information systems committee for consideration. The superior court case management system project steering committee may solicit input from user groups as deemed appropriate.

(8) $8,540,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation is provided solely for the development, expansion, and implementation of an information network hub project to allow state and local case management systems to share critical data in the judicial information system.

(9) $1,849,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacement of computer equipment, including servers, routers, and storage system upgrades in county courts and county clerk offices.

(10) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5449 (court of appeals tax division). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the planning and design of a dependency court improvement demonstration program. The plan must be developed jointly with the one family one team public private partnership, with a private cash match of $75,000. If the cash match is not available by August 1, 2015, the administrative office of the courts will not be required to complete the planning and design of a dependency court improvement demonstration program. By January 1, 2016, the public private partnership shall provide to the appropriate committees of the legislature the program design, including ongoing administrative funding, and a statement of the public and private funding required to provide demonstration grants to up to four counties.

(12) $118,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 287, Laws of 2015 (Engrossed House Bill No. 1943).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115. FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$35,922,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$36,153,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,648,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$75,723,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The amounts provided include funding for expert and investigative services in death penalty personal restraint petitions.

(2) $924,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $462,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for parents representation program costs related to increased parental rights termination filings from the department of social and health services child permanency initiative.

(3) $451,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $915,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to increase payments for attorneys who contract with the office for indigent defense representation.

(4) $245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5486 (parents to parents program). Funds must be used to maintain the current programs in Grays Harbor/Pacific, King, Kitsap, Pierce, Snohomish, Spokane, and Thurston/Mason counties; expand services in three of these locations; provide for program administration; and to fund the first stage of an evaluation of the program to determine if the parents to parents program can be considered evidence-based. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116. FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$12,317,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$12,326,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,463,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$26,106,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $498,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $499,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the child legal representation program. To achieve efficiencies and to manage within appropriated amounts, beginning January 1, 2016, the office is directed to implement the child legal representation program for children under RCW 13.34.100 using attorneys under contract directly with the office in a manner similar to the parents representation program at the office of public defense. The office must consult with counties, county courts, and the office of public defense prior as it implements this operational change.

(2) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and an amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 may be used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise eligible persons who are sixty years of age or older on matters authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k) regardless of household income or asset level.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$5,239,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$5,202,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$14,441,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,000,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account appropriation is provided solely for efforts to assist with currently active industrial recruitment efforts that will bring new jobs to the state or will retain headquarter locations of major companies currently housed in the state.

(2) $684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the office of the education ombudsman.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118. FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$620,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$609,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$90,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,319,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119. FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$2,074,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$2,042,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,116,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120. FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$26,847,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$13,597,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$7,501,000

Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and Access﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$8,421,000

Charitable Organization Education Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$664,000

Local Government Archives Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$8,912,000

Election Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$8,865,000

Washington State Heritage Center Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$6,569,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$81,376,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,301,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.

(2)(a) $2,682,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,761,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and other events of statewide significance during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.

(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage.

(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;

(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.

(3) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to the funding for the library as a whole.

(4) $771,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $772,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the state library to purchase statewide on-line access to the information technology academy to allow public access to on-line courses and learning resources through public libraries.

(5) $11,497,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the 2016 presidential primary election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121. FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$260,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$263,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$523,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office shall assist the department of enterprise services on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department of enterprise services shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122. FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$218,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$219,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$437,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123. FOR THE STATE TREASURER

State Treasurer's Service Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$15,819,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $125,000 of the state treasurer's service account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2063 (better life experience program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124. FOR THE STATE AUDITOR

Performance Audit of Government Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$1,531,000

State Auditing Services Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$9,382,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$10,913,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,531,000 of the performance audit of government account—state appropriation is provided solely for staff and related costs to verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits; and to assist the state special education safety net committee when requested.

(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the auditor shall conduct an audit by January 1, 2016:

(a) Of the Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, and Idaho (WWAMI) medical school located in Spokane to determine the cost per student of medical education and to show the cost per student by fund source;

(b) To determine the cost per student for students from WWAMI partner states other than Washington and whether any Washington state funds or Washington resident student tuition is used to subsidize students from WWAMI partner states; and

(c) To determine the planned per student cost of medical education and to show the cost per student by fund source for the Washington State University medical school program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 125. FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$143,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$178,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$321,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 126. FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$11,171,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$11,367,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$6,930,000

New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,020,000

Legal Services Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$214,543,000

Tobacco Prevention and Control Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$273,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation. . . .$2,783,000

Public Services Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,131,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$250,218,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management, the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown by division of division administration expenses.

(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney general shall notify the director of financial management and the chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.

(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.

(4) $1,034,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5052 (cannabis patient protection act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $55,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5321 (debt settlement services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $14,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5740 (extended foster care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $101,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5226 (public sector unions' financing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) If, by December 31, 2015, the department of enterprise services and the office of financial management do not complete the competitive procurement under RCW 43.19.008(5) to determine if a private vendor should perform real estate services for state agencies, the office of attorney general shall suspend all payments to the department of enterprise services for real estate services. The office of attorney general may perform real estate services on its own behalf or may contract for these services from a private vendor for the remainder of the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. If acquired by contract, the contracting is not subject to the processes set forth in RCW 41.06.142 (1), (4), and (5), as authorized in RCW 41.06.142(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 127. FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$1,587,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$1,639,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$3,226,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 5999 (caseload forecast council). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 128. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$57,101,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$57,920,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$264,478,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$8,012,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,290,000

Drinking Water Assistance Administrative﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$446,000

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$10,000

Lead Paint Account—State Appropriation. . . .$178,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation. . . .$13,000

Home Security Fund Account—State Appropriation. . . .$28,848,000

Affordable Housing for All Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$13,140,000

Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes﻿

Investigation and Prosecution Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,776,000

Low-Income Weatherization and Structural﻿

Rehabilitation Assistance Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,149,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,937,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$12,571,000

Prostitution Prevention and Intervention Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$45,000

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$774,000

Asset Building Assistance Account—State Appropriation. . . .$500,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$1,650,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account—State Appropriation. . . .$643,000

Energy Freedom Account—State Appropriation. . . .$470,000

Financial Services Regulation Account—State Appropriation. . . .$468,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation. . . .$5,605,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$463,024,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the terms included in the original loan agreements.

(2) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a grant to resolution Washington to building statewide capacity for alternative dispute resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to litigation.

(3) The department shall administer its growth management act technical assistance and pass-through grants so that smaller cities and counties receive proportionately more assistance than larger cities or counties.

(4) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely as pass-through funding to Walla Walla Community College for its water and environmental center.

(5) $1,800,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for transitional housing assistance or partial payments for rental assistance under the independent youth housing program.

(6) $2,949,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,949,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for associate development organizations. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the department shall consider an associate development organization's total resources when making contracting and fund allocation decisions, in addition to the schedule provided in RCW 43.330.086.

(7) $234,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $233,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Washington asset building coalitions.

(8) $5,605,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center of Washington.

(9) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the purposes of purchasing contracted services to expand and promote the tourism industry in the state of Washington. If Senate Bill No. 5916 is enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(a) The department must contract with the Washington tourism alliance. Expenditure of state moneys is contingent upon the contractor providing a dollar for dollar cash or in-kind match. Funding must be provided for the following services:

(i) Serving as a central point of contact through developing and maintaining a web portal for Washington tourism, operating a call center, and mailing travel guides;

(ii) Promoting Washington as a tourism destination to national and international markets, with emphasis on markets in Europe and Asia;

(iii) Providing information to businesses and local communities on tourism opportunities that could expand local revenues; and

(iv) Conducting tourism-related research, including market research and measuring the return on investment of funded activities.

(b) The department may not use more than 4 percent of the funds to administer, monitor, and report the outcomes of the services. The department must electronically report the outcomes of the services by January 1st of each fiscal year to the economic development committees of the legislature.

(c) The department has the authority to designate one or more alternative contractors if necessary due to performance or other significant issues. Such change must only be made after consultation with the Washington tourism alliance, the governor's office, and the chairs and ranking members of the economic development committees of the legislature.

(10) $2,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department of commerce for services to homeless families through the Washington youth and families fund.

(11) $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the department to support key sectors and align existing economic development programs and priorities. For each dollar expended the department must receive a one hundred percent match. The match may be provided by the department through nongeneral fund sources, or any partnering governments or organizations. Sector leads established by the department must include the industries of: (a) Tourism; (b) agriculture, wood products, and other natural resource industries; and (c) clean technology and renewable and nonrenewable energy. The department may establish these sector leads by hiring new staff, expanding the duties of current staff, or working with partner organizations and or other agencies to serve in the role of sector lead. The department must develop performance metrics and milestones and report on outcomes and performance by January 1st of each fiscal year to the economic development committees of the legislature.

(12) The department is authorized to suspend issuing any nonstatutorily required grants or contracts of an amount less than $1,000,000 per year.

(13) The department is authorized to require an applicant to pay an application fee to cover the cost of reviewing the project and preparing an advisory opinion on whether a proposed electric generation project or conservation resource qualifies to meet mandatory conservation targets.

(14) Within existing resources, the department shall provide administrative and other indirect support to the developmental disabilities council.

(15) The appropriations provided for homeless housing programs must conform to the requirements in this subsection:

(a) Households with minor children entering programs funded by home security funds shall have incomes at or below 50 percent of area median income adjusted for household size, and households without minor children entering programs funded by home security funds shall have incomes at or below 30 percent of area median income adjusted for household size. Unsheltered households entering programs with an expected enrollment of less than 90 days may be exempted from documentation of their income. At least 40 percent of the people provided housing assistance using home security funds shall be in households that include minor children. Homeless households including those enrolled in the temporary assistance for needy families program shall be given a preference when allocating limited home security fund resources. People provided housing assistance using home security funds that are not housed in drop-in shelter beds shall be required to have a housing stability plan with the goals of maximizing self-sufficiency, moving people into permanent and stable housing, and minimizing the amount and duration of public assistance provided.

(b) $512,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $511,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $10,741,000 of the home security fund account—state appropriation are provided solely for crisis residential centers, hope beds, and street youth services.

(16) $643,000 of the liquor excise tax account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department of commerce to provide fiscal note assistance to local governments.

(17) $468,000 of the financial services regulation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the family prosperity account program.

(18) $472,000 of the energy freedom account—state appropriation is provided solely for the energy office within the department of commerce.

(19) Within existing resources, the department of commerce shall examine the effects of incompatible land use surrounding military installations within Washington state and conduct a comparative analysis of best practices from other states to mitigate conflicts between local jurisdictions and neighboring military installations due to incompatible land use. The department shall submit its analysis to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2016.

(20) $221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $433,000 of the home security fund account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5404 (youth homelessness). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $11,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $11,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5761 (industrial/manufacturing facilities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22) $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5874 (coal fired electric generation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(23) $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5884 (trafficking of persons). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24) $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5933 (trafficking of persons training). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25) $500,000 of the asset building assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5899 (small consumer loans). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely as a grant to Klickitat county for a land use planner to process a backlog of permits that have not been processed by the Columbia river gorge commission due to lack of funds.

(27) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to plan and develop a regional approach in southwest King county to provide day and hygiene shelter services to homeless populations. The plan will identify appropriate partners and a service model to meet regional needs; evaluate the establishment of a facility or facilities to provide day and hygiene services; and within the amounts provided work with existing providers to expand existing services to provide day and hygiene shelter services.

(28) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely as a grant to the aerospace futures alliance and the Washington manufacturing and advanced technology institute to conduct research and develop strategies to align the aerospace supplier community with other manufacturing sectors and based on those activities develop customized training to build a skilled and stable aerospace workforce.

(29) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely as a grant to Safe Yakima Valley to coordinate community efforts for the prevention of alcohol, tobacco, drug use and violence.

(30) Within the amounts provided, the public works board may expend up to $250,000 of the public work assistance account—state appropriation for development of a curriculum and online delivery system in cooperation with the state board for community and technical colleges for public works managers.

(31) $500,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5624 (financing essential public infrastructure). If Engrossed Senate Joint Resolution No. 8204 is not ratified at the November 2015 general election, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(32) The department must convene a work group of interested stakeholders to review the state's deed of trust act contained in Title 61 RCW. The work group should include, but not be limited to, representatives from financial institutions, loan servicing and trustee service companies, and advocacy groups representing homeowners and borrowers. The work group is tasked to review and make recommendations to ensure that the act remains a workable system for financial institutions, loan servicing companies, trustee, homeowners, and borrowers. A report on the review and recommendations is due to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2015. Up to $20,000 from the foreclosure fairness account may be used to defray the department's costs for convening and providing administrative and technical support to the work group.

(33) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the long-term care ombuds program for a new priority response unit that will investigate complaints and notify state agencies, local government agencies, prosecutors, and other relevant parties of high-priority violations.

(34) $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the department to contract with the University of Washington women's center to conduct a study to research supply chain policies related to labor practices of small, medium, and large businesses. The study shall analyze whether or not there is a correlation between supply chain management practices that protect workers from human trafficking and unsafe working conditions and higher shareholder value and/or market share. The study will examine the impact of corporate sourcing practices in social media feedback and in customer satisfaction. The study shall provide case studies and best practices in ethical sourcing practices that protect workers. The study shall recommend how to evaluate and monitor supply chain management related to labor and vendor management practices of companies without bias. The study shall make recommendations on how the state can design legislation on global ethical sourcing practices that is comprehensive, pragmatic and enforceable. The study shall be presented to the house and senate commerce and labor committees no later than January 31, 2016.

(35) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the northwest agriculture business center.

(36) $306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior volunteer program.

(37) $396,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $396,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Washington new Americans program.

(38) $1,677,000 of the financial fraud and identity theft crimes investigation and prosecution account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1090 (financial fraud and identity theft). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 129. FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$760,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$814,000

Lottery Administrative Account—State Appropriation. . . .$50,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,624,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 130. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$10,149,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$10,310,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$38,289,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$372,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$298,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation . . . .$15,500,000

Statewide Information Technology System Development

Revolving Account—State Appropriation. . . .$2,996,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$1,497,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$376,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$79,787,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,996,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for debt service for the time, leave, and attendance system.

(2) The appropriations in this section represent a transfer of expenditure authority of $2,333,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,782,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2017 to the office of financial management to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5084 (all payer claims database).

(3) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5452 (early care and education system). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 131. FOR THE OFFICE OF PERFORMANCE MANAGEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$2,580,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$6,047,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$8,627,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5737 (office of performance management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the appropriations in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 132. FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS

Administrative Hearings Revolving Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$34,590,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The hourly rate charged by the office of administrative hearings to state agencies for hearings services shall not exceed a rate that is equivalent to one hundred twenty dollars per hour.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 133. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY

Lottery Administrative Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$27,559,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $690,000 of the lottery administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of the lottery's gaming systems vendor contract.

(2) No portion of this appropriation may be used for acquisition of gaming system capabilities that violates state law.

(3) Pursuant to RCW 67.70.040, the commission shall take such action necessary to reduce by $6,000,000 each fiscal year the total amount of compensation paid to licensed lottery sales agents. It is anticipated that the result of this action will reduce retail commissions to an average of 5.1 percent of sales.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 134. FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$345,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$348,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$693,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 135. FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$246,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$243,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$489,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 136. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS—OPERATIONS

Department of Retirement Systems Expense

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$54,053,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $98,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5210 (Washington state patrol retirement system annuities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $25,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1194 (public safety death benefits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 137. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$107,456,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$105,865,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$6,377,000

Financial Services Regulation Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$5,000,000

Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$137,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$97,000

Business License Account—State Appropriation. . . .$12,531,000

Data Processing Revolving Account—State Appropriation. . . .$0

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$237,463,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $393,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5189 (disabled veterans and seniors). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) If, by December 31, 2015, the department of enterprise services and the office of financial management do not complete the competitive procurement under RCW 43.19.008(5) to determine if a private vendor should perform real estate services for state agencies, the department of revenue shall suspend all payments to the department of enterprise services for real estate services. The department of revenue may perform real estate services on its own behalf or may contract for these services from a private vendor for the remainder of the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. If acquired by contract, the contracting is not subject to the processes set forth in RCW 41.06.142 (1), (4), and (5), as authorized in RCW 41.06.142(3).

(3) $13,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5904 (forest derived biomass). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 138. FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$1,233,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$1,227,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,460,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 139. FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

OMWBE Enterprises Account—State Appropriation. . . .$4,531,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 140. FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$300,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$227,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$4,528,000

Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$54,422,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$59,477,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the insurance commissioner shall consider, within his or her planned formulary transparency rulemaking, disclosure requirements for provider compensation programs paid by carriers for providing certain medications, including any incentive or penalty programs.

(2) $272,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5717 (insurance company holding act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $25,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5023 (group health benefit plans). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $143,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account— state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5180 (life insurance reserves). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $1,618,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account— state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Substitute Bill No. 5857 (pharmacy benefit managers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 141. FOR THE CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AGENCY

Consolidated Technology Services Revolving

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$7,368,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: In conjunction with the office of the chief information officer's prioritization of proposed information technology expenditures, agency budget requests for proposed information technology expenditures shall include the following: The agency's priority ranking of each information technology request; the estimated cost for the current biennium; the estimated total cost of the request over all biennia; and the expected timeline to complete the request. The office of the chief information officer and the office of financial management may request agencies to include additional information on proposed information technology expenditure requests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 142. FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD

State Investment Board Expense Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$41,313,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143. FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation. . . .$61,267,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation. . . .$15,170,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,776,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$25,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$79,238,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $185,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation is provided solely for the liquor control board to contract with the cannabis law and policy project within the University of Washington school of law. The liquor control board, in conjunction with the department of health, must contract with the cannabis law and policy project to develop best practices for regulating Washington's marijuana industry. Specific deliverables must be negotiated around a scope of work which may include any of the following: Recommendations regarding the nature and requirements of the proposed medical marijuana endorsement; medical cannabis inventory requirements; recommendations regarding the structure of food, drug, dietary supplements, and health and beauty aid labeling and claims; an assessment of legal liability related to advice dispensed by licensees; recommendations regarding the legal/regulatory structures for certification of medical marijuana consultants; recommendations related to disclaimers and waivers of liability related to dispensing of cannabis for medicinal purposes; and any other taxes negotiated by the liquor control board and department of health related to the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5052.

(2) $376,000 of the liquor revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5280 (beer and cider sales). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $4,550,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5052 (medical marijuana). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $2,641,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional cigarette and tobacco enforcement. The liquor control board must provide additional cigarette and tobacco enforcement officers and pursue strategies to reduce the amount of smuggled, contraband, and otherwise untaxed cigarette and tobacco products in the state. The liquor control board must report the amount of untaxed cigarette and tobacco taxes recovered in comparison to past years to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2016, and January 1, 2017.

(5) $451,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2136 (marijuana market reforms). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 144. FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$176,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$11,274,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$35,473,000

Pipeline Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,981,000

Pipeline Safety Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,935,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$51,839,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The commission shall work with the Idaho public utilities commission and the public utility commission of Oregon to identify common regulatory functions that can be performed jointly, with the goal of formalizing an agreement that protects essential services while increasing regulatory effectiveness and efficiencies through economies of scale. The commission is authorized to enter into an agreement with such other state public utility commissions to work jointly in administering specified respective regulatory functions.

(2) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the energy facility site evaluation council to conduct a study on the siting of small modular reactors in Washington.

(a) The study must include the following: (i) Identification of possible locations in the state where small modular reactors could be suitably located; (ii) identification of permits and studies that would need to be conducted in order to facilitate the siting of small modular reactors; and (iii) recommendations on how the siting and permitting process could be streamlined for small modular reactors.

(b) The energy facility site evaluation council shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature and governor by December 1, 2015.

(c) The energy facility site evaluation council may contract for services to assist in the study.

(d) For purposes of this subsection, "small modular reactor" means a scalable nuclear power plant using reactors that each have a gross power output no greater than three hundred megawatts electric, and where each reactor is designed for factory manufacturing and ease of transport, such as by truck, rail, or barge.

(e) $669,000 of the public services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5057 (hazardous material transport). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 145. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$3,217,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$3,184,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$135,251,000

Enhanced 911 Account—State Appropriation. . . .$57,462,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation. . . .$21,735,000

Disaster Response Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$75,870,000

Military Department Rent and Lease Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$615,000

Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,860,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$300,194,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Appropriations from the disaster response account—state appropriation and the disaster response account—federal appropriation may be spent only on disasters declared by the governor and with the approval of the office of financial management. The military department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees on October 1st and February 1st of each year detailing information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2015-2017 biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.

(2) $60,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following: Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the Washington state interoperability executive committee.

(3) $5,000,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for financial assistance to counties to replace analog 911 telephone and network equipment with next generation 911 capable technology.

(4) $178,000 of the enhanced 911 fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5020 (continuity of operations). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $39,000 of the worker and community right-to-know account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5057 (hazardous material transport). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $1,850,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely to Okanogan and Ferry counties to address deficiencies within their communications infrastructure for 911 dispatch. Funds will be used to replace failing radio dispatching hardware within 911 dispatch centers; build interoperable communications between each county's dispatch center such that each can serve as a back-up to the other; and build upon the existing wireless microwave network for 911 calls, dispatch centers, and first responder radio operations. Prior to releasing any state funds, the department will consult with the counties to determine if federal funds are available for any proposed expenditure and assist the counties with any application for such funds.

(7) $130,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a pilot program within King county to implement a mobile phone application that notifies persons trained in cardiopulmonary resuscitation of persons nearby who are having a cardiac emergency. The department may partner with the county, a city, a fire district, or a search and rescue organization for purposes of implementing the application and software-as-a-service in an existing computer-aided dispatch system. The department will report the results of the pilot program to the legislature by December 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 146. FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$1,809,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$1,940,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,108,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,349,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$8,206,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $83,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $155,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5226 (public sector union financial reporting). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 147. FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY

Certified Public Accountants' Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$6,021,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $3,300,000 of the certified public accountants' account—state appropriation is provided solely for deposit into the certified public accounting transfer account to fund scholarships at Washington-based colleges and universities for students pursuing degrees in accounting or taxation as provided in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5534. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 148. FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation. . . .$500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $250,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations. The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding these funds for multiple death investigations involving an unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving multiple jurisdictions.

(2) $210,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in identifying human remains.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 149. FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION

Horse Racing Commission Operating Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,579,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 150. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$2,874,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$3,585,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$102,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation . . . .$1,295,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$7,856,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $3,243,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $1,584,000 from the fee charged to master contract vendors are provided solely for the payment of facilities and services charges, utilities and contracts charges, public and historic facilities charges, and capital projects surcharges allocable to the senate, house of representatives, statute law committee, and joint legislative systems committee. The department shall allocate charges attributable to these agencies among the affected revolving funds. The department shall maintain an interagency agreement with these agencies to establish performance standards, prioritization of preservation and capital improvement projects, and quality assurance provisions for the delivery of services under this subsection. The legislative agencies named in this subsection shall continue to enjoy all of the same rights of occupancy and space use on the capitol campus as historically established.

(2) Before any agency may purchase a passenger motor vehicle as defined in RCW 43.19.560, the agency must have written approval from the director of the department of enterprise services.

(3) From the fee charged to master contract vendors, the department shall transfer to the office of minority and women's business enterprises in equal monthly installments $893,000 in fiscal year 2016 and $1,599,000 in fiscal year 2017.

(4) $62,000 of the building code council account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5804 (state energy code). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) Appropriations to state agencies in this act have been revised to reflect the transfer of personnel services and risk management functions at the department of enterprise services to the office of financial management on July 1, 2015, pursuant to Substitute Senate Bill No. 5315. The department is prohibited from charging agencies for these services.

(6) The department shall enter into competitive procurements for the purpose of entering into a master contracts for the provision of video remote interpreter services by June 30, 2016.

(a) One procurement must be for the purpose of providing video remote interpreter services in a medical or health care setting. The procurement must be modeled on the existing contract entered into by the department of labor and industries for video remote interpreter services. The department must consult with the departments of corrections, social and health services, labor and industries, and other state agencies that currently use interpreters in a medical or health care setting during the procurement process to ensure the master contract will meet their needs.

(b) One procurement must be for the purpose of providing video remote interpreter services generally. The master contract must be made available to all eligible users of the department's contracts. However, the primary purpose of the procurement is to assist local public schools with compliance with federal guidance on the provision of language access services by limited-English proficient parents of students. The department must consult with the superintendent of public instruction during the procurement process to ensure the master contract will meet the needs of local school districts, parents, and student in both the quality of service and the ease of access to the service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 151. FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS

Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'﻿

Administrative Account—State Appropriation. . . .$985,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 152. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$992,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$995,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$1,977,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$14,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$3,978,000

(End of part)

PART II

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.

(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(4) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for social services appointments as the one established for medical appointments in section 213 of this act. When contracting directly with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the department shall only contract with language access providers who are working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available, the department may use a language access provider who meets other certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including interpreters in other states.

(5)(a) The department shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid expansion for clients applying for or receiving state-funded services from the department and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the department shall coordinate with the health care authority to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(b) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. No later than October 1, 2015, the department shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for public assistance benefits.

(c) The department in coordination with the health care authority shall pursue a federal waiver to use supplemental nutrition assistance program eligibility to enroll eligible persons into medicaid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$321,310,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$322,504,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$515,367,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,354,000

Domestic Violence Prevention Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,908,000

Child and Family Reinvestment Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,740,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,164,183,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures.

(2) $668,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $668,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers. The center shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive, or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department shall not require case management as a condition of the contract.

(3) $522,500 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $522,500 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, $529,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation, and $253,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for children's administration to contract with an educational advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12 and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during the transition to performance based contracts. Funding shall be prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth and/or regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested educational outreach services exist. The department shall utilize private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.

(4) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a community-based organization that has innovated, developed, and replicated a foster care delivery model that includes a licensed hub home. The community-based organization will provide training and technical assistance to the children's administration to develop five hub home models in region 2 that will improve child outcomes, support foster parents, and encourage the least restrictive community placements for children.

(5) $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $109,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a receiving care center east of the Cascade mountains.

(6)(a) $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities to establish one demonstration site in a school district or group of school districts in western Washington.

(b) The children's administration and the nongovernmental entity or entities shall collaboratively select the demonstration site. The demonstration site should be a school district or group of school districts with a significant number of students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW.

(c) The demonstration site established under this subsection must be selected by September 1, 2013.

(d) The purpose of the demonstration site is to improve the educational outcomes of students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW by providing individualized education services and monitoring and supporting dependent youths' completion of educational milestones, remediation needs, and special education needs.

(e) The demonstration site established under this subsection must facilitate the educational progress and graduation of dependent youth. The contract must be performance-based with a stated goal of improving the graduation rates of foster youth by two percent per year over five school year periods, starting with the 2014-15 school year and ending with the 2019-20 school year. The demonstration site must develop and provide services aimed at improving the educational outcomes of foster youth. These services must include:

(i) Direct advocacy for foster youth to eliminate barriers to educational access and success;

(ii) Consultation with department of social and health services case workers to develop educational plans for and with participating youth;

(iii) Monitoring education progress of participating youth;

(iv) Providing participating youth with school and local resources that may assist in educational access and success; and

(v) Coaching youth, caregivers, and social workers to advocate for dependent youth in the educational system.

(f) The contracted nongovernmental entity or entities must report demonstration site outcomes to the department of social and health services and the office of public instruction by June 30, 2014, for the 2013-14 school year, and by June 30, 2015, for the 2014-15 school year.

(g) The children's administration must proactively refer all students fifteen years or older, within the demonstration site area, to the selected nongovernmental entity for educational services.

(h) The children's administration must report quarterly to the legislature on the number of eligible youth and number of youth referred for services beginning at the close of the second quarter of fiscal year 2014 and through the final quarter of fiscal year 2015.

(i) The contracted nongovernmental entity or entities shall report to the legislature by June 30, 2015, on the effectiveness of the demonstration site in increasing graduation rates for dependent youth.

(7) $302,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $497,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $226,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for extended foster care services to eligible youth engaged in employment for eighty hours or more per month, pursuant to chapter 122, Laws of 2014.

(8) $990,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $990,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for services provided through children's advocacy centers.

(9)(a) $22,695,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $22,695,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $28,450,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for services for children and families. Prior to approval of contract services pursuant to RCW 74.13B.020, the amounts provided in this section shall be allotted on a monthly basis and expenditures shall not exceed allotments based on a three-month rolling average without approval of the office of financial management following notification to the legislative fiscal committees.

(b) The department shall provide these services to safely reduce the number of children in out-of-home care, the time spent in out-of-home care prior to achieving permanency, and the number of children returning to out-of-home care following permanency.

(10) $5,865,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $1,740,000 of the child and family reinvestment account—state appropriation, and $7,449,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, are provided solely for the implementation and operations of the family assessment response program.

(11) $668,000 of the domestic violence prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5631 (domestic violence victim services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $725,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $342,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5740 (extended foster care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $784,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for early achievers tiered reimbursement for family home and center child care providers consistent with Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5452 (early care and education system). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for implementation of performance-based contracts for family support and related services pursuant to RCW 74.13B.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$91,215,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$90,923,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$3,464,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,985,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$196,000

Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,801,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$190,584,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.

(2) $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to implement community juvenile accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection may be used solely for community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants.

(3) $1,130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a competitive basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.

(4) $3,123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $3,123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts for the following programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy (institute) in its October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Functional family therapy, multi-systemic therapy, aggression replacement training and interagency coordination programs, or other programs with a positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. County juvenile courts shall apply to the juvenile rehabilitation administration for funding for program-specific participation and the administration shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.

(5) $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for expansion of the following treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation administration programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy in its October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Multidimensional treatment foster care, family integrated transitions, and aggression replacement training, or other programs with a positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. The administration may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective manner.

(6)(a) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall administer a block grant, rather than categorical funding, of consolidated juvenile service funds, community juvenile accountability act grants, the chemical dependency disposition alternative funds, the mental health disposition alternative, and the sentencing disposition alternative for the purpose of serving youth adjudicated in the juvenile justice system. In making the block grant, the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall follow the following formula and will prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (i) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years old; (ii) fifteen percent for moderate and high-risk youth; (iii) twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (iv) seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (v) three percent for the chemical dependency disposition alternative; and (vi) two percent for the mental health and sentencing dispositional alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition alternative (SSODA) shall not be included in the block grant, but allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when approved by the juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee, based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.

(b) The juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight committee with equal representation from the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current available information. The committee will be cochaired by the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts, who will also have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to achieve its purpose. Initial members will include one juvenile court representative from the finance committee, the community juvenile accountability act committee, the risk assessment quality assurance committee, the executive board of the Washington association of juvenile court administrators, the Washington state center for court research, and a representative of the superior court judges association; two representatives from the juvenile rehabilitation administration headquarters program oversight staff, two representatives of the juvenile rehabilitation administration regional office staff, one representative of the juvenile rehabilitation administration fiscal staff and a juvenile rehabilitation administration division director. The committee may make changes to the formula categories other than the evidence-based program and disposition alternative categories if it is determined the changes will increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost benefit savings to the state. Long-term cost benefit must be considered. Percentage changes may occur in the evidence-based program or disposition alternative categories of the formula should it be determined the changes will increase evidence-based program or disposition alternative delivery and increase the cost benefit to the state. These outcomes will also be considered in determining when evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left separate.

(c) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts shall be responsible for collecting and distributing information and providing access to the data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the Washington state institute for public policy related to program and outcome data. The juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts will work collaboratively to develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and disposition alternatives.

(7) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts shall collect and distribute information related to program outcome and provide access to these data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation administration and Washington state institute for public policy. The agreements between administrative office of the courts, the juvenile courts, and the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall be executed to ensure that the juvenile rehabilitation administration receives the data that the juvenile rehabilitation administration identifies as needed to comply with this subsection. This includes, but is not limited to, information by program at the statewide aggregate level, individual court level, and individual client level for the purpose of the juvenile rehabilitation administration providing quality assurance and oversight for the locally committed youth block grant and associated funds and at times as specified by the juvenile rehabilitation administration as necessary to carry out these functions. The data shall be provided in a manner that reflects the collaborative work the juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile courts have developed regarding program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and disposition alternatives.

(8) $445,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $445,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild project.

(9) $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the juvenile detention alternatives initiative.

(10) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a grant program focused on criminal street gang prevention and intervention. The Washington state partnership council on juvenile justice may award grants under this subsection. The council shall give priority to applicants who have demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal street gangs. Applicants composed of, at a minimum, one or more local governmental entities and one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations that have a documented history of creating and administering effective criminal street gang prevention and intervention programs may apply for funding under this subsection.

(11) The department shall review its current food services at its institutions for opportunities to consolidate and centralize, emphasizing opportunities for increased efficiency. The department shall consider consolidating and centralizing the department's institutional food service by examining: (a) Consistent daily meals across institutions; (b) off-site meal preparation and cook-chill meals; and (c) increased use of the department of correction's correctional industries institutional food service. Any food service improvements must account for special diets and consistency with established dietary intakes of the food and nutrition board of the national research council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$335,611,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$350,062,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$959,417,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$17,864,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,662,954,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) For the purposes of this subsection, the term "regional support networks," includes, effective April 1, 2016, behavioral health organizations which assume the duties of regional support networks pursuant to chapter 225, Laws of 2014 (2SSB 6312).

(b) $16,631,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $13,761,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $17,918,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to reimburse regional support networks for increased utilization costs, as compared to utilization costs in fiscal year 2014, that are incurred in order to meet statutory obligations to provide individualized mental health treatment in appropriate settings to individuals who are detained or committed under the involuntary treatment act. Prior to distributing funds to a regional support network requesting reimbursement for costs relative to increased utilization, the department must receive adequate documentation of such increased utilization and costs.

(c) $76,532,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $76,398,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for persons and services not covered by the medicaid program. To the extent possible, levels of regional support network spending shall be maintained in the following priority order: Crisis and commitment services; community inpatient services; and residential care services, including personal care and emergency housing assistance. This funding reflects a reduction of $9,363,000 for fiscal year 2016 and $9,497,000 for fiscal year 2017 and reflects a funding shift from general fund—state appropriation to general fund—federal appropriation based on a waiver received from the centers for medicare and medicaid services allowing for federal funds to be used for community inpatient stays that were previously ineligible for federal matching funds. These amounts must be distributed to regional support networks based on the proportion of funds distributed in fiscal year 2015 under section 204(1)(a), chapter 221, Laws of 2014 (ESSB 6002).

(d) $6,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $6,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $7,620,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department and regional support networks to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided to regional support networks with PACT teams, the department shall consider the differences between regional support networks in the percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that are not reimbursable under medicaid. The department may allow regional support networks which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under section 204(1)(c) of this act. The department and regional support networks shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this section.

(e) $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $1,300,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the western Washington regional support networks to provide either community- or hospital campus-based services for persons who require the level of care previously provided by the program for adaptive living skills (PALS) at western state hospital.

(f) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support networks at western state hospital shall be 587 per day.

(g) From the general fund—state appropriations in this subsection, the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional support networks reimburse the aging and disability services administration for the general fund—state cost of medicaid personal care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(h) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly, rather than through contracts with regional support networks, for children's long-term inpatient facility services.

(i) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to continue performance-based incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support services for individuals with severe mental illness who were discharged from the state hospitals as part of the expanding community services initiative. These funds will be used to enhance community residential and support services provided by regional support networks through other state and federal funding.

(j) $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Spokane regional support network to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at eastern state hospital. Such services shall include:

(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;

(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient care or jail services;

(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating those individuals; and

(iv) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.

At least annually, the Spokane regional support network shall assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.

(k) $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane counties for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(l) Regional support networks may use local funds to earn additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients. Additionally, regional support networks may use a portion of the state funds allocated in accordance with (a) of this subsection to earn additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for medicaid.

(m) $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for mental health services for mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon release from confinement.

(n) $11,405,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $11,405,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $17,680,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for enhancement of community mental health services. The department must contract these funds for the operation of community programs in which the department determines there is a need for capacity that allows individuals to be diverted or transitioned from the state hospitals including but not limited to: (i) Community hospital or free standing evaluation and treatment services providing short-term detention and commitment services under the involuntary treatment act to be located in the geographic areas of the King regional support network, the Spokane regional support network outside of Spokane county, and the Thurston Mason regional support network; (ii) one new full program of an assertive community treatment team in the King regional support network and two new half programs of assertive community treatment teams in the Spokane regional support network and the Pierce regional support network; and (iii) three new recovery support services programs in the Grays Harbor regional support network, the greater Columbia regional support network, and the north sound regional support network. In contracting for community evaluation and treatment services, the department may not use these resources in facilities that meet the criteria to be classified under federal law as institutions for mental diseases. If the department is unable to come to a contract agreement with a designated regional support network for any of the services identified above, it may consider contracting for that service in another regional support network that has the need for such service.

(o) Beginning July 1, 2015, the department is directed to reduce capitation rates for classic rate cells, including disabled and nondisabled children and adults, within its medicaid managed-care delivery system to the actuarially sound lower bound rate for all regional support networks.

(p) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for the department to develop and phase in intensive mental health services for high needs youth consistent with the settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter.

(q) $1,394,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,394,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5177 (improving timeliness of competency and evaluation services - nonfelony diversion). Regional support networks must use the amounts for outpatient mental health treatment costs associated with implementation of the bill. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(r) $2,452,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $2,264,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $2,653,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5269 (court review of detention decisions). Regional support networks must use the amounts for involuntary treatment costs associated with implementation of the bill. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(s) $1,913,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $3,825,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $3,308,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5649 (involuntary outpatient mental health treatment). Regional support networks must use the amounts for increases in community mental health treatment costs associated with implementation of the bill. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$160,880,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$162,809,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$161,318,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$56,669,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$541,676,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(b) $231,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $231,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a community partnership between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (2)(b) are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time community service officer at the city of Lakewood.

(c) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for payment to the city of Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state hospital and adjacent areas.

(d) $10,521,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $12,549,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency restoration services pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (SSB 5889). This funding must be used to increase the number of forensic beds at western state hospital to three hundred fifteen and the number of forensic beds at eastern state hospital to one hundred ten. Within these amounts, funding is also provided for staff to provide workforce development, monitoring of forensic evaluation and treatment capacity and demand, and planning related to a community based competency restoration program.

(e) $1,701,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,803,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency evaluation services for individuals who are in local jails pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (SSB 5889). This funding must be used solely to increase the number of staff providing competency evaluation services.

(f) Within the amounts appropriated for institutional services within this subsection (2), funding is provided to implement recommendations of the state psychiatric hospital ad hoc safety committee regarding additional safety skills and related training for employees of the state psychiatric hospitals, including additional staffing necessary to provide patient care when staff are participating in training.

(g) $158,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $152,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5177 (improving timeliness of competency and evaluation services). The department shall use this funding and the amounts appropriated for institutional services in this subsection (2) to create an office of forensic mental health. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(h) $65,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $65,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided to western state hospital solely to initiate United States food and drug administration approved injectable, long-acting, antipsychotic therapy for the treatment of schizophrenia for patients nearing discharge. The drug must be on the health care authority's preferred drug list and must be medically necessary. It is intended that any such therapy be identified for individuals likely to be covered by medicaid or medicare upon release from the state hospital.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$460,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$461,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$6,288,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$7,209,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $178,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence-based practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and implementation of evidence-based or promising practices. The institute must work with the department to develop a plan to seek private, federal, or other grant funding in order to reduce the need for state general funds.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$8,634,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$8,215,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$11,441,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$502,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$28,792,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) In accordance with RCW 43.20B.110, 43.135.055, and 71.24.035, the department is authorized to adopt license and certification fees in fiscal years 2016 and 2017 to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(b) In developing the new medicaid managed care rates under which the public mental health managed care system will operate, the department must seek to estimate the reasonable and necessary cost of efficiently and effectively providing a comparable set of medically necessary mental health benefits to persons of different acuity levels regardless of where in the state they live. The department must report to the office of financial management and to the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on its proposed new mental health managed care rate-setting approach by August 1, 2015, and again at least sixty days prior to implementation of new capitation rates.

(c) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for the department to continue to develop the child adolescent needs and strengths assessment tool and build workforce capacity to provide evidence based wraparound services for children, consistent with the settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter.

(d) $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $241,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5403 (competency to stand trial evaluations). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$505,885,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$549,357,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$1,065,325,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$534,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,121,101,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(i) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes shall be $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2016 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2017. A processing fee of $2,750 shall be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable.

(ii) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities shall be $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2016 and $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2017.

(iii) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities shall be $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2016 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2017.

(c) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations, the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(d) $8,697,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $17,933,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $33,491,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to fund the collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive bargaining representative of individual providers established under RCW 74.39A.270 for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. If Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining) is not enacted by June 30, 2015, or the parties are unable to reach agreement by June 30, 2015, that provides that any excise tax for high-cost employer-sponsored health care coverage under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 4980I is borne by the insurance plan, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(e) $1,184,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $2,483,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $4,638,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of RCW 74.39A.310 to increase wages and benefits of home care agency workers if an agreement between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium is reached subject to the provisions of sections 205, 206, and 919 of this act. If an agreement is not reached by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(f) $4,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $8,310,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $10,550,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are appropriated solely for the individual and family support waiver program. Within these amounts, the department shall expand the current number of clients receiving services by 4,000 and focus on extending services to individuals with developmental disabilities who are not otherwise receiving paid services from the department.

(g) $3,834,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $10,105,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $13,213,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are appropriated solely for the basic plus waiver program. Within these amounts, the department shall expand the current number of clients receiving services by 1,000 and focus on extending services to individuals who are:

(i) Currently receiving state-only funded employment; or

(ii) Graduating high school students who are not already on a medicaid waiver but are currently eligible for medicaid personal care services and interested in pursuing supported employment services.

(h) $404,800 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $404,800 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $507,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the development and implementation of six enhanced respite beds across the state for children. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving, the opportunity for behavioral stabilization of the child, and the ability to partner with the state in the development of an individualized service plan that allows the child to remain in his or her family home.

(i) $404,800 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $404,800 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $507,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the development and implementation of six community respite beds across the state for adults. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving and the opportunity for stabilization of the individual in a community-based setting as an alternative to using a residential habilitation center to provide planned or emergent respite.

(j) The department is authorized to establish limited exemption criteria in rule to address RCW 74.39A.325 when a landline is not available to the employee.

(k) Community residential cost reports that are administered by or on behalf of contracted agency providers are required to include information about agency staffing, including health insurance, wages, number of positions, and turnover.

(l) Within the appropriations in this subsection, the developmental disabilities administration must prepare a report describing the impact of transitioning clients receiving prevocational employment supports into integrated service options. For each client, during the period before and the period after leaving the congregate setting, the report must describe hours of service, hours worked, hourly wage, monthly earnings, and per capita expenditures. The report must also describe waiver services, unrelated to employment, that have been authorized to mitigate the impact of transitioning clients from congregate settings into supported employment. A preliminary report must be submitted to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature by January 1, 2016. A final report must be submitted to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature by January 1, 2017.

(m) The department shall establish new rules and standards to ensure that adult family homes are monitored and licensed to meet the needs of young adults with a developmental disability. These adult family homes may require a package of services including specialized care assessment and planning, personal care, specialized environmental features, and accommodations.

(n) Within the appropriations in this subsection, the developmental disabilities administration must create additional options for providing community-based respite services to adults who have a developmental disability.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$94,170,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$94,712,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$178,305,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$23,041,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$390,228,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) $721,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $721,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are for the department to fulfill its contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to provide transportation, building space, and other support services as are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of students living in residential habilitation centers.

(c) $824,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $1,176,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $2,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of opening an eight-bed cottage at Yakima valley school to support individuals who are developmentally disabled and in need of either crisis or respite services, or both.

(d) The residential habilitation centers may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$3,003,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$2,762,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$3,403,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$9,168,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$1,403,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$1,403,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$1,206,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,012,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$921,923,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$1,002,610,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,372,128,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$33,990,000

Traumatic Brain Injury Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,396,000

Skilled Nursing Facility Safety Net Trust Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$133,360,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,467,407,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $178.87 for fiscal year 2016 and shall not exceed $191.87 for fiscal year 2017, including the rate add-ons described in (a), (b), and (g) of this subsection. There will be no adjustments for economic trends and conditions in fiscal years 2016 and 2017. The economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to the component rate allocations established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW. When no economic trends and conditions factor for either fiscal year is defined in a biennial appropriations act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or compounded to the component rate allocations established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW.

(a) For fiscal year 2016 within the funds provided, the department shall continue to provide an add-on per medicaid resident day per facility not to exceed $1.57. The add-on shall be used to increase wages, benefits, and/or staffing levels for certified nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or benefits for dietary aides, housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other category of worker whose statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was less than $15 in calendar year 2008, according to cost report data. The add-on may also be used to address resulting wage compression for related job classes immediately affected by wage increases to low-wage workers. For fiscal year 2016 within funds provided, the department shall provide an additional add-on per medicaid resident day per facility not to exceed the industry weighted average rate of $2.44. The add-on shall be used to increase wages, benefits, and/or staffing levels for certified nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or benefits for dietary aides, housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other category of worker whose statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was less than $17 in calendar year 2012, according to cost report data. The department shall continue reporting requirements and a settlement process to ensure that the funds are spent according to this subsection.

(b) The department shall do a comparative analysis of the facility-based payment rates calculated on July 1, 2015, using the payment methodology defined in chapter 74.46 RCW and as funded in the omnibus appropriations act, excluding the low wage worker add-on found in (a) of this subsection, the rate add-ons for direct care, support services, and therapy care found in (g) of this subsection, the comparative add-on, acuity add-on, and safety net reimbursement, to the facility-based payment rates in effect June 30, 2010. For fiscal year 2016, if the facility-based payment rate calculated on July 1, 2015, is smaller than the facility-based payment rate on June 30, 2010, then the difference shall be provided to the individual nursing facilities as an add-on payment per medicaid resident day.

(c) During the comparative analysis performed in subsection (b) of this section, for fiscal year 2016, if it is found that the direct care rate for any facility calculated using the payment methodology defined in chapter 74.46 RCW and as funded in the omnibus appropriations act, excluding the low wage worker add-on found in (a) of this subsection, the rate add-ons for direct care, support services, and therapy care found in (g) of this subsection, the comparative add-on, acuity add-on, and safety net reimbursement, is greater than the direct care rate in effect on June 30, 2010, then the facility shall receive a ten percent direct care rate add-on to compensate that facility for taking on more acute clients than they have in the past.

(d) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.

(e) The rate add-on provided in (c) of this subsection is subject to the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW 74.46.022(6).

(f) If the waiver requested from the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services in relation to the safety net assessment is for any reason disapproved, (b), (c), (d), (g), and the fiscal year 2016 additional add-on in (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(g) For fiscal year 2016, the department shall provide the following rate add-ons per medicaid resident day:

(i) A direct care rate add-on of $3.63 per medicaid resident day;

(ii) A support services rate add-on of $1.12 per medicaid resident day; and

(iii) A therapy care rate add-on of $0.05 per patient day.

This subsection (1)(g) is subject to the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW 74.46.022(6).

(2) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall issue no additional certificates of capital authorization for fiscal year 2016 and no new certificates of capital authorization for fiscal year 2017 and shall grant no rate add-ons to payment rates for capital improvements not requiring a certificate of need and a certificate of capital authorization for fiscal years 2016 and 2017.

(3) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(a) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes shall be $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2016 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2017. A processing fee of $2,750 shall be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable.

(b) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities shall be $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2016 and $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2017.

(c) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities shall be $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2016 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2017.

(d) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations, the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of one hundred twenty days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(4) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients residing in nursing homes and paid for with state only funds into less restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the client's care needs.

(5) $20,241,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $40,988,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $76,956,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to fund the collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive bargaining representative of individual providers established under RCW 74.39A.270 for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. If Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining) is not enacted by June 30, 2015, or the parties are unable to reach agreement by June 30, 2015, that provides that any excise tax for high-cost employer-sponsored health care coverage under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 4980I is borne by the insurance plan, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $7,552,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $15,974,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $29,742,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase wages and benefits of home care agency workers if an agreement between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennia is reached subject to the provisions of sections 205, 206, and 919 of this act. If an agreement is not reached by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $100,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation, and $200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department of social and health services to contract for an independent feasibility study and actuarial modeling of public and private options for leveraging private resources to help individuals prepare for long-term services and supports needs. The study must model two options: (a) A long-term care benefit paid for and open to workers and funded through a payroll deduction that would provide a one-to-three year long-term care insurance benefit; and (b) a public-private reinsurance or risk-sharing model to provide a stable and ongoing source of reimbursement to insurers for a portion of their catastrophic long-term services and supports losses in order to provide additional insurance capacity in the state. The two options must be evaluated based on expected costs and benefits to participants, anticipated number of participants, savings to the medicaid program, and legal and financial risks to the state. The department must provide oversight and direction for this evaluation and must convene interested stakeholders to provide input on study design. The study must be submitted to the department by March 31, 2016. The department must then submit an interim report to include the director's findings and recommendations based on the study to the appropriate committees of the legislature by July 1, 2016, and a final report by January 15, 2017.

(8) The department is authorized to establish limited exemption criteria in rule to address RCW 74.39A.325 when a landline phone is not available to the employee.

(9) The department shall reimburse with the exceptional care rate adult family homes that provided care solely to clients with HIV/AIDS on or before January 1, 2000, and continue to provide care solely to clients with HIV/AIDS. The department shall not reduce the exceptional care rate from the rate paid on October 1, 2013.

(10) $1,840,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,877,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer services program. Funding shall be prioritized towards serving populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include senior citizens and persons with disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$380,210,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$384,779,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$1,247,569,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,950,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,014,508,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $151,934,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $151,038,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $738,087,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. The department must create a WorkFirst budget structure that allows for transparent tracking of budget units and subunits of expenditures where these units and subunits are mutually exclusive from other department budget units. The budget structure must include budget units for the following: Cash assistance, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the program. Within these budget units, the department must develop program index codes for specific activities and develop allotments and track expenditures using these codes. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature prior to adopting the new structure and no later than December 2015.

(b) $280,700,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for assistance to clients, including grants, diversion cash assistance, and additional diversion emergency assistance including but not limited to assistance authorized under RCW 74.08A.210. The department may use state funds to provide support to working families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families but otherwise not receiving cash assistance.

(c) $175,923,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for WorkFirst job search, education and training activities, barrier removal services, limited English proficiency services, and tribal assistance under RCW 74.08A.040. The department must allocate this funding based on client outcomes and cost effectiveness measures.

(d) $418,698,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.215.135. The amounts provided in this subsection (d) are provided conditioned on the department of social and health services and the department of early learning taking additional actions to identify and reduce the backlog of overpayment cases related to public assistance programs, including the working connections child care program. The departments shall collaborate and create a plan to triage overpayment cases in a manner that identifies and prioritizes cases with large overpayments and likelihood of fraudulent activity. The departments shall provide a quarterly report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature detailing the specific actions taken as a result of this subsection (d). The amounts in this subsection (1)(d) assume the department of early learning exercises its authority under RCW 43.215.135 to require working connections child care recipients and applicants to seek child support enforcement services from the department of social and health services, division of child support, unless the department of social and health services finds that the applicant or recipient has good cause not to cooperate due to domestic violence or other exceptions, as determined by the department of social and health services, division of child support.

(e) $161,160,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for WorkFirst and working connections child care administration and overhead.

(f) $1,758,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,604,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5452 (early care and education system). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(f) shall lapse.

(g) The amounts in (b) through (d) of this subsection shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified. However, the department may transfer up to 10 percent of funding between (b) through (d) of this subsection. The department shall provide notification prior to any transfer to the office of financial management and to the appropriate legislative committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight task force. The approval of the director of financial management is required prior to any transfer under this subsection.

(2) $1,657,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,657,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for naturalization services.

(3) $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services; and $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.

(4) On December 1, 2013, and annually thereafter, the department must report to the legislature on all sources of funding available for both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service type and funding source. The report must also include the number of clients served and outcome data for the clients.

(5) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to be no less than seventy-five percent and no more than one hundred percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program benefit amount.

(6) Pursuant to RCW 41.06.142(3), the department shall implement a pilot program within existing resources to understand the nature and depth of potential fraud, waste, and abuse within the basic food, state food assistance, temporary assistance to needy families, state family assistance, and working connections child care programs. The pilot program shall review the basic food, state food assistance, temporary assistance to needy families, state family assistance, and working connections child care programs enrollment and determine any changes in demographics, including but not limited to becoming deceased, incarcerated, or residing out of state. The pilot program shall be conducted by the department of social and health services in partnership with a third-party vendor that uses national public records data and a national contributory database such as the national accuracy clearinghouse. The department shall prepare a report and submit it to the legislative fiscal committees by December 15, 2015.

(7) The department shall review clients receiving services through the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization funding through the department.

(8) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties to facilitate applications for veterans' services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$62,030,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$70,508,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$424,652,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$20,211,000

Criminal Justice Treatment Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$11,978,000

Problem Gambling Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,453,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation. . . .$15,332,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$606,164,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department may contract with the University of Washington and community-based providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program or other specialized chemical dependency case management providers for pregnant, post-partum, and parenting women. For all contractors: (a) Service and other outcome data must be provided to the department by request; and (b) indirect charges for administering the program shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.

(2) In accordance with RCW 70.96A.090 and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to adopt fees for the review and approval of treatment programs in fiscal years 2016 and 2017 as necessary to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(3) $3,500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (from the substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant) is provided solely for the continued funding of existing county drug and alcohol use prevention programs.

(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall implement increased rates for chemical dependency treatment services provided to medicaid enrollees, commensurate with current nonmedicaid rates for same or similar services. Any rate changes must be approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services.

(5) $1,800,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,800,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for grants to community based programs which provide preventions services to youth, including programs for school-based resource officers.

(6) $442,500 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $442,500 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the development, implementation, and reporting of the Washington state healthy youth survey and the Washington state young adult behavioral health survey.

(7) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for parenting education services focused on pregnant and parenting women.

(8) Within existing appropriations, the department shall prioritize the prevention and treatment of intravenous, opiate-based drug use.

(9) $200,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $200,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct cost-benefit evaluations of the implementation of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 (Initiative No. 502).

(10) $500,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $500,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to design and administer the Washington state healthy youth survey and produce reports pursuant to RCW 69.50.540.

(11) $54,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $252,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $2,232,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided for regional support networks to provide outpatient chemical dependency treatment for offenders enrolled in the medicaid program that have been released from prison and who are under community supervision by the department of corrections. Effective April 1, 2016, contracts with regional support networks must require that regional support networks sub-contract with a provider that has specialized expertise in the provision of chemical dependency treatment services to offenders being released from prison who are under community supervision. The department of social and health services and the department of corrections must develop a memorandum of understanding to facilitate enrollment in medicaid for offenders being released from corrections that are eligible for the program and to ensure that treatment services funded by these agencies are coordinated, do not result in duplication of services, and maintain access and quality of care for the individuals being served.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$12,437,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$12,386,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$99,251,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$124,074,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$36,449,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$36,037,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$72,486,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall review its current food services for the special commitment center for opportunities to consolidate and centralize, emphasizing opportunities for increased efficiency. The department shall consider consolidating and centralizing the department's institutional food service by examining: (a) Consistent daily meals across institutions; (b) off-site meal preparation and cook-chill meals; and (c) increased use of the department of correction's correctional industries institutional food service. Any food service improvements must account for special diets and consistency with established dietary intakes of the food and nutrition board of the national research council.

(2) Within the amounts provided in this section, the special commitment center within the department of social and health services shall enter into an inter-agency agreement with the University of Washington medicine. The inter-agency agreement shall allow the department to receive drug pricing under 340B of the public health services act, at the very least, for drug purchases associated with treating patients with hepatitis C, whereby the university is acting as the covered entity or safety-net provider beginning January 1, 2016.

(3) $78,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $78,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1059 (enhanced sexual predator reviews). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$23,516,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$23,271,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$37,784,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$654,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$85,225,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section include a reduction of $15,980,000 in general fund—state expenditures by the department of social and health services for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. This reduction in expenditure authority for the administration and supporting services program of the department shall be achieved through expenditure reductions in other programs and divisions of the department as a result of lean management strategies and other administrative efficiencies that do not result from caseload or service delivery reductions. The savings obtained in other programs and divisions of the department shall be transferred to the administration and supporting services program to achieve the expenditure reduction amount specified in this subsection.

(2) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a Washington state mentoring organization to continue its public-private partnerships to provide technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$63,115,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$61,607,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$53,109,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$177,831,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: If, by December 31, 2015, the department of enterprise services and the office of financial management do not complete the competitive procurement under RCW 43.19.008(5) to determine if a private vendor should perform real estate services for state agencies, the department of social and health services shall suspend all payments to the department of enterprise services for real estate services. The department of social and health services may perform real estate services on its own behalf or may contract for these services from a private vendor for the remainder of the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. If acquired by contract, the contracting is not subject to the processes set forth in RCW 41.06.142 (1), (4), and (5), as authorized in RCW 41.06.142(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY

During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the health care authority shall provide support and data as required by the office of the state actuary in providing the legislature with health care actuarial analysis, including providing any information in the possession of the health care authority or available to the health care authority through contracts with providers, plans, insurers, consultants, or any other entities contracting with the health care authority.

Information technology projects and proposed projects for time capture, payroll and payment processes, and eligibility and authorization systems within the health care authority are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

The health care authority shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The health care authority may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the health care authority receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(1) MEDICAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$1,936,747,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$1,910,527,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$11,513,452,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$77,598,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$15,084,000

Hospital Safety Net Assessment Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$734,850,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation. . . .$18,488,000

State Health Care Authority Administration Account—

State Appropriation. . . .$698,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation. . . .$528,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation. . . .$18,134,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$16,226,106,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this subsection to implement the medicaid expansion as defined in the social security act, section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII).

(b) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the health care authority pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that the cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(c) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts, if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.

(d) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.

(e) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of the state's health care system.

(f) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.

(g) $4,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $4,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $8,522,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share hospital payments.

(h) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall provide disproportionate share hospital payments to hospitals that provide services to children in the children's health program who are not eligible for services under Title XIX or XXI of the federal social security act due to their citizenship status.

(i) $6,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.

(j) The health care authority shall continue the inpatient hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and legislature by November 1, 2015, and by November 1, 2016, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2016 and fiscal year 2017, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount. The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with policies approved in the 2015-2017 biennial operating appropriations act and in effect on July 1, 2015, (b) one-half of the indigent assistance disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (c) all of the other disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match. If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount, the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within eleven months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested. $16,664,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $8,170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for state grants for the participating hospitals.

(k) The health care authority shall seek public-private partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to provide on-going support for outreach and education efforts under the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of 2009.

(l) The health care authority shall target funding for maternity support services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco use, or African American or Native American race. The health care authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those services.

(m) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall identify strategies to improve patient adherence to treatment plans for diabetes and implement these strategies as a pilot through one health home program to be identified by the authority. The authority shall report to the governor and legislature in December 2015 on patient outcomes and cost savings derived from new adherence strategies in the health home model and make recommendations for improving the strategies.

(n) Managed care contracts must incorporate accountability measures that monitor patient health and improved health outcomes, and shall include an expectation that each patient receive a wellness examination that documents the baseline health status and allows for monitoring of health improvements and outcome measures.

(o) $88,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account—state appropriation and $567,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement the conversion to the tenth version of the world health organization's international classification of diseases.

(p) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide an adult dental benefit.

(q) The health care authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(r) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. No later than October 1, 2015, the health care authority shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for medical assistance benefits.

(s) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $180,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit organization of a toll-free hotline that assists families to learn about and enroll in the apple health for kids program.

(t) The appropriations in this section reflect savings and efficiencies by transferring children receiving medical care provided through fee-for-service to medical care provided through managed care.

(u) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for primary care services provided by naturopathic physicians.

(v) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall continue to provide coverage for pregnant teens that qualify under existing pregnancy medical programs, but whose eligibility for pregnancy related services would otherwise end due to the application of the new modified adjusted gross income eligibility standard.

(w) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to remove the mental health visit limit and to provide the shingles vaccine and screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment benefits that are available in the medicaid alternative benefit plan in the classic medicaid benefit plan.

(x) $227,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $461,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $734,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5317 (enhanced autism screening - bright futures). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(y) $4,278,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation and $9,835,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5840 (emergency medical transportation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(z) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall conduct a review of its adult dental program in cooperation with Washington dental services foundation. The authority shall develop a plan to implement an expanded oral health care program for adults with diabetes and pregnant women. A report summarizing the authority's implementation plan and an estimation of cost savings must be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2015.

(aa) No more than $1,175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 may be expended for reimbursement for nonhospital based rural health clinics auditing costs to complete annual payment reconciliations for calendar years 2010-2013 as required under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a (bb)(5)(A). The department shall use the agreed-upon procedures to complete the reconciliations. Nonhospital-based clinics shall be reimbursed for the cost of auditing using the agreed-upon procedures for payment reconciliation for this time period only.

(bb) The appropriations in this section represent a transfer of expenditure authority of $2,333,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,782,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2017 to the office of financial management to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5084 (all payer claims database).

(cc) Pursuant to RCW 41.06.142(3), the authority shall implement a pilot program within existing resources to understand the nature and depth of potential fraud, waste, and abuse and the creation of operational efficiencies within the provider and beneficiary system. The pilot program shall examine streamlining provider enrollment and compliance within the current affordable care act screening requirements and include a post-enrollment review of those currently enrolled in medicaid to determine if there have been changes in demographics, including but not limited to becoming deceased, incarcerated, or residing out of state. The pilot program shall be conducted by the authority in partnership with a third-party vendor that uses national public records data as well as provider-specific data. The authority shall prepare a report to the governor and legislative fiscal committees by December 15, 2015.

(dd) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall conduct a review of its federally qualified health center encounter rates in comparison to current uniform medical plan rates for the same or similar services. The authority shall consult with the centers for medicare and medicaid services to determine whether federally qualified encounter rates may be adjusted to uniform medical plan rates as a reasonable proxy to cost. The authority must submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes which encounter rates exceed uniform medical rates, the amount by which the rates are exceeded, and the annual cost of paying above uniform medical rates. The report shall also include the steps the authority has taken with the centers for medicare and medicaid services to ensure that rates bear a reasonable relationship to costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities, including whether uniform medical plan or commercial rates may be considered a reasonable proxy to cost. The report must be submitted by January 1, 2016.

(2) PUBLIC EMPLOYEES BENEFITS BOARD AND EMPLOYEE BENEFITS PROGRAMS

State Health Care Authority Administration Account—

State Appropriation. . . .$38,419,000

The appropriation in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $162,000 of the state health care authority administration account—state appropriation is for the health care authority to work with participating employers to minimize employer penalties that may be incurred by employers not providing health benefit coverage for part-time employees that are defined as full-time employees under the employer shared responsibility provisions of the federal affordable care act.

(3) HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$20,083,000

Health Benefit Exchange Account—State Appropriation. . . .$55,502,000

Health Benefit Exchange Account—Federal

Appropriation. . . .$8,188,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$83,773,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The receipt and use of medicaid funds provided to the health benefit exchange from the health care authority are subject to compliance with state and federal regulations and policies governing the Washington apple health programs, including timely and proper application, eligibility, and enrollment procedures.

(b) $24,868,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $30,634,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $20,083,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to support the exchange's operations, including staffing, in-person assisters, information technology, consulting, auditing, marketing, and printing.

(c) $8,188,000 of the health benefit exchange account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the medicaid-related costs associated with the work supported by federal grants.

(d) The authority shall require the exchange to submit to the authority and the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 30, 2015, and September 30, 2016, a detailed report including:

(i) Salaries of all current employees of the exchange, including starting salary, any increases received, and the basis for any increases; and

(ii) Salary, overtime, and compensation policies for staff of the exchange.

(e) The authority shall require the exchange to submit to the authority and the appropriate committees of the legislature on a monthly basis:

(i) A report of all expenses; and

(ii) Beginning and ending fund balances, by fund source; and

(iii) Any contracts or contract amendments signed by the exchange; and

(iv) An accounting of staff required to operate the exchange broken out by full time equivalent positions, contracted employees, temporary staff, and any other relevant designation that indicates the staffing level of the exchange.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214. FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$1,972,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$1,949,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,213,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$6,134,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215. FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS

Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$10,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation. . . .$20,248,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation. . . .$20,248,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$40,506,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $50,000 of the accident fund—state appropriation and $50,000 of the medical aid fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the board, in consultation with the department of labor and industries and its workers compensation advisory committee created in RCW 51.04.110, to conduct a review of claims appealed to a superior court for fiscal years 2012 through 2015. The review must identify the number of appeals filed by month, the basis of the appeal, the prevailing party of the appeal, and the amount of any award made to the prevailing party, including the amount of any award of attorney fees and costs. The board, department, and committee shall use the review to make recommendations in law, policy, or practice to reduce the number of appeals to superior courts and to provide direct review to superior courts. Additionally, the board and department must use the review to report on the potential costs savings to employers or increased awards to injured workers if attorney fees under RCW 51.52.120 and 51.52.130 were limited to not more than twenty percent of the increase in the award secured by the attorneys' services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$18,279,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$17,123,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$4,388,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation. . . .$148,000

24/7 Sobriety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$30,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$460,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$8,597,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$49,025,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, are provided to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW 9A.44.130.

(2) $535,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely to purchase ammunition for the basic law enforcement academy. Jurisdictions shall reimburse to the criminal justice training commission the costs of ammunition, based on the average cost of ammunition per cadet, for cadets that they enroll in the basic law enforcement academy.

(3) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.

(4) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a school safety program. The commission, in collaboration with the school safety center advisory committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school administrators and school safety personnel hired after the effective date of this section.

(5) $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the school safety center within the commission. The safety center shall act as an information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a school district in Washington or in another state, coordinate activities relating to school safety, and review and approve manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training. Through an interagency agreement, the commission shall provide funding for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to continue to develop and maintain a school safety information web site. The school safety center advisory committee shall develop and revise the training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all school safety personnel. The commission shall provide research-related programs in school safety and security issues beneficial to both law enforcement and schools.

(6) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the costs of providing statewide advanced driving training with the use of a driving simulator.

(7) $644,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $595,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5311 (crisis intervention training). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the commission to develop and oversee a statewide cadre of trainers who can provide training to local jurisdictions on instilling the "guardian" culture into law enforcement agencies.

(9) $429,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $429,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for deposit into the nonappropriated Washington internet crimes against children account for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5215 (internet crimes against children). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$16,118,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$17,202,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$11,876,000

Asbestos Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,168,000

Electrical License Account—State Appropriation. . . .$47,108,000

Farm Labor Contractor Account—State Appropriation. . . .$28,000

Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$915,000

Public Works Administration Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$6,499,000

Manufactured Home Installation Training Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$342,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation. . . .$270,118,000

Accident Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$13,626,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation. . . .$285,245,000

Medical Aid Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$3,186,000

Plumbing Certificate Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,741,000

Pressure Systems Safety Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$4,143,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$679,315,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5897 (child abuse exams). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $2,300,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5451 (enhancing return to work). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $494,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation and $1,580,000 of the accident fund—state appropriation are provided solely for continuation of the logger safety initiative.

(4) $741,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely for a pilot program under which the department partners with an experienced firm to manage cases involving catastrophically injured workers.

(a) For each injured worker referred by the department, the firm must propose a contract identifying a case outcome and the treatment needed to achieve it, and a fixed price for doing so.

(b) If the department agrees to the contract: (i) The firm will assume responsibility at the fixed price for the medical management and payment of all medical costs until the outcome is achieved; (ii) the department retains the authority to approve or deny particular treatments; and (iii) the firm may require treatment providers to submit bills to it, and must forward to the department a record of all payments made.

(c) The department must contract with the firm to manage at least twelve catastrophic cases in each of fiscal year 2016 and fiscal year 2017, provided there is at least that many cases where: (i) An injured worker elects to be served by the firm; and (ii) the fixed price proposed by the firm is lower than the amount the department would pay to achieve the identified outcome if it did not contract with the firm.

(d) The department must provide a written report on the pilot program to the legislature in December 2015 and December 2016.

(5) $4,923,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation and $4,924,000 of the accident fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the first phase of the department's plan to replace its labor and industries industrial insurance information technology system subject to the same conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 705 (4) through (6) of this act.

(6) $250,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to collaborate with its prevailing wage advisory committee to contract for a review of options to replace Washington's current prevailing wage information technology system.

(a) The review must include:

(i) A survey of prevailing wage information technology systems used in other states;

(ii) The availability and use of commercial off-the-shelf or software as a service technology solutions for prevailing wage programs;

(iii) An assessment of the systems identified in (a) and (b) of this subsection that are most accessible and transparent for workers and employers to determine applicable classifications and wage rates; file intents and affidavits; to submit, review, verify, and dispute wage surveys; and to pay fines and fees. The assessment must also evaluate the ability of the system to increase the accuracy of prevailing wage rates, use a variety of statistical methodologies and processes to calculate rates; detect and investigate fraud, and improve the efficiency of the department's operations; and

(iv) The cost to implement up to six systems recommended by the department and prevailing wage advisory committee for further review. Recognizing that a simpler and more accurate system may require changes in state law, rule, or practice, a prevailing wage information technology system should not be rejected for further review solely on this basis, but those requirements must be noted in the review.

(b) The review is due to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2016.

(7) $3,548,000 of the electrical license account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a modern and mobile information technology system for its electrical inspection program subject to the same conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 705 (4) through (6) of this act.

(8) $641,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely for a study of workplace violence in public psychiatric and prison settings in the state. The department shall contract and collaborate with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a study of workplace violence at western and eastern state hospitals and two state correctional facilities. The purpose of the study is to obtain knowledge that will lead to recommendations to prevent workplace violence in these settings. The study shall include, but is not limited to: (a) A review of workers compensation claim data and workplace safety plans; (b) worksite walkthroughs of selected injury events to assess the physical environment; (c) an examination of workplace violence policies and procedures; (d) an assessment of violence prevention and safety programs; (e) an examination of micro-level interactions in conjunction with a safety incident for root cause analysis; (f) an estimate of costs to implement recommendations; and (g) an assessment of return on investment. A report on research findings and recommendations is due to the departments of corrections and social and health services and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2016.

(9) $250,000 of the accident fund—state appropriation and $250,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to conduct a pilot program to allow five retrospective rating plan groups to assist the department in the processing of claims as provided in this section. The pilot program must allow retrospective rating plan groups to schedule independent medical examinations and consultations and vocational rehabilitation assessments beginning January 1, 2016. Groups may apply to be part of the pilot program. From the applications submitted, the department must select groups to ensure diversity of retrospective rating groups based on size of premium, industries and risk classifications in the group, and past history of retrospective rating program performance. The department must develop a protocol and procedures for scheduling by groups and provide training to those groups selected. Charges incurred by the retrospective rating plan groups for independent medical examinations or vocational rehabilitation assessments must be charged against the claim. The department retains the final authority over decisions with respect to any individual claim and may take corrective action, including removing a group from the pilot if protocol or procedures are not followed. A report on impacts of the pilot program is due to the appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December 1, 2016.

(10) The department is directed under RCW 39.12.070 to adjust its fee schedule for statements of intent to pay prevailing wages and certification of affidavits of wages paid to remove or lower fees for contractors and subcontractors whose contract amounts are less than seven hundred fifty dollars.

(11) $25,000 of the public works administration—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a pilot program to improve the accuracy of prevailing wage survey data by sending a copy of wage survey forms submitted by interested parties on behalf of a contractor or employer when that contractor or employer has not signed the survey form. When sending a copy, the department must include a notice and procedure for the contractor or employer to dispute the accuracy of the data on the form. If the contractor or employer chooses to dispute the data on the form, the contractor or employer must provide the department with certified payroll records within thirty days of receiving the department's notice. If the contractor or employer does not respond to the notice, the accuracy of the data on the survey form is deemed to be accurate. The department, in consultation with its prevailing wage advisory committee, shall select the types of contractor, employers, or public works projects to be part of the pilot program. The department must assess the information submitted by the contractor or employer and adjust the data when appropriate to calculate prevailing wage rates. The department must assess the impact the pilot program has on prevailing wage rate accuracy and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2016.

(12) The department is prohibited from incurring costs for travel, lodging, per diem, and other costs for conferences, meetings, and other events sponsored by the department for its employees until contingency reserve targets are met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) HEADQUARTERS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$1,667,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$1,670,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory﻿

Institutions Account—State Appropriation. . . .$10,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$3,347,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$5,387,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$5,363,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$3,537,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$4,524,000

Veteran Estate Management Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,127,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$19,938,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to provide crisis and emergency relief and education, training, and employment assistance to veterans and their families in their communities through the veterans innovation program.

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$418,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$309,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$78,183,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$28,818,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$107,728,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$58,465,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$57,659,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$544,619,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$149,807,000

Hospital Data Collection Account—State Appropriation. . . .$226,000

Health Professions Account—State Appropriation. . . .$107,209,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation. . . .$606,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems﻿

Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$11,212,000

Safe Drinking Water Account—State Appropriation. . . .$6,842,000

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$14,992,000

Waterworks Operator Certification—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,583,000

Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$347,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation. . . .$162,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,857,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$4,720,000

Medical Test Site Licensure Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,420,000

Youth Tobacco Prevention Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,281,000

Public Health Supplemental Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,238,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation. . . .$312,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation. . . .$51,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$968,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation. . . .$6,888,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$975,464,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(2) $130,000 of the health professions state account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 118, Laws of 2015 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5488).

(3) $38,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $38,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided to prevent and control diabetes. The department, the health care authority, and the department of social and health services shall submit a coordinated report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2017, on the following:

(a) The financial impact and reach diabetes of all types is having on programs administered by each agency and individuals enrolled in those programs. Items included in this assessment must include the number of lives with diabetes impacted or covered by programs administered by the agency, the number of lives with diabetes and family members impacted by prevention and diabetes control programs implemented by the agency, the financial toll or impact diabetes and its complications places on these programs, and the financial toll or impact diabetes and its complications places on these programs in comparison to other chronic diseases and conditions;

(b) An assessment of the benefits of implemented programs and activities aimed at controlling diabetes and preventing the disease. This assessment must also document the amount and source for any funding directed to the agency for programs and activities aimed at reaching those with diabetes;

(c) A description of the level of coordination existing between the agencies on activities, programmatic activities, and messaging on managing, treating, or preventing all forms of diabetes and its complications;

(d) A development or revision of detailed action plans for battling diabetes with a range of actionable items for consideration by the legislature. The plans must identify proposed action steps to reduce the impact of diabetes, prediabetes, and related diabetes complications. The plan must also identify expected outcomes of the action steps proposed in the following biennium while also establishing benchmarks for controlling and preventing relevant forms of diabetes; and

(e) An estimate of costs and resources required to implement the plan identified in subsection (d) of this section.

(4) $30,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 259, Laws of 2015 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5027).

(5) $2,703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,312,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 70, Laws of 2015 (Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5052).

(6) $6,888,000 of the dedicated marijuana fund—state appropriation is provided solely for a media-based education campaign that provides medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use, including support surveillance, assessment, and evaluation of the education campaign. Funding is also provided for prevention activities that target youth and populations with a high incidence of tobacco use.

(7) Within existing resources, the department of health, in cooperation with the department of ecology, shall evaluate whether the ASTM F2923-14 standard adequately protects the children of Washington from exposure to cadmium from children's jewelry.

(a) The department's report shall determine:

(i) Whether any instances of medical treatment of children in the state due to children being exposed to harmful levels of cadmium in jewelry has occurred;

(ii) Whether any other voluntary or mandatory standards address the risk of cadmium exposure to children and if so, how those standards compare to ASTM F2923-14;

(iii) To what extent federal agencies considered ASTM F2923-14 and found the standard adequate to address the potential risk of exposure to cadmium in children's jewelry;

(iv) Whether any federal agency has determined that a total content limit for cadmium in children's jewelry could be scientifically supported to assess the potential risk of cadmium exposure to children; and

(v) What scientific justification exists to adopt different standards for cadmium in metal and plastic components of jewelry versus metal and plastic components of toys.

(b) The department shall report its findings to the appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2015.

(8) $830,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely to develop and launch proactive efforts to prevent toxic chemical exposure during pregnancy and early life. The department shall identify priorities for exposure reduction, develop effective methods to reduce toxic threats, and direct policy and educational campaigns. The department shall conduct biomonitoring studies to assess actual exposure levels and to evaluate reduction activities.

(9) $65,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $65,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure and regulatory program to supplement revenue from fees. The department shall charge no more than five hundred twenty-five dollars annually for new or renewed licenses for the midwifery program.

(10) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, each person subject to RCW 43.70.110(3)(c) is required to pay only one surcharge of up to twenty-five dollars annually for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112, regardless of how many professional licenses the person holds.

(11)(a) Within existing resources, the department of health shall compile a report on ambulatory surgical facilities to be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2016. The report shall determine:

(i) How many ambulatory centers are currently functioning in the state;

(ii) How many cases these centers receive annually;

(iii) How many of these centers are medicare certified;

(iv) How many of these centers are not medicare certified; and

(v) How many are also certified by an accrediting organization.

(b) The department shall not increase current annual fees for new or renewed licenses for ambulatory surgical facilities during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

(12) The pharmacy quality assurance commission and the department of health shall observe and maintain the standards of practice in long-term care pharmacies in effect on January 1, 2014, when conducting audits and reviews of long-term care pharmacies. The pharmacy quality assurance commission shall engage in a stakeholder process to develop rules specific to long-term care pharmacies and shall submit proposed rules to the senate health care committee and house of representatives health care and wellness committee no later than November 15, 2015.

(13) $52,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2015 (House Bill No. 1779).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$57,681,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$56,517,000

Data Processing Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .($11,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$114,187,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the support of a statewide council on mentally ill offenders that includes as its members representatives of community-based mental health treatment programs, current or former judicial officers, and directors and commanders of city and county jails and state prison facilities. The council will investigate and promote cost-effective approaches to meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental disorders who have a history of offending or who are at-risk of offending, including their mental health, physiological, housing, employment, and job training needs.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$592,701,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$587,843,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$1,892,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$7,632,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$400,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,190,468,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, when contracts are established or renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and (ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare betterment account.

(b) The department may contract for up to 300 beds statewide to the extent that it is at no net cost to the department. The department shall calculate and report the average cost per offender per day, inclusive of all services, on an annual basis for a facility that is representative of average medium or lower offender costs. The duration of the contracts may be for up to four years. The department shall not pay a rate greater than $65 per day per offender for all costs associated with the offender while in the local correctional facility to include programming and health care costs, or the equivalent of $65 per day per bed including programming and health care costs for full units. The capacity provided at local correctional facilities must be for offenders whom the department of corrections defines as medium or lower security offenders. Programming provided for inmates held in local jurisdictions is included in the rate, and details regarding the type and amount of programming, and any conditions regarding transferring offenders must be negotiated with the department as part of any contract. Local jurisdictions must provide health care to offenders that meet standards set by the department. The local jail must provide all medical care including unexpected emergent care. The department must utilize a screening process to ensure that offenders with existing extraordinary medical/mental health needs are not transferred to local jail facilities. If extraordinary medical conditions develop for an inmate while at a jail facility, the jail may transfer the offender back to the department, subject to terms of the negotiated agreement. Health care costs incurred prior to transfer are the responsibility of the jail.

(c) $501,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $501,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the institution formerly known as the maple lane school in Rochester. The department may not house incarcerated offenders at the maple lane site until specifically directed to do so by the legislature.

(d) $1,379,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, and $1,379,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the department to contract with Yakima county for the use of female inmate bed capacity in lieu of prison beds operated by the state.

(e) The department shall review its policies and procedures for overtime usage throughout its prison custody system to identify efficiencies and best practices that will control costs. The department shall provide to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2015, a report that makes recommendations to reduce the department's overtime usage and reduces overall costs for prison personnel.

(f) In an effort to reduce its need for medium security beds, the department shall review options to meet capacity needs in the most cost-efficient manner without compromising safety. The department shall at a minimum review its policies that determine custody levels, including examining other states' policies and determine costs to convert any empty prison beds to medium security and possibilities to utilize local jail beds for this purpose. The department must evaluate the options on both a short-term and long-term basis against the cost and timing of any proposal to build a new prison facility. The department shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015.

(g) Within the amounts provided, the department of corrections shall enter into an inter-agency agreement with the University of Washington Medicine. The inter-agency agreement shall allow the department to receive drug pricing under 340B of the public health services act, at the very least, for drug purchases associated with treating patients with Hepatitis C, whereby the University of Washington Medicine acts as the covered entity or safety-net provider beginning January 1, 2016.

(h) $630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,611,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5105 (felony DUI). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$151,399,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$153,718,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$995,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$306,112,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of corrections shall contract with local and tribal governments for the provision of jail capacity to house offenders who violate the terms of their community supervision. A contract shall not have a cost of incarceration in excess of $85 per day per offender. A contract shall not have a year-to-year increase in excess of three percent per year. The contracts may include rates for the medical care of offenders which exceed the daily cost of incarceration and the limitation on year-to-year increases, provided that medical payments conform to the department's offender health plan and pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are preapproved by department utilization management staff.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, specific funding is provided to implement Senate Bill No. 5070 (supervision of domestic violence offenders).

(c) $1,372,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $5,946,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5755 (justice reinvestment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(d) The department shall engage in ongoing mitigation strategies to reduce the costs associated with community supervision violators, including improvements in data collection and reporting and alternatives to short-term confinement for low-level violators.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$6,187,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$6,177,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$12,364,000

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$45,133,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$41,751,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$86,884,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital or other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do so.

(2) If, by December 31, 2015, the department of enterprise services and the office of financial management do not complete the competitive procurement under RCW 43.19.008(5) to determine if a private vendor should perform real estate services for state agencies, the department of corrections shall suspend all payments to the department of enterprise services for real estate services. The department of corrections may perform real estate services on its own behalf or may contract for these services from a private vendor for the remainder of the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. If acquired by contract, the contracting is not subject to the processes set forth in RCW 41.06.142 (1), (4), and (5), as authorized in RCW 41.06.142(3).

(6) OFFENDER CHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$45,785,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$48,110,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$93,895,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of corrections shall use funds appropriated in this subsection (6) for offender programming. The department shall develop and implement a written comprehensive plan for offender programming that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity model, are evidence-based, and have measurable outcomes. The department is authorized to discontinue ineffective programs and to repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities in the written plan.

(b) $186,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $807,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5755 (justice reinvestment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(c) Effective April 1, 2016, the regional support networks must sub-contract with a provider that has specialized expertise in the provision of chemical dependency treatment services to offenders being released from prison who are under community supervision. The department of corrections and the department of social and health services must develop a memorandum of understanding to facilitate enrollment in medicaid for offenders being released from corrections that are eligible for the program and to ensure that treatment services funded by these agencies are coordinated, do not result in duplication of services, and maintain access and quality of care for the individuals being served. The department of corrections shall implement and make necessary changes to policies and practices to assist eligible offenders within the community access chemical dependency treatment services through the regional support networks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$2,259,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$2,243,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$22,821,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$60,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$27,383,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222. FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$257,063,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$34,435,000

Unemployment Compensation Administration Account—﻿

Federal Appropriation. . . .$277,844,000

Administrative Contingency Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$24,105,000

Employment Service Administrative Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$45,497,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$638,944,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,662,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is from amounts made available to the state by section 903(g) of the social security act (Reed act). This amount is provided solely for the replacement of the unemployment insurance tax information system for the employment security department. The amounts provided in this subsection is conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(2) $26,955,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available to the state by section 903(g) of the social security act (Reed act). This amount is provided solely for the replacement of the unemployment insurance benefit system for the employment security department. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(3) The department may implement a revised chart of accounts for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium following the receipt and approval of the reconstructed ten-year operating and capital expenditure plan by the office of financial management and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee. The proposed structure must reduce the department's structure from seven programs to four and better align the budget reporting structure with the department's current operational structure.

(4) The department is directed to maximize the use of federal funds. The department must update its budget annually to align expenditures with anticipated changes in projected revenues.

(5) $48,000 of the employment services administrative account—state appropriation is provided for costs associated with the second stage of the review and evaluation of the training benefits program as directed in section 15(2), chapter 4, Laws of 2011 (unemployment insurance program). This second stage shall be developed and conducted by the joint legislative audit and review committee and shall consist of further work on the process study and net-impact/cost-benefit analysis components of the evaluation.

(6) The department is prohibited from expending amounts appropriated in this section for implementation of chapter 49.86 RCW.

(7) If, by December 31, 2015, the department of enterprise services and the office of financial management do not complete the competitive procurement under RCW 43.19.008(5) to determine if a private vendor should perform real estate services for state agencies, the employment security department shall suspend all payments to the department of enterprise services for real estate services. The employment security department may perform real estate services on its own behalf or may contract for these services from a private vendor for the remainder of the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. If acquired by contract, the contracting is not subject to the processes set forth in RCW 41.06.142 (1), (4), and (5), as authorized in RCW 41.06.142(3).

(8) $240,000 of the administrative contingency account—state appropriation is provided solely for the employment security department to contract with a center for workers in King county. The amount appropriated in this subsection shall be used by the contracted center for workers to support initiatives that generate high-skill, high-wage jobs; improve workforce and training systems; improve service delivery for dislocated workers; and build alliances with community and environmental organizations.

(End of part)

PART III

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301. FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$447,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$457,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$32,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$870,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,806,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$24,020,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$23,758,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$102,502,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$22,270,000

Reclamation Account—State Appropriation . . . .$3,824,000

Flood Control Assistance Account—State Appropriation . . . .$2,078,000

State Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$40,000

Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control—State

Appropriation . . . .$12,916,000

State Drought Preparedness Account—State Appropriation . . . .$204,000

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account (Water

Supply Facilities)—State Appropriation . . . .$438,000

Aquatic Algae Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .$515,000

Water Rights Tracking System Account—State Appropriation . . . .$46,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation . . . .$568,000

Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$528,000

Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$1,743,000

Water Rights Processing Account—State Appropriation . . . .$39,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .$124,471,000

State Toxics Control Account—Private/Local

Appropriation . . . .$499,000

Local Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .$9,157,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation . . . .$40,408,000

Underground Storage Tank Account—State Appropriation . . . .$3,443,000

Biosolids Permit Account—State Appropriation . . . .$2,059,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$43,693,000

Hazardous Waste Assistance Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$5,842,000

Radioactive Mixed Waste Account—State Appropriation . . . .$14,853,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .$3,191,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation . . . .$6,837,000

Air Operating Permit Account—State Appropriation . . . .$3,144,000

Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account—State Appropriation . . . .$1,425,000

Oil Spill Response Account—State Appropriation . . . .$7,076,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration

Account—State Appropriation . . . .$533,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$485,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—Federal

Appropriation . . . .$2,291,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$464,896,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(2) $120,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Spokane river regional toxics task force to address elevated levels of polychlorinated biphenyls in the Spokane river.

(3) $990,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation and $1,250,000 of the local toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of the local source control program by adding additional capacity in the Columbia River basin and Clark county.

(4) Within amounts provided in this section, the department of health, in cooperation with the department of ecology, shall evaluate whether the ASTM F2923-14 standard adequately protects the children of Washington from exposure to cadmium from children's jewelry. The department's report shall determine:

(a) Whether any instances of medical treatment of children in the state due to children being exposed to harmful levels of cadmium in jewelry has occurred;

(b) Whether any other voluntary or mandatory standards address the risk of cadmium exposure to children and if so, how those standards compare to ASTM F2923-14;

(c) To what extent federal agencies considered ASTM F2923-14 and found the standard adequate to address the potential risk of exposure to cadmium in children's jewelry;

(d) Whether any federal agency has determined that a total content limit for cadmium in children's jewelry could be scientifically supported to assess the potential risk of cadmium exposure to children; and

(e) What scientific justification exists to adopt different standards for cadmium in metal and plastic components of jewelry versus metal and plastic components of toys.

The department shall report its findings to the appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2015.

(5) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Walla Walla watershed management partnership to address water resource and management issues in the Walla Walla watershed.

(6) $584,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation, $4,000,000 of the local toxics control account—state appropriation, and $1,316,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5057 (hazardous materials transport). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $56,000 of the flood control assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5347 (flood plains/agriculture land). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, $5,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation, and $1,000 of the water quality permit account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5622 (agency land use actions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9)(a) $14,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $14,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are for activities within the water resources program.

(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for processing water right permit applications only if the department of ecology issues at least five hundred water right decisions in fiscal year 2016. If the department of ecology does not issue at least five hundred water right decisions in fiscal year 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse and remain unexpended. Permit decisions for the Columbia river basin count toward the five hundred water rights decisions under this subsection. The department of ecology shall submit a report to the office of financial management and the state treasurer by June 30, 2016, that documents whether five hundred water right decisions were issued in fiscal year 2016. For the purposes of this subsection, applications that are voluntarily withdrawn by an applicant do not count towards the five hundred water right decision requirement. For the purposes of water budget-neutral requests under chapter 173-539A WAC, multiple domestic connections authorized within a single water budget-neutral decision are considered one decision for the purposes of this subsection.

(10) Within existing resources, the department shall conduct a stakeholder process with the department of fish and wildlife to develop recommendations to restructure the fees under RCW 90.16.050 and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015.

(11) Within existing amounts appropriated in this section, the department must evaluate mitigation options for domestic water use in areas of the Yakima basin for which mitigation water is unavailable and access to water from water banks is unsuitable. The department must recommend solutions for providing mitigation water for domestic use in such areas. A report of the department's findings must be provided to the legislature by December 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$8,217,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$8,217,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$6,920,000

Winter Recreation Program Account—State Appropriation . . . .$3,272,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State Appropriation . . . .$220,000

Snowmobile Account—State Appropriation . . . .$5,773,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation . . . .$363,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$112,855,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—Private/Local

Appropriation . . . .$318,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$146,155,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of the Northwest weather and avalanche center.

(2) The commission shall prepare a report on its efforts to increase revenue from all sources, including the discover pass. The report shall also include a status update on the fiscal health of the state parks system, and shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2015.

(3) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the commission shall not close any state park.

(4) During fiscal years 2016 and 2017, the commission must design and implement a recreational metal detector pilot project throughout the state park system. The commission must authorize the recreational use of metal detectors in all developed and disturbed areas of state parks including in campsites, parking areas, boat launches, swim beach areas, and similar areas that have been subject to development. Metal detector use in these areas is subject to reasonable rules to protect natural, cultural, and historical resources. State parks may identify areas of a particular park to be excluded from the pilot project based on the likelihood of impacts to natural, cultural, or historical resources in that specific park. By June 30, 2017, the commission must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives describing the results of the pilot project, any documented recreational metal detector use, and any documented impacts to natural, cultural, and historical resources.

(5) $250,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission, using its authority under RCW 79A.05.055(3) and in partnership with the departments of fish and wildlife and natural resources, to coordinate a process to develop options and recommendations to improve consistency, equity, and simplicity in recreational access fee systems while accounting for the fiscal health and stability of public land management. The process must be collaborative and include other relevant agencies and appropriate stakeholders. The commission must contract with a neutral third party to facilitate meetings and discussions with parties involved in the process; and provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2016. The process must analyze and make recommendations on:

(a) Opportunities for federal and state recreational permit fee coordination, including the potential for developing a system that allows a single pass to provide access to federal and state lands;

(b) Opportunities to enhance consistency in the way state and federal recreational access fees apply to various types of recreational users, including those that travel to public lands by motor vehicle, boat, bicycle, foot, or another method; and

(c) Opportunities to develop a comprehensive and consistent statewide approach to recreational fee discounts and exemptions to social and other groups including, but not limited to, disabled persons, seniors, disabled veterans, foster families, low-income residents, and volunteers. This analysis must examine the cost of such a program, and should consider how recreational fee discounts fit into the broader set of benefits provided by the state to these social groups. This includes a review of the efficacy, purpose, and cost of existing recreational fee discounts and exemptions, as well as opportunities for new or modified social group discounts and exemptions. The departments of veterans affairs and social and health services must be included in this portion of the process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$798,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$758,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$3,482,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$24,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation . . . .$482,000

Firearms Range Account—State Appropriation . . . .$37,000

Recreation Resources Account—State Appropriation . . . .$3,169,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation . . . .$984,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$9,734,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305. FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$2,077,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$2,080,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,157,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$6,775,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$6,770,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$2,301,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation. . . .$7,600,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .$2,400,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$25,846,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $7,600,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement the voluntary stewardship program. This amount may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(2) $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5347 (flood plains/agriculture land). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$33,225,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$31,726,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$110,143,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$60,264,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State Appropriation . . . .$416,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$16,465,000

Recreational Fisheries Enhancement—State

Appropriation . . . .$2,935,000

Warm Water Game Fish Account—State Appropriation . . . .$2,566,000

Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$849,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$198,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$757,000

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation . . . .$106,283,000

Special Wildlife Account—State Appropriation . . . .$300,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal Appropriation . . . .$500,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$3,475,000

Wildlife Rehabilitation Account—State Appropriation . . . .$359,000

Hydraulic Project Approval Account—State Appropriation . . . .$615,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$2,760,000

Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid Recovery Account—

Federal Appropriation . . . .$5,001,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation . . . .$938,000

Oyster Reserve Land Account—State Appropriation . . . .$778,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$380,553,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $344,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $344,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to pay for emergency fire suppression costs. These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(2) $596,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $596,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for weed assessments and for payments in lieu of real property taxes to counties that elect to receive the payments for department owned game lands within the county.

(3) $300,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the aquatic invasive species and ballast water programs to address voluntary compliance and watercraft check stations and develop recommendations for future funding and the transition to new federal ballast water regulations. These recommendations shall be provided to the governor and legislature by June 1, 2016.

(4) Prior to submitting its 2017-2019 biennial operating and capital budget requests related to state fish hatcheries to the office of financial management, the department shall contract with the hatchery scientific review group (HSRG) to review the proposed requests. This review shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent with HSRG recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the requests based on their contributions to protecting wild salmonid stocks and meeting the recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate whether the proposed requests are being made in the most cost effective manner. The department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the office of financial management with its agency budget proposal.

(5) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall identify additional opportunities for partnerships in order to keep fish hatcheries operational. Such partnerships shall aim to maintain fish production and salmon recovery with less reliance on state operating funds.

(6) No funds provided for in this section may be expended or used as match for any activities, including planning and permitting, for the Puget Sound nearshore ecosystem restoration projects being advanced for congressional authorization for further design and construction activity with the U.S. army corps of engineers.

(7) $112,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $112,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5347 (flood plains/agricultural land). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $209,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $212,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5960 (wolf conservation and management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $273,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $273,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5166 (forage fish management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) Within existing resources, the department shall conduct a stakeholder process with the department of ecology to develop recommendations to restructure the fees under RCW 90.16.050 and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$50,557,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$52,818,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$27,004,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$2,372,000

Forest Development Account—State Appropriation . . . .$51,885,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State Appropriation . . . .$4,599,000

Surveys and Maps Account—State Appropriation . . . .$1,474,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$8,391,000

Resources Management Cost Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$109,827,000

Surface Mining Reclamation Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$3,786,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation. . . .$5,000,000

Forest and Fish Support Account—State Appropriation. . . .$8,966,000

Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$400,000

Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$34,000

Marine Resources Stewardship Trust Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$925,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .$5,438,000

Forest Practices Application Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$1,726,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$1,004,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .$797,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation . . . .$665,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation . . . .$1,920,000

Agricultural College Trust Management Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$2,772,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$342,360,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,443,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,395,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural college trust management account and are provided solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's agricultural college trust lands.

(2) $21,055,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $21,055,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $5,000,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation are provided solely for emergency fire suppression. The general fund—state appropriation and disaster response account—state appropriation provided in this subsection may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses. Agency indirect and administrative costs shall be allocated among the agency's remaining accounts and appropriations. The department of natural resources shall submit a quarterly report to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and planned expenditures from the disaster response account. This work shall be done in coordination with the military department.

(3) $5,000,000 of the forest and fish support account—state appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based, performance contracts with tribes to participate in the implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded may only contain indirect costs set at or below the rate in the contracting tribe's indirect cost agreement with the federal government. If federal funding for this purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $925,000 of the marine resources stewardship trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of priority marine management planning efforts including mapping activities, ecological assessment, data tools, and stakeholder engagement.

(5) $440,000 of the state general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $440,000 of the state general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for forest work crews that support correctional camps and are contingent upon continuing operations of the Naselle youth camp.

(6) $2,947,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,947,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the department to carry out the forest practices adaptive management program pursuant to RCW 76.09.370 and the May 24, 2012, settlement agreement entered into by the department and the department of ecology. Scientific research must be carried out according to the master project schedule and work plan of cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research priorities adopted by the forest practices board. The forest practices board shall submit a report to the legislature following review, approval, and solicitation of public comment on the cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research master project schedule, to include: Cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research science and related adaptive management expenditure details, accomplishments, the use of cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research science in decision-making, and funding needs for the coming biennium. The report shall be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2016.

(7) $141,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $141,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for ongoing law enforcement, which the department may contract with local law enforcement agencies, and for noxious weed control, forest fire protection assessment, and other purchased services, for the Teanaway Community Forest as provided in the Teanaway Community Forest management plan.

(8) No funds provided for in this section may be expended or used as match for any activities, including planning and permitting, for the Puget Sound nearshore ecosystem restoration projects being advanced for congressional authorization for further design and construction activity with the U.S. army corps of engineers.

(9) $207,000 of the resources management cost account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5347 (flood plains/agricultural land). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $337,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $311,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2093 (wildland fire suppression). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$15,151,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$15,028,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$26,584,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$193,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation . . . .$2,854,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .$5,826,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation . . . .$73,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$65,709,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,308,445 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $5,302,905 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementing the food assistance program as defined in RCW 43.23.290.

(2) $575,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement a nutrient management training program for farmers that provides training in agronomic application of dairy nutrients, as defined in RCW 90.64.010. The department shall develop an accreditation process to track completion of training by individuals who apply manure. The department shall also offer to willing farms to review agronomic application of dairy nutrients, as defined in RCW 90.64.010, used in crop production, including when, where, and how much manure to apply to meet crop nutrient requirements and to protect waters of the state. These funds may also be used to increase inspection activities in watersheds, including those areas with impaired surface or ground water impairment. The department in consultation with interested stakeholders shall identify gaps in the manure management program, including existing rules and statutory language, and report on a strategy to address those gaps. This program shall be a two-year pilot and the department shall report to the governor and the legislature by December 31, 2015, June 30, 2016, and on June 30, 2017, on the level of participation and results of the program. In developing the curriculum for agronomic education and certification programs, the department will provide opportunity for input from interested parties including: Washington State University, state conservation commission, department of ecology, conservation district staff, representatives from agricultural, livestock, and crop organizations, environmental organizations, tribal government representatives, and certified crop advisers.

(3) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5347 (flood plains/agricultural lands). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310. FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$1,317,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311. FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$2,251,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$2,207,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$9,763,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation . . . .$2,106,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .$691,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$17,018,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: By October 15, 2016, the Puget Sound partnership shall provide the governor a single, prioritized list of state agency 2017-2019 capital and operating budget requests related to Puget Sound restoration.

(End of part)

PART IV

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 401. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$1,297,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$1,353,000

Architects' License Account—State Appropriation . . . .$979,000

Professional Engineers' Account—State Appropriation . . . .$4,065,000

Real Estate Commission Account—State Appropriation . . . .$11,246,000

Uniform Commercial Code Account—State Appropriation . . . .$3,203,000

Real Estate Education Program Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$276,000

Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$1,794,000

Business and Professions Account—State Appropriation . . . .$17,678,000

Real Estate Research Account—State Appropriation . . . .$415,000

Geologists' Account—State Appropriation . . . .$53,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation . . . .$31,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$42,390,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: If, by December 31, 2015, the department of enterprise services and the office of financial management do not complete the competitive procurement under RCW 43.19.008(5) to determine if a private vendor should perform real estate services for state agencies, the department of licensing shall suspend all payments to the department of enterprise services for real estate services. The department of licensing may perform real estate services on its own behalf or may contract for these services from a private vendor for the remainder of the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. If acquired by contract, the contracting is not subject to the processes set forth in RCW 41.06.142 (1), (4), and (5), as authorized in RCW 41.06.142(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402. FOR THE STATE PATROL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$39,114,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$36,632,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$15,968,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$3,023,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation . . . .$6,048,000

Enhanced 911 Account—State Appropriation . . . .$3,230,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$3,408,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$1,388,000

Fire Service Trust Account—State Appropriation . . . .$131,000

Vehicle License Fraud Account—State Appropriation . . . .$227,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation . . . .$8,000,000

Fire Service Training Account—State Appropriation . . . .$9,897,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$54,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .$525,000

Fingerprint Identification Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$13,490,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$141,135,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $200,000 of the fire service training account—state appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12 construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide these services only to those districts that are located in counties without qualified review capabilities.

(2) $8,000,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964. The state patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall be done in coordination with the military department.

(3) $700,000 of the fire service training account—state appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship training program.

(4) $3,230,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for the first phase of the state patrol's plan to upgrade the criminal history system, and is subject to the same conditions, limitations and review provided in section 705 (4) through (6) of this act.

(5) $1,375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1068 (sexual assault examination kits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $3,200,000 of the fingerprint investigation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the second phase of the state patrol's plan to upgrade the criminal history system, and is subject to the same conditions, limitations and review provided in section 705 (4) through (6) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403. FOR THE TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,219,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The highway safety account—state appropriation, not to exceed the revenue generated under section 5(4) of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5105 (DUI felonies), is provided solely for grants to organizations within counties targeted for programs to reduce driving under the influence of alcohol and drugs. If Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5105 is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount appropriated in this section shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART V

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 501. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$37,309,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$39,001,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$66,793,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$6,113,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$202,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation. . . .$206,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$149,624,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $9,427,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $9,373,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(a) The superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans civic education award.

(b) Districts shall report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction daily student unexcused absence data by school, using a uniform definition of unexcused absence as established by the superintendent.

(c) By September of each year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall produce an annual status report of the budget provisos in sections 501 and 513 of this act. The status report of each proviso shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: Purpose and objective, number of staff, number of contractors, status of proviso implementation, number of beneficiaries by year, list of beneficiaries, and proviso outcomes and achievements.

(d) The superintendent of public instruction shall update the program prepared and distributed under RCW 28A.230.150 for the observation of temperance and good citizenship day to include providing an opportunity for eligible students to register to vote at school.

(e) Districts shall annually report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction on: (i) The annual number of graduating high school seniors within the district earning the Washington state seal of biliteracy provided in RCW 28A.300.575; and (ii) the number of high school students earning competency-based high school credits for world languages by demonstrating proficiency in a language other than English. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year.

(f) State funds shall not be used for the purposes of a special assistant for governmental relations in the chief of staff's office.

(2) $1,017,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,017,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for activities associated with the implementation of new school finance systems required by chapter 236, Laws of 2010 (K-12 education funding) and chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (state's education system), including technical staff, systems reprogramming, and workgroup deliberations, including the quality education council and the data governance working group.

(3) $1,012,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,012,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the state board of education, including basic education assistance activities. Of these amounts, $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided for implementation of Initiative Measure No. 1240 (charter schools).

(4) $4,448,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $4,024,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to the professional educator standards board for the following:

(a) $1,050,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,050,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are for the operation and expenses of the professional educator standards board;

(b) $2,372,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,372,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are for grants to improve preservice teacher training and for funding of alternative routes to certification programs administered by the professional educator standards board. Alternative routes programs include the pipeline for paraeducators program, the retooling to teach conditional loan programs, and the recruiting Washington teachers program. Within this subsection (4)(b), up to $500,000 per fiscal year is available for grants to public or private colleges of education in Washington state to develop models and share best practices for increasing the classroom teaching experience of preservice training programs.

(c) Retooling to teach conditional loans shall also be provided for educators pursuing a computer science endorsement.

(d) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the professional educator standards board to develop educator interpreter standards and identify interpreter assessments that are available to school districts. Interpreter assessments should meet the following criteria: (i) Include both written assessment and performance assessment; (ii) be offered by a national organization of professional sign language interpreters and transliterators; and (iii) be designed to assess performance in more than one sign system or sign language. The board shall establish a performance standard, defining what constitutes a minimum assessment result, for each educational interpreter assessment identified. The board shall publicize the standards and assessments for school district use;

(d) $1,001,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $577,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for paraeducator development. Of this amount $877,000 in fiscal year 2016 and $577,000 in fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5179 (paraeducator development). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection for Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5179 (paraeducator development) shall lapse.

(e) The professional educator standards board, in its regular review and revision of teacher certification standards as required by RCW 28A.410.210, shall develop standards for a K-12 computer science endorsement. Standards related to computer science shall be adopted by January 15, 2016. The revised standards shall be aligned with the computer science learning standards developed by a nationally recognized computer science education organization and updated to include the standards adopted by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under this section. In addition to appropriate computer science content, the computer science endorsement standards must facilitate dual endorsement in computer science and mathematics or science, or another related endorsement in a high-demand subject as indicated by a school district.

(5) $266,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $266,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil rights.

(a) $5,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection shall be provided to the Washington state school directors association for the creation of a model policy and procedures for language access by limited-English proficient parents. In developing the model policy and procedures, the school directors association shall consider any guidance materials created by the United States department of justice, the United States department of education, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, regarding how school districts can effectively assess their language access needs and how to develop appropriately tailored language access plans. The model policy and procedures must at a minimum address:

(i) Guidance and procedures for timely and accurate identification of limited-English proficient parents and guardians and their language access needs;

(ii) A recommended process and procedures for when and how to access an interpreter;

(iii) A prohibition on the use of students or children as interpreters for school-related communications;

(iv) Procedures to ensure appropriate staff are aware of parents' or guardians' need for language assistance, including guidance for all school administrators, teachers, and other appropriate staff regarding when and how to access an interpreter or translation services in a timely manner; and

(v) A process for communicating with parents and guardians about their rights under federal and state law to be provided with accessible information that allows them to make informed choices regarding their child's education and how to access the resources and services available to them.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:

(i) Convene an advisory committee with representatives of parents, school administrators, school principals, classified and certificated staff, and other appropriate parties with interest in language access for limited-English parents to develop sample materials for school districts to disseminate to both school employees and parents regarding parents' rights under the model policy developed by the Washington state school directors' association and the resources available to assist parents and guardians in accessing the services available to them. The sample materials must be developed by July 1, 2016;

(ii) Maintain and have available upon request a list of school districts that have and have not adopted the Washington state school directors' association's model policy;

(iii) Adopt rules regarding school districts' communication of the language access policy and procedure to parents, students, employees, and volunteers; and

(iv) Publish to the agency web site a listing of language access services providers available to school districts, including but not limited to, the telephonic, in-person, or video-remote interpreter services vendors on contract with the state of Washington, including contact information and training programs that are available to support school districts in preparing employees for how to access and effectively use an interpreter.

(6) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the ongoing work of the education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.

(7) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on educational opportunity for military children).

(8) $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Initiative Measure No. 1240 (charter schools).

(9) $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and research system (CEDARS).

(10) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for project citizen, a program sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and the center for civic education to promote participation in government by middle school students.

(11) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for collaborative schools for innovation and success authorized under chapter 53, Laws of 2012. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award $500,000 per year in funding for each collaborative school for innovation and success selected for participation in the pilot program during 2012.

(12) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 163, Laws of 2012 (foster care outcomes). The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually report each December on the implementation of the state's plan of cross-system collaboration to promote educational stability and improve education outcomes of foster youth.

(13) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 178, Laws of 2012 (open K-12 education resources).

(14) $93,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $93,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for chapter 185, Laws of 2011 (bullying prevention), which requires the office of the superintendent of public instruction to convene an ongoing workgroup on school bullying and harassment prevention. Within the amounts provided, $140,000 is for youth suicide prevention activities.

(15) $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 242, Laws of 2013 (state-tribal education compacts).

(16) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for competitive grants to school districts to increase the capacity of high schools to offer AP computer science courses. In making grant allocations, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must give priority to schools and districts in rural areas, with substantial enrollment of low-income students, and that do not offer AP computer science. School districts may apply to receive either or both of the following grants:

(a) A grant to establish partnerships to support computer science professionals from private industry serving on a voluntary basis as coinstructors along with a certificated teacher, including via synchronous video, for AP computer science courses; or

(b) A grant to purchase or upgrade technology and curriculum needed for AP computer science, as well as provide opportunities for professional development for classroom teachers to have the requisite knowledge and skills to teach AP computer science.

(17) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to convene a committee for the selection and recognition of Washington innovative schools. The committee shall select and recognize Washington innovative schools based on the selection criteria established by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in accordance with chapter 202, Laws of 2011 (innovation schools—recognition) and chapter 260, Laws of 2011 (innovation schools and zones).

(18) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Mobius science center to expand mobile outreach of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) education to students in rural, tribal, and low-income communities.

(19) $59,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to convene a task force to design a performance-based assistance and accountability system for the transitional bilingual instruction program. The office must submit a report with recommendations from the task force to the education and fiscal committees of the legislature by January 15, 2016.

(20) $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to perform on-going program reviews of alternative learning experience programs and dropout reengagement programs. The amounts provided in this subsection are sufficient for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to conduct ongoing consolidated program reviews of alternative learning experience programs and dropout reengagement programs established under chapter 20, Laws of 2010. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall include alternative learning education and dropout reengagement programs in its ongoing consolidated program reviews, as well as provide outreach and training to school districts regarding implementation of the programs. Findings from the program reviews will be used to support and prioritize the office of the superintendent of public instruction outreach and education efforts that assist school districts in implementing the programs in accordance with statute and legislative intent, as well as to support financial and performance audit work conducted by the office of the state auditor.

(21) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction for statewide implementation of career and technical education course equivalency frameworks authorized under RCW 28A.700.070 for math and science. This may include development of additional equivalency course frameworks, course performance assessments, and professional development for districts implementing the new frameworks. At least two of the science course frameworks must be in environmental science.

(22) $142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 103, Laws of 2014 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 6431) (youth suicide prevention).

(23) $202,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is provided solely to address additional audit resolutions and appeals in the alternative learning experience programs.

(24) $2,541,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,541,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a corps of nurses located at educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care to students, health education, and training for school staff.

(25) $210,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $210,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a nonviolence and leadership training program provided by the institute for community leadership.

(26) $933,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $933,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5252 (regional school safety). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(27) $1,221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.

(28) $1,875,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,875,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers scholarship program. The funds shall be used to support community involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer mentors with students selected as achievers scholars.

(29) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for contracting with a college scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach to students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007.

(30) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the administration of the preliminary scholastic aptitude test to ninth and tenth grade participants in the college bound program. The superintendent of public instruction shall partner with a national nonprofit organization that offers the aptitude test and that will provide: (i) Early and annual feedback on student progress; (ii) detailed performance feedback connected to Washington's standards, instruction, and assessments; (iii) access to state-of-the-art learning tools including free, personalized practice; (iv) access to college and career planning tools; (v) personalized information packets to high-achieving, low-income students to increase the number of applications from this group of students to public four-year institutions of higher education and independent, nonprofit baccalaureate degree-granting institutions in Washington; and (vi) for income eligible students, the opportunity to take the preliminary scholastic aptitude test in eleventh grade at no cost, to take the scholastic aptitude test twice at no cost, and access to additional tools and score reports at no cost.

(31) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $206,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation are provided solely for dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement programs, including the jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program and the building bridges statewide program. Starting in school year 2014-15, students in the foster care system or who are homeless shall be given priority by districts offering the jobs for America's graduates program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene staff representatives from high schools to meet and share best practices for dropout prevention. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $103,000 of dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $103,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the building bridges statewide program.

(32) $1,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $3,871,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills. State funding shall support the statewide administration of the inventory under RCW 28A.655.080(1) and the one-time implementation and training grants under RCW 28A.655.080(3) for schools implementing the inventory for the first time in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

(33) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to subsidize advanced placement exam fees and international baccalaureate class fees and exam fees for low-income students. To be eligible for the subsidy, a student must be either enrolled or eligible to participate in the federal free or reduced-price lunch program, and the student must have maximized the allowable federal contribution. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall set the subsidy in an amount so that the advanced placement exam fee does not exceed $15.00 and the combined class and exam fee for the international baccalaureate does not exceed $14.50.

(34) $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support district implementation of comprehensive guidance and planning programs consistent with RCW 28A.600.045.

(35) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $153,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5179 (paraeducator development). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(36) $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $53,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5688 (student skills). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(37) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a dual-language instruction pilot program. A maximum of two school districts may participate; one of which must be the Auburn school district. Each school district shall provide a sequentially articulated world language program in elementary schools that provides instruction in Spanish and a Chinese language. School districts participating in the program must agree to:

(a) Assure that parents are informed of the availability of the language classes offered as a pilot program; and

(b) Participate in an evaluation of the program as determined by the superintendent of public instruction.

The superintendent of public instruction shall submit an annual report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and education committees of the legislature summarizing the pilot program and its effectiveness. The report shall also include a recommendation as to whether or not the pilot program should be continued, expanded, or otherwise modified.

(38)(a) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for a grant to an entity that is exempt from taxation under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of the effective date of this section, that is affiliated and in good standing with a national congressionally chartered organization's standards under 36 U.S.C., subtitle II, part B, and that:

(i) Is facility-based and provides proven and tested recreational, educational, and character-building programs for children ages six to eighteen years of age;

(ii) Provides after school and summer programs in a minimum of fifty communities statewide, with youth development services available at least twenty hours weekly during the school year and for thirty hours weekly during summer programming;

(iii) Has adopted standards for care that at a minimum include staff ratios, staff training, health and safety standards, and mechanisms for assessing and enforcing the program's compliance with the standards;

(iv) Provides a process to receive and resolve parental complaints; and

(v) Conducts national criminal background checks for all employees and volunteers who work with children.

(b) The grant shall be used to pilot a program of academic, innovation, and mentoring. The purpose of the program is to enable eligible neighborhood youth development entities to provide out-of-school time programs for youth six to eighteen years of age that include educational services, mentoring, and linkages to positive, pro-social leisure and recreational activities. The programs must be designed for mentoring and academic enrichment that include at least two of the following three activity areas:

(i) Science, technology, engineering, and math (STEM);

(ii) Homework support and high-yield learning opportunities; and

(iii) Career exploration.

(c) The entity receiving the grant shall conduct the pilot in at least five communities statewide. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit a report to the appropriate education and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 31, 2015, and a final report by December 31, 2016. The report shall outline the programs established, target populations, and pre- and post-testing results.

(39) $1,122,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to adopt computer science learning standards developed by a nationally recognized computer science education organization and computer science grants to school districts. Of these amounts, $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2016 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the computer science and education grant program to support the following three purposes: (a) Train and credential teachers in computer sciences; (b) provide and upgrade technology needed to learn computer science; and (c) for computer science frontiers grants, to introduce students to and engage them in computer science. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must use the adopted computer science learning standards in implementing the grant, to the extent possible. Additionally, grants provided for the purpose of introducing students to computer science are intended to support innovative ways to introduce and engage students from historically underrepresented groups, including girls, low-income students, and minority students, to computer science and to inspire them to enter computer science careers. Grant funds for the computer science and education grant program may be expended only to the extent that they are equally matched by private sources for the program, including gifts, grants, or endowments.

(40) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to partner with a nonprofit organization providing music curriculum for kindergarten and first grade students and establish a grant program that provides start-up costs and materials for integrated music curriculum that links together other core curriculum. Preference shall be given to Title 1 schools, head start programs, early childhood education and assistance program sites, high poverty schools, schools with high mobility, and schools with low student achievement.

(41) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Kip Tokuda memorial Washington civil liberties public education program. The superintendent of public instruction shall award grants consistent with RCW 28A.300.410.

(42) $2,863,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $3,758,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for college in the high school subsidies as provided in section 3 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1546 (dual credit education opportunities).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$6,191,253,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$6,556,746,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation . . . .$495,730,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$13,243,729,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as provided in the funding formulas and salary schedules in sections 502 and 503 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.

(c) From July 1, 2015, to August 31, 2015, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as provided in sections 502 and 503, chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess., as amended.

(d) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in September and on the first school day of each month October through June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district. Any school district concluding its basic education program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held in May in lieu of a June enrollment.

(e) Funding provided in this part V of this act is sufficient to provide each full-time equivalent student with the minimum hours of instruction required under RCW 28A.150.220.

(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years are determined using formula-generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.

(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW 28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, except that the allocation for guidance counselors in a middle school shall be 1.216 for the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, which enhancement is within the program of basic education. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW 28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of prototypical school on the following regular education average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided in (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection:

(A)

General education class size:

Grade

RCW 28A.150.260

2015-16

School Year

2016-17

School Year

Grade K

. . . .

22.00

19.00

Grade 1

. . . .

23.00

21.00

Grade 2

. . . .

24.00

22.00

Grade 3

. . . .

25.00

22.00

Grade 4

. . . .

27.00

27.00

Grades 5-6

. . . .

27.00

27.00

Grades 7-8

. . . .

28.53

28.53

Grades 9-12

. . . .

28.74

28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for laboratory science, career and technical education (CTE) and skill center programs average class size as provided in RCW 28A.150.260.

(B) The superintendent shall allocate funding for average class sizes for grades K-3 in (c)(i)(A) of this subsection only to the extent of, and proportional to, the school district's demonstrated actual average class size, up to the funded class sizes.

(C) The enhancement in (c)(i) of this subsection is within the program of basic education.

(ii) For each level of prototypical school at which more than fifty percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, the superintendent shall allocate funding based on the following average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher:

(A) General education class size in high poverty schools:

Grade

RCW 28A.150.260

2015-16

School Year

2016-17

School Year

Grade K

. . . .

18.00

17.00

Grade 1

. . . .

19.00

17.00

Grade 2

. . . .

22.00

18.00

Grade 3

. . . .

24.00

21.00

Grade 4

. . . .

27.00

27.00

Grades 5-6

. . . .

27.00

27.00

Grades 7-8

. . . .

28.53

28.53

Grades 9-12

. . . .

28.74

28.74

(B) The superintendent shall provide enhanced funding for class size reduction in grades K through 3 to the extent of, and proportionate to, the school's demonstrated actual average class size up to the funded high-poverty class size. The superintendent shall adopt rules requiring school districts to report full-time equivalent student enrollment to carry out this requirement and as provided in RCW 28A.655.210.

(iii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is 13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and

(iv) Advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as general education schools in the same grade; and

(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and (a) of this subsection and is considered certificated instructional staff, except as provided in (d)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following combined rate per 1000 student full-time equivalent enrollment:

2015-16 School Year

2016-17 School Year

Career and Technical Education

2.72

2.72

Skill Center

3.06

3.06

(e) School nurses providing visual screenings as required in RCW 28A.210.020 shall include both distance and near vision screening. Funding is provided in this section for this purpose.

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS

(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated administrative staff salaries for the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years for general education students are determined using the formula generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in each grade. The following prototypical school values shall determine the allocation for principals, assistance principals, and other certificated building level administrators:

Prototypical School Building:

Elementary School

. . . .

1.253

Middle School

. . . .

1.353

High School

. . . .

1.880

(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated school building-level administrator staff units at per student rates that are a multiple of the general education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following factors: Career and Technical Education students. . . .1.025

Skill Center students. . . .1.198

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and adjusted based on each district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade, except that the allocation for parent involvement coordinators in an elementary school shall be 0.0825, which enhancement is within the program of basic education.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS

In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and administrative staff units are provided for the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school year for the central office administrative costs of operating a school district, at the following rates:

(a) The total central office staff units provided in this subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b), by 5.3 percent.

(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.47 percent shall be allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3) of this section.

(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students, are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in (a) of this subsection.

(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student rates that exceed the general education rate established for students in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 0.94 percent in the 2015-16 school year and 0.94 percent in the 2016-17 school year for career and technical education students, and 17.34 percent in the 2015-16 school year and 17.33 percent in the 2016-17 school year for skill center students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 21.42 percent in the 2015-16 school year and 21.42 percent in the 2016-17 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 22.72 percent in the 2015-16 school year and 22.72 percent in the 2016-17 school year for classified salary allocations provided under subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the maintenance rate specified in section 504 of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows:

(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section; and

(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections (4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS

Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC) incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.150.260.

(a)(i) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component

2015-16

SCHOOL YEAR

2016-17

SCHOOL YEAR

Technology

$127.17

$129.34

Utilities and Insurance

$345.55

$351.43

Curriculum and Textbooks

$136.54

$138.86

Other Supplies and Library Materials

$289.88

$294.81

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated

and Classified Staff

$21.12

$21.47

Facilities Maintenance

$171.19

$174.10

Security and Central Office

$118.60

$120.61

TOTAL BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$1,210.05

$1,230.62

(ii) School districts accepting enhanced MSOC funding above the rate provided in school year 2014-15 shall consider these funds as levy reduction funds and reduce their calendar year 2016 and 2017 levy base respectively used for calculating local levy authority and local effort assistance by the amount of the enhancement when calculating the school district's levy base under RCW 84.52.0531. School districts may continue to receive the school year 2014-15 MSOC rate so that the school district's levy base is not reduced.

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,272.99 for the 2015-16 school year and $1,294.63 for the 2016-17 school year.

(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and technical education programs generate a per student MSOC allocation of $1,431.65 for the 2015-16 school year and $1,455.99 for the 2016-17 school year.

(d) Students in grades 9-12 generate per student FTE MSOC allocations in addition to the allocation provided in (a) of this subsection at the following rate:

MSOC Component

2015-16

SCHOOL YEAR

2016-17

SCHOOL YEAR

Technology

$36.57

$37.19

Curriculum and Textbooks

$39.89

$40.57

Other Supplies and Library Materials

$83.11

$84.53

Instructional Professional Development for Certified

and Classified Staff

$6.65

$6.76

TOTAL GRADE 9-12 BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$166.22

$169.05

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS

For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, funding for substitute costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING

(a) Amounts provided in this section from July 1, 2015, to August 31, 2015, are adjusted to reflect provisions of chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess., as amended (allocation of funding for funding for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident students.

(11) DROPOUT REENGAGEMENT PROGRAM

The superintendent shall adopt rules to require students claimed for general apportionment funding based on enrollment in dropout reengagement programs authorized under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.115 to meet requirements for at least weekly minimum instructional contact, academic counseling, career counseling, or case management contact. Districts must also provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the programs offered by the district or under contract with a provider, as well as accurate monthly headcount and full-time equivalent enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate enrollment counts of resident and nonresident students.

(12) VOLUNTARY ALL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS

Funding in this section is sufficient to fund voluntary all day kindergarten programs in qualifying schools in the 2015-16 school year and all schools in the 2016-17 school year, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315. Each kindergarten student who enrolls for the voluntary all-day program in a qualifying school shall count as one-half of one full-time equivalent student for purpose of making allocations under this section. Funding in this section provides all-day kindergarten programs for 75 percent of kindergarten enrollment in the 2015-16 school year and full funding in the 2016-17 school year, which enhancement is within the program of basic education.

(13) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND NECESSARY PLANTS

For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section on a per district basis.

(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:

(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and

(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;

(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:

(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated administrative staff unit;

(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half average annual full-time equivalent students;

(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this subsection;

(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;

(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified staff unit; and

(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under this subsection (12) shall generate additional MSOC allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC) allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental budget), adjusted annually for inflation.

(14) Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(15) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2016 and 2017 as follows:

(a) $621,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $631,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.

(b) $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for programs providing skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.

(16) $219,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $223,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for school district emergencies as certified by the superintendent of public instruction. Funding provided must be conditioned upon the written commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be awarded, if applicable. At the close of the fiscal year the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature on the allocations provided to districts and the nature of the emergency.

(17) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463, Laws of 2007.

(18) Students participating in running start programs may be funded up to a combined maximum enrollment of 1.2 FTE including school district and institution of higher education enrollment consistent with the running start course requirements provided in Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1546 (dual credit education opportunities). In calculating the combined 1.2 FTE, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may average the participating student's September through June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end dates for courses provided by the high school and higher education institution. Additionally, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the student achievement council, and the education data center, shall annually track and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of students participating in the running start program, including course load analyses at both the high school and community and technical college system.

(19) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (12) of this section, the following apply:

(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and

(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (12) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

(20)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic education and career and technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds. Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting purposes under this section.

(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported career and technical education program enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

(21) Funding in this section is sufficient to provide full general apportionment payments to school districts eligible for federal forest revenues as provided in RCW 28A.520.020. School districts receiving federal forest revenues shall not have their general apportionment reduced.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION

(1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units as provided in RCW 28A.150.280 and under section 502 of this act:

(a) Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units are determined for each district by multiplying the district's certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 2 by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP document 1; and

(b) Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units and classified staff units for each district are determined based on the district's certificated administrative and classified salary allocation amounts shown on LEAP Document 2.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "LEAP Document 1" means the staff mix factors for certificated instructional staff according to education and years of experience, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on March 24, 2015 at 06:11 hours; and

(b) "LEAP Document 2" means the school year salary allocations for certificated administrative staff and classified staff and derived and total base salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on March 24, 2015 at 06:11 hours.

(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary adjustments at a rate of 20.78 percent for school year 2015-16 and 20.78 percent for school year 2016-17 for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 19.22 percent for school year 2015-16 and 19.22 percent for the 2016-17 school year for classified staff.

(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state-wide salary allocation schedules for certificated instructional staff are established for basic education salary allocations:

Table Of Total Base Salaries For Certificated Instructional Staff For School Year 2015-16

*** Education Experience ***

Years

MA+90

of

OR

Service

BA

BA+15

BA+30

BA+45

BA+90

BA+135

MA

MA+45

Ph.D.

0

34,457

35,388

36,352

37,318

40,419

42,416

41,311

44,412

46,411

1

34,921

35,864

36,841

37,850

40,983

42,969

41,770

44,903

46,889

2

35,363

36,315

37,302

38,389

41,513

43,520

42,233

45,356

47,364

3

35,818

36,780

37,777

38,899

42,017

44,072

42,671

45,787

47,844

4

36,265

37,269

38,272

39,432

42,569

44,639

43,130

46,267

48,338

5

36,726

37,735

38,748

39,973

43,098

45,210

43,597

46,723

48,835

6

37,200

38,187

39,235

40,520

43,630

45,754

44,076

47,186

49,308

7

38,033

39,035

40,097

41,452

44,608

46,790

44,972

48,127

50,310

8

39,253

40,309

41,396

42,864

46,062

48,325

46,383

49,582

51,843

9

41,629

42,770

44,290

47,564

49,903

47,808

51,084

53,422

10

44,159

45,790

49,107

51,524

49,309

52,627

55,043

11

47,334

50,723

53,189

50,853

54,243

56,707

12

48,828

52,383

54,921

52,457

55,902

58,441

13

54,082

56,697

54,118

57,601

60,216

14

55,790

58,539

55,828

59,421

62,059

15

57,242

60,062

57,279

60,966

63,672

16 or more

58,386

61,262

58,424

62,185

64,945

Table Of Total Base Salaries For Certificated Instructional Staff For School Year 2016-17

*** Education Experience ***

Years

MA+90

of

OR

Service

BA

BA+15

BA+30

BA+45

BA+90

BA+135

MA

MA+45

Ph.D.

0

35,077

36,024

37,006

37,990

41,146

43,179

42,054

45,211

47,246

1

35,549

36,510

37,504

38,531

41,720

43,742

42,522

45,711

47,732

2

35,999

36,969

37,973

39,080

42,260

44,303

42,992

46,173

48,216

3

36,463

37,442

38,457

39,598

42,773

44,865

43,439

46,611

48,704

4

36,917

37,939

38,961

40,142

43,335

45,443

43,906

47,099

49,208

5

37,387

38,414

39,445

40,692

43,873

46,023

44,382

47,564

49,714

6

37,869

38,874

39,941

41,249

44,416

46,577

44,869

48,035

50,195

7

38,718

39,737

40,818

42,198

45,411

47,632

45,781

48,993

51,215

8

39,959

41,034

42,141

43,635

46,891

49,194

47,217

50,474

52,776

9

42,378

43,539

45,087

48,420

50,801

48,668

52,003

54,384

10

44,954

46,614

49,991

52,451

50,197

53,574

56,033

11

48,186

51,636

54,146

51,768

55,219

57,728

12

49,707

53,325

55,910

53,401

56,908

59,493

13

55,055

57,717

55,092

58,638

61,299

14

56,794

59,592

56,832

60,491

63,175

15

58,272

61,143

58,310

62,063

64,818

16 or more

59,437

62,365

59,476

63,304

66,114

(b) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate degree.

(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection, the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:

(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and

(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.

(5) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.

(b) "MA" means a masters degree.

(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.

(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.

(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and 28A.415.023.

(6) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in this part V, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a) The employee has a masters degree; or

(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations before January 1, 1992.

(7) The salary allocation schedules established in this section are for allocation purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$80,374,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$161,120,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$241,494,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) A salary increase of 1.8 percent effective September 1, 2015, and another 1.2 percent increase effective September 1, 2016, the annual cost-of-living adjustments required under Initiative Measure No. 732.

(2)(a) Additional salary adjustments as necessary to fund the base salaries for certificated instructional staff as listed for each district in LEAP Document 2, defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act.

(b) Additional salary adjustments to certain districts as necessary to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for certificated administrative staff as listed for each district in LEAP Document 2, defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act.

(c) Additional salary adjustments to certain districts as necessary to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for classified staff as listed for each district in LEAP Document 2, defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act.

(d) The appropriations in this subsection (1) include associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at 20.78 percent for the 2015-16 school year and 20.78 percent for the 2016-17 school year for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 19.22 percent for the 2015-16 school year and 19.22 percent for the 2016-17 school year for classified staff.

(e) The appropriations in this section include the increased or decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary allocation schedules and methodology in sections 502 and 503 of this act. Changes for special education result from changes in each district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for educational service districts and institutional education programs are determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections 502 and 503 of this act.

(f) The appropriations in this section include no salary adjustments for substitute teachers.

(3) The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is $768.00 per month for the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years. The appropriations in this section reflect the incremental change in cost of allocating rates of $768.00 per month for the 2015-16 school year and $768.00 per month for the 2016-17 school year.

(4) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$463,112,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$465,128,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$928,240,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for the transportation of eligible students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192. Funding in this section constitutes full implementation of RCW 28A.160.192, which enhancement is within the program of basic education. Students are considered eligible only if meeting the definitions provided in RCW 28A.160.160.

(b) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding for approved and operating charter schools as provided in RCW 28A.710.220(3). Per-student allocations for pupil transportation must be calculated using the allocation for the previous school year to the school district in which the charter school is located and the number of eligible students in the district, and must be distributed to the charter school based on the number of eligible students.

(c) From July 1, 2015 to August 31, 2015, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of students as provided in section 505, chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess., as amended.

(3) $698,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $698,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for pupil transportation expected cost funding formula adjustments as provided under this subsection. School districts with the following: (i) An efficiency rating in the prior year that is at least ninety-five percent; (ii) an expected cost allocation less than the 2013-14 allocation; and (iii) actual prior year costs exceeding the expected cost allocations provided through the pupil transportation funding formula due to exceptional circumstances may apply to the superintendent of public instruction to receive a supplemental funding adjustments for a one-year period to offset the excess costs in whole or in part. The superintendent shall adopt criteria for review of applications, which may include exceptional issues related to geography, student demographics, or other one-time circumstances that are not otherwise addressed in the expected cost model. Differences in costs related to district philosophy, service delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for transportation adjustments. School districts that receive adjustments under this subsection are not guaranteed adjustments in future years and must reapply. Adjustments may not exceed the total appropriation provided in this subsection for fiscal year 2016 and fiscal year 2017. Adjustments also may not exceed the difference between the district's school year 2013-14 allocation and the district's expected cost allocation. These adjustments are outside the program of basic education.

(4) A maximum of $892,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and a maximum of $892,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 may be expended for regional transportation coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.

(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district buses on the presales tax five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that school year.

(7) Funding levels in this section reflect waivers granted by the state board of education for four-day school weeks as allowed under RCW 28A.305.141.

(8) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually disburse payments for bus depreciation in August.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$7,111,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$7,111,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$526,332,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$540,554,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $7,111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $7,111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for state matching money for federal child nutrition programs, and may support the meals for kids program through the following allowable uses:

(1) Elimination of breakfast copays for eligible public school students and lunch copays for eligible public school students in grades kindergarten through third grade who are eligible for reduced-price lunch;

(2) Assistance to school districts and authorized public and private nonprofit organizations for supporting summer food service programs, and initiating new summer food service programs in low-income areas;

(3) Reimbursements to school districts for school breakfasts served to students eligible for free and reduced-price lunch, pursuant to chapter 287, Laws of 2005; and

(4) Assistance to school districts in initiating and expanding school breakfast programs.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report annually to the fiscal committees of the legislature on annual expenditures in (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$814,460,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$864,615,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$476,430,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation . . . .$54,694,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,210,199,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure that special education students as a class receive their full share of the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and 504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an appropriate education for special education students under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall provide services through the special education excess cost allocation funded in this section.

(b) Funding provided within this section is sufficient for districts to provide school principals and lead special education teachers annual professional development on the best-practices for special education instruction and strategies for implementation. Districts shall annually provide a summary of professional development activities to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:

(i) Special education students are basic education students first;

(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the full basic education allocation; and

(iii) Special education students are basic education students for the entire school day.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.

(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(4)(a) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390, except that the calculation of the base allocation also includes allocations provided under section 502 for parent involvement coordinators in prototypical elementary schools and high poverty elementary schools as provided under section 502(4); and guidance counselors in prototypical middle schools and high poverty middle schools as provided under section 502(2)(a), which enhancements are within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2015 to August 31, 2015, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in section 507, chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess., as amended.

(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW 28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fund—state funded special education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent or 12.7 percent.

(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost services for special education students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW 28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units.

(7) $23,679,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $28,092,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $29,574,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section. If the federal safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the federal appropriation in this subsection (7) in any fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of each school year, the superintendent shall recover safety net funds that were distributed prospectively but for which districts were not subsequently eligible.

(a) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, safety net funds shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (ESHB 2261).

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school year, except that the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in July of each school year for the state school for the blind and the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from the current school year.

(8) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund—state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation and the special education program.

(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from educational service districts, and for staff development activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special education program.

(11) $252,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $252,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for two additional full-time equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to provide training and support to districts applying for safety net awards.

(12) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $100,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a special education family liaison position within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$8,218,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$8,205,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$16,423,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).

(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards and next generation science standards. Funding shall be distributed among the educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.

(3) The educational service districts, at the request of the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.305.130, may receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$369,555,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$373,422,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$742,977,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time equivalent student is 8.4 percent from the 2014-15 school year to the 2015-16 school year and 1.4 percent from the 2015-16 school year to the 2016-17 school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$13,967,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$14,003,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$27,970,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund—state fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.

(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.

(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.

(5) $685,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $685,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the department of social and health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections, programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and programs for juveniles operated by city and county jails.

(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be carried over from one year to the next.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$16,912,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$18,914,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$35,826,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c). In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i) Allocations shall be based on three percent of each school district's full-time equivalent basic education enrollment; (ii) additional instruction of 3.0 hours per week per funded highly capable program student; (iii) fifteen highly capable program students per teacher; (iv) 36 instructional weeks per year; (v) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (vi) the district's average staff mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act.

(b) From July 1, 2015, to August 31, 2015, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable students as provided in section 511, chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess., as amended.

(3) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the centrum program at Fort Worden state park.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR MISCELLANEOUS—NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$4,302,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,302,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$116,322,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$119,664,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$94,057,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$2,712,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation . . . .$1,605,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$334,360,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $33,620,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $34,504,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of the Washington state assessment system, including: (a) Development and implementation of retake assessments for high school students who are not successful in one or more content areas; and (b) development and implementation of alternative assessments or appeals procedures to implement the certificate of academic achievement. The superintendent of public instruction shall report quarterly on the progress on development and implementation of alternative assessments or appeals procedures. Within these amounts, the superintendent of public instruction shall contract for the early return of 10th grade student assessment results, on or around June 10th of each year. State funding to districts shall be limited to one collection of evidence payment per student, per content-area assessment. Within the amounts provided in this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall administer the biology collection of evidence.

(2) $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Washington state leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional partnership activities coordinated at the Pacific science center, including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal professional development, and school and community engagement events.

(3) $3,935,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $3,935,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of a new performance-based evaluation for certificated educators and other activities as provided in chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform) and chapter 35, Laws of 2012 (certificated employee evaluations).

(4) $49,877,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $50,334,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,151 per teacher in the 2015-16 school year and a bonus of $5,239 per teacher in the 2016-17 school year;

(b) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least 60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch;

(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications for bonuses under (a)(ii) of this subsection for less than one full school year receive bonuses in a prorated manner. All bonuses in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection will be paid in July of each school year. Bonuses in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection shall be reduced by a factor of 40 percent for first year NBPTS certified teachers, to reflect the portion of the instructional school year they are certified; and

(d) During the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, and within available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the national board for professional teaching standards may receive a conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in addition to compensation received under a district's salary schedule and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200. Recipients who fail to receive certification after three years are required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section in each school year.

(5) $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.

(6) $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to low-performing schools and school districts that are implementing comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.

(7) $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the development of a leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent organization to operate a state-of-the-art education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the state. Semiannually the independent organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and others to support the development and implementation of this program. Leadership academy partners shall include the state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator standards board, and others as the independent organization shall identify.

(8) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a statewide information technology (IT) academy program. This public-private partnership will provide educational software, as well as IT certification and software training opportunities for students and staff in public schools. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the fiscal year 2016 appropriation and $1,000,000 of the fiscal year 2017 appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of expanding this program to middle schools.

(9) $1,877,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,877,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for secondary career and technical education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008. If equally matched by private donations, $900,000 of the 2016 appropriation and $900,000 of the 2017 appropriation shall be used to support FIRST robotics programs. Of the amounts in this subsection, $100,000 of the fiscal year 2016 appropriation and $100,000 of the fiscal year 2017 appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of statewide supervision activities for career and technical education student leadership organizations.

(10) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for (a) staff at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in schools and districts across the state; and (b) grants of $2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year with professional development training for implementing integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in their schools.

(11) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for science, technology, engineering and mathematics lighthouse projects, consistent with chapter 238, Laws of 2010.

(12) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a beginning educator support program. The program shall prioritize first year teachers in the mentoring program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for grant funding. The program provided by a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each beginning teacher aligned with professional certification; release time for mentors and new teachers to work together; and teacher observation time with accomplished peers. Funding may be used to provide statewide professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning educators.

(13) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for advanced project lead the way courses at ten high schools. To be eligible for funding in 2016, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2014-15 school year. The 2016 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2015-16 school year. To be eligible for funding in 2016, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2015-16 school year. The 2017 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2016-17 school year. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research and data center at the office of financial management shall track student participation and long-term outcome data.

(14) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for annual start-up or expansion grants for aerospace and manufacturing technical programs housed at four skill centers. The grants are provided for equipment and curriculum purchases. To be eligible for funding, the skill center must agree to provide regional high schools with access to a technology laboratory, expand manufacturing certificate and course offerings at the skill center, and provide a laboratory space for local high school teachers to engage in professional development in the instruction of courses leading to student employment certification in the aerospace and manufacturing industries. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall administer the grants in consultation with the center for excellence for aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing.

(15) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for annual start-up or expansion grants to six high schools to implement or expand the aerospace assembler program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research and data center at the office of financial management shall track student participation and long-term outcome data.

(16) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the provision of training for teachers in the performance-based teacher principal evaluation program.

(17) $7,235,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $9,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2013 (Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5329) (persistently failing schools).

(18) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to promote the financial literacy of students. The effort will be coordinated through the financial literacy public-private partnership.

(19) $99,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement a youth dropout prevention program that incorporates partnerships between community-based organizations, schools, food banks and farms or gardens. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall select one school district that must partner with an organization that is operating an existing similar program and that also has the ability to serve at least 40 students. Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, up to $10,000 may be used by the office of the superintendent of public instruction for administration of the program.

(20) $2,194,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,194,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to implement chapter 18, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5946) (strengthening student educational outcomes).

(21) $1,061,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,061,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for chapter 184, Laws of 2013 (Second Substitute House Bill No. 1642) (academic acceleration).

(22) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for chapter 212, Laws of 2014 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 6074) (homeless student educational outcomes).

(23) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for chapter 219, Laws of 2014 (Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6163) (expanded learning).

(24) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for chapter 102, Laws of 2014 (Senate Bill No. 6424) (biliteracy seal).

(25) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a nonprofit organization to integrate the state learning standards in English language arts, mathematics, and science with outdoor field studies and project-based and work-based learning opportunities aligned with the environmental, natural resource, and agricultural sectors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$118,022,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$121,838,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$72,182,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$312,042,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual programs under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080, including programs for exited students, as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b) and the provisions of this section. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades kindergarten through twelve in school years 2015-16 and 2016-17; (ii) additional instruction of 3.0000 hours per week in school years 2015-16 and 2016-17 for the head count number of students who have exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within the previous two years based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment; (iii) fifteen transitional bilingual program students per teacher; (iv) 36 instructional weeks per year; (v) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (vi) the district's average staff mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act.

(b) From July 1, 2015, to August 31, 2015, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual instruction programs as provided in section 514, chapter 4, Laws of 2013, 2nd sp. sess., as amended.

(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the following amounts: 1.15 percent for school year 2015-16 and 1.12 percent for school year 2016-17.

(4) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is for migrant education under Title I Part C and English language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the elementary and secondary education act.

(5) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual program students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$223,380,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$227,656,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$448,444,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$899,480,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The general fund—state appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b)(i) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a), except that the allocation for the additional instructional hours shall be enhanced as provided in this section, which enhancements are within the program of the basic education. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (A) Additional instruction of 2.3975 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2015-16 school year and the 2016-17 school year; (B) fifteen learning assistance program students per teacher; (C) 36 instructional weeks per year; (D) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (E) the district's average staff mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act.

(ii) From July 1, 2015, to August 31, 2015, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in section 515, chapter 4, Laws of 2013, 2nd sp. sess., as amended.

(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12 for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or reduced-price lunch in the prior school year. The prior school year's October headcount enrollment for free and reduced-price lunch shall be as reported in the comprehensive education data and research system.

(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through the annual income verification process required by the national school lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the learning assistance program dated February, 2010.

(3) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act of 2001.

(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through part V of this act are for allocations purposes only, unless specified by part V of this act, and do not entitle a particular district, district employee, or student to a specific service, beyond what has been expressly provided in statute. Part V of this act restates the requirements of various sections of Title 28A RCW. If any conflict exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control unless this act explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement. Any amounts provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts required by Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the program of basic education unless clearly stated by this act.

(2) To the maximum extent practicable, when adopting new or revised rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall attempt to seek legislative approval through the budget request process.

(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act, except as expressly provided in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) As required by RCW 28A.710.110, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall transmit the charter school authorizer oversight fee for the charter school commission to the charter school oversight account.

(5) State general fund appropriations distributed through Part V of this act for the operation and administration of charter schools as provided in chapter 28A.710 RCW shall not include state common school levy revenues collected under RCW 84.52.065.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$483,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$316,000

Charter Schools Oversight Account—State Appropriation . . . .$737,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,536,000

(End of part)

PART VI

HIGHER EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 601. The appropriations in sections 605 through 611 of this act are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) "Institutions" means the institutions of higher education receiving appropriations under sections 605 through 611 of this act.

(2) The legislature, the office of financial management, and other state agencies need consistent and accurate personnel data from institutions of higher education for policy planning purposes. Institutions of higher education shall report personnel data to the office of financial management for inclusion in the agency's data warehouse. Uniform reporting procedures shall be established by the office of financial management for use by the reporting institutions, including provisions for common job classifications and common definitions of full-time equivalent staff. Annual contract amounts, number of contract months, and funding sources shall be consistently reported for employees under contract.

(3) In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards and the state board may waive all or a portion of operating fees for any student. State general fund appropriations shall not be provided to replace tuition and fee revenue foregone as a result of waivers granted under this subsection.

(4)(a) For institutions receiving appropriations in section 605 of this act, the only allowable salary increases provided are those with normally occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and staff retention. In fiscal year 2016 and fiscal year 2017, the state board for community and technical colleges may use salary and benefit savings from faculty turnover to provide salary increments and associated benefits for faculty who qualify through professional development and training.

(b) For each institution of higher education receiving appropriations under sections 606 through 611 of this act:

(i) The only allowable salary increases are those associated with normally occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and staff retention; and

(ii) Institutions may provide salary increases from other sources to instructional and research faculty at the universities and The Evergreen State College, exempt professional staff, teaching and research assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under chapter 41.80 RCW. Any salary increase granted under the authority of this subsection (4)(b)(ii) shall not be included in an institution's salary base for future state funding. It is the intent of the legislature that state general fund support for an institution shall not increase during the current or any future biennium as a result of any salary increases authorized under this subsection (4)(b)(ii).

(5) Fiscal or related staff for institutions receiving appropriations in sections 605 through 611 of this act shall form a technical tuition calculation workgroup with staff from the office of financial management including the education research and data center, nonpartisan legislative fiscal staff, and staff from legislative evaluation and accountability program. The workgroup shall determine key elements, definitions, assumptions, and drivers to forecast tuition revenue. By December 1, 2015, the workgroup shall recommend a single methodology for budget, allotment, and budget scenario modeling purposes. The workgroup may consult with the caseload forecast council as needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602. (1) Within the amounts appropriated in this act, each institution of higher education is expected to enroll and educate at least the following numbers of full-time equivalent state-supported students per academic year:

2015-16

Annual Average

2016-17

Annual Average

University of Washington

37,162

37,162

Washington State University

22,538

22,538

Central Washington University

9,105

9,105

Eastern Washington University

8,734

8,734

The Evergreen State College

4,213

4,213

Western Washington University

11,762

11,762

State Board for Community &

Technical Colleges

Adult Students

139,927

139,927

Running Start Students

11,558

11,558

(2) In achieving or exceeding these enrollment targets, each institution shall seek to:

(a) Maintain and to the extent possible increase enrollment opportunities at branch campuses;

(b) Maintain and to the extent possible increase enrollment opportunities at university centers and other partnership programs that enable students to earn baccalaureate degrees on community college campuses; and

(c) Eliminate and consolidate programs of study for which there is limited student or employer demand, or that are not areas of core academic strength for the institution, particularly when such programs duplicate offerings by other in-state institutions.

(3) For purposes of monitoring and reporting statewide enrollment, the University of Washington and Washington State University shall notify the office of financial management of the number of full-time student equivalent enrollments budgeted for each of their campuses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603. PUBLIC BACCALAUREATE INSTITUTIONS

(1) For the purposes of RCW 28B.15.067(6) as amended by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program), the 2015-16 academic year tuition operating fee for the state universities as defined in RCW 28B.15.005 shall be fourteen percent of the state average wage as defined in RCW 50.04.355.

(2) For the purposes of RCW 28B.15.067(6) as amended by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program), the 2015-16 academic year tuition operating fee for the regional universities as defined in RCW 28B.15.005 and The Evergreen State College shall be ten percent of the state average wage as defined in RCW 50.04.355.

(3) The state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College must accept the transfer of college-level courses taken by students under RCW 28A.600.290 or 28A.600.300 if a student seeking a transfer of the college-level courses has been admitted to the state university, the regional university, or The Evergreen State College, and if the college-level courses are recognized as transferrable by the admitting institution of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604. STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

(1) For the purposes of RCW 28B.15.067(3) as amended by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program), the 2015-16 academic year tuition operating fee shall be six percent of the state average wage as defined in RCW 50.04.355.

(2) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 academic years, the state board shall not increase tuition fees charged to resident undergraduates enrolled in upper division applied baccalaureate programs as specified in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$622,789,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$633,886,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$95,982,000

Community/Technical College Capital Projects Account—

State Appropriation . . . .$17,548,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,370,205,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely as special funds for training and related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW 28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2016 and at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2017.

(2) $5,450,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for administration and customized training contracts through the job skills program. The state board must make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these funds.

(3) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the aerospace center of excellence currently hosted by Everett community college to:

(a) Increase statewide communications and outreach between industry sectors, industry organizations, businesses, K-12 schools, colleges, and universities;

(b) Enhance information technology to increase business and student accessibility and use of the center's web site; and

(c) Act as the information entry point for prospective students and job seekers regarding education, training, and employment in the industry.

(4) $4,353,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5179 (paraeducators). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the state board to conduct a feasibility study for a potential new community and technical college in the Graham, Washington area.

(7) Pursuant to aerospace industry appropriations (chapter 1, Laws of 2013 3rd sp. sess.), $8,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $8,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to maintain one thousand full-time equivalent students high demand aerospace enrollments for the 2015-16 and 2016-17 academic years in programs and at sites recommended by the Washington aerospace and advanced manufacturing pipeline advisory committee or its successor committee.

(8) Community and technical colleges are not required to send mass mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts. Community and technical colleges shall consider lower cost alternatives, such as mailing postcards or brochures that direct individuals to online information and other ways of acquiring print catalogs.

(9) If, by December 31, 2015, the department of enterprise services and the office of financial management do not complete the competitive procurement under RCW 43.19.008(5) to determine if a private vendor should perform real estate services for state agencies, the state board of community and technical colleges shall suspend all payments to the department of enterprise services for real estate services. The state board of community and technical colleges may perform real estate services on its own behalf or may contract for these services from a private vendor for the remainder of the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. If acquired by contract, the contracting is not subject to the processes set forth in RCW 41.06.142 (1), (4), and (5), as authorized in RCW 41.06.142(3).

(10) The state board for community and technical colleges shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(11) Pursuant to aerospace industry appropriations (chapter 1, Laws of 2013 3rd sp. sess.), $1,080,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for operating a fabrication composite wing incumbent worker training program to be housed at the Washington aerospace training and research center.

(12) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for Bellevue college to develop a baccalaureate of science degree in computer science. Subject to approval by the state board for community and technical colleges, in fiscal year 2016 Bellevue college shall develop a baccalaureate of science degree in computer science. This degree shall be directed at high school graduates who may enroll directly as freshmen and transfer-oriented degree and professional and technical degree holders. Bellevue college will develop a plan for offering this new degree by no later than fall quarter 2017. With the exception of the amounts provided in this subsection, the plan will assume funding for this new degree will come through redistribution of its current per full-time enrollment funding. The plan shall be delivered to the state board by June 30, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$324,587,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$327,777,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$13,998,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$3,010,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation . . . .$393,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation . . . .$7,116,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation . . . .$6,732,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,700,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$226,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$226,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$685,765,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the center for international trade in forest products in the university of forest resources.

(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(3) $3,000,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account appropriation is provided solely to support the joint center for aerospace innovation technology.

(4) Within existing resources the University of Washington may: (a) Implement an integrated innovation institute and research, planning, and outreach initiatives at the Olympic national resources center; and (b) accredit a four-year undergraduate forestry program from the society of American foresters. Accreditation may occur in conjunction with reaccreditation of the master of forest resources program.

(5) $1,700,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for ocean acidification monitoring, forecasting, and research and for operation of the Washington ocean acidification center. By September 1, 2015, the center must provide a biennial work plan and begin quarterly progress reports to the Washington marine resources advisory council created under RCW 43.06.338.

(6) $55,119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $52,037,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for an increase in the number of bachelor's degrees awarded for computer science.

(8) $3,600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $5,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the continued operations of the Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, Idaho medical school program. The state cost shall not exceed $45,000 per student per year for students attending medical school in Spokane.

(9) Within the amounts provided in this section, the University of Washington Medicine shall enter into an inter-agency agreement with the special commitment center within the department of social and health services and also enter into an inter-agency agreement with the department of corrections. The inter-agency agreements shall allow each entity to receive drug pricing under 340B of the public health services act, at the very least, for drug purchases associated with treating patients with hepatitis C, whereby the university is acting as the covered entity or safety-net provider beginning January 1, 2016.

(10) The University of Washington shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(11) The University of Washington shall not increase the number of partner universities, colleges, or states, to the Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, Idaho medical school program after the effective date of this section without legislative approval.

(12) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Latino health center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$208,543,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$210,284,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$33,995,000

Washington Nuclear Energy Education Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$105,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$138,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$138,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$453,203,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) $35,905,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $33,689,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for an increase in the number of bachelor's degrees awarded for science, technology, engineering, and mathematics programs of study.

(4) $1,122,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for new academic programs in software engineering, sustainable food systems, data analytics, and aviation management at the university center of north Puget Sound.

(5) $1,098,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,402,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1559 (higher education programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, Washington State University must offer to the University of Washington to continue the services and operations of the WWAMI program in Spokane under the same conditions and limitations that existed in the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium prior to the dissolution of the WWAMI partnership between the University of Washington and Washington State University.

(7) $105,000 of the Washington nuclear energy education account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5093 (nuclear energy education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for state match requirements related to the federal aviation administration grant.

(9) Washington State University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletic programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$42,660,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$42,817,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$16,598,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$102,075,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) At least $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and at least $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 shall be expended on the Northwest autism center.

(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in science, technology, and math enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in science, technology, and math programs above the prior academic year.

(3) $6,466,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $5,767,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for an increase in the number of bachelor's degrees awarded for science, technology, engineering, and mathematics programs of study.

(5) Eastern Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$44,145,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$44,632,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$19,076,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$107,853,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient for the university to develop a plan to create an online degree granting entity that awards degrees based on an alternative credit model.

(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in science, technology, and math enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in science, technology, and math programs above the prior academic year.

(3) Central Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(4) $9,638,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $8,885,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for an increase in the number of bachelor's degrees awarded for science, technology, engineering, and mathematics programs of study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$24,848,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$24,748,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$5,450,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$55,046,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The Evergreen State College must work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the college shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the college, and how many students are enrolled in computer science programs above the prior academic year.

(2) $3,111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,870,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5851 (college bound). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for an increase in the number of bachelor's degrees awarded for science, technology, engineering, and mathematics programs of study.

(5) $37,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $158,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5915 (dynamic fiscal notes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $98,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5631 (domestic violence services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $32,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5452 (early start). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5179 (paraeducators). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Washington state institute of public policy to contract with an objective, non-partisan, nationally known organization to examine policy options for increasing the availability of primary care services in rural Washington.

(10) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for The Evergreen State College to continue operations of the Longhouse Center and the Northwest Indian applied research institute.

(11) Notwithstanding other provisions in this section, the board of directors for the Washington state institute for public policy may adjust due dates for projects included on the institute's 2015-2017 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.

(12) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the institute to review existing research literature and begin a four-year study to evaluate outcomes regarding the cost effectiveness of FDA approved long-acting injectable medications that are indicated for the treatment of alcohol and opiate dependence. Any outcome evaluation will be focused on potential benefits to prison offenders being released into the community and the effects on recidivism. The institute shall submit a report summarizing cost-effectiveness findings from the existing research literature to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2016.

(13) The Evergreen State College shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(14) $121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5649 (involuntary treatment act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$63,346,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$63,347,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$13,742,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$140,435,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in science, technology, and math enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in science, technology, and math programs above the prior academic year.

(2) $14,185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $13,228,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for an increase in the number of bachelor's degrees awarded for science, technology, engineering, and mathematics programs of study.

(4) Western Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612. FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$5,430,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$5,438,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$4,841,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$15,709,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 613. FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$278,149,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$272,154,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$11,730,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$300,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation . . . .$60,568,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$135,000,000

Health Professionals Loan Repayment and Scholarship

Program Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,720,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$759,621,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $200,587,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, and $206,221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, $6,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $135,000,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for the state need grant program, the state work study programs including up to four percent administrative allowance for the state work study program, and the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program). Prior to disbursing annual state need grant amounts to institutions of higher education, the council shall retain an amount sufficient to provide maximum state need grant awards for participants in the college bound program as forecasted by the caseload forecast council in February preceding the academic year awards will be disbursed. The student achievement council shall disburse state need grant awards for college bound students in the same manner as college bound awards.

(2) To achieve the fiscal objectives provided in subsections (1) and (6) of this section, changes made to the state need grant program in the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia are continued in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

(3) To achieve the fiscal objectives of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program), $45,061,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $39,867,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $11,022,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation are transferred to the following colleges and universities for instructional support as provided in (a) through (g) of this subsection:

(a) For the University of Washington, $19,287,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $17,811,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $4,819,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation;

(b) For the Washington State University, $12,564,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $11,530,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $3,130,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation;

(c) For Central Washington University, $3,373,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $3,041,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $841,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation;

(d) For Eastern Washington University, $2,263,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $1,974,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $550,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation;

(e) For The Evergreen State College, $1,089,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $982,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $269,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation;

(f) For Western Washington University, $4,964,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $4,528,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $1,233,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation; and

(g) For the state board of community and technical colleges, $1,524,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $189,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation.

(4) Changes made to the state work study program in the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia are continued in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium including maintaining the increased required employer share of wages; adjusted employer match rates; discontinuation of nonresident student eligibility for the program; and revising distribution methods to institutions by taking into consideration other factors such as off-campus job development, historical utilization trends, and student need.

(5) Within the funds appropriated in this section, eligibility for the state need grant shall include students with family incomes at or below 70 percent of the state median family income (MFI), adjusted for family size, and shall include students enrolled in three to five credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits. Awards for all students shall be adjusted by the estimated amount by which Pell grant increases exceed projected increases in the noninstructional costs of attendance. Awards for students with incomes between 51 and 70 percent of the state median shall be prorated at the following percentages of the award amount granted to those with incomes below 51 percent of the MFI: 70 percent for students with family incomes between 51 and 55 percent MFI; 65 percent for students with family incomes between 56 and 60 percent MFI; 60 percent for students with family incomes between 61 and 65 percent MFI; and 50 percent for students with family incomes between 66 and 70 percent MFI.

(6) Students who are eligible for the college bound scholarship shall be given priority for the state need grant program regardless of date of enrollment at the institution. These eligible college bound students whose family incomes are in the 0-65 median family income ranges shall be awarded the maximum state need grant for which they are eligible under the conditions and limitations in this section and may not be denied maximum state need grant funding due to institutional policies or delayed awarding of college bound scholarship students.

(7) $37,518,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the college bound scholarship program and the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program).

(8) $17,207,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $11,153,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to meet state match requirements associated with the opportunity scholarship program. The legislature will evaluate subsequent appropriations to the opportunity scholarship program based on the extent that additional private contributions are made, program spending patterns, and fund balance.

(9) $3,825,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $3,825,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $1,720,000 of the health professionals loan repayment and scholarship program account appropriation are provided solely to increase the number of licensed primary care health professionals to serve in licensed primary care health professional critical shortage areas.

(10) In developing the skilled and educated workforce report pursuant to RCW 28B.77.080(3), the council shall use the bureau of labor statistics analysis of the education and training requirements of occupations, in addition to any other method the council may choose to use, to assess the number and type of higher education and training credentials required to match employer demand for a skilled and educated workforce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 614. FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$1,503,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$1,484,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$55,081,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$72,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$58,140,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$82,677,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$117,443,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$290,969,000

Home Visiting Services Account—State Appropriation . . . .$6,868,000

Home Visiting Services Account—Federal Appropriation . . . .$25,228,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$80,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$603,185,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $51,630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $66,786,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $80,000,000 of the opportunity pathways account appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education assistance program services.

(2) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to develop and provide culturally relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers.

(3) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration, and other costs associated with child care subsidies. The department shall transfer a portion of this grant to the department of social and health services to fund the child care subsidies paid by the department of social and health services on behalf of the department of early learning. Within the amounts provided for the working connections child care program, the department shall control reimbursement decisions for working connections child care cases such that the aggregate average cost per case for working connections child care does not exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures.

(4) The amounts provided in this act for the working connections child care program assume that the department of early learning exercises its authority under RCW 43.215.135 to require working connections child care recipients and applicants to seek child support enforcement services from the department of social and health services, division of child support, unless the department of social and health services finds that the applicant or recipient has good cause not to cooperate due to domestic violence or other exceptions, as determined by the department of social and health services, division of child support.

(5) $3,434,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $3,434,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for expenditure into the home visiting services account. This funding is intended to meet federal maintenance of effort requirements and to secure private matching funds.

(6)(a) $15,047,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $36,113,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $26,206,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5452 (early learning care and education system). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(b) $50,807,000 of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection is provided solely for the early achievers, quality rating, and improvement system, including ratings and training, coaching and technical assistance, quality improvement awards, staffing, and support. Within the amount provided in this subsection, the department shall create a single source web site to provide details on child care providers' early achievers rating level, licensing history, and other indicators of quality and safety.

(c) $12,449,000 of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection is provided solely for professional development opportunities for early achiever program participants, including degree and retention incentives and scholarship and tuition reimbursement for costs associated with obtaining a degree or credential related to early childhood education, child development, or early care and education.

(d) $2,986,000 of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection is provided solely for the reduction of barriers for low-income providers and programs, including the creation of a substitute pool, needs-based grants for curriculum, materials, supplies, and equipment, and development of materials and assessments in provider and family home languages.

(e) $2,916,000 of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection is provided solely to implement tiered reimbursement for child care licensed family home and center providers rated at level 3, 4, or 5. Additional amounts for licensed family home providers are provided separately in fiscal year 2016 as part of a collective bargaining agreement under Part IX of this act.

(f) $1,000,000 of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection is provided solely to pilot implementation of the early achievers system for school-age child care providers.

(g) $5,321,000 of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection is provided solely for the collection of longitudinal, student-level data on all children attending a working connections child care program or early childhood education and assistance program.

(h) $128,000 of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection is provided solely for the early learning advisory council, early achievers review subcommittee to provide feedback and guidance on strategies to improve the quality of instruction and environment for early learning and provide recommendations on the implementation of the early achievers program.

(7)(a) $153,717,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.215.135.

(b) In addition to groups that were given prioritized access to the working connections child care program effective March 1, 2011, the department shall also give prioritized access into the program to families in which a parent of a child in care is a minor who is not living with a parent or guardian and who is a full-time student in a high school that has a school-sponsored on-site child care center.

(8) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with the office of financial management and the department of social and health services shall report enrollments and active caseload for the working connections child care program to the legislative fiscal committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight task force on an agreed upon schedule. The report shall also identify the number of cases participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and working connections child care. The department must also report on the number of children served through contracted slots.

(9) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit entity experienced in the provision of promoting early literacy for children through pediatric office visits.

(10) $1,224,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $1,953,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 and $13,424,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the seasonal child care program. If federal sequestration cuts are realized, cuts to the seasonal child care program must be proportional to other federal reductions made within the department.

(11) $2,522,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $2,522,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 and $4,540,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the medicaid treatment child care (MTCC) program. The department shall contract for MTCC services to provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment services to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children. Priority for services shall be given to children referred from the department of social and health services children's administration. In addition to referrals made by children's administration, the department shall authorize services for children referred to the MTCC program, as long as the children meet the eligibility requirements as outlined in the Washington state plan for the MTCC program. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, $60,000 per fiscal year may be used by the department for administering the MTCC program, if needed.

(12)(a)(i) The department of early learning is required to provide to the education research and data center, housed at the office of financial management, data on all state-funded early childhood programs. These programs include the early support for infants and toddlers, early childhood education and assistance program (ECEAP), and the working connections and seasonal subsidized childcare programs including license exempt facilities or family, friend, and neighbor care. The data provided by the department to the education research data center must include information on children who participate in these programs, including their name and date of birth, and dates the child received services at a particular facility.

(ii) The ECEAP early learning professionals must enter qualifications into the department's professional development registry during the 2015-16 school year. By October 2017 the department must provide ECEAP early learning professional data to the education research data center.

(iii) The department must request federally funded head start programs to voluntarily provide data to the department and the education research data center that is equivalent to what is being provided for state-funded programs.

(iv) The education research and data center must provide a report on early childhood program participation and K-12 outcomes to the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee using available data by November 2015 for the school year ending in 2014 and again in March 2016 for the school year ending in 2015.

(b) The department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, must withhold payment for services to early childhood programs that do not report on the name, date of birth, and the dates a child received services at a particular facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 616. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$6,289,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$6,293,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$34,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$12,616,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the school to offer to students enrolled in grades nine through twelve for full-time instructional services at the Vancouver campus with the opportunity to participate in a minimum of one thousand eighty hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn twenty-four high school credits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 617. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$9,776,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$9,719,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$19,495,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the center to offer to students enrolled in grades nine through twelve for full-time instructional services at the Vancouver campus with the opportunity to participate in a minimum of one thousand eighty hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn twenty-four high school credits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 618. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$1,091,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$1,103,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$2,086,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$18,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,298,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 619. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$2,278,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$2,300,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,578,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the restoration of the Washington women's history consortium created in RCW 27.34.360. Funds must be used for staff, professional archiving, public programs and exhibits, and information technology investments to enable the society to restore its central database of women's history.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 620. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$1,643,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$1,701,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$3,344,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The eastern Washington state historical society shall develop a plan for creating a performance-based partnership agreement between the state of Washington and the not-for-profit Northwest museum of arts and culture for implementation in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium. The plan at minimum shall include strategies to increase nonstate revenues for the operation of the museum and estimate the minimum amount of state funding necessary to preserve, maintain, and protect state-owned facilities and assets. The plan shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2016.

(End of part)

PART VII

SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 701. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$1,067,157,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$1,133,037,000

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$6,462,000

Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retire Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$1,430,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,208,086,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES

Accident Account—State Appropriation . . . .$2,081,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation . . . .$2,081,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,162,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$16,129,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$13,847,000

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$180,685,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$210,661,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$1,400,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$1,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$1,301,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,101,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT POOL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$12,500,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$12,500,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$54,558,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$148,000

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .$10,029,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$89,735,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for deposit to the information technology investment revolving account, hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the director of financial management or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. Funds in the account are provided solely for the information technology projects shown in LEAP omnibus document SIT-2015, dated March 27, 2015, which is hereby incorporated by reference. To facilitate the transfer of moneys from other funds and accounts that are associated with projects contained in LEAP omnibus document SIT-2015, dated March 27, 2015, the state treasurer is directed to transfer moneys from other funds and accounts in an amount not to exceed $10,029,000 to the information technology investment revolving account in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management.

(2) Agencies may apply to the office of financial management to receive funds from the information technology investment revolving account. Preference must be given to projects that utilize commercial off-the-shelf or software as a service technology solution.

(3) Allocations and allotments may be made only during discrete stages of projects, which at a minimum must include a planning stage, procurement stage, and implementation and integration stage. At least fourteen days prior to an allocation or allotment of funds to an agency, the office of financial management, jointly with the office of the chief information officer, must deliver to the legislative fiscal committees the following information for each project receiving an allocation from the account:

(a) A technology budget using a method similar to the state capital budget, identifying project costs, funding sources, and anticipated deliverables through each stage of the investment and across fiscal periods and biennia from project initiation to implementation. If the project affects more than one agency, a technology budget must be prepared for each agency;

(b) The technology implementation plan that includes:

(i) An organizational chart of the project management team that identifies team members and their roles and responsibilities;

(ii) The office of the chief information officer staff assigned to the project;

(iii) An implementation schedule covering activities, critical milestones, and deliverables at each stage of the project for the life of the project at each agency affected by the project; and

(iv) Performance measures used to determine that the project is on time, within budget, and meeting expectations for quality of work product.

(c) A letter from the office of the chief information officer certifying that:

(i) The project is consistent with the state's enterprise architecture and other policies developed by the office of the chief information officer;

(ii) The agency has the organizational capacity, preparedness, and leadership to implement the project successfully;

(iii) The agency has adequately assessed and minimized the risks inherent with the project;

(iv) The project has the management, staffing, and oversight resources needed for the cost, complexity, and risks associated with the project;

(v) The project has implementation schedules and performance measures for timeliness, deliverables, quality, and budget;

(vi) The agency has an adequate risk management plan that also enables the office of the chief information officer to assess, intervene, and take necessary action when performance measures are not being met; and

(vii) For any investment that does not use commercial off-the-shelf or software as a service technology solution, the proposed project represents the best business solution and should not be delayed.

(4) For any project that exceeds two million dollars in total funds to complete, requires more than one biennium to complete, or is financed through financial contracts, bonds, or other indebtedness:

(i) Quality assurance for the project must report independently to the office of the chief information officer;

(ii) The office of the chief information officer must review, and if necessary, revise the proposed project to ensure it is flexible and adaptable to advances in technology;

(iii) The technology budget must specifically identify the uses of any financing proceeds. No more than thirty percent of the financing proceeds may be used for payroll-related costs for state employees assigned to project management, installation, testing, or training;

(iv) The agency must consult with the office of the state treasurer during the competitive procurement process to evaluate early in the process whether products and services to be solicited and the responsive bids from a solicitation may be financed; and

(v) The agency must consult with the contracting division of the department of enterprise services for a review of all contracts and agreements related to the project's information technology procurements.

(5) The office of the chief information officer may suspend or terminate a project at any time if the office of the chief information officer determines that the project is not meeting or is not expected to meet anticipated performance measures. Once suspension or termination occurs, the agency shall not make additional expenditures on the project without approval of the state chief information officer. If a project is terminated, the office of financial management must terminate the agency's allocation from the information technology investment revolving account and the agency shall return any remaining funds to the account to be reallocated to other projects by the office of financial management.

(6) Any cost to administer or implement this section for projects contained in LEAP omnibus document SIT-2015, dated May 22, 2015, must be paid from the information technology investment revolving account. For any other information technology project made subject to the conditions, limitations, and review of this section, the cost to implement this section must be paid from the funds for that project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES—RATE ADJUSTMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .($45,000)

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .($45,000)

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .($16,000)

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$4,000

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .($296,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .($398,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the consolidated technology services' billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92B-2015, dated March 26, 2015, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—SECRETARY OF STATE ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$63,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$80,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$28,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$3,000

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .$62,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$236,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the secretary of state's billing authority for archives and records management. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92C-2015, dated March 26, 2015, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—STATE AUDITOR AUDIT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .($9,000)

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .($16,000)

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .($9,000)

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .($14,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .($48,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the state auditor's billing authority for state agency auditing services. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92D-2015, dated March 26, 2015, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OFFICE OF ATTORNEY GENERAL LEGAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$1,982,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$2,063,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$680,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$58,000

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .$3,267,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$8,050,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the office of attorney general's billing authority for legal services. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92E-2015, dated May 22, 2015, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OFFICE OF THE CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$179,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$205,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$72,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$7,000

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .$238,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$701,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the office of the chief information officer's billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92F-2015, dated March 26, 2015, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .($166,000)

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .($23,000)

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .($64,000)

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .($2,000)

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .($206,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .($461,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the office of administrative hearing's billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92G-2015, dated March 22, 2015, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$591,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$951,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$371,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$50,000

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .$845,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,808,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the central technology services' billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92J-2015, dated March 26, 2015, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$173,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$519,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$313,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$51,000

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .$1,687,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,743,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the department of enterprise services' billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92K-2015, dated March 26, 2015, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—FLEET PROGRAM RATE REDUCTION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .($151,000)

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .($151,000)

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .($114,000)

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .($22,000)

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .($272,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .($710,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to efficiencies and reduced costs for the department of enterprise services' fleet program charges to state agencies. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92P-2015, dated March 26, 2015, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$3,798,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$3,261,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$763,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$96,000

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .$1,446,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$9,364,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to new billing authority for central service functions performed by the office of financial management. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92R-2015, dated March 26, 2015, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .($3,920,000)

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .($3,939,000)

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .($1,164,000)

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .($13,000)

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .($456,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .($9,492,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the self-insurance premium liability billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92X-2015, dated March 26, 2015, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—EMERGENCY FUND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$850,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$850,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,700,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are for the governor's emergency fund for the critically necessary work of any agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$8,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$16,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the education technology revolving account for the purpose of covering ongoing operational and equipment replacement costs incurred by the K-20 educational network program in providing telecommunication services to network participants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—O'BRIEN BUILDING IMPROVEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$2,945,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$2,944,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,889,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the enterprise services account for payment of principal, interest, and financing expenses associated with the certificate of participation for the O'Brien building improvement, project number 20081007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 720. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CHERBERG BUILDING REHABILITATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$602,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$606,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,208,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the enterprise services account for payment for the principal, interest, and financing expenses associated with the certificate of participation for the Cherberg building improvements, project number 2002-1-005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 721. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—HOME VISITING SERVICES ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$2,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$2,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the home visiting services account to support the expansion of home visiting services within the department of early learning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 722. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CANCER RESEARCH ENDOWMENT FUND MATCH TRANSFER ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$5,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for expenditure into the cancer research endowment fund match transfer account under Substitute Senate Bill No. 6096 (cancer research). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the appropriation in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 723. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$36,386,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$36,386,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$72,772,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The state treasurer shall distribute the appropriations to the following counties and health districts in the amounts designated to support public health services, including public health nursing:

Health District

FY 2016

FY 2017

2015-17

Biennium

Adams County Health District

$121,213

$121,213

$242,426

Asotin County Health District

$159,890

$159,890

$319,780

Benton-Franklin Health District

$1,614,337

$1,614,337

$3,228,674

Chelan-Douglas Health District

$399,634

$399,634

$799,268

Clallam County Health and Human Services Department

$291,401

$291,401

$582,802

Clark County Health District

$1,767,341

$1,767,341

$3,534,682

Skamania County Health Department

$111,327

$111,327

$222,654

Columbia County Health District

$119,991

$119,991

$239,982

Cowlitz County Health Department

$477,981

$477,981

$955,962

Garfield County Health District

$93,154

$93,154

$186,308

Grant County Health District

$297,761

$297,761

$595,522

Grays Harbor Health Department

$335,666

$335,666

$671,332

Island County Health Department

$255,224

$255,224

$510,448

Jefferson County Health and Human Services

$184,080

$184,080

$368,160

Seattle-King County Department of Public Health

$12,685,521

$12,685,521

$25,371,042

Bremerton-Kitsap County Health District

$997,476

$997,476

$1,994,952

Kittitas County Health Department

$198,979

$198,979

$397,958

Klickitat County Health Department

$153,784

$153,784

$307,568

Lewis County Health Department

$263,134

$263,134

$526,268

Lincoln County Health Department

$113,917

$113,917

$227,834

Mason County Department of Health Services

$227,448

$227,448

$454,896

Okanogan County Health District

$169,882

$169,882

$339,764

Pacific County Health Department

$169,075

$169,075

$338,150

Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department

$4,143,169

$4,143,169

$8,286,338

San Juan County Health and Community Services

$126,569

$126,569

$253,138

Skagit County Health Department

$449,745

$449,745

$899,490

Snohomish Health District

$3,433,291

$3,433,291

$6,866,582

Spokane County Health District

$2,877,318

$2,877,318

$5,754,636

Northeast Tri-County Health District

$249,303

$249,303

$498,606

Thurston County Health Department

$1,046,897

$1,046,897

$2,093,794

Wahkiakum County Health Department

$93,181

$93,181

$186,362

Walla Walla County-City Health Department

$302,173

$302,173

$604,346

Whatcom County Health Department

$1,214,301

$1,214,301

$2,428,602

Whitman County Health Department

$189,355

$189,355

$378,710

Yakima Health District

$1,052,482

$1,052,482

$2,104,964

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS

$36,386,000

$36,386,000

$72,772,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 724. BELATED CLAIMS

The agencies and institutions of the state may expend moneys appropriated in this act, upon approval of the office of financial management, for the payment of supplies and services furnished to the agency or institution in prior fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 725. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS—CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.

(1) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$65,350,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$68,450,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$133,800,000

(2) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$4,500,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$4,300,000

Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$10,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$18,800,000

(3) There is appropriated for contributions to the judges' retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$501,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$499,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 726. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—LEAN MANAGEMENT STRATEGIES AND EFFICIENCY SAVINGS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .($22,580,000)

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .($26,047,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .($48,627,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature is committed to making continuous improvement part of the culture of state government.

(2) Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5737 (government performance and accountability) establishes the office of performance management to provide coordination and oversight of those activities that are designed to drive efficiencies in state spending and increase productivity of state employees while improving and increasing state services for taxpayers.

(3) The office of performance management shall develop a plan to achieve at least the amount of savings specified in this section. Based on this plan, the office of financial management must reduce allotments for affected state agencies by at least $22,580,000 from the state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2016 and $26,047,000 from the state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2017 in this act to reflect savings resulting from application of the lean management and performance management strategies required by this section and Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5737 (government performance and accountability). The allotment reductions shall be placed in unallotted status and remain unexpended.

(4) The office of performance management and the office of the chief information officer must integrate lean principles into all major information technology initiatives.

(5) The office of performance management must compile and transmit a progress report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature at least every six months, beginning January 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 727. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—STATE EFFICIENCY AND RESTRUCTURING REPAYMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$5,078,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$5,078,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$10,156,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the cleanup settlement account on July 1, 2015, and July 1, 2016, as repayment of moneys that were transferred to the state efficiency and restructuring account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 728. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—COMMON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$600,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$600,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,200,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the common school construction account—state on July 1, 2015, and July 1, 2016, for an interest payment pursuant to RCW 90.38.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 729. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—NATURAL RESOURCES REAL PROPERTY REPLACEMENT ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$300,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$300,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$600,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the natural resources real property replacement account—state on July 1, 2015, and July 1, 2016, for an interest payment pursuant to RCW 90.38.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 730. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$400,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The director of financial management shall distribute $246,000 to Clallam county and $154,000 to Mason county for extraordinary criminal justice costs pursuant to RCW 43.330.190.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 731. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$227,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$227,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$454,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are provided solely for expenditure into the county criminal justice assistance account—state. The treasurer shall make quarterly distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account of the amounts provided in this section in accordance with RCW 82.14.310 for the purposes of reimbursing local jurisdictions for increased costs incurred as a result of the mandatory arrest of repeat offenders pursuant to chapter 35, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. The appropriations and distributions made under this section constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of services for the purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 732. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$133,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$133,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$266,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated for expenditure into the municipal criminal justice assistance account. The treasurer shall make quarterly distributions from the municipal criminal justice assistance account of the amounts provided in this section in accordance with RCW 82.14.320 and 82.14.330, for the purposes of reimbursing local jurisdictions for increased costs incurred as a result of the mandatory arrest of repeat offenders pursuant to chapter 35, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. The appropriations and distributions made under this section constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of services for the purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 733. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—LOCAL GOVERNMENT MARIJUANA ENFORCEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$6,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$6,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$12,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for distribution to local governments pursuant to Substitute Senate Bill No. 6062 (marijuana revenue). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 734. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—COMMUNICATION SERVICES REFORM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$5,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$5,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$10,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the universal communications services fund to fund the temporary universal communications services program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 735. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OUTDOOR EDUCATION AND RECREATION ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$500,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the outdoor education and recreation account. If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5843 (outdoor recreation) is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 736. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY

State Health Care Authority Administration Account—

State Appropriation. . . .$18,076,000

The appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5976 (creating a statewide consolidated health benefits program for school district employees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 737. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—FAMILY ASSESSMENT RESPONSE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$1,584,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the child and family reinvestment account to support the implementation and maintenance of the family assessment response within the department of social and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 738. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CONTRIBUTIONS FOR STATE AGENCY EMPLOYEE HEALTH INSURANCE—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .($2,710,000)

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$14,032,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$3,232,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$333,000

Other Dedicated Funds. . . .$4,590,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$19,477,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to adjust agency appropriations for state agency represented employee insurance benefits consistent with the contribution rates included in sections 932, 933, and 938 of this act.

(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the state treasurer shall transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or account to the special insurance contribution adjustment revolving account in amounts determined by the office of financial management which shall adjust allotments for all agencies to reflect these adjusted appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 739. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CONTRIBUTIONS FOR STATE AGENCY EMPLOYEE HEALTH INSURANCE—NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .($793,000)

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$4,131,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$796,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$92,000

Other Dedicated Funds. . . .$2,083,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$6,309,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to adjust agency appropriations for state agency nonrepresented employee insurance benefits consistent with the contribution rates included in sections 932, 933, and 938 of this act.

(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the state treasurer shall transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or account to the special insurance contribution adjustment revolving account in amounts determined by the office of financial management which shall adjust allotments for all agencies to reflect these adjusted appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 740. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CONTRIBUTIONS FOR HIGHER EDUCATION EMPLOYEE HEALTH INSURANCE—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .($467,000)

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$2,417,000

Other Dedicated Funds. . . .$43,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,993,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to adjust institution appropriations for higher education institution represented employee insurance benefits consistent with the contribution rates included in sections 932, 933, and 938 of this act.

(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the state treasurer shall transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or account to the special insurance contribution adjustment revolving account in amounts determined by the office of financial management which shall adjust allotments for all higher education institutions to reflect these adjusted appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 741. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CONTRIBUTIONS FOR HIGHER EDUCATION EMPLOYEE HEALTH INSURANCE—NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .($1,209,000)

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$6,517,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$10,000

Salary and Insurance Increase Revolving Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$95,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,413,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to adjust institution appropriations for higher education institution nonrepresented employee insurance benefits consistent with the contribution rates included in sections 932, 933, and 938 of this act.

(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the state treasurer shall transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or account to the special insurance contribution adjustment revolving account in amounts determined by the office of financial management which shall adjust allotments for all institutions to reflect these adjusted appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 742. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CONTRIBUTIONS FOR EMPLOYEE HEALTH INSURANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .($13,667,000)

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .($20,441,000)

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .($6,322,000)

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .($659,000)

Other Dedicated Funds Appropriation. . . .($10,642,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .($51,731,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to adjust agency and institution appropriations to reflect reduced state employer funding rates for health insurance, and decreased employer health insurance costs due to lower claims experience and other factors through March 2015, consistent with the provisions included in sections 932, 933, and 938 of this act.

(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the state treasurer shall transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or account to the special insurance contribution adjustment revolving account in amounts determined by the office of financial management which shall adjust allotments for all agencies and institutions to reflect these adjusted appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 743. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CONTRIBUTIONS FOR EMPLOYEE HEALTH INSURANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .($4,267,000)

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .($4,739,000)

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .($1,311,000)

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .($133,000)

Other Dedicated Funds Appropriation. . . .($2,259,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .($12,709,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to adjust agency and institution appropriations to reflect the reductions in the state employer funding rate for health insurance, and decreased employer health insurance costs resulting from increasing the tobacco surcharge to $50 per month and applying the spouse health plan waiver surcharge to all employee spouses and domestic partners who are eligible for health benefits through their employers, consistent with the provisions included in sections 932, 933, and 938 of this act.

(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the state treasurer shall transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or account to the special insurance contribution adjustment revolving account in amounts determined by the office of financial management which shall adjust allotments for all agencies and institutions to reflect these adjusted appropriations.

(End of part)

PART VIII

OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 801. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance﻿

premium distributions. Funds are provided

solely for a distribution to be made each

fiscal year to the Spokane fire district in the

amount of $167,000 and King county fire

district #2 in the amount of $45,000. . . .$424,000

General Fund Appropriation for public utility﻿

district excise tax distributions. . . .$56,598,000

General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting﻿

attorney distributions. . . .$6,345,000

General Fund Appropriation for boating safety﻿

and education distributions. . . .$4,000,000

General Fund Appropriation for other tax﻿

distributions. . . .$80,000

General Fund Appropriation for habitat conservation﻿

program distributions. . . .$3,608,000

General Fund Appropriation for cannabis

excise tax and license distribution from

the dedicated marijuana account to the state

general fund pursuant to Substitute House

Bill No. 2136, $36,046,000 for fiscal year

2016 and $100,277,000 for fiscal year 2017. . . .$136,323,000

Death Investigations Account Appropriation for﻿

distribution to counties for publicly funded﻿

autopsies. . . .$3,135,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for﻿

harbor improvement revenue distribution. . . .$140,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for﻿

distribution to "timber" counties. . . .$95,716,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation

When making the fiscal year 2016 and 2017

distributions to Grant county, the state

treasurer shall reduce the amount by $140,000

each year and distribute the remainder to the

county. This is the second and third of three

reductions that have been made to reimburse the

state for a nonqualifying extraordinary criminal

justice act payment made to Grant county in

fiscal year 2013. . . .$86,648,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance﻿

Appropriation. . . .$33,601,000

City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for﻿

local government financial assistance﻿

distribution. . . .$23,630,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor﻿

excise tax distribution. . . .$23,917,000

Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Mitigation Account﻿

Appropriation for distribution to local taxing﻿

jurisdictions to mitigate the unintended revenue﻿

redistribution effect of the sourcing law﻿

changes. . . .$47,588,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation﻿

for the Confederated Tribes of the Colville﻿

Reservation. . . .$7,911,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation﻿

for the Spokane Tribe of Indians. . . .$5,165,000

Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor﻿

profits distribution. . . .$98,876,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$497,382,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation. . . .$2,156,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium in accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions); and chapter . . . (SSB 5105), Laws of 2015 (DUI penalties).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation. . . .$1,437,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium to all cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions); and chapter . . . (SSB 5105), Laws of 2015 (DUI penalties).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation for federal flood control﻿

funds distribution. . . .$70,000

General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing fees﻿

distribution. . . .$834,000

Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal forest﻿

reserve fund distribution. . . .$20,153,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$21,057,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to﻿

the state general fund, $10,000,000 for fiscal﻿

year 2016 and $10,000,000 for fiscal year 2017. . . .$20,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the streamlined sales﻿

and use tax account, $23,924,000﻿

for fiscal year 2016 and $23,784,000﻿

for fiscal year 2017. . . .$47,698,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state﻿

general fund, in an amount not to exceed the﻿

actual amount of the annual base payment to the﻿

tobacco settlement account. . . .$180,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state﻿

general fund, in an amount not to exceed the

annual strategic contribution payment to the

tobacco settlement account for fiscal year 2016. . . .$26,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed

the annual strategic contribution payment to

the tobacco settlement account for fiscal year

2017. . . .$25,400,000

Life Sciences Discovery Fund: For transfer to the

state general fund for fiscal year 2016. . . .$22,900,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to﻿

the marine resources stewardship trust account,﻿

$125,000 for fiscal year 2016. . . .$125,000

State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the

clean up settlement account as repayment of the

loan provided in section 3022(2) chapter 2,

Laws of 2012, 2nd sp. sess. (ESB 6074 2012

supplemental capital budget), $643,000 for

fiscal year 2016 and $643,000 for fiscal

year 2017. . . .$1,286,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer

to the clean up settlement account as repayment

of the loan provided in section 3022(2) chapter

2, Laws of 2012, 2nd sp. sess. (ESB 6074 2012

supplemental capital budget), $643,000 for

fiscal year 2016 and $643,000 for fiscal

year 2017. . . .$1,286,000

Home Security Fund Account: For transfer to the

transitional housing operating and rent account,

$7,500,000 for fiscal year 2016. . . .$7,500,000

Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, $50,000,000 for fiscal

year 2016 and $50,000,000 for fiscal year 2017. . . .$100,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the Washington nuclear

energy education account, $52,000 for fiscal

year 2016 and $53,000 for fiscal year 2017. . . .$105,000

Criminal Justice Treatment Account: For transfer to

the state general fund for fiscal year 2016. . . .$11,400,000

Liquor Revolving Account: For transfer to the state

general fund, $3,000,000 for fiscal year 2016

and $3,000,000 for fiscal year 2017. . . .$6,000,000

Flood Control Assistance Account: For transfer

to the state general fund, $1,000,000 for fiscal

year 2016 and $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2017. . . .$2,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the education legacy

trust account for fiscal year 2016. . . .$340,000,000

It is the intent of the legislature to continue to transfer the excess balance from the criminal justice treatment account to the state general fund in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, consistent with policy in this omnibus appropriations act and in an amount not to exceed the projected fund balance.

(End of part)

PART IX

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 901. EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS

The appropriations contained in this act are maximum expenditure authorizations. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys disbursed from the treasury on the basis of a formal loan agreement shall be recorded as loans receivable and not as expenditures for accounting purposes. To the extent that moneys are disbursed on a loan basis, the corresponding appropriation shall be reduced by the amount of loan moneys disbursed from the treasury during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902. EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS

Whenever allocations are made from the governor's emergency fund appropriation to an agency that is financed in whole or in part by other than general fund moneys, the director of financial management may direct the repayment of such allocated amount to the general fund from any balance in the fund or funds which finance the agency. An appropriation is not necessary to effect such repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903. STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS

In addition to the amounts appropriated in this act for revenues for distribution, state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 and bond retirement and interest including ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for these purposes under any statutory formula or under chapters 39.94, 39.96, and 39.98 RCW or any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904. BOND EXPENSES

In addition to such other appropriations as are made by this act, there is hereby appropriated to the state finance committee from legally available bond proceeds in the applicable construction or building funds and accounts such amounts as are necessary to pay the expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the subject bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905. VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT AND SEPARATION

As a management tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of resources, while improving employee productivity and morale, agencies may implement either a voluntary retirement or separation program, or both that is cost neutral or results in cost savings (including costs to the state pension systems) over a two-year period following the commencement of the program, provided that such a program is approved by the director of financial management. Agencies participating in this authorization may offer voluntary retirement and/or separation incentives and options according to procedures and guidelines established by the office of financial management, in consultation with the department of retirement systems. The options may include, but are not limited to, financial incentives for voluntary separation or retirement. An employee does not have a contractual right to a financial incentive offered under this section. Offers shall be reviewed and monitored jointly by the office of financial management and the department of retirement systems. Agencies are required to submit a report by the date established by the office of financial management in the guidelines required in this section, to the legislature and the office of financial management on the outcome of their approved incentive program. The report should include information on the details of the program including the incentive payment amount for each participant, the total cost to the state, and the projected or actual net dollar savings over the two year period.

The department of retirement systems may collect from employers the actuarial cost of any incentive provided under this program, or any other incentive to retire provided by employers to members of the state's pension systems, for deposit in the appropriate pension account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS NOT IMPAIRED

Nothing in this act prohibits the expenditure of any funds by an agency or institution of the state for benefits guaranteed by any collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS

The following sections represent the results of the 2015-2017 collective bargaining process required under the provisions of chapters 41.80, 41.56 and 74.39A RCW. Provisions of the collective bargaining agreements contained in Part IX of this act are described in general terms. Only major economic terms are included in the descriptions. These descriptions do not contain the complete contents of the agreements. The collective bargaining agreements contained in Part IX of this act may also be funded by expenditures from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WFSE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$25,342,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$39,141,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$28,224,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$2,457,000

Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . .$42,913,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$138,077,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees general government under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase or a one percent general wage increase plus twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the appropriations in this section shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications, assignment pay for targeted job classifications, hazard pay for designated night crews, and geographic pay for designated areas. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WPEA

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$3,015,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$4,397,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$466,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$2,000

Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . .$4,068,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$11,948,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington public employees association general government under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase or a one percent general wage increase plus twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the appropriations in this section shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—COALITION OF UNIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$1,632,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$2,106,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$728,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$161,000

Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . .$2,578,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$7,205,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: An agreement has been reached between the governor and the coalition of unions under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase or a one percent general wage increase plus twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the appropriations in this section shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications and annual payments for board certified psychiatrists and physicians. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WAFWP

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$605,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$732,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$1,644,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$520,000

Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . .$2,126,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,627,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington association of fish and wildlife professionals under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase or a one percent general wage increase plus twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the appropriations in this section shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 912. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—PTE LOCAL 17

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$4,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$6,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$10,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: An agreement has been reached between the governor and the professional and technical employees local 17 under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase or a one percent general wage increase plus twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the appropriations in this section shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 913. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—SEIU 1199NW

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$3,815,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$4,887,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$2,274,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$91,000

Health Professions Account—State Appropriation . . . .$82,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$11,149,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: An agreement has been reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 1199nw under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the appropriations in this section shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for additional geographic location pay premiums to address recruitment and retention issues and increased training reimbursement. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 914. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—TEAMSTERS LOCAL 117

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$15,872,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$31,781,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority—State

Appropriation. . . .$10,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$47,663,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: An agreement has been reached between the governor and the international brotherhood of teamsters local 117 through an interest arbitration decision as provided in a memorandum of understanding between the parties and under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded five and one-half percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a four and three-tenths percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the appropriations in this section shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications, supplemental shift premiums for LPNs, payment for overtime exempt employees in specified job classifications when on standby status, and the elimination of geographic location premium pay. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 915. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WFSE HIGHER EDUCATION COMMUNITY COLLEGE COALITION

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees community college coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase or a one percent general wage increase plus twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 916. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WPEA HIGHER EDUCATION COMMUNITY COLLEGE COALITION

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington public employees association community college coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase or a one percent general wage increase plus twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 917. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WSP TROOPERS ASSOCIATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$369,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$539,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$15,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$44,000

Vehicle License Fraud Account—State Appropriation. . . .$29,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$996,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington state patrol troopers association through an interest arbitration decision under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded seven percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. Funding is also provided for a three percent specialty pay for breath alcohol concentration technicians. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 918. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WSP LIEUTENANTS ASSOCIATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$52,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$107,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$159,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington state patrol lieutenants association through an interest arbitration decision under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded five percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a five percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. Funding is also provided to increase annual clothing allowance and increase in accumulated holiday credits. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 919. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—YAKIMA VALLEY COMMUNITY COLLEGE—WPEA

An agreement has been reached between Yakima Valley Community College and the Washington public employees association under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase or a one percent general wage increase plus twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications, an hourly increase in shift differential pay, and a one-time settlement incentive pay of two and one-half percent of anticipated salary per year. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 920. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—HIGHLINE COLLEGE—WPEA

An agreement has been reached between Highline college and the Washington public employees association under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase or a one percent general wage increase plus twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for two additional personal leave days per year, an hourly increase in shift differential pay, and a one-time signing incentive. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 921. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between The Evergreen State College and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase or a one percent general wage increase plus twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications, assignment pay for specified job classes, additional steps to the vacation accrual schedules, and a rate re-opener if specified conditions exist.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 922. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between the Western Washington University and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for implementation of the salary survey to twenty-five percent of the prevailing wage, and for increases to targeted job classifications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 923. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY—PSE

An agreement has been reached between the Western Washington University and the public schools employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for implementation of the salary survey to twenty-five percent of the prevailing wage, and for increases to targeted job classifications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 924. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between Eastern Washington University and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase or a one percent general wage increase plus eleven cents per hour, whichever is greater, effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications, a wage increase for employees earning less than fifteen dollars per hour, and a one hundred fifty dollar signing bonus. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 925. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between Central Washington University and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a two percent increase in base wages effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent increase in base wages effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for a two and one-half of one percent salary adjustment for targeted job classifications, an extension of call back pay to law enforcement officers, an increase in law enforcement officer footwear reimbursement, and an increase in the hourly rate for shift premium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 926. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY—PSE

An agreement has been reached between Central Washington University and the public schools employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a two percent increase in base wages effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent increase in base wages effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for a two and one-half of one percent salary adjustment for targeted job classifications and an increase in standby pay rate. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 927. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between the University of Washington and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a two percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for market adjustments for targeted job classifications, an adjustment to the minimum pay step, and targeted incentive and longevity pay for police management staff.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 928. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON—SEIU 925

An agreement has been reached between the University of Washington and the service employees Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a two percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary and market adjustments for targeted job classifications, and an adjustment to the minimum pay rate. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 929. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between the Washington State University and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 930. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY—PSE

An agreement has been reached between the Washington State University and the public schools employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase or a one percent general wage increase plus twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 931. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY—WSU POLICE GUILD

An agreement has been reached between the Washington State University and the WSU Police Guild under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 932. COMPENSATION—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—SUPER COALITION—INSURANCE BENEFITS

An agreement has been reached for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium between the governor and the health care super coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. Appropriations in this act for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, and the appropriations in sections 738 through 743 of this act are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2015-2017 collective bargaining agreement and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan shall not exceed $831 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2016. For fiscal year 2017, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed $884 per eligible employee.

(b) Except as provided by the parties' health care agreement, in order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065. Beginning January 1, 2016, the board shall collect a $50 per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than $50 per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has the option to be covered in a health plan offered by the spouse's or domestic partner's employer. The surcharge payment shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for administrative expenditures.

(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2016 and 2017, the subsidy shall be up to $150.00 per month.

(3) All savings resulting from reduced claim costs or other factors identified after December 31, 2014, must be reserved for funding employee health benefits in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 933. COMPENSATION—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE SUPER COALITION—INSURANCE BENEFITS

Appropriations for state agencies in this act, and the appropriations in sections 738 through 743 of this act, are sufficient for represented employees outside the super coalition for health benefits, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan shall not exceed $831 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2016. For fiscal year 2017, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed $884 per eligible employee.

(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065. Beginning January 1, 2016, the board shall collect a $50 per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than $50 per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has the option to be covered in a health plan offered by the spouse's or domestic partner's employer. The surcharge payment shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for administrative expenditures.

(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2016 and 2017, the subsidy shall be up to $150.00 per month.

(3) All savings resulting from reduced claim costs or other factors identified after December 31, 2014, must be reserved for funding employee health benefits in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 934. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR NONSTATE EMPLOYEES—LANGUAGE ACCESS PROVIDERS WFSE

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. The state will no longer pay for mileage related to appointments in exchange for a general rate increase of three dollars and fifty cents per hour, which results in no increased expenditures. In addition, funding is provided for a rate increase of one dollar and ten cents per hour effective July 1, 2015, and a rate increase of ninety cents per hour effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 935. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR NONSTATE EMPLOYEES—SEIU HEALTHCARE 775NW HOMECARE WORKERS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw under the provisions of chapter 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for increases to wages and pay differentials, contributions to a retirement benefit, and contributions to health care, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse. Funding is also provided for increased contributions for training related obligations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 936. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR NONSTATE EMPLOYEES—SEIU LOCAL 925 CHILDCARE WORKERS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the service employees international union local 925 through an interest arbitration decision and under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded base rate increases and a two percent enhanced rate for license-exempt providers who complete additional training, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse. The agreement also includes an increased non-standard hours bonus with an increased cap, increased health care funding, and an extension of tiered reimbursement rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 937. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR NONSTATE EMPLOYEES—WSRCC ADULT FAMILY HOMES

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington state residential care council through an interest arbitration award and under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded five percent daily rate increase effective July 1, 2015, and a five percent daily rate increase effective July 1, 2016, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the funding provided in this act for this purpose shall lapse. Funding is also provided for a five-year meaningful home-based activities pilot program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 938. COMPENSATION—NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—INSURANCE BENEFITS

Appropriations for state agencies, and the appropriations in sections 738 through 743, in this act are sufficient for nonrepresented state employee health benefits for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $831 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2016. For fiscal year 2017, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed $884 per eligible employee.

(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require or make any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065. Beginning January 1, 2016, the board shall collect a $50 per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than $50 per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has the option to be covered in a health plan offered by the spouse's or domestic partner's employer. The surcharge payment shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for administrative expenditures.

(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2016 and 2017, the subsidy shall be up to $150 per month.

(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120 the following amounts:

(a) For each full-time employee, $67.94 per month beginning September 1, 2015, and $72.81 beginning September 1, 2016; and

(b) For each part-time employee, who at the time of the remittance is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or 41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for basic benefits, $67.94 each month beginning September 1, 2015, and $72.81 beginning September 1, 2016, prorated by the proportion of employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the part-time employee receives. The remittance requirements specified in this subsection (3) shall not apply to employees of a technical college, school district, or educational service district who purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

(4) All savings resulting from reduced claim costs or other factors identified after December 31, 2014, must be reserved for funding employee health benefits in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 939. GENERAL WAGE INCREASES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$14,051,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$22,702,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$9,034,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$866,000

Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . .$24,757,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$71,410,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided for state agency employee compensation for employees who are not represented or who bargain under statutory authority other than chapter 41.80 or 47.64 RCW, or RCW 41.56.473 or 41.56.475 is sufficient for general wage increases.

(2) Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, for all classified employees, as specified in subsection (1) of this section, employees in the Washington management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the office of financial management, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the appropriations in this section shall lapse. The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a three percent salary increase effective July 1, 2015, for executive, legislative, and judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules, whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected officials, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the appropriations in this section shall lapse.

(3) Funding is provided for a general wage increase of one and eight-tenths percent or a one percent general wage increase plus twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective July 1, 2016, for all classified employees, as specified in subsection (1) of this section, employees in the Washington management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the office of financial management, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the appropriations in this section shall lapse. The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a one and eight-tenths percent salary increase effective July 1, 2016, for executive, legislative, and judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected officials, and contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 6126 (collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the appropriations in this section shall lapse. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 940. INITIATIVE 732 COST-OF-LIVING INCREASES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .($61,000)

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .($105,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .($166,000)

Part 9 of this act authorizes general wage increases for state employees covered by Initiative Measure No. 732. The general wage increases are inclusive of the annual cost-of-living adjustments required under Initiative Measure No. 732. Appropriations for state agencies are adjusted by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to reflect the inclusion of these amounts in other authorized salary increases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 941. TARGETED COMPENSATION INCREASES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$889,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$893,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$600,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$34,000

Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . .$2,459,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,875,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding is also provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications as specified by the office of financial management of classified state employees, except those represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapters 41.80 and 47.64 RCW and RCW 41.56.473 and 41.56.475. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 to fund the provisions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 942. GENERAL WAGE INCREASES - HIGHER EDUCATION

Funding provided is sufficient for state employee compensation increases for employees of higher education institutions who are not represented or who bargain under statutory authority other than chapter 41.80 or 47.64 RCW or RCW 41.56.473 or 41.56.475. Funding is sufficient for general wage increases of three percent effective July 1, 2015, and for a one and eight-tenths percent or a one percent general wage increase plus twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective July 1, 2016. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 for the adjustments in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 943. TARGETED COMPENSATION INCREASES - HIGHER EDUCATION

Funding is also provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications as specified by the office of financial management of classified state employees employed by higher education institutions, except those represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapters 41.80 and 47.64 RCW and RCW 41.56.473 and 41.56.475. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 713-2015 for the adjustments in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 944. COMPENSATION—REVISE PENSION CONTRIBUTION RATES

The appropriations for school districts and state agencies, including institutions of higher education are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Appropriations are adjusted to reflect changes to agency appropriations to reflect pension contribution rates adopted by the pension funding council and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 945. ACQUISITION OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROJECTS THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS

(1) Financial contracts for the acquisition of the information technology projects authorized in this section must be approved jointly by the office of the financial management and the office of the chief information officer. Information technology projects funded under this section shall meet the following requirements:

(a) The project reduces costs and achieves economies of scale by leveraging statewide investments in systems and data and other common or enterprise-wide solutions within and across state agencies;

(b) The project begins or continues replacement of legacy information technology systems and replacing these systems with modern and more efficient information technology systems;

(c) The project improves the ability of an agency to recover from major disaster;

(d) The project provides future savings and efficiencies for an agency through reduced operating costs, improved customer service, or increased revenue collections;

(e) Preference for project approval must be given to an agency that has prior approval from the office of the chief information officer, an approved business plan, and where the primary hurdle to project funding is the lack of funding capacity; and

(f) Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

(2) The following state agencies may enter into financial contracts to finance expenditures for the acquisition and implementation of the following information technology projects for up to the respective amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW: $61,500,000 for the department of revenue to continue replacement of the taxpayer legacy system. Proceeds from any financial contracts must be deposited into the information technology investment revolving account created in section 705 of this act.

Sec. 946. RCW 2.68.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 950 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created an account in the custody of the state treasurer to be known as the judicial information system account. The administrative office of the courts shall maintain and administer the account, in which shall be deposited all moneys received from in-state noncourt users and any out-of-state users of the judicial information system and moneys as specified in RCW 2.68.040 for the purposes of providing judicial information system access to noncourt users and providing an adequate level of automated services to the judiciary. The legislature shall appropriate the funds in the account for the purposes of the judicial information system. The account shall be used for the acquisition of equipment, software, supplies, services, and other costs incidental to the acquisition, development, operation, and administration of information services, telecommunications, systems, software, supplies, and equipment, including the payment of principal and interest on items paid in installments. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the judicial information system account may be appropriated to support the state law library. During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia, the judicial information system account may be appropriated to support the information systems and other activities in the administrative office of the courts.

Sec. 947. RCW 28B.115.070 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 207 are each amended to read as follows:

After June 1, 1992, the department, in consultation with the office and the department of social and health services, shall:

(1) Determine eligible credentialed health care professions for the purposes of the loan repayment and scholarship program authorized by this chapter. Eligibility shall be based upon an assessment that determines that there is a shortage or insufficient availability of a credentialed profession so as to jeopardize patient care and pose a threat to the public health and safety. The department shall consider the relative degree of shortages among professions when determining eligibility. The department may add or remove professions from eligibility based upon the determination that a profession is no longer in shortage. Should a profession no longer be eligible, participants or eligible students who have received scholarships shall be eligible to continue to receive scholarships or loan repayments until they are no longer eligible or until their service obligation has been completed;

(2) Determine health professional shortage areas for each of the eligible credentialed health care professions.

(3) For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, consideration for eligibility shall also be given to registered nursing students who have been accepted into an eligible nursing education program and have declared an intention to teach nursing upon completion of the nursing education program.

Sec. 948. RCW 28C.04.535 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 964 are each amended to read as follows:

Except for the ((2013-14 and 2014-15)) 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, the Washington award for vocational excellence shall be granted annually. The workforce training and education coordinating board shall notify the students receiving the award, their vocational instructors, local chambers of commerce, the legislators of their respective districts, and the governor, after final selections have been made. The workforce training and education coordinating board, in conjunction with the governor's office, shall prepare appropriate certificates to be presented to the selected students. Awards shall be presented in public ceremonies at times and places determined by the workforce training and education coordinating board in cooperation with the office of the governor.

Sec. 949. RCW 36.22.179 and 2014 c 200 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the surcharge authorized in RCW 36.22.178, and except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an additional surcharge of ten dollars shall be charged by the county auditor for each document recorded, which will be in addition to any other charge allowed by law. From September 1, 2012, through June 30, 2019, the surcharge shall be forty dollars. The funds collected pursuant to this section are to be distributed and used as follows:

(a) The auditor shall retain two percent for collection of the fee, and of the remainder shall remit sixty percent to the county to be deposited into a fund that must be used by the county and its cities and towns to accomplish the purposes of chapter 484, Laws of 2005, six percent of which may be used by the county for administrative costs related to its homeless housing plan, and the remainder for programs which directly accomplish the goals of the county's local homeless housing plan, except that for each city in the county which elects as authorized in RCW 43.185C.080 to operate its own local homeless housing program, a percentage of the surcharge assessed under this section equal to the percentage of the city's local portion of the real estate excise tax collected by the county shall be transmitted at least quarterly to the city treasurer, without any deduction for county administrative costs, for use by the city for program costs which directly contribute to the goals of the city's local homeless housing plan; of the funds received by the city, it may use six percent for administrative costs for its homeless housing program. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the auditor shall retain one percent for collection of the fee, and of the remainder remit sixty percent to the county as provided in this subsection (a) and forty percent to the state as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

(b) The auditor shall remit the remaining funds to the state treasurer for deposit in the home security fund account. The department may use twelve and one-half percent of this amount for administration of the program established in RCW 43.185C.020, including the costs of creating the statewide homeless housing strategic plan, measuring performance, providing technical assistance to local governments, and managing the homeless housing grant program. Of the remaining eighty-seven and one-half percent, at least forty-five percent must be set aside for the use of private rental housing payments, and the remainder is to be used by the department to:

(i) Provide housing and shelter for homeless people including, but not limited to: Grants to operate, repair, and staff shelters; grants to operate transitional housing; partial payments for rental assistance; consolidated emergency assistance; overnight youth shelters; grants and vouchers designated for victims of human trafficking and their families; and emergency shelter assistance; and

(ii) Fund the homeless housing grant program.

(2) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to (a) assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust, (b) documents recording a birth, marriage, divorce, or death, (c) any recorded documents otherwise exempted from a recording fee or additional surcharges under state law, (d) marriage licenses issued by the county auditor, or (e) documents recording a state, county, or city lien or satisfaction of lien.

Sec. 950. RCW 38.52.540 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 966 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The enhanced 911 account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the state enhanced 911 excise taxes imposed by RCW 82.14B.030 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account must be used only to support the statewide coordination and management of the enhanced 911 system, for the implementation of wireless enhanced 911 statewide, for the modernization of enhanced 911 emergency communications systems statewide, and to help supplement, within available funds, the operational costs of the system, including adequate funding of counties to enable implementation of wireless enhanced 911 service and reimbursement of radio communications service companies for costs incurred in providing wireless enhanced 911 service pursuant to negotiated contracts between the counties or their agents and the radio communications service companies. For the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia, the account may be used for a criminal history system upgrade in the Washington state patrol and for activities and programs in the military department. A county must show just cause, including but not limited to a true and accurate accounting of the funds expended, for any inability to provide reimbursement to radio communications service companies of costs incurred in providing enhanced 911 service.

(2) Funds generated by the enhanced 911 excise tax imposed by RCW 82.14B.030(5) may not be distributed to any county that has not imposed the maximum county enhanced 911 excise tax allowed under RCW 82.14B.030(1). Funds generated by the enhanced 911 excise tax imposed by RCW 82.14B.030(6) may not be distributed to any county that has not imposed the maximum county enhanced 911 excise tax allowed under RCW 82.14B.030(2).

(3) The state enhanced 911 coordinator, with the advice and assistance of the enhanced 911 advisory committee, is authorized to enter into statewide agreements to improve the efficiency of enhanced 911 services for all counties and shall specify by rule the additional purposes for which moneys, if available, may be expended from this account.

Sec. 951. RCW 41.05.130 and 2014 c 221 s 914 are each amended to read as follows:

The state health care authority administrative account is hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account, including unanticipated revenues under RCW 43.79.270, may be spent only after appropriation by statute, and may be used only for operating expenses of the authority, and during the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia, for health care related analysis provided to the legislature by the office of the state actuary.

Sec. 952. RCW 41.16.050 and 2007 c 218 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created and established in the treasury of each municipality a fund which shall be known and designated as the firefighters' pension fund, which shall consist of: (1) All bequests, fees, gifts, emoluments, or donations given or paid thereto; (2) twenty-five percent of all moneys received by the state from taxes on fire insurance premiums; (3) taxes paid pursuant to the provisions of RCW 41.16.060; (4) interest on the investments of the fund; and (5) contributions by firefighters as provided for ((herein)) in this section. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the moneys received from the tax on fire insurance premiums under the provisions of this chapter shall be distributed in the proportion that the number of paid firefighters in the city, town, or fire protection district bears to the total number of paid firefighters throughout the state to be ascertained in the following manner: The secretary of the firefighters' pension board of each city, town, and fire protection district now or hereafter coming under the provisions of this chapter shall within thirty days after June 7, 1961, and on or before the fifteenth day of January thereafter, certify to the state treasurer the number of paid firefighters in the fire department in such city, town, or fire protection district. For any city or town annexed by a fire protection district at any time before, on, or after June 9, 1994, the city or town shall continue to certify to the state treasurer the number of paid firefighters in the city or town fire department immediately before annexation until all obligations against the firefighters' pension fund in the city or town have been satisfied. For the purposes of the calculation in this section, the state treasurer shall subtract the number certified by the annexed city or town from the number of paid firefighters certified by an annexing fire protection district. The state treasurer shall on or before the first day of June of each year deliver to the treasurer of each city, town, and fire protection district coming under the provisions of this chapter his or her warrant, payable to each city, town, or fire protection district for the amount due such city, town or fire protection district ascertained as herein provided and the treasurer of each such city, town, or fire protection district shall place the amount thereof to the credit of the firefighters' pension fund of such city, town, or fire protection district.

(2)(a) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the state treasurer shall calculate the amount for distribution as provided in subsection (1) of this section. However, the amount to be distributed to cities and towns shall be deposited into the state general fund.

(b) It is the intent of the legislature to continue the policy under (a) of this subsection into the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium as it investigates whether this distribution should continue or be modified or terminated.

Sec. 953. RCW 41.26.802 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 969 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By September 30, 2011, if the prior fiscal biennium's general state revenues exceed the previous fiscal biennium's revenues by more than five percent, subject to appropriation by the legislature, the state treasurer shall transfer five million dollars to the local public safety enhancement account.

(2) ((By September 30, 2015, if the prior fiscal biennium's general state revenues exceed the previous fiscal biennium's revenues by more than five percent, subject to appropriation by the legislature, the state treasurer shall transfer twenty million dollars to the local public safety enhancement account.

(3))) By September 30, 2017, and by September 30th of each odd-numbered year thereafter, if the prior fiscal biennium's general state revenues exceed the previous fiscal biennium's revenues by more than five percent, subject to appropriation by the legislature, the state treasurer shall transfer the lesser of one-third of the increase, or fifty million dollars, to the local public safety enhancement account.

(3) It is the intent of the legislature to suspend this distribution in 2017 as it investigates whether this distribution should continue or be modified or terminated.

Sec. 954. RCW 41.50.110 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 936 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 22 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided by RCW 41.50.255 and subsection (6) of this section, all expenses of the administration of the department, the expenses of administration of the retirement systems, and the expenses of the administration of the office of the state actuary created in chapters 2.10, 2.12, 28B.10, 41.26, 41.32, 41.40, 41.34, 41.35, 41.37, 43.43, and 44.44 RCW shall be paid from the department of retirement systems expense fund.

(2) In order to reimburse the department of retirement systems expense fund on an equitable basis the department shall ascertain and report to each employer, as defined in RCW 28B.10.400, 41.26.030, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, the sum necessary to defray its proportional share of the entire expense of the administration of the retirement system that the employer participates in during the ensuing biennium or fiscal year whichever may be required. Such sum is to be computed in an amount directly proportional to the estimated entire expense of the administration as the ratio of monthly salaries of the employer's members bears to the total salaries of all members in the entire system. It shall then be the duty of all such employers to include in their budgets or otherwise provide the amounts so required.

(3) The department shall compute and bill each employer, as defined in RCW 28B.10.400, 41.26.030, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, at the end of each month for the amount due for that month to the department of retirement systems expense fund and the same shall be paid as are its other obligations. Such computation as to each employer shall be made on a percentage rate of salary established by the department. However, the department may at its discretion establish a system of billing based upon calendar year quarters in which event the said billing shall be at the end of each such quarter.

(4) The director may adjust the expense fund contribution rate for each system at any time when necessary to reflect unanticipated costs or savings in administering the department.

(5) An employer who fails to submit timely and accurate reports to the department may be assessed an additional fee related to the increased costs incurred by the department in processing the deficient reports. Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in the retirement system expense fund.

(a) Every six months the department shall determine the amount of an employer's fee by reviewing the timeliness and accuracy of the reports submitted by the employer in the preceding six months. If those reports were not both timely and accurate the department may prospectively assess an additional fee under this subsection.

(b) An additional fee assessed by the department under this subsection shall not exceed fifty percent of the standard fee.

(c) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.

(6) Expenses other than those under RCW 41.34.060(((3))) (4) shall be paid pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

(7) During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the department of retirement systems' expense fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, state contributions to the judicial retirement system may be made in part by appropriations from the department of retirement systems expense fund.

Sec. 955. RCW 41.60.050 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 970 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature shall appropriate from the personnel service fund for the payment of administrative costs of the productivity board. However, during the ((2011-2013)) and 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the operations of the productivity board shall be suspended.

Sec. 956. RCW 43.08.190 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 973 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury to be known as the "state treasurer's service fund." Such fund shall be used solely for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the operation and administration of the state treasurer's office.

Moneys shall be allocated monthly and placed in the state treasurer's service fund equivalent to a maximum of one percent of the trust and treasury average daily cash balances from the earnings generated under the authority of RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.080 other than earnings generated from investment of balances in funds and accounts specified in RCW 43.79A.040(4)(c). The allocation shall precede the distribution of the remaining earnings as prescribed under RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.092. The state treasurer shall establish a uniform allocation rate for all funds and accounts; except that the state treasurer may negotiate a different allocation rate with any state agency that has independent authority over funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury or in the custody of the state treasurer. In no event shall the rate be less than the actual costs incurred by the state treasurer's office. If no rate is separately negotiated, the default rate for any funds held shall be the rate set for funds held pursuant to statute.

During the ((2009-2011 fiscal biennium and the 2011-2013 and)) 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the state treasurer's service fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 957. RCW 43.09.475 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 974 are each amended to read as follows:

The performance audits of government account is hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. Revenue identified in RCW 82.08.020(5) and 82.12.0201 shall be deposited in the account. Money in the account shall be used to fund the performance audits and follow-up performance audits under RCW 43.09.470 and shall be expended by the state auditor in accordance with chapter 1, Laws of 2006. Only the state auditor or the state auditor's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. During the ((2011-2013 and the)) 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the performance audits of government account may be appropriated for ((fraud investigations in the state auditor's office and the department of social and health services, audit and collection functions in the department of revenue,)) the joint legislative audit and review committee, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the office of financial management, the superintendent of public instruction, and audits of school districts. In addition, during the ((2011-2013 and)) 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia the account may be used to fund the office of financial management's contract for the compliance audit of the state auditor. In addition, during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the performance audits of government account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 958. RCW 43.43.839 and 2014 c 221 s 916 are each amended to read as follows:

The fingerprint identification account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from incremental charges of fingerprint checks requested for noncriminal justice purposes and electronic background requests shall be deposited in the account. Receipts for fingerprint checks by the federal bureau of investigation may also be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the cost of record checks. Only the chief of the state patrol or the chief's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. No appropriation is required for expenditures prior to July 1, 1997. After June 30, 1997, the account shall be subject to appropriation. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the fingerprint identification account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, funds in the account may be used for expenditures that support the criminal records management division of the state patrol. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium funds in the account may be used for expenditures related to the upgrade of the state patrol's criminal history system.

Sec. 959. RCW 43.79.480 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 980 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Moneys received by the state of Washington in accordance with the settlement of the state's legal action against tobacco product manufacturers, exclusive of costs and attorneys' fees, shall be deposited in the tobacco settlement account created in this section except as these moneys are sold or assigned under chapter 43.340 RCW.

(2) The tobacco settlement account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the tobacco settlement account may only be transferred to the state general fund, and to the tobacco prevention and control account for purposes set forth in this section. The legislature shall transfer amounts received as strategic contribution payments as defined in RCW 43.350.010 to the life sciences discovery fund created in RCW 43.350.070. ((During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer less than the entire strategic contribution payments, and may transfer amounts attributable to strategic contribution payments into the basic health plan stabilization account.)) During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia, the legislature may transfer less than the entire strategic contribution payments, and may transfer amounts attributable to strategic contribution payments into the state general fund.

(3) The tobacco prevention and control account is created in the state treasury. The source of revenue for this account is moneys transferred to the account from the tobacco settlement account, investment earnings, donations to the account, and other revenues as directed by law. Expenditures from the account are subject to appropriation. ((During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the tobacco prevention and control account to the state general fund such amounts as represent the excess fund balance of the account.))

Sec. 960. RCW 43.101.200 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 982 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All law enforcement personnel, except volunteers, and reserve officers whether paid or unpaid, initially employed on or after January 1, 1978, shall engage in basic law enforcement training which complies with standards adopted by the commission pursuant to RCW 43.101.080. For personnel initially employed before January 1, 1990, such training shall be successfully completed during the first fifteen months of employment of such personnel unless otherwise extended or waived by the commission and shall be requisite to the continuation of such employment. Personnel initially employed on or after January 1, 1990, shall commence basic training during the first six months of employment unless the basic training requirement is otherwise waived or extended by the commission. Successful completion of basic training is requisite to the continuation of employment of such personnel initially employed on or after January 1, 1990.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the commission shall provide the aforementioned training together with necessary facilities, supplies, materials, and the board and room of noncommuting attendees for seven days per week, except during the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia when the employing, county, city, or state law enforcement agency shall reimburse the commission for twenty-five percent of the cost of training its personnel. Additionally, to the extent funds are provided for this purpose, the commission shall reimburse to participating law enforcement agencies with ten or less full-time commissioned patrol officers the cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic law enforcement training: PROVIDED, That such reimbursement shall include only the actual cost of temporary replacement not to exceed the total amount of salary and benefits received by the replaced officer during his or her training period.

Sec. 961. RCW 43.101.220 and 2014 c 221 s 918 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The corrections personnel of the state and all counties and municipal corporations initially employed on or after January 1, 1982, shall engage in basic corrections training which complies with standards adopted by the commission. The training shall be successfully completed during the first six months of employment of the personnel, unless otherwise extended or waived by the commission, and shall be requisite to the continuation of employment.

(2) The commission shall provide the training required in this section, together with facilities, supplies, materials, and the room and board for noncommuting attendees, except during the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia, when the employing county, municipal corporation, or state agency shall reimburse the commission for twenty-five percent of the cost of training its personnel.

(3)(a) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to the Washington state department of corrections prisons division. The Washington state department of corrections is responsible for identifying training standards, designing curricula and programs, and providing the training for those corrections personnel employed by it. In doing so, the secretary of the department of corrections shall consult with staff development experts and correctional professionals both inside and outside of the agency, to include soliciting input from labor organizations.

(b) The commission and the department of corrections share the responsibility of developing and defining training standards and providing training for community corrections officers employed within the community corrections division of the department of corrections.

Sec. 962. RCW 43.135.025 and 2009 c 479 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state shall not expend from the general fund during any fiscal year state moneys in excess of the state expenditure limit established under this chapter.

(2) Except pursuant to a declaration of emergency under RCW ((43.135.035)) 41.135.034 or pursuant to an appropriation under RCW 43.135.045(2), the state treasurer shall not issue or redeem any check, warrant, or voucher that will result in a state general fund expenditure for any fiscal year in excess of the state expenditure limit established under this chapter. A violation of this subsection constitutes a violation of RCW 43.88.290 and shall subject the state treasurer to the penalties provided in RCW 43.88.300.

(3) The state expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the previous fiscal year's state expenditure limit increased by a percentage rate that equals the fiscal growth factor.

(4) For purposes of computing the state expenditure limit for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2009, the phrase "the previous fiscal year's state expenditure limit" means the total state expenditures from the state general fund, the public safety and education account, the health services account, the violence reduction and drug enforcement account, the student achievement fund, the water quality account, and the equal justice subaccount, not including federal funds, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2008, plus the fiscal growth factor. For fiscal years 2015, 2016, and 2017, the state expenditure limit shall be specified in the state omnibus operating appropriations act. The economic and revenue forecast council, in consultation with the state expenditure limit committee, shall prepare draft legislation for introduction in the 2016 legislative session that revises the state expenditure limit to synchronize the requirements of this chapter with the four-year balanced budget requirement under RCW 43.88.060 and the state budget outlook under RCW 82.33.060.

(5) A state expenditure limit committee is established for the purpose of determining and adjusting the state expenditure limit as provided in this chapter. The members of the state expenditure limit committee are the director of financial management, the attorney general or the attorney general's designee, and the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on ways and means. All actions of the state expenditure limit committee taken pursuant to this chapter require an affirmative vote of at least four members.

(6) Each November, the state expenditure limit committee shall adjust the expenditure limit for the preceding fiscal year based on actual expenditures and known changes in the fiscal growth factor and then project an expenditure limit for the next two fiscal years. If, by November 30th, the state expenditure limit committee has not adopted the expenditure limit adjustment and projected expenditure limit as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the attorney general or his or her designee shall adjust or project the expenditure limit, as necessary.

(7) "Fiscal growth factor" means the average growth in state personal income for the prior ten fiscal years.

(8) "General fund" means the state general fund.

Sec. 963. RCW 43.155.050 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 983 are each amended to read as follows:

The public works assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning loans. During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to the general fund, the water pollution control revolving account, and the drinking water assistance account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for economic development, innovation, and export grants, including brownfields; main street improvement grants; and the loan program consolidation board. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to the education legacy trust account such amounts as specified by the legislature. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to the voluntary stewardship program. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to the state general fund such amounts as specified by the legislature. The legislature intends to provide financial assistance for local government infrastructure in future biennia through the loan guarantees and other provisions of Engrossed Senate Joint Resolution No. 8204 and Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5624. Therefore, in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium the legislature intends to allocate ninety-four million dollars of future loan repayments paid into the public works assistance account to support basic education.

Sec. 964. RCW 43.215.090 and 2012 c 229 s 589 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The early learning advisory council is established to advise the department on statewide early learning issues that would build a comprehensive system of quality early learning programs and services for Washington's children and families by assessing needs and the availability of services, aligning resources, developing plans for data collection and professional development of early childhood educators, and establishing key performance measures.

(2) The council shall work in conjunction with the department to develop a statewide early learning plan that guides the department in promoting alignment of private and public sector actions, objectives, and resources, and ensuring school readiness.

(3) The council shall include diverse, statewide representation from public, nonprofit, and for-profit entities. Its membership shall reflect regional, racial, and cultural diversity to adequately represent the needs of all children and families in the state.

(4) Councilmembers shall serve two-year terms. However, to stagger the terms of the council, the initial appointments for twelve of the members shall be for one year. Once the initial one-year to two-year terms expire, all subsequent terms shall be for two years, with the terms expiring on June 30th of the applicable year. The terms shall be staggered in such a way that, where possible, the terms of members representing a specific group do not expire simultaneously.

(5) The council shall consist of not more than twenty-three members, as follows:

(a) The governor shall appoint at least one representative from each of the following: The department, the office of financial management, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the student achievement council, and the state board for community and technical colleges;

(b) One representative from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, to be appointed by the superintendent of public instruction;

(c) The governor shall appoint seven leaders in early childhood education, with at least one representative with experience or expertise in one or more of the areas such as the following: The K-12 system, family day care providers, and child care centers with four of the seven governor's appointees made as follows:

(i) The head start state collaboration office director or the director's designee;

(ii) A representative of a head start, early head start, migrant/seasonal head start, or tribal head start program;

(iii) A representative of a local education agency; and

(iv) A representative of the state agency responsible for programs under section 619 or part C of the federal individuals with disabilities education act;

(d) Two members of the house of representatives, one from each caucus, and two members of the senate, one from each caucus, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate, respectively;

(e) Two parents, one of whom serves on the department's parent advisory group, to be appointed by the governor;

(f) One representative of the private-public partnership created in RCW 43.215.070, to be appointed by the partnership board;

(g) One representative designated by sovereign tribal governments; and

(h) One representative from the Washington federation of independent schools.

(6) The council shall be cochaired by one representative of a state agency and one nongovernmental member, to be elected by the council for two-year terms.

(7) The council shall appoint two members and stakeholders with expertise in early learning to sit on the technical working group created in section 2, chapter 234, Laws of 2010.

(8) Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, but compensation and reimbursement for travel expenses for board members under these statutes is suspended during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

(9) The department shall provide staff support to the council.

Sec. 965. RCW 43.320.110 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 909 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created a local fund known as the "financial services regulation fund" which shall consist of all moneys received by the divisions of the department of financial institutions, except for the division of securities which shall deposit thirteen percent of all moneys received, except as provided in RCW 43.320.115, and which shall be used for the purchase of supplies and necessary equipment; the payment of salaries, wages, and utilities; the establishment of reserves; and other incidental costs required for the proper regulation of individuals and entities subject to regulation by the department. The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the fund. Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the director of financial institutions or the director's designee. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.

During the ((2011-2013)) 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the financial services regulation fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, moneys from the financial services regulation fund may be appropriated for the family prosperity account program at the department of commerce and for the operations of the department of revenue.

Sec. 966. RCW 43.325.040 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 984 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The energy freedom account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from appropriations made to the account and any loan payments of principal and interest derived from loans made under the energy freedom account must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for financial assistance for further funding for projects consistent with this chapter or otherwise authorized by the legislature. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account to fund the state energy office in the department of commerce.

(2) The green energy incentive account is created in the state treasury as a subaccount of the energy freedom account. All receipts from appropriations made to the green energy incentive account shall be deposited into the account, and may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for:

(a) Refueling projects awarded under this chapter;

(b) Pilot projects for plug-in hybrids, including grants provided for the electrification program set forth in RCW 43.325.110; and

(c) Demonstration projects developed with state universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and local governments that result in the design and building of a hydrogen vehicle fueling station.

(3)(a) The energy recovery act account is created in the state treasury. State and federal funds may be deposited into the account and any loan payments of principal and interest derived from loans made from the energy recovery act account must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(b) Expenditures from the account may be used only for loans, loan guarantees, and grants that encourage the establishment of innovative and sustainable industries for renewable energy and energy efficiency technology, including but not limited to:

(i) Renewable energy projects or programs that require interim financing to complete project development and implementation;

(ii) Companies with innovative, near-commercial or commercial, clean energy technology; and

(iii) Energy efficiency technologies that have a viable repayment stream from reduced utility costs.

(c) The director shall establish policies and procedures for processing, reviewing, and approving applications for funding under this section. When developing these policies and procedures, the department must consider the clean energy leadership strategy developed under section 2, chapter 318, Laws of 2009.

(d) The director shall enter into agreements with approved applicants to fix the term and rates of funding provided from this account.

(e) The policies and procedures of this subsection (3) do not apply to assistance awarded for projects under RCW 43.325.020(3).

(4) Any state agency receiving funding from the energy freedom account is prohibited from retaining greater than three percent of any funding provided from the energy freedom account for administrative overhead or other deductions not directly associated with conducting the research, projects, or other end products that the funding is designed to produce unless this provision is waived in writing by the director.

(5) Any university, institute, or other entity that is not a state agency receiving funding from the energy freedom account is prohibited from retaining greater than fifteen percent of any funding provided from the energy freedom account for administrative overhead or other deductions not directly associated with conducting the research, projects, or other end products that the funding is designed to produce.

(6) Subsections (2), (4), and (5) of this section do not apply to assistance awarded for projects under RCW 43.325.020(3).

(7) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the energy freedom account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 967. RCW 43.330.250 and 2014 c 112 s 114 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The economic development strategic reserve account is created in the state treasury to be used only for the purposes of this section.

(2) Only the governor, with the recommendation of the director of the department of commerce, may authorize expenditures from the account.

(3) During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, moneys in the account may also be transferred into the state general fund.

(4) Expenditures from the account may be made to prevent closure of a business or facility, to prevent relocation of a business or facility in the state to a location outside the state, or to recruit a business or facility to the state. Expenditures may be authorized for:

(a) Workforce development;

(b) Public infrastructure needed to support or sustain the operations of the business or facility;

(c) Other lawfully provided assistance, including, but not limited to, technical assistance, environmental analysis, relocation assistance, and planning assistance. Funding may be provided for such assistance only when it is in the public interest and may only be provided under a contractual arrangement ensuring that the state will receive appropriate consideration, such as an assurance of job creation or retention; and

(d) The joint center for aerospace technology innovation.

(5) The funds shall not be expended from the account unless:

(a) The circumstances are such that time does not permit the director of the department of commerce or the business or facility to secure funding from other state sources;

(b) The business or facility produces or will produce significant long-term economic benefits to the state, a region of the state, or a particular community in the state;

(c) The business or facility does not require continuing state support;

(d) The expenditure will result in new jobs, job retention, or higher incomes for citizens of the state;

(e) The expenditure will not supplant private investment; and

(f) The expenditure is accompanied by private investment.

(6) No more than three million dollars per year may be expended from the account for the purpose of assisting an individual business or facility pursuant to the authority specified in this section.

(7) If the account balance in the strategic reserve account exceeds fifteen million dollars at any time, the amount in excess of fifteen million dollars shall be transferred to the education construction account.

(8) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account to fund economic development programs at the department of commerce.

Sec. 968. RCW 43.334.077 and 2008 c 275 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The skeletal human remains assistance account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All appropriations provided by the legislature for this purpose as well as any reimbursement for services provided pursuant to chapter 275, Laws of 2008 must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for archaeological determinations and excavations of inadvertently discovered skeletal human remains, and removal and reinterment of such remains when necessary. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account to the operations of the department of archaeology and historic preservation.

Sec. 969. RCW 43.350.070 and 2011 c 5 s 916 are each amended to read as follows:

The life sciences discovery fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the board or the board's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be made only for purposes of this chapter. Administrative expenses of the authority, including staff support, may be paid only from the fund. Revenues to the fund consist of transfers made by the legislature from strategic contribution payments deposited in the tobacco settlement account under RCW 43.79.480, moneys received pursuant to contribution agreements entered into pursuant to RCW 43.350.030, moneys received from gifts, grants, and bequests, and interest earned on the fund. During the ((2009-2011)) 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to other state funds or accounts such amounts as represent the excess balance of the life sciences discovery fund. Any moneys remaining in the life sciences discovery fund as of July 1, 2015, must be transferred to the state general fund.

Sec. 970. RCW 61.24.172 and 2014 c 164 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The foreclosure fairness account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts received under RCW 61.24.174 must be deposited into the account. Only the director of the department of commerce or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. Funding to agencies and organizations under this section must be provided by the department through an interagency agreement or other applicable contract instrument. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. Expenditures from the account must be used as follows: (1) No less than seventy-one percent must be used for the purposes of providing housing counseling activities to benefit borrowers, except that this amount may be less than seventy-one percent only if necessary to meet the funding level specified for the office of the attorney general under subsection (2) of this section and the department under subsection (4) of this section; (2) up to six percent, or six hundred fifty-five thousand dollars per biennium, whichever amount is greater, to the office of the attorney general to be used by the consumer protection division to enforce this chapter; (3) up to two percent to the office of civil legal aid to be used for the purpose of contracting with qualified legal aid programs for legal representation of homeowners in matters relating to foreclosure. Funds provided under this subsection (3) must be used to supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds; (4) up to eighteen percent, or one million four hundred thousand dollars per biennium, whichever amount is greater, to the department to be used for implementation and operation of the foreclosure fairness act; and (5) up to three percent to the department of financial institutions to conduct homeowner prepurchase and postpurchase outreach and education programs as defined in RCW 43.320.150.

The department shall enter into interagency agreements to contract with the Washington state housing finance commission and other appropriate entities to implement the foreclosure fairness act.

During fiscal year 2016, the department of commerce may expend funds from the account to review deed of trust and foreclosure laws.

Sec. 971. RCW 66.08.170 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 959 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a fund, known as the "liquor revolving fund", which shall consist of all license fees, permit fees, penalties, forfeitures, and all other moneys, income, or revenue received by the board. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. All moneys received by the board or any employee thereof, except for change funds and an amount of petty cash as fixed by the board within the authority of law shall be deposited each day in a depository approved by the state treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be credited to the liquor revolving fund. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer funds from the liquor revolving account [fund] to the state general fund and may direct an additional amount of liquor profits to be distributed to local governments. Neither the transfer of funds nor the additional distribution of liquor profits to local governments during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium may reduce the excess fund distributions that otherwise would occur under RCW 66.08.190. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the state treasurer shall transfer from the liquor revolving fund to the state general fund forty-two million five hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 2012 and forty-two million five hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 2013. The transfer during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium may not reduce the excess fund distributions that otherwise would occur under RCW 66.08.190. Sales to licensees are exempt from any liquor price increases that may result from the transfer of funds from the liquor revolving fund to the state general fund during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium. Disbursements from the revolving fund shall be on authorization of the board or a duly authorized representative thereof. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control the liquor revolving fund shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no appropriation shall be required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from such fund. During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the liquor revolving fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 972. RCW 70.96A.350 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 990 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The criminal justice treatment account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for: (a) Substance abuse treatment and treatment support services for offenders with an addiction or a substance abuse problem that, if not treated, would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a prosecuting attorney in Washington state; (b) the provision of drug and alcohol treatment services and treatment support services for nonviolent offenders within a drug court program; (c) the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court; and (d) during the 2011-2013 biennium, the legislature may appropriate up to three million dollars from the account in order to offset reductions in the state general fund for treatment services provided by counties. This amount is not subject to the requirements of subsections (5) through (9) of this section. During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia, the legislature may transfer from the criminal justice treatment account to the state general fund amounts as reflect the state savings associated with the implementation of the medicaid expansion of the federal affordable care act and the excess fund balance of the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Treatment" means services that are critical to a participant's successful completion of his or her substance abuse treatment program, but does not include the following services: Housing other than that provided as part of an inpatient substance abuse treatment program, vocational training, and mental health counseling; and

(b) "Treatment support" means transportation to or from inpatient or outpatient treatment services when no viable alternative exists, and child care services that are necessary to ensure a participant's ability to attend outpatient treatment sessions.

(3) Revenues to the criminal justice treatment account consist of: (a) Funds transferred to the account pursuant to this section; and (b) any other revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.

(4)(a) For the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2003, the state treasurer shall transfer eight million nine hundred fifty thousand dollars from the general fund into the criminal justice treatment account, divided into eight equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, and each subsequent fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer eight million two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the general fund to the criminal justice treatment account, divided into four equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, and each subsequent fiscal year, the amount transferred shall be increased on an annual basis by the implicit price deflator as published by the federal bureau of labor statistics.

(b) In each odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate the amount transferred to the criminal justice treatment account in (a) of this subsection to the division of alcohol and substance abuse for the purposes of subsection (5) of this section.

(5) Moneys appropriated to the division of alcohol and substance abuse from the criminal justice treatment account shall be distributed as specified in this subsection. The department shall serve as the fiscal agent for purposes of distribution. Until July 1, 2004, the department may not use moneys appropriated from the criminal justice treatment account for administrative expenses and shall distribute all amounts appropriated under subsection (4)(b) of this section in accordance with this subsection. Beginning in July 1, 2004, the department may retain up to three percent of the amount appropriated under subsection (4)(b) of this section for its administrative costs.

(a) Seventy percent of amounts appropriated to the division from the account shall be distributed to counties pursuant to the distribution formula adopted under this section. The division of alcohol and substance abuse, in consultation with the department of corrections, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, the superior court judges' association, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, representatives of the criminal defense bar, representatives of substance abuse treatment providers, and any other person deemed by the division to be necessary, shall establish a fair and reasonable methodology for distribution to counties of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account. County or regional plans submitted for the expenditure of formula funds must be approved by the panel established in (b) of this subsection.

(b) Thirty percent of the amounts appropriated to the division from the account shall be distributed as grants for purposes of treating offenders against whom charges are filed by a county prosecuting attorney. The division shall appoint a panel of representatives from the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges' association, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington defender's association or the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, substance abuse treatment providers, and the division. The panel shall review county or regional plans for funding under (a) of this subsection and grants approved under this subsection. The panel shall attempt to ensure that treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.

(6) The county alcohol and drug coordinator, county prosecutor, county sheriff, county superior court, a substance abuse treatment provider appointed by the county legislative authority, a member of the criminal defense bar appointed by the county legislative authority, and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of the drug court shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (5)(b) of this section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the criminal justice treatment account within that county. The funds shall be used solely to provide approved alcohol and substance abuse treatment pursuant to RCW 70.96A.090, treatment support services, and for the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court.

(a) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent on the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court.

(b) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent for treatment support services.

(7) Counties are encouraged to consider regional agreements and submit regional plans for the efficient delivery of treatment under this section.

(8) Moneys allocated under this section shall be used to supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds used for substance abuse treatment.

(9) Counties must meet the criteria established in RCW 2.28.170(3)(b).

(10) The authority under this section to use funds from the criminal justice treatment account for the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court expires June 30, ((2015)) 2017.

Sec. 973. RCW 70.105D.070 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7033 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 992 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control account are hereby created in the state treasury.

(2)(a) Moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 must be deposited as follows: Fifty-six percent to the state toxics control account under subsection (3) of this section and forty-four percent to the local toxics control account under subsection (4) of this section. When the cumulative amount of deposits made to the state and local toxics control accounts under this section reaches the limit during a fiscal year as established in (b) of this subsection, the remainder of the moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 during that fiscal year must be deposited into the environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170.

(b) The limit on distributions of moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 to the state and local toxics control accounts for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2013, is one hundred forty million dollars.

(c) In addition to the funds required under (a) of this subsection, the following moneys must be deposited into the state toxics control account: (i) The costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter 70.105A RCW; (ii) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter; and (iii) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by the legislature.

(3) Moneys in the state toxics control account must be used only to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the following activities:

(a) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;

(b) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;

(c) The hazardous waste clean-up program required under this chapter;

(d) State matching funds required under federal cleanup law;

(e) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;

(f) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling, or disposal of paint and hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and agriculture;

(g) Oil and hazardous materials spill prevention, preparedness, training, and response activities;

(h) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring programs;

(i) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;

(j) A public participation program;

(k) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will achieve both: (i) A substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur; and (ii) the prevention or mitigation of unfair economic hardship;

(l) Development and demonstration of alternative management technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management priorities of RCW 70.105.150;

(m) State agriculture and health programs for the safe use, reduction, recycling, or disposal of pesticides;

(n) Storm water pollution control projects and activities that protect or preserve existing remedial actions or prevent hazardous clean-up sites;

(o) Funding requirements to maintain receipt of federal funds under the federal solid waste disposal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.);

(p) Air quality programs and actions for reducing public exposure to toxic air pollution;

(q) Public funding to assist prospective purchasers to pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) if:

(i) The facility is located within a redevelopment opportunity zone designated under RCW 70.105D.150;

(ii) The amount and terms of the funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70.105D.040(5); and

(iii) The director has found the funding meets any additional criteria established in rule by the department, will achieve a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur, and will provide a public benefit in addition to cleanup commensurate with the scope of the public funding;

(r) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters;

(s) Appropriations to the local toxics control account or the environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170, if the legislature determines that priorities for spending exceed available funds in those accounts;

(t) During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia, the department of ecology's water quality, shorelands, environmental assessment, administration, and air quality programs;

(u) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, actions at the state conservation commission to improve water quality for shellfish; ((and))

(v) During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia, actions at the University of Washington for reducing ocean acidification;

(w) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics control account may be spent on projects in section 3159, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. and for transfer to the local toxics control account; ((and))

(x) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics control account may be transferred to the radioactive mixed waste account; and

(y) For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, forest practices regulation at the department of natural resources.

(4)(a) The department shall use moneys deposited in the local toxics control account for grants or loans to local governments for the following purposes in descending order of priority:

(i) Extended grant agreements entered into under (c)[(e)](i) of this subsection;

(ii) Remedial actions, including planning for adaptive reuse of properties as provided for under (c)[(e)](iv) of this subsection. The department must prioritize funding of remedial actions at:

(A) Facilities on the department's hazardous sites list with a high hazard ranking for which there is an approved remedial action work plan or an equivalent document under federal cleanup law;

(B) Brownfield properties within a redevelopment opportunity zone if the local government is a prospective purchaser of the property and there is a department-approved remedial action work plan or equivalent document under the federal cleanup law;

(iii) Storm water pollution source projects that: (A) Work in conjunction with a remedial action; (B) protect completed remedial actions against recontamination; or (C) prevent hazardous clean-up sites;

(iv) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;

(v) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;

(vi) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters; and

(vii) Appropriations to the state toxics control account or the environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170, if the legislature determines that priorities for spending exceed available funds in those accounts.

(b) Funds for plans and programs must be allocated consistent with the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW.

(c) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control account may also be used for local government storm water planning and implementation activities.

(d) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the local toxics control account to the state general fund, such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

(e) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department may use the following strategies when providing grants to local governments under this subsection:

(i) Enter into an extended grant agreement with a local government conducting remedial actions at a facility where those actions extend over multiple biennia and the total eligible cost of those actions exceeds twenty million dollars. The agreement is subject to the following limitations:

(A) The initial duration of such an agreement may not exceed ten years. The department may extend the duration of such an agreement upon finding substantial progress has been made on remedial actions at the facility;

(B) Extended grant agreements may not exceed fifty percent of the total eligible remedial action costs at the facility; and

(C) The department may not allocate future funding to an extended grant agreement unless the local government has demonstrated to the department that funds awarded under the agreement during the previous biennium have been substantially expended or contracts have been entered into to substantially expend the funds;

(ii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government conducting a remedial action that provides for periodic reimbursement of remedial action costs as they are incurred as established in the agreement;

(iii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government prior to it acquiring a property or obtaining necessary access to conduct remedial actions, provided the agreement is conditioned upon the local government acquiring the property or obtaining the access in accordance with a schedule specified in the agreement;

(iv) Provide integrated planning grants to local governments to fund studies necessary to facilitate remedial actions at brownfield properties and adaptive reuse of properties following remediation. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to: Environmental site assessments; remedial investigations; health assessments; feasibility studies; site planning; community involvement; land use and regulatory analyses; building and infrastructure assessments; economic and fiscal analyses; and any environmental analyses under chapter 43.21C RCW;

(v) Provide grants to local governments for remedial actions related to area-wide groundwater contamination. To receive the funding, the local government does not need to be a potentially liable person or be required to seek reimbursement of grant funds from a potentially liable person;

(vi) The director may alter grant matching requirements to create incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the following conditions exists:

(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship imposed by the clean-up liability;

(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development, public recreational opportunities, or habitat restoration opportunities that would not otherwise occur; or

(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and redevelopment of brownfield property under RCW 70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;

(vii) When pending grant applications under (c)[(e)](iv) and (v) of this subsection (4) exceed the amount of funds available, designated redevelopment opportunity zones must receive priority for distribution of available funds.

(d) [(f)] To expedite multiparty clean-up efforts, the department may purchase remedial action cost-cap insurance. For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the local toxics control account may be spent on projects in sections 3024, 3035, 3036, and 3059, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

(5) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be spent only after appropriation by statute.

(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics control account may be used for: Natural disasters where there is no hazardous substance contamination; high performance buildings; solid waste incinerator facility feasibility studies, construction, maintenance, or operation; or after January 1, 2010, for projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound, funded in a competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310. However, this subsection does not prevent an appropriation from the state toxics control account to the department of revenue to enforce compliance with the hazardous substance tax imposed in chapter 82.21 RCW.

(7) Except during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, one percent of the moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 shall be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management priorities. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation that are not expended at the close of any biennium revert to the state toxics control account.

(8) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and performance. To accelerate both remedial action and economic recovery, the department may expedite the adoption of rules necessary to implement chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. using the expedited procedures in RCW 34.05.353. The department shall initiate the award of financial assistance by August 1, 2013. To ensure the adoption of rules will not delay financial assistance, the department may administer the award of financial assistance through interpretive guidance pending the adoption of rules through July 1, 2014.

(9) Except as provided under subsection (3)(k) and (q) of this section, nothing in chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. effects [affects] the ability of a potentially liable person to receive public funding.

(10) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium the local toxics control account may also be used for the centennial clean water program and for storm water grants.

Sec. 974. RCW 77.12.203 and 2014 c 55 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section and notwithstanding RCW 84.36.010 or other statutes to the contrary, the director must pay by April 30th of each year on game lands, regardless of acreage, in each county, if requested by an election under RCW 77.12.201, an amount in lieu of real property taxes equal to that amount paid on similar parcels of open space land taxable under chapter 84.34 RCW or the greater of seventy cents per acre per year or the amount paid in 1984 plus an additional amount for control of noxious weeds equal to that which would be paid if such lands were privately owned. This amount may not be assessed or paid on department buildings, structures, facilities, game farms, fish hatcheries, water access sites, tidelands, or public fishing areas.

(2) "Game lands," as used in this section and RCW 77.12.201, means those tracts, regardless of acreage, owned in fee by the department and used for wildlife habitat and public recreational purposes. All lands purchased for wildlife habitat, public access, or recreation purposes with federal funds in the Snake River drainage basin are considered game lands regardless of acreage.

(3) This section does not apply to lands transferred after April 23, 1990, to the department from other state agencies.

(4) The county must distribute the amount received under this section in lieu of real property taxes to all property taxing districts except the state in appropriate tax code areas the same way it would distribute local property taxes from private property. The county must distribute the amount received under this section for weed control to the appropriate weed district.

(5) For the ((2011-2013 and)) 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the director must pay by April 30th of each year on game lands in each county, if requested by an election under RCW 77.12.201, an amount in lieu of real property taxes and must be distributed as follows:

County

Adams. . . .1,909

Asotin. . . .36,123

Chelan. . . .24,757

Columbia. . . .7,795

Ferry. . . .6,781

Garfield. . . .4,840

Grant. . . .37,443

Kittitas. . . .143,974

Klickitat. . . .21,906

Lincoln. . . .13,535

Okanogan. . . .151,402

Pend Oreille. . . .3,309

Yakima. . . .126,225

These amounts may not be assessed or paid on department buildings, structures, facilities, game farms, fish hatcheries, water access sites, tidelands, or public fishing areas.

Sec. 975. RCW 79.64.040 and 2014 c 32 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall determine the amount deemed necessary in order to achieve the purposes of this chapter and shall provide by rule for the deduction of this amount from the moneys received from all leases, sales, contracts, licenses, permits, easements, and rights-of-way issued by the department and affecting state lands and aquatic lands, provided that no deduction shall be made from the proceeds from agricultural college lands.

(2) Moneys received as deposits from successful bidders, advance payments, and security under RCW 79.15.100, 79.15.080, and 79.11.150 prior to December 1, 1981, which have not been subjected to deduction under this section are not subject to deduction under this section.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, the deductions authorized under this section shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the moneys received by the department in connection with any one transaction pertaining to state lands and aquatic lands other than second-class tide and shore lands and the beds of navigable waters, and fifty percent of the moneys received by the department pertaining to second-class tide and shore lands and the beds of navigable waters.

(4) In the event that the department sells logs using the contract harvesting process described in RCW 79.15.500 through 79.15.530, the moneys received subject to this section are the net proceeds from the contract harvesting sale.

(5) During the ((2011-2013 and)) 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the twenty-five percent limitation on deductions set in subsection (3) of this section may be increased up to thirty percent by the board.

Sec. 976. RCW 79.105.150 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1002 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After deduction for management costs as provided in RCW 79.64.040 and payments to towns under RCW 79.115.150(2), all moneys received by the state from the sale or lease of state-owned aquatic lands and from the sale of valuable material from state-owned aquatic lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement account which is hereby created in the state treasury. After appropriation, these funds shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for the purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public purposes; for providing and improving access to the lands; and for volunteer cooperative fish and game projects. During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia, the aquatic lands enhancement account may be used to support the shellfish program, the ballast water program, hatcheries, the Puget Sound toxic sampling program and steelhead mortality research at the department of fish and wildlife, the knotweed program at the department of agriculture, actions at the University of Washington for reducing ocean acidification, which may include the creation of a center on ocean acidification, and the Puget SoundCorps program. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the aquatic lands enhancement account to the geoduck aquaculture research account for research related to shellfish aquaculture.

(2) In providing grants for aquatic lands enhancement projects, the recreation and conservation funding board shall:

(a) Require grant recipients to incorporate the environmental benefits of the project into their grant applications;

(b) Utilize the statement of environmental benefits, consideration, except as provided in RCW 79.105.610, of whether the applicant is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, whether a project is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310, and except as otherwise provided in RCW 79.105.630, and effective one calendar year following the development and statewide availability of model evergreen community management plans and ordinances under RCW 35.105.050, whether the applicant is an entity that has been recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the evergreen community recognition program created in RCW 35.105.030 in its prioritization and selection process; and

(c) Develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to be used both for management and performance assessment of the grants.

(3) To the extent possible, the department should coordinate its performance measure system with other natural resource-related agencies as defined in RCW 43.41.270.

(4) The department shall consult with affected interest groups in implementing this section.

(5) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound may be funded under this chapter only if the project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 977. RCW 82.08.160 and 2014 c 221 s 923 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On or before the twenty-fifth day of each month, all taxes collected under RCW 82.08.150 during the preceding month must be remitted to the state department of revenue, to be deposited with the state treasurer. Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), ((and)) (4), and (5) of this section, upon receipt of such moneys the state treasurer must credit sixty-five percent of the sums collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) and one hundred percent of the sums collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (3) and (4) to the state general fund and thirty-five percent of the sums collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) to a fund which is hereby created to be known as the "liquor excise tax fund."

(2) During the 2012 fiscal year, 66.19 percent of the sums collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) must be deposited in the state general fund and the remainder collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) must be deposited in the liquor excise tax fund.

(3) During fiscal year 2013, all funds collected under RCW 82.08.150 (1), (2), (3), and (4) must be deposited into the state general fund.

(4) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, seventy-seven and one-half percent of the sums collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) must be deposited in the state general fund, and the remainder collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) must be deposited in the liquor excise tax fund. The amendments in this section are curative, clarifying, and remedial and apply retroactively to July 1, 2013.

(5) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, seventy-seven and one-half percent of the sums collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) must be deposited in the state general fund, and the remainder collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) must be deposited in the liquor excise tax fund. In addition, during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the liquor excise tax fund may be appropriated for the local government fiscal note program in the department of commerce. It is the intent of the legislature to continue these policies in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

Sec. 978. RCW 82.08.170 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, during the months of January, April, July, and October of each year, the state treasurer must make the transfers required under subsections (2) and (3) of this section from the liquor excise tax fund and then the apportionment and distribution of all remaining moneys in the liquor excise tax fund to the counties, cities, and towns in the following proportions: (a) Twenty percent of the moneys in the liquor excise tax fund must be divided among and distributed to the counties of the state in accordance with the provisions of RCW 66.08.200; and (b) eighty percent of the moneys in the liquor excise tax fund must be divided among and distributed to the cities and towns of the state in accordance with the provisions of RCW 66.08.210.

(2) Each fiscal quarter and prior to making the twenty percent distribution to counties under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the treasurer shall transfer to the liquor revolving fund created in RCW 66.08.170 sufficient moneys to fund the allotments from any legislative appropriations for county research and services as provided under chapter 43.110 RCW.

(3) During the months of January, April, July, and October of each year, the state treasurer must transfer two million five hundred thousand dollars from the liquor excise tax fund to the state general fund.

(4) During calendar year 2012, the October distribution under subsection (1) of this section and the July and October transfers under subsections (2) and (3) of this section must not be made. During calendar year 2013, the January, April, and July distributions under subsection (1) of this section and transfers under subsections (2) and (3) of this section must not be made.

(5) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the liquor excise tax fund may be appropriated for the local government fiscal note program in the department of commerce. It is the intent of the legislature to continue this policy in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

Sec. 979. RCW 86.26.007 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1005 are each amended to read as follows:

The flood control assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury. At the beginning of the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the state treasurer shall transfer three million dollars from the general fund to the flood control assistance account. Each biennium thereafter the state treasurer shall transfer four million dollars from the general fund to the flood control assistance account, except that during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the state treasurer shall transfer one million dollars from the general fund to the flood control assistance account. Moneys in the flood control assistance account may be spent only after appropriation for purposes specified under this chapter. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium and the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the flood control assistance account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 980. RCW 88.02.650 and 2011 c 171 s 135 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) General fees for vessel registrations collected by the director must be deposited in the general fund. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any amount above one million one hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year must be allocated to counties by the state treasurer for boating safety/education and law enforcement programs. Eligibility for boating safety/education and law enforcement program allocations is contingent upon approval of the local boating safety program by the state parks and recreation commission. Fund allocation must be based on the numbers of registered vessels by county of moorage. Each benefiting county is responsible for equitable distribution of such allocation to other jurisdictions with approved boating safety programs within the county. Any fees not allocated to counties due to the absence of an approved boating safety program must be allocated to the state parks and recreation commission for awards to local governments to offset law enforcement and boating safety impacts of boaters recreating in jurisdictions other than where registered. Jurisdictions receiving funds under this section shall deposit the funds into an account dedicated solely for supporting the jurisdiction's boating safety programs. These funds may not replace existing local funds used for boating safety programs.

(2) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, any amount above one million three hundred fifty thousand dollars per fiscal year must be allocated to counties by the state treasurer for boating safety, education, and law enforcement programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 981. UNRESTRICTED RESERVES. The state treasurer shall place in unrestricted reserve in the state general fund an amount equivalent to the $298 million in marijuana-related state revenues under Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2136 (marijuana market reforms). This unrestricted reserve shall be placed in unallotted status and remain unexpended during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 982. Section 966 (RCW 43.325.040) of this act expires June 30, 2016.

(End of part)

PART XI

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

Sec. 1101. 2014 c 221 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$30,923,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($30,810,000))

﻿ $30,740,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,765,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($63,498,000))

﻿ $63,428,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: A joint select task force on nuclear energy is created to study the generation of energy in the region through the use of nuclear power. The task force must report any findings and recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 2014.

(1) In its deliberations, the task force must consider the greatest amount of environmental benefit for each dollar spent based on the life-cycle cost of any nuclear power technology. Life-cycle costs must include the storage and disposal of any nuclear wastes.

(2) The task force must consist of eight members that serve on the legislative standing committees with primary jurisdiction over energy issues. The president of the senate shall appoint two members from the majority caucus, two members from the minority caucus, and an alternate. The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two members from each caucus and an alternate.

(3) The members of the task force shall select from among their members a chair and other officers as the task force deems appropriate.

(4) The task force must hold no more than four meetings, with two of those meetings in Richland, Washington.

(5) The task force must be staffed by senate committee services and the office of program research of the house of representatives.

(6) The task force terminates December 15, 2014.

Sec. 1102. 2014 c 221 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SENATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$21,240,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($23,216,000))

﻿ $23,144,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,514,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($45,970,000))

﻿ $45,898,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: A joint select task force on nuclear energy is created to study the generation of energy in the region through the use of nuclear power. The task force must report any findings and recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 2014.

(1) In its deliberations, the task force must consider the greatest amount of environmental benefit for each dollar spent based on the life-cycle cost of any nuclear power technology. Life-cycle costs must include the storage and disposal of any nuclear wastes.

(2) The task force must consist of eight members that serve on the legislative standing committees with primary jurisdiction over energy issues. The president of the senate shall appoint two members from the majority caucus, two members from the minority caucus, and an alternate. The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two members from each caucus and an alternate.

(3) The members of the task force shall select from among their members a chair and other officers as the task force deems appropriate.

(4) The task force must hold no more than four meetings, with two of those meetings in Richland, Washington.

(5) The task force must be staffed by senate committee services and the office of program research of the house of representatives.

(6) The task force terminates December 15, 2014.

Sec. 1103. 2014 c 221 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$8,062,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($7,976,000))

﻿ $7,971,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($16,038,000))

﻿ $16,033,000

Sec. 1104. 2014 c 221 s 107 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$3,896,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($4,053,000))

﻿ $4,046,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($7,949,000))

﻿ $7,942,000

Sec. 1105. 2014 c 221 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$3,558,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($3,820,000))

﻿ $3,816,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($7,378,000))

﻿ $7,374,000

Sec. 1106. 2014 c 221 s 109 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPREME COURT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$7,028,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($6,813,000))

﻿ $6,795,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($13,841,000))

﻿ $13,823,000

Sec. 1107. 2014 c 221 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE LAW LIBRARY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$1,484,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($1,457,000))

﻿ $1,484,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,941,000))

﻿ $2,968,000

Sec. 1108. 2014 c 221 s 111 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$1,071,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($997,000))

﻿ $1,006,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,068,000))

﻿ $2,077,000

Sec. 1109. 2014 c 221 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$15,865,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($15,811,000))

﻿ $15,870,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($31,676,000))

﻿ $31,735,000

Sec. 1110. 2014 c 221 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$51,403,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($50,987,000))

﻿ $51,126,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,123,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$657,000

Judicial Information Systems Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($53,517,000))

﻿ $53,204,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$6,691,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($165,378,000))

﻿ $165,204,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,500,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation is provided solely for development and implementation of the information network hub project.

(2) $2,138,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacement of computer equipment, including servers, routers, and storage system upgrades.

(3) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

(4) $1,199,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacing computer equipment at state courts and state judicial agencies.

(5) $108,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 210, Laws of 2013 (Senate Bill No. 5052) (superior court judges Whatcom county). The funds provided in this subsection shall be expended only if the fourth superior court judge position in Whatcom county is appointed and serving on the bench.

(6) $108,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 142, Laws of 2013 (House Bill No. 1175) (superior court judges Benton/Franklin counties). The funds provided in this subsection shall be expended only if the seventh superior court judge position in Benton and Franklin counties jointly is appointed and serving on the bench.

(7) $16,606,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation is provided solely for continued implementation of the superior court case management system project. The administrative office of the courts, in consultation with the judicial information systems committee and the office of the chief information officer shall develop a revised superior court case management steering committee charter to implement the next phases of the superior court case management system. The steering committee members shall be appointed by the judicial information systems committee and shall consist of two members representing each of the following groups: Court administrators, superior court judges, county clerks, and the administrative office of the courts. The revised charter shall insure that voting members of the steering committee represent the administrative office of the courts and those courts that have implemented, or have committed to implement, the statewide superior court vendor solution as selected by the judicial information systems committee. The revised charter shall also insure that the superior court case management system project steering committee continues to provide contract oversight in collaboration with the judicial information system committee through the implementation period. Oversight responsibilities of the steering committee throughout the various phases of the project must include, but are not limited to, vendor management, contract and deliverable management, assuring reasonable satisfaction of the business and technical needs at the local level, receipt of stakeholder feedback, and communication between the various stakeholder groups and the judicial information systems committee. Issues of significant scope, schedule or budget changes, and risk mitigation strategies must be escalated to the judicial information systems committee for consideration. In the event that a majority of the steering committee members cannot reach a decision, the issue must be escalated to the judicial information systems committee for consideration. The superior court case management system project steering committee may solicit input from user groups as deemed appropriate. The revised charter shall be approved by the judicial information systems committee.

(8) $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for school districts for petitions to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. The administrator for the courts shall develop an interagency agreement with the superintendent of public instruction to allocate the funding provided in this subsection. Allocation of this money to school districts shall be based on the number of petitions filed. This funding includes amounts school districts may expend on the cost of serving petitions filed under RCW 28A.225.030 by certified mail or by personal service or for the performance of service of process for any hearing associated with RCW 28A.225.030.

(9)(a) $7,313,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $7,313,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per-petition processing costs.

(b) Each fiscal year during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate fiscal committees no later than 60 days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(10) $274,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $274,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the office of public guardianship to continue guardianship services for those low-income incapacitated persons who were receiving services on June 30, 2013.

(11) (($1,426,000)) $1,113,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation is provided solely for the content management system for the appellate courts.

(12) The administrative office of the courts and the judicial information systems committee shall develop statewide superior court data collection and exchange standards. Upon implementation, these standards must be met by each superior court in order to continue to receive judicial information systems account funding or equipment and services funded by the account. For those courts that do not use the statewide superior court vendor solution as chosen by the judicial information systems committee, judicial information systems account funds may not be allocated for (a) the costs to meet the data collection and exchange standards developed by administrative office of the courts and judicial information systems committee, and (b) the costs to develop and implement local court case management systems.

(13) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the office of public guardianship for the purpose of providing guardianship services to low income and indigent alleged or actual incapacitated persons.

(14) $99,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for payment of billings from the office of attorney general.

Sec. 1111. 2014 c 221 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$30,912,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($35,475,000))

﻿ $35,865,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,648,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$304,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($70,339,000))

﻿ $70,729,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The amounts provided include funding for expert and investigative services in death penalty personal restraint petitions.

(2) $3,378,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely to expand the parents representation program into Asotin, Columbia, Garfield, King, Whatcom, and Whitman counties.

(3) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,721,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for parents representation program costs related to increased parental rights termination filings from the department of social and health services permanency initiative.

(4) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the immigration consequences advisement program at the Washington defenders association.

Sec. 1112. 2014 c 221 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$10,910,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .$12,345,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .$115,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,453,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($24,468,000))

﻿ $24,823,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and an amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 may be used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise eligible persons who are sixty years of age or older on matters authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k) regardless of household income or asset level.

(2) $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and (($956,000)) $1,196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6126 (representation of children in dependency matters) and to fund the cost of legal services. The office is authorized to include in its contracts with counties provisions to reduce reimbursement levels, impose case funding limits or other measures to remain within appropriated amounts. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1113. 2014 c 221 s 116 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$5,565,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($5,225,000))

﻿ $5,136,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($14,790,000))

﻿ $14,701,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,000,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account appropriation is provided solely for efforts to assist with currently active industrial recruitment efforts that will bring new jobs to the state or will retain headquarter locations of major companies currently housed in the state.

(2) $684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the office of the education ombudsman.

(3) $258,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5802 (greenhouse gas emissions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1709 (foreign language interpreters). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((6))) (5) Within appropriated funds, the office of the education ombuds shall develop a scope of work and proposed plan for a task force on success for students with special needs that will: (a) Define and assess barriers that students placed or qualified to be placed in special education and students with a plan for accommodation under section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of 1973 face in earning a high school diploma and fully accessing the educational program provided by the public schools; and (b) outline recommendations for systemic changes and successful models for education and service delivery, including improved coordination of early learning through postsecondary education and career preparation. With input from interested parents, educators, state agencies, and organizations representing students placed or qualified to be placed in special education and students with a section 504 plan, the office of the education ombuds shall invite representative individuals to participate in the task force. The office of the education ombuds shall submit the scope of work and proposed task force plan to the education and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2014, along with a request for additional funds necessary to implement the plan. To the extent possible within appropriated funds, the office of the education ombuds may convene the task force and commence its work before June 30, 2015.

Sec. 1114. 2014 c 221 s 117 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$654,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($657,000))

﻿ $655,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$90,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,401,000))

﻿ $1,399,000

Sec. 1115. 2014 c 221 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$2,084,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($2,044,000))

﻿ $2,042,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,128,000))

﻿ $4,126,000

Sec. 1116. 2014 c 221 s 119 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$11,813,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($9,440,000))

﻿ $9,422,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$7,428,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$20,000

Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and Access﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($8,336,000))

﻿ $7,526,000

Charitable Organization Education Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$364,000

Local Government Archives Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$8,485,000

Election Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$12,006,000

Washington State Heritage Center Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($8,860,000))

﻿ $8,784,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($66,752,000))

﻿ $65,848,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,767,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.

(2)(a) $1,847,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,926,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and other events of statewide significance during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.

(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage.

(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;

(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.

(3) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to the funding for the library as a whole.

(4) It is the intent of the legislature to consider during the 2014 legislative session funding for the publication and distribution of a primary election voters pamphlet.

(5) $771,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $772,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the state library to purchase statewide on-line access to the information technology academy to allow public access to on-line courses and learning resources through public libraries.

(6) The legislature finds that the volume of state records retained in paper format continues to grow, increasing the records storage costs for the state. The secretary of state shall convene a work group to study methods for retaining records in electronic formats and for shorter periods of time, with the goal of reducing the volume of stored paper records by ten percent by the end of 2016, and an additional ten percent by the end of 2018. The following state agencies shall participate in the work group, which shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2014, and December 31, 2015:

(a) Office of the secretary of state;

(b) Office of the attorney general;

(c) Office of the state auditor;

(d) Office of financial management;

(e) Department of corrections;

(f) Department of social and health services;

(g) Department of health; and

(h) Department of transportation.

Sec. 1117. 2014 c 221 s 120 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$249,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($250,000))

﻿ $249,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($499,000))

﻿ $498,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office shall assist the department of enterprise services on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department of enterprise services shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.

Sec. 1118. 2014 c 221 s 122 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER

State Treasurer's Service Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($14,872,000))

﻿ $15,226,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($150,000)) $350,000 of the state treasurer's service account—state appropriation is provided solely for legal fees related to additional legal assistance due to changes in federal financial regulations and an increase in complex and high profile litigation.

Sec. 1119. 2014 c 221 s 125 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$11,019,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .$10,803,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$7,114,000

New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$990,000

Legal Services Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($205,174,000))

﻿ $207,294,000

Tobacco Prevention and Control Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$271,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($2,333,000))

﻿ $2,404,000

Public Services Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,106,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($239,810,000))

﻿ $242,001,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management, the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown by division of division administration expenses.

(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney general shall notify the director of financial management and the chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.

(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.

(4) The executive ethics board shall: (a) Develop a statewide plan, with performance measures, to provide overall direction and accountability in all executive branch agencies and statewide elected offices; (b) coordinate and work with the commission on judicial conduct and the legislative ethics board; (c) assess and evaluate each agency's ethical culture through employee and stakeholder surveys, review Washington state quality award feedback reports, and publish an annual report on the results to the public; and (d) solicit outside evaluations, studies, and recommendations for improvements from academics, nonprofit organizations, the public disclosure commission, or other entities with expertise in ethics, integrity, and the public sector.

(5) $424,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacement of a portion of the agency's personal computers. The amount provided in this subsection is conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer and section 945 of this act, personal computer acquisition and replacement.

(6) $609,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for upgrades to software programs. The amount provided in this subsection is conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(7) $150,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5405 (extended foster care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1341 (wrongful imprisonment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $189,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1420 (transportation improvement projects). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $2,093,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the work of the public counsel section of the office of the attorney general.

(11) $353,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $353,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a grant to the Washington coalition of crime victim advocates to provide training, certification, and technical assistance for crime victim service center advocates.

(12) $69,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2171 (veterans, military personnel). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $182,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, $13,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation, $54,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account—state appropriation, and $3,128,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of salary adjustments addressing recruitment and retention issues for assistant attorneys general in the first six years of their employment with the attorney general's office.

Sec. 1120. 2014 c 221 s 126 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$1,260,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($1,230,000))

﻿ $1,273,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,490,000))

﻿ $2,533,000

Sec. 1121. 2014 c 221 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$61,546,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($63,394,000))

﻿ $63,055,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$266,732,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$5,595,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,013,000

Drinking Water Assistance Administrative﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$442,000

Lead Paint Account—State Appropriation. . . .$147,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation. . . .$13,000

Home Security Fund Account—State Appropriation. . . .$25,457,000

Affordable Housing for All Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$11,908,000

Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes﻿

Investigation and Prosecution Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,166,000

Low-Income Weatherization and Structural﻿

Rehabilitation Assistance Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,879,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$5,298,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$18,481,000

Prostitution Prevention and Intervention Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$98,000

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$752,000

Washington Community Technology Opportunity Account—﻿

Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$10,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation. . . .$5,605,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($471,536,000))

﻿ $471,197,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the terms included in the original loan agreements.

(2) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a grant to resolution Washington to building statewide capacity for alternative dispute resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to litigation.

(3) $306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior volunteer program.

(4) The department shall administer its growth management act technical assistance and pass-through grants so that smaller cities and counties receive proportionately more assistance than larger cities or counties.

(5) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely as pass-through funding to Walla Walla Community College for its water and environmental center.

(6) $1,800,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided for transitional housing assistance or partial payments for rental assistance under the independent youth housing program.

(7) $5,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is for the operation, repair, and staffing of shelters in the homeless family shelter program.

(8) $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $396,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington new Americans program.

(9) $2,949,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $2,949,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for associate development organizations. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the department shall consider an associate development organization's total resources when making contracting and fund allocation decisions, in addition to the schedule provided in RCW 43.330.086.

(10) $234,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $233,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington asset building coalitions.

(11) $5,605,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center of Washington.

(12) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the purposes of purchasing contracted services to expand and promote the tourism industry in the state of Washington.

(a) The department must contract with the Washington tourism alliance. Expenditure of state moneys is contingent upon the contractor providing a dollar for dollar cash or in-kind match. Funding must be provided for the following services:

(i) Serving as a central point of contact through developing and maintaining a web portal for Washington tourism, operating a call center, and mailing travel guides;

(ii) Promoting Washington as a tourism destination to national and international markets, with emphasis on markets in Europe and Asia;

(iii) Providing information to businesses and local communities on tourism opportunities that could expand local revenues; and

(iv) Conducting tourism-related research, including market research and measuring the return on investment of funded activities.

(b) The department may not use more than 4 percent of the funds to administer, monitor, and report the outcomes of the services. The department must electronically submit performance metrics by January 1, 2014, and report the outcomes of the services by January 1, 2015, to the economic development committees of the legislature.

(c) The department has the authority to designate one or more alternative contractors if necessary due to performance or other significant issues. Such change must only be made after consultation with the Washington tourism alliance, the governor's office, and the chairs and ranking members of the economic development committees of the legislature.

(13) $72,000 of the prostitution prevention and intervention account is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1291 (sex trade victims). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $49,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $49,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1818 (business and government streamlining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $37,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the department to develop an economic cluster strategy to leverage the state's unique maritime assets, geography, history, and infrastructure. Goals include growing employment, targeted economic activity, environmental considerations, tax revenue to state and local governments, and quality of life associated with the maritime sector by working with the industry to understand workforce needs, parity considerations with Oregon and British Columbia, and tax structure and regulatory barriers. The department will report its findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2014.

(16) $2,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department of commerce for services to homeless families through the Washington families fund.

(17) $5,000,000 of the home security account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department of commerce to provide emergency assistance to homeless families in the temporary assistance for needy families program.

(18) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for the economic development commission to retain one current administrative position. The department shall convene a work group, chaired by the current chair of the economic development commission, of representatives of associate development organizations and the economic development commission to recommend: (1) Changes to the economic development commission's purpose and source and amount of funding; (2) objective benchmarks and outcome-based performance measures for evaluating state investments in economic development; (3) high priority regulatory reforms to foster a favorable business climate for long-term private sector job creation and competitiveness; and (4) organizational roles responsibilities and structures to strengthen cohesive planning, streamline execution, and improve outcomes. The work group shall be comprised of representatives from no less than eight associate development organizations representing both urban and rural counties and counties on both sides of the Cascade range. The department shall submit a report of the work group's recommendation to the fiscal and economic development policy committees of the legislature by December 15, 2013.

(19) $2,515,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $3,779,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for purposes of creating and operating a community health care and education and innovation center at the Pacific Medical Center in Seattle. Amounts provided in this subsection must be used for lease, maintenance, operations, and other required related expenses for Seattle community colleges allied health programs and other related uses identified by the department of commerce. The department is authorized to enter into a thirty-year lease for the Pacific Medical Center property.

(20) Within the appropriations in this section, the department shall, by December 1, 2013, develop a comprehensive start-up Washington strategy to facilitate the growth of start-ups and enhance the state's competitiveness in recruiting and retaining businesses that start up in Washington. This shall include but is not limited to: Business and occupation tax relief, capital investment, regulatory burdens, workforce and infrastructure needs and support. Start-up businesses interactions with state government and other public entities as a customer shall also be considered.

(21) $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the department to identify and invest in strategic growth areas, support key sectors, and align existing economic development programs and priorities. The department must consider Washington's position as the most trade dependent state when identifying priority investments. The department must engage states and provinces in the northwest as well as associate development organizations, small business development centers, chambers of commerce, ports, and other partners to leverage the funds provided. For each dollar expended the department must receive a one hundred percent match. The match may be provided by the department through nongeneral fund sources, or any partnering governments or organizations. Sector leads established by the department must include the industries of: (a) Tourism; (b) agriculture, wood products, and other natural resource industries; and (c) clean technology and renewable and nonrenewable energy. The department may establish these sector leads by hiring new staff, expanding the duties of current staff, or working with partner organizations and or other agencies to serve in the role of sector lead. The department must develop performance metrics and milestones. The department must electronically submit the performance metrics and performance-to-date by January 1, 2014, to the economic development committees of the legislature.

(22) The department is authorized to suspend issuing any nonstatutorily required grants or contracts of an amount less than $1,000,000 per year.

(23) The department is authorized to require an applicant to pay an application fee to cover the cost of reviewing the project and preparing an advisory opinion on whether a proposed electric generation project or conservation resource qualifies to meet mandatory conservation targets.

(24) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the economic impact and infrastructure cost study for Covington town center.

(25) The department is directed to work with innovation partnership zone administrators to review the existing grant program, including the criteria for designation as an innovation partnership zone and the grant funding criteria. The department shall submit its report to the legislature by December 1, 2013.

(26) Within existing resources, the department shall provide administrative and other indirect support to the developmental disabilities council.

(27) $306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the long-term care ombuds program to improve ombuds access to long-term care residents in community-based settings such as adult family homes and assisted living facilities.

(28) $26,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to establish a pilot program to provide a certification of homeless status for persons who may need a physical or mailing address for purposes of employment. The department must choose one county within which to implement the program, based on the support of local homeless housing and service providers, community leaders, and businesses willing to partner with the department. The department must establish a homeless status form that requires sufficient information to verify a person's homeless status and to provide the address and location of a homeless housing or service provider to be used as the person's own address. The department must develop a procedure for collecting and maintaining the information provided on the homeless status forms and convene regular meetings with homeless housing and service providers, community leaders, homeless persons, and businesses interested in implementing the program. The department must submit a report to the appropriate legislative committees that includes the number of persons who filed a homeless status form, the number of persons who obtained employment with use of the certification, the involvement of partners within the community in implementing the program, and an evaluation and recommendation of the opportunities and impediments for expanding the program statewide. The evaluation and recommendation should include input from statewide homeless housing and service provider networks and business associations.

(29) $466,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide one-time funding to the Tacoma housing authority to offset expenses associated with remediating units of low-income housing that have been contaminated by the manufacture or use of methamphetamine. The Tacoma housing authority must provide sufficient documentation to verify the costs associated with remediating units of low-income housing that have been contaminated by the manufacture or use of methamphetamine for which they request support. The department may make full or partial payment once sufficient documentation has been provided.

(30) Within existing resources, the department must conduct a data-based evaluation of the effectiveness of the department's international trade services. The report must include comparative data from other states and detail the possible advantages and disadvantages of contracting these services to a nonstate entity. The department must present its findings to the economic development committees of the legislature no later than January 15, 2015.

Sec. 1122. 2014 c 221 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$17,942,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($17,539,000))

﻿ $17,401,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$34,336,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$370,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$288,000

Personnel Service Fund—State Appropriation. . . .$8,592,000

Data Processing Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$6,552,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,497,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($91,116,000))

﻿ $90,978,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of financial management shall prepare a report outlining alternative methods of procuring health benefits for home care workers, including individual providers and agency providers. In preparing the report, the office of financial management shall consult with the department of social and health services, representatives of individual home care providers, and agency home care providers.

Along with a summary of the current method of providing benefits, the report must include an analysis of the policy and fiscal implications of accessing health benefits through the Washington health benefits exchange. The report must also provide an analysis of a medicaid section 1115 waiver with the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services that would provide additional medicaid matching funds for individual provider home care workers who are provided with health care benefits through a collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the state under chapter 74.39A RCW, but would otherwise be eligible for medicaid under the federal expanded eligibility provisions that take effect January 1, 2014.

The report must be submitted to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by January 6, 2014.

(2) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5802 (greenhouse gas emissions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $536,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for a study of the state's medical and public assistance eligibility systems and infrastructure with the goal of simplifying procedures, improving customer service, and reducing state expenditures. The study must also examine which state entities play various roles in the eligibility and data verification processes in order to determine if eligibility processes can be further streamlined in light of changes related to the federal affordable care act. The study must identify how costs will be allocated between state and federal funding sources and options for maximizing federal participation. The office of financial management shall provide a report on its findings and recommendations to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by January 1, 2014.

(4)(a) The legislature finds that the state's nationally recognized student achievement initiative has led to significant improvements at two-year institutions of higher education. With the goal of creating such efficiencies within the four-year institutions of higher education, the office of financial management shall convene, in coordination with the joint committee on higher education and the student achievement council, a technical incentive funding model task force to propose an incentive funding model for the four-year institutions of higher education. The model will provide new incentive funding to four-year institutions of higher education that demonstrate improvement on existing performance measures and control resident undergraduate tuition growth. Participation in the program is voluntary; however, funding appropriated for this program shall only be available to those institutions that have chosen to participate in the program.

(b) The task force must include the following members:

(i) One representative from the student achievement council;

(ii) One representative from the education data center created in RCW 43.41.400; and

(iii) One representative from each of the four-year institutions of higher education.

(c) The program shall include, but shall not be limited to:

(i) A system for allocating new incentive funding to participating institutions based on an institution's:

(A) Performance in specific metrics;

(B) Control and reduction where possible of resident undergraduate and graduate tuition; and

(C) Efficient utilization of classrooms, laboratories, and online and other high technology instructional methods;

(ii) A methodology for allocating funding for performance as specified in (c)(i)(A) of this subsection that is based on performance metrics reported in the accountability monitoring and reporting system established in RCW 28B.77.090 and that recognizes each institution's unique mission by measuring each institution's performance in these metrics against its past performance;

(iii) A methodology for investing any unallocated incentive funds to the state need grant program created in chapter 28B.92 RCW to expand access to low-income and underserved student populations; and

(iv) A methodology for establishing a baseline level of state funding that:

(A) Fully supports the state's need for an increasing portion of its citizens to gain post-secondary education and qualifications;

(B) Recognizes the acute need of the state's high-technology economy for a sufficient number of graduates in high employer demand programs of study;

(C) Achieves a more equitable share of support between the state and students and their families; and

(D) Provides for funding enhancements based on demonstrated improvements in institutional performance within the educational achievement and tuition reduction incentive program.

(d) The workgroup shall submit a final report containing an incentive funding model to the governor and higher education and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 31, 2013.

(5) $37,000 of the data processing revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2192 (state agency permitting). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $262,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2739 (student success in schools). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) Within amounts provided in this section, the office of the chief information officer must survey and review agency security policies and standards including, but not limited to (a) compliance with employee information technology security training policies; (b) agency standards and policies for decommissioning personal computers; and (c) the security plans of the provider one system and other health information technology systems within the health care authority and the department of social and health services to ensure compliance with federal health information portability and accountability act rules and the council for affordable quality healthcare committee on operating rules for information exchange. The office must report to the legislature by December 1, 2014, with findings and recommendations from the survey and review.

(8) In conjunction with the office of the chief information officer's prioritization of proposed information technology expenditures, agency budget requests for proposed information technology expenditures shall include the following: The agency's priority ranking of each information technology request; the estimated cost for the current biennium; the estimated total cost of the request over all biennia; and expected timeline to complete the request. The office of the chief information officer and the office of financial management may request agencies to include additional information on proposed information technology expenditure requests.

(9) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for an analysis of statewide jail needs and how operational costs are incurred among local governments. The analysis must examine, among other things, how regional capacity is currently being utilized at the state and local level including, but not limited to: Historical and current utilization, level of security, ability to provide medical and mental health care, and availability of programming. The analysis must examine the financial impact to counties of providing felon and juvenile detention. In addition, the analysis must include the identification of barriers and solutions for the use of local jails in lieu of prison beds including: For individuals who would otherwise be transferred to department of corrections for a short-term stay; for violator population billing and tracking; and for long-term stays in jail in lieu of prison. A report of findings and recommendations must be provided to the governor and legislative fiscal committees by November 1, 2014.

(10) $46,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the education data center to:

(a) Collect and publish on its web site by October 1, 2014, short-term and long-term earnings and employment data for completers of higher education degrees, apprenticeships, and certificates awarded by institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 for each institution;

(b) With the assistance of the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, make publicly available on its web site a detailed inventory of the data that are contained in the data warehouse. The data center and its contributors shall continue to expand efforts to improve the integrity of the information and web site displays to maximize value and utility. The education data center shall also collaborate with the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee to broadly disseminate meaningful information on the publicly accessible web sites by expanding and increasing interactive web-based reporting; and

(c) In consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the workforce training and education coordinating board, representatives of the public four-year institutions of higher education, and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, prepare, or contract with an entity to prepare, an economic success metrics report of employment and earnings outcomes for degrees, apprenticeships, and certificates earned at institutions of higher education. The final report shall be published on the education data center web site and delivered to the governor and the higher education and fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1, 2014.

Sec. 1123. 2014 c 221 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS

Administrative Hearings Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($38,011,000))

﻿ $39,174,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $151,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacement of computer equipment, including servers, routers, and storage system upgrades. The amount provided in this subsection is conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(2) $137,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacement of a portion of the agency's personal computers. The amount provided in this subsection is conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(3) Within the amounts provided in this section, the office shall improve the timeliness of its hearings and report the progress of its efforts to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1, 2014.

Sec. 1124. 2014 c 221 s 134 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS—OPERATIONS

Department of Retirement Systems Expense

Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($50,599,000))

﻿ $50,859,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $57,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for the purposes of Senate Bill No. 6201 (optional life annuities for LEOFF 2 members). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1125. 2014 c 221 s 135 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$108,115,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($105,511,000))

﻿ $104,861,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$6,083,000

Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$131,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$92,000

Business License Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($17,043,000))

﻿ $16,543,000

Data Processing Revolving Account—State Appropriation. . . .$6,751,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($243,726,000))

﻿ $242,576,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department of revenue is authorized to increase the master application fee to nineteen dollars and the renewal fee to eleven dollars consistent with RCW 19.02.075.

(2) $6,751,000 of the data processing revolving account—state appropriation and $4,853,000 of the master license fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the replacement of the department's legacy business systems. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(3) $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $431,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1971 or Senate Bill No. 5873 (communications services reform). If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in the subsection shall lapse.

(4) $641,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $297,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5882 or House Bill No. 2081 (tax preferences and transparency). If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in the subsection shall lapse.

(5) $78,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $262,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5360 (unpaid wage collection). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $8,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of Second Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2493 (land use/horticulture). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1287 (Indian tribes/property tax). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1634 (property tax levy limit). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1126. 2014 c 221 s 136 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$1,203,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($1,174,000))

﻿ $1,183,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,377,000))

﻿ $2,386,000

Sec. 1127. 2014 c 221 s 140 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD

Dedicated Marijuana Fund—State Appropriation. . . .(($8,136,000))

﻿ $7,350,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($57,268,000))

﻿ $60,267,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($945,000))

﻿ $2,370,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$25,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($66,374,000))

﻿ $70,012,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The liquor control board must work with the department of health and the department of revenue to develop recommendations for the legislature regarding the interaction of medical marijuana regulations and the provisions of Initiative Measure No. 502. At a minimum, the recommendations must include provisions addressing the following:

(i) Age limits;

(ii) Authorizing requirements for medical marijuana;

(iii) Regulations regarding health care professionals;

(iv) Collective gardens;

(v) Possession amounts;

(vi) Location requirements;

(vii) Requirements for medical marijuana producing, processing, and retail licensing;

(viii) Taxation of medical marijuana in relation to recreational marijuana; and

(ix) The state agency that should be the regulatory body for medical cannabis.

(b) The board must submit its recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2014.

(2) For the purposes of RCW 43.88.110(7), any initial cash deficit in the dedicated marijuana fund must be liquidated over the remainder of the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.

Sec. 1128. 2014 c 221 s 141 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$150,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$11,217,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$29,850,000

Pipeline Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$4,407,000

Pipeline Safety Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($1,929,000))

﻿ $2,649,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($47,553,000))

﻿ $48,273,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The commission shall work with the Idaho public utilities commission and the public utility commission of Oregon to identify common regulatory functions that can be performed jointly, with the goal of formalizing an agreement that protects essential services while increasing regulatory effectiveness and efficiencies through economies of scale. The commission is authorized to enter into an agreement with such other state public utility commissions to work jointly in administering specified respective regulatory functions.

(2) Up to $200,000 of the total appropriation is provided for the commission to continue to evaluate the regulatory processes for energy companies and identify and implement administrative actions to improve those processes. The commission shall develop and adopt a schedule for such administrative actions.

Sec. 1129. 2014 c 221 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$1,993,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($2,058,000))

﻿ $2,056,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$521,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,319,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($7,891,000))

﻿ $7,889,000

Sec. 1130. 2014 c 221 s 146 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$3,661,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($5,863,000))

﻿ $6,001,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,223,000

Data Processing Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$7,062,000

Enterprise Services Account—State Appropriation. . . .$2,400,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($20,209,000))

﻿ $20,347,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,287,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and (($3,286,000)) $3,444,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the payment of facilities and services charges, utilities and contracts charges, public and historic facilities charges, and capital projects surcharges allocable to the senate, house of representatives, statute law committee, and joint legislative systems committee. The department shall allocate charges attributable to these agencies among the affected revolving funds. The department shall maintain an interagency agreement with these agencies to establish performance standards, prioritization of preservation and capital improvement projects, and quality assurance provisions for the delivery of services under this subsection. The legislative agencies named in this subsection shall continue to enjoy all of the same rights of occupancy and space use on the capitol campus as historically established.

(2) In accordance with RCW 46.08.172 and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase parking fees in fiscal years 2014 and 2015 as necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business.

(3) The building code council account appropriation is provided solely for the operation of the state building code council as required by statute and modified by the standards established by executive order 10-06. The council shall not consider any proposed code amendment or take any other action not authorized by statute or in compliance with the standards established in executive order 10-06. No member of the council may receive compensation, per diem, or reimbursement for activities other than physical attendance at those meetings of the state building code council or the council's designated committees, at which the opportunity for public comment is provided generally and on all agenda items upon which the council proposes to take action. The building code council shall comply with chapter 19.85 RCW, known as the regulatory fairness act, by including with all proposed substantial code amendments an analysis addressing cost effectiveness, net benefits, payback periods, and life-cycle costs.

(4) The department of enterprise services shall purchase flags needed for ceremonial occasions on the capitol campus in order to fully represent the countries that have an international consulate in Washington state.

(5) Before any agency may purchase a passenger motor vehicle as defined in RCW 43.19.560, the agency must have written approval from the director of the department of enterprise services.

(6) $2,400,000 of the enterprise services account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of a pilot program to implement a strategy and action plan to modernize the state's enterprise financial and administrative systems. The department, the office of financial management, and the office of the chief information officer, will lead the planning effort and establish advisory committees composed of key stakeholders. The plan will include an assessment of the readiness of state government to conduct a business transformation and system replacement project of this scale. The plan shall incorporate the objectives of lean management and should include recommendations on: Project scope, phasing and timeline, expected outcomes and measures of success, product strategy, budget and financing strategy options, risk mitigation, staffing and organization, and strategies to close readiness gaps. The department shall submit the implementation plan to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 15, 2014.

The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(7) $7,062,000 of the data processing revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of a pilot program to implement a time, leave, and attendance enterprise system. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(8) From the fee charged to master contract vendors, the department shall transfer to the office of minority and women's business enterprises in equal monthly installments $2,039,000 in fiscal year 2014 and $2,038,000 in fiscal year 2015.

(9) The legislature intends to review for purchase parcel number one and surrounding property on McNeil Island. The department shall coordinate with the federal government to obtain an appraisal determining the fair market value and shall provide an estimate to the legislative fiscal committees by October 1, 2013.

(((11))) (10) On a one-time basis, $2,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for incremental costs to facilitate the purchasing of electricity for use in state government operations from in-state alternative power sources consisting of high-efficiency cogeneration from woody biomass that is at least sixty-five percent energy efficient based upon low heat value, coal transition power, and solar energy facilities. This funding shall be provided on a temporary basis to assist state agencies to make purchases from in-state alternative power sources. The department may solicit proposals from local electric utilities that currently serve state operations.

Sec. 1131. 2014 c 221 s 148 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$1,271,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($1,258,000))

﻿ $1,257,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$1,944,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$14,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,487,000))

﻿ $4,486,000

(End of part)

PART XII

HUMAN SERVICES

Sec. 1201. 2014 c 221 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.

(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3)(a) The health care authority and the department are authorized to develop an integrated health care program designed to slow the progression of illness and disability and better manage medicaid expenditures for the aged and disabled population. Under the Washington medicaid integration partnership (WMIP) and the medicare integrated care project (MICP), the health care authority and the department may combine and transfer such medicaid funds appropriated under sections 204, 206, 208, and 213 of this act as may be necessary to finance a unified health care plan for the WMIP and the MICP program enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not exceed a daily enrollment of 6,000 persons, nor expand beyond one county during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. The amount of funding assigned from each program may not exceed the average per capita cost assumed in this act for individuals covered by that program, actuarially adjusted for the health condition of persons enrolled, times the number of clients enrolled. In implementing the WMIP and the MICP, the health care authority and the department may: (i) Withhold from calculations of "available resources" as set forth in RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the capitated rate for enrolled individuals; and (ii) employ capitation financing and risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration with health care service contractors licensed by the office of the insurance commissioner and qualified to participate in both the medicaid and medicare programs.

(b) If Washington has been selected to participate in phase two of the federal demonstration project for persons dually-eligible for both medicare and medicaid, the department and the authority may initiate the MICP. Participation in the project shall be limited to persons who are eligible for both medicare and medicaid and to counties in which the county legislative authority has agreed to the terms and conditions under which it will operate. The purpose of the project shall be to demonstrate and evaluate ways to improve care while reducing state expenditures for persons enrolled both in medicare and medicaid. To that end, prior to initiating the project, the department and the authority shall assure that state expenditures shall be no greater on either a per person or total basis than the state would otherwise incur. Individuals who are solely eligible for medicaid may also participate if their participation is agreed to by the health care authority, the department, and the county legislative authority.

(4) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(5) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for social services appointments as the one established for medical appointments in section 213 of this act. When contracting directly with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the department shall only contract with language access providers who are working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available, the department may use a language access provider who meets other certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including interpreters in other states.

(6) The department shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid expansion for clients applying for or receiving state funded services from the department and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the department shall coordinate with the health care authority to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for the medicaid expansion but are enrolled in coverage that will be eliminated in the transition to the medicaid expansion.

(7)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2014)) 2015, unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year ((2014)) 2015 among programs after approval by the director of financial management. However, the department shall not transfer state moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year ((2014)) 2015 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the long-term care, foster care, adoptions support, medicaid personal care, and child support programs, the department may transfer state moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department shall not transfer funds, and the director of financial management shall not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

Sec. 1202. 2014 c 221 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$297,837,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($298,132,000))

﻿ $302,896,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($495,189,000))

﻿ $493,069,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($1,354,000))

﻿ $2,241,000

Home Security Fund Account—State Appropriation. . . .$10,741,000

Domestic Violence Prevention Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,240,000

Child and Family Reinvestment Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($2,647,000))

﻿ $1,812,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,107,140,000))

﻿ $1,109,836,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures.

(2) $668,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $668,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers. The center shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive, or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department shall not require case management as a condition of the contract.

(3) $538,500 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $539,500 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, $656,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation, and $253,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for children's administration to contract with an educational advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12 and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during the transition to performance based contracts. Funding shall be prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth and/or regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested educational outreach services exist. The department shall utilize private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.

(4) $10,741,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract for services pursuant to RCW 13.32A.030 and 74.15.220. The department shall contract and collaborate with service providers in a manner that maintains the availability and geographic representation of secure and semi-secure crisis residential centers and HOPE centers. To achieve efficiencies and increase utilization, the department shall allow the co-location of these centers, except that a youth may not be placed in a secure facility or the secure portion of a co-located facility except as specifically authorized by chapter 13.32A RCW. The reductions to appropriations in this subsection related to semi-secure crisis residential centers reflect a reduction to the number of beds for semi-secure crisis residential centers and not a reduction in rates. Any secure crisis residential center or semi-secure crisis residential center bed reduction shall not be based solely upon bed utilization. The department is to exercise its discretion in reducing the number of beds but to do so in a manner that maintains availability and geographic representation of semi-secure and secure crisis residential centers.

(5) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a community-based organization that has innovated, developed, and replicated a foster care delivery model that includes a licensed hub home. The community-based organization will provide training and technical assistance to the children's administration to develop five hub home models in region 2 that will improve child outcomes, support foster parents, and encourage the least restrictive community placements for children.

(6) $73,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $31,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1566 (youth in out-of-home care). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $28,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1774 (child welfare system). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(8) $1,698,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $2,788,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $1,894,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5405 (extended foster care). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(9) $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $109,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a receiving care center east of the Cascade mountains.

(10)(a) $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities to establish one demonstration site in a school district or group of school districts in western Washington.

(b) The children's administration and the nongovernmental entity or entities shall collaboratively select the demonstration site. The demonstration site should be a school district or group of school districts with a significant number of students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW.

(c) The demonstration site established under this subsection must be selected by September 1, 2013.

(d) The purpose of the demonstration site is to improve the educational outcomes of students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW by providing individualized education services and monitoring and supporting dependent youths' completion of educational milestones, remediation needs, and special education needs.

(e) The demonstration site established under this subsection must facilitate the educational progress and graduation of dependent youth. The contract must be performance-based with a stated goal of improving the graduation rates of foster youth by two percent per year over five school year periods, starting with the 2014-15 school year and ending with the 2019-20 school year. The demonstration site must develop and provide services aimed at improving the educational outcomes of foster youth. These services must include:

(i) Direct advocacy for foster youth to eliminate barriers to educational access and success;

(ii) Consultation with department of social and health services case workers to develop educational plans for and with participating youth;

(iii) Monitoring education progress of participating youth;

(iv) Providing participating youth with school and local resources that may assist in educational access and success; and

(v) Coaching youth, caregivers, and social workers to advocate for dependent youth in the educational system.

(f) The contracted nongovernmental entity or entities must report demonstration site outcomes to the department of social and health services and the office of public instruction by June 30, 2014, for the 2013-14 school year, and by June 30, 2015, for the 2014-15 school year.

(g) The children's administration must proactively refer all students fifteen years or older, within the demonstration site area, to the selected nongovernmental entity for educational services.

(h) The children's administration must report quarterly to the legislature on the number of eligible youth and number of youth referred for services beginning at the close of the second quarter of fiscal year 2014 and through the final quarter of fiscal year 2015.

(i) The contracted nongovernmental entity or entities shall report to the legislature by June 30, 2015, on the effectiveness of the demonstration site in increasing graduation rates for dependent youth.

(11) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $256,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5315 (Powell fatality team). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(12) $670,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $670,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for services provided through children's advocacy centers.

(13)(a) $22,695,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $22,695,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $28,450,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for services for children and families. Prior to approval of contract services pursuant to RCW 74.13B.020, the amounts provided in this section shall be allotted on a monthly basis and expenditures shall not exceed allotments based on a three-month rolling average without approval of the office of financial management following notification to the legislative fiscal committees.

(b) The department shall provide these services to safely reduce the number of children in out-of-home care, the time spent in out-of-home care prior to achieving permanency, and the number of children returning to out-of-home care following permanency.

(14) $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $6,332,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, (($2,647,000)) $1,812,000 of the child and family reinvestment account—state appropriation, and $9,474,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, are provided solely for the implementation and operations of the family assessment response program.

(((16))) (15) $329,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 and $48,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a tiered reimbursement pilot project for family home and center child care providers who participate in the early achievers quality and improvement system. The tiered reimbursement rates shall be consistent with those established by the department of early learning.

(((17))) (16) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for training, technical assistance, and fidelity oversight for an open source parenting program developed by a university-based child welfare research entity. Expenditure of the amount provided in this subsection is contingent upon the availability of private or local funds necessary for the research entity to develop the open source parenting curriculum. The children's administration must make the open source parenting program available to parents with an open child welfare case beginning January 1, 2015.

(((18))) (17) Effective January 2015, in addition to the youth eligible for extended foster care services under RCW 13.34.267 and 74.13.031, the department is authorized to provide extended foster care services to nonminor dependents who are engaged in employment for eighty hours or more per month. $83,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 and $23,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for such services.

Sec. 1203. 2014 c 221 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$89,505,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($88,778,000))

﻿ $88,063,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$3,464,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,978,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$196,000

Reinvesting in Youth—State Appropriation. . . .$383,000

Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,801,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($187,105,000))

﻿ $186,390,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.

(2) $2,716,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $2,716,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county impacts associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.

(3) $3,482,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $3,482,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to implement community juvenile accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection may be used solely for community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants.

(4) $1,130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a competitive basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.

(5) $3,123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $3,123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts for the following programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy (institute) in its October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Functional family therapy, multi-systemic therapy, aggression replacement training and interagency coordination programs, or other programs with a positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. County juvenile courts shall apply to the juvenile rehabilitation administration for funding for program-specific participation and the administration shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.

(6) $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for expansion of the following treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation administration programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy in its October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Multidimensional treatment foster care, family integrated transitions, and aggression replacement training, or other programs with a positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. The administration may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective manner.

(7)(a) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall administer a block grant, rather than categorical funding, of consolidated juvenile service funds, community juvenile accountability act grants, the chemical dependency disposition alternative funds, the mental health disposition alternative, and the sentencing disposition alternative for the purpose of serving youth adjudicated in the juvenile justice system. In making the block grant, the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall follow the following formula and will prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (i) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years old; (ii) fifteen percent for moderate and high-risk youth; (iii) twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (iv) seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (v) three percent for the chemical dependency disposition alternative; and (vi) two percent for the mental health and sentencing dispositional alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition alternative (SSODA) shall not be included in the block grant, but allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when approved by the juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee, based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.

(b) The juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight committee with equal representation from the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current available information. The committee will be cochaired by the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts, who will also have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to achieve its purpose. Initial members will include one juvenile court representative from the finance committee, the community juvenile accountability act committee, the risk assessment quality assurance committee, the executive board of the Washington association of juvenile court administrators, the Washington state center for court research, and a representative of the superior court judges association; two representatives from the juvenile rehabilitation administration headquarters program oversight staff, two representatives of the juvenile rehabilitation administration regional office staff, one representative of the juvenile rehabilitation administration fiscal staff and a juvenile rehabilitation administration division director. The committee may make changes to the formula categories other than the evidence-based program and disposition alternative categories if it is determined the changes will increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost benefit savings to the state. Long-term cost benefit must be considered. Percentage changes may occur in the evidence-based program or disposition alternative categories of the formula should it be determined the changes will increase evidence-based program or disposition alternative delivery and increase the cost benefit to the state. These outcomes will also be considered in determining when evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left separate.

(c) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts shall be responsible for collecting and distributing information and providing access to the data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the Washington state institute for public policy related to program and outcome data. The juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts will work collaboratively to develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and disposition alternatives.

(8) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts shall collect and distribute information related to program outcome and provide access to these data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation administration and Washington state institute for public policy. The agreements between administrative office of the courts, the juvenile courts, and the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall be executed to ensure that the juvenile rehabilitation administration receives the data that the juvenile rehabilitation administration identifies as needed to comply with this subsection. This includes, but is not limited to, information by program at the statewide aggregate level, individual court level, and individual client level for the purpose of the juvenile rehabilitation administration providing quality assurance and oversight for the locally committed youth block grant and associated funds and at times as specified by the juvenile rehabilitation administration as necessary to carry out these functions. The data shall be provided in a manner that reflects the collaborative work the juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile courts have developed regarding program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and disposition alternatives.

(9) $445,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $445,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild project.

(10) $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the juvenile detention alternatives initiative.

(11) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a grant program focused on criminal street gang prevention and intervention. The Washington state partnership council on juvenile justice may award grants under this subsection. The council shall give priority to applicants who have demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal street gangs. Applicants composed of, at a minimum, one or more local governmental entities and one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations that have a documented history of creating and administering effective criminal street gang prevention and intervention programs may apply for funding under this subsection.

(12) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for competitive grants to community-based organizations to provide at-risk youth intervention services, including but not limited to, case management, employment services, educational services, and street outreach intervention programs. Projects funded should focus on preventing, intervening, and suppressing behavioral problems and violence while linking at-risk youth to pro-social activities. The costs of administration may not exceed four percent of appropriated funding for each grant recipient. Each entity receiving funds must report to the juvenile rehabilitation administration on the number and types of youth served, the services provided, and the impact of those services upon the youth and the community.

Sec. 1204. 2014 c 221 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$328,527,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($329,208,000))

﻿ $323,005,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($666,113,000))

﻿ $770,476,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$17,864,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,341,712,000))

﻿ $1,439,872,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $104,999,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $88,895,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for persons and services not covered by the medicaid program. To the extent possible, levels of regional support network spending shall be maintained in the following priority order: Crisis and commitment services; community inpatient services; and residential care services, including personal care and emergency housing assistance. This is a reduction in flexible nonmedicaid funding of $4,343,000 for fiscal year 2014 and $20,446,000 for fiscal year 2015. This reduction reflects offsets in state funding related to services that will now be funded with federal dollars through the affordable care act medicaid expansion. This reduction shall be distributed as follows:

(i) The $4,343,000 reduction in fiscal year 2014 and $10,223,000 of the reduction in fiscal year 2015 must be distributed among regional support networks based on a formula that equally weights each regional support networks proportion of individuals who become newly eligible and enroll in medicaid under the expansion provisions of the affordable care act in fiscal year 2014 and each regional support network's spending of flexible nonmedicaid funding on services that would be reimbursable for federal medicaid matching funds if provided to medicaid enrollees in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium.

(ii) The remaining $10,223,000 reduction in fiscal year 2015 must be distributed among regional support networks based on each regional support network's proportion of individuals who become newly eligible and enroll in medicaid under the expansion provisions of the affordable care act through fiscal year 2015.

(b) $6,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $6,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $7,620,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department and regional support networks to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided to regional support networks with PACT teams, the department shall consider the differences between regional support networks in the percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that are not reimbursable under medicaid. The department may allow regional support networks which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under section 204(1)(a) of this act. The department and regional support networks shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this section.

(c) $5,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $5,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $1,300,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the western Washington regional support networks to provide either community- or hospital campus-based services for persons who require the level of care previously provided by the program for adaptive living skills (PALS) at western state hospital.

(d) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support networks at western state hospital shall be 557 per day.

(e) From the general fund—state appropriations in this subsection, the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional support networks reimburse the aging and disability services administration for the general fund—state cost of medicaid personal care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(f) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly, rather than through contracts with regional support networks, for children's long-term inpatient facility services.

(g) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to continue performance-based incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support services for individuals with severe mental illness who were discharged from the state hospitals as part of the expanding community services initiative. These funds will be used to enhance community residential and support services provided by regional support networks through other state and federal funding.

(h) $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Spokane regional support network to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at eastern state hospital. Such services shall include:

(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;

(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient care or jail services;

(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating those individuals; and

(iv) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.

At least annually, the Spokane regional support network shall assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.

(i) $1,529,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,529,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane counties for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(j) Regional support networks may use local funds to earn additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients. Additionally, regional support networks may use a portion of the state funds allocated in accordance with (a) of this subsection to earn additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for medicaid.

(k) $3,436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for mental health services for mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon release from confinement.

(l) $523,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $775,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $854,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of sections 3 through 5 of chapter 289, Laws of 2013 (E2SHB 1114). Regional support networks must use this funding for the development of intensive community programs that allow individuals to be diverted or transitioned from the state hospitals in accordance with plans approved by the department.

(m) $5,986,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $11,592,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $10,160,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 335, Laws of 2013 (ESSB 5480). Regional support networks must use this funding for the development of intensive community programs that allow individuals to be diverted or transitioned from the state hospitals in accordance with plans approved by the department.

(n) Due to recent approval of federal medicaid matching funds for the disability lifeline and the alcohol and drug abuse treatment support act programs, the department shall charge regional support networks for only the state share rather than the total cost of community psychiatric hospitalization for persons enrolled in those programs.

(o) The legislature finds that the circumstances of the Chelan-Douglas regional support network (CD-RSN) make it necessary for CD-RSN to undergo restructuring in order to provide mental health services essential to the health and wellness of the citizens within its service area. The legislature intends to provide additional temporary financial relief to the CD-RSN while it undergoes internal restructuring or negotiates a merger with another regional support network.

The department shall negotiate relief for outstanding fiscal year 2013 reimbursements owed by CD-RSN to the state provided that the CD-RSN has a plan in place that is approved by the department by August 1, 2013, that demonstrates how CD-RSN will maintain financial viability and stability or will merge with another regional support network.

For the period of July 1, 2013, through December 31, 2013, the department may alter collection of reimbursement from CD-RSN for overuse of state hospital beds. To receive a reduction to the required reimbursement for overuse of state hospital beds, CD-RSN must continue to prioritize services that reduce its utilization and census at eastern state hospital and be actively implementing an approved plan to maintain financial viability or pursuing a future merger with another regional support network. Up to $298,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is for the department to provide payments to regional support networks in eastern Washington which have used less than their allocated or contracted patient days of care at the state hospital to replace the share of the reimbursements from CD-RSN that the regional support networks would have received under RCW 71.24.320.

(p) $266,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to maintain services for the King county regional support network as it works to transition services to settings that are eligible for federal participation for individuals covered under the medicaid program.

(q) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for the department to develop and phase in intensive mental health services for high needs youth consistent with the settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter.

(r) $7,281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 and $4,589,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for enhancement of community mental health services. The department must contract these funds for the operation of community programs in which the department determines there is a need for capacity that allows individuals to be diverted or transitioned from the state hospitals including but not limited to: (i) Community hospital or free standing evaluation and treatment services providing short-term detention and commitment services under the involuntary treatment act to be located in the geographic areas of the King regional support network, the Spokane regional support network outside of Spokane county, and the Thurston Mason regional support network; (ii) one new full program of an assertive community treatment team in the King regional support network and two new half programs of assertive community treatment teams in the Spokane regional support network and the Pierce regional support network; and (iii) three new recovery support services programs in the Grays Harbor regional support network, the greater Columbia regional support network, and the north sound regional support network. In contracting for community evaluation and treatment services, the department may not use these resources in facilities that meet the criteria to be classified under federal law as institutions for mental diseases. If the department is unable to come to a contract agreement with a designated regional support network for any of the services identified above, it may consider contracting for that service in another regional support network that has the need for such service.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$137,913,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($130,754,000))

﻿ $131,615,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($158,952,000))

﻿ $159,021,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($58,844,000))

﻿ $58,012,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($486,463,000))

﻿ $486,561,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(b) $231,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $231,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a community partnership between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (2)(b) are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time community service officer at the city of Lakewood.

(c) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for payment to the city of Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state hospital and adjacent areas.

(d) $20,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $20,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to maintain staffed capacity to serve an average daily census in forensic wards at western state hospital of 270 patients per day.

(e) $2,994,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $5,266,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $240,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the state psychiatric hospitals to plan, procure, and implement the core elements of an electronic medical record system that is compliant with the international classification of diseases (ICD-10) by October 1, 2014. These funds must only be used for an electronic medical record system that meets federal criteria for electronic sharing of patient information and clinical care summaries with doctors' offices, hospitals, and health systems which use federally certified electronic health record systems. The procurement and implementation shall be conducted to allow for these services to be expanded to the department of corrections. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$1,612,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .$452,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$6,286,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$8,350,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $1,161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for children's evidence-based mental health services.

(b) $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $178,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence-based practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and implementation of evidence-based or promising practices. The institute must work with the department to develop a plan to seek private, federal, or other grant funding in order to reduce the need for state general funds. The institute and the department must submit this plan to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2013.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$5,807,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($7,418,000))

﻿ $7,450,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($10,030,000))

﻿ $10,032,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$502,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($23,757,000))

﻿ $23,791,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) In accordance with RCW 43.20B.110, 43.135.055, and 71.24.035, the department is authorized to adopt license and certification fees in fiscal years 2014 and 2015 to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(b) $74,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $74,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $78,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 335, Laws of 2013 (ESSB 5480).

(c) $160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 284, Laws of 2013 (ESSB 5551).

(d) In developing the new medicaid managed care rates under which the public mental health managed care system will operate, the department must seek to estimate the reasonable and necessary cost of efficiently and effectively providing a comparable set of medically necessary mental health benefits to persons of different acuity levels regardless of where in the state they live. The department must report to the office of financial management and to the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on its proposed new mental health managed care rate-setting approach by August 1, 2013, and again at least sixty days prior to implementation of new capitation rates.

(e) $349,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $212,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $302,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 320, Laws of 2013 (ESHB 1519) and chapter 338, Laws of 2013 (2SSB 5732).

(f) The department shall work cooperatively with the health care authority to explore the feasibility of incentivizing small, rural hospitals to convert, in part or fully, some of their beds to psychiatric treatment beds. No later than December 31, 2014, the department shall report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature on the feasibility of such conversion. The report shall consider rate enhancements and the ability to claim federal medicaid matching funds on converted beds.

(g) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $21,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided for implementation of section 9, chapter 197, Laws of 2013 (ESHB 1336). The department must utilize these funds for mental health first aid training targeted at teachers and educational staff in accordance with the training model developed by the department of psychology in Melbourne, Australia.

(h) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for the department to continue to develop the child adolescent needs and strengths assessment tool and build workforce capacity to provide evidence based wraparound services for children, consistent with the settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter.

(i) $144,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $466,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $687,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6312 (mental health, chemical dependency) and Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2315 (suicide prevention). ((If Substitute Senate Bill No. 6312 (mental health, chemical dependency) is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(j) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $780,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $900,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for contracted actuarial services required for integrating treatment services into managed care contracts in accordance with Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6312 (mental health, chemical dependency). This includes the development of integrated rates for mental health and chemical dependency services that can be used for contracts with behavioral health and recovery organizations effective April 1, 2016, and for integrated physical health and behavioral health contracts with early adopters. The department shall collaborate with the health care authority, the office of the state actuary, and legislative staff on the establishment of these rates. Contracts for these actuarial services must require the contractors to provide information in response to questions from the health care authority, the office of the state actuary, and legislative staff. By November 1, 2014, the department shall provide a preliminary progress report on the rate setting process to the behavioral health task force established in chapter 338, Laws of 2013, and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature. The department shall provide an updated report to the same entities by June 30, 2015.

Sec. 1205. 2014 c 221 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$444,370,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($470,359,000))

﻿ $478,204,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($835,386,000))

﻿ $841,913,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$535,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,750,650,000))

﻿ $1,765,022,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(i) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes shall be increased to $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2014 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2015. A processing fee of $2,750 shall be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable.

(ii) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities shall be increased to $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2014 and $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2015.

(iii) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities shall be increased to $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2014 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2015.

(c) $13,301,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $20,607,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $33,910,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw through an interest arbitration decision under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.

(d) $6,244,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $6,244,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are appropriated solely for the individual and family support program. Within these amounts, the department shall expand the current number of clients receiving services and focus on extending services to individuals with developmental disabilities who are not otherwise receiving paid services from the department.

(e) The department shall reimburse with the exceptional care rate adult family homes that provided care solely to clients with HIV/AIDS on or before January 1, 2000, and continue to provide care solely to clients with HIV/AIDS. The department shall not reduce the exceptional care rate from the rate paid on October 1, 2013.

(f) $774,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $2,395,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a payment system that satisfies medicaid requirements regarding time reporting for W-2 providers. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(g) $1,707,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $2,670,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $4,376,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity impacts of the service employees international union healthcare 775nw arbitration award.

(h) The department is authorized to establish limited exemption criteria in rule to address RCW 74.39A.325 when a landline phone is not available to the employee.

(i) $91,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2310 (provider safety equipment). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(j) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(k) The department of social and health services shall increase the benchmark rates for community residential service businesses providing supported living, group home, and licensed staff residential services for people with developmental disabilities by thirty cents starting July 1, 2014.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$86,005,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($84,806,000))

﻿ $87,062,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($160,310,000))

﻿ $161,785,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$23,041,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($354,162,000))

﻿ $357,893,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) $721,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $721,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are for the department to fulfill its contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to provide transportation, building space, and other support services as are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of students living in residential habilitation centers.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$1,975,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($2,074,000))

﻿ $2,290,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($2,102,000))

﻿ $2,283,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($6,151,000))

﻿ $6,548,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 and $46,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of designing and implementing the community first choice option benefit pursuant to either Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2746 (medicaid personal care) or Substitute Senate Bill No. 6387 (eliminating waiting for individuals with developmental disabilities). ((If neither of these bills is enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this subsection (3)(a) shall lapse.))

(b) It is the intent of the legislature to use savings from the community first choice option to make needed investments in home and community-based services for seniors and people with disabilities, including potential investments recommended by the joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability and a development and implementation council that the department of social and health services must convene prior to submitting the proposed community first choice option to the centers for medicare and medicaid services. At a minimum, the final report to the legislature from the joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability must explore the cost and benefit of rate enhancements for providers of long-term services and supports, restoration of hours for in-home clients, additional investment in the family caregiver support program, and additional investment in the individual and family services program or other medicaid services to support individuals with developmental disabilities.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$1,403,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .$1,403,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$1,206,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,012,000

Sec. 1206. 2014 c 221 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$860,198,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($913,984,000))

﻿ $889,962,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($1,898,401,000))

﻿ $1,876,936,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$33,471,000

Traumatic Brain Injury Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,392,000

Skilled Nursing Facility Safety Net Trust Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$110,681,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($3,820,127,000))

﻿ $3,774,640,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $171.35 for fiscal year 2014 and shall not exceed $178.82 for fiscal year 2015, including the rate add-ons described in (a), (b), and (g) of this subsection. However, if the waiver requested from the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services in relation to the safety net assessment is for any reason disapproved, the weighted average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $162.43 for fiscal year 2014 and shall not exceed $163.58 for fiscal year 2015. There will be no adjustments for economic trends and conditions in fiscal years 2014 and 2015. The economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to the component rate allocations established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW. When no economic trends and conditions factor for either fiscal year is defined in a biennial appropriations act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or compounded to the component rate allocations established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW.

(a) For fiscal year 2014 and 2015 within the funds provided, the department shall continue to provide an add-on per medicaid resident day per facility not to exceed $1.57. The add-on shall be used to increase wages, benefits, and/or staffing levels for certified nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or benefits for dietary aides, housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other category of worker whose statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was less than $15 in calendar year 2008, according to cost report data. The add-on may also be used to address resulting wage compression for related job classes immediately affected by wage increases to low-wage workers. For fiscal year 2015 within funds provided, the department shall provide an additional add-on per medicaid resident day per facility not to exceed the industry weighted average rate of $2.44. The add-on shall be used to increase wages, benefits, and/or staffing levels for certified nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or benefits for dietary aides, housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other category of worker whose statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was less than $17 in calendar year 2012, according to cost report data. The department shall continue reporting requirements and a settlement process to ensure that the funds are spent according to this subsection.

(b) The department shall do a comparative analysis of the facility-based payment rates calculated on July 1, 2014, using the payment methodology defined in chapter 74.46 RCW and as funded in the omnibus appropriations act, excluding the low wage worker add-on found in (a) of this subsection, the rate add-ons for direct care, support services, and therapy care found in (g) of this subsection, the comparative add-on, acuity add-on, and safety net reimbursement, to the facility-based payment rates in effect June 30, 2010. If the facility-based payment rate calculated on July 1, 2014, is smaller than the facility-based payment rate on June 30, 2010, then the difference shall be provided to the individual nursing facilities as an add-on payment per medicaid resident day.

(c) During the comparative analysis performed in subsection (b) of this section, if it is found that the direct care rate for any facility calculated using the payment methodology defined in chapter 74.46 RCW and as funded in the omnibus appropriations act, excluding the low wage worker add-on found in (a) of this subsection, the rate add-ons for direct care, support services, and therapy care found in (g) of this subsection, the comparative add-on, acuity add-on, and safety net reimbursement, is greater than the direct care rate in effect on June 30, 2010, then the facility shall receive a ten percent direct care rate add-on to compensate that facility for taking on more acute clients than they have in the past.

(d) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.

(e) The rate add-on provided in (c) of this subsection is subject to the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW 74.46.022(6).

(f) If the waiver requested from the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services in relation to the safety net assessment is for any reason disapproved, (b), (c), (d), (g), and the fiscal year 2015 additional add-on in (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(g) For fiscal year 2015, the department shall provide the following rate add-ons per medicaid resident day:

(i) A direct care rate add-on of $3.63 per medicaid resident day;

(ii) A support services rate add-on of $1.12 per medicaid resident day; and

(iii) A therapy care rate add-on of $0.05 per patient day.

This subsection (1)(g) is subject to the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW 74.46.022(6).

(2) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall issue no additional certificates of capital authorization for fiscal year 2014 and no new certificates of capital authorization for fiscal year 2015 and shall grant no rate add-ons to payment rates for capital improvements not requiring a certificate of need and a certificate of capital authorization for fiscal years 2014 and 2015.

(3) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(a) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes shall be increased to $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2014 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2015. A processing fee of $2,750 shall be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable.

(b) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities shall be increased to $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2014 and $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2015.

(c) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities shall be increased to $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2014 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2015.

(4) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients residing in nursing homes and paid for with state only funds into less restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the client's care needs.

(5) $30,640,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $48,633,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $79,273,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw through an interest arbitration decision under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.

(6) $1,840,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,877,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer services program. Funding shall be prioritized towards serving populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include senior citizens and persons with disabilities.

(7) $2,447,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $7,575,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a payment system that satisfies medicaid requirements regarding time reporting for W-2 providers. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(8) The department is authorized to establish limited exemption criteria in rule to address RCW 74.39A.325 when a landline phone is not available to the employee.

(9) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, in a report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature that must be submitted by December 1, 2013, the department of social and health services must describe the process for establishing medicaid rates for assisted living and adult family homes. The report must include information about licensing and physical plant standards, contracting provisions, and per capita and biennial expenditures for assisted living and adult family homes.

(10) $10,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $17,768,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $28,567,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity impacts of the service employees international union healthcare 775nw arbitration award.

(11) $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $17,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $50,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for staffing and other expenses associated with the work of the joint legislative executive committee on planning for aging and disability issues that is established by this subsection.

(a) A joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability is established, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) Four members of the senate, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members. Four members of the house of representatives, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members;

(ii) A member from the office of the governor, appointed by the governor;

(iii) The secretary of the department of social and health services or his or her designee;

(iv) The director of the health care authority or his or her designee; and

(v) The director of the department of retirement systems or his or her designee.

(b) The committee must convene by September 1, 2013. At the first meeting, the committee will select cochairs from among its members who are legislators. All meetings of the committee are open to the public.

(c) The purpose of the committee is to identify key strategic actions to prepare for the aging of the population in Washington, including state budget and policy options, by conducting at least, but not limited to, the following tasks:

(i) Establish a profile of Washington's current population of older people and people with disabilities and a projection of population growth through 2030;

(ii) Establish an inventory of services and supports currently available to older people and people with disabilities from the health care and long-term services and support systems and other community resources such as housing, transportation, income support, and protection for vulnerable adults;

(iii) Identify state budget and policy options to more effectively use state, federal and private resources to, over time, reduce the growth rate in state expenditures that would otherwise occur by continuing current policy in light of significant population growth;

(iv) Identify strategies to better serve the health care needs of an aging population and people with disabilities, and promote healthy living;

(v) Identify policy options to create financing mechanisms for long-term services and supports that will promote additional private responsibility for individuals and families to meet their needs for service;

(vi) Identify policies to promote financial security in retirement, support people who wish to stay in the workplace longer, and expand the availability of workplace retirement savings plans; and

(vii) Identify policy options to help communities adapt to the aging demographic in planning for housing, land use and transportation.

(d) The committee shall consult with the office of the insurance commissioner, the caseload forecast council, health care authority, and other appropriate entities with specialized knowledge of the needs and growth trends of the aging population and people with disabilities.

(e) Staff support for the committee shall be provided by the office of program research, senate committee services, the office of financial management, and the department of social and health services.

(f) Within existing appropriations, the cost of meetings must be paid jointly by the senate, house of representatives, and the office of financial management. Joint committee expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees. The joint committee members may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter 44.04 RCW as appropriate. Advisory committee members may not receive compensation or reimbursement for travel and expenses.

(g) The committee shall issue an interim report to the legislature by December 10, 2013, and issue final recommendations to the governor and relevant standing committees of the legislature by December 10, 2014. The committee shall terminate on June 30, 2015.

(12) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $1,342,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $1,468,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 320, Laws of 2013 (ESHB 1519) and chapter 338, Laws of 2013 (2SSB 5732).

(13) The department shall review the capital add-on rate established by RCW 74.39A.320 for effectiveness in incentivizing assisted living facilities to serve Medicaid eligible clients. Upon completing its review, the department shall submit its findings along with recommendations for alternatives to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2013. The department is encouraged to engage stakeholders in developing alternatives.

(14) $239,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $398,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 300, Laws of 2013 (SSB 5630).

(15) $3,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2310 (provider safety equipment). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(16) $296,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 and $296,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of designing and implementing the community first choice option benefit pursuant to either Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2746 (medicaid personal care) or Substitute Senate Bill No. 6387 (eliminating waiting for individuals with developmental disabilities). ((If neither of these bills is enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(17) $5,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for services and support to individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind.

(18) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(19) It is the intent of the legislature to use savings from the community first choice option to make needed investments in home and community-based services for seniors and people with disabilities, including potential investments recommended by the joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability and the development and implementation council that the department of social and health services must convene prior to submitting the proposed community first choice option to the centers for medicare and medicaid services. At a minimum, the final report to the legislature from the joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability must explore the cost and benefit of rate enhancements for providers of long-term services and supports, restoration of hours for in-home clients, additional investment in the family caregiver support program, and additional investment in the individual and family services program or other medicaid services to support individuals with developmental disabilities.

(20) The department shall reimburse with the exceptional care rate adult family homes that provided care solely to clients with HIV/AIDS on or before January 1, 2000, and continue to provide care solely to clients with HIV/AIDS. The department shall not reduce the exceptional care rate from the rate paid on October 1, 2013.

(21) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the department to contract with area agencies on aging to convene a work group to include first responders and companies providing life alert or other emergency alert services and to develop a proposal on how vulnerable adults who have life alert services might be made known to first responders in the event of a long-term power or telecommunications outage. The work group shall review methods for information sharing to include:

(a) Protocols and conditions in which information would be shared;

(b) A process whereby vulnerable life alert and emergency alert customers may provide permission for their information to be shared in the event of an emergency;

(c) Privacy protections for participants in the program; and

(d) Liability protections for agencies that collect, maintain, and track information.

The work group shall develop recommendations and provide them to the office of financial management and to the appropriate legislative committees by November 15, 2014.

(22) Within existing appropriations, the department is authorized to implement the fully capitated demonstration project for individuals who are dually eligible for medicare and medicaid. Savings realized from this implementation may be used to offset any general fund—state costs incurred by the department.

Sec. 1207. 2014 c 221 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$371,738,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($374,979,000))

﻿ $370,943,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($1,235,362,000))

﻿ $1,269,415,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($36,450,000))

﻿ $22,265,000

Administrative Contingency Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$5,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,023,529,000))

﻿ $2,039,361,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $145,315,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, (($146,136,000)) $140,239,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, $5,000,000 of the administrative contingency account—state appropriation, and (($770,440,000)) $777,157,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. The department must create a WorkFirst budget structure that allows for transparent tracking of budget units and subunits of expenditures where these units and subunits are mutually exclusive from other department budget units. The budget structure must include budget units for the following: Cash assistance, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the program. Within these budget units, the department must develop program index codes for specific activities and develop allotments and track expenditures using these codes. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature prior to adopting the new structure. The secretary of the department of social and health services, working with WorkFirst partner agencies and in collaboration with the WorkFirst oversight task force, shall develop a plan for maximizing the following outcomes and shall report back to the legislature by November 1, 2013. The outcomes to be measured are: (i) Increased employment; (ii) completion of education or post-secondary training; (iii) completion of barrier removal activity including drug and alcohol or mental health treatment; (iv) housing stability; (v) child care or education stability for the children of temporary assistance for needy families recipients; (vi) reduced rate of return after exit from the WorkFirst program; and (vii) work participation requirements.

(b) (($374,455,000)) $359,933,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for assistance to clients, including grants, diversion cash assistance, and additional diversion emergency assistance including but not limited to assistance authorized under RCW 74.08A.210. The department may use state funds to provide support to working families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families but otherwise not receiving cash assistance.

(c) $171,893,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for WorkFirst job search, education and training activities, barrier removal services, limited English proficiency services, and tribal assistance under RCW 74.08A.040. The department must allocate this funding based on client outcomes and cost effectiveness measures.

(d) (($352,085,000)) $366,366,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.215.135. The amounts provided in this subsection (d) are provided conditioned on the department of social and health services and the department of early learning taking additional actions to identify and reduce the backlog of overpayment cases related to public assistance programs, including the working connections child care program. The departments shall collaborate and create a plan to triage overpayment cases in a manner that identifies and prioritizes cases with large overpayments and likelihood of fraudulent activity. The departments shall provide a quarterly report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature detailing the specific actions taken as a result of this subsection (d). The department of social and health services shall also establish an interagency agreement with the state auditor's office to conduct an independent performance audit of the office of fraud and accountability recovery. The audit shall include an analysis of the data reporting elements used by the office, current methods for determining the closing of cases, workload allocation, and issues associated with coordination between the two departments. $300,000 of the amount provided in this subsection (d) is provided solely for this performance audit.

(e) (($168,456,000)) $169,519,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for WorkFirst and working connections child care administration and overhead.

(f) The amounts in (b) through (e) of this subsection shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified. However, the department may transfer up to 10 percent of funding between (b) through (e) of this subsection. The department shall provide notification prior to any transfer to the office of financial management and to the appropriate legislative committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight task force. The approval of the director of financial management is required prior to any transfer under this subsection.

(2) $1,657,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,657,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for naturalization services.

(3) $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services; and $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.

(4) On December 1, 2013, and annually thereafter, the department must report to the legislature on all sources of funding available for both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service type and funding source. The report must also include the number of clients served and outcome data for the clients.

(5) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to be no less than seventy-five percent and no more than one hundred percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program benefit amount.

(6) $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of section 1, chapter 337, Laws of 2013 (2SSB 5595).

(7) $4,729,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $4,729,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of the telephone assistance program and the Washington information network 211 organization pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 1971 (communication services). Of these funds, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for operational support of the Washington information network 211 organization. ((If Substitute House Bill No. 1971 (communication services) is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(8) The department shall review clients receiving services through the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization funding through the department.

(9) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties to facilitate applications for veterans' services.

(10) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 ((and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are)) is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2069 (safety net benefits). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 1208. 2014 c 221 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$73,021,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($63,535,000))

﻿ $62,915,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($279,090,000))

﻿ $283,121,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($16,301,000))

﻿ $16,401,000

Criminal Justice Treatment Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$14,284,000

Problem Gambling Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,449,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($447,680,000))

﻿ $451,191,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department may contract with the University of Washington and community-based providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program or other specialized chemical dependency case management providers for pregnant, post-partum, and parenting women. For all contractors: (a) Service and other outcome data must be provided to the department by request; (b) program modifications needed to maximize access to federal medicaid matching funds will be phased in over the course of the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium; and (c) indirect charges for administering the program shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.

(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall continue to provide for chemical dependency treatment services for adult medicaid eligible, pregnant and parenting women, disability lifeline, and alcoholism and drug addiction treatment and support act, and medical care services clients.

(3) In accordance with RCW 70.96A.090 and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to adopt fees for the review and approval of treatment programs in fiscal years 2014 and 2015 as necessary to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(4) $3,500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (from the substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant) is provided solely for the continued funding of existing county drug and alcohol use prevention programs.

(5) $2,600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for the department to transition 128 beds from settings that are considered institutions for mental diseases to facilities with no more than 16 beds that are able to claim federal match for services provided to medicaid clients or individuals covered under the department's section 1115 medicaid waiver. The department may conduct a request for proposal process to fulfill this requirement and adopt rates that are comparable to the pilot projects implemented in the 2011-13 fiscal biennium. The department may use these funds to assist with the costs of providers in setting up or converting to 16-bed facilities. This funding may also be used for providers that are developing new capacity for clients who will become eligible for services under the affordable care act medicaid expansion. The number of beds available for pregnant and parenting women must not be reduced.

(6) $141,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for transitional funding for the family drug court in Pierce county.

(7) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall review differential rates paid for alcohol and substance abuse assessment and treatment services for medicaid and nonmedicaid clients and the impact to providers as previously uninsured clients become eligible for services through the medicaid expansion under the federal patient protection and affordable care act. By December 1, 2014, the department must submit a report to the legislature which provides: (a) The estimated impact on providers for each type of medicaid reimbursable service as newly eligible clients shift from nonmedicaid to medicaid rates; (b) identification of which types of providers will be most significantly impacted by these shifts; (c) identification of the estimated annual costs for increasing rates for each level of service; and (d) a summary of federal requirements that must be considered in determining how any future rate increase must be implemented.

(8) $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 and $29,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to expand access to a program located in a county with a population over 700,000 that provides case management and coordinating services for low-income women who are pregnant or parenting and have a suspected history of alcohol or drug abuse.

(9) Within existing appropriations, the department shall prioritize the prevention and treatment of intravenous, opiate-based drug use.

Sec. 1209. 2014 c 221 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$16,568,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($11,083,000))

﻿ $10,960,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$99,397,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($127,048,000))

﻿ $126,925,000

((The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $5,006,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for services and support to individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind.))

Sec. 1210. 2014 c 221 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$37,796,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($36,492,000))

﻿ $36,510,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($74,288,000))

﻿ $74,306,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department of social and health services shall transfer the stewardship of McNeil Island to the department of corrections industries program, effective September 1, 2013. The transferred responsibilities shall include marine operations, waste water treatment, water treatment, road maintenance, and any other general island maintenance that is not site specific to the operations of the special commitment center or the Pierce county secure community transition facility. Facility maintenance within the perimeter of the special commitment center shall remain the responsibility of the department of social and health services. Capital repairs and maintenance necessary to maintain the special commitment center on McNeil Island shall be managed by the department of social and health services. The legislature directs both departments to enter into an interagency agreement by August 1, 2013. The office of financial management shall oversee the negotiations of the interagency agreement. The interagency agreement must describe equipment that will transfer between the departments, warehouse space that will be shared by the departments, and occupancy requirements for any shops outside the perimeter of the special commitment center. The office of financial management will make the final determination on any disagreements between the departments on the details of the interagency agreement.

(2) $3,042,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $3,024,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for operational costs specific to island operations of the special commitment center and the Pierce county secure community transition facility. The department shall establish an accounting structure that enables it to track and report on costs specific to island operations.

(3) All employees of the department of social and health services engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred to the department of corrections industries program under this subsection, are transferred to the department of corrections.

(4) All classified employees of the department of social and health services assigned to the department of corrections under this subsection whose positions are within an existing bargaining unit description at the department of corrections shall become a part of the existing bargaining unit at the department of corrections and shall be considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

(5) By November 1, 2014, the department of social and health services shall provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature that evaluates the department's costs for certain medical and pharmacy costs for its residents within the special commitment center. The department as part of its evaluation shall consult with the health care authority, the health benefits exchange, and the department of corrections. At a minimum, the report should look at the following items: (a) Obtaining medicaid eligibility for residents; (b) feasibility of obtaining insurance for residents through the health benefit exchange; (c) utilizing multistate consortiums for the purchase of pharmaceuticals to reduce costs; and (d) consolidating contracts for medical inpatient and outpatient services with western state hospital.

Sec. 1211. 2014 c 221 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$29,773,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($28,313,000))

﻿ $20,011,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($37,067,000))

﻿ $37,166,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$654,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($95,807,000))

﻿ $87,604,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $395,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $228,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $335,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 320, Laws of 2013 (ESHB 1519) and chapter 338, Laws of 2013 (2SSB 5732).

(2) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington state mentors program to continue its public-private partnerships to provide technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.

(3) $82,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $28,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to develop a report on state efforts to prevent and control diabetes. The department, the health care authority, and the department of health shall submit a coordinated report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2014, on the following:

(a) The financial impacts and reach that diabetes of all types and undiagnosed gestational diabetes are having on the programs administered by each agency and individuals, including children with mothers with undiagnosed gestational diabetes, enrolled in those programs. Items in this assessment must include: (i) The number of lives with diabetes and undiagnosed gestational diabetes impacted or covered by the programs administered by each agency; (ii) the number of lives with diabetes, or at risk for diabetes, and family members impacted by prevention and diabetes control programs implemented by each agency; (iii) the financial toll or impact diabetes and its complications, and undiagnosed gestational diabetes and the complications experienced during labor to children of mothers with gestational diabetes places on these programs in comparison to other chronic diseases and conditions; and (iv) the financial toll or impact diabetes and its complications, and diagnosed gestational diabetes and the complications experienced during labor to children of mothers with gestational diabetes places on these programs;

(b) An assessment of the benefits of implemented and existing programs and activities aimed at controlling all types of diabetes and preventing the disease. This assessment must also document the amount and source for any funding directed to each agency for the programs and activities aimed at reaching those with diabetes of all types;

(c) A description of the level of coordination existing between the agencies on activities, programmatic activities, and messaging on managing, treating, or preventing all types of diabetes and its complications;

(d) The development or revision of detailed policy-related action plans and budget recommendations for battling diabetes and undiagnosed gestational diabetes that includes a range of actionable items for consideration by the legislature. The plans and budget recommendations must identify proposed action steps to reduce the impact of diabetes, prediabetes, related diabetes complications, and undiagnosed gestational diabetes. The plans and budget recommendations must also identify expected outcomes of the action steps proposed in the following biennium while also establishing benchmarks for controlling and preventing all types of diabetes; and

(e) An estimate of savings, efficiencies, costs, and budgetary savings and resources required to implement the plans and budget recommendations identified in (d) of this subsection (5).

Sec. 1212. 2014 c 221 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$62,822,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($65,716,000))

﻿ $67,320,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($58,340,000))

﻿ $56,759,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($186,878,000))

﻿ $186,901,000

Sec. 1213. 2014 c 221 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$2,144,827,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($2,161,903,000))

﻿ $2,052,711,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($7,908,155,000))

﻿ $8,621,613,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($56,400,000))

﻿ $63,332,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems﻿

Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$15,082,000

Hospital Safety Net Assessment Fund—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($669,380,000))

﻿ $618,212,000

Health Benefit Exchange Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($16,580,000))

﻿ $10,871,000

State Health Care Authority Administration Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .(($35,328,000))

﻿ $36,828,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation. . . .$528,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($21,206,000))

﻿ $21,118,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($13,029,389,000))

﻿ $13,585,122,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($1,900,484,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely)) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to implement the medicaid expansion as defined in the social security act, section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII), subject to the conditions and limitations in this subsection. If the federal medical assistance percentage for the medicaid expansion falls below the percentages in section 1905(y) of the social security act as of July 1, 2013, the authority shall ensure that the state does not incur any additional state costs above what would have been incurred had the federal medical assistance percentages remained at the percentages in section 1905(y) as of July 1, 2013. The director is authorized to make any necessary program adjustments to comply with this requirement, including adding or adjusting premiums, modifying benefits, or reducing optional programs. To the extent a waiver is needed to accomplish this, the director shall promptly apply for such waiver. If a necessary waiver is not approved, the medicaid expansion program shall be terminated upon appropriate notification to the legislature and enrollees.

(2) The requirements of this subsection apply to the basic health plan. This subsection is null and void and has no further effect upon implementation of the medicaid expansion under subsection (1) of this section.

(a) Within amounts appropriated in this section and sections 205 and 206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents eligible to participate in the basic health plan as subsidized enrollees and home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at the minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.

(b) The health care authority shall require organizations and individuals that are paid to deliver basic health plan services and that choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due from the sponsored enrollees.

(c) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of (i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all applicants, or (ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from those persons not required to file income tax returns; (b) check employment security payroll records at least once every twelve months on all enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as indicated by payroll records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based to document their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d) require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot be obtained to document their current income at least once every six months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to, depreciation, amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by the United States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment and civil penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).

(d) Enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan shall be limited to only include persons who qualify as subsidized enrollees as defined in RCW 70.47.020 and who (a) qualify for services under 1115 medicaid demonstration project number 11-W-00254/10; or (b) are foster parents licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.

(3) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the health care authority pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that the cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(4) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts, if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.

(5) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.

(6) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of the state's health care system.

(7) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.

(8) $4,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $4,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $8,522,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share hospital payments.

(9) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $600,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for disproportionate share hospital payments to rural hospitals certified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services as sole community hospitals as of January 1, 2013, with less than one hundred fifty acute care licensed beds in fiscal year 2011 that do not participate in the certified public expenditures program. The authority shall discontinue these payments on January 1, 2015.

(10) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for grants to rural hospitals in Clallam county that were certified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services as sole community hospitals as of January 1, 2013, with less than one hundred fifty acute care licensed beds in fiscal year 2011. The authority shall discontinue these payments on January 1, 2015.

(11) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 and $100,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for disproportionate share hospital payments beginning on January 1, 2015, to rural hospitals in Lewis county that were certified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services as sole community hospitals as of January 1, 2013, with less than one hundred fifty acute care licensed beds in fiscal year 2011. The authority shall discontinue these payments after June 30, 2015.

(12) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for grants to rural public hospitals in Grant county that were certified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services as sole community hospitals as of January 1, 2013, with less than one hundred fifty acute care licensed beds in fiscal year 2011. The authority shall discontinue these payments after June 30, 2015.

(13) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall provide disproportionate share hospital payments to hospitals that provide services to children in the children's health program who are not eligible for services under Title XIX or XXI of the federal social security act due to their citizenship status.

(14) $6,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.

(15) The health care authority shall continue the inpatient hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and legislature by November 1, 2013, and by November 1, 2014, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2014 and fiscal year 2015, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount. The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with policies approved in the 2013-2015 biennial operating appropriations act and in effect on July 1, 2013, (b) one-half of the indigent assistance disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (c) all of the other disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match. If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount, the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within eleven months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested. $11,928,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and (($14,821,000)) $21,666,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for state grants for the participating hospitals.

(16) The health care authority shall seek public-private partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to provide on-going support for outreach and education efforts under the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of 2009.

(17) The health care authority shall target funding for maternity support services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco use, or African American or Native American race. The health care authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those services.

(18) $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $292,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1519 (service coordination organizations) and Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5732 (behavioral health services). If neither of the bills is enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $57,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $55,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to develop a report on state efforts to prevent and control diabetes. The authority, the department of social and health services, and the department of health shall submit a coordinated report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2014, on the following:

(a) The financial impacts and reach that diabetes of all types and undiagnosed gestational diabetes are having on the programs administered by each agency and individuals, including children with mothers with undiagnosed gestational diabetes, enrolled in those programs. Items in this assessment must include: (i) The number of lives with diabetes and undiagnosed gestational diabetes impacted or covered by the programs administered by each agency; (ii) the number of lives with diabetes, or at risk for diabetes, and family members impacted by prevention and diabetes control programs implemented by each agency; (iii) the financial toll or impact diabetes and its complications, and undiagnosed gestational diabetes and the complications experienced during labor to children of mothers with gestational diabetes places on these programs in comparison to other chronic diseases and conditions; and (iv) the financial toll or impact diabetes and its complications, and diagnosed gestational diabetes and the complications experienced during labor to children of mothers with gestational diabetes places on these programs;

(b) An assessment of the benefits of implemented and existing programs and activities aimed at controlling all types of diabetes and preventing the disease. This assessment must also document the amount and source for any funding directed to each agency for the programs and activities aimed at reaching those with diabetes of all types;

(c) A description of the level of coordination existing between the agencies on activities, programmatic activities, and messaging on managing, treating, or preventing all types of diabetes and its complications;

(d) The development or revision of detailed policy-related action plans and budget recommendations for battling diabetes and undiagnosed gestational diabetes that includes a range of actionable items for consideration by the legislature. The plans and budget recommendations must identify proposed action steps to reduce the impact of diabetes, prediabetes, related diabetes complications, and undiagnosed gestational diabetes. The plans and budget recommendations must also identify expected outcomes of the action steps proposed in the following biennium while also establishing benchmarks for controlling and preventing all types of diabetes; and

(e) An estimate of savings, efficiencies, costs, and budgetary savings and resources required to implement the plans and budget recommendations identified in (d) of this subsection (17).

(20) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall identify strategies to improve patient adherence to treatment plans for diabetes and implement these strategies as a pilot through one health home program to be identified by the authority. The authority shall report to the governor and the legislature in December 2014 on the progress of strategy implementation. The authority shall report to the governor and legislature in December 2015 on patient outcomes and cost savings derived from new adherence strategies in the health home model and make recommendations for improving the strategies.

(21) Effective January 1, 2014, managed care contracts must incorporate accountability measures that monitor patient health and improved health outcomes, and shall include an expectation that each patient receive a wellness examination that documents the baseline health status and allows for monitoring of health improvements and outcome measures.

(22) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $25,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the development of recommendations for funding integrated school nursing and outreach services. The authority shall collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop recommendations for increasing federal financial participation for providing nursing services in schools with the goals of integrating nursing and outreach services and supporting one nurse for every four hundred fifty students in elementary schools and one nurse for every seven hundred fifty students in secondary schools. In developing these recommendations, the authority shall inquire with the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services about state plan amendment or waiver options for receiving additional federal matching funds for school nursing services provided to children enrolled in apple health for kids. The recommendations shall include proposals for funding training and reimbursement for nurses that provide outreach services to help eligible students enroll in apple health for kids and other social services programs. The authority and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide these recommendations to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2013.

(23) $430,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to complete grant requirements for the health information exchange.

(24) $143,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account—state appropriation and $423,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the rebasing of outpatient and inpatient payment methods.

(25) (($1,163,000)) $1,075,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account—state appropriation and (($9,710,000)) $9,143,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement the conversion to the tenth version of the world health organization's international classification of diseases.

(26) $111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $359,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to update the medicaid information technology architecture state self-assessment and to develop the five year road map for the medicaid information technology architecture architect.

(27) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $126,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to support the Robert Bree collaborative's efforts to disseminate evidence-based best practices for preventing and treating health problems.

(28) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall increase reimbursement rates for primary care services provided by independent nurse practitioners to medicare levels for the period from July 1, 2013, to December 31, 2014.

(29) The authority shall seek a medicaid state plan amendment to create a professional services supplemental payment managed care program for professional services delivered to managed care recipients by University of Washington medicine and other public professional providers. This program shall be effective as soon as administratively possible and shall operate concurrently with the existing professional services supplemental payment program. The authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the difference between average commercial rates and fee-for-service medicaid payments. This difference will be multiplied by the number of managed care encounters and incorporated into the managed care plan capitation rates by a certified actuary. The managed care plans will pay the providers the difference attributable to the increased capitation rate. Participating providers shall be solely responsible for providing the local funds required to obtain federal matching funds. Any incremental costs incurred by the authority in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this program shall be the responsibility of the participating providers. Participating providers shall retain the full amount of supplemental payments provided under this program, net of any costs related to the program that are disallowed due to audits or litigation against the state.

(30) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide an adult dental benefit beginning January 1, 2014.

(31) To the extent allowed under federal law, the authority shall require an adult client to enroll in full medicaid coverage instead of family planning-only coverage unless the client is at risk of domestic violence.

(32) The authority shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid expansion for clients applying for or receiving state funded services from the authority and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for the medicaid expansion but are enrolled in coverage that will be eliminated in the transition to the medicaid expansion.

(33) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $180,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit organization of a toll-free hotline that assists families to learn about and enroll in the apple health for kids program.

(34) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reduce premiums for children with family incomes above 200 percent of the federal poverty level in the state-funded children's health program who are not eligible for coverage under the federal children's health insurance program. Premiums in the state and federal children's health insurance program shall be equal.

(35) The appropriations in this section reflect savings and efficiencies by transferring children receiving medical care provided through fee-for-service to medical care provided through managed care.

(36) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $170,561,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the provider incentive program and other initiatives related to the health information technology medicaid plan.

(37) $1,528,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $2,206,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $17,912,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement phase two of the project to create a single provider payment system that consolidates medicaid medical and social services payments and replaces the social service payment system. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the authority satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(38) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority and the department of social and health services shall implement the state option to provide health homes for enrollees with chronic conditions under section 2703 of the federal affordable care act. The total state match for enrollees who are dually-eligible for both medicare and medicaid and not enrolled in managed care shall be no more than the net savings to the state from the enhanced match rate for its medicaid-only managed care enrollees under section 2703.

(39) The health care authority shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The health care authority may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the health care authority receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(40) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for primary care services provided by naturopathic physicians.

(41) Within amounts appropriated, the health care authority shall conduct a review of its management and staffing structure to identify efficiencies and opportunities to reduce full time equivalent employees and other administrative costs. A report summarizing the review and the authority's recommendations to reduce costs and full time equivalent employees must be submitted to the governor and legislature by November 1, 2013.

(42) (($16,580,000)) $10,871,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation and (($3,409,000)) $9,244,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to support the operations of the Washington health benefit exchange from January 1, 2015, to June 30, 2015. The Washington state health insurance pool administrator shall transfer $20,838,000 of pool contributions to the treasurer for deposit into the health benefit exchange account in calendar year 2014. The receipt and use of medicaid funds provided to the health benefit exchange from the health care authority are subject to compliance with state and federal regulations and policies governing the Washington apple health programs, including timely and proper application, eligibility, and enrollment procedures. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $321,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation and $688,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for print services and postage for modified adjusted gross income medicaid eligibility correspondence sent from the health benefit exchange.

(43) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall continue to provide coverage after December 31, 2013, for pregnant teens that qualify under existing pregnancy medical programs, but whose eligibility for pregnancy related services would otherwise end due to the application of the new modified adjusted gross income eligibility standard.

(44) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to restore medicaid coverage under the breast and cervical cancer treatment program.

(45) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $40,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to create a new position to provide adequate oversight and assistance to managed care organizations, rural health clinics, and federally qualified health centers under a new administratively streamlined payment methodology. Effective July 1, 2013, or upon obtaining any necessary federal approval, but in no case during the first quarter of a calendar year, the authority shall implement an administratively streamlined payment methodology for federally qualified health centers and rural health clinics. The authority's payments to managed care organizations shall include the full encounter payment comprised of both the standard and enhancement payments for federally qualified health centers and rural health clinics as defined in the medicaid state plan and in accordance with section 1902(bb) of the social security act (42 U.S.C. 1396a(bb)). At no time will a managed care organization be at risk for or have any claim to the supplemental payment portion of the rate which will be reconciled to ensure accurate payment and full pass through of the obligated funds. For any services eligible for encounter payments, as defined in the medicaid state plan, managed care organizations shall be required to pay at least the full published encounter rates directly to each clinic or center, and payments will be reconciled on at least an annual basis between the managed care organization and the authority, with final review and approval by the authority. At the option of any clinic, the enhancement payment can be received from the managed care organization on a per member per month basis for all assigned managed care enrollees in an amount prescribed by the authority. Nothing in this section is intended to disrupt mutually agreeable contractual arrangements between managed care organizations and clinics that impact how the standard payment for services is paid. The authority will require participating managed care organizations to reimburse federally qualified health centers and rural health clinics for clean claims in strict adherence to the timeliness of payment standards established under contract and specified for the medicaid fee-for-service program in section 1902(a)(37) of the social security act (42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)(37)), 42 C.F.R. Sec. 447.46, and specified for health carriers in WAC 284-43-321. The authority shall exercise all necessary options under its existing sanctions policy to enforce timely payment of claims. The authority shall ensure necessary staff and resources are identified to actively monitor and enforce the timeliness and accuracy of payments to federally qualified health centers and rural health clinics. By January 1, 2014, and after collaboration with federally qualified health centers, rural health clinics, managed care plans, and the centers for medicare and medicaid services, the authority will produce a report that provides options for a new payment methodology that rewards innovation and outcomes over volume of services delivered, and which maintains the integrity of the rural health clinic and federally qualified health center programs as outlined under federal law. The report will detail necessary federal authority for implementation and provide the benefits and drawbacks of each option.

(46) $3,605,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely to proportionally reduce the amounts that rural health clinics owe the state under the calendar year 2009 recoupment.

(47) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to remove the mental health visit limit and to provide the shingles vaccine and screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment benefits that are available in the medicaid alternative benefit plan in the current medicaid benefit plan beginning January 1, 2014.

(48) The appropriations in this section reflect savings and efficiencies achieved by modifying dispensing methods of contraceptive drugs. The authority must make arrangements for all medicaid programs offered through managed care plans or fee-for-service programs to require dispensing of contraceptive drugs with a one-year supply provided at one time unless a patient requests a smaller supply or the prescribing physician instructs that the patient must receive a smaller supply. Contracts with managed care plans must allow on-site dispensing of the prescribed contraceptive drugs at family planning clinics. Dispensing practices must follow clinical guidelines for appropriate prescribing and dispensing to ensure the health of the patient while maximizing access to effective contraceptive drugs.

(49)(a) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $75,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for preparing options with an expert consultant for possible implementation of a targeted premium assistance program and possible implementation of the federal basic health option. $75,000 of the amounts appropriated in this subsection is provided solely for the development of options related to the targeted premium assistance program. The authority shall develop options for a waiver request to the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services to implement a targeted premium assistance program for the expansion adults, identified in section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of the social security act, with incomes above one hundred percent of the federal poverty level, and for children covered in the children's health insurance program with incomes above two hundred percent of the federal poverty level, with a goal of providing seamless coverage through the health benefit exchange and improving opportunities for families to be covered in the same health plans. The options must include the possibility of applying premiums for individuals and cost-sharing that may exceed the five percent of family income cap under federal law, and the options must include recommendations to make the targeted premium assistance program cost neutral. The authority shall submit a report on the options to the legislature and the governor by January 1, 2014. The authority is encouraged to be creative, use subject matter experts, and exhaust all possible options to achieve cost neutrality. The report shall also include a detailed plan and timeline. $75,000 of the amounts appropriated in this subsection is provided solely for the development of options related to the federal basic health option. The authority shall prepare options for implementing the federal basic health option as federal guidance becomes available. The authority shall submit a report on the options to the legislature and the governor by January 1, 2014, or ninety days following the release of federal guidance. The report must include a comparison of the premiums and cost-sharing under the federal basic health option with the premium assistance options described in this subsection, options for implementing the federal basic health option in combination with a premium assistance program, a detailed fiscal analysis for each coverage approach, including the estimated costs for system design and implementation, and information about impacted populations.

(b) Where possible, the authority shall leverage the same expert consultants to review each proposal and compare and contrast the approaches to ensure seamless coordination with the health benefit exchange.

(c) The authority shall collaborate with the joint select committee on health care oversight in the development of these options.

(50) $171,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 and $145,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6312 (mental health, chemical dependency) and Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2315 (suicide prevention). If Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6312 (mental health, chemical dependency) is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(51) $604,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $597,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $18,320,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2572 (health care purchasing, delivery). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(52) $306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 and $306,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2310 (provider safety equipment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(53) $390,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 and $3,510,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for medicaid clients to select the medicaid managed care organization of their choice within the Washington healthplanfinder online marketplace.

(54) $561,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, $2,000 of the general fund—local appropriation, and $693,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to add autism screenings for children age eighteen months beginning July 1, 2014.

(55) By December 1, 2014, the authority shall report to the legislative fiscal committees with options for reducing payments to hospital owned physician practices or clinics that are higher than the maximum resource based relative value scale fee rates received by nonhospital owned physician practices or clinics for the same procedures. The authority shall include options for exempting certain hospital owned clinics from the reductions and the fiscal impacts of those options. The authority shall not enter into or renew any contracts under RCW 74.60.160 that would restrict the authority's ability to implement any of these options in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

(56) The appropriations to the authority in this act shall be expended for the purposes and in the amounts specified in this act. To the extent that appropriations in this section are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions, the authority, after May 1, ((2014)) 2015, may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year ((2014)) 2015 that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The authority shall not transfer funds, and the director of financial management shall not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

Sec. 1214. 2014 c 221 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$2,059,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($2,027,000))

﻿ $2,024,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,171,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($6,257,000))

﻿ $6,254,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $218,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided for additional financial resources from the U.S. department of housing and urban development for the investigation of discrimination cases involving service animals.

Sec. 1215. 2014 c 221 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$14,535,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($14,062,000))

﻿ $15,093,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($4,380,000))

﻿ $5,134,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation. . . .$148,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$460,000

24/7 Sobriety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$10,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$8,597,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($42,182,000))

﻿ $43,977,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, are provided to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW 9A.44.130.

(2) (($408,000)) $429,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely to purchase ammunition for the basic law enforcement academy. Jurisdictions shall reimburse to the criminal justice training commission the costs of ammunition, based on the average cost of ammunition per cadet, for cadets that they enroll in the basic law enforcement academy.

(3) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.

(4) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a school safety program. The commission, in collaboration with the school safety center advisory committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school administrators and school safety personnel hired after the effective date of this section.

(5) $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the school safety center within the commission. The safety center shall act as an information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a school district in Washington or in another state, coordinate activities relating to school safety, and review and approve manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training. Through an interagency agreement, the commission shall provide funding for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to continue to develop and maintain a school safety information web site. The school safety center advisory committee shall develop and revise the training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all school safety personnel. The commission shall provide research-related programs in school safety and security issues beneficial to both law enforcement and schools.

(6) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the costs of providing statewide advanced driving training with the use of a driving simulator.

(7) $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for crisis intervention training for peace officers. The commission shall incorporate eight hours of crisis intervention curriculum into its basic law enforcement academy and shall offer an eight-hour in-service crisis intervention training course.

(8) (($35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for a study to collect data on the number of reserve officers statewide. By December 31, 2014, the commission shall report to the legislature on the number of reserve peace officers who are employed at each local law enforcement agency in Washington.

(9))) $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the commission to design and initiate, in partnership with Seattle university criminal justice department, the first year of a five-year study to research the effectiveness of its crisis intervention training. By November 1, 2014, the commission shall provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature that sets forth the proposed benchmarks and outcomes to be evaluated by the study. The commission shall provide an annual report of its evaluation to date by June 30th of each fiscal year during the study.

Sec. 1216. 2014 c 221 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$17,216,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($17,663,000))

﻿ $17,553,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$11,876,000

Asbestos Account—State Appropriation. . . .$363,000

Electrical License Account—State Appropriation. . . .$40,072,000

Farm Labor Contractor Account—State Appropriation. . . .$28,000

Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$897,000

Public Works Administration Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$7,202,000

Manufactured Home Installation Training Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$350,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation. . . .$257,709,000

Accident Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$13,626,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation. . . .$277,845,000

Medical Aid Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$3,186,000

Plumbing Certificate Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,734,000

Pressure Systems Safety Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$4,170,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($653,937,000))

﻿ $653,827,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase elevator fees by up to 13.1 percent during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. This increase is necessary to support expenditures authorized in this section, consistent with chapter 70.87 RCW.

(2) $1,336,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5362 (workers' compensation/vocational rehabilitation). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) $279,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation, $4,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation, and $4,000 of the accident account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1420 (transportation improvement projects). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) $94,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $17,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5123 (farm internship program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) $210,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation and $630,000 of the accident account—state appropriation are provided solely for the contract costs and one staff position at the department for the purpose of implementing the logging safety initiative in an effort to reduce the frequency and severity of injuries in manual, or nonmechanized, logging. The department shall reduce $840,000 of workers compensation funding used for the safety and health investment project to maintain cost neutrality. Additional costs for the implementation of the logging safety initiative shall be accomplished by the department within existing resources to include the assignment of two full-time auditors specifically for this purpose. The department is directed to include $420,000 of these costs in its calculation of workers' compensation premiums for the forest products industry for 2014, 2015, and 2016 rates. The department shall report to the legislature by December 31, 2014, an approach for using a third party safety certification vendor, accomplishments of the taskforce, accomplishments on this effort to-date, and future plans. The report must identify options for future funding and make recommendations for permanent funding for this program.

(6) $132,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $130,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5360 (unpaid wages collection). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 1217. 2014 c 221 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) HEADQUARTERS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$1,995,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($1,878,000))

﻿ $1,864,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory﻿

Institutions Account—State Appropriation. . . .$10,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($3,883,000))

﻿ $3,869,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$5,348,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($5,305,000))

﻿ $5,278,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$3,442,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$4,523,000

Veteran Estate Management Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,098,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($19,716,000))

﻿ $19,689,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to provide crisis and emergency relief and education, training, and employment assistance to veterans and their families in their communities through the veterans innovation program.

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$239,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($156,000))

﻿ $155,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$69,188,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$25,447,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($95,030,000))

﻿ $95,029,000

Sec. 1218. 2014 c 221 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$59,915,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($62,889,000))

﻿ $60,402,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($534,989,000))

﻿ $540,482,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$139,011,000

Hospital Data Collection Account—State Appropriation. . . .$221,000

Health Professions Account—State Appropriation. . . .$105,228,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation. . . .$604,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems﻿

Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$11,194,000

Safe Drinking Water Account—State Appropriation. . . .$5,233,000

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$14,697,000

Waterworks Operator Certification—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,554,000

Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$336,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation. . . .$158,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,323,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,913,000

Medical Test Site Licensure Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$4,722,000

Youth Tobacco Prevention Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,512,000

Public Health Supplemental Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,236,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation. . . .$302,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation. . . .$50,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$987,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($952,074,000))

﻿ $955,081,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(((b) The joint administrative rules review committee shall review the new or amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities under (a) of this subsection. The review committee shall determine whether (i) the rules are within the intent of the legislature as expressed by the statute that the rule implements, (ii) the rule has been adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions of law, or (iii) that the agency is using a policy or interpretive statement in place of a rule. The rules review committee shall report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature the results of committee's review and any recommendations that the committee deems advisable.))

(2) In accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to establish and raise fees in fiscal year 2014 as necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section. This authorization applies to fees required for newborn screening, and fees associated with the following professions: Agency affiliated counselors; certified counselors; and certified advisors.

(3) $150,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely to provide water filtration systems for low-income households with individuals at high public health risk from nitrate-contaminated wells in the lower Yakima basin.

(4)(a) $64,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to integrate the prescription monitoring program into the coordinated care electronic tracking program developed in response to section 213, chapter 7, Laws of 2012, 2nd sp. sess., commonly referred to as the seven best practices in emergency medicine.

(b) The integration must provide prescription monitoring program data to emergency department personnel when the patient registers in the emergency department. Such exchange may be a private or public joint venture, including the use of the state health information exchange.

(c) As part of the integration, the department shall request insurers and third-party administrators that provide coverage to residents of Washington state to provide the following to the coordinated care electronic tracking program:

(i) Any available information regarding the assigned primary care provider, and the primary care provider's telephone and fax numbers. This information is to be used for real-time communication to an emergency department provider when caring for a patient; and

(ii) Information regarding any available care plans or treatment plans for patients with higher utilization of services on a regular basis. This information is to be provided to the treating provider.

(5) $180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington autism alliance to assist autistic individuals and families with autistic children during the transition to federal health reform.

(6) $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the department to convene a work group to study and recommend language for standardized clinical affiliation agreements for clinical placements associated with the education and training of physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, osteopathic physicians and surgeons licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, and nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW. The work group shall develop one recommended standardized clinical affiliation agreement for each profession or one recommended standardized clinical affiliation agreement for all three professions.

(a) When choosing members of the work group, the department shall consult with the health care personnel shortage task force and shall attempt to ensure that the membership of the work group is geographically diverse. The work group must, at a minimum, include representatives of the following:

(i) Two-year institutions of higher education;

(ii) Four-year institutions of higher education;

(iii) The University of Washington medical school;

(iv) The college of osteopathic medicine at the Pacific Northwest University of Health Sciences;

(v) The health care personnel shortage task force;

(vi) Statewide organizations representing hospitals and other facilities that accept clinical placements;

(vii) A statewide organization representing physicians;

(viii) A statewide organization representing osteopathic physicians and surgeons;

(ix) A statewide organization representing nurses;

(x) A labor organization representing nurses; and

(xi) Any other groups deemed appropriate by the department in consultation with the health care personnel shortage task force.

(b) The work group shall report its findings to the governor and the appropriate standing committees of the legislature no later than November 15, 2014.

(7) $65,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $65,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are for the midwifery licensure and regulatory program to supplement revenue from fees. The department shall charge no more than five hundred twenty-five dollars annually for new or renewed licenses for the midwifery program.

(8) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, each person subject to RCW 43.70.110(3)(c) is required to pay only one surcharge of up to twenty-five dollars annually for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112, regardless of how many professional licenses the person holds.

(9) $654,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5206 (health sciences library). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $35,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1003 (health professions licensees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $10,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1270 (board of denturists). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $10,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1271 (denturism). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $11,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1330 (dental hygienists, assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $34,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1376 (suicide assessment training). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) $10,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1515 (medical assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16) $2,185,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1518 (disciplinary authorities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $141,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1525 (birth certificates). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $220,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1534 (impaired dentist program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $51,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1609 (board of pharmacy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $12,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1629 (home care aide continuing education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $18,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1737 (physician assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22) $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $38,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to develop a report on state efforts to prevent and control diabetes. The department, the health care authority, and the department of social and health services shall submit a coordinated report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2014, on the following:

(a) The financial impacts and reach that diabetes of all types and undiagnosed gestational diabetes are having on the programs administered by each agency and individuals, including children with mothers with undiagnosed gestational diabetes, enrolled in those programs. Items in this assessment must include: (i) The number of lives with diabetes and undiagnosed gestational diabetes impacted or covered by the programs administered by each agency; (ii) the number of lives with diabetes, or at risk for diabetes, and family members impacted by prevention and diabetes control programs implemented by each agency; (iii) the financial toll or impact diabetes and its complications, and undiagnosed gestational diabetes and the complications experienced during labor to children of mothers with gestational diabetes places on these programs in comparison to other chronic diseases and conditions; and (iv) the financial toll or impact diabetes and its complications, and diagnosed gestational diabetes and the complications experienced during labor to children of mothers with gestational diabetes places on these programs;

(b) An assessment of the benefits of implemented and existing programs and activities aimed at controlling all types of diabetes and preventing the disease. This assessment must also document the amount and source for any funding directed to each agency for the programs and activities aimed at reaching those with diabetes of all types;

(c) A description of the level of coordination existing between the agencies on activities, programmatic activities, and messaging on managing, treating, or preventing all types of diabetes and its complications;

(d) The development or revision of detailed policy-related action plans and budget recommendations for battling diabetes and undiagnosed gestational diabetes that includes a range of actionable items for consideration by the legislature. The plans and budget recommendations must identify proposed action steps to reduce the impact of diabetes, prediabetes, related diabetes complications, and undiagnosed gestational diabetes. The plans and budget recommendations must also identify expected outcomes of the action steps proposed in the following biennium while also establishing benchmarks for controlling and preventing all types of diabetes; and

(e) An estimate of savings, efficiencies, costs, and budgetary savings and resources required to implement the plans and budget recommendations identified in (d) of this subsection (23).

(23) Within the general fund—state amounts appropriated in this section, the department of health will develop and administer the certified home care aide examination translated into at least seven languages in addition to the languages in which the examination is available on the effective date of this act. The purpose of offering the examination in additional languages is to encourage an adequate supply of certified home care aides to meet diverse long-term care client needs.

(24)(a) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the department of health to support Washington's healthiest next generation efforts by partnering with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, department of early learning, and other public and private partners as appropriate to do the following:

(i) Expand programs across Washington that have demonstrated success in increasing physical activity and access to healthy food and drinking water;

(ii) Provide toolkits and mentoring for early learning and school professionals with strategies to encourage children to be active, eat healthy food, and have access to drinking water;

(iii) Enhance performance standards for the early childhood education and assistance program to include best practices on healthy eating and physical activity, nutrition education activities in written curriculum plans, and the incorporation of healthy eating, physical activity, and screen time education into parent education;

(iv) Revise statewide guidelines for schools for quality health and fitness education; and

(v) Establish performance metrics.

(b) The department shall collaborate with the governor or the governor's designee, chairs or designees of the appropriate legislative committees, the state agencies listed in (a) of this subsection, other necessary state or local agencies and private businesses, and community organizations or individuals with expertise in child health, nutrition, and fitness to submit reports to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2014, and June 30, 2015, that include:

(i) An update and a summary of the current and expected impacts of the activities listed in (a) of this subsection;

(ii) An identification and description of other programs designed to prevent childhood obesity, including programs with a focus on reducing child-related health disparities in specific population groups and programs for preventing and stopping tobacco and substance use; and

(iii) An analysis and identification of potential programs, policy, and funding recommendations for consideration by the legislature.

(25) $68,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2160 (physical therapists). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26) $251,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2315 (suicide prevention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(27)(a) Within the appropriations provided in this section, the department shall update its hepatitis C strategic plan for the state to include recommended actions pertaining to, at a minimum:

(i) Using prevalence data to determine the number of undiagnosed hepatitis C patients in the state;

(ii) How to best reach undiagnosed patients, with special consideration to people born between 1945 and 1965, and new infections;

(iii) The status of the more than sixty thousand state residents who have already been diagnosed with hepatitis C;

(iv) A framework for improving hepatitis C testing and linkage to medical care; and

(v) A framework for the prevention of hepatitis C.

(b) The department of health shall present its updated strategic hepatitis C plan to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 15, 2014.

(28) Moneys appropriated in this section are sufficient to maintain and operate the marine biotoxin information hotline and the department shall not suspend or reduce its operation.

(29) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for tobacco, marijuana, and e-cigarette prevention activities that serve youth and populations with a high incidence of smoking. For activities that serve youth, the department must partner with the office of the superintendent of public instruction to fund effective tobacco, marijuana, and e-cigarette prevention programs at middle and high schools. For activities that serve populations with a high incidence of smoking, the department must contract with community based organizations that serve populations that have a high incidence of smoking tobacco, marijuana, or e-cigarettes. The legislature intends to fund tobacco and e-cigarette prevention programs in future biennia based on the Washington state institute for public policy report in section 609 of this act. The department shall work with the institute and shall develop a budget request for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium based on the institute's report.

Sec. 1219. 2014 c 221 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

The appropriations to the department of corrections in this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this section. However, after May 1, ((2014)) 2015, after approval by the director of financial management and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year ((2014)) 2015 between programs. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any deviations from appropriation levels. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$56,330,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($54,430,000))

﻿ $53,972,000

Data Processing Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,249,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($112,009,000))

﻿ $111,551,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the support of a statewide council on mentally ill offenders that includes as its members representatives of community-based mental health treatment programs, current or former judicial officers, and directors and commanders of city and county jails and state prison facilities. The council will investigate and promote cost-effective approaches to meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental disorders who have a history of offending or who are at-risk of offending, including their mental health, physiological, housing, employment, and job training needs.

(b) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the department to contract with a consultant who can facilitate and provide project expertise on the implementation of community and prison based offender programming that follows the risk-needs-responsivity model.

(i) By September 1, 2013, the department shall provide to the consultant an inventory of all existing programming both in prisons and in community operations. The department shall consult with the Washington state institute for public policy (WSIPP) to determine whether programs are evidence-based or research-based using definitions provided by WSIPP and shall include this information on the inventory.

(ii) By March 1, 2014, the consultant shall report to the department, the office of financial management, and legislative fiscal committees on the department's current plans and processes for managing offender programming including processes for phasing-out ineffective programs and implementing evidence-based or research-based programs. All department programs should be considered by the consultant regardless of whether they are included on the most recent list of WSIPP approved identifiable evidence-based practices in (b)(i) of this subsection.

(iii) The WSIPP, in consultation with the department, shall systematically review selected programs to determine the effectiveness of these programs at reducing recidivism or other outcomes. The WSIPP shall conduct a benefit-cost analysis of these programs when feasible and shall report to the legislature by December 1, 2013.

(iv) Based on the report provided by the consultant and the WSIPP review of programs, the department shall work collaboratively with the consultant to develop and complete a written comprehensive implementation plan by June 30, 2014. The implementation plan must clearly identify the types of programs to be included, the recommended locations where the programs will be sited, an implementation timeline, and a phasing of the projected number of participants needed to meet the threshold of available program funds.

(v) Using the written implementation plan as a guide, the department must have programs in place and fully phased-in no later than January 1, 2016.

(vi) The department shall hold the consultant on retainer to assist the department as needed throughout the implementation process. The consultant shall review quarterly the actual implementation compared to the written implementation plan and shall provide a report to the secretary of the department. The department shall provide reports to the office of financial management and legislative fiscal committees as follows:

(A) The written comprehensive implementation plan shall be provided by July 15, 2014; and

(B) Written progress updates shall be provided by December 1, 2014, and by June 1, 2015.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$594,207,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($594,052,000))

﻿ $599,834,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($3,356,000))

﻿ $2,816,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$7,582,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$105,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$390,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,199,692,000))

﻿ $1,204,934,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, when contracts are established or renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and (ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare betterment account.

(b) $501,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $501,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the institution formerly known as the maple lane school in Rochester. The department may not house incarcerated offenders at the maple lane site until specifically directed to do so by the legislature.

(c) ((By March 31, 2014, the department of corrections shall provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature that evaluates the department's inmate intake processes and expenditures and makes recommendations for improvements. The evaluation must include an analysis of lean management processes that, if adopted, could improve the efficiency and cost effectiveness of inmate intake.

(d) By December 1, 2013, the department of corrections shall provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature that evaluates the department's use of partial confinement and work release programs and makes recommendations for improving public safety and decreasing recidivism through increasing participation in partial confinement re-entry and work release programs. In making its recommendations, the department shall identify:

(i) Options for increasing the capacity of work release beds to meet the number of eligible offenders;

(ii) Potential cost savings to the state through contracting for or building new work release capacity;

(iii) Options for expanding eligibility for partial confinement, including creation of a structured re-entry program that includes stable housing, mandatory participation in evidence-based programs, and intensive supervision; and

(iv) Potential cost savings to the state from creation of a structured re-entry program.

(e) By December 1, 2013, the department of corrections shall provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature that evaluates the department's community parenting alternative program, and makes recommendations for increasing participation in the program with the goals of increasing public safety and decreasing recidivism. The evaluation shall include recommendations for increasing the placement of eligible offenders into the program and increasing eligibility to other populations. In making its recommendations, the department shall identify the percent of the eligible population currently entering the program, outcomes to-date for program participants, and potential cost savings from increasing placement of offenders into the program.

(f))) The department of corrections shall contract with local and tribal governments for the provision of jail capacity to house offenders who violate the terms of their community supervision. A contract shall not have a cost of incarceration in excess of $85 per day per offender. A contract shall not have a year-to-year increase in excess of three percent per year. The contracts may include rates for the medical care of offenders which exceed the daily cost of incarceration and the limitation on year-to-year increase, provided that medical payments conform to the department's offender health plan, pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are preapproved by department utilization management staff.

(((g))) (d)(i) The legislature finds that it has taken several steps to mitigate the demand for prison capacity including funding evidence-based programming for offenders which is proven to reduce recidivism, funding evidence-based treatment alternatives to incarceration for drug-addicted offenders, standardizing inconsistencies in the drug sentencing grid, and authorizing the department to rent local jail beds. These steps will also assist the department's implementation of additional operational efficiencies by reducing costs related to offender intake, processing, and transportation.

(ii) Up to $1,119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and up to $1,322,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 may be used by the department to rent jail capacity for short-term offenders. In contracting for jail beds for short-term offenders, the department shall rent capacity from local and tribal governments to house offenders with an earned release date of less than one hundred twenty days remaining on his or her sentence at the time the offender would otherwise be transferred to a state correctional facility. The contracted daily costs for these offenders shall not exceed $70 per offender including medical costs.

(((h))) (e) The department of corrections shall issue a competitive solicitation by August 1, 2013, to contract with local jurisdictions for the use of inmate bed capacity in lieu of prison beds operated by the state. The department may contract for up to 300 beds statewide to the extent that it is at no net cost to the department. The department shall calculate and report the average cost per offender per day, inclusive of all services, on an annual basis for a facility that is representative of average medium or lower offender costs. The duration of the contracts may be for up to four years. The department shall not pay a rate greater than $65 per day per offender for all costs associated with the offender while in the local correctional facility to include programming and health care costs, or the equivalent of $65 per day per bed including programming and health care costs for full units. The capacity provided at local correctional facilities must be for offenders whom the department of corrections defines as medium or lower security offenders. Programming provided for inmates held in local jurisdictions is included in the rate, and details regarding the type and amount of programming, and any conditions regarding transferring offenders will be negotiated with the department as part of any contract. Local jurisdictions must provide health care to offenders that meet standards set by the department. The local jail will provide all medical care including unexpected emergent care. The department must utilize a screening process to ensure that offenders with existing extraordinary medical/mental health needs are not transferred to local jail facilities. If extraordinary medical conditions develop for an inmate while at a jail facility the jail may transfer the offender back to the department, subject to terms of the negotiated agreement. Health care costs incurred prior to transfer will be the responsibility of the jail. The department will report to legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management by November 1, 2013, to provide a status update on implementation.

(((i) The department shall convene a work group to develop health care cost containment strategies at local jail facilities. The work group shall identify cost containment strategies in place at the department and at local jail facilities, identify the costs and benefits of implementing strategies in jail health-care facilities, and make recommendations on implementing beneficial strategies. The work group shall submit a report on its findings and recommendations to the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2013. The work group shall include jail administrators, representatives from health care facilities at the local jail level and the state prisons level, and other representatives as deemed necessary.

(j))) (f) $526,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $781,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to expand the piloted risk-needs-responsivity model to include the use of cognitive behavioral therapy with evidence-based programming at two minimum security prison facilities and at the Monroe correctional complex.

(((k))) (g) $23,453,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $24,919,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for offender programming. Pursuant to section 220(1) of this act, the department shall develop and implement a written comprehensive plan for offender programming that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity model, are evidence-based, and have measurable outcomes. The department is authorized to discontinue ineffective programs and to repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities in the written plan.

(((l))) (h) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5484 (assault in the third-degree). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(m))) (i) $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1383 (stalking protection orders). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(n))) (j) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5149 (crimes against pharmacies). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(o))) (k) $24,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $24,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5669 (trafficking). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(p))) (l) $24,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $24,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5053 (vehicle prowling). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(q))) (m) $96,000 of the county criminal justice assistance—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5105 (rental vouchers for offenders). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(r))) (n) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, and $1,494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the department to contract with Yakima county for the use of female inmate bed capacity in lieu of prison beds operated by the state. The department shall rent jail beds through contracts established under (h) of this subsection to house female offenders beginning no later than May 1, 2014.

(((s))) (o) The department shall assess possible uses for the Yakima county jail facility, including but not limited to, housing for short-term offenders; housing for community supervision violators or absconders; housing for offenders with special program needs such as offenders with mental health issues; and housing for older or infirm offenders. The department shall report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2014, with findings, cost estimates, and recommendations for the use of the facility.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$148,788,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($151,715,000))

﻿ $158,506,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$298,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State. . . .$2,249,000

Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account—State. . . .$2,200,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($304,952,000))

﻿ $312,041,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $1,906,000 of the county criminal justice assistance account—state appropriation and $2,200,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract for additional residential drug offender sentencing alternative treatment slots. By December 1, 2013, the department shall provide a report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the senate on the use of the additional treatment slots.

(b) $4,186,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $6,362,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 must be expended on evidence-based programs that follow the risk-needs-responsivity model. The department is authorized to use up to ten percent of these funds as necessary to secure physical space as needed to maximize program delivery of evidence-based treatment to all high-risk, high-need offenders in community supervision. Funding may be prioritized by the department to any program recognized as evidence-based for adult offenders by the Washington state institute for public policy.

(c) $15,363,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $16,527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for offender programming. Pursuant to section 220 (1) of this act, the department shall develop and implement a written comprehensive plan for offender programming that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity model, are evidence-based, and have measurable outcomes. The department is authorized to discontinue ineffective programs and to repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities in the written plan.

(d) $107,000 of the county criminal justice—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5105 (rental vouchers for offenders). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$6,830,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($7,174,000))

﻿ $6,336,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($14,004,000))

﻿ $13,166,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $3,293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and (($3,707,000)) $3,932,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the stewardship of McNeil island. The department shall assume responsibility of all island maintenance excluding site specific maintenance operations for the special commitment center and the Pierce county secure transitional facility. The department shall as part of its industries program provide job skills to offenders while providing the minimum maintenance and preservation necessary for the state to remain in compliance with the federal deed for McNeil island. The department shall report on efficiencies and potential cost reductions to the office of financial management and legislative fiscal committees by December 15, 2013.

(b)(i) The department of social and health services shall transfer the stewardship of McNeil Island to the department of corrections industries program, effective September 1, 2013. The transferred responsibilities shall include marine operations, waste water treatment, water treatment, road maintenance, and any other general island maintenance that is not site specific to the operations of the special commitment center or the Pierce county secure community transition facility. Facility maintenance within the perimeter of the special commitment center shall remain the responsibility of the department of social and health services. Capital repairs and maintenance necessary to maintain the special commitment center on McNeil Island shall be managed by the department of social and health services. The legislature directs both departments to enter into an interagency agreement by August 1, 2013. The office of financial management shall oversee the negotiations of the interagency agreement. The interagency agreement must describe equipment that will transfer between the departments, warehouse space that will be shared by the departments, and occupancy requirements for any shops outside the perimeter of the special commitment center. The office of financial management will make the final determination on any disagreements between the departments on the details of the interagency agreement.

(ii) All employees of the department of social and health services engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred to the department of corrections industries program under this subsection, are transferred to the department of corrections.

(iii) All classified employees of department of social and health services assigned to the department of corrections under this subsection whose positions are within an existing bargaining unit description at the department of corrections shall become a part of the existing bargaining unit at the department of corrections and shall be considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$41,667,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($38,200,000))

﻿ $37,546,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($79,867,000))

﻿ $79,213,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital or other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do so.

Sec. 1220. 2014 c 221 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$2,225,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($2,182,000))

﻿ $2,181,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$20,937,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$60,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($25,404,000))

﻿ $25,403,000

Sec. 1221. 2014 c 221 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($269,546,000))

﻿ $217,250,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$34,095,000

Unemployment Compensation Administration Account—﻿

Federal Appropriation. . . .(($330,594,000))

﻿ $308,961,000

Administrative Contingency Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$17,872,000

Employment Service Administrative Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$41,451,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($693,558,000))

﻿ $619,629,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is from amounts made available to the state by section 903(g) of the social security act (Reed act). This amount is provided solely for continuing current unemployment insurance functions and department services to employers and job seekers.

(2) (($23,585,000)) $19,880,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is from amounts made available to the state by section 903(g) of the social security act (Reed act). This amount is provided solely for the replacement of the unemployment insurance tax information system for the employment security department. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(3) $3,735,000 of the unemployment compensation account—federal appropriation is from amounts made available to the state by section 903(g) of the social security act (Reed act). This amount is provided solely for the replacement of call center technology to improve the integration of the telephone and computing systems to increase efficiency and improve customer service.

(4) $182,000 of the employment services administrative account—state appropriation is provided for costs associated with the second stage of the review and evaluation of the training benefits program as directed in section 15(2), chapter 4, Laws of 2011 (unemployment insurance program). This second stage shall be developed and conducted by the joint legislative audit and review committee and shall consist of further work on the process study and net-impact/cost-benefit analysis components of the evaluation.

(5) $240,000 of the administrative contingency account—state appropriation is provided solely for the employment security department to contract with a center for workers in King county. The amount appropriated in this subsection shall be used by the contracted center for workers to support initiatives that generate high-skill, high-wage jobs; improve workforce and training systems; improve service delivery for dislocated workers; and build alliances with community and environmental organizations.

(6) The department is prohibited from expending amounts appropriated in this section for implementation of chapter 49.86 RCW.

(7) The employment security department shall collaborate with the workforce training and education coordinating board, the state board for community and technical colleges, the economic service administration, and the local workforce development councils to coordinate a consolidated report on short-term and long-term employment and training related outcomes and funding of WorkFirst and workforce investment act Title IB workforce training programs, including but not limited to the information described in this subsection. The employment security department shall prepare a single report and submit it to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2014. Specifically:

(a) The state board for community and technical colleges and the economic services administration shall report jointly on training outcomes for WorkFirst funded programs by activity (basic education, vocational education iBest, life skills, and any other related activities that are provided for WorkFirst clients), including but not limited to:

(i) The number and percent of individuals that complete educational activities;

(ii) The number and percent of individuals employed within one quarter after program completion and their median quarterly hours and wage and median annualized earnings;

(iii) The number and percent of individuals employed within three quarters after program completion and their median quarterly hours and wage and median annualized earnings;

(iv) The number of students enrolled in certificate programs by certificate type;

(v) The number of students who accumulate at least forty-five credits and a college award; and

(vi) The amount of WorkFirst funds spent.

The report shall also include recommendations for improving student retention and completion rates and any other system improvement recommendations.

(b) The employment security department shall work with the workforce training and education coordinating board, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the local workforce development councils to map the flow of federal workforce investment act funds from initial receipt by the employment security department to final expenditure. The report must include:

(i) The total amount spent on direct training provided by the community and technical colleges from workforce investment act funds;

(ii) The total amount spent by the employment security department on direct service provision;

(iii) The number of students who enroll in certificate programs;

(iv) The number and percent of students who earn certificates; and

(v) The number and percent of students who accumulate at least forty-five credits and an industry recognized credential.

(8) (($3,809,000)) $7,514,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is from amounts made available to the state by section 903(g) of the social security act (Reed act). This amount is provided solely for the replacement of the unemployment insurance benefit system for the employment security department. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(9) $50,000 of the administrative contingency account—state appropriation is provided solely for the employment security department to convene and provide support to a work group on agricultural and agricultural labor-related issues.

(a) The goals of the work group are the following:

(i) To educate participants on relevant areas of regulation, business practices, and other labor issues of interest to the stakeholders in Washington agriculture;

(ii) To identify labor-related issues of importance to participants, including but not limited to, housing, workplace standards, and agricultural labor supply; and

(iii) To foster substantive, respectful, problem-solving oriented communication among stakeholders in and affected by the agricultural industry on the identified issues.

(b) The work group is charged with finding mutual points of interest and concern and with collaborating to find, where possible, administrative solutions to issues affecting agriculture.

(c) The work group must consist of ten members appointed by the governor with balanced and diverse representation that must include representatives from growers, agricultural industries, farmworker advocates, and labor.

(d) State agencies including the department of agriculture, the employment security department, the department of labor and industries, the department of health, and the commission on Hispanic affairs must each identify a representative to participate on the work group as an ex officio member. The work group may invite other agencies to participate as needed.

(e) The employment security department must coordinate no more than six meetings in 2014, with the final number of meetings to be determined by the work group.

(f) The work group may use a facilitator to assist the group in achieving the goals in (a) of this subsection.

(g) The employment security department must submit a report by December 1, 2014, to the office of financial management and to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature. The report must include the following:

(i) The list of work group members;

(ii) The list of issues identified by the work group; and

(iii) Any work plan, recommendations, or actions taken that have been agreed upon by the work group.

(h) Work group members are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050, 43.03.060, and 43.03.049.

(End of part)

PART XIII

NATURAL RESOURCES

Sec. 1301. 2014 c 221 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$442,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($450,000))

﻿ $445,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$31,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($875,000))

﻿ $871,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,798,000))

﻿ $1,789,000

Sec. 1302. 2014 c 221 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$25,942,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($25,065,000))

﻿ $25,074,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$102,926,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$16,857,000

Reclamation Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,982,000

Flood Control Assistance Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,976,000

State Emergency Water Projects Revolving﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$40,000

Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($9,689,000))

﻿ $9,714,000

State Drought Preparedness Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$204,000

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account﻿

(Water Supply Facilities)—State Appropriation. . . .$423,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($44,852,000))

﻿ $44,915,000

Aquatic Algae Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$513,000

Water Rights Tracking System Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$46,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation. . . .$553,000

Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$608,000

Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,690,000

Water Rights Processing Account—State Appropriation. . . .$135,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($125,248,000))

﻿ $125,153,000

State Toxics Control Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$976,000

Local Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,745,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($41,661,000))

﻿ $41,790,000

Underground Storage Tank Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,331,000

Biosolids Permit Account—State Appropriation. . . .$2,136,000

Hazardous Waste Assistance Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($6,009,000))

﻿ $6,030,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,124,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($6,312,000))

﻿ $6,330,000

Air Operating Permit Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,137,000

Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,405,000

Oil Spill Response Account—State Appropriation. . . .$7,076,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($352,000))

﻿ $474,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($1,491,000))

﻿ $2,102,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($1,021,000))

﻿ $728,000

Radioactive Mixed Waste Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($14,336,000))

﻿ $14,346,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($456,861,000))

﻿ $457,481,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(2) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase the following fees as necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section: Wastewater discharge permit, not more than 4.55 percent in fiscal year 2014 and 4.63 percent in fiscal year 2015; mixed waste management service charge authorized in RCW 70.105.280, not more than 1.82 percent in fiscal year 2014 and 0.62 percent in fiscal year 2015; and reasonably available control technology fee.

(3) $1,981,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is for the department to provide training regarding the benefits of low-impact development including, but not limited to, when the use of low-impact development is appropriate and feasible, and the design, installation, maintenance, and best practices of low-impact development. The department will consult with Washington State University extension low-impact development technical center and others in the development of the low-impact technical training. As appropriate, the department may contract with the Washington State University extension low-impact development technical center, private sector vendors, associations, and others to deliver the technical training. The training must be provided free of cost to phase I and phase II permittees and the private development community including builders, engineers, and other industry professionals. The training must be sequenced geographically and provided in time for local jurisdictions to comply with RCW 90.48.260 and 36.70A.130(5). By August 1, 2013, the department of ecology shall provide the governor and appropriate legislative committees a plan for how low-impact development training funds will be spent during fiscal years 2014 through 2017.

(4) (($440,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for administering the water pollution control facilities financial assistance program authorized in chapter 90.50A RCW.

(5))) $350,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Spokane river regional toxics task force to support their efforts to address elevated levels of polychlorinated biphenyls in the Spokane river. Funding will be used to determine the extent of the cleanup required, implement cleanup actions to meet applicable water quality standards, and prevent recontamination.

(((6))) (5) $516,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to support an ultrafine particulate study to determine how, if at all, the biomass cogeneration facilities in Port Townsend and Port Angeles may impact air quality and the health of citizens in the region.

(((7))) (6) $65,000 of the water quality permit account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1245 (derelict and abandoned vessels). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((8))) (7) $40,000 of the environmental legacy stewardship account—state appropriation is provided solely for the middle snake river watershed, WRIA 35 planning unit in implementing its watershed plan in collaboration with the department.

(((9))) (8)(a) $14,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $14,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are for activities within the water resources program.

(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for processing water right permit applications only if the department of ecology issues at least five hundred water right decisions in fiscal year 2014, and if the department of ecology does not issue at least five hundred water right decisions in fiscal year 2014 the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse and remain unexpended. Permit decisions for the Columbia river basin count toward the five hundred water rights decisions under this subsection. The department of ecology shall submit a report to the office of financial management and the state treasurer by June 30, 2014, that documents whether five hundred water right decisions were issued in fiscal year 2014. For the purposes of this subsection, applications that are voluntarily withdrawn by an applicant do not count towards the five hundred water right decision requirement. For the purposes of water budget-neutral requests under chapter 173-539A WAC, multiple domestic connections authorized within a single water budget-neutral decision are considered one decision for the purposes of this subsection.

(((10))) (9) The department of ecology, in consultation with the office of financial management, shall prepare a facilities plan to reduce the agency's facilities obligation and the agency's cost per FTE for its facilities by 2017 to align with comparable state agencies. The plan must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees by November 1, 2013. The plan must include: (a) An inventory of all currently owned and leased buildings, consistent with the data provided through the state's facilities inventory process prescribed by the office of financial management annually by September 1st; (b) a list of facilities solutions that will reduce costs with an emphasis on consolidation, collocation, and alternative space solutions such as shared workspace and mobile work; and (c) a department-wide coordinated process and plan for regularly evaluating facility needs.

(((11))) (10) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the protection of groundwater aquifers that are the sole drinking water source as prescribed in RCW 90.54.140 specifically for the protection of artesian groundwater aquifers in a county with a population greater than one million five hundred thousand that are being detrimentally impacted by development. If the amount provided in this subsection is not sufficient for this purpose, the department must use existing funds to implement this subsection.

(((12))) (11) $50,000 of the environmental legacy stewardship account—state appropriation is provided solely to fund the Bertrand watershed improvement district's development of a conceptual groundwater model for water right permitting and mitigation efforts in the Lynden, Everson, Nooksack, and Sumas (LENS) aquifer study area. The conceptual groundwater model shall be developed in cooperation with the WRIA 1 watershed planning joint board.

(((13))) (12) Within the environmental legacy stewardship account—state appropriation in this section, the department must use a portion of the funds to:

(a) Review tetrabromobisphenol A, chemical abstracts service number 79-94-7 and antimony, chemical abstracts service number 7440-36-0 and their use in children's products and furniture as flame retardants. The department must consider available information on the hazards, uses, exposures, potential health and environmental concerns, safer alternatives, existing regulatory programs, and information from other governments or authoritative bodies. By December 31, 2014, the department must provide to the appropriate committees of the legislature a summary of the data reviewed and recommendations on whether to ban or restrict antimony and tetrabromobisphenol A flame retardants in children's products and furniture; and

(b) Test for the presence of flame retardants in children's products and furniture. By December 31, 2014, the department must report to the appropriate legislative committees on test results, available information on hazards, uses, exposures, safer alternatives, existing regulatory programs, potential health and environmental concerns, information from other governmental or authoritative bodies, and recommendations on whether to restrict or ban the flame retardants in children's products and furniture.

(((14))) (13) $300,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a study of oil shipment through the state. The purpose of the study is to assess public health and safety as well as environmental impacts associated with oil transport. The study must provide data and analysis of statewide risks, gaps, and options for increasing public safety and improving spill prevention and response readiness. The department shall conduct the study in consultation with the department of transportation, the emergency management division of the military department, the utilities and transportation commission, tribes, appropriate local, state, and federal agencies, impacted industry groups, and stakeholders. The department must provide an update to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2014, and a final report by March 1, 2015.

Sec. 1303. 2014 c 221 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$4,271,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($4,415,000))

﻿ $4,392,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$6,001,000

Winter Recreation Program Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,463,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$214,000

Snowmobile Account—State Appropriation. . . .$4,856,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation. . . .$363,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$105,159,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$300,000

Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$1,700,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($129,742,000))

﻿ $129,719,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of the Northwest weather and avalanche center.

(2) Prior to closing any state park, the commission must notify all affected local governments and relevant nonprofit organizations of the intended closure and provide an opportunity for the notified local governments and nonprofit organizations to elect to acquire, or enter into, a maintenance and operating contract with the commission that would allow the park to remain open.

(3) The commission shall prepare a report on its efforts to increase revenue from all sources, including the discover pass. The report shall also include a status update on the fiscal health of the state parks system, and shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 28, 2013.

(4) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2192 (state agency permitting). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1304. 2014 c 221 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$833,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($903,000))

﻿ $901,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$3,411,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$124,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation. . . .$480,000

Park Land Trust Revolving Account—State Appropriation. . . .$34,000

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation. . . .$33,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$33,000

Firearms Range Account—State Appropriation. . . .$37,000

Recreation Resources Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,153,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation. . . .$961,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($10,002,000))

﻿ $10,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $34,000 of the park land trust revolving fund—state appropriation, $33,000 of the state parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation, and $33,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation are provided solely for the recreation and conservation office to contract with a consultant to provide a study that quantifies the economic contribution to the state economy from the state's public lands and that quantifies the economic contribution from statewide outdoor recreation to the state's economy. A report is due to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2015.

Sec. 1305. 2014 c 221 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$2,210,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($2,151,000))

﻿ $2,029,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,361,000))

﻿ $4,239,000

Sec. 1306. 2014 c 221 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$6,819,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($6,708,000))

﻿ $6,670,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,301,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,050,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($16,878,000))

﻿ $16,840,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the conservation commission, in consultation with conservation districts, must submit to the office of financial management and legislative fiscal committees by December 10, 2013, a report outlining opportunities to minimize districts' overhead costs, including consolidation of conservation districts within counties in which there is more than one district. The report must include details on the anticipated future savings that could be expected from implementing these efficiencies starting on July 1, 2014.

(2) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $246,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to implement the voluntary stewardship program in Thurston and Chelan counties. These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(3) $1,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to implement the voluntary stewardship program statewide. The commission shall place the appropriation in this subsection in unallotted status, and may not allot any of these funds until the federal government has provided funding to the commission for the purpose of implementing the voluntary stewardship program.

(4) The conservation commission must evaluate the current system for the election of conservation district board supervisors and recommend improvements to ensure the highest degree of public involvement in these elections. The commission must engage with stakeholder groups and conservation districts to gather a set of options for improvement to district elections, which must include an option aligning district elections with state and local general elections. The commission must submit a report detailing the options to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 10, 2013.

(5) $50,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Whatcom agricultural district coalition to educate and inform agricultural landowners on regulatory compliance issues relating to groundwater quality issues including nitrates, fecal coliform, and pesticide contamination within WRIA 1 and to organize watershed improvement districts to implement environmental regulatory compliance strategies.

(6) The state conservation commission may provide additional funding to a conservation district if the conservation district conducts elections at such times as and consistent with the general election law, chapter 29A.04 RCW.

Sec. 1307. 2014 c 221 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$30,747,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($30,094,000))

﻿ $30,178,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($107,198,000))

﻿ $115,147,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($58,359,000))

﻿ $58,322,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$390,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($15,873,000))

﻿ $16,082,000

Recreational Fisheries Enhancement—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($2,603,000))

﻿ $2,609,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,224,000

Warm Water Game Fish Account—State Appropriation. . . .$2,490,000

Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$849,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$228,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$761,000

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($103,229,000))

﻿ $103,204,000

Special Wildlife Account—State Appropriation. . . .$2,399,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$500,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,440,000

Wildlife Rehabilitation Account—State Appropriation. . . .$259,000

Hydraulic Project Approval Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$966,000

Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid Recovery﻿

Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$5,001,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation. . . .$912,000

Oyster Reserve Land Account—State Appropriation. . . .$771,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($368,293,000))

﻿ $376,479,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $675,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to pay for emergency fire suppression costs. These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(2) Prior to submitting its 2015-2017 biennial operating and capital budget request related to state fish hatcheries to the office of financial management, the department shall contract with the hatchery scientific review group (HSRG) to review this request. This review shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent with HSRG recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the requests based on their contributions to protecting wild salmonid stocks and meeting the recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate whether the proposed requests are being made in the most cost effective manner. The department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the office of financial management with their agency budget proposal.

(3) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a state match to support the Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S. army corps of engineers.

(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall identify additional opportunities for partnerships in order to keep fish hatcheries operational. Such partnerships shall aim to maintain fish production and salmon recovery with less reliance on state operating funds.

(5) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the department must retain ownership and continue to occupy the downtown Olympia office building at 600 Capitol Way.

(6) $1,000,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation is provided solely to the department for resources that serve to promote and engage nonlethal deterrence methods relating to wolf and livestock interaction with a priority given to funding cooperative agreements with livestock producers, and of this amount, $250,000 in fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for compensation for injury or loss of livestock caused by wolves as prescribed in chapter 77.36 RCW.

(7) $100,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation is provided solely for the transfer of trout from the Clarks creek hatchery to the Lakewood hatchery.

(8) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the production of steelhead, coho, and Chinook salmon at the Clarks creek hatchery.

(9) $200,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation, $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the department to increase production of juvenile fall Chinook on the Cowlitz river. The funds provided may be used to match or leverage funds from private or public sources for the same purpose.

(10) $596,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $596,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for weed assessments and for payments in lieu of real property taxes to counties that elect to receive the payments for department owned game lands within the county.

(11) $10,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for development of an aquatic invasive species passport program to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of watercraft inspections by expediting aquatic invasive species watercraft inspections for watercraft at low risk of transmitting invasive species and prioritizing the use of available resources for the inspection of high risk vessels.

(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department must deploy additional wildlife conflict specialists to provide landowner assistance and address wildlife conflicts, with at least one additional specialist primarily assigned to each of the following areas: Administrative region six of the department; Okanogan and Chelan counties in administrative region two of the department; and Whatcom and Skagit counties in administrative region four of the department.

(13) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1112 (science and public policy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) Within the amounts appropriated in this section the department shall work with the regional fisheries enhancement groups to identify a revenue source or sources capable of providing long-term funding to support the community-based salmon restoration work of regional fisheries enhancement groups. The department shall work with the regional fisheries enhancement group coalition to submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2013, with the outcomes and recommendations.

(15) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely to conduct a study of the Lake Washington basin sockeye salmon to evaluate the impact of predation on juvenile sockeye by several species of fish that inhabit the lake, and develop management actions by the state to increase the returns of adult sockeye to the lake.

(16) $30,000 of the aquatic invasive species prevention account—state appropriation and $20,000 of the aquatic invasive species enforcement account—state appropriation are provided solely to the department for a contract, that includes performance measures and requires reporting on outcomes, with the Pacific northwest economic region nonprofit organization to support regional coordination of invasive species prevention activities in the Pacific northwest.

Sec. 1308. 2014 c 221 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$48,655,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($44,694,000))

﻿ $44,650,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$26,937,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$2,372,000

Forest Development Account—State Appropriation. . . .$50,418,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$4,468,000

Surveys and Maps Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,667,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,578,000

Snowmobile Account—State Appropriation. . . .$100,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,948,000

Resources Management Cost Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$116,006,000

Surface Mining Reclamation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,951,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation. . . .$5,000,000

Forest and Fish Support Account—State ﻿

Appropriation. . . .$11,755,000

Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$462,000

Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$34,000

Marine Resources Stewardship Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$4,122,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$80,000

Forest Practices Application Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,697,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$782,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation. . . .$946,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,767,000

Agricultural College Trust Management Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,699,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($336,138,000))

﻿ $336,094,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,389,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and (($1,323,000)) $1,310,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural college trust management account and are provided solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's agricultural college trust lands.

(2) $25,271,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $19,099,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $5,000,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation are provided solely for emergency fire suppression. None of the general fund and disaster response account amounts provided in this subsection may be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses. Agency indirect and administrative costs shall be allocated among the agency's remaining accounts and appropriations. The department of natural resources shall submit a quarterly report to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and planned expenditures from the disaster response account. This work shall be done in coordination with the military department.

(3) $5,000,000 of the forest and fish support account—state appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based, performance contracts with tribes to participate in the implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded may only contain indirect costs set at or below the rate in the contracting tribe's indirect cost agreement with the federal government. If federal funding for this purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $518,000 of the forest and fish support account—state appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based performance contracts with nongovernmental organizations to participate in the implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded may only contain indirect cost set at or below a rate of eighteen percent.

(5) $717,000 of the forest and fish support account—state appropriation is provided solely to fund interagency agreements with the department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife as part of the adaptive management process.

(6) $440,000 of the state general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $440,000 of the state general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for forest work crews that support correctional camps and are contingent upon continuing operations of Naselle youth camp.

(7) $2,382,000 of the resource management cost account—state appropriation is for addressing the growing backlog of expired aquatic leases and new aquatic lease applications. The department shall implement a Lean process to improve the lease review process and further reduce the backlog, and submit a report on its progress in addressing the backlog and implementation of the Lean process to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2013.

(8) $1,948,000 of the environmental legacy stewardship account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to pay a portion of the costs to complete remedial investigation work at Whitmarsh landfill and Mill site A and perform final-year maintenance of the Olympic view triangle site in Commencement Bay.

(9) $265,000 of the resources management cost account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1764 (geoduck diver licenses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $425,000 of the derelict vessel removal account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1245 (derelict and abandoned vessels). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $3,700,000 of the marine resources stewardship trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of priority marine management planning efforts including mapping activities, ecological assessment, data tools, stakeholder engagement, and all other work identified in Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5603 (marine advisory councils) during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.

(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department may purchase an extraordinary sensing device for the express purpose of firefighting and fire prevention.

Sec. 1309. 2014 c 221 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$15,270,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($15,950,000))

﻿ $15,856,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$22,979,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$192,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,827,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$5,188,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation. . . .$73,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($62,479,000))

﻿ $62,385,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,308,445 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $6,102,905 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementing the food assistance program as defined in RCW 43.23.290.

(2) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055 and 16.57.220, the department is authorized to institute livestock inspection fees in the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium for calves less than thirty days old.

(3) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055 and 16.36.150, the department is authorized to establish a fee for the sole purpose of purchasing and operating a database and any other technology or software needed to administer animal disease traceability activities for cattle sold or slaughtered in the state or transported out of the state.

(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department of agriculture must convene and facilitate a work group with appropriate stakeholders to review fees supporting programs within the department that are also supported with state general fund. In developing strategies to make the program work more self-supporting, the workgroup will consider, at minimum, the length of time since the last fee increase, similar fees that exist in neighboring states, and fee increases that will ensure reasonable competitiveness in the respective industries. The workgroup must submit a report containing recommendations that will make each of the fee supported programs within the department less reliant on state general fund to the office of financial management and legislative fiscal committees by December 1, 2013.

Sec. 1310. 2014 c 221 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($994,000))

﻿ $1,064,000

Sec. 1311. 2014 c 221 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$2,398,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($2,427,000))

﻿ $2,426,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($11,582,000))

﻿ $15,240,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,920,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$675,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($19,002,000))

﻿ $22,659,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $788,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for coordinating a study of Puget Sound juvenile steelhead marine survival conducted by the department of fish and wildlife and based on a study plan developed in cooperation with federal, tribal, and nongovernmental entities.

(2) By October 1, 2014, the Puget Sound partnership shall provide the governor a single, prioritized list of state agency 2015-2017 capital and operating budget requests related to Puget Sound restoration.

(3) $71,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the Puget Sound partnership to collaborate with interested parties to review the roles of local watershed and salmon recovery organizations implementing the action agenda and provide legislative, budgetary, and administrative recommendations to streamline and strengthen Puget Sound recovery efforts. In conducting this work, the partnership must coordinate with the following interested parties: The Hood Canal coordinating council, marine resources committees, including the Northwest straits initiative, regional fisheries enhancement groups, local integrating organizations, lead entities, and other county watershed councils, as well as representatives of federal, state, tribal, and local government agencies. Recommendations must be provided to the appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2014.

(End of part)

PART XIV

TRANSPORTATION

Sec. 1401. 2014 c 221 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$1,097,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($1,354,000))

﻿ $1,353,000

Architects' License Account—State Appropriation. . . .$898,000

Professional Engineers' Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,529,000

Real Estate Commission Account—State Appropriation. . . .$9,885,000

Uniform Commercial Code Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,132,000

Real Estate Education Program Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$276,000

Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,700,000

Business and Professions Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($17,390,000))

﻿ $17,410,000

Funeral and Cemetery Account—State Appropriation. . . .$5,000

Landscape Architects' License Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$4,000

Appraisal Management Company Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$4,000

Real Estate Research Account—State Appropriation. . . .$415,000

Wildlife Account—State Appropriation. . . .$32,000

Geologists' Account—State Appropriation. . . .$52,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation. . . .$31,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($39,804,000))

﻿ $39,823,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $566,000 of the business and professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1552 (scrap metal theft reduction). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $166,000 of the business and professions account—state appropriation in fiscal year 2014 only is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1779 (esthetics). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $592,000 of the business and professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1822 (debt collection practices). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $32,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5193 (wolf conflict management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a pilot identicard program to assist and prepare offenders for release from prison and reentry into the community. The goal of the pilot identicard program is to provide proper state identification to offenders to facilitate access to services, employment, housing, and various other opportunities upon release to the community. By September 1, 2014, the department of licensing, working in conjunction with the department of corrections, must implement the pilot identicard program in accordance with the following:

(a) The pilot program must provide an original, renewal, or replacement identicard to offenders that: (i) Prove their identity as required by RCW 46.20.035; (ii) are under the custody of the department of corrections; (iii) have been sentenced to an incarceration period exceeding one year and one day; and (iv) are incarcerated within the Monroe correctional complex and within two months of release.

(b) For purposes of verifying an offender's identity and eligibility for the program, a valid identification card issued by the department of corrections serves as sufficient proof of identity and residency for an offender to apply for and obtain a Washington state identicard.

(c) For the purposes of the pilot program, the department of licensing must (i) set an expiration date for an identicard issued under the pilot program for the first anniversary of the offender's birthdate after issuance; and (ii) not charge any fee to an applicant for an identicard issued as part of the pilot program.

(d) The department of licensing, in consultation with the department of corrections, must report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the results of the pilot identicard program and any recommendations for improvement by June 30, 2015.

Sec. 1402. 2014 c 221 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PATROL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$35,561,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($31,337,000))

﻿ $31,860,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$15,860,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$3,019,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($9,925,000))

﻿ $9,933,000

Enhanced 911 Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,480,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,310,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,340,000

Fire Service Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$131,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation. . . .$8,000,000

Fire Service Training Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($9,774,000))

﻿ $9,778,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$54,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$513,000

Fingerprint Identification Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($12,184,000))

﻿ $12,185,000

Vehicle License Fraud Account—State Appropriation. . . .$334,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($134,822,000))

﻿ $135,358,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $200,000 of the fire service training account—state appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12 construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide these services only to those districts that are located in counties without qualified review capabilities.

(2) $8,000,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964. The state patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall be done in coordination with the military department.

(3) $700,000 of the fire service training account—state appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship training program.

(4) $3,480,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for upgrades to the Washington state identification system and the Washington crime information center. Amounts provided in this subsection may not be expended until the office of the chief information officer approves a plan to move the Washington state patrol's servers and data center equipment into the state data center in the 1500 Jefferson building, and the office of the chief information officer certifies that the Washington state patrol has begun the move. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(5) $154,000 of the fingerprint identification account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1612 (firearms offenders).

(6) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for safety and security assistance to Pierce county related to hosting the United States open in June 2015.

(End of part)

PART XV

EDUCATION

Sec. 1501. 2014 c 221 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$27,273,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($26,966,000))

﻿ $26,873,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$70,931,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$4,003,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$200,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($129,373,000))

﻿ $129,280,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) A maximum of $16,996,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and (($17,401,000)) $17,308,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is for state agency operations.

(a) $8,961,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and (($8,639,000)) $8,546,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(i) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(a), the superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans civic education award.

(ii) Districts shall report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction daily student unexcused absence data by school, using a uniform definition of unexcused absence as established by the superintendent.

(iii) By September of each year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall produce an annual status report of the budget provisos in sections 501 and 513 of this act. The status report of each proviso shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: Purpose and objective, number of staff, number of contractors, status of proviso implementation, number of beneficiaries by year, list of beneficiaries, and proviso outcomes and achievements.

(iv) The superintendent of public instruction shall update the program prepared and distributed under RCW 28A.230.150 for the observation of temperance and good citizenship day to include providing an opportunity for eligible students to register to vote at school.

(b) $1,017,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,017,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for activities associated with the implementation of new school finance systems required by chapter 236, Laws of 2010 (K-12 education funding) and chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (state's education system), including technical staff, systems reprogramming, and workgroup deliberations, including the quality education council and the data governance working group.

(c)(i) $1,012,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,034,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the state board of education, including basic education assistance activities. Of these amounts, $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided for implementation of Initiative Measure No. 1240 (charter schools).

(ii) $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the purpose of implementing provisions of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6552 (student hour and graduation requirements) related to career and college ready graduation requirements. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(d) $1,325,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to the professional educator standards board for the following:

(i) $1,050,000 in fiscal year 2014 and $1,050,000 in fiscal year 2015 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional educator standards board;

(ii) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are for mentor stipends provided through the alternative routes to certification program administered by the professional educator standards board, including the pipeline for paraeducators program and the retooling to teach conditional loan programs. Funding within this subsection (1)(d)(ii) is also provided for the recruiting Washington teachers program;

(iii) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the professional educator standards board to develop educator interpreter standards and identify interpreter assessments that are available to school districts. Interpreter assessments should meet the following criteria: (A) Include both written assessment and performance assessment; (B) be offered by a national organization of professional sign language interpreters and transliterators; and (C) be designed to assess performance in more than one sign system or sign language. The board shall establish a performance standard, defining what constitutes a minimum assessment result, for each educational interpreter assessment identified. The board shall publicize the standards and assessments for school district use;

(iv) $24,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the professional educator standards board to: (A) Disseminate information about principles of language acquisition as a critical knowledge and skill for educators in support of instruction for English language learners; and (B) in conjunction with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, revise the model framework and curriculum for high school career and technical education courses related to careers in education to incorporate standards of cultural competence, new research on educator preparation, and curriculum and activities from the recruiting Washington teacher program; and

(v) $128,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6129 (paraeducator development). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(e) $133,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $266,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil rights.

(f) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the ongoing work of the education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.

(g) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on educational opportunity for military children).

(h) $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of Initiative Measure No. 1240 (charter schools).

(i) $1,826,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and research system (CEDARS).

(j) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for project citizen, a program sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and the center for civic education to promote participation in government by middle school students.

(k) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for collaborative schools for innovation and success authorized under chapter 53, Laws of 2012. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award $500,000 per year in funding for each collaborative school for innovation and success selected for participation in the pilot program during 2012.

(l) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 163, Laws of 2012 (foster care outcomes). The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually report each December on the implementation of the state's plan of cross-system collaboration to promote educational stability and improve education outcomes of foster youth.

(m) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 178, Laws of 2012 (open K-12 education resources).

(n) $93,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $93,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for chapter 185, Laws of 2011 (bullying prevention, which requires the office of the superintendent of public instruction to convene an ongoing workgroup on school bullying and harassment prevention. Within the amounts provided, $140,000 is for youth suicide prevention activities.

(o) $138,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1336 (troubled youth in school). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(p) $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1134 (state-tribal education compacts). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(q) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are for competitive grants to school districts to increase the capacity of high schools to offer AP computer science courses. In making grant allocations, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must give priority to schools and districts in rural areas, with substantial enrollment of low-income students, and that do not offer AP computer science. School districts may apply to receive either or both of the following grants:

(i) A grant to establish partnerships to support computer science professionals from private industry serving on a voluntary basis as coinstructors along with a certificated teacher, including via synchronous video, for AP computer science courses; or

(ii) A grant to purchase or upgrade technology and curriculum needed for AP computer science, as well as provide opportunities for professional development for classroom teachers to have the requisite knowledge and skills to teach AP computer science.

(r) $27,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1556 (cardiac arrest education).

(s) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for the development of recommendations for funding integrated school nursing and outreach services. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall collaborate with the health care authority to develop recommendations for increasing federal financial participation for providing nursing services in schools with the goals of integrating nursing and outreach services and supporting one nurse for every four-hundred fifty students in elementary schools and one nurse for every seven-hundred fifty students in secondary schools. The recommendations shall include proposals for funding training and reimbursement for nurses that provide outreach services to help eligible students enroll in apple health for kids and other social services programs. The authority and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide these recommendations to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2013.

(t) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with an organization to develop a model plan for evaluating the outcomes of state funded pilot education programs, including guidelines for standard data that must be gathered throughout any education pilot program, as well as guidance for data and evaluation methods depending on the design of the program and the target population. The contract must also include a provision to provide guidance for the evaluation of existing pilot programs.

(u) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to convene a committee for the selection and recognition of Washington innovative schools. The committee shall select and recognize Washington innovative schools based on the selection criteria established by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in accordance with chapter 202, Laws of 2011 (innovation schools—recognition) and chapter 260, Laws of 2011 (innovation schools and zones).

(v) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Mobius science center to expand mobile outreach of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) education to students in rural, tribal, and low-income communities.

(w) $28,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create a clearinghouse of research-based best practices for school districts to provide academic and nonacademic support for students while they are subject to disciplinary action and after their reengagement in school.

(x) $49,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, the professional educator standards board, colleges of education, and representatives from diverse communities and community-based organizations, to develop a content outline for professional development and training in cultural competence for school staff, which educational service districts and school districts are encouraged to use.

(y) $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to convene a task force to design a performance-based assistance and accountability system for the transitional bilingual instruction program. The office must submit a report with recommendations from the task force to the education and fiscal committees of the legislature by January 15, 2016.

(z) $134,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to perform on-going program reviews of alternative learning experience programs and dropout reengagement programs. The amounts provided in this subsection are sufficient for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to conduct ongoing consolidated program reviews of alternative learning experience programs and dropout reengagement programs established under chapter 20, Laws of 2010. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall include alternative learning education and dropout reengagement programs in its ongoing consolidated program reviews, as well as provide outreach and training to school districts regarding implementation of the programs. Findings from the program reviews will be used to support and prioritize the office of the superintendent of public instruction outreach and education efforts that assist school districts in implementing the programs in accordance with statute and legislative intent, as well as to support financial and performance audit work conducted by the office of the state auditor.

(aa) $287,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the purpose of implementing provisions of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6552 (student hour and graduation requirements) related to career and technical education equivalencies. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(bb) $148,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6431 (youth suicide prevention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $200,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is provided solely for a one-time workload increase to address additional audit resolutions and appeals in the alternative learning experience programs.

(3) $10,277,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $9,565,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are for statewide programs.

(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY

(i) $2,541,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $2,541,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a corps of nurses located at educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care to students, health education, and training for school staff.

(ii) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a nonviolence and leadership training program provided by the institute for community leadership.

(b) TECHNOLOGY

$1,221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.

(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS

(i) $1,875,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,875,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers scholarship program. The funds shall be used to support community involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer mentors with students selected as achievers scholars.

(ii) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for contracting with a college scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach to students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007.

(iii) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement programs, including the jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program and the building bridges statewide program. Starting in school year 2014-15, students in the foster care system or who are homeless shall be given priority by districts offering the jobs for America's graduates program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene staff representatives from high schools to meet and share best practices for dropout prevention.

(iv) $2,112,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 340, Laws of 2011 and chapter 51, Laws of 2012. This includes the development and implementation of the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills (WaKIDS).

(v) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to subsidize advanced placement exam fees and international baccalaureate class fees and exam fees for low-income students. To be eligible for the subsidy, a student must be either enrolled or eligible to participate in the federal free or reduced price lunch program, and the student must have maximized the allowable federal contribution. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall set the subsidy in an amount so that the advanced placement exam fee does not exceed $15.00 and the combined class and exam fee for the international baccalaureate does not exceed $14.50.

(vi) $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support district implementation of comprehensive guidance and planning programs consistent with RCW 28A.600.045.

Sec. 1502. 2014 c 221 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$5,386,820,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($5,599,423,000))

﻿ $5,605,692,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$381,563,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($11,367,806,000))

﻿ $11,374,075,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as provided in the funding formulas and salary schedules in sections 502 and 503 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.

(c) From July 1, 2013, to August 31, 2013, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as provided in sections 502 and 503, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess., as amended.

(d) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in September and on the first school day of each month October through June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district. Any school district concluding its basic education program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held in May in lieu of a June enrollment.

(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years are determined using formula-generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.

(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW 28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, except that the allocation for guidance counselors in a middle school shall be 1.216 for the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years and the allocation for guidance counselors in a high school shall be 2.009 for the 2013-14 school year, which enhancements are within the program of basic education. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW 28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of prototypical school on the following regular education average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection:

General education class size:

Grade

RCW 28A.150.260

2013-14

School Year

2014-15

School Year

Grades K-3

. . . .

25.23

25.23

Grade 4

. . . .

27.00

27.00

Grades 5-6

. . . .

27.00

27.00

Grades 7-8

. . . .

28.53

28.53

Grades 9-12

. . . .

28.74

28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for laboratory science, career and technical education (CTE) and skill center programs average class size as provided in RCW 28A.150.260.

(ii) For each level of prototypical school at which more than fifty percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, the superintendent shall allocate funding based on the following average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher:

(A) General education class size in high poverty schools:

Grade

RCW 28A.150.260

Grade 2

. . . .

24.10

Grade 3

. . . .

24.10

Grade 4

. . . .

27.00

Grades 5-6

. . . .

27.00

Grades 7-8

. . . .

28.53

Grades 9-12

. . . .

28.74

(B) For grades K-1, class size of 20.85 is provided for high poverty schools for the 2013-14 school year;

(C) For grades K through 1, the superintendent shall, at a minimum, allocate funding to high-poverty schools for the 2014-15 school year based on an average class size of 24.10 full-time equivalent students per teacher. The superintendent shall provide enhanced funding for class size reduction in grades K through 1 to the extent of, and proportionate to, the school's demonstrated actual average class size up to a class size of 20.30 full-time equivalent students per teacher. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules to implement the enhanced funding authorized under (ii)(C) of this subsection and shall distribute draft rules for review no later than December 1, 2013. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report the draft rules and proposed methodology to the governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2013.

(D) The enhancement in this subsection (2)(c)(ii) is within the program of basic education.

(iii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is 13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and

(iv) Advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as general education schools in the same grade; and

(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and (a) of this subsection and is considered certificated instructional staff, except as provided in (d)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following combined rate per 1000 student full-time equivalent enrollment:

2013-14 School Year

2014-15 School Year

Career and Technical Education

2.02

2.72

Skill Center

2.36

3.06

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS

(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated administrative staff salaries for the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years for general education students are determined using the formula generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in each grade. The following prototypical school values shall determine the allocation for principals, assistance principals, and other certificated building level administrators:

Prototypical School Building:

Elementary School

. . . .

1.253

Middle School

. . . .

1.353

High School

. . . .

1.880

(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated school building-level administrator staff units at per student rates that are a multiple of the general education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following factors: Career and Technical Education students. . . .1.025

Skill Center students. . . .1.198

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and adjusted based on each district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade, except that the allocation for parent involvement coordinators in an elementary school shall be 0.0825, which enhancement is within the program of basic education.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS

In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and administrative staff units are provided for the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school year for the central office administrative costs of operating a school district, at the following rates:

(a) The total central office staff units provided in this subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b), by 5.3 percent.

(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.47 percent shall be allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3) of this section.

(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students, are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in (a) of this subsection.

(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student rates that exceed the general education rate established for students in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 1.71 percent in the 2013-14 school year and 0.90 percent in the 2014-15 school year for career and technical education students, and 21.57 percent in the 2013-14 school year and 17.29 percent in the 2014-15 school year for skill center students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 18.68 percent in the 2013-14 school year and 18.68 percent in the 2014-15 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 20.95 percent in the 2013-14 school year and 20.95 percent in the 2014-15 school year for classified salary allocations provided under subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the maintenance rate specified in section 504 of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows:

(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section; and

(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections (4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS

Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC) incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.150.260.

(a) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component

2013-14

SCHOOL YEAR

2014-15

SCHOOL YEAR

Technology

$77.46

$89.13

Utilities and Insurance

$210.46

$242.17

Curriculum and Textbooks

$83.17

$95.69

Other Supplies and Library Materials

$176.56

$203.16

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated

and Classified Staff

$12.86

$14.80

Facilities Maintenance

$104.27

$119.97

Security and Central Office

$72.24

$83.12

TOTAL BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$737.02

$848.04

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,244.25 for the 2013-14 school year and $1,260.41 for the 2014-15 school year.

(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and technical education programs generate a per student MSOC allocation of $1,399.30 for the 2013-14 school year and $1,417.48 for the 2014-15 school year.

(d) Students in grades 9-12 generate per student FTE MSOC allocations in addition to the allocation provided in (a) of this subsection at the following rate:

2014-15

School Year

Technology. . . .$36.35

Curriculum and Textbooks. . . .$39.02

Other Supplies and Library Materials. . . .$82.84

Instructional Professional Development for﻿

Certificated and Classified Staff. . . .$6.04

TOTAL GRADE 9-12 BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE. . . .$164.25

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS

For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, funding for substitute costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING

(a) Amounts provided in this section from July 1, 2013, to August 31, 2013, are adjusted to reflect provisions of chapter 34, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. (allocation of funding for funding for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).

(b) Amounts provided in this section beginning September 1, 2013, are adjusted to reflect modifications to alternative learning experience courses in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5946 (student educational outcomes).

(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident students.

(11) DROPOUT REENGAGEMENT PROGRAM

The superintendent shall adopt rules to require students claimed for general apportionment funding based on enrollment in dropout reengagement programs authorized under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.115 to meet requirements for at least weekly minimum instructional contact, academic counseling, career counseling, or case management contact, starting with the 2014-15 school year. Districts must also provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the programs offered by the district or under contract with a provider, as well as accurate monthly headcount and full-time equivalent enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate enrollment counts of resident and nonresident students.

(12) VOLUNTARY FULL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS

Funding in this section is sufficient to fund voluntary full day kindergarten programs in qualifying high poverty schools, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315. Each kindergarten student who enrolls for the voluntary full-day program in a qualifying school shall count as one-half of one full-time equivalent student for purpose of making allocations under this section. Funding in this section provides full-day kindergarten programs for 43.75 percent of kindergarten enrollment in the 2013-14 school year and 43.75 percent in the 2014-15 school year, which enhancement is within the program of basic education.

(13) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND NECESSARY PLANTS

For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section on a per district basis.

(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:

(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and

(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;

(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:

(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated administrative staff unit;

(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half average annual full-time equivalent students;

(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this subsection;

(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;

(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified staff unit; and

(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under this subsection (12) shall generate additional MSOC allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC) allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental budget), adjusted annually for inflation.

(14) Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(15) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2014 and 2015 as follows:

(a) $605,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $613,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.

(b) $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for programs providing skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.

(16) $214,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for school district emergencies as certified by the superintendent of public instruction. At the close of the fiscal year the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature on the allocations provided to districts and the nature of the emergency.

(17) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463, Laws of 2007.

(18) Students participating in running start programs may be funded up to a combined maximum enrollment of 1.2 FTE including school district and institution of higher education enrollment. In calculating the combined 1.2 FTE, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may average the participating student's September through June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end dates for courses provided by the high school and higher education institution. Additionally, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the student achievement council, and the education data center, shall annually track and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of students participating in the running start program, including course load analyses at both the high school and community and technical college system.

(19) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (12) of this section, the following apply:

(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and

(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (12) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

(20)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic education and career and technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds. Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting purposes under this section.

(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported career and technical education program enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

Sec. 1503. 2014 c 221 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$365,048,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($429,312,000))

﻿ $445,371,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($794,360,000))

﻿ $810,419,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for the transportation of eligible students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192. Funding in this section for school year 2014-15 constitutes full implementation of RCW 28A.160.192, which enhancement is within the program of basic education. Students are considered eligible only if meeting the definitions provided in RCW 28A.160.160.

(b) For the 2014-15 school year, the superintendent shall allocate funding for approved and operating charter schools as provided in RCW 28A.710.220(3). Per-student allocations for pupil transportation must be calculated using the allocation for the previous school year to the school district in which the charter school is located and the number of eligible students in the district, and must be distributed to the charter school based on the number of eligible students.

(c) From July 1, 2013 to August 31, 2013, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of students as provided in section 505, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess., as amended.

(3) $558,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for pupil transportation expected cost funding formula adjustments as provided under this subsection. School districts whose efficiency rating is at least ninety-five percent and whose actual prior year costs exceed the expected cost allocations provided through the pupil transportation funding formula due to exceptional circumstances may apply to the superintendent of public instruction to receive a supplemental funding adjustments for a one-year period to offset the excess costs in whole or in part. The superintendent shall adopt criteria for review of applications, which may include exceptional issues related to geography, student demographics, or other one-time circumstances that are not otherwise addressed in the expected cost model. Differences in costs related to district philosophy, service delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for transportation adjustments. School districts that receive adjustments under this subsection are not guaranteed adjustments in future years and must reapply. Adjustments may not exceed the total appropriation provided in this subsection for fiscal year 2015. Adjustments also may not exceed the difference between the district's school year 2013-14 allocation and the district's expected cost allocation.

(4) A maximum of $892,000 of this fiscal year 2014 appropriation and a maximum of $892,000 of the fiscal year 2015 appropriation may be expended for regional transportation coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.

(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district buses on the pre-sales tax five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that school year.

(7) Funding levels in this section reflect waivers granted by the state board of education for four-day school weeks as allowed under RCW 28A.305.141.

(8) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually disburse payments for bus depreciation in August.

Sec. 1504. 2014 c 221 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$7,111,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .$7,111,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($501,326,000))

﻿ $513,326,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($515,548,000))

﻿ $527,548,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $7,111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $7,111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for state matching money for federal child nutrition programs, and may support the meals for kids program through the following allowable uses:

(a) Elimination of breakfast copays for eligible public school students and lunch copays for eligible public school students in grades kindergarten through third grade who are eligible for reduced price lunch;

(b) Assistance to school districts and authorized public and private nonprofit organizations for supporting summer food service programs, and initiating new summer food service programs in low-income areas;

(c) Reimbursements to school districts for school breakfasts served to students eligible for free and reduced price lunch, pursuant to chapter 287, Laws of 2005; and

(d) Assistance to school districts in initiating and expanding school breakfast programs.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report annually to the fiscal committees of the legislature on annual expenditures in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection.

Sec. 1505. 2014 c 221 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$693,894,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($742,343,000))

﻿ $735,931,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$476,122,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$46,151,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,958,510,000))

﻿ $1,952,098,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure that special education students as a class receive their full share of the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and 504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an appropriate education for special education students under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall provide services through the special education excess cost allocation funded in this section.

(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:

(i) Special education students are basic education students first;

(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the full basic education allocation; and

(iii) Special education students are basic education students for the entire school day.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.

(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(4)(a) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390, except that the calculation of the base allocation also includes allocations provided under section 502 for parent involvement coordinators in prototypical elementary schools as provided under section 502(4); and guidance counselors in prototypical middle and high schools as provided under section 502(2)(a), which enhancements are within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2013 to August 31, 2013, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in section 507, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess., as amended.

(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW 28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fund—state funded special education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent or 12.7 percent.

(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost services for special education students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW 28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units.

(7) $17,578,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, (($29,948,000)) $19,949,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and (($29,574,000)) $30,280,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section. If the federal safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the federal appropriation in this subsection (7) in any fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of each school year, the superintendent shall recover safety net funds that were distributed prospectively but for which districts were not subsequently eligible.

(a) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, safety net funds shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (ESHB 2261).

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school year. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from the current school year.

(8) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund—state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation and the special education program.

(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from educational service districts, and for staff development activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special education program.

(11) $252,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $252,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for two additional full-time equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to provide training and support to districts applying for safety net awards.

(12) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $100,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation shall be expended to support a special education ombudsman program within the office of superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 1506. 2014 c 221 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$8,121,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($8,124,000))

﻿ $8,105,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($16,245,000))

﻿ $16,226,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).

(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards and next generation science standards. Funding shall be distributed among the educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.

(3) The educational service districts, at the request of the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.305.130, may receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

Sec. 1507. 2014 c 221 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$311,882,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($340,444,000))

﻿ $344,905,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($652,326,000))

﻿ $656,787,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time equivalent student is 4.914 percent from the 2012-13 school year to the 2013-14 school year and 4.914 percent from the 2013-14 school year to the 2014-15 school year.

Sec. 1508. 2014 c 221 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$13,968,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($13,964,000))

﻿ $13,631,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($27,932,000))

﻿ $27,599,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund—state fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.

(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.

(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.

(5) $569,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and (($569,000)) $685,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the department of social and health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections, programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and programs for juveniles operated by city and county jails.

(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 1509. 2014 c 221 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$9,539,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($9,685,000))

﻿ $9,807,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($19,224,000))

﻿ $19,346,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c). In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i) Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the district's average staff mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act.

(b) From July 1, 2013, to August 31, 2013, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable students as provided in section 511, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess., as amended.

(3) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the centrum program at Fort Worden state park.

Sec. 1510. 2014 c 221 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$114,340,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($101,537,000))

﻿ $118,375,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($217,806,000))

﻿ $220,106,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$4,002,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,597,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($439,282,000))

﻿ $458,420,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $38,031,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, (($22,806,000)) $39,644,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and (($15,868,000)) $18,168,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of the Washington state assessment system, including: (i) Development and implementation of retake assessments for high school students who are not successful in one or more content areas and (ii) development and implementation of alternative assessments or appeals procedures to implement the certificate of academic achievement. The superintendent of public instruction shall report quarterly on the progress on development and implementation of alternative assessments or appeals procedures. Within these amounts, the superintendent of public instruction shall contract for the early return of 10th grade student assessment results, on or around June 10th of each year. State funding to districts shall be limited to one collection of evidence payment per student, per content-area assessment.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall modify the statewide student assessment system and implement assessments developed with a multistate consortium beginning in the 2014-15 school year to assess student proficiency on the standards adopted under RCW 28A.655.071 and including the provisions of House Bill No. 1450.

(c) Within the amounts provided in this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall develop and administer the biology collection of evidence.

(d) Within the amounts provided in this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall create an alternative assessment for students with the most significant cognitive challenges that is aligned to the common core state standards.

(2) $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington state leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional partnership activities coordinated at the Pacific science center, including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal professional development, and school and community engagement events.

(3) $5,851,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $3,935,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of a new performance-based evaluation for certificated educators and other activities as provided in chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform) and chapter 35, Laws of 2012 (certificated employee evaluations).

(4)(a) $44,879,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $48,746,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,090 per teacher in the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years;

(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least 60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced price lunch;

(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications for bonuses under (a)(ii) of this subsection for less than one full school year receive bonuses in a pro-rated manner. All bonuses in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection will be paid in July of each school year. Bonuses in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection shall be reduced by a factor of 40 percent for first year NBPTS certified teachers, to reflect the portion of the instructional school year they are certified; and

(iv) During the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, and within available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the national board for professional teaching standards may receive a conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in addition to compensation received under a district's salary schedule and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200. Recipients who fail to receive certification after three years are required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section in each school year.

(5) $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.

(6) $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to low-performing schools and school districts that are implementing comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.

(7) $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the development of a leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent organization to operate a state-of-the-art education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the state. Semiannually the independent organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and others to support the development and implementation of this program. Leadership academy partners shall include the state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator standards board, and others as the independent organization shall identify.

(8) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a statewide information technology (IT) academy program. This public-private partnership will provide educational software, as well as IT certification and software training opportunities for students and staff in public schools.

(9) $1,277,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,277,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for secondary career and technical education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008. If equally matched by private donations, $300,000 of the 2014 appropriation and $300,000 of the 2015 appropriation shall be used to support FIRST robotics programs. Of the amounts in this subsection, $100,000 of the fiscal year 2014 appropriation and $100,000 of the fiscal year 2015 appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of statewide supervision activities for career and technical education student leadership organizations.

(10) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for (a) staff at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in schools and districts across the state; and (b) grants of $2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year with professional development training for implementing integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in their schools.

(11) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for science, technology, engineering and mathematics lighthouse projects, consistent with chapter 238, Laws of 2010.

(12) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a beginning educator support program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for grant funding. The superintendent shall implement this program in 5 to 15 school districts and/or regional consortia. The program provided by a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each beginning teacher aligned with professional certification; release time for mentors and new teachers to work together; and teacher observation time with accomplished peers. $250,000 may be used to provide statewide professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning educators.

(13) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for advanced project lead the way courses at ten high schools. To be eligible for funding in 2014, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2012-13 school year. The 2014 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2013-14 school year. To be eligible for funding in 2015, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2013-14 school year. The 2015 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2014-15 school year. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research and data center at the office of financial management shall track student participation and long-term outcome data.

(14) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for annual start-up grants for aerospace and manufacturing technical programs housed at four skill centers. The grants are provided for start-up equipment and curriculum purchases. To be eligible for funding, the skill center must agree to provide regional high schools with access to a technology laboratory, expand manufacturing certificate and course offerings at the skill center, and provide a laboratory space for local high school teachers to engage in professional development in the instruction of courses leading to student employment certification in the aerospace and manufacturing industries. Once a skill center receives a start-up grant, it is ineligible for additional start-up funding in the following school year. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall administer the grants in consultation with the center for excellence for aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing.

(15) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for annual start-up grants to six high schools to implement the aerospace assembler program. Participating high schools must agree to offer the aerospace assembler training program to students by spring semester of school year 2013-14. Once a high school receives a start-up grant, it is ineligible for additional start-up funding in the following school year. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research and data center at the office of financial management shall track student participation and long-term outcome data.

(16) $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $5,027,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the provision of training for teachers in the performance-based teacher principal evaluation program. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, $5,000,000 for fiscal year 2014 is a one-time appropriation, and $27,000 for fiscal year 2015 is a one-time appropriation provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to include foundational elements of cultural competence that are aligned with standards developed by the professional educator standards board within the content of the training.

(17) $3,600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $6,681,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5329 (persistently failing schools). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to promote the financial literacy of students. The effort will be coordinated through the financial literacy public-private partnership.

(19) $109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $99,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement a youth dropout prevention program that incorporates partnerships between community-based organizations, schools, food banks and farms or gardens. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall select one school district that must partner with an organization that is operating an existing similar program and that also has the ability to serve at least 40 students. Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, up to $10,000 may be used by the office of the superintendent of public instruction for administration of the program.

(20) $1,827,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $2,194,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5946 (strengthening student educational outcomes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $1,110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,061,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for chapter 184, Laws of 2013 (Second Substitute House Bill No. 1642) (academic acceleration). Of the amount appropriated in this section, forty-nine thousand is provided as one-time funding.

(22) $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 6074 (homeless student educational outcomes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(23) $83,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6163 (expanded learning). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24) $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for Senate Bill No. 6424 (biliteracy seal). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1511. 2014 c 221 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR MISCELLANEOUS—NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($4,302,000))

﻿ $5,227,000

Sec. 1512. 2014 c 221 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$97,796,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($110,084,000))

﻿ $109,788,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$72,116,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($279,996,000))

﻿ $279,700,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual programs under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080, including programs for exited students, as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b) and the provisions of this section. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades kindergarten through twelve in school years 2013-14 and 2014-15; (ii) additional instruction of 3.0000 hours per week in school year 2013-14 for the head count number of students who have exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within the previous school year based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment; (iii) additional instruction of 3.0000 hours per week in school year 2014-15 for the head count number of students who have exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within the previous two years based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment; (iv) fifteen transitional bilingual program students per teacher; (v) 36 instructional weeks per year; (vi) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (vii) the district's average staff mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act.

(b) From July 1, 2013, to August 31, 2013, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual instruction programs as provided in section 514, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess., as amended.

(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the following amounts: 1.70 percent for school year 2013-14 and ((1.53)) 1.52 percent for school year 2014-15.

(4) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is for migrant education under Title I Part C and English language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the elementary and secondary education act.

(5) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual program students.

Sec. 1513. 2014 c 221 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$194,728,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($214,877,000))

﻿ $217,428,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$450,534,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($860,139,000))

﻿ $862,690,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The general fund—state appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b)(i) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a), except that the allocation for the additional instructional hours shall be enhanced as provided in this section, which enhancements are within the program of the basic education. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (A) Additional instruction of 2.3975 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2013-14 school year and the 2014-15 school year; (B) fifteen learning assistance program students per teacher; (C) 36 instructional weeks per year; (D) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (E) the district's average staff mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act.

(ii) From July 1, 2013, to August 31, 2013, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in section 515, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess., as amended.

(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12 for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or reduced price lunch in the prior school year. Starting with the allocation for the 2014-15 school year, the prior school year's October headcount enrollment for free and reduced price lunch shall be as reported in the comprehensive education data and research system.

(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through the annual income verification process required by the national school lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the learning assistance program dated February, 2010.

(3) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act of 2001.

(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program.

Sec. 1514. 2014 c 221 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through part V of this act are for allocations purposes only, unless specified by part V of this act, and do not entitle a particular district, district employee, or student to a specific service, beyond what has been expressly provided in statute. Part V of this act restates the requirements of various sections of Title 28A RCW. If any conflict exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control unless this act explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement. Any amounts provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts required by Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the program of basic education unless clearly stated by this act.

(2) To the maximum extent practicable, when adopting new or revised rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall attempt to seek legislative approval through the budget request process.

(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act, except as expressly provided in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2014)) 2015, unless specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the director of financial management, the superintendent of public instruction may transfer state general fund appropriations for fiscal year ((2014)) 2015 among the following programs to meet the apportionment schedule for a specified formula in another of these programs: General apportionment; employee compensation adjustments; pupil transportation; special education programs; institutional education programs; transitional bilingual programs; highly capable; and learning assistance programs.

(5) The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

(6) As required by RCW 28A.710.110, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall transmit the charter school authorizer oversight fee for the charter school commission to the charter school oversight account.

Sec. 1515. 2014 c 221 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$466,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($556,000))

﻿ $559,000

Charter School Oversight Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($17,000))

﻿ $29,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,039,000))

﻿ $1,054,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for the office of the attorney general costs related to League of Women Voters v. State of Washington.

(2) $137,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for charter school evaluation and oversight.

(End of part)

PART XVI

HIGHER EDUCATION

Sec. 1601. 2014 c 221 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$569,679,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($554,963,000))

﻿ $600,136,000

Community/Technical College Capital Projects﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$17,548,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($95,197,000))

﻿ $47,703,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,237,387,000))

﻿ $1,235,066,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely as special funds for training and related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW 28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2014 and at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2015.

(2) $5,450,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for administration and customized training contracts through the job skills program. The state board shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these funds.

(3) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the aerospace center of excellence currently hosted by Everett community college to:

(a) Increase statewide communications and outreach between industry sectors, industry organizations, businesses, K-12 schools, colleges, and universities;

(b) Enhance information technology to increase business and student accessibility and use of the center's web site; and

(c) Act as the information entry point for prospective students and job seekers regarding education, training, and employment in the industry.

(4) $181,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $181,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the opportunity center for employment and education internet technology integration project at north Seattle community college.

(5) $255,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $255,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of a maritime industries training program at south Seattle community college.

(6) $5,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $5,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the student achievement initiative.

(7) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5624 (STEM or career and tech ed). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for a pilot project to embed the year up model within community college campuses.

(9) $13,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $168,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6129 (paraeducator development). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $410,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the mathematics engineering science achievement community college programs.

(11) Community and technical colleges are not required to send mass mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts. Community and technical colleges shall consider lower cost alternatives, such as mailing postcards or brochures that direct individuals to online information and other ways of acquiring print catalogs.

(12) The state board for community and technical colleges shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

Sec. 1602. 2014 c 221 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$247,063,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($239,472,000))

﻿ $237,607,000

Geoduck Aquaculture Research Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$300,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$13,998,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$3,000,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation. . . .$390,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation. . . .$6,702,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation. . . .$6,528,000

Aquatic Land Enhancement Account—State Appropriation. . . .$700,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,120,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($519,273,000))

﻿ $517,408,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $300,000 of the geoduck aquaculture research account—state appropriation is provided solely for the University of Washington sea grant program to commission scientific research studies that examine possible negative and positive effects, including the cumulative effects and the economic contribution, of evolving shellfish aquaculture techniques and practices on Washington's economy and marine ecosystems. The research conducted for the studies is not intended to be a basis for an increase in the number of shellfish harvesting permits available and should be coordinated with any research efforts related to ocean acidification. The University of Washington must submit an annual report detailing any findings and outline the progress of the study, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, to the appropriate legislative committees by December 1st of each year.

(2) $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the center for international trade in forest products in the college of forest resources.

(3) $4,459,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $4,459,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the expansion of computer science and engineering enrollments. The university will work with the education research and data center to establish program baselines and demonstrate enrollment increases. By September 1, 2014, and each September 1st thereafter, the university shall provide a report that provides the specific detail on how these amounts were spent in the preceding fiscal year, including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the college, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the 2012-2013 academic year baseline.

(4) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for creation of a clean energy institute. The institute shall integrate physical sciences and engineering with a research focus on energy storage and solar energy.

(5) $3,000,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account appropriation is provided solely to support the joint center for aerospace innovation technology.

(6) Within existing resources the University of Washington may: (a) Form and implement an integrated innovation institute and research, planning, and outreach initiatives at the Olympic national resources center; and (b) accredit a four-year undergraduate forestry program from the society of American foresters. Accreditation may occur in conjunction with reaccreditation of the master of forest resources program.

(7) $700,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation and $1,120,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation are provided solely for the center on ocean acidification and related work necessary to implement the recommendations of the governor's blue ribbon task force on ocean acidification. The university shall provide staffing for this purpose.

(8) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the institute of protein design to support the commercialization of translational projects.

(9) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the University of Washington-Tacoma to develop a law school.

(10) The University of Washington shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

Sec. 1603. 2014 c 221 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$156,867,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($154,106,000))

﻿ $153,044,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$33,995,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($344,968,000))

﻿ $343,906,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Within existing resources, Washington State University shall establish an accredited forestry program.

(2) $2,856,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $2,857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the expansion of computer science and engineering enrollments. The university will work with the education research and data center to establish program baselines and demonstrate enrollment increases. By September 1, 2014, and each September 1st thereafter, the university shall provide a report that provides the specific detail on how these amounts were spent in the preceding fiscal year, including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the college, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the 2012-2013 academic year baseline.

(3) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for the Ruckelshaus center to collaborate with local governments, the media, and representatives of the public regarding public record requests made to local government. The center shall facilitate meetings and discussions and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature. The report shall include information on:

(a) Recommendations related to balancing open public records with concerns of local governments related to interfering with the work of the local government;

(b) Resources necessary to accommodate requests;

(c) Potential harassment of government employees;

(d) Potential safety concerns of people named in the record;

(e) Potentially assisting criminal activity; and

(f) Other issues brought forward by the participants.

The center shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2013.

(4) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington State University agricultural research center to conduct public outreach and education related to nonlethal methods of mitigating conflicts between livestock and large wild carnivores. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to the center to conduct a detailed analysis of such methods. The amounts appropriated in this subsection may not be subject to an administrative fee or charge, and must be used for costs directly associated with the research and analysis.

(5) $2,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $3,600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for expansion of medical education and biomedical research in Spokane.

(6) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for state match requirements related to the federal aviation administration grant.

(7) Washington State University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletic programs.

Sec. 1604. 2014 c 221 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$31,386,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($31,808,000))

﻿ $31,525,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$14,941,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($78,135,000))

﻿ $77,852,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) At least $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and at least $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 shall be expended on the Northwest autism center.

(2) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the expansion of engineering enrollments. The university will work with the education research and data center to establish program baselines and demonstrate enrollment increases. By September 1, 2015, and each September 1st thereafter, the university shall provide a report that provides the specific detail on how these amounts were spent in the preceding fiscal year, including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the college, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the 2013-2014 academic year baseline.

(3) Eastern Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

Sec. 1605. 2014 c 221 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$29,733,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($29,487,000))

﻿ $29,239,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$19,076,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($78,296,000))

﻿ $78,048,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for the college of education to conduct a study identifying the duties encompassed in a state-funded teacher's typical work day. The study must include an estimate of the percent of a teacher's typical day that is spent on teaching related duties and the percentage of the teacher's day that is spent on duties that are not directly related to teaching. The university shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2013.

(2) Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient for the university to develop a plan to create an online degree granting entity that awards degrees based on an alternative credit model. The university shall submit a final plan by December 1, 2013, to the higher education committees of the legislature.

(3) Central Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(4) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the expansion of computer science and engineering enrollments. The university will work with the education research and data center to establish program baselines and demonstrate enrollment increases. By September 1, 2015, and each September 1st thereafter, the university shall provide a report that provides the specific detail on how these amounts were spent in the preceding fiscal year, including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the college, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the 2013-2014 academic year baseline.

Sec. 1606. 2014 c 221 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$18,351,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($17,371,000))

﻿ $17,230,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$5,450,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($41,172,000))

﻿ $41,031,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a comprehensive retrospective outcome evaluation and return on investment analysis of the early learning childhood program pursuant to Senate Bill No. 5904 (high quality early learning). This evaluation is due December 15, 2014. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to develop a risk assessment instrument for patients committed for involuntary treatment in Washington state.

(3) $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $27,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to prepare an inventory of evidence-based and research-based effective practices, activities, and programs for use by school districts in the learning assistance program pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5946 (student educational outcomes), including partnerships with community-based organizations that deliver academic and nonacademic supports to students who are significantly at-risk of not being successful in school, such as one-to-one services to overcome barriers of success at school and school-wide afterschool academic support. The initial inventory is due by August 1, 2014, and shall be updated every two years thereafter. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to provide expertise to the department of corrections on the implementation of programming that follows the risk needs responsivity model. In consultation with the department of corrections, the institute will systematically review selected programs for outcome measures.

(5) The Washington state institute for public policy shall examine the drug offender sentencing alternative for offenders sentenced to residential treatment in the community. The institute shall examine its effectiveness on recidivism and conduct a benefit-cost analysis. The institute shall report its findings by December 1, 2014.

(6) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for Washington state institute for public policy to complete a comprehensive assessment of the utilization and capacity needs of crisis mental health services provided by the department of social and health services. The study shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) An update to statewide utilization and capacity figures for evaluation and treatment facilities, inpatient psychiatric beds, and regional support network-funded crisis facilities, including an estimate of the effect of the implementation of chapter 280, Laws of 2010 and chapter 335, Laws of 2013 on the capacity of the involuntary commitment system. The department shall work with the institute as needed on data collection procedures necessary to identify commitments associated with newly implemented standards;

(b) A longitudinal study of outcomes and public costs for adults receiving regional support network-funded crisis response services compared to adults evaluated for involuntary commitment who are not subsequently committed, and adults who receive a seventy-two hour involuntary commitment. Outcomes may include subsequent jail bookings or convictions, use of publicly funded medical care, and deaths; and

(c) A review of practices in other states regarding third-party initiation of a civil commitment petition, and an assessment of the comparative effectiveness of this change compared to other alternative practices for which comprehensive studies are available.

A preliminary report must be provided by December 1, 2015, and a final report by December 1, 2016.

(7) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a comprehensive study of tobacco and e-cigarette prevention programs that will yield the highest public health benefit and reduce tobacco use. In conducting this study, the institute shall identify: (a) The most effective population-based approaches and what targeted populations will yield the greatest return on investment; and (b) other state models, including the "Friday night light" program in California, that yield the greatest likelihood of reducing state health care costs. The institute shall work with the department of health to determine which programs can be brought to scale most efficiently. The institute shall report its findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2014.

(8) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for The Evergreen State College to continue operations of the Longhouse Center and the Northwest Indian applied research institute.

(9) Notwithstanding other provisions in this section, the board of directors for the Washington state institute for public policy may adjust due dates for projects included on the institute's 2013-2015 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.

(10) The Evergreen State College shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

Sec. 1607. 2014 c 221 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$44,521,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($43,341,000))

﻿ $43,005,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$12,895,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($100,757,000))

﻿ $100,421,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,497,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,498,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the expansion of computer science and engineering enrollments. The university will work with the education research and data center to establish program baselines and demonstrate enrollment increases. By September 1, 2014, and each September 1st thereafter, the university shall provide a report that provides the specific detail on how these amounts were spent in the preceding fiscal year, including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the college, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the 2012-2013 academic year baseline.

(2) Western Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

Sec. 1608. 2014 c 221 s 611 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$5,320,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($5,287,000))

﻿ $5,258,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$4,811,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($15,418,000))

﻿ $15,389,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The student achievement council is authorized to increase or establish fees for initial degree authorization, degree authorization renewal, degree authorization reapplication, new program applications, and new site applications pursuant to RCW 28B.85.060.

Sec. 1609. 2014 c 221 s 612 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$245,124,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($244,666,000))

﻿ $244,643,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$11,639,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$334,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($79,651,000))

﻿ $79,560,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$141,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($722,414,000))

﻿ $722,300,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $237,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $237,455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, $6,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $141,000,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for student financial aid payments under the state need grant and state work study programs including up to four percent administrative allowance for the state work study program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the council to develop an alternative financial aid application system to implement Senate Bill No. 6523 (higher education opportunities).

(2) Changes made to the state need grant program in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium are continued in the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium including aligning increases in awards given to private institutions with the annual tuition increases for public research institutions or the private institution's average annual tuition increase experience of 3.5 percent per year, whichever is less. For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, it is the intent of the legislature to reconsider grant awards for students at private four-year institutions.

(3) Changes made to the state work study program in the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia are continued in the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium including maintaining the increased required employer share of wages; adjusted employer match rates; discontinuation of nonresident student eligibility for the program; and revising distribution methods to institutions by taking into consideration other factors such as off-campus job development, historical utilization trends, and student need.

(4) Within the funds appropriated in this section, eligibility for the state need grant shall include students with family incomes at or below 70 percent of the state median family income (MFI), adjusted for family size, and shall include students enrolled in three to five credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits. Awards for all students shall be adjusted by the estimated amount by which Pell grant increases exceed projected increases in the noninstructional costs of attendance. Awards for students with incomes between 51 and 70 percent of the state median shall be prorated at the following percentages of the award amount granted to those with incomes below 51 percent of the MFI: 70 percent for students with family incomes between 51 and 55 percent MFI; 65 percent for students with family incomes between 56 and 60 percent MFI; 60 percent for students with family incomes between 61 and 65 percent MFI; and 50 percent for students with family incomes between 66 and 70 percent MFI.

(5)(a) Students who are eligible for the college bound scholarship shall be given priority for the state need grant program if the students have applied by the institution's priority financial aid deadline and have completed their financial aid file in a timely manner. These eligible college bound students whose family incomes are in the 0-65 median family income ranges shall be awarded the maximum state need grant for which they are eligible under state policies and may not be denied maximum state need grant funding due to institutional policies or delayed awarding of college bound scholarship students.

(b) In calculating the college bound award, public institutions of higher education shall be subject to the conditions and limitations in RCW 28B.15.102 and shall not utilize college bound funds to offset tuition costs from rate increases in excess of levels authorized in section 603, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 and those assumed in section 602 or 603 of this act.

(6) (($48,297,000)) $48,206,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the college bound scholarship program and may support scholarships for summer session. This amount assumes that college bound scholarship recipients will receive priority for state need grant awards in fiscal year 2014 and fiscal year 2015. If this policy of prioritization is not fully achieved, it is the intent of this legislation to provide supplemental appropriations in the 2014 supplemental operating budget.

(7) $2,236,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $2,236,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the passport to college program. The maximum scholarship award shall be $5,000. The board shall contract with a nonprofit organization to provide support services to increase student completion in their postsecondary program and shall, under this contract, provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal years 2014 and 2015 for this purpose.

(8) $25,354,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to meet state match requirements associated with the opportunity scholarship program.

(9) In developing the skilled and educated workforce report pursuant to RCW 28B.77.080(3), the council shall use the bureau of labor statistics analysis of the education and training requirements of occupations, in addition to any other method the council may choose to use, to assess the number and type of higher education and training credentials required to match employer demand for a skilled and educated workforce.

Sec. 1610. 2014 c 221 s 614 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$30,605,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($52,336,000))

﻿ $52,272,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($295,177,000))

﻿ $298,405,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$50,000

Opportunity Pathways Account—State Appropriation. . . .$80,000,000

Home Visiting Services Account—State Appropriation. . . .$2,868,000

Home Visiting Services Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$22,753,000

Children's Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$180,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($483,969,000))

﻿ $487,133,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $20,229,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $36,474,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $80,000,000 of the opportunity pathways account appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education assistance program services. Of these amounts, $10,284,000 is a portion of the biennial amount of state maintenance of effort dollars required to receive federal child care and development fund grant dollars.

(2) $638,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, and $638,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for child care resource and referral network services.

(3) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to develop and provide culturally relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers.

(4) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration, and other costs associated with child care subsidies. The department shall transfer a portion of this grant to the department of social and health services to fund the child care subsidies paid by the department of social and health services on behalf of the department of early learning.

(5) $1,434,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $1,434,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for expenditure into the home visiting services account. This funding is intended to meet federal maintenance of effort requirements and to secure private matching funds.

(6)(a) $153,717,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.215.135.

(b) In addition to groups that were given prioritized access to the working connections child care program effective March 1, 2011, the department shall also give prioritized access into the program to families in which a parent of a child in care is a minor who is not living with a parent or guardian and who is a full-time student in a high school that has a school-sponsored on-site child care center.

(c) Within the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, the department is authorized to serve up to 20 percent of the working connections households through contracted slots. The department may achieve this by contracting with the working connections child care providers and with early childhood education assistance program providers to braid funding between working connection child care program and the education assistance program to support a full-day preschool experience for eligible children.

(7) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with the office of financial management and the department of social and health services shall report quarterly enrollments and active caseload for the working connections child care program to the legislative fiscal committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight task force. The report shall also identify the number of cases participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and working connections child care. The department must also report on the number of children served through contracted slots.

(8) $1,194,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $1,738,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $13,424,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the seasonal child care program. If federal sequestration cuts are realized, cuts to the seasonal child care program must be proportional to other federal reductions made within the department.

(9) $4,438,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $4,674,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $236,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the medicaid treatment child care (MTCC) program. The department shall contract for MTCC services to provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment services to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children. Priority for services shall be given to children referred from the department of social and health services children's administration. In addition to referrals made by children's administration, the department shall authorize services for children referred to the MTCC program, as long as the children meet the eligibility requirements as outlined in the Washington state plan for the MTCC program.

(a) Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, $60,000 per fiscal year may be used by the department for administering the MTCC program, if needed.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,916,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely to continue providing services in the event of losing federal funding for the MTCC program. To the extent that the moneys provided in this subsection (9)(b) are not necessary for this purpose, the amounts provided shall lapse.

(10) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit entity experienced in the provision of promoting early literacy for children through pediatric office visits.

(11) $721,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for the department to complete development work of the electronic benefits transfer system.

(12) $221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,234,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of an electronic benefits transfer system. To the maximum extent possible, the department shall work to integrate this system with the department of social and health services payment system. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(13) $32,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5595 (child care reform). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(14)(a)(i) The department of early learning is required to provide to the education research and data center, housed at the office of financial management, data on all state-funded early childhood programs. These programs include the early support for infants and toddlers, early childhood education and assistance program (ECEAP), and the working connections and seasonal subsidized childcare programs including license exempt facilities or family, friend, and neighbor care. The data provided by the department to the education research data center must include information on children who participate in these programs, including their name and date of birth, and dates the child received services at a particular facility.

(ii) The ECEAP early learning professionals must enter qualifications into the department's professional development registry during the 2013-14 school year. By October 2015, the department must provide ECEAP early learning professional data to the education research data center.

(iii) The department must request federally funded head start programs to voluntarily provide data to the department and the education research data center that is equivalent to what is being provided for state-funded programs.

(iv) The education research and data center must provide a report on early childhood program participation and K-12 outcomes to the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee using available data by November 2013 for the school year ending in 2012 and again in March 2014 for the school year ending in 2013.

(b) The department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, must withhold payment for services to early childhood programs that do not report on the name, date of birth, and the dates a child received services at a particular facility.

(15) $2,369,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the department to implement early achievers tiered reimbursement for child care center providers. The department shall establish tiered reimbursement pilot projects for providers in levels III, IV, and V of early achievers. The tiered reimbursement rates shall be implemented equitably across provider types. The department shall base the rates for tiered reimbursement on the child care cost model study completed in 2013 and factor in any increases in the base subsidy rate in establishing the tier reimbursement rates.

Sec. 1611. 2014 c 221 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$5,975,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($5,752,000))

﻿ $5,853,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$5,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($11,732,000))

﻿ $11,833,000

Sec. 1612. 2014 c 221 s 616 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$8,758,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($8,528,000))

﻿ $8,881,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($17,286,000))

﻿ $17,639,000

Sec. 1613. 2014 c 221 s 617 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$1,093,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($1,093,000))

﻿ $1,105,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,071,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$29,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,286,000))

﻿ $4,298,000

Sec. 1614. 2014 c 221 s 619 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$1,624,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($1,558,000))

﻿ $1,557,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($3,182,000))

﻿ $3,181,000

(End of part)

PART XVII

SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 1701. 2014 c 221 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$830,140,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($973,235,000))

﻿ $958,648,000

State Building Construction Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($8,164,000))

﻿ $5,164,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$473,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($2,621,000))

﻿ $1,621,000

Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,320,000

Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,000

Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water Supply﻿

Development Account—State Appropriation. . . .$182,000

Debt-Limit General Fund Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$236,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,817,136,000))

﻿ $2,034,549,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account. The entire general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 shall be expended into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account by June 30, 2014.

Sec. 1702. 2014 c 221 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$1,401,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .$1,401,000

State Building Construction Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($2,156,000))

﻿ $1,156,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$66,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$324,000

Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($1,000))

﻿ $2,000

Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water Supply﻿

Development Account—State Appropriation. . . .$18,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($5,367,000))

﻿ $4,368,000

Sec. 1703. 2014 c 221 s 706 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$36,386,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .$36,386,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$72,772,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The state treasurer shall distribute the appropriations to the following counties and health districts in the amounts designated to support public health services, including public health nursing:

Health District

FY 2014

FY 2015

2013-15

Biennium

Adams County Health District

$121,213

$121,213

$242,426

Asotin County Health District

$159,890

$159,890

$319,780

Benton-Franklin Health District

$1,614,337

$1,614,337

$3,228,674

Chelan-Douglas Health District

$399,634

$399,634

$799,268

Clallam County Health and Human Services Department

$291,401

$291,401

$582,802

Clark County Health District

$1,767,341

$1,767,341

$3,534,682

Skamania County Health Department

$111,327

$111,327

$222,654

Columbia County Health District

$119,991

$119,991

$239,982

Cowlitz County Health Department

$477,981

$477,981

$955,962

Garfield County Health District

$93,154

$93,154

$186,308

Grant County Health District

$297,761

(($297,762)) $297,761

(($595,523))

$595,522

Grays Harbor Health Department

$335,666

$335,666

$671,332

Island County Health Department

$255,224

(($225,224)) $255,224

$510,448

Jefferson County Health and Human Services

$184,080

$184,080

$368,160

Seattle-King County Department of Public Health

$10,558,598

$12,685,521

$23,244,119

Bremerton-Kitsap County Health District

$997,476

$997,476

$1,994,952

Kittitas County Health Department

$198,979

$198,979

$397,958

Klickitat County Health Department

$153,784

$153,784

$307,568

Lewis County Health Department

$263,134

$263,134

$526,268

Lincoln County Health Department

$113,917

$113,917

$227,834

Mason County Department of Health Services

$227,448

$227,448

$454,896

Okanogan County Health District

$169,882

$169,882

$339,764

Pacific County Health Department

$169,075

$169,075

$338,150

Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department

$4,143,169

$4,143,169

$8,286,338

San Juan County Health and Community Services

$2,253,493

$126,569

$2,380,062

Skagit County Health Department

$449,745

$449,745

$899,490

Snohomish Health District

$3,433,291

$3,433,291

$6,866,582

Spokane County Health District

$2,877,318

$2,877,318

(($5,574,636)) $5,754,636

Northeast Tri-County Health District

$249,303

$249,303

$498,606

Thurston County Health Department

$1,046,897

$1,046,897

$2,093,794

Wahkiakum County Health Department

$93,181

$93,181

$186,362

Walla Walla County-City Health Department

$302,173

$302,173

$604,346

Whatcom County Health Department

$1,214,301

$1,214,301

$2,428,602

Whitman County Health Department

$189,355

$189,355

$378,710

Yakima Health District

$1,052,482

$1,052,482

$2,104,964

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS

$36,386,001

(($36,386,001)) $36,386,000

(($72,772,002)) $72,772,001

Sec. 1704. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 712 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS—CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.

(1) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$58,700,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .(($61,600,000))

﻿ $59,600,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($120,300,000))

﻿ $118,300,000

(2) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .$10,600,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .$10,600,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$21,200,000

Sec. 1705. 2014 c 221 s 708 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (((FY 2014))) (FY 2015). . . .$590,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The director of financial management shall distribute $500,000 to Clallam county, $72,000 to Mason county, and $18,000 to Klickitat county for extraordinary criminal justice costs pursuant to RCW 43.330.190.

Sec. 1706. 2014 c 221 s 709 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS

The following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund for fiscal year 2014 or fiscal year 2015, unless otherwise indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations for sundry claims.

(1) These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved by the director of the department of enterprise services, except as otherwise provided, for reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110, as follows:

(((1))) (a) Tony M. Noble, claim number 99970075. . . .$5,670

(((2))) (b) Patrick Earl, claim number 99970076. . . .$2,799

(((3))) (c) Stephen J. Felice, claim number 99970076. . . .$17,275

(((4))) (d) Michael Felice, claim number 99970076. . . .$93,809

(((5))) (e) Noe Angel Aranda Hernandez, claim number﻿

99970077. . . .$12,500

(((6))) (f) Anderson Durham, claim number 99970071. . . .$11,000

(((7))) (g) Chase Balzer, claim number 99970078. . . .$5,953

(((8))) (h) Kent Wescott, claim1 number 99970079. . . .$13,447

(((9))) (i) Tommy Villanueva, claim number 99970080. . . .$70,099

(j) Alonzo French, claim number 99970081. . . .$11,065

(k) Jason Hansen, claim number 99970083. . . .$12,352

(l) Chad O'Neill, claim number 99970085. . . .$109,414

(m) John Hall, claim number 99970086. . . .$1,100

(n) Gail Gerlach, claim number 99970087. . . .$221,575

(o) Mathew Hope, claim number 9997090. . . .$20,900

(p) Charles Thomas, claim number 99970092. . . .$640

(q) Abram Bergamo, claim number 99970093. . . .$13,813

(r) Gary Jeudy, claim number 99970095. . . .$16,446

(s) Brian Jackson, claim number 99970100. . . .$8,500

(t) Casey Balch, claim number 99970097. . . .$111,095

(u) Douglas McRae, claim number 99970099. . . .$101,899

(v) Gregory Dussault, claim number 9997101. . . .$11,225

(2) These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved by the director of the department of enterprise services, except as otherwise provided, for payment of compensation for wrongful convictions pursuant to RCW 4.100.060, as follows:

(a) Ryan Allen, claim number 99970070. . . .$94,339

(b) Michael Washington, claim number 99970084. . . .$11,243

(c) Brandon Olebar, claim number 99970089. . . .$546,691

(d) Thomas Kennedy, claim number 99970088. . . .$519,974

(e) James Anderson, claim number 99970096. . . .$238,258

Sec. 1707. 2014 c 221 s 710 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—COMMON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .$444,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for expenditure into the common school construction account—state on July 1, ((2015)) 2014, for an interest payment pursuant to RCW 90.38.130.

Sec. 1708. 2014 c 221 s 711 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—NATURAL RESOURCES REAL PROPERTY REPLACEMENT ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .$222,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for expenditure into the natural resources real property replacement account—state on July 1, ((2015)) 2014, for an interest payment pursuant to RCW 90.38.130.

Sec. 1709. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 718 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—AGENCY EFFICIENCIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2014). . . .($2,500,000)

((General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .($2,500,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .($5,000,000)))

The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are)) is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office of financial management shall reduce allotments for all agencies by $2,500,000 from fiscal year 2014 general fund—state appropriations ((and $2,500,000 from fiscal year 2015 general fund—state appropriations)) in this act to reflect (1) available fund balances in dedicated revolving funds used for central services to state agencies and (2) more efficient delivery of consolidated central services to state agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1710. 2014 c 221 s 707 (uncodified) is repealed.

(End of part)

PART XVIII

OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 1801. 2014 c 221 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance﻿

premium distributions. . . .(($8,591,000))

﻿ $8,804,000

General Fund Appropriation for public utility﻿

district excise tax distributions. . . .(($53,709,000))

﻿ $54,766,000

General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting﻿

attorney distributions. . . .$5,985,000

General Fund Appropriation for boating safety﻿

and education distributions. . . .$4,000,000

General Fund Appropriation for other tax﻿

distributions. . . .(($65,000))

﻿ $80,000

General Fund Appropriation for habitat conservation﻿

program distributions. . . .$3,154,000

General Fund Appropriation for cannabis excise

tax and license distribution. . . .$8,391,000

Death Investigations Account Appropriation for﻿

distribution to counties for publicly funded﻿

autopsies. . . .$3,158,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for﻿

harbor improvement revenue distribution. . . .$146,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for﻿

distribution to "timber" counties. . . .(($76,932,000))

﻿ $73,400,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation.﻿

When making the fiscal year 2015 distribution to﻿

Grant county, the state treasurer shall reduce﻿

the amount by $140,000 and distribute the﻿

remainder to the county. This is the first of﻿

three reductions that will be made to reimburse﻿

the state for a nonqualifying extraordinary﻿

criminal justice act payment made to Grant﻿

county in fiscal year 2013. . . .(($78,721,000))

﻿ $79,127,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($30,519,000))

﻿ $30,758,000

City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for﻿

local government financial assistance﻿

distribution. . . .(($19,584,000))

﻿ $22,766,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor﻿

excise tax distribution. . . .(($23,906,000))

﻿ $24,900,000

Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Mitigation Account﻿

Appropriation for distribution to local taxing﻿

jurisdictions to mitigate the unintended revenue﻿

redistribution effect of the sourcing law﻿

changes. . . .$49,420,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation﻿

for the Confederated Tribes of the Colville﻿

Reservation. . . .$7,752,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation﻿

for the Spokane Tribe of Indians. . . .$5,011,000

Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor﻿

profits distribution. . . .$98,876,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($469,529,000))

﻿ $480,494,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 1802. 2014 c 221 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation. . . .(($2,409,000))

﻿ $2,300,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium in accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock

violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 1803. 2014 c 221 s 803 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation. . . .(($1,606,000))

﻿ $1,533,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium to all cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 1804. 2014 c 221 s 804 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation for federal flood control﻿

funds distribution. . . .$66,000

General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing fees﻿

distribution. . . .$1,706,000

Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal forest﻿

reserve fund distribution. . . .(($24,446,000))

﻿ $40,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($26,218,000))

﻿ $41,772,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 1805. 2014 c 221 s 805 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to﻿

the state general fund, $10,100,000 for fiscal﻿

year 2014 and $10,100,000 for fiscal year 2015. . . .$20,200,000

Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer to﻿

the drinking water assistance repayment

account. . . .(($32,000,000))

﻿ $17,426,000

General Fund: For transfer to the streamlined sales﻿

and use tax account, $24,436,000﻿

for fiscal year 2014 and $24,984,000﻿

for fiscal year 2015. . . .$49,420,000

Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the﻿

education legacy trust account, $138,622,000 for﻿

fiscal year 2014 and $138,622,000 for fiscal﻿

year 2015. . . .$277,244,000

Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the﻿

state general fund, $9,000,000 for fiscal year﻿

2014 and $9,000,000 for fiscal year 2015. . . .$18,000,000

((State Taxable Building Construction Account: For﻿

transfer to the Columbia River basin taxable﻿

bond water supply development account, an﻿

amount not to exceed. . . .$32,000,000))

Employment Training Finance Account: For transfer to﻿

the state general fund, $1,000,000 for fiscal﻿

year 2014 and $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2015. . . .$2,000,000

Tuition Recovery Trust Account: For transfer to the﻿

state general fund, $1,250,000 for fiscal year﻿

2014 and $1,250,000 for fiscal year 2015. . . .$2,500,000

General Fund: For transfer to the child and family﻿

reinvestment account, $1,656,000 for﻿

fiscal year 2014 and $992,000﻿

for fiscal year 2015. . . .$2,648,000

Flood Control Assistance Account: For transfer to the﻿

state general fund, $1,000,000 for fiscal year﻿

2014 and $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2015. . . .$2,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state﻿

general fund, in an amount not to exceed the﻿

actual amount of the annual base payment to the﻿

tobacco settlement account. . . .(($170,832,000))

﻿ $180,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state﻿

general fund from the amounts deposited in the﻿

account that are attributable to the annual﻿

strategic contribution payment received in﻿

fiscal year 2014. . . .$17,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state﻿

general fund from the amounts deposited in the﻿

account that are attributable to the annual﻿

strategic contribution payment received in﻿

fiscal year 2015. . . .$17,000,000

((It is the intent of the legislature to transfer the full amounts received as strategic contribution payments in the tobacco settlement account to the education legacy trust account in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.))

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the life﻿

sciences discovery fund, in an amount not to﻿

exceed the actual remaining amount of the﻿

annual strategic contribution payment to the﻿

tobacco settlement account for fiscal year 2014. . . .$9,515,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the life﻿

sciences discovery fund, in an amount not to﻿

exceed the actual remaining amount of the﻿

annual strategic contribution payment to the﻿

tobacco settlement account for fiscal year 2015. . . .$9,515,000

The transfer to the life sciences discovery fund is subject to the following conditions:

(1) The life sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees shall begin preparing to become a self-sustaining entity capable of operating without direct state subsidy by the time the tobacco strategic contribution supplemental payments end in fiscal year 2017.

(2) $250,000 of the appropriation in fiscal year 2014 and $250,000 of the appropriation in fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to promote the development and delivery of global health technologies and products.

(a) The life sciences discovery fund authority must either administer a grant application, review, and reward process, or contract with a qualified nonprofit organization for these services. State moneys must be provided for grants to entities for the development, production, promotion, and delivery of global health technologies and products. Grant award criteria must include:

(i) The quality of the proposed research or the proposed technical assistance in product development or production process design. Any grant funds awarded for research activities must be awarded for nonbasic research that will assist in the commercialization or manufacture of global health technologies;

(ii) The potential for the grant recipient to improve global health outcomes;

(iii) The potential for the grant to leverage additional funding for the development of global health technologies and products;

(iv) The potential for the grant to stimulate, or promote technical skills training for, employment in the development of global health technologies in the state; and

(v) The willingness of the grant recipient, when appropriate, to enter into royalty or licensing income agreements with the authority.

(b) The authority, or the contractor of the authority, must report information including the types of products and research funded, the funding leveraged by the grants, and the number and types of jobs created as a result of the grants, to the economic development committees of the legislature by December 1, 2014.

(3) The life sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees shall terminate all funding for contracts by June 30, 2015.

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to﻿

the geoduck aquaculture research account,﻿

$150,000 for fiscal year 2014 and $150,000 for﻿

fiscal year 2015. . . .$300,000

Health Benefit Exchange Account: For transfer to the﻿

state general fund for fiscal year 2015. . . .(($21,514,000))

﻿ $26,590,000

Criminal Justice Treatment Account: For transfer to﻿

the state general fund, $437,000 for fiscal﻿

year 2014 and $2,746,000 for fiscal year 2015. . . .$3,183,000

Resources Management Cost Account—Aquatics: For

transfer to the marine resources stewardship

trust account, $1,850,000 for fiscal year 2014﻿

and $1,850,000 for fiscal year 2015. . . .$3,700,000

Legal Services Revolving Account: For transfer to the﻿

state general fund, $976,000 for fiscal year﻿

2014 and $1,477,000 for fiscal year 2015. . . .$2,453,000

Personnel Service Account: For transfer to the state﻿

general fund, $733,000 for fiscal year 2014 and﻿

$733,000 for fiscal year 2015. . . .$1,466,000

Data Processing Revolving Account: For transfer to﻿

the state general fund, $4,069,000 for fiscal﻿

year 2014 and $4,070,000 for fiscal year 2015. . . .$8,139,000

Home Security Fund Account: For transfer to the﻿

transitional housing operating and rent account. . . .$7,500,000

Professional Engineers' Account: For transfer to the﻿

state general fund, $956,000 for fiscal year﻿

2014 and $957,000 for fiscal year 2015. . . .$1,913,000

Electrical License Account: For transfer to the state﻿

general fund, $1,700,000 for fiscal year 2014﻿

and $1,700,000 for fiscal year 2015. . . .$3,400,000

Business and Professions Account: For transfer to the﻿

state general fund, $2,838,000 for fiscal﻿

year 2014 and $2,800,000 for fiscal﻿

year 2015. . . .$5,638,000

Energy Freedom Account: For transfer to the state﻿

general fund, $1,000,000 for fiscal﻿

year 2014 and $1,000,000 for fiscal﻿

year 2015. . . .$2,000,000

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust Account:﻿

For transfer to the state general fund,﻿

$2,500,000 for fiscal year 2014 and $2,500,000﻿

for fiscal year 2015. . . .$5,000,000

Real Estate Commission Account: For transfer to the﻿

state general fund, $1,700,000 for fiscal year﻿

2014 and $1,700,000 for fiscal year 2015. . . .$3,400,000

State Lottery Account: For transfer to the education﻿

legacy trust account, $10,050,000﻿

for fiscal year 2014 and $6,050,000 for fiscal﻿

year 2015. . . .$16,100,000

State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the﻿

radioactive mixed waste account, $2,000,000 for﻿

fiscal year 2014. . . .$2,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the education savings﻿

account, $387.04 for fiscal year 2014. . . .$387.04

Dedicated Marijuana Account: For transfer to the

education legacy trust account, $45,412,000

for fiscal year 2015. . . .$45,412,000

Liquor Revolving Fund: For transfer to the state

general fund, $6,000,000 for fiscal year 2015. . . .$6,000,000

(End of part)

PART XIX

MISCELLANEOUS

Sec. 1901. RCW 69.50.540 and 2013 c 3 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

All marijuana excise taxes collected from sales of marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products under RCW 69.50.535, and the license fees, penalties, and forfeitures derived under chapter 3, Laws of 2013 from marijuana producer, marijuana processor, and marijuana retailer licenses shall every three months be disbursed by the state liquor control board as follows:

(1) One hundred twenty-five thousand dollars to the department of social and health services to design and administer the Washington state healthy youth survey, analyze the collected data, and produce reports, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, department of health, department of commerce, family policy council, and state liquor control board. The survey shall be conducted at least every two years and include questions regarding, but not necessarily limited to, academic achievement, age at time of substance use initiation, antisocial behavior of friends, attitudes toward antisocial behavior, attitudes toward substance use, laws and community norms regarding antisocial behavior, family conflict, family management, parental attitudes toward substance use, peer rewarding of antisocial behavior, perceived risk of substance use, and rebelliousness. Funds disbursed under this subsection may be used to expand administration of the healthy youth survey to student populations attending institutions of higher education in Washington;

(2) Fifty thousand dollars to the department of social and health services for the purpose of contracting with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct the cost-benefit evaluation and produce the reports described in RCW 69.50.550. This appropriation shall end after production of the final report required by RCW 69.50.550;

(3) Five thousand dollars to the University of Washington alcohol and drug abuse institute for the creation, maintenance, and timely updating of web-based public education materials providing medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use;

(4) An amount not exceeding one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the state liquor control board as is necessary for administration of chapter 3, Laws of 2013;

(5) Of the funds remaining after the disbursements identified in subsections (1) through (4) of this section:

(a) Fifteen percent to the department of social and health services division of behavioral health and recovery for implementation and maintenance of programs and practices aimed at the prevention or reduction of maladaptive substance use, substance-use disorder, substance abuse or substance dependence, as these terms are defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, among middle school and high school age students, whether as an explicit goal of a given program or practice or as a consistently corresponding effect of its implementation; PROVIDED, That:

(i) Of the funds disbursed under (a) of this subsection, at least eighty-five percent must be directed to evidence-based and cost-beneficial programs and practices that produce objectively measurable results; and

(ii) Up to fifteen percent of the funds disbursed under (a) of this subsection may be directed to research-based and emerging best practices or promising practices.

In deciding which programs and practices to fund, the secretary of the department of social and health services shall consult, at least annually, with the University of Washington's social development research group and the University of Washington's alcohol and drug abuse institute;

(b) Ten percent to the department of health for the creation, implementation, operation, and management of a marijuana education and public health program that contains the following:

(i) A marijuana use public health hotline that provides referrals to substance abuse treatment providers, utilizes evidence-based or research-based public health approaches to minimizing the harms associated with marijuana use, and does not solely advocate an abstinence-only approach;

(ii) A grants program for local health departments or other local community agencies that supports development and implementation of coordinated intervention strategies for the prevention and reduction of marijuana use by youth; and

(iii) Media-based education campaigns across television, internet, radio, print, and out-of-home advertising, separately targeting youth and adults, that provide medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use;

(c) Six-tenths of one percent to the University of Washington and four-tenths of one percent to Washington State University for research on the short and long-term effects of marijuana use, to include but not be limited to formal and informal methods for estimating and measuring intoxication and impairment, and for the dissemination of such research;

(d) Fifty percent to the state basic health plan trust account to be administered by the Washington basic health plan administrator and used as provided under chapter 70.47 RCW;

(e) Five percent to the Washington state health care authority to be expended exclusively through contracts with community health centers to provide primary health and dental care services, migrant health services, and maternity health care services as provided under RCW 41.05.220;

(f) Three-tenths of one percent to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to fund grants to building bridges programs under chapter 28A.175 RCW; and

(g) The remainder to the general fund.

(6) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may redistribute to the education legacy trust account any of the distributions in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1902. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1903. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately except for section 974 (RCW 77.12.203) of this act, which takes effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---