BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

[NOT USED]

PART II

Extending the Expiration Date of Tax Preferences for Food Processing

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201. This section is the tax preference performance statement for the agricultural processor tax exemptions in sections 202 through 205 of this act. The performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(1) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended to accomplish the general purposes indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2) (c) and (e).

(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to create and retain jobs and continue providing tax relief to the food processing industry.

(3) To measure the effectiveness of the exemptions in sections 202 through 205 of this act in achieving the public policy objectives described in subsection (2) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee must evaluate the following:

(a) The number of businesses that claim the exemptions in sections 202 through 205 of this act;

(b) The change in total taxable income for taxpayers claiming the exemptions under sections 202 through 205 of this act;

(c) The change in total employment for taxpayers claiming the exemptions under sections 202 through 205 of this act; and

(d) For each calendar year, the total amount of exemptions claimed under sections 202 through 205 of this act as a percentage of total taxable income for taxpayers within taxable income categories.

(4) The information provided in the annual survey submitted by the taxpayers under RCW 82.32.585, tax data collected by the department of revenue, and data collected by the employment security department is intended to provide the informational basis for the evaluation under subsection (3) of this section.

(5) In addition to the data sources described under subsection (4) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may use any other data it deems necessary in performing the evaluation under subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 202. RCW 82.04.4266 and 2014 c 140 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not apply to the value of products or the gross proceeds of sales derived from:

(a) Manufacturing fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables; or

(b) Selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state. A person taking an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.

(2) For purposes of this section, "fruits" and "vegetables" do not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

(3) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.

(4) This section expires July 1, ((2015)) 2025.

Sec. 203. RCW 82.04.4268 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax, the value of products or the gross proceeds of sales derived from:

(a) Manufacturing dairy products; or

(b) Selling dairy products manufactured by the seller to purchasers who either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product. A person taking an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product.

(2) "Dairy products" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.260.

(3) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.

(4) This section expires July 1, ((2015)) 2025.

Sec. 204. RCW 82.04.4269 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not apply to the value of products or the gross proceeds of sales derived from:

(a) Manufacturing seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; or

(b) Selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state. A person taking an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.

(2) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.

(3) This section expires July 1, ((2015)) 2025.

Sec. 205. RCW 82.04.260 and 2014 c 140 s 6 and 2014 c 140 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing:

(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;

(b) Beginning July 1, ((2015)) 2025, seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;

(c)(i) Beginning July 1, ((2015)) 2025, dairy products; or selling dairy products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products" means:

(A) Products, not including any marijuana-infused product, that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and

(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by weight or volume.

(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy product;

(d)(i) Beginning July 1, ((2015)) 2025, fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "fruits" and "vegetables" do not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products;

(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and

(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association engaging within this state in research and development, as to such corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an international steamship agent, international customs house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.

(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.

If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.

(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent thereafter.

(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:

(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and

(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.

(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.

(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(e)(i) Except as provided in (e)(ii) of this subsection (11), this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.

(ii) With respect to the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes, this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850 has been sited outside the state of Washington. This subsection (11)(e)(ii) only applies to the manufacturing or sale of commercial airplanes that are the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850.

(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.

(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i) Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products, manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.

(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.

(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent. For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after severance.

(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:

(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.

(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue; kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard, liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of printed materials.

(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.

(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035.

(v) "Timber products" means:

(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;

(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered paper or paper products; and

(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of biocomposite surface products.

(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood windows; and biocomposite surface products.

(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12) must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.

(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.

(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (14) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

PART III

Providing a Sales and Use Tax Exemption for Eligible Server Equipment Installed in Certain Data Centers

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301. This section is the tax preference performance statement for the sales and use tax exemption contained in sections 302 and 303 of this act. This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preferences in sections 302 and 303 of this act. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(1) The legislature categorizes this sales and use tax exemption as one intended to improve industry competitiveness, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(b).

(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to improve industry competitiveness. It is the legislature's intent to provide a sales and use tax exemption on eligible server equipment and power infrastructure installed in eligible computer data centers, charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing eligible server equipment, and for construction, installation, repair, alteration, or improvement of eligible power infrastructures in order to increase investment in data center construction in rural Washington counties, thereby adding real and personal property to state and local property tax rolls, thereby increasing the rural county tax base.

(3) If a review finds that the rural county tax base is increased as a result of the construction of computer data centers eligible for the sales and use tax exemption in sections 302 and 303 of this act, then the legislature intends to extend the expiration date of the tax preference.

(4) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in subsection (3) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may refer to data available from the department of revenue regarding rural county property tax assessments.

Sec. 302. RCW 82.08.986 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 is provided for sales to qualifying businesses and to qualifying tenants of eligible server equipment to be installed, without intervening use, in an eligible computer data center, and to charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing eligible server equipment. The exemption also applies to sales to qualifying businesses and to qualifying tenants of eligible power infrastructure, including labor and services rendered in respect to constructing, installing, repairing, altering, or improving eligible power infrastructure.

(2)(a) In order to claim the exemption under this section, a qualifying business or a qualifying tenant must submit an application to the department for an exemption certificate. The application must include the information necessary, as required by the department, to determine that a business or tenant qualifies for the exemption under this section. The department must issue exemption certificates to qualifying businesses and qualifying tenants. The department may assign a unique identification number to each exemption certificate issued under this section.

(b) A qualifying business or a qualifying tenant claiming the exemption under this section must present the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(c) With respect to computer data centers for which the commencement of construction occurs after July 1, 2015, but before July 1, 2019, the exemption provided in this section is limited to no more than eight computer data centers, with total eligible data centers provided under this section limited to twelve from July 1, 2015, through July 1, 2025. Tenants of qualified data centers do not constitute additional data centers under the limit. The exemption is available on a first-in-time basis based on the date the application required under this section is received by the department. Exemption certificates expire two years after the date of issuance, unless construction has been commenced.

(3)(a) Within six years of the date that the department issued an exemption certificate under this section to a qualifying business or a qualifying tenant with respect to an eligible computer data center, the qualifying business or qualifying tenant must establish that net employment at the eligible computer data center has increased by a minimum of:

(i) Thirty-five family wage employment positions; or

(ii) Three family wage employment positions for each twenty thousand square feet of space or less that is newly dedicated to housing working servers at the eligible computer data center. For qualifying tenants, the number of family wage employment positions that must be increased under this subsection (3)(a)(ii) is based only on the space occupied by the qualifying tenant in the eligible computer data center.

(b) In calculating the net increase in family wage employment positions:

(i) The owner of an eligible computer data center, in addition to its own net increase in family wage employment positions, may include:

(A) The net increase in family wage employment positions employed by qualifying tenants; and

(B) The net increase in family wage employment positions described in (c)(ii)(B) of this subsection (3).

(ii)(A) Qualifying tenants, in addition to their own net increase in family wage employment positions, may include:

(I) A portion of the net increase in family wage employment positions employed by the owner; and

(II) A portion of the net increase in family wage employment positions described in (c)(ii)(B) of this subsection (3).

(B) The portion of the net increase in family wage employment positions to be counted under this subsection (3)(b)(ii) by each qualifying tenant must be in proportion to the amount of space in the eligible computer data center occupied by the qualifying tenant compared to the total amount of space in the eligible computer data center occupied by all qualifying tenants.

(c)(i) For purposes of this subsection, family wage employment positions are new permanent employment positions requiring forty hours of weekly work, or their equivalent, on a full-time basis at the eligible computer data center and receiving a wage equivalent to or greater than one hundred fifty percent of the per capita personal income of the county in which the qualified project is located. An employment position may not be counted as a family wage employment position unless the employment position is entitled to health insurance coverage provided by the employer of the employment position. For purposes of this subsection (3)(c), "new permanent employment position" means an employment position that did not exist or that had not previously been filled as of the date that the department issued an exemption certificate to the owner or qualifying tenant of an eligible computer data center, as the case may be.

(ii)(A) Family wage employment positions include positions filled by employees of the owner of the eligible computer data center and by employees of qualifying tenants.

(B) Family wage employment positions also include individuals performing work at an eligible computer data center as an independent contractor hired by the owner of the eligible computer data center or as an employee of an independent contractor hired by the owner of the eligible computer data center, if the work is necessary for the operation of the computer data center, such as security and building maintenance, and provided that all of the requirements in (c)(i) of this subsection (3) are met.

(d) All previously exempted sales and use taxes are immediately due and payable for a qualifying business or qualifying tenant that does not meet the requirements of this subsection.

(4) A qualifying business or a qualifying tenant claiming an exemption under this section or RCW 82.12.986 must complete an annual report with the department as required under RCW 82.32.534.

(5)(a) The exemption provided in this section does not apply to:

(i) Any person who has received the benefit of the deferral program under chapter 82.60 RCW on: (A) The construction, renovation, or expansion of a structure or structures used as a computer data center; or (B) machinery or equipment used in a computer data center; and

(ii) Any person affiliated with a person within the scope of (a)(i) of this subsection (5).

(b) If a person claims an exemption under this section and subsequently receives the benefit of the deferral program under chapter 82.60 RCW on either the construction, renovation, or expansion of a structure or structures used as a computer data center or machinery or equipment used in a computer data center, the person must repay the amount of taxes exempted under this section. Interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW applies to amounts due under this section until paid in full.

(6) ((For purposes of this section the following definitions apply)) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise((:)).

(a) "Affiliated" means that one person has a direct or indirect ownership interest of at least twenty percent in another person.

(b) "Building" means a fully enclosed structure with a weather resistant exterior wall envelope or concrete or masonry walls designed in accordance with the requirements for structures under chapter 19.27 RCW. This definition of "building" only applies to computer data centers for which commencement of construction occurs on or after July 1, 2015.

(c)(i) "Computer data center" means a facility comprised of one or more buildings, which may be comprised of multiple businesses, constructed or refurbished specifically, and used primarily, to house working servers, where the facility has the following characteristics: (A) Uninterruptible power supplies, generator backup power, or both; (B) sophisticated fire suppression and prevention systems; and (C) enhanced physical security, such as: Restricted access to the facility to selected personnel; permanent security guards; video camera surveillance; an electronic system requiring passcodes, keycards, or biometric scans, such as hand scans and retinal or fingerprint recognition; or similar security features.

(ii) For a computer data center comprised of multiple buildings, each separate building constructed or refurbished specifically, and used primarily, to house working servers is considered a computer data center if it has all of the characteristics listed in (((b))) (c)(i)(A) through (C) of this subsection (6).

(iii) A facility comprised of one building or more than one building must have a combined square footage of at least one hundred thousand square feet.

(((c))) (d) "Electronic data storage and data management services" include, but are not limited to: Providing data storage and backup services, providing computer processing power, hosting enterprise software applications, and hosting web sites. The term also includes providing services such as e-mail, web browsing and searching, media applications, and other online services, regardless of whether a charge is made for such services.

(((d))) (e)(i) "Eligible computer data center" means a computer data center:

(A) Located in a rural county as defined in RCW 82.14.370;

(B) Having at least twenty thousand square feet dedicated to housing working servers, where the server space has not previously been dedicated to housing working servers; and

(C) For which the commencement of construction occurs:

(I) After March 31, 2010, and before July 1, 2011; ((or))

(II) After March 31, 2012, and before July 1, 2015; or

(III) After June 30, 2015, and before July 1, 2025.

(ii) For purposes of this section, "commencement of construction" means the date that a building permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031 for construction of the computer data center. The construction of a computer data center includes the expansion, renovation, or other improvements made to existing facilities, including leased or rented space. "Commencement of construction" does not include soil testing, site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit for the construction of the foundation of a computer data center.

(iii) With respect to facilities in existence on April 1, 2010, that are expanded, renovated, or otherwise improved after March 31, 2010, or facilities in existence on April 1, 2012, that are expanded, renovated, or otherwise improved after March 31, 2012, or facilities in existence on July 1, 2015, that are expanded, renovated, or otherwise improved after June 30, 2015, an eligible computer data center includes only the portion of the computer data center meeting the requirements in (((d))) (e)(i)(B) of this subsection (6).

(((e))) (f) "Eligible power infrastructure" means all fixtures and equipment owned by a qualifying business or qualifying tenant and necessary for the transformation, distribution, or management of electricity that is required to operate eligible server equipment within an eligible computer data center. The term includes generators; wiring; cogeneration equipment; and associated fixtures and equipment, such as electrical switches, batteries, and distribution, testing, and monitoring equipment. The term does not include substations.

(((f))) (g) "Eligible server equipment" means:

(i) For a qualifying business whose computer data center qualifies as an eligible computer data center under (((d))) (e)(i)(C)(I) of this subsection (6), the original server equipment installed in an eligible computer data center on or after April 1, 2010, and replacement server equipment. For purposes of this subsection (6)(((f))) (g)(i), "replacement server equipment" means server equipment that:

(A) Replaces existing server equipment, if the sale or use of the server equipment to be replaced qualified for an exemption under this section or RCW 82.12.986; and

(B) Is installed and put into regular use before April 1, 2018.

(ii) For a qualifying business whose computer data center qualifies as an eligible computer data center under (((d))) (e)(i)(C)(II) of this subsection (6), "eligible server equipment" means the original server equipment installed in an eligible computer data center on or after April 1, 2012, and replacement server equipment. For purposes of this subsection (6)(((f))) (g)(ii), "replacement server equipment" means server equipment that:

(A) Replaces existing server equipment, if the sale or use of the server equipment to be replaced qualified for an exemption under this section or RCW 82.12.986; and

(B) Is installed and put into regular use before April 1, ((2020)) 2024.

(iii)(A) For a qualifying business whose computer data center qualifies as an eligible computer data center under (e)(i)(C)(III) of this subsection (6), "eligible server equipment" means the original server equipment installed in a building within an eligible computer data center on or after July 1, 2015, and replacement server equipment. Server equipment installed in movable or fixed stand-alone, prefabricated, or modular units, including intermodal shipping containers, is not "directly installed in a building." For purposes of this subsection (6)(g)(iii)(A), "replacement server equipment" means server equipment that replaces existing server equipment, if the sale or use of the server equipment to be replaced qualified for an exemption under this section or RCW 82.12.986; and

(B) Is installed and put into regular use no later than twelve years after the date of the certificate of occupancy.

(iv) For a qualifying tenant who leases space within an eligible computer data center, "eligible server equipment" means the original server equipment installed within the space it leases from an eligible computer data center on or after April 1, 2010, and replacement server equipment. For purposes of this subsection (6)(((f)(iii))) (g)(iv), "replacement server equipment" means server equipment that:

(A) Replaces existing server equipment, if the sale or use of the server equipment to be replaced qualified for an exemption under this section or RCW 82.12.986; ((and))

(B) Is installed and put into regular use before April 1, ((2020)) 2024; and

(C) For tenants leasing space in an eligible computer data center built after July 1, 2015, is installed and put into regular use no later than twelve years after the date of the certificate of occupancy.

(((g))) (h) "Qualifying business" means a business entity that exists for the primary purpose of engaging in commercial activity for profit and that is the owner of an eligible computer data center. The term does not include the state or federal government or any of their departments, agencies, and institutions; tribal governments; political subdivisions of this state; or any municipal, quasi-municipal, public, or other corporation created by the state or federal government, tribal government, municipality, or political subdivision of the state.

(((h))) (i) "Qualifying tenant" means a business entity that exists for the primary purpose of engaging in commercial activity for profit and that leases space from a qualifying business within an eligible computer data center. The term does not include the state or federal government or any of their departments, agencies, and institutions; tribal governments; political subdivisions of this state; or any municipal, quasi-municipal, public, or other corporation created by the state or federal government, tribal government, municipality, or political subdivision of the state. The term also does not include a lessee of space in an eligible computer data center under (((d))) (e)(i)(C)(I) of this subsection (6), if the lessee and lessor are affiliated and:

(i) That space will be used by the lessee to house server equipment that replaces server equipment previously installed and operated in that eligible computer data center by the lessor or another person affiliated with the lessee; or

(ii) Prior to May 2, 2012, the primary use of the server equipment installed in that eligible computer data center was to provide electronic data storage and data management services for the business purposes of either the lessor, persons affiliated with the lessor, or both.

(((i))) (j) "Server equipment" means the computer hardware located in an eligible computer data center and used exclusively to provide electronic data storage and data management services for internal use by the owner or lessee of the computer data center, for clients of the owner or lessee of the computer data center, or both. "Server equipment" also includes computer software necessary to operate the computer hardware. "Server equipment" does not include personal computers, the racks upon which the server equipment is installed, and computer peripherals such as keyboards, monitors, printers, and mice.

(((7) This section expires April 1, 2020.))

Sec. 303. RCW 82.12.986 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 is provided for the use by qualifying businesses or qualifying tenants of eligible server equipment to be installed, without intervening use, in an eligible computer data center, and to the use of labor and services rendered in respect to installing such server equipment. The exemption also applies to the use by a qualifying business or qualifying tenant of eligible power infrastructure, including labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, altering, or improving such infrastructure.

(2) A qualifying business or a qualifying tenant is not eligible for the exemption under this section unless the department issued an exemption certificate to the qualifying business or a qualifying tenant for the exemption provided in RCW 82.08.986.

(3)(a) The exemption provided in this section does not apply to:

(i) Any person who has received the benefit of the deferral program under chapter 82.60 RCW on: (A) The construction, renovation, or expansion of a structure or structures used as a computer data center; or (B) machinery or equipment used in a computer data center; and

(ii) Any person affiliated with a person within the scope of (a)(i) of this subsection (3).

(b) If a person has received the benefit of the exemption under this section and subsequently receives the benefit of the deferral program under chapter 82.60 RCW on either the construction, renovation, or expansion of a structure or structures used as a computer data center or machinery or equipment used in a computer data center, the person must repay the amount of taxes exempted under this section. Interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW applies to amounts due under this subsection (3)(b) until paid in full. A person is not required to repay taxes under this subsection with respect to property and services for which the person is required to repay taxes under RCW 82.08.986(5).

(4) The definitions and requirements in RCW 82.08.986 apply to this section.

(((5) This section expires April 1, 2020.))

PART IV

Creating a Pilot Program that Provides Incentives for Investments in Washington State Job Creation and Economic Development

NEW SECTION. Sec. 401. (1) Businesses that invest capital create jobs and generate economic activity that supports a healthy Washington economy. The legislature finds that these investments result in future revenues that support schools and our communities. Therefore, the legislature finds that a pilot program must be conducted to evaluate the effectiveness of a program that invests business taxes from new investments into workforce training programs that support manufacturing businesses in the state of Washington thereby creating jobs and capital investments in the state for the benefit of its citizens.

(2)(a) This subsection is the tax preference performance statement for the sales and use tax deferral provided in section 404 of this act on expenditures made to build or expand qualified investment projects and purchases of machinery and equipment. This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(b) The legislature categorizes the tax preference as one intended to create or retain jobs and to provide funding to support job readiness training, professional development, or apprenticeship programs in manufacturing or production occupations, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2) (c) and (f).

(c) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to provide a pilot program that would provide a sales tax deferral on the construction and expenditure costs of up to five new manufacturing facilities, two of which must be located in eastern Washington. When deferred taxes are repaid, the deferred taxes are reinvested to support job readiness training, professional development, or apprenticeship programs in manufacturing or production occupations.

(d) To measure the effectiveness of the deferral provided in this part in achieving the specific public policy objective described in (c) of this subsection, the joint legislative audit and review committee should refer to information available from the employment security department and department of revenue. If a review finds that each eligible investment project generated at least twenty full-time jobs and increased training opportunities for manufacturing and production jobs, then the legislature intends for the legislative auditor to recommend extending the expiration date of the tax preference. For purposes of this subsection (2)(d), full-time jobs includes both temporary construction jobs and permanent full-time employment positions created at the eligible investment project within one year of the date that the facility became operationally complete as determined by the department of revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under this chapter.

(2) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project for qualified buildings and machinery and equipment on five new, renovated, or expanded manufacturing operations, at least two of which must be located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains. The deferral provided in this section only applies to the state and local sales and use taxes due on the first ten million dollars in costs for qualified buildings and machinery and equipment.

(3) "Initiation of construction" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.63.010.

(4) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the project.

(5) "Manufacturing" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.120.

(6) "Person" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.030.

(7) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures, and expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of increasing floor space or production capacity, used for manufacturing, including plant offices and warehouses or other buildings for the storage of raw material or finished goods if such facilities are an essential or an integral part of a factory, mill, plant, or laboratory used for manufacturing. If a qualified building is used partly for manufacturing and partly for other purposes, the applicable tax deferral must be determined by apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the department.

(8) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an integral and necessary part of a manufacturing operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes: Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment; manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all equipment used to control, monitor, or operate the machinery.

(9) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403. The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for a deferral unless:

(1) The underlying ownership of the building, machinery, and equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or

(2)(a) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee;

(b) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey required under RCW 82.32.585; and

(c) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified building and the lessee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404. (1) Application for deferral of taxes under this chapter must be made before initiation of the construction of the investment project or acquisition of equipment or machinery. The application must be made to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The deferrals are available on a first-in-time basis. The application must contain information regarding the location of the investment project, the applicant's average employment in the state for the prior year, estimated or actual new employment related to the project, estimated or actual wages of employees related to the project, estimated or actual costs, time schedules for completion and operation, and other information required by the department. The department must rule on the application within sixty days.

(2) The department may not approve applications for more than five eligible investment projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department must issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, 82.14, and 81.104 RCW on each eligible investment project.

(2) No certificate may be issued for an investment project that has already received a deferral under this part or chapter 82.60 RCW.

(3) The department must keep a running total of all deferrals granted under this chapter during each fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406. (1) The recipient must begin paying the deferred taxes in the fifth year after the date certified by the department as the date on which the investment project has been operationally completed. The first payment of ten percent of the deferred taxes will be due on December 31st of the fifth calendar year after such certified date, with subsequent annual payments of ten percent of the deferred taxes due on December 31st for each of the following nine years.

(2) The department may authorize an accelerated repayment schedule upon request of the recipient.

(3) Interest may not be charged on any taxes deferred under this chapter for the period of deferral, although all other penalties and interest applicable to delinquent excise taxes may be assessed and imposed for delinquent payments under this chapter. The debt for deferred taxes will not be extinguished by insolvency or other failure of the recipient. Transfer of ownership does not terminate the deferral. The deferral is transferred, subject to the successor meeting the eligibility requirements of this chapter, for the remaining periods of the deferral.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407. (1) State taxes deferred and repaid under this chapter, including any interest or penalties on such amounts, must be deposited in the invest in Washington account created in this section. The invest in Washington account is hereby created in the state treasury must be used exclusively by the state board for community and technical colleges for supporting customized training programs, job skills programs, job readiness training, workforce professional development, and to assist employers with state-approved apprenticeship programs for manufacturing and production occupations.

(2) Revenues to the invest in Washington account consist of amounts transferred by the state treasurer as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(3) By June 1, 2016, and by June 1st of every subsequent year, the department must notify the state treasurer of the amount of tax, interest, and penalties collected under this section since the effective date of this chapter through May 1, 2016, in the case of the first notification under this subsection (3), and since the previous May 1st for subsequent notifications under this subsection (3). The department may make adjustments to the annual notification under this subsection (3) as may be necessary to correct errors in the previous notification or offset previous amounts that did not qualify for deferral under this section.

(4) By July 1, 2016, and by July 1st of every subsequent year, the state treasurer must transfer the amount included in the department's most recent notification under subsection (3) of this section from the general fund to the invest in Washington account. Money in the account may only be appropriated for the purposes specified in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408. (1) Each recipient of a deferral of taxes granted under this chapter must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585. If the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in section 403 of this act, the lessee must file a complete annual survey, and the applicant is not required to file a complete annual survey.

(2) If, on the basis of a survey under RCW 82.32.585 or other information, the department finds that an investment project is not eligible for tax deferral under this chapter due to the fact the investment project is no longer used for qualified activities, the amount of deferred taxes outstanding for the investment project is immediately due and payable.

(3) If the economic benefits of a tax deferral under this chapter are passed to a lessee as provided in section 403 of this act, the lessee is responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has received the economic benefit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409. This part may be known and cited as the invest in Washington act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 410. Sections 401 through 408 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 411. The expiration provisions of RCW 82.32.805(1)(a) do not apply to sections 406 through 409 of this act.

PART V

Continuing Tax Preferences for Aluminum Smelters

NEW SECTION. Sec. 501. (1) The legislature finds that the aluminum industry in Washington employs over one thousand people. The legislature further finds that average annual wages and benefits for these employment positions exceed one hundred thousand dollars and that each of these employment positions indirectly generates an additional two to three jobs within the state. The legislature further finds that the aluminum industry generates substantial taxes for local jurisdictions. The legislature further finds that the aluminum industry was severely impacted by the global economic recession. The legislature further finds that the London metal exchange, where aluminum is traded as a commodity, is extremely volatile and substantially impacts the profitability of the aluminum industry. The legislature further finds that for the aforementioned reasons, the industry continues to struggle with profitability, putting the continued employment of its Washington workforce in jeopardy.

(2)(a) This subsection is the tax preference performance statement for the aluminum industry tax preferences in RCW 82.04.2909, 82.04.4481, 82.08.805, 82.12.805, and 82.12.022, as amended in this Part V. The performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(b) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended to accomplish the general purposes indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2) (c) and (d).

(c) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to promote the preservation of employment positions within the Washington aluminum manufacturing industry as the industry continues to grapple with the lingering effects of the economic recession and the volatility of the London metal exchange.

(d) To measure the effectiveness of the exemption provided in this Part V in achieving the specific public policy objective described in (c) of this subsection, the joint legislative audit and review committee must evaluate the changes in the number of statewide employment positions for the aluminum industry in Washington.

Sec. 502. RCW 82.04.2909 and 2011 c 174 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person who is an aluminum smelter engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing aluminum; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.

(2) Upon every person who is an aluminum smelter engaging within this state in the business of making sales at wholesale of aluminum manufactured by that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the aluminum multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.

(3) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(4) This section expires January 1, ((2017)) 2027.

Sec. 503. RCW 82.04.4481 and 2011 c 174 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is allowed for all property taxes paid during the calendar year on property owned by a direct service industrial customer and reasonably necessary for the purposes of an aluminum smelter.

(2) A person claiming the credit under this section is subject to all the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A credit earned during one calendar year may be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in the subsequent calendar year, but may not be carried over a second year. Credits carried over must be applied to tax liability before new credits. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.

(3) Credits may not be claimed under this section for property taxes levied for collection in ((2017)) 2027 and thereafter.

(4) A person claiming the credit provided in this section must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 504. RCW 82.08.805 and 2011 c 174 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who has paid tax under RCW 82.08.020 for personal property used at an aluminum smelter, tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of buildings or other structures at an aluminum smelter, or for labor and services rendered with respect to such buildings, structures, or personal property, is eligible for an exemption from the state share of the tax in the form of a credit, as provided in this section. A person claiming an exemption must pay the tax and may then take a credit equal to the state share of retail sales tax paid under RCW 82.08.020. The person must submit information, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, specifying the amount of qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is claimed and the amount of exempted tax.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "aluminum smelter" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.217.

(3) A person claiming the tax preference provided in this section must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(4) Credits may not be claimed under this section for taxable events occurring on or after January 1, ((2017)) 2027.

Sec. 505. RCW 82.12.805 and 2011 c 174 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who is subject to tax under RCW 82.12.020 for personal property used at an aluminum smelter, or for tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of buildings or other structures at an aluminum smelter, or for labor and services rendered with respect to such buildings, structures, or personal property, is eligible for an exemption from the state share of the tax in the form of a credit, as provided in this section. The amount of the credit equals the state share of use tax computed to be due under RCW 82.12.020. The person must submit information, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, specifying the amount of qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is claimed and the amount of exempted tax.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "aluminum smelter" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.217.

(3) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(4) Credits may not be claimed under this section for taxable events occurring on or after January 1, ((2017)) 2027.

Sec. 506. RCW 82.12.022 and 2014 c 216 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A use tax is levied on every person in this state for the privilege of using natural gas or manufactured gas, including compressed natural gas and liquefied natural gas, within this state as a consumer.

(2) The tax must be levied and collected in an amount equal to the value of the article used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rate in effect for the public utility tax on gas distribution businesses under RCW 82.16.020. The "value of the article used" does not include any amounts that are paid for the hire or use of a gas distribution business as defined in RCW 82.16.010(2) in transporting the gas subject to tax under this subsection if those amounts are subject to tax under that chapter.

(3) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas delivered to the consumer by other means than through a pipeline.

(4) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas if the person who sold the gas to the consumer has paid a tax under RCW 82.16.020 with respect to the gas for which exemption is sought under this subsection.

(5)(a) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas by an aluminum smelter as that term is defined in RCW 82.04.217 before January 1, ((2017)) 2027.

(b) A person claiming the exemption provided in this subsection (5) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(6) The tax imposed by this section does not apply to the use of natural gas, compressed natural gas, or liquefied natural gas, if the consumer uses the gas for transportation fuel as defined in RCW 82.16.310.

(7) There is a credit against the tax levied under this section in an amount equal to any tax paid by:

(a) The person who sold the gas to the consumer when that tax is a gross receipts tax similar to that imposed pursuant to RCW 82.16.020 by another state with respect to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection; or

(b) The person consuming the gas upon which a use tax similar to the tax imposed by this section was paid to another state with respect to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection.

(8) The use tax imposed in this section must be paid by the consumer to the department.

(9) There is imposed a reporting requirement on the person who delivered the gas to the consumer to make a quarterly report to the department. Such report must contain the volume of gas delivered, name of the consumer to whom delivered, and such other information as the department may require by rule.

(10) The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the administration and enforcement of sections 1 through 6, chapter 384, Laws of 1989.

PART VI

Clarifying the Definition of a Newspaper and Extending the B&O Newspaper Preferential Tax Rate

NEW SECTION. Sec. 601. (1) The legislature finds that over the last fifteen years, technological transformation and other developments have radically changed the newspaper industry business model, which remains in transition. The legislature further finds that the economic hardship wrought by this digital transformation has been substantial. The legislature finds that a strong and vibrant newspaper industry in Washington is beneficial to the state's citizens and to the conduct of good government at every level. The legislature further finds that advertising revenue of all United States newspapers fell from 63.5 billion dollars in 2000 to about twenty-three billion dollars in 2013, and is still falling. The legislature further finds that traditional news organizations' ability to support high quality news gathering and reporting relied primarily on a model in which advertisers paid to reach mass audiences attracted by newspapers. The legislature further finds that advertisers found it advantageous to pay to reach a mass audience because other advertising mediums were limited and less effective. The digital era has greatly fractured traditional spending by advertisers and turned this model on its head such that newspapers continue to require time to adapt so they may continue their public service mission. The legislature also finds that the business and occupation tax rate for the newspaper industry was pegged to the general manufacturing and wholesaling rate from 1937 until 2009, when the legislature extended tax relief to the industry due to this shift. It is the legislature's intent to extend this tax relief to the industry until its revenues and business model have stabilized. It is the legislature's further intent to provide a uniform tax rate for the industry to minimize the burden of reporting state business and occupation taxes for different types of revenue, which often times are impossible to account for separately by the taxpayer.

(2)(a) This subsection is the tax preference performance statement for the newspaper tax preferences in section 602 of this act. The performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(b) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended to provide temporary tax relief as described in RCW 82.32.808(2)(e).

(c) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to provide business and occupation tax relief to the newspaper industry as it continues to adjust to significant revenue shifts and technological changes. As a secondary public policy objective, it is the legislature's intent to provide a permanent uniform rate for the industry.

(d) To measure the effectiveness of the preference provided in this act in achieving the specific public policy objective described in (c) of this subsection, the joint legislative audit and review committee must evaluate year-to-year changes in gross revenue derived from all sources for newspaper firms claiming the preferential tax rate under RCW 82.04.260(14). If the average year-to-year change in gross revenue is positive, including the last three years included in the tax preference review by the joint legislative audit and review committee, it is the legislature's intent to allow the tax preference to expire and to reinstate the traditional rate of 0.484 percent.

(e)(i) The information provided in the annual tax preference accountability report submitted by taxpayers as required by the department of revenue and taxpayer data provided by the department of revenue is intended to provide the informational basis for the evaluation under (d) of this subsection.

(ii) In addition to the data source described under (e)(i) of this subsection, the joint legislative audit and review committee may use any other data it deems necessary in performing the evaluation under (d) of this subsection.

Sec. 602. RCW 82.04.260 and 2014 c 140 s 6 and 2014 c 140 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing:

(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;

(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;

(c)(i) Beginning July 1, 2015, dairy products; or selling dairy products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products" means:

(A) Products, not including any marijuana-infused product, that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and

(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by weight or volume.

(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy product;

(d)(i) Beginning July 1, 2015, fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "fruits" and "vegetables" do not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products;

(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and

(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association engaging within this state in research and development, as to such corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an international steamship agent, international customs house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.

(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.

If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.

(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent thereafter.

(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:

(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and

(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.

(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.

(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(e)(i) Except as provided in (e)(ii) of this subsection (11), this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.

(ii) With respect to the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes, this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850 has been sited outside the state of Washington. This subsection (11)(e)(ii) only applies to the manufacturing or sale of commercial airplanes that are the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850.

(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.

(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i) Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products, manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.

(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.

(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent. For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after severance.

(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:

(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.

(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue; kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard, liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of printed materials.

(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.

(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035.

(v) "Timber products" means:

(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;

(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered paper or paper products; and

(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of biocomposite surface products.

(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood windows; and biocomposite surface products.

(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12) must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.

(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of ((0.2904 percent)) 0.35 percent until July 1, 2024, and 0.484 percent thereafter.

(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (14) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603. 2012 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

((Part VI)) Section 602 of this act expires July 1, 2015.

PART VII

Providing a Reduced Public Utility Tax for Log Transportation Businesses

NEW SECTION. Sec. 701. This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preference contained in sections 702 and 703 of this act. This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(1) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended to provide tax relief for certain businesses or individuals, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(e).

(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to support the forest products industry due in part to the industry's efforts to support the local economy by focusing on Washington state based resources thereby reducing global environmental impacts through the manufacturing and use of wood. It is the legislature's intent to provide the forest products industry permanent tax relief by lowering the public utility tax rate attributable to log transportation businesses. Because this reduced public utility rate is intended to be permanent, the reduced rate established in this Part VII is not subject to the ten-year expiration provision in RCW 82.32.805(1)(a).

Sec. 702. RCW 82.16.010 and 2009 c 535 s 1110 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the context:

(1) "Express business" means the business of carrying property for public hire on the line of any common carrier operated in this state, when such common carrier is not owned or leased by the person engaging in such business.

(2) "Gas distribution business" means the business of operating a plant or system for the production or distribution for hire or sale of gas, whether manufactured or natural.

(3) "Gross income" means the value proceeding or accruing from the performance of the particular public service or transportation business involved, including operations incidental thereto, but without any deduction on account of the cost of the commodity furnished or sold, the cost of materials used, labor costs, interest, discount, delivery costs, taxes, or any other expense whatsoever paid or accrued and without any deduction on account of losses.

(4) "Light and power business" means the business of operating a plant or system for the generation, production or distribution of electrical energy for hire or sale and/or for the wheeling of electricity for others.

(5) "Log transportation business" means the business of transporting logs by truck, except when such transportation meets the definition of urban transportation business or occurs exclusively upon private roads.

(6) "Motor transportation business" means the business (except urban transportation business) of operating any motor propelled vehicle by which persons or property of others are conveyed for hire, and includes, but is not limited to, the operation of any motor propelled vehicle as an auto transportation company (except urban transportation business), common carrier, or contract carrier as defined by RCW 81.68.010 and 81.80.010. However, "motor transportation business" does not mean or include: (a) A log transportation business; or (b) the transportation of logs or other forest products exclusively upon private roads or private highways.

(((6))) (7)(a) "Public service business" means any of the businesses defined in subsections (1), (2), (4), (((5), (7),)) (6), (8), (9), (((11), and)) (10), (12), and (13) of this section or any business subject to control by the state, or having the powers of eminent domain and the duties incident thereto, or any business hereafter declared by the legislature to be of a public service nature, except telephone business and low-level radioactive waste site operating companies as redefined in RCW 81.04.010. It includes, among others, without limiting the scope hereof: Airplane transportation, boom, dock, ferry, pipe line, toll bridge, toll logging road, water transportation and wharf businesses.

(b) The definitions in this subsection (((6))) (7)(b) apply throughout this subsection (((6))) (7).

(i) "Competitive telephone service" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.065.

(ii) "Network telephone service" means the providing by any person of access to a telephone network, telephone network switching service, toll service, or coin telephone services, or the providing of telephonic, video, data, or similar communication or transmission for hire, via a telephone network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission system. "Network telephone service" includes the provision of transmission to and from the site of an internet provider via a telephone network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission system. "Network telephone service" does not include the providing of competitive telephone service, the providing of cable television service, the providing of broadcast services by radio or television stations, nor the provision of internet access as defined in RCW 82.04.297, including the reception of dial-in connection, provided at the site of the internet service provider.

(iii) "Telephone business" means the business of providing network telephone service. It includes cooperative or farmer line telephone companies or associations operating an exchange.

(iv) "Telephone service" means competitive telephone service or network telephone service, or both, as defined in (b)(i) and (ii) of this subsection.

(((7))) (8) "Railroad business" means the business of operating any railroad, by whatever power operated, for public use in the conveyance of persons or property for hire. It shall not, however, include any business herein defined as an urban transportation business.

(((8))) (9) "Railroad car business" means the business of operating stock cars, furniture cars, refrigerator cars, fruit cars, poultry cars, tank cars, sleeping cars, parlor cars, buffet cars, tourist cars, or any other kinds of cars used for transportation of property or persons upon the line of any railroad operated in this state when such railroad is not owned or leased by the person engaging in such business.

(((9))) (10) "Telegraph business" means the business of affording telegraphic communication for hire.

(((10))) (11) "Tugboat business" means the business of operating tugboats, towboats, wharf boats or similar vessels in the towing or pushing of vessels, barges or rafts for hire.

(((11))) (12) "Urban transportation business" means the business of operating any vehicle for public use in the conveyance of persons or property for hire, insofar as (a) operating entirely within the corporate limits of any city or town, or within five miles of the corporate limits thereof, or (b) operating entirely within and between cities and towns whose corporate limits are not more than five miles apart or within five miles of the corporate limits of either thereof. Included herein, but without limiting the scope hereof, is the business of operating passenger vehicles of every type and also the business of operating cartage, pickup, or delivery services, including in such services the collection and distribution of property arriving from or destined to a point within or without the state, whether or not such collection or distribution be made by the person performing a local or interstate line-haul of such property.

(((12))) (13) "Water distribution business" means the business of operating a plant or system for the distribution of water for hire or sale.

(((13))) (14) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the term "tax year," "person," "value proceeding or accruing," "business," "engaging in business," "in this state," "within this state," "cash discount" and "successor" shall apply equally in the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 703. RCW 82.16.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected from every person a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after the business, as follows:

(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three and six-tenths percent;

(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths percent;

(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;

(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;

(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats, operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;

(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;

(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent;

(h) Log transportation business: One and twenty-eight one- hundredths percent. The reduced rate established in this subsection (1)(h) is not subject to the ten-year expiration provision in RCW 82.32.805(1)(a).

(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW 82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage collection businesses ((shall)) must be deposited in the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230 from July 1, 2013, through June 30, 2019, and thereafter in the public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050.

PART VIII

Increasing Jobs in the Maritime Trades Industry

NEW SECTION. Sec. 801. (1)(a) The legislature finds that a robust maritime industry is crucial for the state's economic vitality. The legislature further finds that:

(i) The joint task force for economic resilience of maritime and manufacturing established policy goals to continue efforts towards developing a robust maritime industry in the state;

(ii) The maritime industry has a direct and indirect impact on jobs in the state;

(iii) Many of the cities and towns impacted by the maritime industry are often small with limited resources to encourage economic growth, heavily relying on the maritime industry for local jobs and revenues in the community;

(iv) Keeping Washington competitive with other cruising destinations is essential to continue to build a robust maritime economy in the state; and

(v) Tax incentives are an imperative component to improve the state's overall competitiveness in this sector.

(b) Therefore, the legislature intends to:

(i) Bolster the maritime industry in the state by incentivizing larger vessel owners to use Washington waters for recreational boating to increase economic activity and jobs in coastal communities and inland water regions of the state;

(ii) Achieve this objective in a fiscally responsible manner and require analysis of specific metrics to ensure valuable state resources are being used to accomplish the intended goal; and

(iii) Provide limited, short-term tax relief to entity-owned nonresident vessel owners that currently are not afforded the same benefits as other nonresident vessel owners.

(2)(a) This subsection is the tax preference performance statement for the entity-owned nonresident vessel tax preference established in section 803 of this act. The performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(b) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended to accomplish the purposes indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(c) and one intended to improve the state's competitiveness with other nearby cruising destinations.

(c) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to increase economic activity and jobs related to the maritime industry by providing a tax preference for large entity-owned nonresident vessels to increase the length of time these vessels cruise Washington waters in turn strengthening the maritime economy in the state.

(d) To measure the effectiveness of the tax preference provided in part XII of this act in achieving the public policy objective in (c) of this subsection, the joint legislative audit and review committee must provide the following in a published evaluation of this tax preference by December 31, 2024:

(i) A comparison of the gross and taxable revenue generated by businesses that sell or provide maintenance or repair of vessels, prior to and after the enactment of this tax preference;

(ii) Analysis of retail sales taxes collected from the restaurant and service industries in coastal and inlet coastal jurisdictions, for both counties and cities, for periods prior to and after the enactment of this tax preference;

(iii) Employment and wage trends for businesses described in (d)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, for periods prior to and after the enactment of this tax preference;

(iv) Descriptive statistics for the number of permits sold each year in addition to the following information:

(A) The cost for each permit by strata of vessel length;

(B) The jurisdiction of ownership for the nonresident vessel; and

(C) The amount of use tax that would have been due based on the estimated value of the vessel;

(v) A comparison of the number of registered entity-owned and individually owned vessels registered in Washington prior to and after the enactment of this tax preference; and

(vi) Data and analysis for Washington's main cruising destination competitors, specifically looking at tax preferences provided in those jurisdictions, vessel industry income data, and any additional relevant information to compare Washington's maritime climate with its competitors.

(e) The provision of RCW 82.32.808(5) does not apply to this tax preference.

Sec. 802. RCW 88.02.620 and 2011 c 171 s 133 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A vessel owner who is a nonresident ((natural)) person ((shall apply for)) must obtain a nonresident vessel permit on or before the sixty-first day of use in Washington state if the vessel:

(a) Is currently registered or numbered under the laws of the state of principal operation or has been issued a valid number under federal law; and

(b) Has been brought into Washington state for personal use for not more than six months in any continuous twelve-month period.

(2) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this section, a nonresident vessel owner that is not a natural person may only obtain a nonresident vessel permit if:

(a) The vessel is at least thirty feet in length, but no more than one hundred sixty-four feet in length;

(b) No Washington state resident is a principal, as defined in section 805 of this act, of the nonresident person; and

(c) The department of revenue has provided the nonresident vessel owner written approval authorizing the permit as provided in section 805 of this act.

(3) A nonresident vessel permit:

(a) May be obtained from the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director;

(b) Must show the date the vessel first came into Washington state; ((and))

(c) Is valid for two months; and

(d) May not be issued after December 31, 2025, to a nonresident vessel owner that is not a natural person.

(((3))) (4) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director ((shall)) must collect the fee required in RCW 88.02.640(1)(((h))) (i) when issuing nonresident vessel permits.

(((4))) (5) A nonresident vessel permit is not required under this section if the vessel is used in conducting temporary business activity within Washington state.

(((5))) (6) For any permits issued under this section to a nonresident vessel owner that is not a natural person, the department must maintain a record of the following information and provide it to the department of revenue quarterly or as otherwise mutually agreed to by the department and department of revenue:

(a) The name of the record owner of the vessel;

(b) The vessel's hull identification number;

(c) The amount of the fee paid under RCW 88.02.640(5);

(d) The date the vessel first entered the waters of this state;

(e) The expiration date for the permit; and

(f) Any other information mutually agreed to by the department and department of revenue.

(7) The department ((shall)) must adopt rules to implement this section, including rules on issuing and displaying the nonresident vessel permit.

Sec. 803. RCW 88.02.640 and 2013 c 291 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any other fees and taxes required by law, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director ((shall)) must charge the following vessel fees and surcharge:

FEE

AMOUNT

AUTHORITY

DISTRIBUTION

(a) Dealer temporary permit

$5.00

RCW 88.02.800(2)

General fund

(b) Derelict vessel and invasive species removal

Subsection (3) of this section

Subsection (3) of this section

Subsection (3) of this section

(c) Derelict vessel removal surcharge

$1.00

Subsection (4) of this section

Subsection (4) of this section

(d) Duplicate certificate of title

$1.25

RCW 88.02.530(1)(c)

General fund

(e) Duplicate registration

$1.25

RCW 88.02.590(1)(c)

General fund

(f) Filing

RCW 46.17.005

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.400

(g) License plate technology

RCW 46.17.015

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.370

(h) License service

RCW 46.17.025

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.220

(i) Nonresident vessel permit

(($25.00)) Subsection (5) of this section

RCW 88.02.620(((3))) (4)

Subsection (5) of this section

(j) Quick title service

$50.00

RCW 88.02.540(3)

Subsection (7) of this section

(k) Registration

$10.50

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 88.02.650

(l) Replacement decal

$1.25

RCW 88.02.595(1)(c)

General fund

(m) Title application

$5.00

RCW 88.02.515

General fund

(n) Transfer

$1.00

RCW 88.02.560(7)

General fund

(o) Vessel visitor permit

$30.00

RCW 88.02.610(3)

Subsection (6) of this section

(2) The five dollar dealer temporary permit fee required in subsection (1) of this section must be credited to the payment of registration fees at the time application for registration is made.

(3) The derelict vessel and invasive species removal fee required in subsection (1) of this section is five dollars and must be distributed as follows:

(a) One dollar and fifty cents must be deposited in the aquatic invasive species prevention account created in RCW 77.12.879;

(b) One dollar must be deposited into the aquatic algae control account created in RCW 43.21A.667;

(c) Fifty cents must be deposited into the aquatic invasive species enforcement account created in RCW 43.43.400; and

(d) Two dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100.

(4) In addition to other fees required in this section, an annual derelict vessel removal surcharge of one dollar must be charged with each vessel registration. The surcharge is to address the significant backlog of derelict vessels accumulated in Washington waters that pose a threat to the health and safety of the people and to the environment and must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100.

(5) ((The twenty-five dollar nonresident vessel permit fee must be paid by the vessel owner to the department for the cost of providing the identification document by the department)) (a) The amount of the nonresident vessel permit fee is:

(i) For a vessel owned by a nonresident natural person, twenty-five dollars; and

(ii) For a nonresident vessel owner that is not a natural person, the fee is equal to:

(A) Twenty-five dollars per foot for vessels between thirty and ninety-nine feet in length;

(B) Thirty dollars per foot for vessels between one hundred and one hundred twenty feet in length; and

(C) Thirty-seven dollars and fifty cents per foot for vessels between one hundred twenty-one and one hundred sixty-four feet in length. The fee must be multiplied by the extreme length of the vessel in feet, rounded up to the nearest whole foot.

(b) The fee must be paid by the vessel owner to the department. Any moneys remaining from the fee after the payment of costs to administer the permit must be allocated to counties by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.650.

(c) A nonresident vessel owner that is not a natural person may not obtain more than two nonresident vessel permits under RCW 88.02.620 within any thirty-six month period.

(6) The thirty dollar vessel visitor permit fee must be distributed as follows:

(a) Five dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100;

(b) The department may keep an amount to cover costs for providing the vessel visitor permit;

(c) Any moneys remaining must be allocated to counties by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.650; and

(d) Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW 46.17.005 are in addition to any other fee or tax due for the titling and registration of vessels.

(7)(a) The fifty dollar quick title service fee must be distributed as follows:

(i) If the fee is paid to the director, the fee must be deposited to the general fund.

(ii) If the fee is paid to the participating county auditor or other agent or subagent appointed by the director, twenty-five dollars must be deposited to the general fund. The remainder must be retained by the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by the county auditor.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "quick title" has the same meaning as in RCW 88.02.540.

Sec. 804. RCW 88.02.570 and 2010 c 161 s 1018 are each amended to read as follows:

Vessel registration is required under this chapter except for the following:

(1) A military vessel owned by the United States government;

(2) A public vessel owned by the United States government, unless the vessel is a type used for recreation;

(3) A vessel clearly identified as being:

(a) Owned by a state, county, or city; and

(b) Used primarily for governmental purposes;

(4) A vessel either (a) registered or numbered under the laws of a country other than the United States or (b) having a valid United States customs service cruising license issued pursuant to 19 C.F.R. Sec. 4.94. Either vessel is exempt from registration only for the first sixty days of use on Washington state waters. On or before the sixty-first day of use on Washington state waters, any vessel in the state under this subsection must obtain a vessel visitor permit as required under RCW 88.02.610;

(5) A vessel that is currently registered or numbered under the laws of the state of principal operation or that has been issued a valid number under federal law. However, either vessel must be registered in Washington state if the state of principal operation changes to Washington state by the sixty-first day after the vessel arrives in Washington state;

(6)(a) A vessel owned by a nonresident if:

(((a))) (i) The vessel is located upon the waters of this state exclusively for repairs, alteration, or reconstruction, or any testing related to these services;

(((b))) (ii) An employee of the facility providing these services is on board the vessel during any testing; and

(((c))) (iii) The nonresident files an affidavit with the department of revenue by the sixty-first day verifying that the vessel is located upon the waters of this state for these services.

(b) The nonresident ((shall)) must continue to file an affidavit every sixty days thereafter, as long as the vessel is located upon the waters of this state exclusively for repairs, alteration, reconstruction, or testing;

(7) A vessel equipped with propulsion machinery of less than ten horsepower that:

(a) Is owned by the owner of a vessel for which a valid vessel number has been issued;

(b) Displays the number of that numbered vessel followed by the suffix "1" in the manner prescribed by the department; and

(c) Is used as a tender for direct transportation between the numbered vessel and the shore and for no other purpose;

(8) A vessel under sixteen feet in overall length that has no propulsion machinery of any type or that is not used on waters subject to the jurisdiction of the United States or on the high seas beyond the territorial seas for vessels owned in the United States and are powered by propulsion machinery of ten or less horsepower;

(9) A vessel with no propulsion machinery of any type for which the primary mode of propulsion is human power;

(10) A vessel primarily engaged in commerce that has or is required to have a valid marine document as a vessel of the United States. A commercial vessel that the department of revenue determines has the external appearance of a vessel that would otherwise be required to register under this chapter, must display decals issued annually by the department of revenue that indicate the vessel's exempt status;

(11) A vessel primarily engaged in commerce that is owned by a resident of a country other than the United States;

(12) A vessel owned by a nonresident ((natural)) person brought into the state for use or enjoyment while temporarily within the state for not more than six months in any continuous twelve-month period that (a) is currently registered or numbered under the laws of the state of principal use or (b) has been issued a valid number under federal law. This type of vessel is exempt from registration only for the first sixty days of use on Washington state waters. On or before the sixty-first day of use on Washington state waters, any vessel under this subsection must obtain a nonresident vessel permit as required under RCW 88.02.620;

(13) A vessel used in this state by a nonresident individual possessing a valid use permit issued under RCW 82.08.700 or 82.12.700; and

(14) A vessel held for sale by any licensed dealer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805. A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A nonresident vessel owner that is not a natural person must apply directly to the department for written approval to obtain a nonresident vessel permit under RCW 88.02.620. The application must be made to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department and must include:

(a) The name of the record owner of the vessel;

(b) The name, address, and telephone number of the individual that applied for the permit on behalf of the nonresident person;

(c) The record owner's address and telephone number;

(d) The vessel's hull identification number;

(e) The vessel year, make, and model;

(f) The vessel length;

(g) The vessel's registration or numbering under the state of principal operation or the valid number under federal law;

(h) Proof of the person's current nonresident status, including certified copies of the filed articles of incorporation, a certificate of formation, or similar filings;

(i) Proof of the identity and current residency of all principals of the nonresident person. Such proof may include a valid driver's license verifying out-of-state residency or a valid identification card that has a photograph of the holder and is issued by an out-of-state jurisdiction;

(j) An affidavit signed by a principal of the nonresident vessel owner certifying that no Washington residents are principals of the nonresident vessel owner; and

(k) Any other information the department may require.

(2) The department must determine the nonresident vessel owner's eligibility for the permit, as provided in RCW 88.02.620, and may request additional information as needed directly from the nonresident vessel owner.

(3)(a) If the nonresident vessel owner appears eligible for the permit, the department must provide written approval to the nonresident vessel owner that authorizes issuance of the permit and includes the name of the nonresident vessel owner, the name of the vessel, and the hull identification number. After November 30, 2025, the department may not provide written approval for any permits under this subsection.

(b) The department must also provide the information in the written approval to the department of licensing.

(4)(a) If, after a permit has been issued under RCW 88.02.620, the department has reason to believe that the nonresident vessel owner was not eligible for the permit approved under subsection (3) of this section, the department may request such information from the nonresident vessel owner as the department determines is necessary to conduct a review of the nonresident vessel owner's eligibility.

(b) If the department finds the nonresident person was not eligible for the permit, the department must assess against the nonresident person state and local use tax on the value of the vessel according to the "value of the article used" as defined in RCW 82.12.010. The department must also assess against the nonresident person any watercraft excise tax due under chapter 82.49 RCW. Penalties and interest as provided in this chapter and chapter 82.49 RCW apply to taxes assessed under this subsection (4).

(5) For purposes of this section, "principal" means a natural person that owns, directly or indirectly, including through any tiered ownership structure, more than a one percent interest in the nonresident person applying for a nonresident vessel permit.

(6) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

PART IX

Concerning Distribution and Use of Aircraft Excise Taxes

Sec. 901. RCW 82.48.080 and 1995 c 170 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary ((shall)) must regularly pay to the state treasurer the excise taxes collected under this chapter, which ((shall)) must be credited by the state treasurer ((as follows: Ninety percent to the general fund and ten percent)) to the aeronautics account ((in the transportation fund)) for state grants to airports and the administrative expenses associated with grant execution and the collection of excise taxes under this chapter.

PART X

Providing a Business and Occupation Tax Credit for Businesses That Hire Veterans

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001. This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preference contained in sections 1002 and 1003 of this act. This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(1) The legislature categorizes the tax preferences as those intended to induce certain designated behavior by taxpayers and create or retain jobs, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2) (a) and (c).

(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to provide employment for unemployed veterans. It is the legislature's intent to provide employers a credit against the business and occupation tax or public utility tax for hiring unemployed veterans which would reduce an employer's tax burden thereby inducing employers to hire and create jobs for unemployed veterans. Pursuant to chapter 43.136 RCW, the joint legislative audit and review committee must review the business and occupation tax and public utility tax credit established under sections 1002 and 1003 of this act by December 31, 2022.

(3) If a review finds that the number of unemployed veterans decreased by thirty percent, then the legislature intends for the legislative auditor to recommend extending the expiration date of the tax preference.

(4) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in subsection (3) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee should refer to the veteran unemployment rates available from the employment security department and the bureau of labor statistics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002. A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person is allowed a credit against the tax due under this chapter as provided in this section. The credit equals twenty percent of wages and benefits paid to or on behalf of a qualified employee up to a maximum of one thousand five hundred dollars for each qualified employee hired on or after October 1, 2016.

(2) No credit may be claimed under this section until a qualified employee has been employed for at least two consecutive full calendar quarters.

(3) Credits are available on a first-in-time basis. The department must keep a running total of all credits allowed under this section and section 1003 of this act during each fiscal year. The department may not allow any credits that would cause the total credits allowed under this section and section 1003 of this act to exceed five hundred thousand dollars in any fiscal year. If all or part of a claim for credit is disallowed under this subsection, the disallowed portion is carried over to the next fiscal year. However, the carryover into the next fiscal year is only permitted to the extent that the cap for the next fiscal year is not exceeded. Priority must be given to credits carried over from a previous fiscal year. The department must provide written notice to any person who has claimed tax credits in excess of the limitation in this subsection. The notice must indicate the amount of tax due and provide that the tax be paid within thirty days from the date of the notice. The department may not assess penalties and interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW on the amount due in the initial notice if the amount due is paid by the due date specified in the notice, or any extension thereof.

(4) The credit may be used against any tax due under this chapter, and may be carried over until used, except as provided in subsection (9) of this section. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.

(5) If an employer discharges a qualified employee for whom the employer has claimed a credit under this section, the employer may not claim a new credit under this section for a period of one year from the date the qualified employee was discharged. However, this subsection (5) does not apply if the qualified employee was discharged for misconduct, as defined in RCW 50.04.294, connected with his or her work or discharged due to a felony or gross misdemeanor conviction, and the employer contemporaneously documents the reason for discharge.

(6) Credits earned under this section may be claimed only on returns filed electronically with the department using the department's online tax filing service or other method of electronic reporting as the department may authorize. No application is required to claim the credit, but the taxpayer must keep records necessary for the department to determine eligibility under this section including records establishing the person's status as a veteran and status as unemployed when hired by the taxpayer.

(7) No person may claim a credit against taxes due under both this chapter and chapter 82.16 RCW for the same qualified employee.

(8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)(i) "Qualified employee" means an unemployed veteran who is employed in a permanent full-time position for at least two consecutive full calendar quarters. For seasonal employers, "qualified employee" also includes the equivalent of a full-time employee in work hours for two consecutive full calendar quarters.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (8)(a), "full time" means a normal work week of at least thirty-five hours.

(b) "Unemployed" means that the veteran was unemployed as defined in RCW 50.04.310 for at least thirty days immediately preceding the date that the veteran was hired by the person claiming credit under this section for hiring the veteran.

(c) "Veteran" means every person who has received an honorable discharge or received a general discharge under honorable conditions or is currently serving honorably, and who has served as a member in any branch of the armed forces of the United States, including the national guard and armed forces reserves.

(9) Credits allowed under this section can be earned for tax reporting periods through June 30, 2022. No credits can be claimed after June 30, 2023.

(10) This section expires July 1, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003. A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person is allowed a credit against the tax due under this chapter as provided in this section. The credit equals twenty percent of wages and benefits paid to or on behalf of a qualified employee up to a maximum of one thousand five hundred dollars for each qualified employee hired on or after October 1, 2016.

(2) No credit may be claimed under this section until a qualified employee has been employed for at least two consecutive full calendar quarters.

(3) Credits are available on a first-in-time basis. The department must keep a running total of all credits allowed under this section and section 1002 of this act during each fiscal year. The department may not allow any credits that would cause the total credits allowed under this section and section 1002 of this act to exceed five hundred thousand dollars in any fiscal year. If all or part of a claim for credit is disallowed under this subsection, the disallowed portion is carried over to the next fiscal year. However, the carryover into the next fiscal year is only permitted to the extent that the cap for the next fiscal year is not exceeded. Priority must be given to credits carried over from a previous fiscal year. The department must provide written notice to any person who has claimed tax credits in excess of the limitation in this subsection. The notice must indicate the amount of tax due and provide that the tax be paid within thirty days from the date of the notice. The department may not assess penalties and interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW on the amount due in the initial notice if the amount due is paid by the due date specified in the notice, or any extension thereof.

(4) The credit may be used against any tax due under this chapter, and may be carried over until used, except as provided in subsection (9) of this section. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.

(5) If an employer discharges a qualified employee for whom the employer has claimed a credit under this section, the employer may not claim a new credit under this section for a period of one year from the date the qualified employee was discharged. However, this subsection (5) does not apply if the qualified employee was discharged for misconduct, as defined in RCW 50.04.294, connected with his or her work or discharged due to a felony or gross misdemeanor conviction, and the employer contemporaneously documents the reason for discharge.

(6) Credits earned under this section may be claimed only on returns filed electronically with the department using the department's online tax filing service or other method of electronic reporting as the department may authorize. No application is required to claim the credit, but the taxpayer must keep records necessary for the department to determine eligibility under this section including records establishing the person's status as a veteran and status as unemployed when hired by the taxpayer.

(7) No person may claim a credit against taxes due under both chapter 82.04 RCW and this chapter for the same qualified employee.

(8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)(i) "Qualified employee" means an unemployed veteran who is employed in a permanent full-time position for at least two consecutive full calendar quarters. For seasonal employers, "qualified employee" also includes the equivalent of a full-time employee in work hours for two consecutive full calendar quarters.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (8)(a), "full time" means a normal work week of at least thirty-five hours.

(b) "Unemployed" means that the veteran was unemployed as defined in RCW 50.04.310 for at least thirty days immediately preceding the date that the veteran was hired by the person claiming credit under this section for hiring the veteran.

(c) "Veteran" means every person who has received an honorable discharge or received a general discharge under honorable conditions or is currently serving honorably, and who has served as a member in any branch of the armed forces of the United States, including the national guard and armed forces reserves.

(9) Credits allowed under this section can be earned for tax reporting periods through June 30, 2022. No credits can be claimed after June 30, 2023.

(10) This section expires July 1, 2023.

PART XI

Defining Honey Bee Products and Services as an Agricultural Product

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101. This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preference contained in this Part XI. This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to support the honey bee industry and provide tax relief to eligible apiarists. Honey bees pollinate eighty percent of the nation's flowering crops, which include agricultural crops. They are vitally important to agriculture and an integral part of food production. Therefore, the legislature intends to permanently include eligible apiarists within the definition of farmer and define honey bee products as agricultural products so that they may receive the same tax relief as that provided to other sectors of agriculture. Because the legislature intends for the changes in this Part XI to be permanent, they are exempt from the ten-year expiration provision in RCW 82.32.805.

Sec. 1102. RCW 82.04.213 and 2014 c 140 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Agricultural product" means any product of plant cultivation or animal husbandry including, but not limited to: A product of horticulture, grain cultivation, vermiculture, viticulture, or aquaculture as defined in RCW 15.85.020; plantation Christmas trees; short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035; turf; or any animal including but not limited to an animal that is a private sector cultured aquatic product as defined in RCW 15.85.020, or a bird, or insect, or the substances obtained from such an animal including honey bee products. "Agricultural product" does not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products, or animals defined as pet animals under RCW 16.70.020.

(2)(a) "Farmer" means any person engaged in the business of growing, raising, or producing, upon the person's own lands or upon the lands in which the person has a present right of possession, any agricultural product to be sold, and the growing, raising, or producing honey bee products for sale, or providing bee pollination services, by an eligible apiarist. "Farmer" does not include a person growing, raising, or producing such products for the person's own consumption; a person selling any animal or substance obtained therefrom in connection with the person's business of operating a stockyard or a slaughter or packing house; or a person in respect to the business of taking, cultivating, or raising timber.

(b) "Eligible apiarist" means a person who owns or keeps one or more bee colonies and who grows, raises, or produces honey bee products for sale at wholesale and is registered under RCW 15.60.021.

(c) "Honey bee products" means queen honey bees, packaged honey bees, honey, pollen, bees wax, propolis, or other substances obtained from honey bees. "Honey bee products" does not include manufactured substances or articles.

(3) The terms "agriculture," "farming," "horticulture," "horticultural," and "horticultural product" may not be construed to include or relate to marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products unless the applicable term is explicitly defined to include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

(4) "Marijuana," "useable marijuana," and "marijuana-infused products" have the same meaning as in RCW 69.50.101.

Sec. 1103. RCW 82.04.330 and 2014 c 140 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not apply to any farmer in respect to the sale of any agricultural product at wholesale or to any farmer who grows, raises, or produces agricultural products owned by others, such as custom feed operations. This exemption does not apply to any person selling such products at retail or to any person selling manufactured substances or articles. This chapter does not apply to bee pollination services provided to a farmer by an eligible apiarist.

(2) This chapter also does not apply to any persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve program or its successor administered by the United States department of agriculture with respect to land enrolled in that program.

Sec. 1104. RCW 82.04.050 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 802 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person who:

(i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of business without intervening use by such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or

(ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component of such real or personal property without intervening use by such person; or

(iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or

(iv) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(v) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065; or

(vi) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty without intervening use by such person.

(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection following such use.

(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280(1) (a), (b), and (g), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.

(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:

(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities, and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals, birds and insects;

(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation, and also includes the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;

(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original owner;

(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing buildings or structures, but does not include the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term "janitorial services" means those cleaning and caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery. The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering, repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or sandblasting;

(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;

(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real property, and it is presumed that the occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it is presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;

(g) The installing, repairing, altering, or improving of digital goods for consumers;

(h) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this subsection may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section may be construed to modify this subsection.

(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and other service emoluments however designated, received by persons engaging in the following business activities:

(a)(i) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers.

(ii) Until July 1, 2017, amusement and recreation services do not include the opportunity to dance provided by an establishment in exchange for a cover charge.

(iii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(a):

(A) "Cover charge" means a charge, regardless of its label, to enter an establishment or added to the purchaser's bill by an establishment or otherwise collected after entrance to the establishment, and the purchaser is provided the opportunity to dance in exchange for payment of the charge.

(B) "Opportunity to dance" means that an establishment provides a designated physical space, on either a temporary or permanent basis, where customers are allowed to dance and the establishment either advertises or otherwise makes customers aware that it has an area for dancing;

(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;

(c) Credit bureau services;

(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;

(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an electric utility;

(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional sporting events; and

(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services, tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.

(4)(a) The term also includes the renting or leasing of tangible personal property to consumers.

(b) The term does not include the renting or leasing of tangible personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of sublease or subrent.

(5) The term also includes the providing of "competitive telephone service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary services," as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.

(6)(a) The term also includes the sale of prewritten computer software to a consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end user. For purposes of ((this subsection (6)))(a) and (b) of this subsection, the sale of prewritten computer software includes the sale of or charge made for a key or an enabling or activation code, where the key or code is required to activate prewritten computer software and put the software into use. There is no separate sale of the key or code from the prewritten computer software, regardless of how the sale may be characterized by the vendor or by the purchaser.

(b) The term "retail sale" does not include the sale of or charge made for:

(i) Custom software; or

(ii) The customization of prewritten computer software.

(((b))) (c)(i) The term also includes the charge made to consumers for the right to access and use prewritten computer software, where possession of the software is maintained by the seller or a third party, regardless of whether the charge for the service is on a per use, per user, per license, subscription, or some other basis.

(ii)(A) The service described in (((b))) (c)(i) of this subsection (6) includes the right to access and use prewritten computer software to perform data processing.

(B) For purposes of this subsection (6)(((b))) (c)(ii), "data processing" means the systematic performance of operations on data to extract the required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to usable information. Data processing includes check processing, image processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing, claim processing, and similar activities.

(7) The term also includes the sale of or charge made for an extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection, "extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property, labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010.

(8)(a) The term also includes the following sales to consumers of digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services:

(i) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right of permanent use;

(ii) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of use that is less than permanent;

(iii) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale; and

(iv) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale.

(b) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services under this subsection (8) includes any services provided by the seller exclusively in connection with the digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, "permanent" means perpetual or for an indefinite or unspecified length of time. A right of permanent use is presumed to have been granted unless the agreement between the seller and the purchaser specifies or the circumstances surrounding the transaction suggest or indicate that the right to use terminates on the occurrence of a condition subsequent.

(9) The term also includes the charge made for providing tangible personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (9), an operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.

(10) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind.

(11) The term also does not include sales of chemical sprays or washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor does it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their successors administered by the United States department of agriculture; (b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; (c) farmers for the purpose of providing bee pollination services; and (((c))) (d) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.

(12) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development.

(13) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency, as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.

(14) The term does not include the sale for resale of any service described in this section if the sale would otherwise constitute a "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this section.

Sec. 1105. RCW 82.04.050 and 2015 c 169 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person who:

(i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of business without intervening use by such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or

(ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component of such real or personal property without intervening use by such person; or

(iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or

(iv) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(v) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065; or

(vi) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty without intervening use by such person.

(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection following such use.

(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280(1) (a), (b), and (g), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.

(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:

(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities, and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals, birds and insects;

(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation, and also includes the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;

(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original owner;

(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing buildings or structures, but does not include the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term "janitorial services" means those cleaning and caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery. The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering, repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or sandblasting;

(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;

(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real property, and it is presumed that the occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it is presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;

(g) The installing, repairing, altering, or improving of digital goods for consumers;

(h) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this subsection may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section may be construed to modify this subsection.

(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and other service emoluments however designated, received by persons engaging in the following business activities:

(a) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;

(b) Credit bureau services;

(c) Automobile parking and storage garage services;

(d) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an electric utility;

(e) Service charges associated with tickets to professional sporting events;

(f) The following personal services: Tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services; and

(g)(i) Operating an athletic or fitness facility, including all charges for the use of such a facility or for any associated services and amenities, except as provided in (g)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in (g)(i) of this subsection (3), the term "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this subsection does not include:

(A) Separately stated charges for the use of an athletic or fitness facility where such use is primarily for a purpose other than engaging in or receiving instruction in a physical fitness activity;

(B) Separately stated charges for the use of a discrete portion of an athletic or fitness facility, other than a pool, where such discrete portion of the facility does not by itself meet the definition of "athletic or fitness facility" in this subsection;

(C) Separately stated charges for services, such as advertising, massage, nutritional consulting, and body composition testing, that do not require the customer to engage in physical fitness activities to receive the service. The exclusion in this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(C) does not apply to personal training services and instruction in a physical fitness activity;

(D) Separately stated charges for physical therapy provided by a physical therapist, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.74.010, or occupational therapy provided by an occupational therapy practitioner, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.59.020, when performed pursuant to a referral from an authorized health care practitioner or in consultation with an authorized health care practitioner. For the purposes of this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(D), an authorized health care practitioner means a health care practitioner licensed under chapter 18.83, 18.25, 18.36A, 18.57, 18.57A, 18.71, or 18.71A RCW;

(E) Rent or association fees charged by a landlord or residential association to a tenant or residential owner with access to an athletic or fitness facility maintained by the landlord or residential association, unless the rent or fee varies depending on whether the tenant or owner has access to the facility;

(F) Services provided in the regular course of employment by an employee with access to an athletic or fitness facility maintained by the employer for use without charge by its employees or their family members;

(G) The provision of access to an athletic or fitness facility by an educational institution to its students and staff. However, charges made by an educational institution to its alumni or other members of the public for the use of any of the educational institution's athletic or fitness facilities are a retail sale under this subsection (3)(g). For purposes of this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(G), "educational institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.170; and

(H) Yoga, tai chi, or chi gong classes held at a community center, park, gymnasium, college or university, hospital or other medical facility, private residence, or any facility that is not primarily used for physical fitness activities other than yoga, tai chi, or chi gong classes.

(iii) Nothing in (g)(ii) of this subsection (3) may be construed to affect the taxation of sales made by the operator of an athletic or fitness facility, where such sales are defined as a retail sale under any provision of this section other than this subsection (3).

(iv) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(g), the following definitions apply:

(A) "Athletic or fitness facility" means an indoor or outdoor facility or portion of a facility that is primarily used for: Exercise classes; strength and conditioning programs; personal training services; tennis, racquetball, handball, squash, or pickleball; yoga; boxing, kickboxing, wrestling, martial arts, or mixed martial arts training; or other activities requiring the use of exercise or strength training equipment, such as treadmills, elliptical machines, stair climbers, stationary cycles, rowing machines, pilates equipment, balls, climbing ropes, jump ropes, and weightlifting equipment.

(B) "Physical fitness activities" means activities that involve physical exertion for the purpose of improving or maintaining the general fitness, strength, flexibility, conditioning, or health of the participant.

(4)(a) The term also includes the renting or leasing of tangible personal property to consumers.

(b) The term does not include the renting or leasing of tangible personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of sublease or subrent.

(5) The term also includes the providing of "competitive telephone service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary services," as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.

(6)(a) The term also includes the sale of prewritten computer software to a consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end user. For purposes of ((this subsection (6)))(a) and (b) of this subsection, the sale of prewritten computer software includes the sale of or charge made for a key or an enabling or activation code, where the key or code is required to activate prewritten computer software and put the software into use. There is no separate sale of the key or code from the prewritten computer software, regardless of how the sale may be characterized by the vendor or by the purchaser.

(b) The term "retail sale" does not include the sale of or charge made for:

(i) Custom software; or

(ii) The customization of prewritten computer software.

(((b))) (c)(i) The term also includes the charge made to consumers for the right to access and use prewritten computer software, where possession of the software is maintained by the seller or a third party, regardless of whether the charge for the service is on a per use, per user, per license, subscription, or some other basis.

(ii)(A) The service described in (((b))) (c)(i) of this subsection (6) includes the right to access and use prewritten computer software to perform data processing.

(B) For purposes of this subsection (6)(((b))) (c)(ii), "data processing" means the systematic performance of operations on data to extract the required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to usable information. Data processing includes check processing, image processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing, claim processing, and similar activities.

(7) The term also includes the sale of or charge made for an extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection, "extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property, labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010.

(8)(a) The term also includes the following sales to consumers of digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services:

(i) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right of permanent use;

(ii) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of use that is less than permanent;

(iii) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale; and

(iv) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale.

(b) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services under this subsection (8) includes any services provided by the seller exclusively in connection with the digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, "permanent" means perpetual or for an indefinite or unspecified length of time. A right of permanent use is presumed to have been granted unless the agreement between the seller and the purchaser specifies or the circumstances surrounding the transaction suggest or indicate that the right to use terminates on the occurrence of a condition subsequent.

(9) The term also includes the charge made for providing tangible personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (9), an operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.

(10) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind.

(11) The term also does not include sales of chemical sprays or washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor does it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their successors administered by the United States department of agriculture; (b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; (c) farmers for the purpose of providing bee pollination services; and (((c))) (d) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.

(12) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development.

(13) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency, as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.

(14) The term does not include the sale for resale of any service described in this section if the sale would otherwise constitute a "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this section.

(15)(a) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes amounts charged, however labeled, to consumers to engage in any of the activities listed in this subsection (15)(a), including the furnishing of any associated equipment or, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, providing instruction in such activities, where such charges are not otherwise defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" in this section:

(i)(A) Golf, including any variant in which either golf balls or golf clubs are used, such as miniature golf, hitting golf balls at a driving range, and golf simulators, and including fees charged by a golf course to a player for using his or her own cart. However, charges for golf instruction are not a retail sale, provided that if the instruction involves the use of a golfing facility that would otherwise require the payment of a fee, such as green fees or driving range fees, such fees, including the applicable retail sales tax, must be separately identified and charged by the golfing facility operator to the instructor or the person receiving the instruction.

(B) Notwithstanding (a)(i)(A) of this subsection (15) and except as otherwise provided in this subsection (15)(a)(i)(B), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include amounts charged to participate in, or conduct, a golf tournament or other competitive event. However, amounts paid by event participants to the golf facility operator are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(i). Likewise, amounts paid by the event organizer to the golf facility are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(i), if such amounts vary based on the number of event participants;

(ii) Ballooning, hang gliding, indoor or outdoor sky diving, paragliding, parasailing, and similar activities;

(iii) Air hockey, billiards, pool, foosball, darts, shuffleboard, ping pong, and similar games;

(iv) Access to amusement park, theme park, and water park facilities, including but not limited to charges for admission and locker or cabana rentals. Discrete charges for rides or other attractions or entertainment that are in addition to the charge for admission are not a retail sale under this subsection (15)(a)(iv). For the purposes of this subsection, an amusement park or theme park is a location that provides permanently affixed amusement rides, games, and other entertainment, but does not include parks or zoos for which the primary purpose is the exhibition of wildlife, or fairs, carnivals, and festivals as defined in (b)(i) of this subsection;

(v) Batting cage activities;

(vi) Bowling, but not including competitive events, except that amounts paid by the event participants to the bowling alley operator are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(vi). Likewise, amounts paid by the event organizer to the operator of the bowling alley are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(vi), if such amounts vary based on the number of event participants;

(vii) Climbing on artificial climbing structures, whether indoors or outdoors;

(viii) Day trips for sightseeing purposes;

(ix) Bungee jumping, zip lining, and riding inside a ball, whether inflatable or otherwise;

(x) Horseback riding offered to the public, where the seller furnishes the horse to the buyer and providing instruction is not the primary focus of the activity, including guided rides, but not including therapeutic horseback riding provided by an instructor certified by a nonprofit organization that offers national or international certification for therapeutic riding instructors;

(xi) Fishing, including providing access to private fishing areas and charter or guided fishing, except that fishing contests and license fees imposed by a government entity are not a retail sale under this subsection;

(xii) Guided hunting and hunting at game farms and shooting preserves, except that hunting contests and license fees imposed by a government entity are not a retail sale under this subsection;

(xiii) Swimming, but only in respect to (A) recreational or fitness swimming that is open to the public, such as open swim, lap swimming, and special events like kids night out and pool parties during open swim time, and (B) pool parties for private events, such as birthdays, family gatherings, and employee outings. Fees for swimming lessons, to participate in swim meets and other competitions, or to join a swim team, club, or aquatic facility are not retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(xiii);

(xiv) Go-karting, bumper cars, and other motorized activities where the seller provides the vehicle and the premises where the buyer will operate the vehicle;

(xv) Indoor or outdoor playground activities, such as inflatable bounce structures and other inflatables; mazes; trampolines; slides; ball pits; games of tag, including laser tag and soft-dart tag; and human gyroscope rides, regardless of whether such activities occur at the seller's place of business, but not including playground activities provided for children by a licensed child day care center or licensed family day care provider as those terms are defined in RCW 43.215.010;

(xvi) Shooting sports and activities, such as target shooting, skeet, trap, sporting clays, "5" stand, and archery, but only in respect to discrete charges to members of the public to engage in these activities, but not including fees to enter a competitive event, instruction that is entirely or predominately classroom based, or to join or renew a membership at a club, range, or other facility;

(xvii) Paintball and airsoft activities;

(xviii) Skating, including ice skating, roller skating, and inline skating, but only in respect to discrete charges to members of the public to engage in skating activities, but not including skating lessons, competitive events, team activities, or fees to join or renew a membership at a skating facility, club, or other organization;

(xix) Nonmotorized snow sports and activities, such as downhill and cross-country skiing, snowboarding, ski jumping, sledding, snow tubing, snowshoeing, and similar snow sports and activities, whether engaged in outdoors or in an indoor facility with or without snow, but only in respect to discrete charges to the public for the use of land or facilities to engage in nonmotorized snow sports and activities, such as fees, however labeled, for the use of ski lifts and tows and daily or season passes for access to trails or other areas where nonmotorized snow sports and activities are conducted. However, fees for the following are not retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(xix): (A) Instructional lessons; (B) permits issued by a governmental entity to park a vehicle on or access public lands; and (C) permits or leases granted by an owner of private timberland for recreational access to areas used primarily for growing and harvesting timber; and

(xx) Scuba diving; snorkeling; river rafting; surfing; kiteboarding; flyboarding; water slides; inflatables, such as water pillows, water trampolines, and water rollers; and similar water sports and activities.

(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this subsection (15), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include charges:

(i) Made for admission to, and rides or attractions at, fairs, carnivals, and festivals. For the purposes of this subsection, fairs, carnivals, and festivals are events that do not exceed twenty-one days and a majority of the amusement rides, if any, are not affixed to real property;

(ii) Made by an educational institution to its students and staff for activities defined as retail sales by (a)(i) through (xx) of this subsection. However, charges made by an educational institution to its alumni or other members of the general public for these activities are a retail sale under this subsection (15). For purposes of this subsection (15)(b)(ii), "educational institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.170;

(iii) Made by a vocational school for commercial diver training that is licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW; or

(iv) Made for day camps offered by a nonprofit organization or state or local governmental entity that provide youth not older than age eighteen, or that are focused on providing individuals with disabilities or mental illness, the opportunity to participate in a variety of supervised activities.

Sec. 1106. RCW 82.08.855 and 2014 c 97 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale to an eligible farmer of:

(a) Replacement parts for qualifying farm machinery and equipment;

(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to the installing of replacement parts; and

(c) Labor and services rendered in respect to the repairing of qualifying farm machinery and equipment, provided that during the course of repairing no tangible personal property is installed, incorporated, or placed in, or becomes an ingredient or component of, the qualifying farm machinery and equipment other than replacement parts.

(2)(a) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, if a single transaction involves services that are not exempt under this section and services that would be exempt under this section if provided separately, the exemptions provided in subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section apply if: (i) The seller makes a separately itemized charge for labor and services described in subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section; and (ii) the separately itemized charge does not exceed the seller's usual and customary charge for such services.

(b) If the requirements in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection (2) are met, the exemption provided in subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section applies to the separately itemized charge for labor and services described in subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section.

(3)(a) A purchaser claiming an exemption under this section must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. Sellers making tax-exempt sales under this section must obtain an exemption certificate from the purchaser in a form and manner prescribed by the department. In lieu of an exemption certificate, a seller may capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate or the data elements for the seller's files.

(b)(i) For a person who is an eligible farmer as defined in subsection (4)(b)(iv) of this section, the exemption is conditioned upon:

(A) The eligible farmer having gross sales or a harvested value of agricultural products grown, raised, or produced by that person or gross sales of bee pollination services of at least ten thousand dollars in the first full tax year in which the person engages in business as a farmer; or

(B) The eligible farmer, during the first full tax year in which that person engages in business as a farmer, growing, raising, or producing agricultural products or bee pollination services having an estimated value at any time during that year of at least ten thousand dollars, if the person will not sell or harvest an agricultural product or bee pollination service during the first full tax year in which the person engages in business as a farmer.

(ii) If a person fails to meet the condition provided in (b)(i)(A) or (B) of this subsection, the person must repay any taxes exempted under this section. Any taxes for which an exemption under this section was claimed are due and payable to the department within thirty days of the end of the first full tax year in which the person engages in business as a farmer. The department must assess interest on the taxes for which the exemption was claimed as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the date the exemption was claimed, and accrues until the taxes for which the exemption was claimed are paid. Penalties may not be imposed on any tax required to be paid under this subsection (3) (b)(ii) if full payment is received by the due date.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Agricultural products" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.213.

(b) "Eligible farmer" means:

(i) A farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213 whose gross sales or harvested value of agricultural products grown, raised, or produced by that person or gross sales of bee pollination services was at least ten thousand dollars for the immediately preceding tax year;

(ii) A farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213 whose agricultural products had an estimated value of at least ten thousand dollars for the immediately preceding tax year, if the person did not sell or harvest an agricultural product or bee pollination service during that year;

(iii) A farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213 who has merely changed identity or the form of ownership of an entity that was an eligible farmer, where there was no change in beneficial ownership, and the combined gross sales, harvested value, or estimated value of agricultural products or bee pollination services by both entities met the requirements of (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection for the immediately preceding tax year;

(iv) A farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213((,)) who does not meet the definition of "eligible farmer" in (b)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection, and who did not engage in farming for the entire immediately preceding tax year, because the farmer is either new to farming or newly returned to farming; or

(v) Anyone who otherwise meets the definition of "eligible farmer" in this subsection except that they are not a "person" as defined in RCW 82.04.030.

(c) "Farm vehicle" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.181.

(d) "Harvested value" means the number of units of the agricultural product that were grown, raised, or produced, multiplied by the average sales price of the agricultural product. For purposes of this subsection (4)(d), "average sales price" means the average price per unit of agricultural product received by farmers in this state as reported by the United States department of agriculture's national agricultural statistics service for the twelve-month period that coincides with, or that ends closest to, the end of the relevant tax year, regardless of whether the prices are subject to revision. If the price per unit of an agricultural product received by farmers in this state is not available from the national agricultural statistics service, average sales price may be determined by using the average price per unit of agricultural product received by farmers in this state as reported by a recognized authority for the agricultural product.

(e) "Qualifying farm machinery and equipment" means machinery and equipment used primarily by an eligible farmer for growing, raising, or producing agricultural products, providing bee pollination services, or both. "Qualifying farm machinery and equipment" does not include:

(i) Vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.670, other than farm tractors as defined in RCW 46.04.180, farm vehicles, and other farm implements. For purposes of this subsection (4)(e)(i), "farm implement" means machinery or equipment manufactured, designed, or reconstructed for agricultural purposes and used primarily by an eligible farmer to grow, raise, or produce agricultural products, but does not include lawn tractors and all-terrain vehicles;

(ii) Aircraft;

(iii) Hand tools and hand-powered tools; and

(iv) Property with a useful life of less than one year.

(f)(i) "Replacement parts" means those parts that replace an existing part, or which are essential to maintain the working condition, of a piece of qualifying farm machinery or equipment.

(ii) Paint, fuel, oil, hydraulic fluids, antifreeze, and similar items are not replacement parts except when installed, incorporated, or placed in qualifying farm machinery and equipment during the course of installing replacement parts as defined in (f)(i) of this subsection or making repairs as described in subsection (1)(c) of this section.

(g) "Tax year" means the period for which a person files its federal income tax return, irrespective of whether the period represents a calendar year, fiscal year, or some other consecutive twelve-month period. If a person is not required to file a federal income tax return, "tax year" means a calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1107. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 82.04.629 (Exemptions—Honey bee products) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 306 & 2008 c 314 s 2;

(2) RCW 82.04.630 (Exemptions—Bee pollination services) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 307 & 2008 c 314 s 3;

(3) RCW 82.08.0204 (Exemptions—Honey bees) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 308 & 2008 c 314 s 4;

(4) RCW 82.12.0204 (Exemptions—Honey bees) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 309 & 2008 c 314 s 5;

(5) RCW 82.08.200 (Exemptions—Honey beekeepers) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 302;

(6) RCW 82.12.200 (Exemptions—Honey beekeepers) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 303; and

(7) RCW 43.136.047 (Beekeeper evaluation) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 304.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1108. The legislature intends for the amendments in this act to be permanent. Therefore, the amendments in Part XI of this act are exempt from the provision in RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808.

PART XII

Concerning the Taxation of Wax and Ceramic Materials Used to Make Molds

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1201. (1) This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preference contained in section 1202 of this act. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(2) The legislature categorizes the tax preference created in this act as one intended to reduce structural inefficiencies in the tax structure as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(d).

(3) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to provide permanent tax relief that corrects the structural inefficiencies under RCW 82.08.983 with regard to wax and ceramic materials used to create molds during the process of creating ferrous and nonferrous investment castings used in industrial applications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1202. 2010 c 225 s 4 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1203. As this part is intended to create a permanent tax exemption, the tax preference in this act is not subject to the expiration date requirements in RCW 82.32.805 and is not subject to the requirements in RCW 82.32.808(4).

PART XIII

[NOT USED]

PART XIV

[NOT USED]

PART XV

[NOT USED]

PART XVI

[NOT USED]

PART XVII

[NOT USED]

PART XVIII

[NOT USED]

PART XIX

Concerning a Hazardous Substance Tax Exemption for Certain Hazardous Substances that Are Used as Agricultural Crop Protection Products and Warehoused but not Otherwise Used, Manufactured, Packaged, or Sold in this State

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1901. A new section is added to chapter 82.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature categorizes the tax preference in section 1902 of this act as one intended to improve industry competitiveness, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(b).

(2) The legislature's specific public policy objective is to clarify an existing exemption from the hazardous substance tax for agricultural crop protection products to incentivize storing products in Washington state as they are engaged in interstate commerce. The legislature finds that the agricultural industry is a vital component of Washington's economy, providing thousands of jobs throughout the state. The legislature further finds that Washington state is the ideal location for distribution centers for agricultural crop protection products because Washington is an efficient transportation hub for Pacific Northwest farmers, and encourages crop protection products to be managed in the most protective facilities, and transported using the most sound environmental means. However, products being warehoused in the state are diminishing because agricultural crop protection products are being redirected to out-of-state distribution centers as a direct result of Washington's tax burden. Relocation of this economic activity is detrimental to Washington's economy through the direct loss of jobs and hazardous substance tax revenue, thereby negatively impacting the supply chain for Washington farmers, thereby causing increased transportation usage and risk of spillage, thereby failing to encourage the most environmentally protective measures. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to encourage the regional competitiveness of agricultural distribution by clarifying an exemption from the hazardous substance tax for agricultural crop protection products that are manufactured out-of-state, warehoused or transported into the state, but ultimately shipped and sold out of Washington state.

(3) If a review finds an average increase in revenue of the hazardous substance tax, then the legislature intends to extend the expiration date of the tax preference.

(4) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in subsection (3) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may refer to data available from the department of revenue.

Sec. 1902. RCW 82.21.040 and 1989 c 2 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The following are exempt from the tax imposed in this chapter:

(1) Any successive possession of a previously taxed hazardous substance. If tax due under this chapter has not been paid with respect to a hazardous substance, the department may collect the tax from any person who has had possession of the hazardous substance. If the tax is paid by any person other than the first person having taxable possession of a hazardous substance, the amount of tax paid shall constitute a debt owed by the first person having taxable possession to the person who paid the tax.

(2) Any possession of a hazardous substance by a natural person under circumstances where the substance is used, or is to be used, for a personal or domestic purpose (and not for any business purpose) by that person or a relative of, or person residing in the same dwelling as, that person.

(3) Any possession of a hazardous substance amount which is determined as minimal by the department of ecology and which is possessed by a retailer for the purpose of making sales to ultimate consumers. This exemption does not apply to pesticide or petroleum products.

(4) Any possession of alumina or natural gas.

(5)(a) Any possession of a hazardous substance as defined in RCW 82.21.020(1)(c) that is solely for use by a farmer or certified applicator as an agricultural crop protection product and warehoused in this state or transported to or from this state, provided that the person possessing the substance does not otherwise use, manufacture, package for sale, or sell the substance in this state.

(b) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(i) "Agricultural crop protection product" means a chemical regulated under the federal insecticide, fungicide, and rodenticide act, 7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 as amended as of the effective date of this section, when used to prevent, destroy, repel, mitigate, or control predators, diseases, weeds, or other pests.

(ii) "Certified applicator" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 17.21.020.

(iii) "Farmer" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.213.

(iv) "Manufacturing" includes mixing or combining agricultural crop protection products with other chemicals or other agricultural crop protection products.

(v) "Package for sale" includes transferring agricultural crop protection products from one container to another, including the transfer of fumigants and other liquid or gaseous chemicals from one tank to another.

(vi) "Use" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.12.010.

(6) Persons or activities which the state is prohibited from taxing under the United States Constitution.

(((6) Any persons possessing a hazardous substance where such possession first occurred before March 1, 1989.))

PART XX

Concerning the Taxation of Certain Rented Property Owned by Nonprofit Fair Associations

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001. (1) This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preference contained in section 2002 of this act. This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(2) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as intended to accomplish a general purpose not identified in RCW 82.32.808(2) (a) through (e).

(3) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to support nonprofit fairs that obtained a majority of their property from a city or county between 1995 and 1998. The legislature intends to make their property tax exemption permanent, while requiring the collection of leasehold excise tax on any rentals of their exempt property that exceed fifty consecutive days. Because the legislature intends for the changes in this Part XX to be permanent, they are exempt from the ten-year expiration provision in RCW 82.32.805(1)(a).

Sec. 2002. RCW 84.36.480 and 2013 c 212 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the real and personal property of a nonprofit fair association that sponsors or conducts a fair or fairs that is eligible to receive support from the fair fund, as created in RCW 15.76.115 and allocated by the director of the department of agriculture, is exempt from taxation. To be exempt under this subsection (1), the property must be used exclusively for fair purposes, except as provided in RCW 84.36.805. However, the loan or rental of property otherwise exempt under this section to a private concessionaire or to any person for use as a concession in conjunction with activities permitted under this section ((shall)) do not nullify the exemption if the concession charges are subject to agreement and the rental income, if any, is reasonable and is devoted solely to the operation and maintenance of the property.

(2)(a) Except as provided otherwise in this subsection and subsection (3) of this section, the real and personal property owned by a nonprofit fair association organized under chapter 24.06 RCW and used for fair purposes is exempt from taxation if the majority of such property, as determined by assessed value, was purchased or acquired by the same nonprofit fair association from a county or a city between 1995 and 1998.

(b) ((The exemption under this subsection (2) may not be claimed for taxes levied for collection in 2019 and thereafter.)) The use of exempt property for rental purposes does not negate the exemption under this subsection. However, any rental exceeding fifty consecutive days during any calendar year is subject to leasehold excise tax under chapter 82.29A RCW. For purposes of this subsection, "rental" means a lease, permit, license, or any other agreement granting possession and use, to a degree less than fee simple ownership, between the nonprofit fair association and a person who would not be exempt from property taxes if that person owned the property in fee.

(3) A nonprofit fair association with real and personal property having an assessed value of more than fifteen million dollars is not eligible for the exemptions under this section.

Sec. 2003. RCW 82.29A.020 and 2014 c 207 s 3 and 2014 c 140 s 26 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context requires otherwise.

(1)(a) "Leasehold interest" means an interest in publicly owned, or specified privately owned, real or personal property which exists by virtue of any lease, permit, license, or any other agreement, written or verbal, between the ((public)) owner of the property and a person who would not be exempt from property taxes if that person owned the property in fee, granting possession and use, to a degree less than fee simple ownership. However, no interest in personal property (excluding land or buildings) which is owned by the United States, whether or not as trustee, or by any foreign government may constitute a leasehold interest hereunder when the right to use such property is granted pursuant to a contract solely for the manufacture or production of articles for sale to the United States or any foreign government. The term "leasehold interest" includes the rights of use or occupancy by others of property which is owned in fee or held in trust by a public corporation, commission, or authority created under RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660 if the property is listed on or is within a district listed on any federal or state register of historical sites.

(b) The term "leasehold interest" does not include:

(i) Road or utility easements, rights of access, occupancy, or use granted solely for the purpose of removing materials or products purchased from ((a public)) an owner or the lessee of ((a public)) an owner, or rights of access, occupancy, or use granted solely for the purpose of natural energy resource exploration; or

(ii) The preferential use of publicly owned cargo cranes and docks and associated areas used in the loading and discharging of cargo located at a port district marine facility. "Preferential use" means that publicly owned real or personal property is used by a private party under a written agreement with the public owner, but the public owner or any third party maintains a right to use the property when not being used by the private party.

(((c) "Publicly owned real or personal property" includes real or personal property owned by a federally recognized Indian tribe in the state and exempt from tax under RCW 84.36.010.))

(2)(a) "Taxable rent" means contract rent as defined in (c) of this subsection in all cases where the lease or agreement has been established or renegotiated through competitive bidding, or negotiated or renegotiated in accordance with statutory requirements regarding the rent payable, or negotiated or renegotiated under circumstances, established by public record, clearly showing that the contract rent was the maximum attainable by the lessor. With respect to a leasehold interest in privately owned property, "taxable rent" means contract rent. However, after January 1, 1986, with respect to any lease which has been in effect for ten years or more without renegotiation, taxable rent may be established by procedures set forth in (g) of this subsection. All other leasehold interests are subject to the determination of taxable rent under the terms of (g) of this subsection.

(b) For purposes of determining leasehold excise tax on any lands on the Hanford reservation subleased to a private or public entity by the department of ecology, taxable rent includes only the annual cash rental payment made by such entity to the department of ecology as specifically referred to as rent in the sublease agreement between the parties and does not include any other fees, assessments, or charges imposed on or collected by such entity irrespective of whether the private or public entity pays or collects such other fees, assessments, or charges as specified in the sublease agreement.

(c) "Contract rent" means the amount of consideration due as payment for a leasehold interest, including: The total of cash payments made to the lessor or to another party for the benefit of the lessor according to the requirements of the lease or agreement, including any rents paid by a sublessee; expenditures for the protection of the lessor's interest when required by the terms of the lease or agreement; and expenditures for improvements to the property to the extent that such improvements become the property of the lessor. Where the consideration conveyed for the leasehold interest is made in combination with payment for concession or other rights granted by the lessor, only that portion of such payment which represents consideration for the leasehold interest is part of contract rent.

(d) "Contract rent" does not include: (i) Expenditures made by the lessee, which under the terms of the lease or agreement, are to be reimbursed by the lessor to the lessee or expenditures for improvements and protection made pursuant to a lease or an agreement which requires that the use of the improved property be open to the general public and that no profit will inure to the lessee from the lease; (ii) expenditures made by the lessee for the replacement or repair of facilities due to fire or other casualty including payments for insurance to provide reimbursement for losses or payments to a public or private entity for protection of such property from damage or loss or for alterations or additions made necessary by an action of government taken after the date of the execution of the lease or agreement; (iii) improvements added to publicly owned property by a sublessee under an agreement executed prior to January 1, 1976, which have been taxed as personal property of the sublessee prior to January 1, 1976, or improvements made by a sublessee of the same lessee under a similar agreement executed prior to January 1, 1976, and such improvements are taxable to the sublessee as personal property; (iv) improvements added to publicly owned property if such improvements are being taxed as personal property to any person.

(e) Any prepaid contract rent is considered to have been paid in the year due and not in the year actually paid with respect to prepayment for a period of more than one year. Expenditures for improvements with a useful life of more than one year which are included as part of contract rent must be treated as prepaid contract rent and prorated over the useful life of the improvement or the remaining term of the lease or agreement if the useful life is in excess of the remaining term of the lease or agreement. Rent prepaid prior to January 1, 1976, must be prorated from the date of prepayment.

(f) With respect to a "product lease", the value is that value determined at the time of sale under terms of the lease.

(g) If it is determined by the department of revenue, upon examination of a lessee's accounts or those of a lessor of publicly owned property, that a lessee is occupying or using publicly owned property in such a manner as to create a leasehold interest and that such leasehold interest has not been established through competitive bidding, or negotiated in accordance with statutory requirements regarding the rent payable, or negotiated under circumstances, established by public record, clearly showing that the contract rent was the maximum attainable by the lessor, the department may establish a taxable rent computation for use in determining the tax payable under authority granted in this chapter based upon the following criteria: (i) Consideration must be given to rental being paid to other lessors by lessees of similar property for similar purposes over similar periods of time; (ii) consideration must be given to what would be considered a fair rate of return on the market value of the property leased less reasonable deductions for any restrictions on use, special operating requirements or provisions for concurrent use by the lessor, another person or the general public.

(3) "Product lease" as used in this chapter means a lease of property for use in the production of agricultural or marine products, not including the production of marijuana as defined in RCW 69.50.101, to the extent that such lease provides for the contract rent to be paid by the delivery of a stated percentage of the production of such agricultural or marine products to the credit of the lessor or the payment to the lessor of a stated percentage of the proceeds from the sale of such products.

(4) "Renegotiated" means a change in the lease agreement which changes the agreed time of possession, restrictions on use, the rate of the cash rental or of any other consideration payable by the lessee to or for the benefit of the lessor, other than any such change required by the terms of the lease or agreement. In addition "renegotiated" means a continuation of possession by the lessee beyond the date when, under the terms of the lease agreement, the lessee had the right to vacate the premises without any further liability to the lessor.

(5) "City" means any city or town.

(6) "Products" includes natural resource products such as cut or picked evergreen foliage, Cascara bark, wild edible mushrooms, native ornamental trees and shrubs, ore and minerals, natural gas, geothermal water and steam, and forage removed through the grazing of livestock.

(7) "Publicly owned, or specified privately owned, real or personal property" includes real or personal property:

(a) Owned in fee or held in trust by a public entity and exempt from property tax under the laws or Constitution of this state or the Constitution of the United States;

(b) Owned by a federally recognized Indian tribe in the state and exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.010;

(c) Owned by a nonprofit fair association exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.480(2), but only with respect to that portion of the fair's property subject to the tax imposed in this chapter pursuant to RCW 84.36.480(2)(b); or

(d) Owned by a community center exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.010.

Sec. 2004. RCW 82.29A.020 and 2014 c 140 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context requires otherwise.

(1)(a) "Leasehold interest" means an interest in publicly owned, or specified privately owned, real or personal property which exists by virtue of any lease, permit, license, or any other agreement, written or verbal, between the ((public)) owner of the property and a person who would not be exempt from property taxes if that person owned the property in fee, granting possession and use, to a degree less than fee simple ownership. However, no interest in personal property (excluding land or buildings) which is owned by the United States, whether or not as trustee, or by any foreign government may constitute a leasehold interest hereunder when the right to use such property is granted pursuant to a contract solely for the manufacture or production of articles for sale to the United States or any foreign government. The term "leasehold interest" includes the rights of use or occupancy by others of property which is owned in fee or held in trust by a public corporation, commission, or authority created under RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660 if the property is listed on or is within a district listed on any federal or state register of historical sites.

(b) The term "leasehold interest" does not include:

(i) Road or utility easements, rights of access, occupancy, or use granted solely for the purpose of removing materials or products purchased from ((a public)) an owner or the lessee of ((a public)) an owner, or rights of access, occupancy, or use granted solely for the purpose of natural energy resource exploration((. "Leasehold interest" does not include)); or

(ii) The preferential use of publicly owned cargo cranes and docks and associated areas used in the loading and discharging of cargo located at a port district marine facility. "Preferential use" means that publicly owned real or personal property is used by a private party under a written agreement with the public owner, but the public owner or any third party maintains a right to use the property when not being used by the private party.

(2)(a) "Taxable rent" means contract rent as defined in (c) of this subsection in all cases where the lease or agreement has been established or renegotiated through competitive bidding, or negotiated or renegotiated in accordance with statutory requirements regarding the rent payable, or negotiated or renegotiated under circumstances, established by public record, clearly showing that the contract rent was the maximum attainable by the lessor. With respect to a leasehold interest in privately owned property, "taxable rent" means contract rent. However, after January 1, 1986, with respect to any lease which has been in effect for ten years or more without renegotiation, taxable rent may be established by procedures set forth in (g) of this subsection. All other leasehold interests are subject to the determination of taxable rent under the terms of (g) of this subsection.

(b) For purposes of determining leasehold excise tax on any lands on the Hanford reservation subleased to a private or public entity by the department of ecology, taxable rent includes only the annual cash rental payment made by such entity to the department of ecology as specifically referred to as rent in the sublease agreement between the parties and does not include any other fees, assessments, or charges imposed on or collected by such entity irrespective of whether the private or public entity pays or collects such other fees, assessments, or charges as specified in the sublease agreement.

(c) "Contract rent" means the amount of consideration due as payment for a leasehold interest, including: The total of cash payments made to the lessor or to another party for the benefit of the lessor according to the requirements of the lease or agreement, including any rents paid by a sublessee; expenditures for the protection of the lessor's interest when required by the terms of the lease or agreement; and expenditures for improvements to the property to the extent that such improvements become the property of the lessor. Where the consideration conveyed for the leasehold interest is made in combination with payment for concession or other rights granted by the lessor, only that portion of such payment which represents consideration for the leasehold interest is part of contract rent.

(d) "Contract rent" does not include: (i) Expenditures made by the lessee, which under the terms of the lease or agreement, are to be reimbursed by the lessor to the lessee or expenditures for improvements and protection made pursuant to a lease or an agreement which requires that the use of the improved property be open to the general public and that no profit will inure to the lessee from the lease; (ii) expenditures made by the lessee for the replacement or repair of facilities due to fire or other casualty including payments for insurance to provide reimbursement for losses or payments to a public or private entity for protection of such property from damage or loss or for alterations or additions made necessary by an action of government taken after the date of the execution of the lease or agreement; (iii) improvements added to publicly owned property by a sublessee under an agreement executed prior to January 1, 1976, which have been taxed as personal property of the sublessee prior to January 1, 1976, or improvements made by a sublessee of the same lessee under a similar agreement executed prior to January 1, 1976, and such improvements are taxable to the sublessee as personal property; (iv) improvements added to publicly owned property if such improvements are being taxed as personal property to any person.

(e) Any prepaid contract rent is considered to have been paid in the year due and not in the year actually paid with respect to prepayment for a period of more than one year. Expenditures for improvements with a useful life of more than one year which are included as part of contract rent must be treated as prepaid contract rent and prorated over the useful life of the improvement or the remaining term of the lease or agreement if the useful life is in excess of the remaining term of the lease or agreement. Rent prepaid prior to January 1, 1976, must be prorated from the date of prepayment.

(f) With respect to a "product lease", the value is that value determined at the time of sale under terms of the lease.

(g) If it is determined by the department of revenue, upon examination of a lessee's accounts or those of a lessor of publicly owned property, that a lessee is occupying or using publicly owned property in such a manner as to create a leasehold interest and that such leasehold interest has not been established through competitive bidding, or negotiated in accordance with statutory requirements regarding the rent payable, or negotiated under circumstances, established by public record, clearly showing that the contract rent was the maximum attainable by the lessor, the department may establish a taxable rent computation for use in determining the tax payable under authority granted in this chapter based upon the following criteria: (i) Consideration must be given to rental being paid to other lessors by lessees of similar property for similar purposes over similar periods of time; (ii) consideration must be given to what would be considered a fair rate of return on the market value of the property leased less reasonable deductions for any restrictions on use, special operating requirements or provisions for concurrent use by the lessor, another person or the general public.

(3) "Product lease" as used in this chapter means a lease of property for use in the production of agricultural or marine products, not including the production of marijuana as defined in RCW 69.50.101, to the extent that such lease provides for the contract rent to be paid by the delivery of a stated percentage of the production of such agricultural or marine products to the credit of the lessor or the payment to the lessor of a stated percentage of the proceeds from the sale of such products.

(4) "Renegotiated" means a change in the lease agreement which changes the agreed time of possession, restrictions on use, the rate of the cash rental or of any other consideration payable by the lessee to or for the benefit of the lessor, other than any such change required by the terms of the lease or agreement. In addition "renegotiated" means a continuation of possession by the lessee beyond the date when, under the terms of the lease agreement, the lessee had the right to vacate the premises without any further liability to the lessor.

(5) "City" means any city or town.

(6) "Products" includes natural resource products such as cut or picked evergreen foliage, Cascara bark, wild edible mushrooms, native ornamental trees and shrubs, ore and minerals, natural gas, geothermal water and steam, and forage removed through the grazing of livestock.

(7) "Publicly owned, or specified privately owned, real or personal property" includes real or personal property:

(a) Owned in fee or held in trust by a public entity and exempt from property tax under the laws or Constitution of this state or the Constitution of the United States;

(b) Owned by a federally recognized Indian tribe in the state and exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.010;

(c) Owned by a nonprofit fair association exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.480(2), but only with respect to that portion of the fair's property subject to the tax imposed in this chapter pursuant to RCW 84.36.480(2)(b); or

(d) Owned by a community center exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.010.

Sec. 2005. RCW 82.29A.030 and 2010 c 281 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(((a))) There is levied and collected a leasehold excise tax on the act or privilege of occupying or using publicly owned, or specified privately owned, real or personal property ((or real or personal property of a community center)) through a leasehold interest on and after January 1, 1976, at a rate of twelve percent of taxable rent. However, after the computation of the tax a credit is allowed for any tax collected pursuant to RCW 82.29A.040.

(((b) For the purposes of this subsection, "community center" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 84.36.010.))

(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW 82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 2006. RCW 82.29A.040 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 61 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative body of any county or city is hereby authorized to levy and collect a leasehold excise tax on the act or privilege of occupying or using publicly owned, or specified privately owned, real or personal property through a leasehold interest ((in publicly owned property)) within the territorial limits of such county or city. The tax levied by a county under authority of this section shall not exceed six percent and the tax levied by a city shall not exceed four percent of taxable rent((: PROVIDED, That)). However, any county ordinance levying such tax shall contain a provision allowing a credit against the county tax for the full amount of any city tax imposed upon the same taxable event.

(2) The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of such county or city.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007. Sections 2003, 2005, and 2006 of this act apply with respect to taxable rent, as defined in RCW 82.29A.020, payable on or after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008. Section 2002 of this act applies to taxes levied for collection in 2019 and thereafter.

PART XXI

Improving the Administration of Unclaimed Property Laws

Sec. 2101. RCW 63.29.020 and 2011 c 116 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, all intangible property, including any income or increment derived therefrom, less any lawful charges, that is held, issued, or owing in the ordinary course of the holder's business and has remained unclaimed by the owner for more than three years after it became payable or distributable is presumed abandoned.

(2) Property, with the exception of unredeemed Washington state lottery tickets and unpresented winning parimutuel tickets, is payable and distributable for the purpose of this chapter notwithstanding the owner's failure to make demand or to present any instrument or document required to receive payment.

(3) This chapter does not apply to claims drafts issued by insurance companies representing offers to settle claims unliquidated in amount or settled by subsequent drafts or other means.

(4) This chapter does not apply to property covered by chapter 63.26 RCW.

(5) This chapter does not apply to used clothing, umbrellas, bags, luggage, or other used personal effects if such property is disposed of by the holder as follows:

(a) In the case of personal effects of negligible value, the property is destroyed; or

(b) The property is donated to a bona fide charity.

(6) This chapter does not apply to a gift certificate ((subject to the prohibition against expiration dates under RCW 19.240.020 or to a gift certificate subject to RCW 19.240.030 through 19.240.060. However, this chapter applies to)) lawfully issued under chapter 19.240 RCW, except lawfully issued gift certificates presumed abandoned under RCW 63.29.110. Nothing in this section limits the application of chapter 19.240 RCW.

(7) Except as provided in RCW 63.29.350, this chapter does not apply to excess proceeds held by counties, cities, towns, and other municipal or quasi-municipal corporations from foreclosures for delinquent property taxes, assessments, or other liens.

(8)(a) This chapter does not apply to a premium paid by an agricultural fair by check.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection the following definitions apply:

(i) "Agricultural fair" means a fair or exhibition that is intended to promote agriculture by including a balanced variety of exhibits of livestock and agricultural products, as well as related manufactured products and arts, including: Products of the farm home and educational contests, displays, and demonstrations designed to train youth and to promote the welfare of farmers and rural living; and

(ii) "Premium" means an amount paid for exhibits and educational contests, displays, and demonstrations of an educational nature. A "premium" does not include judges' fees and expenses; livestock sale revenues; or prizes or amounts paid for promotion or entertainment activities such as queen contests, parades, dances, rodeos, and races.

Sec. 2102. RCW 63.29.140 and 2004 c 168 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A gift certificate or a credit memo issued in the ordinary course of an issuer's business which remains unclaimed by the owner for more than three years after becoming payable or distributable is presumed abandoned.

(2) In the case of a gift certificate, the amount presumed abandoned is the price paid by the purchaser for the gift certificate. In the case of a credit memo, the amount presumed abandoned is the amount credited to the recipient of the memo.

(3) A gift certificate that is lawfully issued under chapter 19.240 RCW and that is presumed abandoned under this section may, but need not be, included in the report as provided under RCW 63.29.170(4). ((If a gift certificate that is presumed abandoned under this section is not timely reported as provided under RCW 63.29.170(4), RCW 19.240.005 through 19.240.110 apply to the gift certificate.))

Sec. 2103. RCW 63.29.170 and 2004 c 168 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person holding property presumed abandoned and subject to custody as unclaimed property under this chapter ((shall)) must report to the department concerning the property as provided in this section.

(2) The report must be verified and must include:

(a) Except with respect to travelers checks and money orders, the name, if known, and last known address, if any, of each person appearing from the records of the holder to be the owner of property with a value of more than fifty dollars presumed abandoned under this chapter;

(b) In the case of unclaimed funds of more than fifty dollars held or owing under any life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract, the full name and last known address of the insured or annuitant and of the beneficiary according to the records of the insurance company holding or owing the funds;

(c) In the case of the contents of a safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository or in the case of other tangible property, a description of the property and the place where it is held and where it may be inspected by the department, and any amounts owing to the holder;

(d) The nature and identifying number, if any, or description of the property and the amount appearing from the records to be due, but items with a value of fifty dollars or less each may be reported in the aggregate;

(e) The date the property became payable, demandable, or returnable, and the date of the last transaction with the apparent owner with respect to the property; and

(f) Other information the department prescribes by rule as necessary for the administration of this chapter.

(3) If the person holding property presumed abandoned and subject to custody as unclaimed property is a successor to other persons who previously held the property for the apparent owner or the holder has changed his or her name while holding the property, the holder shall file with the report all known names and addresses of each previous holder of the property.

(4) The report must be filed before November 1st of each year and shall include, except as provided in RCW 63.29.140(3), all property presumed abandoned and subject to custody as unclaimed property under this chapter that is in the holder's possession as of the preceding June 30th. On written request by any person required to file a report, the department may postpone the reporting date.

(5)(a) Beginning July 1, 2016, reports due under this section must be filed electronically in a form or manner provided or authorized by the department. However, the department, upon request or its own initiative, may relieve any holder or class of holders from the electronic filing requirement under this subsection for good cause as determined by the department.

(b) For purposes of this subsection, "good cause" means:

(i) A circumstance or condition exists that, in the department's judgment, prevents the holder from electronically filing the report due under this section; or

(ii) The department determines that relief from the electronic filing requirement under this subsection supports the efficient or effective administration of this chapter.

(6) After May 1st, but before August 1st, of each year in which a report is required by this section, the holder in possession of property presumed abandoned and subject to custody as unclaimed property under this chapter ((shall)) must send written notice to the apparent owner at the last known address informing him or her that the holder is in possession of property subject to this chapter if:

(a) The holder has in its records an address for the apparent owner which the holder's records do not disclose to be inaccurate;

(b) The claim of the apparent owner is not barred by the statute of limitations; and

(c) The property has a value of more than seventy-five dollars.

Sec. 2104. RCW 63.29.180 and 2005 c 367 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department ((shall)) must cause a notice to be published not later than November 1st, immediately following the report required by RCW 63.29.170 in the printed or online version of a newspaper of general circulation within this state, which the department determines is most likely to give notice to the apparent owner of the property.

(2) The published notice must be entitled "Notice to Owners of Unclaimed Property" and contain a summary explanation of how owners may obtain information about unclaimed property reported to the department.

(3) Not later than September 1st, immediately following the report required by RCW 63.29.170, the department ((shall)) must mail a notice to each person whose last known address is listed in the report and who appears to be entitled to property with a value of more than seventy-five dollars presumed abandoned under this chapter and any beneficiary of a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract for whom the department has a last known address. The department is not required to mail notice under this subsection if the address listed in the report appears to the department to be insufficient for the purpose of the delivery of mail.

(4) The mailed notice must contain:

(a) A statement that, according to a report filed with the department, property is being held to which the addressee appears entitled; and

(b) The name of the person reporting the property and the type of property described in the report.

(5) This section is not applicable to sums payable on travelers checks, money orders, and other written instruments presumed abandoned under RCW 63.29.040.

Sec. 2105. RCW 63.29.190 and 2005 c 502 s 4, 2005 c 367 s 3, and 2005 c 285 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a person who is required to file a report under RCW 63.29.170 ((shall)) must pay or deliver to the department all abandoned property required to be reported at the time of filing the report. Beginning July 1, 2016, holders who are required to file a report electronically under this chapter must remit payments under this section by electronic funds transfer or other form of electronic payment acceptable to the department. However, the department, upon request or its own initiative, may relieve any holder or class of holders from the electronic payment requirement under this subsection for good cause as determined by the department.

(b) For purposes of this subsection, "good cause" means:

(i) A circumstance or condition exists that, in the department's judgment, prevents the holder from remitting payments due under this section electronically; or

(ii) The department determines that relief from the electronic payment requirement under this subsection supports the efficient or effective administration of this chapter.

(2)(a) Counties, cities, towns, and other municipal and quasi-municipal corporations that hold funds representing warrants canceled pursuant to RCW 36.22.100 and 39.56.040, uncashed checks, and property tax overpayments or refunds may retain the funds until the owner notifies them and establishes ownership as provided in RCW 63.29.135. Counties, cities, towns, or other municipal or quasi-municipal corporations ((shall)) must provide to the department a report of property it is holding pursuant to this section. The report ((shall)) must identify the property and owner in the manner provided in RCW 63.29.170 and the department ((shall)) must publish the information as provided in RCW 63.29.180.

(b)(i) A public transportation authority that holds funds representing value on abandoned fare cards may retain the funds until the owner notifies the authority and establishes ownership as provided in RCW 63.29.135.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (2)(b), "public transportation authority" means a municipality, as defined in RCW 35.58.272, a regional transit authority authorized by chapter 81.112 RCW, a public mass transportation system authorized by chapter 47.60 RCW, or a city transportation authority authorized by chapter 35.95A RCW.

(3)(a) The contents of a safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository presumed abandoned under RCW 63.29.160 and reported under RCW 63.29.170 ((shall)) must be paid or delivered to the department within six months after the final date for filing the report required by RCW 63.29.170.

(b) If the owner establishes the right to receive the abandoned property to the satisfaction of the holder before the property has been delivered or it appears that for some other reason the presumption of abandonment is erroneous, the holder need not pay or deliver the property to the department, and the property will no longer be presumed abandoned. In that case, the holder ((shall)) must file with the department a verified written explanation of the proof of claim or of the error in the presumption of abandonment.

(4) The holder of an interest under RCW 63.29.100 ((shall)) must deliver a duplicate certificate or other evidence of ownership if the holder does not issue certificates of ownership to the department. Upon delivery of a duplicate certificate to the department, the holder and any transfer agent, registrar, or other person acting for or on behalf of a holder in executing or delivering the duplicate certificate is relieved of all liability of every kind in accordance with RCW 63.29.200 to every person, including any person acquiring the original certificate or the duplicate of the certificate issued to the department, for any losses or damages resulting to any person by the issuance and delivery to the department of the duplicate certificate.

Sec. 2106. RCW 63.29.290 and 1983 c 179 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The expiration, after September 1, 1979, of any period of time specified by contract, statute, or court order, during which a claim for money or property can be made or during which an action or proceeding may be commenced or enforced to obtain payment of a claim for money or to recover property, does not prevent the money or property from being presumed abandoned or affect any duty to file a report or to pay or deliver abandoned property to the department as required by this chapter.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no action or proceeding may be commenced by the department with respect to any duty of a holder under this chapter more than six years after the duty arose.

(3) No action or proceeding may be commenced by the department with respect to any assessment under this chapter more than three years after the later of (a) the due date for payment of the assessment including any extension granted by the department or (b) thirty days after the final decision on any petition for review under section 2111 of this act.

Sec. 2107. RCW 63.29.300 and 1983 c 179 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may require any person who has not filed a report to file a verified report stating whether or not the person is holding any unclaimed property reportable or deliverable under this chapter. Nothing in this chapter requires reporting of property which is not subject to payment or delivery.

(2) The department, at reasonable times and upon reasonable notice, may examine the records of any person to determine whether the person has complied with the provisions of this chapter. The department may conduct the examination even if the person believes it is not in possession of any property reportable or deliverable under this chapter.

(3) If a person is treated under RCW 63.29.120 as the holder of the property only insofar as the interest of the business association in the property is concerned, the department, pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, may examine the records of the person if the department has given the notice required by subsection (2) of this section to both the person and the business association at least ninety days before the examination.

(4) Material obtained by any person during any examination authorized under this chapter, or whether the holder was, is being, or will be examined or subject to an examination, is confidential information and may not be disclosed to any person except as provided in RCW 63.29.380.

(5) If an examination of the records of a person results in the disclosure of property reportable and payable or deliverable under this chapter, the department must assess against the person the amount that should have been reported and paid as determined or approved by the department. An assessment must also include a demand to deliver any property that should have been reported and delivered to the department under this chapter. The assessment must include interest and penalties as provided in RCW 63.29.340. The department may assess the cost of the examination against the holder at the rate of one hundred forty dollars a day for each examiner, but in no case may the charges exceed the lesser of three thousand dollars or the value of the property found to be reportable and payable or deliverable. No assessment ((shall)) for costs may be imposed ((where)) when the person proves that failure to report and deliver property was inadvertent. The cost of examination made pursuant to subsection (3) of this section may be imposed only against the business association.

(((5))) (6) If a holder fails after June 30, 1983, to maintain the records required by RCW 63.29.310 and the records of the holder available for the periods subject to this chapter are insufficient to permit the preparation of a report, the department may ((require the holder to report and pay)) assess such amounts as may reasonably be estimated from any available records.

(7)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, all amounts and property identified in any assessment issued by the department under this section must be paid or delivered to the department within thirty days of issuance.

(b) If a timely petition for review of an assessment is filed with the department as provided in section 2111 of this act, only the uncontested amounts and property must be paid or delivered to the department within thirty days of the issuance of the assessment.

Sec. 2108. RCW 63.29.340 and 2011 c 96 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who fails to pay or deliver property ((within the time prescribed by this chapter shall be)) when due is required to pay to the department interest at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2) from the date the property should have been paid or delivered until the property is paid or delivered((, unless)). However, the department must waive or cancel interest imposed under this subsection if:

(a) The department finds that the failure to pay or deliver the property within the time prescribed by this chapter was the result of circumstances beyond the person's control sufficient for waiver or cancellation of interest under RCW 82.32.105;

(b) The failure to timely pay or deliver the property within the time prescribed by this chapter was the direct result of written instructions given to the person by the department; or

(c) The extension of a due date for payment or delivery under an assessment issued by the department was not at the person's request and was for the sole convenience of the department.

(2) ((A person who willfully fails to render any report, to pay or deliver property, or to perform other duties required under this chapter shall pay a civil penalty of one hundred dollars for each day the report is withheld or the duty is not performed, but not more than five thousand dollars, plus one hundred percent of the value of the property which should have been reported, paid or delivered.

(3) A person who willfully refuses after written demand by the department to pay or deliver property to the department as required under this chapter or who enters into a contract to avoid the duties of this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and upon conviction may be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars or imprisonment for up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both.)) If a person fails to file any report or to pay or deliver any amounts or property when due under a report required under this chapter, there is assessed a penalty equal to ten percent of the amount unpaid and the value of any property not delivered.

(3) If an examination results in an assessment for amounts unpaid or property not delivered, there is assessed a penalty equal to ten percent of the amount unpaid and the value of any property not delivered.

(4) If a person fails to pay or deliver to the department by the due date any amounts or property due under an assessment issued by the department to the person, there is assessed an additional penalty of five percent of the amount unpaid and the value of any property not delivered.

(5) Penalties under subsections (2) through (4) of this section may be waived or canceled only if the department finds that the failure to pay or deliver within the time prescribed by this chapter was the result of circumstances beyond the person's control sufficient for waiver or cancellation of penalties under RCW 82.32.105.

(6) If a person willfully fails to file a report or to provide written notice to apparent owners as required under this chapter, the department may assess a civil penalty of one hundred dollars for each day the report is withheld or the notice is not sent, but not more than five thousand dollars.

(7) If a holder, having filed a report, failed to file the report electronically as required by RCW 63.29.170, or failed to pay electronically any amounts due under the report as required by RCW 63.29.190, the department must assess a penalty equal to five percent of the amount payable or deliverable under the report, unless the department grants the taxpayer relief from the electronic filing and payment requirements. Total penalties assessed under this subsection may not exceed five percent of the amount payable and value of property deliverable under the report.

(8) The penalties imposed in this section are cumulative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2109. A new section is added to chapter 63.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (4) of this section, the department must waive all penalties and interest on amounts payable or property deliverable under this chapter if before November 1, 2016, the holder:

(a) Completes an application for a penalty and interest waiver under this section in the form and manner prescribed by the department;

(b) Files a report as required by this chapter that includes all property for which the penalty and interest wavier is requested; and

(c) Pays and delivers all amounts and property identified on that report.

(2) This section does not apply to any amounts or property that have been paid, delivered, or reported to the department before July 1, 2015.

(3) This section does not apply to any amounts or property included in an assessment or that have otherwise been identified through an investigation or examination.

(4) Except as authorized under RCW 63.29.200, a holder may not seek a refund for any amounts or property paid or delivered to the department under this section, or otherwise challenge whether such amounts or property were properly due under this chapter.

(5) All amounts reported, paid, and delivered under this section are subject to verification by the department. A grant by the department of any waiver under this section does not preclude assessment for amounts due or property deliverable that have not been paid or delivered to the department.

(6) After October 31, 2016, if the department determines it is unable to effectively implement any of the mandatory penalty provisions of RCW 63.29.340 as amended by section 2108 of this act, the department may waive all mandatory penalties and interest under RCW 63.29.340 for all holders until October 31, 2017.

(7) The department must publicize the availability of the penalty waivers provided in this section.

(8) This section expires January 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2110. A new section is added to chapter 63.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) If, upon receipt of an application by a holder for a refund or return of property, or upon an examination of the report or records of any holder, it is determined by the department that any amount, interest, or penalty has been paid in excess of that properly due under this chapter or that any property was delivered to the department under this chapter in error, then with the exception of amounts delivered by the department to a claimant under RCW 63.29.240, the excess amount must be refunded to the holder, or the property delivered in error returned to the holder, as the case may be.

(b)(i) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 63.29.200(2) or this section, no refund or return of property may be made for any amount or property paid or delivered, or for any interest or penalty paid, more than six years after the end of the calendar year in which the payment or delivery occurred.

(ii) The expiration of the limitations period in this subsection will not bar a refund or the return of property if a complete application for such refund or return of property was received by the department before the expiration of such limitations period.

(2) The execution of a written waiver signed by the holder and the department will extend the time for making a refund of any amounts paid, or a return of property delivered in error, during, or attributable to, the years covered by the waiver if, prior to the expiration of the waiver period, a complete application for refund or return of such amounts or property is made by the holder or the department discovers a refund is due or a return of property under this section is required.

(3) For purposes of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, an application for a refund or return of property is complete if it includes information the department deems sufficient to substantiate the holder's claim for a refund or return of property. If the department receives an incomplete application before the expiration of the limitations period in subsection (1)(b)(i) of this section or before the expiration of an applicable waiver period as authorized under subsection (2) of this section, the department must provide the holder written notice of the deficiencies of information in the application and grant the holder thirty days from the date of such notice to provide sufficient documentation to substantiate the holder's claim for a refund or return of property. The department may, at its sole discretion, grant a holder up to an additional ninety days to substantiate its claim and specify in a written notice the expiration date of such additional period. If the holder provides sufficient substantiation documentation to the department within the additional time granted but after the expiration of the limitations period in subsection (1)(b)(i) of this section or an applicable waiver period as authorized under subsection (2) of this section, the holder will be deemed to have provided a complete application before the expiration of such limitations or waiver period. This subsection (3) may not be interpreted as governing the administration of applications for refund or return of property other than for purposes of the limitations period established in this section.

(4) Any such refunds must be made by means of vouchers approved by the department and by the issuance of state warrants drawn upon and payable from such funds as the legislature may provide. However, persons who are required to pay amounts due under this chapter electronically must have any refunds paid by electronic funds transfer if the department has the necessary account information to facilitate a refund by electronic funds transfer.

(5) Any judgment for which a recovery is granted by any court of competent jurisdiction, not appealed from, for amounts, penalties, or interest paid by the holder, and costs, in a suit by any holder must be paid in the same manner, as provided in subsection (4) of this section, upon the filing with the department of a certified copy of the order or judgment of the court.

(6) Interest at the rate computed under RCW 82.32.050(2) must be added to the amount of any refund allowed by the department or any court. Interest must be computed from the date the department received the excess payment, until the date the refund is issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2111. A new section is added to chapter 63.29 RCW to read as follows:

Any person having been issued an assessment by the department, or a denial of an application for a refund or return of property, under the provisions of this chapter is entitled to a review by the department conducted in accordance with the provisions of RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.494, subject to judicial review under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598. A petition for review under this section is timely if received in writing by the department before the due date of the assessment, including any extension of the due date granted by the department, or in the case of a refund or return application, thirty days after the department rejects the application in writing, regardless of any subsequent action by the department to reconsider its initial decision. The period for filing a petition for review under this section may be extended as provided in a rule adopted by the department under chapter 34.05 RCW or upon a written agreement signed by the holder and the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2112. A new section is added to chapter 63.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any person who has paid or delivered property to the department under the provisions of this chapter, except one who has failed to keep and preserve records as required in this chapter, feeling aggrieved by such payment or delivery, may appeal to the superior court of Thurston county. The person filing a notice of appeal under this section is deemed the plaintiff, and the department, the defendant.

(2) An appeal under this section must be made within:

(a) The time limitation for a refund provided in section 2110 of this act; or

(b) Thirty days after the department rejects in writing an application for refund or return of property, regardless of any subsequent action by the department to reconsider its initial decision, if:

(i) An application for refund or return of property has been made to the department within the time limitation provided in (a) of this subsection (2) or the limitation provided in RCW 63.29.200(2), as applicable; and

(ii) The time limitation provided under this subsection (2)(b) is later than the time limitation provided in (a) of this subsection (2).

(3)(a) In an appeal filed under this section, the plaintiff must set forth the amount or property, if any, payable or deliverable on the report or assessment that the plaintiff is contesting, which the holder concedes to be the correct amount payable or deliverable, and the reason why the amount payable or deliverable should be reduced or abated.

(b) The appeal is perfected only by serving a copy of the notice of appeal upon the department and filing the original with proof of service with the clerk of the superior court of Thurston county, within the time specified in subsection (2) of this section.

(4)(a) The trial in the superior court on appeal must be de novo and without the necessity of any pleadings other than the notice of appeal. At trial, the burden is on the plaintiff to (i) prove that the amount paid by that person is incorrect, either in whole or in part, or the property in question was delivered in error to the department, and (ii) establish the correct amount payable or the property required to be delivered to the department, if any.

(b) Both parties are entitled to subpoena the attendance of witnesses as in other civil actions and to produce evidence that is competent, relevant, and material to determine the correct amount due, if any, that should be paid by the plaintiff.

(c) Either party may seek appellate review in the same manner as other civil actions are appealed to the appellate courts.

(5) An appeal may be maintained under this section without the need for the plaintiff to first:

(a) Protest against the payment of any amount due or reportable under this chapter or to make any demand to have such amount refunded or returned; or

(b) Petition the department for a refund, return of property, or a review of its action as authorized in section 2111 of this act.

(6) No court action or proceeding of any kind may be maintained by the plaintiff to recover any amount paid, delivered, or reported to the department under this chapter, except as provided in this section or as may be available to the plaintiff under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.

(7) No appeal may be maintained under this section with respect to matters reviewed by the department under the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2113. A new section is added to chapter 63.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department may enter into an agreement in writing with any holder with respect to any duties under this chapter or any property or amounts due under this chapter, including penalties and interest.

(2) Upon its execution by all parties, the agreement is final and conclusive as to the periods, property, and any other matters expressly covered by the agreement. Except upon a showing of fraud or malfeasance, or of misrepresentation of a material fact:

(a) The agreement may not be reopened as to the matters agreed upon, nor may the agreement be modified, by any officer, employee, or agent of the state, or the holder; and

(b) In any suit, action, or proceeding, such agreement, or any determination, assessment, collection, payment, abatement, or refund, or credit made in accordance with the agreement, may not be annulled, modified, set aside, or disregarded.

(3) No agreement under this section may affect a holder's obligations to an owner or an owner's rights against a holder, except as expressly provided in RCW 63.29.200.

(4) No agreement under this section may include any indemnification of any holder for amounts or property that has not been paid or delivered to the department. Nothing in this subsection (4) may be construed to affect the finality and conclusiveness of any agreement under this section to the extent provided in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2114. (1) Section 2101 of this act applies only with respect to gift certificates issued on or after the effective date of section 2101 of this act.

(2) Section 2102 of this act applies only with respect to gift certificates issued on or after the effective date of section 2102 of this act.

(3) Section 2106 of this act applies only with respect to original assessments issued on or after the effective date of section 2106 of this act.

(4) Section 2108 of this act applies only with respect to reports initially due, or property initially payable or deliverable, or other duties that arise initially on or after the effective date of section 2108 of this act.

(5) Section 2110 of this act applies only with respect to (a) requests for refund or the return of property, where the request is originally received by the department on or after the effective date of section 2110 of this act, and (b) excess payments or property improperly delivered, where such excess payments or improper delivery are discovered by the department on or after the effective date of section 2110 of this act.

PART XXII

[NOT USED]

PART XXIII

Miscellaneous Provisions

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2301. (1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2015.

(2) Parts IV, VI, VIII, and XIX of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect September 1, 2015.

(3) Part X of this act takes effect October 1, 2016.

(4) Section 1105 of this act takes effect January 1, 2016.

(5) Except for section 2004 of this act, Part XX of this act takes effect January 1, 2019.

(6) Section 2004 of this act takes effect January 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2302. Part VII of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect August 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2303. Part VIII of this act expires July 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2304. Section 1104 of this act expires January 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2305. Part XII of this act takes effect June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2306. Section 2003 of this act expires January 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2307. (1) Section 2108 of this act takes effect July 1, 2016, unless the department of revenue determines that it is unable to efficiently and effectively implement any of the provisions of section 2108 of this act, in which case section 2108 of this act takes effect July 1, 2017.

(2) The department of revenue must provide written notice of the effective date of section 2108 of this act to the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the department, as well as post notice of the effective date on its public web site. The notice must be provided no later than June 1, 2016.

--- END ---