BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that North American crude oil and the various products derived from it are important and necessary for Washington's economic health and growth, the freedom and mobility of the people of the state, and the energy independence of the nation. The legislature further finds that Washington's state government should thoroughly examine the best, safest, and most convenient means for transporting oil through the state. Moreover, the legislature recognizes that any method for transporting oil involves benefits and risks that must be fully considered by state policymakers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The energy facility site evaluation council shall study matters relating to the siting and construction of pipelines for transporting crude oil and related products in Washington. The study must include the following elements: (a) An examination and report on the amount of North American crude oil entering Washington per year over the past five years; (b) an assessment of the share of North American crude oil annually entering Washington that could potentially be transported by pipeline if additional pipeline infrastructure was constructed; (c) an evaluation of federal, state, and local processes, permits, and other approvals that would be necessary for the siting and construction of pipelines in Washington; (d) recommendations for streamlining permitting processes, including the development of general or programmatic permits, to facilitate the siting and construction of pipelines in Washington; (e) a comparison of the benefits and costs, including safety and economic impacts, of transporting crude oil through Washington by pipeline versus other methods of transport; and (f) a general survey of potential pipeline routes through the state where pipelines could potentially be sited and constructed.

(2) The energy facility site evaluation council must consult with the department of ecology, the utilities and transportation commission, the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, and other appropriate state agencies for the completion of the study required in subsection (1) of this section. The energy facility site evaluation council may, where appropriate, consult with appropriate federal and local agencies and tribes for the completion of the study required in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The energy facility site evaluation council shall provide the final study to the legislature and governor by December 1, 2015.

(4) The energy facility site evaluation council may contract for services to assist in the study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016, from the general fund to the energy facility site evaluation council for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---