BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.52.085 and 1979 c 34 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any information authorized for release under RCW 46.52.080 and 46.52.083 may be furnished in written form for a fee sufficient to meet((, but not exceed,)) the costs incurred. In addition to the fee, a six dollar surcharge is imposed for each accident report furnished to fund the justice information data exchange. All fees and surcharges received by the Washington state patrol ((for such copies shall)) pursuant to this section must be deposited in the ((motor vehicle fund)) state patrol highway account.

--- END ---