BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.28.091 and 2003 c 399 s 301 and 2003 c 242 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) No license under the provision of this chapter shall be required from any utility or any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity employed by a utility because of work in connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by or under the control of a utility and used for transmission or distribution of electricity from the source of supply to the point of contact at the premises and/or property to be supplied and service connections and meters and other apparatus or appliances used in the measurement of the consumption of electricity by the customer.

(2) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be required from any utility because of work in connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of the following:

(a) Lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment used in the lighting of streets, alleys, ways, or public areas or squares;

(b) Lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by a commercial, industrial, or public institution customer that are an integral part of a transmission or distribution system, either overhead or underground, providing service to such customer and located outside the building or structure: PROVIDED, That a utility does not initiate the sale of services to perform such work;

(c) Lines and wires, together with ancillary apparatus, and equipment, owned by a customer that is an independent power producer who has entered into an agreement for the sale of electricity to a utility and that are used in transmitting electricity from an electrical generating unit located on premises used by such customer to the point of interconnection with the utility's system.

(3) Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity licensed under RCW 19.28.041 may enter into a contract with a utility for the performance of work under subsection (2) of this section.

(4) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity because of the work of installing and repairing ignition or lighting systems for motor vehicles.

(5) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity because of work in connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of wires and equipment, and installations thereof, exempted in RCW 19.28.010.

(6) The department may by rule exempt from licensing requirements under this chapter work performed on premanufactured electric power generation equipment assemblies and control gear involving the testing, repair, modification, maintenance, or installation of components internal to the power generation equipment, the control gear, or the transfer switch.

(7) This chapter does not require an electrical contractor license if: (a) An appropriately certified electrician or a properly supervised certified electrical trainee is performing the installation, repair, or maintenance of wires and equipment for a nonprofit corporation that holds a current tax exempt status as provided under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or a nonprofit religious organization; (b) the certified electrician or certified electrical trainee is not compensated for the electrical work; and (c) the value of the electrical work does not exceed thirty thousand dollars.

(8) An entity that currently holds a valid specialty or general plumbing contractor's registration under chapter 18.27 RCW may employ a certified plumber, a certified residential plumber, or a plumber trainee meeting the requirements of chapter 18.106 RCW to perform electrical work that is incidentally, directly, and immediately appropriate to the like-in-kind replacement of a household appliance or other small household utilization equipment that requires limited electric power and limited waste and/or water connections. A plumber trainee must be supervised by a certified plumber or a certified residential plumber while performing electrical work. The electrical work is subject to the permitting and inspection requirements of this chapter.

(9) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity because of work in connection with the installation, reconfiguration, or maintenance of modular electrical systems that are UL-listed for use in commercial furniture. This subsection does not apply to line voltage connections to the building power source necessary as part of the office furniture installation.

Sec. 2. RCW 19.28.261 and 2013 c 23 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed to require that a person obtain a license or a certified electrician in order to do electrical work at his or her residence or farm or place of business or on other property owned by him or her unless the electrical work is on the construction of a new building intended for rent, sale, or lease. However, if the construction is of a new residential building with up to four units intended for rent, sale, or lease, the owner may receive an exemption from the requirement to obtain a license or use a certified electrician if he or she provides a signed affidavit to the department stating that he or she will be performing the work and will occupy one of the units as his or her principal residence. The owner shall apply to the department for this exemption and may only receive an exemption once every twenty-four months. It is intended that the owner receiving this exemption shall occupy the unit as his or her principal residence for twenty-four months after completion of the units.

(2) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be intended to derogate from or dispense with the requirements of any valid electrical code enacted by a city or town pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3), except that no code shall require the holder of a certificate of competency to demonstrate any additional proof of competency or obtain any other license or pay any fee in order to engage in the electrical construction trade.

(3) RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not apply to common carriers subject to Part I of the Interstate Commerce Act, nor to their officers and employees.

(4) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be deemed to apply to the installation or maintenance of telephone, telegraph, radio, or television wires and equipment; nor to any electrical utility or its employees in the installation, repair, and maintenance of electrical wiring, circuits, and equipment by or for the utility, or comprising a part of its plants, lines, or systems.

(5) The licensing provisions of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not apply to:

(a) Persons making electrical installations on their own property or to regularly employed employees working on the premises of their employer, unless the electrical work is on the construction of a new building intended for rent, sale, or lease;

(b) Employees of an employer while the employer is performing utility type work of the nature described in RCW 19.28.091 so long as such employees have registered in the state of Washington with or graduated from a state-approved outside lineworker apprenticeship course that is recognized by the department and that qualifies a person to perform such work;

(c) Any work exempted under RCW 19.28.091(6); ((and))

(d) Certified plumbers, certified residential plumbers, or plumber trainees meeting the requirements of chapter 18.106 RCW and performing exempt work under RCW 19.28.091(8); and

(e) Any work exempted under RCW 19.28.091(9).

(6) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed to restrict the right of any householder to assist or receive assistance from a friend, neighbor, relative, or other person when none of the individuals doing the electrical installation hold themselves out as engaged in the trade or business of electrical installations.

(7) Nothing precludes any person who is exempt from the licensing requirements of this chapter under this section from obtaining a journey level or specialty certificate of competency if they otherwise meet the requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 3. RCW 19.28.101 and 2008 c 181 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall cause an inspector to inspect all wiring, appliances, devices, and equipment to which this chapter applies except for basic electrical work as defined in this chapter. The department may not require an electrical work permit for class A basic electrical work unless deficiencies in the installation or repair require inspection. The department may inspect class B basic electrical work on a random basis as specified by the department in rule. Nothing contained in this chapter may be construed as providing any authority for any subdivision of government to adopt by ordinance any provisions contained or provided for in this chapter except those pertaining to cities and towns pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3).

(2) Upon request, electrical inspections will be made by the department within forty-eight hours, excluding holidays, Saturdays, and Sundays. If, upon written request, the electrical inspector fails to make an electrical inspection within twenty-four hours, the serving utility may immediately connect electrical power to the installation if the necessary electrical work permit is displayed: PROVIDED, That if the request is for an electrical inspection that relates to a mobile home installation, the applicant shall provide proof of a current building permit issued by the local government agency authorized to issue such permits as a prerequisite for inspection approval or connection of electrical power to the mobile home.

(3) Whenever the installation of any wiring, device, appliance, or equipment is not in accordance with this chapter, or is in such a condition as to be dangerous to life or property, the person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity owning, using, or operating it shall be notified by the department and shall within fifteen days, or such further reasonable time as may upon request be granted, make such repairs and changes as are required to remove the danger to life or property and to make it conform to this chapter. The director, through the inspector, is hereby empowered to disconnect or order the discontinuance of electrical service to conductors or equipment that are found to be in a dangerous or unsafe condition and not in accordance with this chapter. Upon making a disconnection the inspector shall attach a notice stating that the conductors have been found dangerous to life or property and are not in accordance with this chapter. It is unlawful for any person to reconnect such defective conductors or equipment without the approval of the department, and until the conductors and equipment have been placed in a safe and secure condition, and in a condition that complies with this chapter.

(4) The director, through the electrical inspector, has the right during reasonable hours to enter into and upon any building or premises in the discharge of his or her official duties for the purpose of making any inspection or test of the installation of new construction or altered electrical wiring, electrical devices, equipment, or material contained in or on the buildings or premises. No electrical wiring or equipment subject to this chapter may be concealed until it has been approved by the inspector making the inspection. At the time of the inspection, electrical wiring or equipment subject to this chapter must be sufficiently accessible to permit the inspector to employ any testing methods that will verify conformance with the national electrical code and any other requirements of this chapter.

(5) Persons, firms, partnerships, corporations, or other entities making electrical installations shall obtain inspection and approval from an authorized representative of the department as required by this chapter before requesting the electric utility to connect to the installations. Electric utilities may connect to the installations if approval is clearly indicated by certification of the electrical work permit required to be affixed to each installation or by equivalent means, except that increased or relocated services may be reconnected immediately at the discretion of the utility before approval if an electrical work permit is displayed. The permits shall be furnished upon payment of the fee to the department.

(6) The director, subject to the recommendations and approval of the board, shall set by rule a schedule of license and electrical work permit fees that will cover the costs of administration and enforcement of this chapter. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. No fee may be charged for plug-in mobile homes, recreational vehicles, or portable appliances.

(7) Nothing in this chapter shall authorize the inspection of any wiring, appliance, device, or equipment, or installations thereof, by any utility or by any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity employed by a utility in connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by or under the control of the utility. All work covered by the national electric code not exempted by the 1981 edition of the national electric code 90-2(B)(5) shall be inspected by the department.

(8) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the governor may waive or suspend the collection of fees under this section or any portion of this section or under any administrative rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of the civilian population.

(9) Nothing in this chapter authorizes the inspection of any installation exempted under RCW 19.28.091(9).

--- END ---