BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.48.210 and 2004 c 7 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, when an employer determines that an employee was overpaid wages, the employer shall provide written notice to the employee. The notice shall include the amount of the overpayment, the basis for the claim, a demand for payment within twenty calendar days of the date on which the employee received the notice, and the rights of the employee under this section.

(2) The notice may be served upon the employee in the manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action, or be mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the employee at his or her last known address.

(3) Within twenty calendar days after receiving the notice from the employer that an overpayment has occurred, the employee may request, in writing, that the employer review its finding that an overpayment has occurred. The employee may choose to have the review conducted through written submission of information challenging the overpayment or through a face-to-face meeting with the employer. If the request is not made within the twenty-day period as provided in this subsection, the employee may not further challenge the overpayment and has no right to further agency review, an adjudicative proceeding, or judicial review.

(4) Upon receipt of an employee's written request for review of the overpayment, the employer shall review the employee's challenge to the overpayment. Upon completion of the review, the employer shall notify the employee in writing of the employer's decision regarding the employee's challenge. The notification must be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the employee at his or her last known address.

(5) If the employee is dissatisfied with the employer's decision regarding the employee's challenge to the overpayment, the employee may request an adjudicative proceeding governed by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW or, in the case of a county or city employee, an adjudicative proceeding provided pursuant to ordinance or resolution of the county or city. The employee's application for an adjudicative proceeding must be in writing, state the basis for contesting the overpayment notice, and include a copy of the employer's notice of overpayment. The application must be served on and received by the employer within twenty-eight calendar days of the employee's receipt of the employer's decision following review of the employee's challenge. Notwithstanding RCW 34.05.413(3), agencies may not vary the requirements of this subsection (5) by rule or otherwise. The employee must serve the employer by certified mail, return receipt requested.

(6) If the employee does not request an adjudicative proceeding within the twenty-eight-day period, the amount of the overpayment provided in the notice shall be deemed final and the employer may proceed to recoup the overpayment as provided in this section and RCW 49.48.200.

(7) Where an adjudicative proceeding has been requested, the presiding or reviewing officer shall determine the amount, if any, of the overpayment received by the employee.

(8) If the employee fails to attend or participate in the adjudicative proceeding, upon a showing of valid service, the presiding or reviewing officer may enter an administrative order declaring the amount claimed in the notice sent to the employee after the employer's review of the employee's challenge to the overpayment to be assessed against the employee and subject to collection action by the employer as provided in RCW 49.48.200.

(9) Failure to make an application for a review by the employer as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section or an adjudicative proceeding within twenty-eight calendar days of the date of receiving notice of the employer's decision after review of the overpayment shall result in the establishment of a final debt against the employee in the amount asserted by the employer, which debt shall be collected as provided in RCW 49.48.200.

(10) When an employer determines that an employee covered by a collective bargaining agreement was overpaid wages, the employer shall provide written notice to the employee. The notice shall include the amount of the overpayment, the basis for the claim, and the rights of the employee under the collective bargaining agreement. Any dispute relating to the occurrence or amount of the overpayment shall be resolved using the grievance procedures contained in the collective bargaining agreement.

(11) As used in this section or RCW ((49.48.210 [49.48.200])) 49.48.200 and 49.48.220:

(a) "City" means city or town;

(b) "Employer" means the state of Washington or a county ((or)), city, or municipal corporation, and any of its agencies, institutions, boards, or commissions; and

(c) "Overpayment" means a payment of wages for a pay period that is greater than the amount earned for a pay period.

--- END ---