BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 11.84.010 and 2009 c 525 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Abuser" means any person who participates, either as a principal or an accessory before the fact, in the willful and unlawful financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult.

(2) "Decedent" means:

(a) Any person whose life is taken by a slayer; or

(b) Any deceased person who, at any time during life in which he or she was a vulnerable adult, was the victim of financial exploitation by an abuser.

(3) "Financial exploitation" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 74.34.020, as enacted or hereafter amended.

(4) "Property" includes any real and personal property and any right or interest therein.

(5) "Slayer" means any person who: (a) Participates, either as a principal or an accessory before the fact, in the willful and unlawful killing of any other person; or (b) is found not guilty by reason of insanity of a criminal offense constituting participation, either as a principal or an accessory before the fact, in the willful and unlawful killing of any other person.

(6) "Vulnerable adult" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 74.34.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act may be known and cited as Carol's law.

--- END ---