BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that major technological, economic, and demographic changes have increased the demand for training and education to maintain a high quality, competitive work force, and a well-educated populace to meet the challenges of the twenty-first century. Therefore, the legislature finds that there is increasing demand for postsecondary educational opportunities for citizens of the state of Washington.

The legislature declares that the policy of the state of Washington is to improve the access to, and the quality of, this state's postsecondary educational system. The budgetary policy of the state is to provide a level of fiscal commitment to the state's postsecondary educational system commensurate with the responsibility of the state to the educational and professional improvement of its citizens and work force.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.10.776 and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the policy of the state of Washington that the ((essential requirements level)) state budget ((calculation)) for institutions of higher education include enrollment levels necessary to ((maintain, by educational sector, the participation rate funded in the 1993 fiscal year. The participation rate shall be based on the state's estimated population ages seventeen and above by appropriate age groups)) meet the demand for higher education in the state.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.10.778 and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the policy of the state of Washington that((, for new enrollments provided under RCW 28B.10.776, the essential requirements level budget calculation for those enrollments shall)) the state omnibus appropriations act must, each biennium, at a minimum, include a funding level per full-time equivalent student that is equal to the per-student rate assumed in the omnibus appropriations act for the last fiscal year of the previous biennium ((for the instructional, primary support, and library programs,)) plus ((an)) inflation ((factor. The inflation factor should be equivalent to the inflation factor used to calculate basic education in the common school system budget request submitted by the governor)).

(2) As used in this section, "inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of economic analysis of the federal department of commerce.

Sec. 4. RCW 28B.10.784 and 2012 c 229 s 517 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((participation rate)) enrollment levels used to calculate ((enrollment)) state funding levels under RCW 28B.10.776 and ((28B.10.782)) 28B.10.778 shall be ((based on)) the fall enrollment reported in the higher education enrollment report as maintained by the ((office of financial management, fall enrollment as reported in the management information system of the state board for community and technical colleges, and the corresponding fall population forecast by the office of financial management. Formal estimates of the state participation rates and enrollment levels necessary to fulfill the requirements of RCW 28B.10.776 and 28B.10.782 shall be determined by the office of financial management)) caseload forecast council as part of its responsibility to develop and maintain student enrollment forecasts for colleges and universities under RCW 43.62.050. ((Formal estimates of)) The state ((participation rates and)) enrollment levels required by this section shall be based on procedures and standards established by a technical work group consisting of staff from the student achievement council, the public four-year institutions of higher education, the state board for community and technical colleges, the fiscal and higher education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, and the ((office of financial management. Formal estimates of the state participation rates and)) caseload forecast council. The enrollment levels required by this section shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate on or before November 15th of each ((even-numbered)) year. ((The student achievement council shall periodically review the enrollment goals set forth in RCW 28B.10.776 and 28B.10.782 and submit recommendations concerning modification of these goals to the governor and to the higher education committees of the house of representatives and the senate.))

Sec. 5. RCW 43.88C.010 and 2013 c 332 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The caseload forecast council is hereby created. The council shall consist of two individuals appointed by the governor and four individuals, one of whom is appointed by the chairperson of each of the two largest political caucuses in the senate and house of representatives. The chair of the council shall be selected from among the four caucus appointees. The council may select such other officers as the members deem necessary.

(2) The council shall employ a caseload forecast supervisor to supervise the preparation of all caseload forecasts. As used in this chapter, "supervisor" means the caseload forecast supervisor.

(3) Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five members of the council is required for any decisions regarding employment of the supervisor. Employment of the supervisor shall terminate after each term of three years. At the end of the first year of each three-year term the council shall consider extension of the supervisor's term by one year. The council may fix the compensation of the supervisor. The supervisor shall employ staff sufficient to accomplish the purposes of this section.

(4) The caseload forecast council shall oversee the preparation of and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four members, the official state caseload forecasts prepared under RCW 43.88C.020. If the council is unable to approve a forecast before a date required in RCW 43.88C.020, the supervisor shall submit the forecast without approval and the forecast shall have the same effect as if approved by the council.

(5) A councilmember who does not cast an affirmative vote for approval of the official caseload forecast may request, and the supervisor shall provide, an alternative forecast based on assumptions specified by the member.

(6) Members of the caseload forecast council shall serve without additional compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative members of the council shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(7) "Caseload," as used in this chapter, means:

(a) The number of persons expected to meet entitlement requirements and require the services of public assistance programs, state correctional institutions, state correctional noninstitutional supervision, state institutions for juvenile offenders, the common school system, long-term care, medical assistance, foster care, and adoption support;

(b) The number of students who are eligible for the Washington college bound scholarship program and are expected to attend an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030;

(c) The number of students expected to enroll in an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 in order to calculate state funding as provided in RCW 28B.10.784.

(8) The caseload forecast council shall forecast the temporary assistance for needy families and the working connections child care programs as a courtesy.

(9) The caseload forecast council shall forecast youth participating in the extended foster care program pursuant to RCW 74.13.031 separately from other children who are residing in foster care and who are under eighteen years of age.

(10) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions provided in RCW 43.88.020 apply to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 28B.10.780 (Budget calculation—Funding level) and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 4; and

(2) RCW 28B.10.782 (Budget calculation—Increased enrollment target level—Availability of information) and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 5.

--- END ---