BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.10.630 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 14 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature that state universities ((engage in)) promote the practical application and commercialization of research and other economic development and workforce development activities that benefit the ((intermediate and long-term)) economic vitality of Washington. State universities are expected to develop and strengthen university-industry relationships through the conduct of research, the support of company formation and job generation, and collaborative training. The state universities, using a collaborative process that may include both in-house resources and independent contractors with necessary technical expertise or innovative processes, must perform one or more of the following functions:

(a) Provide collaborative research and technology transfer opportunities;

(b) Publicize their commercialization processes and include an explanation of how to access commercialization resources at the ((universities)) university;

(c) Develop mechanisms for pairing researchers, entrepreneurs, and investors. Such mechanisms are to include, but are not limited to, developing guides, web sites, or workshops on funding opportunities, on entrepreneurship and the process of starting a company, and on university-industry relations;

(d) Host events to connect researchers to entrepreneurs, investors, and individuals from the state's technology-based industries; and

(e) Provide opportunities for training undergraduate and graduate students through direct involvement in research and industry interactions.

(2) In carrying out the functions in this section, the universities:

(a) May provide university-administered facilities and other resources to students, staff, and faculty for their use, including but not limited to use in extramurally funded research, such as through grants, contracts, or donations, consistent with the public mission of the university, if the university does not impose a requirement to assign intellectual property or other intangible assets that may thereby be created, or assert a financial interest in such assets, except as may be required by an extramural sponsor of research;

(b) May require assignment of, or have a financial interest in intellectual property or other intangible assets developed by students, staff, or faculty only through agreements entered into on a voluntary basis;

(c) May not, in employment agreements with student or faculty employees, require assignment of or assert a financial interest in their inventions; and

(d) May work with and through the ((higher education coordinating board)) student achievement council.

--- END ---