BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9A.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By July 31st of each year, each statewide elected official or candidate for statewide elected office must certify in a written statement that either:

(a) He or she has no actual knowledge of any criminal charges pending against him or her or of any ongoing criminal investigation in which he or she is a suspect or person of interest conducted by a federal, state, or local law enforcement organization; or

(b) He or she has actual knowledge that criminal charges have been filed against him or her or that he or she is a suspect or person of interest in an ongoing criminal investigation conducted by a federal, state, or local law enforcement agency.

(2) Any statewide elected official or candidate for statewide elected office that answers pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section must provide details of each and every charge or investigation including, but not limited to, the subject matter and the law enforcement agency or agencies involved.

(3) Any statement filed under this section must be submitted under oath to the public disclosure commission and available for public viewing. Failure to file or the filing of a false statement under this section is a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---