BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

GENERAL PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101. INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature in adopting this title to provide the necessary revenues for the support of vital state services on a more stable and equitable basis.

PART II

DEFINITIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201. INTRODUCTORY. Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in sections 202 through 212 of this act apply throughout this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202. ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME. "Adjusted gross income" means adjusted gross income as determined under the internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203. DEPARTMENT. "Department" means the state department of revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204. FEDERAL BASE INCOME. "Federal base income" means:

(1) For individuals, adjusted gross income;

(2) For estates and trusts, taxable income as determined for estates and trusts consistent with subtitle A, chapter I, subchapter J of the internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205. INDIVIDUAL. "Individual" means a natural person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206. INTERNAL REVENUE CODE. "Internal revenue code" means the United States internal revenue code of 1986 and amendments thereto, as existing and in effect on January 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207. PERSON. "Person" includes individuals, partnerships, firms, companies, fiduciaries, estates, trusts, and any other group or combination acting as a unit, but does not include corporations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208. RESIDENT. (1) "Resident" includes an individual who:

(a) Has resided in this state for the entire tax year; or

(b) Is domiciled in this state unless the individual:

(i) Maintains no permanent place of abode in this state; and

(ii) Maintains a permanent place of abode elsewhere; and

(iii) Spends in the aggregate not more than thirty days in the tax year in this state; or

(c) Is not domiciled in this state, but maintains a permanent place of abode in this state and spends in the aggregate more than one hundred eighty-three days of the tax year in this state unless the individual establishes to the satisfaction of the director of revenue that the individual is in the state only for temporary or transitory purposes; or

(d) Claims the state of Washington as the individual's tax home for federal income tax purposes.

(2) A resident estate means an estate of which a personal representative was appointed by a Washington court or an estate administration of which is carried on in this state.

(3) A resident trust means a trust whose situs as determined by RCW 11.96A.030 is within the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209. S CORPORATION. "S corporation" means an S corporation as defined in section 1361 of the internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210. TAXABLE INCOME. "Taxable income" means federal base income as modified under sections 401 through 503 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211. TAXABLE YEAR. "Taxable year" means the taxpayer's taxable year as defined under the internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212. TAXPAYER. "Taxpayer" means a person receiving income subject to tax under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213. DEFINITION OF TERMS GENERALLY. Except as provided in sections 201 through 212 of this act, any term used in this title has the same meaning as when used in a comparable context in the internal revenue code.

PART III

DETERMINATION OF TAX

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301. TAX IMPOSED—RATES. (1) A tax is imposed on all taxable income of resident individuals, estates, and trusts and on all individuals, estates, and trusts deriving income from sources in Washington for each taxable year based on the type of return filed and the amount of income in accordance with this section.

(2) For every married individual who makes a single return jointly with his or her spouse and for every surviving spouse, the tax is five percent of taxable income.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302. CREDIT FOR INCOME TAXES DUE ANOTHER JURISDICTION. (1) A resident individual, estate, or trust is allowed a credit against the tax imposed under this title for the amount of any income tax imposed by another state or foreign country, or political subdivision of the state or foreign country, on income taxed under this title, subject to the following conditions, which must be imposed separately with respect to each taxing jurisdiction:

(a) The credit is allowed only for taxes imposed by the other jurisdiction on net income from sources within that jurisdiction; and

(b) The amount of the credit may not exceed the smaller of:

(i) The amount of tax paid to the other jurisdiction on net income from sources within the other jurisdiction; or

(ii) The amount of tax due under this title before application of credits allowable by this title, multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the amount of the taxpayer's adjusted gross income subject to tax in the other jurisdiction. The denominator of the fraction is the taxpayer's total adjusted gross income as modified by this title. The fraction may never be greater than one.

(2) If, in lieu of a credit similar to the credit allowed under subsection (1) of this section, the laws of the other taxing jurisdiction contain a provision exempting a resident of this state from liability for the payment of income taxes on income earned for personal services performed in such jurisdiction, then the director is authorized to enter into a reciprocal agreement with such jurisdiction providing a similar tax exemption on income earned for personal services performed in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303. DUAL RESIDENCE. If an individual is regarded as a resident both of this state and another jurisdiction for state personal income tax purposes, the department must reduce the tax on that portion of the taxpayer's income which is subjected to tax in both jurisdictions solely by virtue of dual residence, if the other taxing jurisdiction allows a similar reduction. The reduction must equal the lower of the two taxes applicable to the income taxed twice, multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the tax imposed by this state on the income taxed twice. The denominator of the fraction is the tax imposed by both jurisdictions on the income taxed twice. The fraction must never be greater than one.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304. BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX CREDIT. (1) There is allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this title in the amount of the state of Washington business and occupation tax paid by the taxpayer in the tax year subject to the limitation of subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The credit may not exceed the smaller of:

(a) The amount of business and occupation tax paid; or

(b) The amount of tax of the taxpayer imposed by this title before the application of credits allowed by this title, multiplied by a fraction:

(i) The numerator is the amount of the taxpayer's adjusted gross income attributable to activities subject to business and occupation tax; and

(ii) The denominator is the taxpayer's adjusted gross income as modified by this title. The fraction may never be greater than one.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305. PUBLIC UTILITY TAX CREDIT. (1) There is allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this title in the amount of the state of Washington public utility tax paid by the taxpayer in the tax year subject to the limitation of subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The credit may not exceed the smaller of:

(a) The amount of public utility tax paid; or

(b) The amount of tax of the taxpayer imposed by this title before the application of credits allowed by this title, multiplied by a fraction:

(i) The numerator is the amount of the taxpayer's adjusted gross income attributable to activities subject to public utility tax; and

(ii) The denominator is the taxpayer's adjusted gross income as modified by this title. The fraction may never be greater than one.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306. CARRYFORWARDS AND CARRYBACKS. The amount of tax credits received by any taxpayer under sections 302, 304, and 305 of this act may not exceed the total amount of tax due, and no carryback or carryforward of any unused excess credits is allowed.

PART IV

TAXABLE INCOME MODIFICATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 401. INTRODUCTORY. In computing taxable income, modifications must be made to the taxpayer's federal base income as required under sections 301 through 410 of this act, unless the modification has the effect of duplicating an item of income or deduction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402. STATE AND LOCAL OBLIGATIONS. To federal base income, add income which has been excluded under section 103 of the internal revenue code in computing federal base income, except interest on obligations of the state of Washington or political subdivisions of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403. STATE AND LOCAL INCOME TAXES—BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION, PUBLIC UTILITY TAXES. To federal base income, add:

(1) Taxes on or measured by net income which have been deducted under the internal revenue code in computing federal base income;

(2) The amount of taxes paid or accrued which have been deducted for federal purposes, but for which a business and occupation tax credit or public utility tax credit, or both, is allowed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404. NET OPERATING LOSS. There is allowed as a deduction from federal base income the amount of net operating loss as allowed in section 172 of the internal revenue code. The calculation of the loss amount must reflect the modifications to federal base income as provided in this title and a net operating loss deduction may include a loss carried forward to the tax year but may not include a loss carried back from a future year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405. CARRYOVERS. To federal base income, add amounts which have been deducted in computing federal base income to the extent the amounts have been carried over from taxable years ending before the effective date of this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406. FEDERAL OBLIGATIONS. From federal base income, deduct, to the extent included in federal base income, income derived from obligations of the United States which this state is prohibited by federal law from subjecting to a net income tax. However, the amount deducted under this section must be reduced by any expense, including amortizable bond premiums, incurred in the production of such income to the extent the expense has been deducted in calculating federal base income.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407. STANDARD DEDUCTION—PERSONAL EXEMPTION. There is allowed from federal base income the following standard deductions and personal exemption deduction:

(1) The standard deduction for an individual is:

(a) In the case of a joint return or a surviving spouse, thirty thousand dollars;

(b) In the case of the head of a household, twenty-two thousand dollars;

(c) In the case of an individual who is not married and who is not a surviving spouse or head of a household and in the case of a married individual filing a separate return, fifteen thousand dollars.

(2) A personal exemption deduction in the amount of five thousand dollars is allowed for each individual for whom a personal exemption deduction is allowed for federal income tax purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408. ADJUSTMENT OF DEDUCTIONS AND EXEMPTIONS FOR NONRESIDENTS. The deductions from federal base income allowed under section 407 of this act for individual taxpayers who are not residents of this state for the entire taxable year must be reduced by multiplying the amount of the deductions by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the individual's adjusted gross income attributable to sources within the state of Washington. The denominator of the fraction is the individual's gross income from all sources. The fraction may never be greater than one.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409. TAX RETURNS FOR FRACTIONAL YEAR. (1) If the first taxable year of any taxpayer with respect to which a tax is imposed by this title ends before December 31st of the calendar year in which this title becomes effective, the taxable income for the fractional taxable year is the taxpayer's taxable income for the entire taxable year, adjusted by one of the following methods, at the taxpayer's election:

(a) The taxable income must be multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the number of days in the fractional taxable year. The denominator of the fraction is the number of days in the entire taxable year.

(b) The taxable income must be adjusted, in accordance with rules of the department, so as to include only such income and be reduced only by such deductions as can be clearly determined from the permanent records of the taxpayer to be attributable to the fractional taxable year.

(2) If an individual taxpayer's taxable income is adjusted under subsection (1) of this section, the deduction amounts allowed under section 407 of this act for the taxpayer must be reduced by multiplying the amount of the exemption by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the number of days in the taxpayer's fractional taxable year. The denominator of the fraction is the number of days in the entire taxable year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 410. INDEX FOR INFLATION. For each tax year beginning after December 31, 2018, the standard deduction and the personal exemption deduction amounts under section 407 of this act must be adjusted by the department for inflation by multiplying the standard deduction and the personal exemption deduction amounts of the previous tax year by the cost-of-living adjustment as determined under internal revenue code section 1(f)(3) through (5) for the calendar year in which the tax year begins. No adjustment may be made which decreases the standard deduction and personal exemption deduction amounts. If any adjustment increase is not a multiple of ten dollars, the increase must be rounded to the next lowest multiple of ten dollars.

PART V

DIVISION OF INCOME, MODIFICATIONS, AND CREDITS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 501. APPORTIONMENT AND ALLOCATION OF INCOME. (1) For resident individuals, estates, and trusts, all income must be apportioned and allocated to this state.

(2) For nonresident individuals, estates, and trusts, income derived from sources within this state must be apportioned and allocated to this state. For purposes of this title:

(a) The adjusted gross income of a nonresident derived from sources within this state is the net amount of items of income, gain, loss, and deduction of the nonresident's federal adjusted gross income that are derived from or connected with sources in this state including any distributive share of partnership income and deductions, and any share of estate or trust income and deductions, including any unrelated business income of an otherwise exempt trust or organization.

(b) Items of income, gain, loss, and deduction derived from or connected with sources within this state are those items attributable to the ownership or disposition of any interest in real or tangible personal property in this state, and a business, trade, profession, or occupation carried on within this state. The department must issue rules to provide consistency of this section with the excise tax provisions.

(c) Deduction with respect to expenses, capital losses, and net operating losses is based solely on income, gains, losses, and deductions derived from or connected with sources in this state but is otherwise determined in the same manner as the corresponding federal deduction except as provided in this title.

(d) Income from intangible personal property, including annuities, dividends, interest, and gains from the disposition of intangible personal property, constitutes income derived from sources within the state of Washington only to the extent that such income is from property employed in a business, trade, profession, or occupation carried on within this state. However, distributed and undistributed income of an electing S corporation for federal tax purposes derived from or connected with sources within this state is income derived from sources within this state for a nonresident shareholder. A net operating loss of such corporation does constitute a loss or deduction connected with sources within this state for a nonresident shareholder.

(e) Compensation paid by the United States for service in the armed forces of the United States performed in this state by a nonresident does not constitute income derived from sources within this state.

(f) If a business, trade, profession, or occupation is carried on partly within and partly without this state, the determination of net income derived or connected with sources within this state as provided in this section must be made by apportionment and allocation of chapter 82.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502. PARTNERSHIPS AND S CORPORATIONS. (1) Partnerships are not subject to tax under this title. Partners are subject to tax in their separate or individual capacities.

(2) S corporations are not subject to tax under this title. Shareholders of S corporations are subject to tax in their separate or individual capacities.

(3) The taxable incomes of partners is computed by including a pro rata share of the modifications under sections 401 through 503 of this act and the credits allowed under sections 302, 304, and 305 of this act, if the modification or credit relates to the income of the partnership. Each partner's pro rata share of a modification or credit is the amount of modification or credit multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the partner's distributive share of partnership income. The denominator of the fraction is the total partnership income. The fraction may never be greater than one.

(4) The taxable incomes of shareholders of S corporations must be computed by including a share of the modifications under sections 401 through 503 of this act and the credits allowed under sections 302, 304, and 305 of this act, if the modification or credit relates to the income of the S corporation. Each shareholder's share of a modification or credit is the amount of modification or credit multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the shareholder's pro rata share of S corporation income. The denominator of the fraction is the total S corporation income. The fraction may never be greater than one.

(5) As used in this section:

(a) "S corporation income" includes both distributed and undistributed federal taxable income of the S corporation.

(b) "Pro rata share" means pro rata share as determined under section 1366(a) of the internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503. ESTATES, TRUSTS, AND BENEFICIARIES. (1) The taxable incomes of estates, trusts, and beneficiaries thereof is computed by including a share of the modifications under sections 401 through 503 of this act and the credits allowed under sections 302, 304, and 305 of this act.

Each taxpayer's share of a modification or credit is the amount of modification or credit multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the taxpayer's share of the distributable net income of the estate or trust. The denominator of the fraction is the total distributable net income of the estate or trust. The fraction may never be greater than one.

(2) As used in this section, "distributable net income" means distributable net income as defined in the internal revenue code. If an estate or trust has no federal distributable net income, the term means the income of the estate or trust which is distributed or is required to be distributed during the taxable year under local law or the terms of the estate or trust instrument.

(3) Any portion of a modification which is not included in calculating the taxable incomes of the beneficiaries must be included in calculating the taxable income of the trust or estate.

PART VI

WITHHOLDING—ESTIMATED TAX

NEW SECTION. Sec. 601. EMPLOYER WITHHOLDING—REQUIREMENTS. (1) Every employer making a payment of wages or salaries earned in this state, regardless of the place where the payment is made, and who is required by the internal revenue code to withhold taxes, must deduct and withhold a tax as prescribed by the department by rule. The rules prescribed must reasonably reflect the annual tax liability of the employee under this title. Every employer making such a deduction and withholding must furnish to the employee a record of the amount of tax deducted and withheld from the employee on forms provided by the department.

(2) If the employee is a resident of this state and earns income from personal services entirely performed in another state which imposes an income tax on the income, and the employer withholds income taxes under the laws of the state in which the income is earned, the employer is not required to withhold any tax imposed by this title on the income if the laws of the state in which the income is earned allow a similar exemption for its residents who earn income in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602. LIABILITY OF EMPLOYER FOR TAX WITHHELD. Any person required to deduct and withhold the tax imposed by this title is liable to the department for the payment of the amount deducted and withheld, and is not liable to any other person for the amount of tax deducted and withheld under this title or for the act of withholding. The amount of tax so deducted and withheld must be held to be a special fund in trust for this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603. CREDIT FOR TAX WITHHELD—HOW CLAIMED. The amount deducted and withheld as tax under sections 601 through 606 of this act during any taxable year must be allowed as a credit against the tax imposed for the taxable year by this title. If the liability of any individual for taxes, interest, penalties, or other amounts due the state of Washington is less than the total amount of the credit which the individual is entitled to claim under this section, the individual is entitled to a refund from the department in the amount of the excess of the credit over the tax otherwise due. If any individual entitled to claim a credit under this section is not otherwise required by this title to file a return, a refund may be obtained in the amount of the credit by filing a return, with applicable sections completed, to claim the refund. No credit or refund is allowed under this section unless the credit or refund is claimed on a return filed for the taxable year for which the amount was deducted and withheld.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604. WITHHOLDING—EXEMPTION DECLARATIONS. An employee is entitled to use and an employer must use the withholding exemption declaration on file with the employer for federal income tax purposes. The department may redetermine the number of withholding exemptions to which any employee is entitled, and the department may require an additional withholding exemption declaration to be filed on a form prescribed by the department where the department finds that the exemption declaration filed for federal income tax purposes does not properly reflect the number of withholding exemptions to which the employee is entitled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605. WITHHOLDING—FAILURE TO PAY OR COLLECT—PENALTIES. (1) The tax required by this title to be collected by the employer must be deemed to be held in trust by the employer until paid to the department.

(2) In case any employer, or a responsible person within the meaning of internal revenue code section 6672, fails to collect the tax herein imposed or having collected the tax, fails to pay it to the department, the employer or responsible person is, nevertheless, personally liable to the state for the amount of the tax. The interest and penalty provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606. ESTIMATED TAX IMPOSED—DUE DATE OF ESTIMATED TAXES—AMOUNT OF ESTIMATED TAX—UNDERPAYMENT PENALTY. (1) Each individual, estate, or trust subject to taxation by this title which is required by the internal revenue code to make payment of estimated taxes must pay to the department on forms prescribed by the department the estimated taxes due under this title.

(2) The provisions of the internal revenue code relating to the determination of reporting periods and due dates of payments of estimated tax applies to the estimated tax payments due under this section.

(3) The amount of the estimated tax is the annualized tax divided by the number of months in the reporting period. No estimated tax is due if the annualized tax is less than five hundred dollars. The provisions of RCW 82.32.050 and 82.32.090 apply to underpayments of estimated tax but do not apply to underpayments, as defined by the internal revenue code, if the tax remitted to the department is either ninety percent of the tax shown on the return or one hundred percent of the tax shown on the previous year's tax return.

(4) For purposes of this section, the annualized tax is the taxpayer's projected tax liability for the tax year as computed pursuant to internal revenue code section 6654 and the regulations thereunder.

PART VII

CRIMES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 701. CRIMES. (1) Any person who knowingly attempts to evade the tax imposed under this title or payment thereof is guilty of a class C felony as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) Any person required to collect tax imposed under this title who knowingly fails to collect, truthfully account for, or pay over the tax is guilty of a class C felony as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) Any person who knowingly fails to pay tax, pay estimated tax, make returns, keep records, or supply information, as required under this title, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

PART VIII

ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 801. METHOD OF ACCOUNTING. (1) A taxpayer's method of accounting for purposes of the tax imposed under this title is the same as the taxpayer's method of accounting for federal income tax purposes. If no method of accounting has been regularly used by a taxpayer for federal income tax purposes or if the method used does not clearly reflect income, tax due under this title is computed by a method of accounting which in the opinion of the department fairly reflects income.

(2) If a person's method of accounting is changed for federal income tax purposes, it must be similarly changed for purposes of this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802. PERSONS REQUIRED TO FILE RETURNS. (1) All taxpayers must file with the department, on forms prescribed by the department, an income tax return for each tax year. Each person required to file a return under this title must, without assessment, notice, or demand, pay any tax due thereon to the department on or before the date fixed for the filing of the return.

(2) The department may by rule require that certain taxpayers file, on forms prescribed by the department, informational returns for any period. Each person required by rule to file an informational return must, without assessment, notice, or demand, pay any tax due thereon to the department on or before the date fixed for the filing of the informational return.

(3) If an adjustment to a taxpayer's federal return is made by the taxpayer or the internal revenue service, the taxpayer must, within ninety days of the final determination of the adjustment by the internal revenue service or within thirty days of the filing of a federal return adjusted by the taxpayer, file with the department on forms prescribed by the department a corrected return reflecting the adjustments as finally determined. The taxpayer must pay any additional tax due resulting from the finally determined internal revenue service adjustment or a taxpayer adjustment without notice and assessment. Notwithstanding any provision of this title or any other title to the contrary, the period of limitation for the collection of the additional tax, interest, and penalty due as a result of an adjustment by the taxpayer or a finally determined internal revenue service adjustment must begin at the later of thirty days following the final determination of the adjustment or the date of the filing of the corrected return.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803. DUE DATE FOR FILING A RETURN—EXTENSIONS—INTEREST AND PENALTIES. The due date of a return required to be filed with the department is the due date of the federal income tax return or informational return for federal income tax purposes. The department must have the authority to grant extensions of times by which returns required to be filed by this title may be submitted. The department must also have the authority to grant extensions of time to pay tax with regard to taxes imposed by this title. Interest at the rate as specified in RCW 82.32.050 accrues during any extension period and the interest and penalty provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply to late payments and deficiencies. Notwithstanding the limitation of RCW 82.32.090, in the case of the late filing of an informational return, there is imposed a penalty the amount of which is established by the department by rule. The penalty may not exceed fifty dollars per month for a maximum of ten months. RCW 82.32.105 applies to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804. JOINT RETURN. (1) If the federal income tax liabilities of both spouses are determined on a joint federal return for the taxable year, they must file a joint return under this title unless one spouse is a resident and the other is a nonresident.

(2) If neither spouse is required to file a federal income tax return for the taxable year, a joint return may be filed under this title under the same conditions under which a joint return may be filed for purposes of the federal income tax.

(3) If the federal income tax liability of either spouse is determined on a separate federal return for the taxable year, they must file separate returns under this title.

(4) If one spouse is a resident and the other is a nonresident, they must file separate returns under this title, unless they elect to determine their tax liabilities under this title on a joint return as if they were both residents, and:

(a) Their federal tax liability for the taxable year was determined on a joint federal return; or

(b) Neither spouse has filed a federal income tax return for the taxable year and they would be permitted to file a joint federal return for the taxable year.

(5) In any case in which a joint return is filed under this section, the liability of the husband and wife is joint and several, unless the spouse is relieved of liability under section 6013 of the internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805. RECORDS—RETURNS. (1) Every taxpayer and every person required to deduct and withhold the tax imposed under this title must keep records, render statements, make returns, file reports, and perform other acts as the department requires by rule. Each return must be made under penalty of perjury and on forms prescribed by the department. The department may require other statements and reports be made under penalty of perjury and on forms prescribed by the department. The department may require any taxpayer and any person required to deduct and withhold the tax imposed under this title to furnish to the department a correct copy of any return or document which the taxpayer has filed with the internal revenue service or received from the internal revenue service.

(2) All books and records and other papers and documents required to be kept under this title are subject to inspection by the department at all times during business hours of the day.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 806. ESTIMATION AGREEMENTS. The department may reasonably estimate the items of business or nonbusiness income of a taxpayer having an office within the state and one or more other states or foreign countries which may be apportioned or allocated to the state and may enter into estimation agreements with such taxpayers for the determination of their liability for the tax imposed by this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 807. PROVISIONS OF INTERNAL REVENUE CODE CONTROL. (1) To the extent possible without being inconsistent with this title, all of the provisions of the internal revenue code relating to the following subjects apply to the taxes imposed under this title:

(a) Time of payment of tax deducted and withheld under sections 301 through 306 of this act;

(b) Liability of transferees;

(c) Time and manner of making returns, extensions of time for filing returns, verification of returns, and the time when a return is deemed filed.

(2) The department by rule may provide modifications and exceptions to the provisions listed in subsection (1) of this section, if reasonably necessary to facilitate the prompt, efficient, and equitable collection of tax under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 808. REFUNDS OF OVERPAYMENTS—OTHER ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS. (1) The department must refund all taxes improperly paid or collected.

(2) The following sections apply to the administration of taxes imposed under this title: RCW 82.32.020, 82.32.050, 82.32.060, 82.32.070, 82.32.090, 82.32.100, 82.32.105, 82.32.110, 82.32.120, 82.32.130, 82.32.140, 82.32.150, 82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.32.180, 82.32.190, 82.32.200, 82.32.210, 82.32.220, 82.32.230, 82.32.235, 82.32.237, 82.32.240, 82.32.245, 82.32.265, 82.32.300, 82.32.310, 82.32.320, 82.32.330, 82.32.340, 82.32.350, 82.32.360, and 82.32.380.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 809. RULES. The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the administration and enforcement of this title. The rules, to the extent possible without being inconsistent with this title, must follow the internal revenue code and the regulations and rulings of the United States treasury department with respect to the federal income tax. The department may adopt as a part of these rules any portions of the internal revenue code and treasury department regulations and rulings, in whole or in part.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 810. ACCOUNTS INTO WHICH REVENUE IS DEPOSITED. (1) Seventy-five percent of all revenue collected under this title must be deposited into a subaccount created by the state treasury in the state general fund to be used exclusively for the purpose of making ample provision for the education of all children resident within the state, consistent with the state's duty under Article IX of the state Constitution.

(2) By June 30th of each fiscal year, twenty-five percent of the revenue collected under this title must be deposited into the higher education stabilization account created in Article VII, section . . . of the state Constitution (the new section created in Z-0511/15 or Z-0522/15).

PART IX

APPEALS

Sec. 901. RCW 82.03.130 and 2005 c 253 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board ((shall have)) has jurisdiction to decide the following types of appeals:

(a) Appeals taken pursuant to RCW 82.03.190.

(b) Appeals from a county board of equalization pursuant to RCW 84.08.130.

(c) Appeals by an assessor or landowner from an order of the director of revenue made pursuant to RCW 84.08.010 and 84.08.060, if filed with the board of tax appeals within thirty days after the mailing of the order, the right to such an appeal being hereby established.

(d) Appeals by an assessor or owner of an intercounty public utility or private car company from determinations by the director of revenue of equalized assessed valuation of property and the apportionment thereof to a county made pursuant to chapter 84.12 and 84.16 RCW, if filed with the board of tax appeals within thirty days after mailing of the determination, the right to such appeal being hereby established.

(e) Appeals by an assessor, landowner, or owner of an intercounty public utility or private car company from a determination of any county indicated ratio for such county compiled by the department ((of revenue)) pursuant to RCW 84.48.075((: PROVIDED, That)).

(i) ((Said)) The appeal must be filed after review of the ratio under RCW 84.48.075(3) and not later than fifteen days after the mailing of the certification; and

(ii) The hearing before the board ((shall)) must be expeditiously held in accordance with rules prescribed by the board and ((shall)) takes precedence over all matters of the same character.

(f) Appeals from the decisions of sale price of second class shorelands on navigable lakes by the department of natural resources pursuant to RCW ((79.94.210)) 79.125.450.

(g) Appeals from urban redevelopment property tax apportionment district proposals established by governmental ordinances pursuant to RCW 39.88.060.

(h) Appeals from interest rates as determined by the department of revenue for use in valuing farmland under current use assessment pursuant to RCW 84.34.065.

(i) Appeals from revisions to stumpage value tables used to determine value by the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.33.091.

(j) Appeals from denial of tax exemption application by the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.36.850.

(k) Appeals pursuant to RCW 84.40.038(3).

(l) Appeals pursuant to RCW 84.39.020.

(m) Appeals relating to income tax deficiencies and refunds, including penalties and interest, under Title 82A RCW (the new title created in section 1502 of this act).

(2) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law ((hereafter)), the provisions of RCW 1.12.070 ((shall)) apply to all notices of appeal filed with the board of tax appeals.

Sec. 902. RCW 82.03.140 and 2000 c 103 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In all appeals over which the board has jurisdiction under RCW 82.03.130, a party taking an appeal may elect either a formal or an informal hearing((, such)). An election to appeal under this section must be made according to the rules of practice and procedure ((to be)) promulgated by the board((: PROVIDED, That)).

(2) Nothing ((shall)) in this section:

(a) Prevents the assessor or taxpayer, as a party to an appeal pursuant to RCW 84.08.130, within twenty days from the date of the receipt of the notice of appeal, from filing with the clerk of the board notice of intention that the hearing be a formal one((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing herein shall));

(b) May be construed to modify the provisions of RCW 82.03.190((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).

(3) Upon an appeal under RCW 82.03.130(1) (e) or (m), the director ((of revenue)) may, within ten days from the date of its receipt of the notice of appeal, file with the clerk of the board notice of its ((intention that the hearing be held pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW)) election of a formal hearing.

(4) In the event that appeals are taken from the same decision, order, or determination, as the case may be, by different parties and only one of ((such)) the parties elects a formal hearing, a formal hearing ((shall)) must be granted.

PART X

APPLICATION OF TAX TO PUBLIC PENSIONS

Sec. 1001. RCW 2.10.180 and 2012 c 159 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), ((and)) (4), and (5) of this section, the right of a person to a retirement allowance, disability allowance, or death benefit, the retirement, disability or death allowance itself, any optional benefit, any other right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter, and the moneys in the fund created under this chapter, are ((hereby)) exempt from any state, county, municipal, or other local tax and ((shall)) are not ((be)) subject to execution, garnishment, or any other process of law whatsoever whether the same be in actual possession of the person or be deposited or loaned.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section ((shall not be deemed to)) does not prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from authorizing deductions therefrom for payment of premiums due on any group insurance policy or plan issued for the benefit of a group comprised of public employees of the state of Washington.

(3) Deductions made in the past from retirement benefits are hereby expressly recognized, ratified, and affirmed. Future deductions may only be made in accordance with this section.

(4) Subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) does not prohibit the department of retirement systems from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) a notice of payroll deduction issued under chapter 26.23 RCW, (c) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued pursuant to chapter 41.50 RCW, (e) a court order directing the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court order expressly authorized by federal law.

(5) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension or other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW (the new title created in section 1502 of this act), nor does it prohibit the department of retirement systems from complying with the tax withholding requirements of that title.

Sec. 1002. RCW 2.12.090 and 2012 c 159 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), ((and)) (4), and (5) of this section, the right of any person to a retirement allowance or optional retirement allowance under the provisions of this chapter and all moneys and investments and income thereof are exempt from any state, county, municipal, or other local tax and ((shall)) are not ((be)) subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or the insolvency laws, or other processes of law whatsoever whether the same be in actual possession of the person or be deposited or loaned and ((shall be)) are unassignable except as herein specifically provided.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) does not prohibit the department of retirement systems from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) a notice of payroll deduction issued under chapter 26.23 RCW, (c) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued pursuant to chapter 41.50 RCW, (e) a court order directing the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court order expressly authorized by federal law.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section ((shall not be deemed to)) does not prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from authorizing deductions therefrom for payment of premiums due on any group insurance policy or plan issued for the benefit of a group comprised of public employees of the state of Washington.

(4) Deductions made in the past from retirement benefits are hereby expressly recognized, ratified, and affirmed. Future deductions may only be made in accordance with this section.

(5) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension or other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW (the new title created in section 1502 of this act), nor does it prohibit the department of retirement systems from complying with the tax withholding requirements of that title.

Sec. 1003. RCW 6.13.030 and 2007 c 429 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A homestead may consist of lands, as described in RCW 6.13.010, regardless of area, but the homestead exemption amount ((shall)) may not exceed the lesser of (1) the total net value of the lands, manufactured homes, mobile home, improvements, and other personal property, as described in RCW 6.13.010, or (2) the sum of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars in the case of lands, manufactured homes, mobile home, and improvements, or the sum of fifteen thousand dollars in the case of other personal property described in RCW 6.13.010((, except where the homestead is subject to execution, attachment, or seizure by or under any legal process whatever to satisfy a judgment in favor of any state for failure to pay that state's income tax on benefits received while a resident of the state of Washington from a pension or other retirement plan, in which event there shall be no dollar limit on the value of the exemption)).

Sec. 1004. RCW 6.15.020 and 2011 c 162 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the policy of the state of Washington to ensure the well-being of its citizens by protecting retirement income to which they are or may become entitled. For that purpose generally and pursuant to the authority granted to the state of Washington under 11 U.S.C. Sec. 522(b)(2), the exemptions in this section relating to retirement benefits are provided.

(2) Unless otherwise provided by federal law, any money received by any citizen of the state of Washington as a pension from the government of the United States, whether the same be in the actual possession of such person or be deposited or loaned, ((shall be)) is exempt from execution, attachment, garnishment, or seizure by or under any legal process whatever, and when a debtor dies, or absconds, and leaves his or her family any money exempted by this subsection, the same ((shall be)) is exempt to the family as provided in this subsection. This subsection ((shall)) does not apply to child support collection actions issued under chapter 26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW, if otherwise permitted by federal law, or to collection actions for taxes imposed under Title 82A RCW (the new title created in section 1502 of this act).

(3) The right of a person to a pension, annuity, or retirement allowance or disability allowance, or death benefits, or any optional benefit, or any other right accrued or accruing to any citizen of the state of Washington under any employee benefit plan, and any fund created by such a plan or arrangement, ((shall be)) is exempt from execution, attachment, garnishment, or seizure by or under any legal process whatever. This subsection ((shall)) does not apply to child support collection actions issued under chapter 26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW if otherwise permitted by federal law, or to collection actions for taxes imposed under Title 82A RCW (the new title created in section 1502 of this act). This subsection ((shall)) permits benefits under any such plan or arrangement to be payable to a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a participant in such plan to the extent expressly provided for in a qualified domestic relations order that meets the requirements for such orders under the plan, or, in the case of benefits payable under a plan described in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 403(b) or 408 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, or section 409 of such code as in effect before January 1, 1984, to the extent provided in any order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction that provides for maintenance or support. This subsection does not prohibit actions against an employee benefit plan, or fund for valid obligations incurred by the plan or fund for the benefit of the plan or fund.

(4) For the purposes of this section, the term "employee benefit plan" means any plan or arrangement that is described in RCW 49.64.020, including any Keogh plan, whether funded by a trust or by an annuity contract, and in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 401(a) or 403(a) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended; or that is a tax-sheltered annuity or a custodial account described in section 403(b) of such code or an individual retirement account or an individual retirement annuity described in section 408 of such code; or a Roth individual retirement account described in section 408A of such code; or a medical savings account or a health savings account described in sections 220 and 223, respectively, of such code; or a retirement bond described in section 409 of such code as in effect before January 1, 1984. The term "employee benefit plan" ((shall)) does not include any employee benefit plan that is established or maintained for its employees by the government of the United States, by the state of Washington under chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.34, 41.35, 41.37, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW or RCW 41.50.770, or by any agency or instrumentality of the government of the United States.

(5) An employee benefit plan ((shall be)) is deemed to be a spendthrift trust, regardless of the source of funds, the relationship between the trustee or custodian of the plan and the beneficiary, or the ability of the debtor to withdraw or borrow or otherwise become entitled to benefits from the plan before retirement. This subsection ((shall)) does not apply to child support collection actions issued under chapter 26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW, if otherwise permitted by federal law, or to collection actions for taxes imposed under Title 82A RCW (the new title created in section 1502 of this act). This subsection ((shall)) permits benefits under any such plan or arrangement to be payable to a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a participant in such plan to the extent expressly provided for in a qualified domestic relations order that meets the requirements for such orders under the plan, or, in the case of benefits payable under a plan described in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 403(b) or 408 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, or section 409 of such code as in effect before January 1, 1984, to the extent provided in any order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction that provides for maintenance or support.

(6)(a) Unless prohibited by federal law, nothing contained in subsection (3), (4), or (5) of this section ((shall)) may be construed as a termination or limitation of a spouse's community property interest in an employee benefit plan held in the name of or on account of the other spouse, who is the participant or the account holder spouse. Unless prohibited by applicable federal law, at the death of the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse, the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse may transfer or distribute the community property interest of the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse in the participant or account holder spouse's employee benefit plan to the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse's estate, testamentary trust, inter vivos trust, or other successor or successors pursuant to the last will of the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse or the law of intestate succession, and that distributee may, but ((shall)) is not ((be)) required to, obtain an order of a court of competent jurisdiction, including a nonjudicial binding agreement or order entered under chapter 11.96A RCW, to confirm the distribution.

(b) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, the distributee of the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse's community property interest in an employee benefit plan ((shall be)) is considered a person entitled to the full protection of subsection (3) of this section. The nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse's consent to a beneficiary designation by the participant or account holder spouse with respect to an employee benefit plan ((shall)) does not, absent clear and convincing evidence to the contrary, be deemed a release, gift, relinquishment, termination, limitation, or transfer of the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse's community property interest in an employee benefit plan.

(c) For purposes of this subsection((, the term)):

(i) "Nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse" means the spouse of the person who is a participant in an employee benefit plan or in whose name an individual retirement account is maintained. ((As used in this subsection,))

(ii) An order of a court of competent jurisdiction entered under chapter 11.96A RCW includes an agreement, as that term is used under RCW 11.96A.220.

Sec. 1005. RCW 41.24.240 and 1995 c 11 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right of any person to any future payment under the provisions of this chapter ((shall)) is not ((be)) transferable or assignable at law or in equity, and none of the moneys paid or payable or the rights existing under this chapter, ((shall be)) is subject to execution, levy, attachment, garnishment, or other legal process, or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law. This section ((shall)) is not be applicable to any child support collection action taken under chapter 26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW. Benefits under this chapter ((shall be)) are payable to a spouse or ex-spouse to the extent expressly provided for in any court decree of dissolution or legal separation or in any court order or court-approved property settlement agreement incident to any court decree of dissolution or legal separation.

(2) Nothing in this chapter ((shall)) may be construed to deprive any participant, eligible to receive a pension hereunder, from receiving a pension under any other act to which that participant may become eligible by reason of services other than or in addition to his or her services under this chapter.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension or other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW (the new title created in section 1502 of this act), nor does it prohibit the department of retirement systems from complying with the tax withholding requirements of that title.

Sec. 1006. RCW 41.32.052 and 2012 c 159 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to subsections (2) ((and)), (3), and (4) of this section, the right of a person to a pension, an annuity, a retirement allowance, or disability allowance, to the return of contributions, any optional benefit or death benefit, any other right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter and the moneys in the various funds created by this chapter ((shall be)) are unassignable, and are hereby exempt from any state, county, municipal or other local tax, and ((shall)) are not ((be)) subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or other process of law whatsoever whether the same be in actual possession of the person or be deposited or loaned.

(2) This section ((shall not be deemed to)) does not prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance who is eligible:

(a) Under RCW 41.05.080 from authorizing monthly deductions therefrom for payment of premiums due on any group insurance policy or plan issued for the benefit of a group comprised of public employees of the state of Washington or its political subdivisions;

(b) Under a group health care benefit plan approved pursuant to RCW 28A.400.350 or 41.05.065 from authorizing monthly deductions therefrom, of the amount or amounts of subscription payments, premiums, or contributions to any person, firm, or corporation furnishing or providing medical, surgical, and hospital care or other health care insurance; or

(c) Under this system from authorizing monthly deductions therefrom for payment of dues and other membership fees to any retirement association composed of retired teachers and/or public employees pursuant to a written agreement between the director and the retirement association.

Deductions under (a) and (b) of this subsection ((shall)) (2) must be made in accordance with rules that may be adopted by the director.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) does not prohibit the department from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of payroll deduction issued pursuant to RCW 26.23.060, (d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued by the department, (e) a court order directing the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court order expressly authorized by federal law.

(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension or other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW (the new title created in section 1502 of this act), nor does it prohibit the department of retirement systems from complying with the tax withholding requirements of that title.

Sec. 1007. RCW 41.35.100 and 2012 c 159 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to subsections (2) ((and)), (3), and (4) of this section, the right of a person to a pension, an annuity, or retirement allowance, any optional benefit, any other right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter, the various funds created by this chapter, and all moneys and investments and income thereof, are ((hereby)) exempt from any state, county, municipal, or other local tax, and ((shall)) are not ((be)) subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or other process of law whatsoever, whether the same be in actual possession of the person or be deposited or loaned and ((shall be)) are unassignable.

(2) This section does not prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from authorizing deductions therefrom for payment of premiums due on any group insurance policy or plan issued for the benefit of a group comprised of public employees of the state of Washington or its political subdivisions and which has been approved for deduction in accordance with rules that may be adopted by the state health care authority and/or the department. This section also does not prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from authorizing deductions therefrom for payment of dues and other membership fees to any retirement association or organization the membership of which is composed of retired public employees, if a total of three hundred or more of such retired employees have authorized such deduction for payment to the same retirement association or organization.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit the department from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of payroll deduction issued pursuant to RCW 26.23.060, (d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued by the department, (e) a court order directing the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court order expressly authorized by federal law.

(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension or other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW (the new title created in section 1502 of this act), nor does it prohibit the department of retirement systems from complying with the tax withholding requirements of that title.

Sec. 1008. RCW 41.40.052 and 2012 c 159 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to subsections (2) ((and)), (3), and (4) of this section, the right of a person to a pension, an annuity, or retirement allowance, any optional benefit, any other right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter, the various funds created by this chapter, and all moneys and investments and income thereof, are ((hereby)) exempt from any state, county, municipal, or other local tax, and ((shall)) are not ((be)) subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or other process of law whatsoever, whether the same be in actual possession of the person or be deposited or loaned and ((shall be)) are unassignable.

(2)(a) This section ((shall not be deemed to)) does not prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from authorizing deductions therefrom for payment of premiums due on any group insurance policy or plan issued for the benefit of a group comprised of public employees of the state of Washington or its political subdivisions and which has been approved for deduction in accordance with rules that may be adopted by the state health care authority and/or the department, and this section ((shall not be deemed to)) does not prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from authorizing deductions therefrom for payment of dues and other membership fees to any retirement association or organization the membership of which is composed of retired public employees, if a total of three hundred or more of such retired employees have authorized such deduction for payment to the same retirement association or organization.

(b) This section does not prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from authorizing deductions from that allowance for charitable purposes on the same terms as employees and public officers under RCW 41.04.035 and 41.04.036.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) does not prohibit the department from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of payroll deduction issued pursuant to RCW 26.23.060, (d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued by the department, (e) a court order directing the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court order expressly authorized by federal law.

(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension or other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW (the new title created in section 1502 of this act), nor does it prohibit the department of retirement systems from complying with the tax withholding requirements of that title.

Sec. 1009. RCW 41.44.240 and 2012 c 159 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right of a person to a pension, annuity or a retirement allowance, to the return of contribution, the pension, annuity or retirement allowance itself, any optional benefit, any other right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter, and the moneys in the fund created under this chapter ((shall)) are not ((be)) subject to execution, garnishment, or any other process whatsoever whether the same be in actual possession of the person or be deposited or loaned.

(2) This section ((shall)) does not apply to child support collection actions taken under chapter 26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW against benefits payable under any such plan or arrangement. Benefits under this chapter ((shall be)) are payable to a spouse or ex-spouse to the extent expressly provided for in any court decree of dissolution or legal separation or in any court order or court-approved property settlement agreement incident to any court decree of dissolution or legal separation.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension or other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW (the new title created in section 1502 of this act), nor does it prohibit the department of retirement systems from complying with the tax withholding requirements of that title.

Sec. 1010. RCW 41.26.053 and 2012 c 159 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to subsections (2) ((and)), (3), and (4) of this section, the right of a person to a retirement allowance, disability allowance, or death benefit, to the return of accumulated contributions, the retirement, disability or death allowance itself, any optional benefit, any other right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter, and the moneys in the fund created under this chapter, are hereby exempt from any state, county, municipal, or other local tax and ((shall)) are not ((be)) subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or any other process of law whatsoever, whether the same be in actual possession of the person or be deposited or loaned and ((shall be)) are unassignable.

(2) On the written request of any person eligible to receive benefits under this section, the department may deduct from such payments the premiums for life, health, or other insurance. The request on behalf of any child or children ((shall)) must be made by the legal guardian of such child or children. The department may provide for such persons one or more plans of group insurance, through contracts with regularly constituted insurance carriers or health care service contractors.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) does not prohibit the department from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of payroll deduction issued pursuant to RCW 26.23.060, (d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued by the department, (e) a court order directing the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court order expressly authorized by federal law.

(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension or other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW (the new title created in section 1502 of this act), nor does it prohibit the department of retirement systems from complying with the tax withholding requirements of that title.

Sec. 1011. RCW 43.43.310 and 2012 c 159 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) ((and)), (3), and (4) of this section, the right of any person to a retirement allowance or optional retirement allowance under ((the provisions hereof)) this section and all moneys and investments and income thereof are exempt from any state, county, municipal, or other local tax and ((shall)) are not ((be)) subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or the insolvency laws, or other processes of law whatsoever, whether the same be in actual possession of the person or be deposited or loaned and ((shall be)) are unassignable except as herein specifically provided.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) does not prohibit the department of retirement systems from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of payroll deduction issued pursuant to RCW 26.23.060, (d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued pursuant to chapter 41.50 RCW, (e) a court order directing the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court order expressly authorized by federal law.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section ((shall not be deemed to)) does not prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from authorizing deductions therefrom for payment of premiums due on any group insurance policy or plan issued for the benefit of a group comprised of members of the Washington state patrol or other public employees of the state of Washington, or for contributions to the Washington state patrol memorial foundation.

(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension or other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW (the new title created in section 1502 of this act), nor does it prohibit the department of retirement systems from complying with the tax withholding requirements of that title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012. RCW 6.15.025 (Exemption of pension or retirement plan benefits from execution for judgment for out-of-state income tax) and 1991 c 123 s 3 are each repealed.

PART XI

REDUCING THE STATE SALES TAX

Sec. 1101. RCW 82.08.020 and 2014 c 140 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning January 1, 2018, there is levied and collected a tax equal to ((six)) five and five-tenths percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state of:

(a) Tangible personal property, unless the sale is specifically excluded from the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;

(b) Digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services, if the sale is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;

(c) Services, other than digital automated services, included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;

(d) Extended warranties to consumers; and

(e) Anything else, the sale of which is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale.

(2) There is levied and collected an additional tax on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.

(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include:

(a) Farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181, unless the farm tractor or farm vehicle is for use in the production of marijuana;

(b) Off-road vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.365;

(c) Nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.310; and

(d) Snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.04.546.

(5) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes collected under subsection (1) of this section must be dedicated to funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470. The revenue identified in this subsection must be deposited in the performance audits of government account created in RCW 43.09.475.

(6) The taxes imposed under this chapter apply to successive retail sales of the same property.

(7) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

PART XII

ELIMINATING THE STATE PROPERTY TAX

Sec. 1201. RCW 84.52.065 and 1991 sp.s. c 31 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the limitations in RCW 84.55.010, in each year the state ((shall levy)) levies for collection in the following year for the support of common schools of the state a tax of three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value upon the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the state adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue. The state may not levy a tax for collection in calendar year 2018 and each year thereafter.

(2) As used in this section, "the support of common schools" includes the payment of the principal and interest on bonds issued for capital construction projects for the common schools.

Sec. 1202. RCW 84.52.043 and 2009 c 551 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal property by the taxing districts hereafter named ((shall be)) are as follows:

(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts ((shall be)) are as follows: (a) The ((levy by the state shall not exceed three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support of the common schools; (b) the)) levy by any county ((shall not)) may exceed one dollar and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (((c))) (b) the levy by any road district ((shall)) may not exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; and (((d))) (c) the levy by any city or town ((shall)) may not exceed three dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value. However any county is hereby authorized to increase its levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a rate not to exceed two dollars and forty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for general county purposes if the total levies for both the county and any road district within the county do not exceed four dollars and five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as a result of the increased county levy.

(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior taxing districts((, other than the state, shall)) may not exceed five dollars and ninety cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term "junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other than the state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and public utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection ((shall)) do not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution; (c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW 84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; (f) the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are protected under RCW 84.52.120; (g) levies imposed by ferry districts under RCW 36.54.130; (h) levies for criminal justice purposes under RCW 84.52.135; (i) the portions of levies by fire protection districts that are protected under RCW 84.52.125; and (j) levies by counties for transit-related purposes under RCW 84.52.140.

Sec. 1203. RCW 84.52.050 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 194 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as ((hereinafter)) provided in this section, the aggregate of all tax levies upon real and personal property by the state and all taxing districts, now existing or hereafter created, ((shall)) may not in any year exceed ((one percentum)) seven dollars per one thousand dollars of the true and fair value of such property in money((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)).

(2) Such aggregate limitation or any specific limitation imposed by law in conformity therewith may be exceeded only as authorized by law and in conformity with the provisions of Article VII, section 2 (a), (b), or (c) of the Constitution of the state of Washington.

(3) Nothing ((herein shall)) in this section:

(a) Prevents levies at the rates now provided by law by or for any port or public utility district.

(b) Nothing herein contained prohibits the legislature from allocating or reallocating the authority to levy taxes between the taxing districts of the state and its political subdivisions in a manner that complies with the aggregate tax limitation set forth in this section.

(4) The term "taxing district" for the purposes of this section ((shall)) means any political subdivision, municipal corporation, district, or other governmental agency authorized by law to levy, or have levied for it, ad valorem taxes on property, other than a port or public utility district. ((Such aggregate limitation or any specific limitation imposed by law in conformity therewith may be exceeded only as authorized by law and in conformity with the provisions of Article VII, section 2(a), (b), or (c) of the Constitution of the state of Washington.

Nothing herein contained shall prohibit the legislature from allocating or reallocating the authority to levy taxes between the taxing districts of the state and its political subdivisions in a manner which complies with the aggregate tax limitation set forth in this section.))

Sec. 1204. RCW 84.55.005 and 2014 c 97 s 316 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of economic analysis of the federal department of commerce by September 25th of the year before the taxes are payable;

(2) "Limit factor" means((:

(a) For taxing districts with a population of less than ten thousand in the calendar year prior to the assessment year, one hundred one percent;

(b) For taxing districts for which a limit factor is authorized under RCW 84.55.0101, the lesser of the limit factor authorized under that section or one hundred one percent;

(c) For all other districts,)) the lesser of one hundred ((one)) three percent or one hundred percent plus inflation; and

(3) "Regular property taxes" has the meaning given it in RCW 84.04.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1205. RCW 84.55.0101 (Limit factor—Authorization for taxing district to use one hundred one percent or less—Ordinance or resolution) and 2007 sp.s. c 1 s 2 & 1997 c 3 s 204 are each repealed.

Sec. 1206. RCW 36.58.150 and 1984 c 186 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A solid waste disposal district ((shall)) does not have the power to levy an annual levy without voter approval, but it ((shall have)) has the power to levy a tax, in excess of the ((one percent)) limitation in RCW 84.52.050, upon the property within the district for a one year period to be used for operating or capital purposes whenever authorized by the electors of the district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

(a) A solid waste disposal district may issue general obligation bonds for capital purposes only, subject to the limitations prescribed in RCW 39.36.020(1), and may provide for the retirement of the bonds by voter-approved bond retirement tax levies pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state Constitution and RCW 84.52.056. Such general obligation bonds ((shall)) must be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

(b) A solid waste disposal district may issue revenue bonds to fund its activities. Such revenue bonds may be in any form, including bearer bonds or registered bonds as provided in RCW 39.46.030.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such revenue bonds may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

Sec. 1207. RCW 36.60.040 and 1983 c 303 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

A county rail district is not authorized to impose a regular ad valorem property tax levy but may:

(1) Levy an ad valorem property tax, in excess of the ((one percent)) limitation in RCW 84.52.050, upon the property within the district for a one-year period to be used for operating or capital purposes whenever authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

(2) Provide for the retirement of voter approved general obligation bonds, issued for capital purposes only, by levying bond retirement ad valorem property tax levies, in excess of the one percent limitation, whenever authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state Constitution and RCW 84.52.056.

Sec. 1208. RCW 36.69.145 and 2010 c 106 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A park and recreation district may impose regular property tax levies in an amount equal to sixty cents or less per thousand dollars of assessed value of property in the district in each year for six consecutive years when specifically authorized so to do by a majority of at least three-fifths of the voters thereof approving a proposition authorizing the levies submitted at a special election or at the regular election of the district, at which election the number of voters voting "yes" on the proposition must constitute three-fifths of a number equal to forty ((per centum)) percent of the number of voters voting in such district at the last preceding general election when the number of voters voting on the proposition does not exceed forty ((per centum)) percent of the number of voters voting in such taxing district in the last preceding general election; or by a majority of at least three-fifths of the voters thereof voting on the proposition if the number of voters voting on the proposition exceeds forty ((per centum)) percent of the number of voters voting in such taxing district in the last preceding general election. A proposition authorizing the tax levies may not be submitted by a park and recreation district more than twice in any twelve-month period. Ballot propositions must conform with RCW 29A.36.210. In the event a park and recreation district is levying property taxes, which in combination with property taxes levied by other taxing districts subject to the ((one percent)) limitation provided for in ((Article 7, section 2, of our state Constitution)) RCW 84.52.050 result in taxes in excess of the limitation provided for in RCW 84.52.043(2), the park and recreation district property tax levy must be reduced or eliminated as provided in RCW 84.52.010.

(2) The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 does not apply to the first levy imposed under this section following the approval of the levies by the voters under subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 1209. RCW 36.73.060 and 2005 c 336 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A district may levy an ad valorem property tax in excess of the ((one percent)) limitation in RCW 84.52.050 upon the property within the district for a one-year period whenever authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

(2) A district may provide for the retirement of voter-approved general obligation bonds, issued for capital purposes only, by levying bond retirement ad valorem property tax levies in excess of the one percent limitation whenever authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state Constitution and RCW 84.52.056.

Sec. 1210. RCW 36.83.030 and 1983 c 130 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A service district may levy an ad valorem property tax, in excess of the ((one percent)) limitation in RCW 84.52.050, upon the property within the district for a one-year period whenever authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

(2) A service district may provide for the retirement of voter approved general obligation bonds, issued for capital purposes only, by levying bond retirement ad valorem property tax levies, in excess of the one percent limitation, whenever authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state Constitution and RCW 84.52.056.

Sec. 1211. RCW 36.100.050 and 1988 ex.s. c 1 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A public facilities district may levy an ad valorem property tax, in excess of the ((one percent)) limitation in RCW 84.52.050, upon the property within the district for a one-year period to be used for operating or capital purposes whenever authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

(2) A public facilities district may provide for the retirement of voter-approved general obligation bonds, issued for capital purposes only, by levying bond retirement ad valorem property tax levies, in excess of the one percent limitation, whenever authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state Constitution and RCW 84.52.056.

Sec. 1212. RCW 67.38.130 and 1984 c 131 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governing body of a cultural arts, stadium and convention district may levy or cause to levy the following ad valorem taxes:

(((1))) (a)(i) Regular ad valorem property tax levies in an amount equal to twenty-five cents or less per thousand dollars of the assessed value of property in the district in each year for six consecutive years when specifically authorized so to do by a majority of at least three-fifths of the electors thereof approving a proposition authorizing the levies submitted at a general or special election, at which election the number of persons voting "yes" on the proposition ((shall)) constitutes three-fifths of a number equal to forty ((percentum)) percent of the total votes cast in such taxing district at the last preceding general election; or by a majority of at least three-fifths of the electors thereof voting on the proposition when the number of electors voting yes on the proposition exceeds forty ((percentum)) percent of the total votes cast in such taxing district in the last preceding general election. Ballot propositions ((shall)) must conform with RCW ((29.30.111)) 29A.36.210.

(ii)(A) In the event a cultural arts, stadium and convention district is levying property taxes, which in combination with property taxes levied by other taxing districts subject to the ((one percent)) limitation provided for in ((Article VII, section 2, of our state Constitution)) RCW 84.52.050 result in taxes in excess of the limitation provided for in RCW 84.52.043, the cultural arts, stadium and convention district property tax levy ((shall)) must be reduced or eliminated before the property tax levies of other taxing districts are reduced((: PROVIDED, That no)).

(B) Cultural arts, stadium, and convention districts may pledge anticipated revenues derived from the property tax herein authorized as security for payments of bonds issued pursuant to ((subsection (1))) (a)(i) of this ((section: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That such)) subsection.

(C) The limitation ((shall)) in (a)(ii)(A) of this subsection does not apply to property taxes approved pursuant to ((subsections (2) and (3))) (b) and (c) of this ((section)) subsection.

(iii) The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 ((shall apply)) applies to levies after the first levy authorized under this section following the approval of such levy by voters pursuant to this section.

(((2))) (b) An annual excess ad valorem property tax for general district purposes when authorized by the district voters in the manner prescribed by ((section 2,)) Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution and by RCW 84.52.052.

(((3))) (c) Multiyear excess ad valorem property tax levies used to retire general obligation bond issues when authorized by the district voters in the manner prescribed by ((section 2,)) Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution and by RCW 84.52.056.

(2) The district ((shall)) must include in its regular property tax levy for each year a sum sufficient to pay the interest and principal on all outstanding general obligation bonds issued without voter approval pursuant to RCW 67.38.110 and may include a sum sufficient to create a sinking fund for the redemption of all outstanding bonds.

Sec. 1213. RCW 84.52.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 28 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes must be levied or voted in specific amounts.

(2) The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, must be determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county must be determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts respectively.

(3) When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor must recompute and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(a) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district, and city or town purposes must be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law; however any state levy takes precedence over all other levies and may not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 36.54.130, 84.34.230, 84.52.069, 84.52.105, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, 84.52.125, 84.52.135, 84.52.140, and the protected portion of the levy under RCW 86.15.160 by flood control zone districts in a county with a population of seven hundred seventy-five thousand or more that are coextensive with a county, the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the ((one percent)) limitation under RCW 84.52.050 exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050, then these levies must be reduced as follows:

(i) The portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that has a population of less than one hundred fifty thousand and is located in a county with a population of one million five hundred thousand or more that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050 or must be eliminated;

(ii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the ((one percent)) limitation under RCW 84.52.050 still exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050, the protected portion of the levy imposed under RCW 86.15.160 by a flood control zone district in a county with a population of seven hundred seventy-five thousand or more that is coextensive with a county must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050 or must be eliminated;

(iii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the ((one percent)) limitation under RCW 84.52.050 still exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050, the levy imposed by a county under RCW 84.52.140 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050 or must be eliminated;

(iv) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the ((one percent)) limitation under RCW 84.52.050 still exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050, the portion of the levy by a fire protection district that is protected under RCW 84.52.125 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050 or must be eliminated;

(v) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the ((one percent)) limitation under RCW 84.52.050 still exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050, the levy imposed by a county under RCW 84.52.135 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050 or must be eliminated;

(vi) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the ((one percent)) limitation under RCW 84.52.050 still exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050, the levy imposed by a ferry district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050 or must be eliminated;

(vii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the ((one percent)) limitation under RCW 84.52.050 still exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district with a population of one hundred fifty thousand or more that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050 or must be eliminated;

(viii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the ((one percent)) limitation under RCW 84.52.050 still exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050, then the levies imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, must be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined rate no longer exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050 or must be eliminated; and

(ix) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the ((one percent)) limitation under RCW 84.52.050 still exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050, then the thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050 or must be eliminated.

(b) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property must be reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:

(i) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100, and 67.38.130 must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(ii) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts other than the portion of a levy protected under RCW 84.52.815 must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(iii) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire protection service authorities, library districts, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for public hospital districts, must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(iv) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after January 1, 2002, must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(v) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 and regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b) and (c) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and

(vi) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a), library districts, metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

Sec. 1214. RCW 84.52.010 and 2009 c 551 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes ((shall)) must be levied or voted in specific amounts.

(2) The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, ((shall)) must be determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county ((shall)) must be determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts respectively.

(3) When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor ((shall)) must recompute and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(((1))) (a) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district, and city or town purposes ((shall)) must be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law; however any state levy ((shall)) takes precedence over all other levies and ((shall)) may not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 36.54.130, 84.34.230, 84.52.069, 84.52.105, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, 84.52.125, 84.52.135, and 84.52.140, the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the ((one percent)) limitation under RCW 84.52.050 exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050, then these levies ((shall)) must be reduced as follows:

(((a))) (i) The levy imposed by a county under RCW 84.52.140 ((shall)) must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050 or ((shall)) must be eliminated;

(((b))) (ii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the ((one percent)) limitation under RCW 84.52.050 still exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050, the portion of the levy by a fire protection district that is protected under RCW 84.52.125 ((shall)) must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050 or ((shall)) must be eliminated;

(((c))) (iii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the ((one percent)) limitation under RCW 84.52.050 still exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050, the levy imposed by a county under RCW 84.52.135 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050 or must be eliminated;

(((d))) (iv) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the ((one percent)) limitation under RCW 84.52.050 still exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050, the levy imposed by a ferry district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050 or must be eliminated;

(((e))) (v) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the ((one percent)) limitation under RCW 84.52.050 still exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 ((shall)) must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050 or ((shall)) must be eliminated;

(((f))) (vi) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the ((one percent)) limitation under RCW 84.52.050 still exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050, then the levies imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined rate no longer exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050 or ((shall)) must be eliminated; and

(((g))) (vii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the ((one percent)) limitation under RCW 84.52.050 still exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050, then the thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 ((shall)) must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050 or must be eliminated.

(((2))) (b) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property ((shall)) must be reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:

(((a))) (i) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100, and 67.38.130 ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(((b))) (ii) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(((c))) (iii) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire protection service authorities, library districts, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for public hospital districts, ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(((d))) (iv) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after January 1, 2002, ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(((e))) (v) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 and regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b) and (c) ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and

(((f))) (vi) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a), library districts, metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

Sec. 1215. RCW 84.69.020 and 2005 c 502 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On the order of the county treasurer, ad valorem taxes paid before or after delinquency ((shall)) must be refunded if they were:

(((1))) (a) Paid more than once;

(((2))) (b) Paid as a result of manifest error in description;

(((3))) (c) Paid as a result of a clerical error in extending the tax rolls;

(((4))) (d) Paid as a result of other clerical errors in listing property;

(((5))) (e) Paid with respect to improvements which did not exist on assessment date;

(((6))) (f) Paid under levies or statutes adjudicated to be illegal or unconstitutional;

(((7))) (g) Paid as a result of mistake, inadvertence, or lack of knowledge by any person exempted from paying real property taxes or a portion thereof pursuant to RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, as now or hereafter amended;

(((8))) (h) Paid as a result of mistake, inadvertence, or lack of knowledge by either a public official or employee or by any person with respect to real property in which the person paying the same has no legal interest;

(((9))) (i) Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation which was appealed to the county board of equalization and ordered reduced by the board;

(((10))) (j) Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation which was appealed to the state board of tax appeals and ordered reduced by the board((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the amount refunded under ((subsections (9) and (10))) (i) and (j) of this ((section shall)) subsection may only be for the difference between the tax paid on the basis of the appealed valuation and the tax payable on the valuation adjusted in accordance with the board's order;

(((11))) (k) Paid as a state property tax levied upon property, the assessed value of which has been established by the state board of tax appeals for the year of such levy((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). However, the amount refunded ((shall)) may only be for the difference between the state property tax paid and the amount of state property tax which would, when added to all other property taxes within the ((one percent)) limitation of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution equal ((one percent)) the percentage under RCW 84.52.050 of the assessed value established by the board;

(((12))) (l) Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation which was adjudicated to be unlawful or excessive((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the amount refunded ((shall be)) is for the difference between the amount of tax which was paid on the basis of the valuation adjudged unlawful or excessive and the amount of tax payable on the basis of the assessed valuation determined as a result of the proceeding;

(((13))) (m) Paid on property acquired under RCW 84.60.050, and canceled under RCW 84.60.050(2);

(((14))) (n) Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation that was reduced under RCW 84.48.065;

(((15))) (o) Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation that was reduced under RCW 84.40.039; or

(((16))) (p) Abated under RCW 84.70.010.

(2) No refunds under the provisions of this section ((shall)) may be made because of any error in determining the valuation of property, except as authorized in subsection((s (9), (10), (11), and (12))) (1)(i), (j), (k), and (l) of this section nor may any refunds be made if a bona fide purchaser has acquired rights that would preclude the assessment and collection of the refunded tax from the property that should properly have been charged with the tax. Any refunds made on delinquent taxes ((shall)) must include the proportionate amount of interest and penalties paid. However, no refunds as a result of an incorrect payment authorized under subsection (((8))) (1)(h) of this section made by a third party payee ((shall)) may be granted. The county treasurer may deduct from moneys collected for the benefit of the state's levy, refunds of the state levy including interest on the levy as provided by this section and chapter 84.68 RCW.

(3) The county treasurer of each county ((shall)) must make all refunds determined to be authorized by this section, and by the first Monday in February of each year, report to the county legislative authority a list of all refunds made under this section during the previous year. The list is to include the name of the person receiving the refund, the amount of the refund, and the reason for the refund.

Sec. 1216. RCW 39.89.020 and 2001 c 212 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Assessed value of real property" means the valuation of real property as placed on the last completed assessment roll.

(2) "Local government" means any city, town, county, port district, or any combination thereof.

(3) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative action by a local government.

(4) "Public improvements" means:

(a) Infrastructure improvements within the increment area that include:

(i) Street and road construction and maintenance;

(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;

(iii) Sidewalks and streetlights;

(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;

(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;

(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas; and

(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems; and

(b) Expenditures for any of the following purposes:

(i) Providing environmental analysis, professional management, planning, and promotion within the increment area, including the management and promotion of retail trade activities in the increment area;

(ii) Providing maintenance and security for common or public areas in the increment area; or

(iii) Historic preservation activities authorized under RCW 35.21.395.

(5) "Public improvement costs" means the costs of: (a) Design, planning, acquisition, site preparation, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement, and installation of public improvements; (b) relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending construction of public improvements; (c) relocating utilities as a result of public improvements; (d) financing public improvements, including interest during construction, legal and other professional services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs on general indebtedness issued to finance public improvements, and any necessary reserves for general indebtedness; (e) assessments incurred in revaluing real property for the purpose of determining the tax allocation base value that are in excess of costs incurred by the assessor in accordance with the revaluation plan under chapter 84.41 RCW, and the costs of apportioning the taxes and complying with this chapter and other applicable law; and (f) administrative expenses and feasibility studies reasonably necessary and related to these costs, including related costs that may have been incurred before adoption of the ordinance authorizing the public improvements and the use of community revitalization financing to fund the costs of the public improvements.

(6) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as defined in RCW 84.04.140, except((: (a))) regular property taxes levied by port districts or public utility districts specifically for the purpose of making required payments of principal and interest on general indebtedness((; and (b) regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of the common schools under RCW 84.52.065)). Regular property taxes do not include excess property tax levies that are exempt from the aggregate limits for junior and senior taxing districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043.

(7) "Tax allocation base value" means the true and fair value of real property located within an increment area for taxes imposed in the year in which the increment area is created, plus twenty-five percent of any increase in the true and fair value of real property located within an increment area that is placed on the assessment rolls after the increment area is created.

(8) "Tax allocation revenues" means those tax revenues derived from the imposition of regular property taxes on the increment value and distributed to finance public improvements.

(9) "Increment area" means the geographic area from which taxes are to be appropriated to finance public improvements authorized under this chapter.

(10) "Increment value" means seventy-five percent of any increase in the true and fair value of real property in an increment area that is placed on the tax rolls after the increment area is created.

(11) "Taxing districts" means a governmental entity that levies or has levied for it regular property taxes upon real property located within a proposed or approved increment area.

(12) "Value of taxable property" means the value of the taxable property as defined in RCW 39.36.015.

Sec. 1217. RCW 43.99H.060 and 2009 c 500 s 8 and 2009 c 479 s 32 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) For bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(16), on each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due, the board of regents or the board of trustees of Washington State University shall cause the amount computed in RCW 43.99H.040(1) to be paid out of the appropriate building account or capital projects account to the state treasurer for deposit into the general fund of the state treasury.

(2) For bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(15), on each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due, the state treasurer shall transfer the amount computed in RCW 43.99H.040(2) from the capitol campus reserve account, hereby created in the state treasury, to the general fund of the state treasury. At the time of sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(15), and on or before June 30th of each succeeding year while such bonds remain outstanding, the state finance committee shall determine, based on current balances and estimated receipts and expenditures from the capitol campus reserve account, that portion of principal and interest on such RCW 43.99H.020(15) bonds which will, by virtue of payments from the capitol campus reserve account, be reimbursed from sources other than "general state revenues" as that term is defined in Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution.

(3) For bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(17), on each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due, the director of the department of labor and industries shall cause fifty percent of the amount computed in RCW 43.99H.040(3) to be transferred from the accident fund created in RCW 51.44.010 and fifty percent of the amount computed in RCW 43.99H.040(3) to be transferred from the medical aid fund created in RCW 51.44.020, to the general fund of the state treasury.

(4) For bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(18), on each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due, the board of regents of the University of Washington shall cause the amount computed in RCW 43.99H.040(4) to be paid out of University of Washington nonappropriated local funds to the state treasurer for deposit into the general fund of the state treasury.

(((5) For bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(4), on each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due, the state treasurer shall transfer from property taxes in the state general fund levied for the support of the common schools under RCW 84.52.065 to the general fund of the state treasury for unrestricted use the amount computed in RCW 43.99H.040(6).))

Sec. 1218. RCW 43.99I.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 612 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((On each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due on bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99I.020(4), the state treasurer shall transfer from property taxes in the state general fund levied for this support of the common schools under RCW 84.52.065 to the general fund of the state treasury for unrestricted use the amount computed in RCW 43.99I.030 for the bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99I.020(4).

(2))) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due on bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99I.020(((5))) (4), the state treasurer ((shall)) must transfer from higher education operating fees deposited in the general fund to the general fund of the state treasury for unrestricted use, or if chapter 231, Laws of 1992 (Senate Bill No. 6285) becomes law and changes the disposition of higher education operating fees from the general fund to another account, the state treasurer shall transfer the proportional share from the University of Washington operating fees account, the Washington State University operating fees account, and the Central Washington University operating fees account the amount computed in RCW 43.99I.030 for the bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99I.020(((6))) (5).

(((3))) (2) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due on bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99I.020(((6))) (5), the state treasurer ((shall)) must transfer from the data processing revolving fund created in RCW 43.19.791 to the general fund of the state treasury the amount computed in RCW 43.99I.030 for the bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99I.020(((6))) (5).

(((4))) (3) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due on bonds issued for the purpose of RCW 43.99I.020(((7))) (6), the Washington state dairy products commission ((shall)) must cause the amount computed in RCW 43.99I.030 for the bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99I.020(((7))) (6) to be paid out of the commission's general operating fund to the state treasurer for deposit into the general fund of the state treasury.

(((5))) (4) The higher education operating fee accounts for the University of Washington, Washington State University, and Central Washington University established by chapter 231, Laws of 1992 and repealed by chapter 18, Laws of 1993 1st sp. sess. are reestablished in the state treasury for purposes of fulfilling debt service reimbursement transfers to the general fund required by bond resolutions and covenants for bonds issued for purposes of RCW 43.99I.020(((5))) (4).

(((6))) (5) For bonds issued for purposes of RCW 43.99I.020(((5))) (4), on each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due, the board of regents or board of trustees of the University of Washington, Washington State University, or Central Washington University ((shall)) must cause the amount as determined by the state treasurer to be paid out of the local operating fee account for deposit by the universities into the state treasury higher education operating fee accounts. The state treasurer ((shall)) must transfer the proportional share from the University of Washington operating fees account, the Washington State University operating fees account, and the Central Washington University operating fees account the amount computed in RCW 43.99I.030 for the bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99I.020(((6))) (5) to reimburse the general fund.

PART XIII

BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX REFORM

Sec. 1301. RCW 82.04.230 and 2006 c 300 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an extractor, except persons taxable as an extractor under any other provision in this chapter; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of the products, including by-products, extracted for sale or for commercial or industrial use, multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.

(2) The measure of the tax is the value of the products, including by-products, so extracted, regardless of the place of sale or the fact that deliveries may be made to points outside the state.

Sec. 1302. RCW 82.04.240 and 2004 c 24 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a manufacturer, except persons taxable as manufacturers under other provisions of this chapter; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of the products, including by-products, manufactured, multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.

(2) The measure of the tax is the value of the products, including by-products, so manufactured regardless of the place of sale or the fact that deliveries may be made to points outside the state.

Sec. 1303. RCW 82.04.240 and 2010 c 114 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a manufacturer, except persons taxable as manufacturers under other provisions of this chapter; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products, including by-products, manufactured, multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.

(2)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing semiconductor materials, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured, or, in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. For the purposes of this subsection "semiconductor materials" means silicon crystals, silicon ingots, raw polished semiconductor wafers, compound semiconductors, integrated circuits, and microchips.

(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (2) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(c) This subsection (2) expires twelve years after the effective date of this act.

(3) The measure of the tax is the value of the products, including by-products, so manufactured regardless of the place of sale or the fact that deliveries may be made to points outside the state.

Sec. 1304. RCW 82.04.250 and 2014 c 97 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of making sales at retail, except persons taxable as retailers under other provisions of this chapter, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.471)) 0.2904 percent.

(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or 82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(11) or subsection (3) of this section, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.

(3)(a) Until July 1, 2040, upon every person classified by the federal aviation administration as a federal aviation regulation part 145 certificated repair station and that is engaging within this state in the business of making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or 82.08.0263, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.

(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (3) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 1305. RCW 82.04.257 and 2010 c 111 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of making sales at retail or wholesale of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services described in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(b), as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.471)) 0.2904 percent in the case of retail sales and by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent in the case of wholesale sales.

(2) Persons providing subscription television services or subscription radio services are subject to tax under RCW 82.04.290(2) on the gross income of the business received from providing such services.

(3) For purposes of this section, a person is considered to be engaging within this state in the business of making sales of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services described in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(b), if the person makes sales of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services described in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(b) and the sales are sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 for sales tax purposes or would have been sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 if the sale had been taxable under chapter 82.08 RCW.

(4) A person subject to tax under this section is subject to the mandatory electronic filing and payment requirements in RCW 82.32.080.

Sec. 1306. RCW 82.04.260 and 2014 c 140 s 6 and 2014 c 140 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing:

(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;

(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;

(c)(i) Beginning July 1, 2015, dairy products; or selling dairy products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products" means:

(A) Products, not including any marijuana-infused product, that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and

(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by weight or volume.

(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy product;

(d)(i) Beginning July 1, 2015, fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "fruits" and "vegetables" do not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products;

(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and

(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association engaging within this state in research and development, as to such corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.

(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an international steamship agent, international customs house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.

(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.

If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.

(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.

(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and ((1.5)) 1.0 percent thereafter.

(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:

(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and

(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.

(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.

(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(e)(i) Except as provided in (e)(ii) of this subsection (11), this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.

(ii) With respect to the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes, this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850 has been sited outside the state of Washington. This subsection (11)(e)(ii) only applies to the manufacturing or sale of commercial airplanes that are the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850.

(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.

(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i) Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products, manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.

(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.

(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent. For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after severance.

(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:

(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.

(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue; kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard, liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of printed materials.

(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.

(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035.

(v) "Timber products" means:

(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;

(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered paper or paper products; and

(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of biocomposite surface products.

(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood windows; and biocomposite surface products.

(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12) must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.

(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.

(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.

(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (14) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 1307. RCW 82.04.270 and 2004 c 24 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of making sales at wholesale, except persons taxable as wholesalers under other provisions of this chapter; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of such business multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.

Sec. 1308. RCW 82.04.280 and 2010 c 106 s 205 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of: (a) Printing materials other than newspapers, and of publishing periodicals or magazines; (b) building, repairing or improving any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used, primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind and including any readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the facilities of any public, private or cooperatively owned utility or railroad in the course of such building, repairing or improving, the cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the responsibility of the public authority whose street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired or improved; (c) extracting for hire or processing for hire, except persons taxable as extractors for hire or processors for hire under another section of this chapter; (d) operating a cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse, but not including the rental of cold storage lockers; (e) representing and performing services for fire or casualty insurance companies as an independent resident managing general agent licensed under the provisions of chapter 48.17 RCW; (f) radio and television broadcasting, excluding network, national and regional advertising computed as a standard deduction based on the national average thereof as annually reported by the federal communications commission, or in lieu thereof by itemization by the individual broadcasting station, and excluding that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state audience computed as a ratio to the station's total audience as measured by the 100 micro-volt signal strength and delivery by wire, if any; (g) engaging in activities which bring a person within the definition of consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.

(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the product for orderly marketing.

(b) "Storage warehouse" means a building or structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses, fruit warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage" facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual storage areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.

(c) "Periodical or magazine" means a printed publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated intervals at least once every three months, including any supplement or special edition of the publication.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1309. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2010 c 106 s 206;

(2) 2009 c 461 s 3;

(3) 2006 c 300 s 7; and

(4) 2003 c 149 s 4.

Sec. 1310. RCW 82.04.285 and 2014 c 97 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of operating contests of chance; as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to the business of operating contests of chance is equal to the gross income of the business derived from contests of chance multiplied by the rate of ((1.5)) one percent.

(2) An additional tax is imposed on those persons subject to tax in subsection (1) of this section. The amount of the additional tax with respect to the business of operating contests of chance is equal to the gross income of the business derived from contests of chance multiplied by the rate of 0.1 percent through June 30, 2006, and 0.13 percent thereafter. The money collected under this subsection (2) ((shall)) must be deposited in the problem gambling account created in RCW 43.20A.892. This subsection does not apply to businesses operating contests of chance when the gross income from the operation of contests of chance is less than fifty thousand dollars per year.

(3)(a) For the purpose of this section, "contests of chance" means any contests, games, gaming schemes, or gaming devices, other than the state lottery as defined in RCW 67.70.010, in which the outcome depends in a material degree upon an element of chance, notwithstanding that skill of the contestants may also be a factor in the outcome. The term includes social card games, bingo, raffle, and punchboard games, and pull-tabs as defined in chapter 9.46 RCW.

(b) The term does not include: (i) Race meet for the conduct of which a license must be secured from the Washington horse racing commission, (ii) "amusement game" as defined in RCW 9.46.0201, or (iii) any activity that is not subject to regulation by the gambling commission.

(4) "Gross income of the business" does not include the monetary value or actual cost of any prizes that are awarded, amounts paid to players for winning wagers, accrual of prizes for progressive jackpot contests, or repayment of amounts used to seed guaranteed progressive jackpot prizes.

Sec. 1311. RCW 82.04.290 and 2014 c 97 s 404 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of providing international investment management services, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.

(2)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business activity other than or in addition to an activity taxed explicitly under another section in this chapter or subsection (1) or (3) of this section; as to such persons the amount of tax on account of such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of ((1.5)) one percent.

(b) This subsection (2) includes, among others, and without limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to materials used in the performance of such business passes to another by accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged in the business of rendering any type of service which does not constitute a "sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials furnished to an agent by his or her principal or supplier to be used for informational, educational, and promotional purposes is not considered a part of the agent's remuneration or commission and is not subject to taxation under this section.

(3)(a) Until July 1, 2040, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of performing aerospace product development for others, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by a rate of ((0.9)) 0.6 percent.

(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (3) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(c) "Aerospace product development" has the meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.4461.

Sec. 1312. RCW 82.04.2905 and 1998 c 312 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of providing child care for periods of less than twenty-four hours; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.

Sec. 1313. RCW 82.04.2906 and 2003 c 343 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of providing intensive inpatient or recovery house residential treatment services for chemical dependency, certified by the department of social and health services, for which payment from the United States or any instrumentality thereof or from the state of Washington or any municipal corporation or political subdivision thereof is received as compensation for or to support those services; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income from such services multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.

(2) If the persons described in subsection (1) of this section receive income from sources other than those described in subsection (1) of this section or provide services other than those named in subsection (1) of this section, that income and those services are subject to tax as otherwise provided in this chapter.

Sec. 1314. RCW 82.04.2907 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of receiving income from royalties, the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross income from royalties multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "gross income from royalties" means compensation for the use of intangible property, including charges in the nature of royalties, regardless of where the intangible property will be used. For purposes of this subsection, "intangible property" includes copyrights, patents, licenses, franchises, trademarks, trade names, and similar items. "Gross income from royalties" does not include compensation for any natural resource, the licensing of prewritten computer software to the end user, or the licensing of digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services to the end user as defined in RCW 82.04.190(11).

Sec. 1315. RCW 82.04.298 and 2011 c 2 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The amount of tax with respect to a qualified grocery distribution cooperative's sales of groceries or related goods for resale, excluding items subject to tax under RCW 82.04.260(4), to customer-owners of the grocery distribution cooperative is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the grocery distribution cooperative multiplied by the rate of one ((and one-half)) percent.

(2) A qualified grocery distribution cooperative is allowed a deduction from the gross proceeds of sales of groceries or related goods for resale, excluding items subject to tax under RCW 82.04.260(4), to customer-owners of the grocery distribution cooperative that is equal to the portion of the gross proceeds of sales for resale that represents the actual cost of the merchandise sold by the grocery distribution cooperative to customer-owners.

(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Grocery distribution cooperative" means an entity that sells groceries and related items to customer-owners of the grocery distribution cooperative and has customer-owners, in the aggregate, who own a majority of the outstanding ownership interests of the grocery distribution cooperative or of the entity controlling the grocery distribution cooperative. "Grocery distribution cooperative" includes an entity that controls a grocery distribution cooperative.

(b) "Qualified grocery distribution cooperative" means:

(i) A grocery distribution cooperative that has been determined by a court of record of the state of Washington to be not engaged in wholesaling or making sales at wholesale, within the meaning of RCW 82.04.270 or any similar provision of a municipal ordinance that imposes a tax on gross receipts, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income, with respect to purchases made by customer-owners, and subsequently changes its form of doing business to make sales at wholesale of groceries or related items to its customer-owners; or

(ii) A grocery distribution cooperative that has acquired substantially all of the assets of a grocery distribution cooperative described in (b)(i) of this subsection.

(c) "Customer-owner" means a person who has an ownership interest in a grocery distribution cooperative and purchases groceries and related items at wholesale from that grocery distribution cooperative.

(d) "Controlling" means holding fifty percent or more of the voting interests of an entity and having at least equal power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of the entity, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, or otherwise.

Sec. 1316. RCW 82.04.4461 and 2013 3rd sp.s. c 2 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)(i) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is allowed for each person for qualified aerospace product development. For a person who is a manufacturer or processor for hire of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, credit may be earned for expenditures occurring after December 1, 2003. For all other persons, credit may be earned only for expenditures occurring after June 30, 2008.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection, "commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.

(b) Before July 1, 2005, any credits earned under this section must be accrued and carried forward and may not be used until July 1, 2005. These carryover credits may be used at any time thereafter, and may be carried over until used. Refunds may not be granted in the place of a credit.

(2) The credit is equal to the amount of qualified aerospace product development expenditures of a person, multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.

(3) Except as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section the credit must be claimed against taxes due for the same calendar year in which the qualified aerospace product development expenditures are incurred. Credit earned on or after July 1, 2005, may not be carried over. The credit for each calendar year may not exceed the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar year. Refunds may not be granted in the place of a credit.

(4) Any person claiming the credit must file a form prescribed by the department that must include the amount of the credit claimed, an estimate of the anticipated aerospace product development expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit is claimed, an estimate of the taxable amount during the calendar year for which the credit is claimed, and such additional information as the department may prescribe.

(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Aerospace product" has the meaning given in RCW 82.08.975.

(b) "Aerospace product development" means research, design, and engineering activities performed in relation to the development of an aerospace product or of a product line, model, or model derivative of an aerospace product, including prototype development, testing, and certification. The term includes the discovery of technological information, the translating of technological information into new or improved products, processes, techniques, formulas, or inventions, and the adaptation of existing products and models into new products or new models, or derivatives of products or models. The term does not include manufacturing activities or other production-oriented activities, however the term does include tool design and engineering design for the manufacturing process. The term does not include surveys and studies, social science and humanities research, market research or testing, quality control, sale promotion and service, computer software developed for internal use, and research in areas such as improved style, taste, and seasonal design.

(c) "Qualified aerospace product development" means aerospace product development performed within this state.

(d) "Qualified aerospace product development expenditures" means operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a partner in a partnership as determined by the department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly incurred in qualified aerospace product development by a person claiming the credit provided in this section. The term does not include amounts paid to a person or to the state and any of its departments and institutions, other than a public educational or research institution to conduct qualified aerospace product development. The term does not include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land, structures, or depreciable property.

(e) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's tax returns during the year in which the credit is claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under RCW 82.04.440.

(6) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a person claiming the credit under this section must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(7) Credit may not be claimed for expenditures for which a credit is claimed under RCW 82.04.4452.

(8) ((This section expires July 1, 2040.)) (a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection (8), this subsection (8) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.

(b) With respect to aerospace product development, subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850 has been sited outside the state of Washington. This subsection (8)(b) only applies to manufacturers of commercial airplanes that are the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850.

Sec. 1317. RCW 82.32.790 and 2010 c 114 s 201 and 2010 c 106 s 401 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) ((Section 206, chapter 106, Laws of 2010,)) Sections 104, 110, 117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws of 2010((, section 3, chapter 461, Laws of 2009, section 7, chapter 300, Laws of 2006, and section 4, chapter 149, Laws of 2003)) and section 1303, chapter . . ., Laws of 2015 (section 1303 of this act) are contingent upon the siting and commercial operation of a significant semiconductor microchip fabrication facility in the state of Washington.

(b) For the purposes of this section:

(i) "Commercial operation" means the same as "commencement of commercial production" as used in RCW 82.08.965.

(ii) "Semiconductor microchip fabrication" means "manufacturing semiconductor microchips" as defined in RCW 82.04.426.

(iii) "Significant" means the combined investment of new buildings and new machinery and equipment in the buildings, at the commencement of commercial production, will be at least one billion dollars.

(2) Chapter 149, Laws of 2003 takes effect the first day of the month in which a contract for the construction of a significant semiconductor fabrication facility is signed, as determined by the director of the department of revenue.

(3)(a) The department of revenue must provide notice of the effective date of sections 104, 110, 117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws of 2010(([,] section 3, chapter 461, Laws of 2009, section 7, chapter 300, Laws of 2006, and section 4, chapter 149, Laws of 2003)) and section 1303, chapter . . ., Laws of 2015 (section 1303 of this act) to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed appropriate by the department.

(b) If, after making a determination that a contract has been signed and chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is effective, the department discovers that commencement of commercial production did not take place within three years of the date the contract was signed, the department must make a determination that chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is no longer effective, and all taxes that would have been otherwise due are deemed deferred taxes and are immediately assessed and payable from any person reporting tax under RCW 82.04.240(2) or claiming an exemption or credit under section 2 or 5 through 10, chapter 149, Laws of 2003. The department is not authorized to make a second determination regarding the effective date of chapter 149, Laws of 2003.

PART XIV

USING NET REVENUE TO REDUCE SCHOOL DISTRICT DEPENDENCE ON EXCESS LEVIES FOR MAINTENANCE AND OPERATION SUPPORT OF THE BASIC EDUCATION PROGRAM

Sec. 1401. RCW 84.52.0531 and 2010 c 237 s 2 and 2010 c 99 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of RCW 84.52.053 ((shall be)) is determined as follows:

(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and rules in effect in November 1996.

(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or minus (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection minus (e) of this subsection:

(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsection (3) of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as defined in subsection (4) of this section;

(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year commencing the year of the levy;

(c) Except for nonhigh districts under (d) of this subsection, for districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this section multiplied by:

(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:

(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined under subsection (4) of this section; increased by:

(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school year divided by fifty-five percent;

(d) The levy bases of nonhigh districts participating in an innovation academy cooperative established under RCW 28A.340.080 shall be adjusted by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to reflect each district's proportional share of student enrollment in the cooperative;

(e) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.

(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in (a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the prior school year, including allocations for compensation increases, plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per full time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A district's levy base shall not include local school district property tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.

(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;

(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following programs:

(i) Pupil transportation;

(ii) Special education;

(iii) Education of highly capable students;

(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and bilingual education;

(v) Food services; and

(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and

(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.

(4)(a) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-four percent in 2010 and twenty-eight percent in 2011 through 2017 and twenty-four percent every year thereafter;

(b) For qualifying districts, in addition to the percentage in (a) of this subsection the grandfathered percentage determined as follows:

(i) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum levy percentage and twenty percent; ((and))

(ii) For 2011 through 2017, the percentage calculated as follows:

(A) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this section;

(B) Reduce the result of (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection by any levy reduction funds as defined in subsection (5) of this section that are to be allocated to the district for the current school year;

(C) Divide the result of (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection by the district's levy base; and

(D) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in (b)(ii)(C) of this subsection;

(iii) For 2018 and thereafter, the percentage shall be calculated as follows:

(A) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this section;

(B) Reduce the result of (b)(iii)(A) of this subsection by any levy reduction funds as defined in subsection (5) of this section that are to be allocated to the district for the current school year;

(C) Divide the result of (b)(iii)(B) of this subsection by the district's levy base; and

(D) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in (b)(iii)(C) of this subsection.

(5) "Levy reduction funds" ((shall)) means increases in state funds from the prior school year for programs included under subsection (3) of this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment changes, compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b) that are or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or counties.

(6) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year" means the most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies are to be collected.

(7) For the purposes of this section, "current school year" means the year immediately following the prior school year.

(8) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.

(9) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

(10) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must reduce a school district levy authority by an amount no less than eighty percent of the additional annual basic education allocations to the district for expenditures that the office identifies as being supported by school excess levy revenues. It is the intent of the legislature that the net new revenue generated as a result of the enactment of chapter . . ., Laws of 2015 (this act) be used to reduce the dependence of school districts on excess levies for maintenance and operation support of the basic education program.

PART XV

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1501. SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1502. CODIFICATION. Sections 101 through 810 of this act constitute a new title in the Revised Code of Washington, to be codified as Title 82A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1503. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. (1) If the proposed amendment to Article VII of the state Constitution authorizing income taxes (SJR . . . or HJR . . . (Z-0511/15 or Z-0522/15)) is validly submitted and is approved and ratified by the voters at a general election held in November 2016, then this act takes effect January 1, 2018, except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs, sections 1201, 1203, and 1213 of this act take effect January 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1504. EXPIRATION DATE. Section 1213 of this act expires January 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1505. APPLICATION. Part XII of this act applies to taxes levied for collection in 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1506. CONFORMING AMENDMENTS. If any amendments in this act, or any sections enacted or affected by chapter . . ., Laws of 2015 (this act), are enacted in a 2015 legislative session that do not take cognizance of chapter . . ., Laws of 2015 (this act), the code reviser must prepare a bill for introduction in the 2016 or 2017 legislative session that incorporates any such amendments into the reorganization adopted by chapter . . ., Laws of 2015 (this act) and corrects any incorrect cross-references.

--- END ---