BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 81.53.--- and 2015 c . . . (ESHB 1449) s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To address the potential public safety hazards presented by private crossings in the state and by the transportation of hazardous materials in the state, including crude oil, the commission is authorized to and must adopt rules governing safety standards for private crossings along the railroad tracks over which crude oil is transported in the state. The commission is also authorized to conduct inspections of the private crossings subject to this section, to order the railroads to make improvements at the private crossings, and enforce the orders.

(2) The commission must adopt rules governing private crossings along railroad tracks over which crude oil is transported in the state, establishing:

(a) Minimum safety standards for the private crossings subject to this section, including, but not limited to, requirements for signage; and

(b) Criteria for prioritizing the inspection and improvements of the private crossings subject to this section.

(3) Nothing in this section modifies existing agreements between the railroad company and the landowner governing cost allocation for upgrades to private crossings or liability for injuries or damages occurring at the private crossing.

--- END ---