BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.03.3051 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 39 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013,)) (a) Any state elected official ((of the executive branch)) may voluntarily reduce his or her salary from that established pursuant to Article XXVIII, section 1 of the state Constitution ((by three percent)).

(b) Any state elected official may direct the amount of voluntary salary reduction under (a) of this subsection to be contributed to a charitable organization registered under chapter 19.09 RCW.

(2) The department of ((personnel)) enterprise services and office of financial management shall develop a form to be used by any state elected official ((of the executive branch)) to execute the salary reduction or contribution under subsection (1) of this section through the state's central personnel payroll system. The salary reduction or contribution shall be made on a pretax basis to the maximum extent allowed under the federal internal revenue code.

(3) A voluntary reduction in salary shall be effective and continue ((through June 29, 2013, unless)) until the state elected official ((of the executive branch)) directs in writing that ((the department of personnel discontinue)) the reduction or contribution be discontinued.

--- END ---