BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.95N.290 and 2013 c 305 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The authority is governed by a board of directors. The board of directors is comprised of eleven participating manufacturers, appointed by the director of the department.

(i) For program years 2009 through 2015, five board positions are reserved for representatives of the top ten brand owners by return share of covered electronic products, and six board positions are reserved for representatives of other brands, including at least one board position reserved for a manufacturer who is also a retailer selling their own private label. The return share of covered electronic products used to determine the top ten brand owners for purposes of electing the board must be determined by the department by January 1, 2007.

(ii) For program years 2016 and beyond, five board positions are reserved for representatives of the top ten brand owners by market share of covered electronic products, and ((six)) three board positions are reserved for representatives of other brands, including at least one board position reserved for a manufacturer who is also a retailer selling its own private label. The market share of covered electronic products used to determine the top ten brand owners for purposes of electing the board must be determined by the department by October 1, 2015. Two board positions are reserved for representatives of companies engaged in the collection and transporting of discarded electronic products, at least one of which must be an employee or owner of a minority-owned business enterprise. One board position is reserved for a representative of organizations advocating for increasing the recycling and reuse of discarded electronic products.

(b) The board must have representation from both television and computer manufacturers.

(2) The board shall select from its membership the chair of the board and such other officers as it deems appropriate.

(3) A majority of the board constitutes a quorum.

(4) The directors of the department of commerce and the department of ecology serve as ex officio members. The state agency directors serving in ex officio capacity may each designate an employee of their respective departments to act on their behalf in all respects with regard to any matter to come before the authority. Ex officio designations must be made in writing and communicated to the authority director.

(5) The board shall create its own bylaws in accordance with the laws of the state of Washington.

(6) Any member of the board may be removed for misfeasance, malfeasance, or willful neglect of duty after notice and a public hearing, unless the notice and hearing are expressly waived in writing by the affected member.

(7) The members of the board serve without compensation but are entitled to reimbursement, solely from the funds of the authority, for expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties under this chapter.

--- END ---