BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79A.80.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 15 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a discover pass is required for any motor vehicle to:

(a) Park at any recreation site or lands; or

(b) Operate on any recreation site or lands.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 79A.80.110, the cost of a discover pass is thirty dollars. Every four years the office of financial management must review the cost of the discover pass and, if necessary, recommend to the legislature an adjustment to the cost of the discover pass to account for inflation.

(3) A discover pass is valid for one year beginning from the date that the discover pass is marked for activation. The activation date may differ from the purchase date pursuant to any policies developed by the agencies.

(4) Sales of discover passes must be consistent with RCW 79A.80.100.

(5) The discover pass must contain space for two motor vehicle license plate numbers. A discover pass is valid only for: Those vehicle license plate numbers written on the pass; and use with one motor vehicle at any one time. However((,)):

(a) The agencies may offer for sale a family discover pass that is fully transferable among vehicles and does not require the placement of a license plate number on the pass to be valid. The agencies must collectively set a price for the sale of a family discover pass that is no more than fifty dollars((. A discover pass is valid only for use with one motor vehicle at any one time)); and

(b) A person may use a previously purchased discover pass with a rental car or shared car by: Including that vehicle's license plate number on the discover pass if space is available; or, if space is not available, displaying a written note in a prominent location near the discover pass indicating that the car is a rental car or shared car. The agencies may not impose an additional fee or permit requirement in order to display a previously purchased discover pass with a rental car or shared car. For purposes of this subsection, "rental car" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.465 and "shared car" means a motor vehicle that is part of a fleet available to members of a car sharing organization on a fee for use basis.

(6) One complimentary discover pass must be provided to a volunteer who performed twenty-four hours of service on agency-sanctioned volunteer projects in a year. The agency must provide vouchers to volunteers identifying the number of volunteer hours they have provided for each project. The vouchers may be brought to an agency to be redeemed for a discover pass.

Sec. 2. RCW 79A.80.110 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 15 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) By mutual agreement, the agencies may sell discounted discover passes at a rate below that established under RCW 79A.80.020 or discounted day-use permits at a rate below that established under RCW 79A.80.030 for purposes of bulk sales to retailers, agency license and permit product bundling, and partnership opportunities to expand accessibility and visibility of the discover pass and recreational opportunities on agency-managed lands.

(b) The agencies must pursue opportunities for bulk sales to and partnership opportunities with rental car and car sharing companies. In doing so, the agencies must seek to expand the accessibility and visibility of the discover pass, make recreation on agency-managed land more convenient for users of rental and shared cars, and create a net revenue gain from the discover pass consistent with subsection (2) of this section.

(2) In exercising this authority, the agencies must prioritize opportunities for discounted sales that result in a net revenue gain.

--- END ---