BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.30.--- and 2015 c 6 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The board of regents of Washington State University may offer and teach medicine as a major line, and is authorized to establish, operate, and maintain a school of medicine at the university, to be known as the Elson S. Floyd School of Medicine. The board of regents of Washington State University may offer and teach forestry as a major line.

--- END ---