BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c ... (ESHB 1106) to read as follows:

(1) The sum of $1,410,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016, from the state general fund to the state health care authority.

(2) The sum of $1,388,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the state general fund to the state health care authority.

(3) The sum of $10,104,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2017, from the general fund—federal to the state health care authority.

(4) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to increase the reimbursement rate for providing long-acting reversible contraceptives such as intrauterine devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---