BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.131.419 and 2012 c 241 s 216 are each amended to read as follows:

The qui tam provisions of the medicaid fraud false claims act as established under chapter 74.66 RCW shall be terminated on June 30, ((2016)) 2023, as provided in RCW 43.131.420.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.131.420 and 2012 c 241 s 217 are each amended to read as follows:

The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, ((2017)) 2024:

(1) ((RCW 74.66.010 and 2012 c 241 s 201;

(2) RCW 74.66.020 and 2012 c 241 s 202;

(3) RCW 74.66.030 and 2012 c 241 s 203;

(4) RCW 74.66.040 and 2012 c 241 s 204;

(5))) RCW 74.66.050 and 2012 c 241 s 205;

(((6))) (2) RCW 74.66.060 and 2012 c 241 s 206;

(((7))) (3) RCW 74.66.070 and 2012 c 241 s 207;

(((8))) (4) RCW 74.66.080 and 2012 c 241 s 208; and

(((9) RCW 74.66.090 and 2012 c 241 s 209;

(10) RCW 74.66.100 and 2012 c 241 s 210;

(11) RCW 74.66.110 and 2012 c 241 s 211;

(12) RCW 74.66.120 and 2012 c 241 s 212;

(13))) (5) RCW 74.66.130 and 2012 c 241 s 213((; and

(14) RCW 74.66.005 and 2012 c 241 s 214)).

--- END ---