BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department may not adopt any rule or policy establishing a statewide limit, cap, or standard, to control the amount of greenhouse gas emissions occurring during a period of time, unless the department is authorized to adopt such a rule or policy as clearly expressed in legislation enacted after the effective date of this section.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "greenhouse gas" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70.235.010.

--- END ---