BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 80.28.360 and 2015 c 220 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In establishing rates for each electrical company regulated under this title, the commission may allow an incentive rate of return on investment on capital expenditures for electric vehicle supply equipment that is deployed for the benefit of ratepayers, provided that the capital expenditures do not increase costs to ratepayers in excess of one-quarter of one percent. The commission must consider and may adopt other policies to improve access to and promote fair competition in the provision of electric vehicle supply equipment, including policies that allow electrical companies to establish a user fee or other similar charge for electric vehicle supply equipment that is deployed for the benefit of ratepayers.

(2) An incentive rate of return on investment under this section may be allowed only if the company chooses to pursue capital investment in electric vehicle supply equipment on a fully regulated basis similar to other capital investments behind a customer's meter. In the case of an incentive rate of return on investment allowed under this section, an increment of up to two percent must be added to the rate of return on common equity allowed on the company's other investments.

(3) The incentive rate of return on investment authorized in subsection (2) of this section applies only to projects which have been installed after July 1, 2015, and which are reasonably expected, at the time they are placed in the rate base, to result in real and tangible benefits for ratepayers by being installed and located where electric vehicles are most likely to be parked for intervals longer than two hours.

(4) The incentive rate of return on investment increment pursuant to this section may be earned only for a period up to the depreciable life of the electric vehicle supply equipment as defined in the depreciation schedules developed by the company and submitted to the commission for review. When the capital investment has fully depreciated, an electrical company may gift the electric vehicle supply equipment to the owner of the property on which it is located.

(5) By December 31, 2017, the commission must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with regard to the use of any incentives allowed under this section, the quantifiable impacts of the incentives on actual electric vehicle deployment, and any recommendations to the legislature about utility participation in the electric vehicle market.

--- END ---