BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the 2015 legislature mandated common schools to use the Since Time Immemorial curriculum, developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction and available free of charge. The legislature recognizes the need to extend the state's commitment to educate students about tribal sovereignty, history, culture, and treaty rights by requiring educator preparation programs to also use the Since Time Immemorial curriculum. The legislature intends the use of the curriculum to improve the understanding of students and educators about the past contributions of Indian nations to the state of Washington and the contemporary and ongoing tribal and state government relations.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.10.710 and 2006 c 263 s 823 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) There shall be a one quarter or semester course in either Washington state history and government, or Pacific Northwest history and government in the curriculum of all ((teachers' colleges and teachers' courses in all institutions of higher education)) teacher preparation programs.

(b) No person shall be graduated from any of said ((schools)) programs without completing said course of study, unless otherwise determined by the Washington professional educator standards board.

(2) Any course in Washington state or Pacific Northwest history and government used to fulfill ((this)) the requirement in subsection (1) of this section shall include information on the culture, history, and government of the American Indian peoples who were the first human inhabitants of the state and the region.

(3) Teacher preparation programs shall meet the requirements of this section by integrating the curriculum developed and made available free of charge by the office of the superintendent of public instruction into existing programs or courses and may modify that curriculum in order to incorporate elements that have a regionally specific focus.

--- END ---