BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The use of racially derogatory or discriminatory school or athletic team names, mascots, or nicknames in Washington public schools is antithetical to the Washington school mission of providing an equal education to all;

(2) Certain athletic team names, mascots, and nicknames that have been used and remain in use by other teams, including school teams, in other parts of the nation are discriminatory in singling out the Native American community for the derision to which mascots or nicknames are often subjected;

(3) Many individuals and organizations interested and experienced in human relations, including the United States commission on civil rights, have concluded that the use of Native American images and names in school sports is a barrier to equality and understanding, and that all residents of the United States would benefit from the discontinuance of their use; and

(4) No individual or school has a cognizable interest in retaining a racially derogatory or discriminatory school or athletic team name, mascot, or nickname.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning January 1, 2017, all public schools are prohibited from using the term Redskins for school or athletic team names, mascots, or nicknames.

(2) This section does not apply to a school located within, or with enrollment boundaries that include a portion of, "Indian country," as defined in Title 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1151, if the tribe having regulatory jurisdiction over the territory within that boundary has authorized the use of the school or athletic team name, mascot, or nickname through an appropriate enactment or resolution.

(3) Notwithstanding this section, a public school may continue to use uniforms or other materials bearing the term Redskins as a school or athletic team name, mascot, or nickname that were purchased before January 1, 2017, if all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The school selects a new school or athletic team name, mascot, or nickname;

(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, the school refrains from purchasing or acquiring, for the purpose of distribution or sale to pupils or school employees, any uniform that includes or bears the term Redskins;

(ii) Notwithstanding (b)(i) of this subsection, before January 1, 2019, a school using uniforms that bear the term Redskins may purchase or acquire a number of uniforms equal to up to twenty percent of the total number of uniforms used by a team or band at that school during the 2016-17 school year for the purposes of replacing damaged or lost uniforms;

(c) The school refrains from purchasing or acquiring, for the purpose of distribution or sale to pupils or school employees, any yearbook, newspaper, program, or other similar material that includes or bears the prohibited school or athletic team name, mascot, or nickname in its logo or cover title; or

(d) The school refrains from purchasing or constructing a marquee, sign, or other new or replacement fixture that includes or bears the prohibited school or athletic team name, mascot, or nickname.

--- END ---