BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.43.735 and 2009 c 549 s 5130 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It shall be the duty of the sheriff or director of public safety of every county, and the chief of police of every city or town, and of every chief officer of other law enforcement agencies duly operating within this state, to cause the photographing and fingerprinting of all adults and juveniles lawfully arrested for the commission of any criminal offense constituting a felony or gross misdemeanor. (a) When such juveniles are brought directly to a juvenile detention facility, the juvenile court administrator is also authorized, but not required, to cause the photographing, fingerprinting, and record transmittal to the appropriate law enforcement agency; and (b) a further exception may be made when the arrest is for a violation punishable as a gross misdemeanor and the arrested person is not taken into custody, except that photographing and fingerprinting shall always be required for all adults and juveniles arrested for the commission of any offense defined as a prior offense in RCW 46.61.5055.

(2) It shall be the right, but not the duty, of the sheriff or director of public safety of every county, and the chief of police of every city or town, and every chief officer of other law enforcement agencies operating within this state to photograph and record the fingerprints of all adults lawfully arrested.

(3) Such sheriffs, directors of public safety, chiefs of police, and other chief law enforcement officers, may record, in addition to photographs and fingerprints, the palmprints, soleprints, toeprints, or any other identification data of all persons whose photograph and fingerprints are required or allowed to be taken under this section when in the discretion of such law enforcement officers it is necessary for proper identification of the arrested person or the investigation of the crime with which he or she is charged.

--- END ---