BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. When the department of fish and wildlife approves the updated North Cascade elk herd plan through the process underway on January 1, 2016, the department of fish and wildlife must provide the updated plan to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives for legislative review. The updated plan may not take effect and the department of fish and wildlife may not implement the updated plan until the legislature has had a full regular legislative session for review of the updated plan.

--- END ---