BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A supplemental capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2017, out of the several funds specified in this act.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

Spokane Court Facility Upgrade (92000001)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$103,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$103,000

Sec. 1002. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1036 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Behavioral Health Bed - Acute & Residential (92000344)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department of commerce, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, to issue grants to hospitals or other entities to establish new community hospital inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, or crisis stabilization facilities with sixteen or fewer beds for the purpose of providing short-term detention services through the publicly funded mental health system. Funds may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of the community hospital inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, or crisis stabilization facilities. These funds may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services. The department shall establish criteria for the issuance of grants and priority must be given to those proposals to establish new community hospital inpatient psychiatric beds or free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities. The criteria must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional support networks, as defined in RCW 71.24.025;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical access to short-term detention services under chapter 71.05 RCW in their region;

(c) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(d) A commitment by the applicant to maintain the beds or facility for at least a ten-year period;

(e) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(f) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;

(g) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW; and

(h) A lack of local resources, including nonmedicaid operating reserves, and regional fund balances that are not contractually encumbered.

(2) To accommodate the emergent need for inpatient psychiatric services, the department of health and the department of commerce, in collaboration with the department of social and health services shall establish a concurrent and expedited process for the purpose of grant applicants meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, or crisis stabilization facilities.

(3) The following list is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section:

Cascade mental health. . . .$3,000,000

((Woodmont)) Kent recovery center. . . .$5,000,000

Parkside conversion to behavioral health beds. . . .(($3,000,000))

$4,000,000

((Navos behavioral health center for children, youth &

families. . . .$2,000,000))

Central Washington comprehensive mental health. . . .$2,000,000

Swedish Ballard psychiatric unit. . . .$3,000,000

Substance abuse & mental health facilities. . . .$2,000,000

Fairfax behavioral health - Providence health &

services facility. . . .$1,000

Daybreak Youth Services. . . .$1,500,000

(4) Multicare-Franciscan joint venture. . . .$5,000,000

(5) State Mental Hospital Diversion Projects. . . .$7,552,000

(6) Competitive grants. . . .$10,499,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($32,000,000))

﻿ $43,552,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($32,000,000))

﻿ $43,552,000

Sec. 1003. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1040 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects 2016 (92000369)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is released for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) $2,209,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Fairchild air force base protection and community empowerment project, including the purchase of twenty acres of land for development of affordable housing and the county's purchase of mobile home parks in order to reduce the use of the accident potential zone for residential purposes. There shall be no limitations on the sequence on the purchase of mobile home parks. If the county subsequently rezones, develops, and leases the mobile home park property for commercial or industrial uses contrary to the allowed uses in the accident potential zone, the county must repay to the state the amount spent on the purchase of mobile home parks in its entirety within ten years.

(8) $850,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the White River restoration project. Design solutions for flooding reductions in the lower White River must include a floodplain habitat design that both reduces flood risks and restores salmon habitat by reconnecting the river with its floodplain and a sustainable riparian corridor. Project designs and plans must also identify lands for acquisition needed for floodplain reconnection where pending or existing development eliminates the potential for riparian and aquatic habitat restoration. The city shall work cooperatively with the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe and the Puyallup Tribe of Indians, and develop a plan collaboratively to achieve both flood reduction and habitat restoration.

(9) Up to $150,000 of the appropriation in this section for the veterans helping veterans: Emergency transition shelter project may be spent on preconstruction or pre-acquisition activities, including, but not limited to, building inspections, design of necessary renovations, cost estimation, and other activities necessary to identify and select a facility appropriate for the program. The remainder of the appropriation must be used for eventual acquisition and renovations of a facility.

(10) $2,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the mercy housing and health care center at Sand Point. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the center may not house any community health care training organization that has been investigated by and has paid settlement fees to the attorney general's office for alleged medicaid fraud.

(11) The Lake Chelan land use plan must be developed without adverse impacts on agricultural operations.

(12) Funds provided for the city of Stanwood police station/city hall relocation are for acquisition.

(13) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Algona senior center

$500,000

All-accessible destination playground

$750,000

Appleway trail

$1,000,000

Basin 3 sewer rehabilitation

$1,500,000

Bellevue downtown park inspiration playground and sensory garden

$1,000,000

Bender fields parking lot and restrooms

$1,000,000

Blackhills community soccer complex safety projects

$750,000

Bremerton children's dental clinic

$396,000

Brewster reservoir replacement

$1,250,000

Brookville gardens

$1,200,000

Camas-Washougal Babe Ruth youth baseball improve Louis Bloch park

$10,000

Cancer immunotherapy facility-Seattle children's research inst.

$7,000,000

Caribou trail apartments

$100,000

Carnegie library imprv for the rapid recidivism reduction program

$1,000,000

Cavelero park - regional park facility/skateboard park

$500,000

CDM caregiving services: Clark county aging resource center

$1,200,000

Centerville school heating upgrades

$46,000

Chambers Creek regional park pier extension and moorage

$1,750,000

City of LaCenter parks & rec community center

$1,500,000

City of Lynden pipeline

$2,000,000

City of Lynden-Riverview road construction

$850,000

City of Lynden-safe rtes to school and Kaemingk trail gap elim.

$300,000

City of Mt. Vernon downtown flood protect project & riverfront trail

$1,500,000

City of Olympia - Percival Landing renovation

$950,000

City of Pateros water system

$1,838,000

City of Stanwood police station/city hall relocation

$300,000

Classroom door barricade - nightlock

$45,000

Confluence area parks upgrade and restoration

$1,000,000

Corbin senior center elevator

$300,000

Covington community park

$5,000,000

Cross Kirkland corridor trail connection 52nd St.

$1,069,000

Dawson place child advocacy center building completion project

$161,000

Dekalb street pier

$500,000

DNR/City of Castle Rock exchange

$80,000

Dr. Sun Yat Sen memorial statue

$10,000

Drug abuse and prevention center - Castle Rock

$96,000

DuPont historical museum renovation

$46,000

East Tacoma community center

$1,000,000

Edmonds center for the arts: Gym climate control & roof repairs

$250,000

Edmonds senior & community center

$1,250,000

Emergency generator for kidney resource center

$226,000

Enumclaw expo center

$350,000

Fairchild air force base protection & comm empowerment project

$2,209,000

Federal Way PAC center

$2,000,000

Filipino community of Seattle village (innovative learning center)

$1,200,000

Franklin Pierce early learning center

$2,000,000

Gateway center project

$1,000,000

Gilda club repairs

$800,000

Granite Falls boys & girls club

$1,000,000

Gratzer park ball fields

$200,000

Grays Harbor navigation improvement project

$2,500,000

Green river gorge open space buffer, Kummer connection

$750,000

Guy Cole center revitalization

$450,000

Historic renovation Maryhill museum

$1,000,000

Hopelink at Ronald commons

$750,000

Irvine slough storm water separation

$500,000

Kahlotus highway sewer force main

$2,625,000

Kennewick boys and girls club

$500,000

Kent east hill YMCA

$500,000

Key Pen civics center

$50,000

KiBe high school parking

$125,000

Kitsap humane society - shelter renovation

$90,000

Lacey boys & girls club

$29,000

Lake Chelan land use plan

$75,000

LeMay car museum ADA access improvements

$500,000

Lyman city park renovation

$167,000

Lyon creek flood reduction project

$400,000

Main street revitalization project

$1,300,000

Marine terminal rail investments

$1,000,000

Martin Luther King Jr. family outreach center expansion project

$85,000

Mason county Belfair wastewater system rate relief

$1,500,000

McAllister museum

$660,000

Mercer arena energy savings & sustainability funding

$450,000

Mercy housing and health center at Sand Point

$2,500,000

Meridian center for health

$2,500,000

Minor Road water reservoir replacement

$1,500,000

Mountains to Sound Greenway Tiger Mountain access improvements

$300,000

Mt. Spokane guest services building & preservation/maintenance of existing facilities

$520,000

((Mukilteo)) Boys & girls club of Snohomish county (Brewster, Sultan, Granite Falls, Arlington, and Mukilteo)

$1,000,000

Mukilteo tank farm clean-up

$250,000

New Shoreline medical-dental clinic

$1,500,000

Nordic heritage museum

$2,000,000

North Kitsap fishline foodbank

$625,000

Northwest native canoe center project

$250,000

Oak Harbor clean water facility

$2,500,000

Okanogan emergency communications

$400,000

Onalaska community tennis and sports courts

$80,000

Opera house ADA elevator

$357,000

Orcas Island library expansion

$1,400,000

Pacific community center

$250,000

PCAF's building for the future

$350,000

Pe Ell second street

$197,000

Perry technical school

$1,000,000

Pike Place Market front project

$800,000

Police station security/hardening

$38,000

Port of Centralia - Centralia station

$500,000

Port of Sunnyside demolish the carnation building

(($450,000)) $550,000

PROVAIL TBI residential facility

$450,000

Quincy water reuse

$1,500,000

Redmond downtown park

$3,000,000

Redondo boardwalk repairs

$1,500,000

Renovate senior center

$400,000

Rochester boys & girls club

$38,000

Rockford wastewater treatment

$1,200,000

Roslyn renaissance-NW improve company bldg renovation project

$900,000

Sammamish rowing association boathouse

$500,000

SE 240th St. watermain system improvement project

$700,000

SE Seattle financial & economic opportunity center

$1,500,000

SeaTac international marketplace & transit-oriented community

$1,250,000

Seattle theatre group

$131,000

Snohomish veterans memorial rebuild

$10,000

Snoqualmie riverfront project

$1,520,000

South 228th street inter-urban trail connector

$500,000

Splash pad/foundation: Centralia outdoor pool restoration project

$200,000

Spokane women's club

$300,000

Springbrook park neighborhood connection project

$300,000

SR 532 flood berm and bike/ped path

$85,000

St. Vincent food bank & community services construction project

$400,000

Stan & Joan cross park

$750,000

Steilacoom Sentinel Way repairs

$450,000

Stilly Valley youth project Arlington B&G club

$2,242,000

Sunset neighborhood park

$1,750,000

Support, advocacy & resource center for victims of violence

$750,000

The gathering house job training café

$14,000

The Salvation Army Clark County: Corps community center

$1,200,000

Thurston county food bank

$500,000

Tulalip water pipeline, (final of 8 segments)

$2,000,000

Twin Bridges museum rehab Lyle Wa

$64,000

Twisp civic building

$500,000

Vancouver, Columbia waterfront project

$2,500,000

Vantage point senior apartments

$2,000,000

Veterans center

$500,000

Veterans helping veterans: Emergency transition shelter

$600,000

Waitsburg Main Street bridge replacement

$1,700,000

Washington green schools

$105,000

Washougal roof repair

$350,000

Water meter and system improvement program

$500,000

Water reservoir and transmission main

$500,000

Wayne golf course land preservation

$500,000

White River restoration project

$850,000

Willapa behavioral health safety improvement project

$75,000

WSU LID frontage - local and economic benefits

$500,000

Yakima children's museum center

$50,000

Yakima SunDome

$2,000,000

Yelm community center

$500,000

Yelm senior center

$80,000

Youth wellness campus gymnasium renovation

$1,000,000

Spokane Family Justice Center at the YWCA

$75,000

Total

(($130,169,000)) $130,334,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($130,169,000))

﻿ $130,334,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($130,169,000))

﻿ $130,334,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp. s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Base Realignment and Closure Commission Preparation (92000383)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp. s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Mother Joseph Academy Roof Replacement (92000384)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp. s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Mental Health Housing, First and Denny (92000385)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp. s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Tenino Historical Museum Roof (92000386)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$22,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$22,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp. s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Asian Pacific Cultural Center (92000387)

As the most trade dependent state in the nation, the legislature recognizes the significant statewide benefits to be gained from the proposed Asian Pacific cultural center. The multipurpose facility will serve as a needed cultural resource for Washington's Asian and Pacific Islander community; provide affordable housing and educational opportunities; strengthen relations with our Asia-Pacific trading partners; and deliver economic growth as a commercial and tourist destination. As the project continues to move forward, the legislature intends to support its development through a grant to be used for project design.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Disaster Emergency Response (92000377)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Mental Health Housing Health Homes (92000381)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding is provided for the construction or renovation of 4 health homes that will serve people with severe health and housing challenges, including those who are medically fragile and those who have been diagnosed with a chronic behavioral health disorder, that commit to participate in treatment through the duration of their stay. The homes must: (a) Be located in counties that have adopted the tax, authorized under RCW 82.14.460, for chemical dependency or mental health treatment services; (b) be located in counties that have adopted fully integrated managed care for medicaid; and (c) include: (i) The Everett first low barrier housing; (ii) the 22 north emergency housing in Bellingham; (iii) a project in southwest Washington; and (iv) a project in eastern Washington.

(2) Local housing authorities may serve as fiscal agents for the projects.

(3) $1,500,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the establishment of a health home in Pierce county. The amount in this subsection is contingent upon Pierce county adopting the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.460.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,500,000

Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,500,000

Sec. 1011. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1076 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Oversight of State Facilities (30000046)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of financial management, with assistance from the department of enterprise services and other state agencies as needed, shall conduct space studies and make recommendations to the legislature on the state's space standards including alternative workplace strategies. State agencies shall provide space use data in a format prescribed by the office of financial management to support this effort. The office of financial management shall report the results and recommendations to the legislative fiscal committees by July 1, 2016.

(2) The office of financial management, with assistance from the department of enterprise services and other state agencies as needed, shall update the lease space requirements to reflect high performance building standards and any other components that may improve the conditions of leased space.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,040,000))

﻿ $1,182,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$1,120,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($2,160,000))

﻿ $2,302,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,160,000))

﻿ $2,302,000

Sec. 1012. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1077 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Construction Contingency Pool (90000300)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for construction projects that confront emergent and unavoidable costs in excess of the construction contingency included in the project appropriation. For requests occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting contingency funds from the office of financial management. Eligible agencies that may apply to the pool include higher education institutions, the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, the department of enterprise services, ((the criminal justice training commission,)) the department of veterans affairs, the parks and recreation commission, and the department of fish and wildlife. Eligible construction projects are only projects that had cost reductions as kept on file with the office of financial management. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee as projects are approved for funding.

(2)(a) The legislature intends to use the 1063 Block building development project as a model of efficient space and energy use for both owned and leased state office buildings.

(b) To achieve this intent, the office of financial management must reconsider tenants for the building, including consideration of the utilities and transportation commission, all current tenants of the general administration building with operations compatible with a high density office building, and other possible tenants. The measure of achieving a higher space efficiency is measured by the average square feet per housed employee.

(c) The office of financial management must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the redesign and the increase space efficiency by October 15, 2015.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

Sec. 1013. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1079 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Emergency Repair Pool for K-12 Public Schools (90000302)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Emergency repair funding is provided solely to address unexpected and imminent health and safety hazards at K-12 public schools, including skill centers, that will impact the day-to-day operations of the school facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, an emergency declaration must be signed by the school district board of directors and the superintendent of public instruction, and submitted to the office of financial management for consideration. The emergency declaration must include a description of the imminent health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of local funding to be applied to the project. Grants of emergency repair moneys must be conditioned upon the written commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be awarded, if applicable. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee as emergency projects are approved for funding.

(2) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for minor works repairs at west sound skill center.

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($5,000,000))

﻿ $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

State Agency Laboratory Colocation Study (92000013)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office of financial management shall evaluate the feasibility of collocating state agency laboratories. Participating agencies include, but are not limited to, the department of labor and industries, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of agriculture, and the Washington state patrol.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$50,000

Accident Account—State. . . .$50,000

Medical Aid Account—State. . . .$50,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Cross Laminated Timber Pilot Project (92000015)

The appropriation is this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $950,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to help offset the higher project costs for one or more construction projects by state or local government agencies in which cross laminated timber (CLT) is used for major structural elements of the building. Eligible projects may include multifamily housing through the housing trust fund, student housing for public higher education campuses, prefabricated public school construction, and other state or local government agency projects that may demonstrate the structural utility of CLT. The legislature recognizes that early adoption of CLT may result in higher project costs, but accelerating the acceptance of CLT will produce economic and employment gains for the state and will increase the value of timber on Washington state trust lands. State agencies that receive allocations from this appropriation must submit a project completion report that specifies how CLT was used and the costs differences in materials and labor.

(2) $75,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the Washington State University college of engineering and architecture, to prepare a review and summary of available engineering test results and other evidence demonstrating the performance of CLT in building construction. The review must emphasize results and evidence that are relevant to the consideration of building code amendments that allow for greater use of CLT in construction. Administrative overhead charges by Washington State University may not exceed five percent of the amount provided in this subsection. The report must be submitted to the state building code council and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2016.

(3) $50,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the department of commerce or an associate development organization in an area of the state with appropriate forest resources to assist prospective CLT manufacturers in evaluating the potential CLT market and determine necessary investments to manufacture CLT.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,075,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,075,000

Sec. 1016. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1083 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Equipment Benchmarks for Capital Projects Study (92000010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office of financial management shall submit a higher education and skill center capital project equipment cost study to the governor and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees by December 1, 2015. The study must include benchmarks for standard ranges of fixed and nonfixed equipment expenditures in different types of facilities and an examination of alternatives for financing equipment costs where the equipment has a life expectancy that is less than the length of bond financing. The alternative analysis must include a life-cycle cost analysis of the competing alternatives to determine the most cost-effective options to the state bond and general fund budget.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($250,000))

﻿ $125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($250,000))

﻿ $125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Cost-Effective K-3 Classrooms Assessment (30000053)

The office of financial management shall analyze cost-effective options for the procurement of high quality, sustainably built, energy efficient, and healthy classroom space to address the need for K-3 classrooms statewide. The analysis may include the potential for use of advanced sustainable materials and innovative design, production and procurement processes. The office of financial management may contract with one or more consultant to assist with the analysis.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp. s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Water Infrastructure Investment Analysis (92000016)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature finds that population growth, climate change, and intensified development are creating increasing stresses on critical water infrastructure, fisheries, and watershed health. To inform policy decisions about the scale and timing of new investments in flood risk reduction, water quality, and water supply both in-stream and out-of-stream, it is the intent of the legislature to direct an analysis of the economic implications related to water infrastructure and fisheries habitat restoration needs across the state.

(2) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of financial management to contract for an analysis of the economic implications relating to water infrastructure and fisheries habitat restoration needs.

(a) The analysis must incorporate existing data and information relating to:

(i) Integrated water supply and management planning that addresses water storage for municipal and agricultural uses, in-stream or out-of-stream water supply needs, or both, as well as fisheries habitat and passage improvements;

(ii) Multiple benefit approaches that reduce the risk from floods and protect and restore naturally functioning areas; and

(iii) Low-impact development retrofits to reduce toxics and other pollutants in storm water.

(b) The analysis must consider, but not be limited to, fishing and recreation benefits of improved floodplain and riparian habitat, in-stream flows, municipal and agricultural water storage benefits, and fish passage projects.

(c) The analysis must provide a review of other state reports that examine the economic implications to water infrastructure and fisheries habitat restoration needs.

(d) The analysis must address, but not be limited to:

(i) A 20 year forecast of known need for investment for the three categories identified in (a) of this subsection;

(ii) Estimated effects on the Washington economy without new infrastructure investment, including impacts on households, business, and commerce caused by flooding, drought, and degraded water quality from storm water runoff; and

(iii) Estimated economic benefits, including jobs, commerce, and development associated with each billion dollars invested in the categories in (a) of this subsection.

(3) The consultant shall invite representatives of interest groups to provide input in conducting the analysis. The interest groups must include, but are not be limited to, the Washington business roundtable, the Washington state labor council, and the Washington environmental council. The consultant must report its findings to the house of representatives capital budget committee and the senate ways and means committee by January 15, 2017.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

Sec. 1019. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1088 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation (30000722)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) No minor works funds may be allotted until the action part of the plan is provided. Up to $300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided for the department to develop an implementation plan for a capitol campus parking strategy. The action part of the plan must include: (((1))) (a) During the legislative sessions a reduction of agency reserve stalls from twenty-six percent to fifteen percent as recommended by the 2014 state of Washington parking and transportation study; (((2))) (b) cost-benefit of incorporating parking attendants or parking arms to accept payment for campus parking during the legislative sessions; (((3))) (c) installation of at least two electronic boards, or other methods of providing the available parking capacity in the east plaza garage. The department shall work in cooperation with the city of Olympia, and the city may provide a proposal to enforce parking on the capitol campus. The department shall report to all fiscal committees on its progress by November 1, 2015.

(2) $60,000 of the Thurston county capital facilities account—state appropriation is provided solely for minor works repair at the 120 Union Avenue building and is contingent upon the building remaining open subject to the following conditions: (a) The department shall: (i) Apply the current capital projects surcharge to the operating rents; (ii) increase the tenant rental rate by $1 per square foot per year above the current rate; (iii) add a clause to the tenant contracts that the lease shall be terminated should a major building system failure occur. A major building system includes failure of the roof, heating, and electrical systems; (iv) add a clause to the tenant contracts that the lease may be terminated if the occupancy of the building falls below 30 percent; and (v) actively promote rental of vacant space in the building; and (b) the department may close the building once the legislature has approved construction funding for a project at the site.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .(($850,000))

﻿ $1,910,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($5,608,000))

﻿ $4,608,000

State Vehicle Parking Account—State. . . .$900,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($7,358,000))

﻿ $7,418,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$19,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($26,358,000))

﻿ $26,418,000

Sec. 1020. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1095 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Lake Long-term Management Planning (30000740)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely to make tangible progress on reaching broad agreement on a long-term plan for the management of Capitol Lake/Deschutes Estuary/Lower Budd Inlet/Deschutes River watershed, building on the recommendations of the 2014 situation assessment for Capitol Lake management prepared by the Ruckleshaus center and prior related reports.

The department shall:

(a) Identify and summarize the findings of the best available science concerning water quality and habitat as they relate to conceptual options of retaining or removing the dam;

(b) Identify multiple hybrid options for future management of Capitol Lake, which options must include substantial improvement in fish and wildlife habitat and ecosystem functions, maintaining a historic reflecting pool at the north end of the lake/estuary, and adaptive management strategies;

(c) Identify general cost estimates for construction and maintenance of each conceptual option, in consultation with the office of financial management;

(d) Identify the range of public support for or concerns about each option;

(e) Identify conceptual options and degree of general support for shared funding by state, local, and federal governments and potentially other entities;

(f) Identify one or more conceptual options for long-term shared governance of a future management plan, including consideration of an option similar to state lake management districts, chapter 36.61 RCW or shellfish protection districts, chapter 90.72 RCW.

(g) Engage in other related activities which would contribute to reaching broad agreement on the long-term management plan.

The department shall conduct its information gathering and report preparation with a pro-active approach to public engagement, and may create such advisory entities as it determines would be helpful.

(2) The department may contract for facilitation, research, or other services to assist in the preparation of this report.

(3) The department shall make periodic reports to the state capitol committee, the office of financial management, and fiscal committees of the legislature, with a final report to be submitted no later than January 1, 2017. The reports must include visual representations of proposals to aid the public and decision-makers to understand and evaluate them.

Appropriation:

((Enterprise Services Account—State. . . .$250,000))

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

Sec. 1021. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1108 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

The reappropriation and appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature intends to support the transfer of the Olympia armory to the Thurston county boys and girls club. The military department must execute an agreement to transfer title of the property to the Thurston county boys and girls club if the club agrees to use the facility as a boys and girls club for a minimum of ten years. The transfer agreement must specify a mutually agreed transfer date following the completion of the Thurston county readiness center. The transfer agreement must require the club to cover any closing costs and must specify a purchase price of one dollar. The agreement must be reported to the house of representatives capital budget committee, senate ways and means committee, and the governor's office by January 1, 2016.

(2) The legislature intends to support the transfer of the Puyallup armory to the Central Pierce fire and rescue (Pierce county fire protection district No. 6). The military department must execute an agreement to transfer title of the property to the Central Pierce fire and rescue if the district agrees to use the facility as a fire and rescue station for a minimum of ten years. The transfer agreement must specify a mutually agreed transfer date following the vacation of the Puyallup armory. The transfer agreement must require the Central Pierce fire and rescue to cover any closing costs and must specify a purchase price of not less than $200,000. The agreement must be reported to the house of representatives capital budget committee, the senate ways and means committee, and the governor's office by January 1, 2017.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,750,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($7,883,000))

﻿ $635,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .(($34,207,000))

﻿ $1,800,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($42,090,000))

﻿ $2,435,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))

﻿ $40,161,000

TOTAL. . . .(($44,890,000))

﻿ $45,396,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Tri Cities Readiness Center - Land (30000808)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$900,000

Military Department Capital Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Emergency Management Division's UPS replacement (30000810)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

Sec. 1024. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1114 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

National Parks Service Maritime Heritage Grants (91000008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $28,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the center for wooden boats' historic small craft project.

(2) $87,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Northwest seaport's preservation of the national historic landmark 1889 tugboat Arthur Foss.

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .(($105,000))

﻿ $115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($105,000))

﻿ $115,000

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

Sec. 2001. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 2004 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide (91000037)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Up to $950,000 may be used for necessary renovations at the Maple Lane facility for the purpose of temporary forensic beds.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($10,645,000))

﻿ $16,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($10,645,000))

﻿ $16,850,000

Sec. 2002. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 2016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

((Western State Hospital - East Campus)) Eastern State Hospital: Psychiatric Intensive Care Unit and Competency Restoration (30002773)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,200,000))

﻿ $1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,200,000))

﻿ $1,250,000

Sec. 2003. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 2023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

ESH-15 Bed Addition for Substitute Senate Bill No. 5889 (92000016)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,400,000))

﻿ $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,400,000))

﻿ $1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Lakeland Village: Code Required Campus Infrastructure Upgrades (30002238)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,575,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo Glen-Housing Unit: Acute Mental Health Unit (30002736)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital - Eastlake: Emergency Generator Replacement (30003326)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Western State Hospital (30003388)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple Lane - Cascade: Remodel for Forensic Services (91000039)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Competency Restoration (91000040)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: New Civil Ward (92000022)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$450,000

Sec. 2011. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 2035 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Facilities Preservation (30000174)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the restoration and preservation of the Washington soldiers home cemetery.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($3,095,000))

﻿ $3,345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,690,000

TOTAL. . . .(($12,785,000))

﻿ $13,035,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

Sec. 3001. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (20084010)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$221,000

Water Quality Capital Account—State. . . .$43,000

((State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$570,000))

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($834,000))

﻿ $264,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$66,036,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($66,870,000))

﻿ $66,300,000

Sec. 3002. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3020 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$1,959,000

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($3,666,000))

﻿ $1,502,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($5,625,000))

﻿ $3,461,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$35,573,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($41,198,000))

﻿ $39,034,000

Sec. 3003. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3022 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000208)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3024, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($12,341,000))

﻿ $11,511,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,759,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($34,100,000))

﻿ $33,270,000

Sec. 3004. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000217)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($2,117,000))

﻿ $751,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,883,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($6,000,000))

﻿ $4,634,000

Sec. 3005. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000265)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($1,896,000))

﻿ $698,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,504,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($16,400,000))

﻿ $15,202,000

Sec. 3006. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3033 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Statewide Storm Water Projects (30000294)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3041, chapter 4, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($14,411,000))

﻿ $12,411,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$15,589,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($30,000,000))

﻿ $28,000,000

Sec. 3007. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000337)

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .(($19,100,000))

﻿ $12,655,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($31,500,000))

﻿ $25,055,000

Sec. 3008. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000351)

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .(($6,735,000))

﻿ $4,035,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,565,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($10,300,000))

﻿ $7,600,000

Sec. 3009. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3054 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000427)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the department of ecology must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its centennial clean water program grant.

(2) The agency must encourage local government use of federally funded water pollution control infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture - rural development.

(3) $1,500,000 of the state building construction account—state is provided solely as state match for the federal section 319 grant program.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($10,000,000))

﻿ $12,500,000

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($20,000,000))

﻿ $22,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$160,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($180,000,000))

﻿ $182,500,000

Sec. 3010. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3056 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Woodstove Emissions (30000429)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,350,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department of ecology to extend support for the wood stove removal and replacement program in Pierce county, operated by the Puget Sound clean air agency under the federally approved maintenance plan for fine particle pollution.

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($10,000,000))

﻿ $11,500,000

Sec. 3011. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3059 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000458)

Appropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($65,050,000))

﻿ $65,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($300,000,000))

﻿ $302,250,000

TOTAL. . . .(($365,050,000))

﻿ $367,550,000

Sec. 3012. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3062 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Financial Assistance Program (30000535)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for the storm water financial assistance program.

(2) $981,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Washington State University LID frontage - water quality project.

Appropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($33,000,000))

﻿ $26,600,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($53,000,000))

﻿ $46,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$280,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($333,000,000))

﻿ $326,600,000

Sec. 3013. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3066 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Cleanup Toxics Sites – Puget Sound (30000542)

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($22,550,000))

﻿ $18,846,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$72,763,000

TOTAL. . . .(($95,313,000))

﻿ $91,609,000

Sec. 3014. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3074 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

FY 2012 Statewide Stormwater Grant Program (91000053)

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($14,789,000))

﻿ $12,789,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,284,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($24,073,000))

﻿ $22,073,000

Sec. 3015. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3075 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Stormwater Retrofit and LID Competitive Grants (91000054)

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($6,952,000))

﻿ $5,652,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,511,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($14,463,000))

﻿ $13,163,000

Sec. 3016. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3081 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Improvements (92000076)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3081, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .(($91,456,000))

﻿ $64,056,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,544,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($100,000,000))

﻿ $72,600,000

Sec. 3017. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3084 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Drought Response (92000142)

Appropriation:

((State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000))

State Drought Preparedness Account—State. . . .(($14,000,000))

﻿ $9,500,000

((Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$16,000,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($16,000,000))

﻿ $9,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Low Interest Loans for Drought Wells (92000148)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department shall establish a low-interest loan program to allow agricultural or public entities to drill or retrofit wells to mitigate the effects of drought. For loans that are repaid within five years, the interest rate must be thirty percent of the average rate for twenty year municipal bonds as published in the bond buyer index, and for loans that are repaid between five and twenty years, the rate must be sixty percent of the average rate for twenty year municipal bonds as published in the bond buyer index. A well that is funded by this program may be operated only during a drought declaration.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE AGENCY

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Program (30000002)

Appropriation:

Underground Storage Tank Revolving Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$90,000,000

Sec. 3020. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3109 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Local Grant Authority (30000857)

Appropriation:

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—

Private/Local. . . .(($1,000,000))

﻿ $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($6,200,000))

﻿ $7,200,000

Sec. 3021. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3165 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (((30000207))) (30000222)

The legislature encourages the board to consider applications for the 2017-2019 funding program that will fund the purchase and installation of capital equipment to control invasive species at or near selected boat launches serving vessels 26 feet in length or less.

Appropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .(($9,360,000))

﻿ $14,210,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$37,800,000

TOTAL. . . .(($47,160,000))

﻿ $52,010,000

Sec. 3022. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3166 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000223)

Appropriation:

NOVA Program Account—State. . . .(($8,670,000))

﻿ $11,170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$34,770,000

TOTAL. . . .(($43,440,000))

﻿ $45,940,000

Sec. 3023. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3179 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreation and Conservation Office Recreation Grants (92000131)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The recreation and conservation office may retain up to four percent of these appropriations to administer the grants.

(2) A local match is not required for the Concrete water spray park project.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$32,785,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$5,611,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$38,396,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$38,396,000

Sec. 3024. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3200 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minter Hatchery Intakes (30000277)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($250,000))

﻿ $665,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($7,948,000))

﻿ $7,533,000

TOTAL. . . .$8,198,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Puget Sound and Adjacent Waters Nearshore Restoration - Match (30000753)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,500,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,500,000

Sec. 3026. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitchell Act Federal Grant (91000021)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .(($1,014,000))

﻿ $5,014,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,986,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($3,000,000))

﻿ $7,000,000

Sec. 3027. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3229 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

State Forest Land Replacement (30000223)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) ((The appropriation in this section)) $3,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely to the department to transfer from state forest land status to natural resources conservation area status certain state forest lands in Skamania county.

(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and transferred at fair market value, without consideration of management or regulatory encumbrances associated with wildlife species listed under the federal endangered species act. The value of the timber and other valuable materials transferred must be distributed as provided in RCW 79.64.110. The value of the land transferred must be deposited in the park land trust revolving account and be used solely to buy replacement state forest land, consistent with RCW 79.22.060.

(3) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department shall execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this section. Transfer agreements for properties identified in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose.

(4) The department and Skamania county shall work in good faith to carry out the intent of this section. The department shall identify eligible properties for transfer, consistent with subsection (1) of this section, in consultation with Skamania county, and may not execute any property transfers that are not in the statewide interest of either the state forest trust or the natural resources conservation area program.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($3,000,000))

﻿ $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($10,500,000))

﻿ $13,500,000

Sec. 3028. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3235 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Contaminated Sites Cleanup and Settlement (30000240)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $261,000 is provided solely for the state's share of liability under the model toxics control act for the cleanup of lead contamination at a rock pit now owned by plum creek timber company.

(2) $95,000 is provided solely for the contaminated soils cleanup at the Cedar creek correction center.

(3) $125,000 is provided solely for the webster nursery pesticides and groundwater cleanup.

(4) $375,000 is provided solely for the underground storage tank cleanup of contaminated soils of an old fueling station at the department of natural resources, SE region headquarters' parking lot that is within the city of Ellensburg new drinking water supply wellhead protection area.

(5) $74,500 of the firearms range account—state appropriation is provided solely for the state's share of liability under the comprehensive environmental response, compensation, and liability act for the cleanup of contamination at the Salt creek firing range site in Port Angeles, Clallam County.

Appropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .(($856,000))

﻿ $681,000

Firearms Range Account—State. . . .$250,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$931,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($856,000))

﻿ $931,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

By June 30, 2017, the department of natural resources shall transfer to the state board for community and technical colleges the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institution trust land currently leased to Green River Community College, South Seattle Community College-Georgetown campus, Grays Harbor Community College, and Highline Community College. The transfer documents must specify that the land be used for the educational purposes of the community and technical colleges and if the land ceases to be used for the educational purposes of the community and technical colleges the state board for community and technical colleges shall transfer the land to the department of natural resources to be managed as charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institution trust land.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Fire Communications Base Stations and Mountain Top Repeaters (92000030)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$626,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$626,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

The department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, and the state parks and recreation commission shall evaluate the use of locally-produced renewable biofertilizers and fiber from dairy digester systems when such products are cost-competitive and provide a suitable substitute for imported conventional fertilizers and fiber when blended with or used in place of conventional fertilizers and fiber. By November 1, 2016, the agencies shall report to the legislature and governor with the results of the demonstration projects.

Sec. 3032. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3232 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Blanchard Working Forest (30000231)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the department of natural resources shall not authorize or conduct any logging operations in the one thousand, six hundred acres on Mount Blanchard, referred to as the core management zone.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,500,000

TOTAL. . . .$7,500,000

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

Sec. 4001. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 4002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Fire Training Academy Burn Building Replacement (30000071)

Reappropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .(($200,000))

﻿ $385,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($1,300,000))

﻿ $1,115,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

Sec. 5001. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2013-15 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance (30000145)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5020, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. and section 6022 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$255,339,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$540,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$132,250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($387,589,000))

﻿ $388,129,000

Sec. 5002. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Tri-Tech Skills Center East Growth (30000159)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding is provided solely as a grant to constitute local funding available to the Tri-tech skills center in order to be eligible for state funding assistance through the school construction assistance program pursuant to RCW 28A.525.166.

(2) Funds provided in this section may not be used for any project with total ((project)) construction costs per square foot that exceed the construction cost allocation for calculating state funding assistance in subsection (1) by more than thirty-five percent.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,702,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,702,000

Sec. 5003. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Capital Program Administration (30000165)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall publish to its web site and report to the office of financial management, the appropriate committees of the legislature, and the legislative evaluation and accountability program a list of local school district projects submitted for school construction assistance within seven business days of the grant program deadline. The report must be updated within seven days following the superintendent of public instruction's final grant award decisions. Prior versions of the report must be maintained on the web site in order to monitor changes in estimates as the grant process progresses. The report must include, but not be limited to:

(a) School district;

(b) Project name;

(c) Estimated square footage by proposed project type;

(d) Estimated total of all project costs and estimated total construction contract cost;

(e) Funding sources and election dates, if applicable; and

(f) Intent to front-fund the project.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide to the office of financial management and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee in electronic database form the following:

(a) Study and survey information beginning with grants awarded July 1, 2015, or later; and

(b) All available inventory and condition of schools data.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall contract with educational service district 112 construction services group to perform an analysis of school construction costs. The analysis must include a significant sample of new ((and modernization)) school construction projects completed over the past ten years, with costs adjusted for construction inflation. The analysis must determine the major sources of variation in total school construction costs among different kinds of projects, districts, and regions. The analysis must estimate the cost difference due to variations in:

(a) The size of the project including the size per expected enrollment;

(b) Whether it is a new school or modernization project;

(c) Whether it is an elementary school, middle school, high school, or skills center;

(d) The extent of specialized higher cost facilities such as laboratories, shops, performing arts and indoor athletic facilities;

(e) Delivering specialized programs at skill centers including but not limited to: Dental and medical assisting, mechanical and engineering programs, first responder training, culinary programs, cyber security, and others;

(f) Site requirements;

(g) Durability of construction materials, finishes, building system components, and general life expectancy of the building; and

(h) Other design and construction feature that may contribute to cost variations.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must prepare a report on the findings from subsection (3) of this section and submit the report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by September 1, 2016.

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,924,000))

﻿ $3,438,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,244,000

TOTAL. . . .(($15,168,000))

﻿ $15,682,000

Sec. 5004. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2015-17 School Construction Assistance Program (30000169)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $990,000 of the common school construction account—state is provided solely for the Spokane Valley technical skills center to construct five science classrooms.

(2) $675,000 of the common school construction account—state is provided solely for study and survey grants. In calculating study and survey grants, for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award no more than fifty percent of the dollar amount for the minimum grants and square footage allocations. School districts receiving these grants in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium must use data collected or validated by the Washington State University extension energy office for the inventory and condition of existing school facilities.

(3) ((School districts receiving funding through the 2015-17 school construction assistance program must map the design of new facilities and remap the design of facilities to be remodeled.)) $1,282,648 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of superintendent of public instruction to contract with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs for mapping or remapping of school facilities.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must weight and prioritize grant requests on the following criteria and in the following order: (a) Will provide facility capacity needs to reduce kindergarten through third grade class sizes at high poverty schools; (b) will provide facility capacity needs to reduce kindergarten through third grade class sizes in remaining schools.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must expedite allocation and distribution of any eligible funds under the school construction assistance grant program for the appropriations provided to the superintendent of public instruction in this act for distressed schools, STEM pilot projects, or skill centers. For purposes of determining state funding assistance, eligible area must be calculated as follows: (a) Eligible area for STEM pilot projects is 1,440 square feet per science lab or classroom combination, or both; and 1,040 square feet per science classroom. Total eligible area per STEM pilot project must not exceed 15,840 square feet; (b) eligible area for skill centers is gross square feet of the proposed project as submitted to the office of financial management as requested by the superintendent for consideration in the 2015-2017 capital budget. Eligible area for the Spokane Valley technical skills center must not exceed 5,400 square feet, and; (c) eligible area for replacement of the cafeteria at Marysville-Pilchuck high school is 13,500 square feet.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($302,121,000))

﻿ $320,021,000

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .(($305,978,000))

﻿ $322,835,000

Common School Construction Account—Federal. . . .$3,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($611,099,000))

﻿ $645,856,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,638,150,000

TOTAL. . . .(($4,249,249,000))

﻿ $4,284,006,000

Sec. 5005. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

K-3 Class-Size Reduction Grants (92000039)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $10,000,000 of this appropriation is provided solely for Seattle public schools to provide additional state assistance for public school facilities necessary to support all-day kindergarten and class size reduction in kindergarten through third grade.

(2) The remaining appropriation is for the K-3 class size reduction construction pilot grant program specified in section 201, chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6080), Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess. to provide additional state assistance for public school facilities necessary to support all-day kindergarten and class size reduction in kindergarten through third grade.

(3) Within the remaining appropriation, a maximum of $750,000 is provided for the office of superintendent of public instruction to administer the K-3 class size reduction construction grant pilot program. The office may not use these funds for indirect costs.

(4) Should Seattle public schools have received additional state funds, in excess of the block grant provided in subsection (1) of this section, through the K-3 class size reduction construction grant pilot program, Seattle public schools may receive the amount provided by the calculated grant in the pilot program in excess of the block grant.

(5) The funding provided in subsection (1) of this section may not constitute local funding available to the Seattle public schools in order to be eligible for state funding assistance through the school construction assistance program pursuant to RCW 28A.525.166.

(6) School districts receiving grant funding in the first round must secure local matching funds by July 1, 2016. If local matching funds have not been secured by this date, the office of superintendent of public instruction may award the grant amounts without a secured local match to the remaining school districts in order of the K-3 class size reduction prioritized list.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($200,000,000))

﻿ $238,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($200,000,000))

﻿ $238,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:

(1) The joint legislative task force on school construction is established to review the following work underway:

(a) The status of implementing chapter 41, Laws of 2015 3rd sp.s. (2ESSB 6080), including recommendations for modifying the formula to fund K-3 classrooms;

(b) The findings and results from the work performed by the Washington State University energy office, including verification of K-12 building condition and classroom counts, and measuring school sizes in a sample of schools;

(c) The findings and results from the work by educational service district 112, including the major causes of variations in the cost of construction of schools; and

(d) The status of implementing capital grants to improve facilities for science, technology, engineering, and math education (STEM), including how the grants interact with the school construction assistance program.

(2) The task force must consider the findings and results from subsection (1) of this section and all other information about the history of state assistance to help local school districts design, build, and maintain public schools to make recommendations on improvements in how that state assistance is provided. The improvements must be designed to provide:

(a) Grants for new schools based on prototypical schools tied to an assumed number of classrooms needed to match K-12 operating budget assumptions;

(b) Grants for additions to new schools to allow for incremental growth to meet enrollment growth;

(c) Grants for replacement and renewal of major building systems based on achieving lowest life-cycle building costs, provided that standards of routine maintenance are achieved by local districts;

(d) Grants for specialized facility improvements such as STEM facilities and vocational facilities such as skills centers;

(e) Equity in allocating grants for school construction such that the share of school construction costs reflects the relative ability to raise necessary property taxes to pay for the local share;

(f) Effective and efficient school design and construction; and

(g) Transparency when districts are proposing local bond issues and capital levies for school construction.

(3)(a) The joint legislative task force on school construction consists of eight members, two members each, one from each major caucus, from the house of representatives committees on capital budget and education, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, and two members each, one from each major caucus, from the senate committees on ways and means, early learning, and K-12 education, appointed by the president of the senate.

(b) The task force shall select a chair from among its membership.

(c) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the house of representatives office of program research and the senate committee services.

(d) The office of superintendent of public instruction and the office of financial management shall cooperate with the task force and maintain liaison representatives.

(e) The task force shall coordinate with the appropriate standing committees of the legislature and may consult with other interested parties, as may be appropriate, for technical advice and assistance.

(4) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except those representing an employer or organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(6) The task force must report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2016.

Sec. 5007. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5054 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Inventory and Condition of Schools Data Collection (91000033)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature intends to complete the data collection, input, and verification of the inventory and condition of public school facilities in order to make informed decisions about K-12 school facility data collection processes and classroom capacity needs to fulfill current educational graduation requirements and class-size ratios. These decisions are best made when based on accurate data collected in a thorough and consistent manner by professionals experienced in making such inventory and condition assessments for public institutions.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the Washington State University extension energy office to complete collection, input, and verification of selected data of public school facilities, including skill centers, in the inventory and condition of schools system administered and maintained by the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) The Washington State University extension energy office shall conduct on-site visits to assess inventory and condition of all facilities for school districts that have no current study and survey as defined in RCW 28A.525.050 on file with the superintendent of public instruction as of July 1, 2015, or no pending study and survey to be filed with the superintendent through an outstanding study and survey grant award. The data collected, sufficient to meet the study and survey requirements for school facilities space inventory and condition analysis, through on-site visits must be input into the inventory and condition of schools system.

(4) The Washington State University extension energy office shall input into the inventory and condition of schools system applicable data of inventory and condition of school facilities from all current studies and surveys on file with the superintendent of public instruction as of July 1, 2015. The data must be input into the system in a manner that captures older information and data first. As studies and surveys from outstanding grant awards are filed with the superintendent, the Washington State University extension energy office shall input data into the system once current study and survey data has been input. Activities conducted pursuant to this subsection must occur concurrently with activities in subsection (3) of this section.

(5) The Washington State University extension energy office shall conduct on-site verification of data for school districts whose current studies and surveys on file with the superintendent will expire by June 30, 2017. Data verification must be conducted to evaluate the study and survey process as a tool to collect accurate inventory and condition of schools data upon which policymakers can make informed decisions regarding school facility and capacity needs. Activities conducted pursuant to this subsection must occur concurrently with activities in subsection (3) of this section and once sufficient data has been input into the system per subsection (4) of this section to conduct on-site visits to verification.

(6)(a) The Washington State University extension energy office, concurrent with activities conducted in subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section, must collect data to determine the information in (c)(i) through (vii) of this subsection. Additional on-site data collection for this task or collection of data from "as-built" documents or other valid sources must be accomplished to produce a valid sample for determining:

(b) The accuracy of reported number of classrooms in the most recent survey of classrooms and building data by the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and

(c) The variation in the size of schools and the allocation of space to the categories described in (c)(i) through (vii) of this subsection. The sample must be sufficient to determine this information for elementary, middle, high schools, and skills centers in districts of different sizes, growth rates, age, and relative property values.

(i) The square footage and number of classrooms. Classrooms are rooms that are used as classrooms or that could be used as classrooms under building code requirements and must include labs, shops, computer rooms used for instruction, art, and music classrooms. For this purpose, a music classroom is not a room designed to seat an audience;

(ii) The square footage of libraries;

(iii) The square footage of cafeteria and kitchen space;

(iv) The square footage of gymnasiums, locker rooms, and other indoor athletic facilities;

(v) The square footage of auditoriums and other performing arts space not counted as classrooms;

(vi) The square footage of administrative offices, and space used primarily by staff; and

(vii) The square footage of other space such as bathrooms, general circulation, mechanical rooms, and the balance of the total facility square footage not included in (c)(i) through (vi) of this subsection;

(d) The data included in (c)(i) through (vii) of this subsection must indicate whether the space is in a structure with a permanent foundation or not.

(7) As a general condition of appropriations provided to the superintendent of public instruction in this act, the superintendent of public instruction and each state school district shall provide requested facilities information and access to facilities in a timely manner to enable the Washington State University extension energy office to complete the tasks, oversight, and reporting requirements assigned in this section.

(8) The Washington State University extension energy office shall report progress of data collection, input, and verification to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2015. The Washington State University extension energy office must complete all work in this section and make a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2016.

(9) If funding provided in this section is insufficient to carry out the tasks identified within this section, the Washington State University extension energy office shall prioritize the tasks to ensure the requirements in subsection (6) of this section are completed first. The Washington State University extension energy office may enter into an interagency agreement with the office of superintendent of public instruction for additional funding to carry out the tasks identified in this subsection.

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,550,000))

﻿ $1,836,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,550,000))

﻿ $1,836,000

Sec. 5008. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5065 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Samuelson Communication and Technology Center (SCTC) (30000451)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,600,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($56,041,000))

﻿ $60,941,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($61,041,000))

﻿ $65,941,000

Sec. 5009. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5085 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

North Campus Utility Upgrade (30000426)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($600,000))

﻿ $209,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($2,982,000))

﻿ $3,373,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,582,000

Sec. 5010. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5086 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Performing Arts Exterior Renewal (30000428)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($387,000))

﻿ $355,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($2,560,000))

﻿ $2,592,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,947,000

Sec. 5011. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5089 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000615)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($3,572,000))

﻿ $3,995,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$4,886,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($8,458,000))

﻿ $8,881,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$64,422,000

TOTAL. . . .(($72,880,000))

﻿ $73,303,000

Sec. 5012. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5098 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Facilities Preservation – Minor Works Projects (30000222)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,515,000))

﻿ $2,684,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($12,515,000))

﻿ $12,684,000

Sec. 5013. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5099 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage Grants (30000237)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 27.34.330.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Project﻿ Authorized Amount

Pantages centennial: Façade restoration. . . .$685,000

Chong Wa parapet preservation. . . .$66,000

Rehabilitation of historic structures. . . .$750,000

Renovation heating of interior space of Balfour dock. . . .$1,000,000

Town hall historic restoration: Phase one of construction. . . .$1,000,000

Washington hall restoration. . . .$452,000

Rehabilitation of Ritzville library for ADA compliance. . . .$138,000

Quartermaster and dental surgery renovation project. . . .$309,000

Skagit city school restoration. . . .$91,000

Yamasaki courtyard restoration project. . . .$129,000

Prairie line trail historic interpretation project. . . .$400,000

Ancich netshed restoration. . . .$662,000

Chimney, gutter, and kitchen restoration. . . .$11,000

Federal building rehabilitation - phases II and III. . . .$920,000

Preservation of the Colville Indian agency cabin in Chewelah. . . .$33,000

Arthur Foss preservation and restoration phase II. . . .$166,000

Seaport landing development - renovation of building #8. . . .$1,000,000

Si view community center rehabilitation project phase II. . . .$130,000

Revitalization to historic wells house for community use. . . .$26,000

Chiyo's garden phase II. . . .$108,000

Historic community center, library, and city hall

restoration. . . .$185,000

Sea mar latino history and cultural center. . . .$654,000

Olympia waldorf school - the next 100 years. . . .$20,000

Chinook school restoration - final phase. . . .$79,000

Phase III of Worthington park - Quilcene. . . .$244,000

El centro de la raza community access and security project. . . .$100,000

Steam locomotives changed everything. . . .$199,000

The artifact/exhibit environmental conservation project. . . .$8,000

F/V Shenandoah restoration project - phase three. . . .$41,000

Henderson house and Tumwater historic district interpretive. . . .$50,000

Carnegie library renovation phase II. . . .$344,000

Gig Harbor boatshop, Eddon boatyard house restoration. . . .Alternate

Yakima Valley trolley capital improvement project. . . .Alternate

Total. . . .$10,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:

The Washington state historical society shall convene a team to develop and analyze options for the use or sale of the Lord Mansion and gardens located in the historic south capitol neighborhood in Olympia.

(1) Options for the use of the Lord Mansion should include, but not be limited to, display space for state historical materials, state and/or local government office space, private office space, small business incubator space, conference meeting rooms, and residential options. Selling the mansion must also be analyzed to determine the benefits and cost to the state and local government.

(2) The team must consist of the state historical society, the department of enterprise services, a former secretary of state, and the city of Olympia. Local stakeholders must be engaged before a final report is submitted to the office of financial management and the legislature. Appropriate staff from the office of financial management and legislative fiscal committees must be consulted on state fiscal implications.

(3) The Washington state historical society and the team convened under this section must report on the options analyzed and the specific analysis criteria and findings by November 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Campbell House Roof Replacement (92000001)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$376,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$376,000

(End of part)

PART 6

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 6001. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are ((thirty-six million eight hundred thirteen)) eighty-two million nine hundred twenty-one thousand dollars for the 2015-2017 biennium, ((two hundred thirty-three million two hundred eighty-six)) three hundred fifty-four million eight hundred fifty thousand dollars for the 2017-2019 biennium, and ((three hundred twenty-seven million two hundred thirty-four)) four hundred fifty-four million five hundred twenty-six thousand dollars for the 2019-2021 biennium.

Sec. 6002. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. (1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of enterprise services and the state treasurer's office to develop requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include charges for services rendered.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Department of enterprise services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $69,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a new office building at 1063 Capitol Way South, Olympia.

(4) Department of enterprise services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $8,077,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to repair the natural resources building parking garage fire suppression system.

(5) Department of ecology: Enter into a financing contract for up to $180,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for programmatic improvements to the headquarters building and the eastern regional office.

(6) Department of ecology: Enter into a financing contract for up to $760,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for preservation improvements to the headquarters building.

(7) Central Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $8,414,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a welcome center.

(8) The Evergreen State College: Enter into a financing contract for up to $12,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase a permanent location for the Tacoma program.

(9) Western Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $6,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the carver building renovation.

(10) Eastern Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $10,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the Washington street facility project. The university shall not use their building account or other appropriated account as a fund source for the certificate of participation.

(11) Community and technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Centralia Community College for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the student services building.

(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Centralia Community College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct student housing.

(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clark College for up to $8,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the culinary arts facility.

(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clark College for up to $35,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to design and construct a student recreation center.

(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin College for up to $7,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to design and construct a health science center.

(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River College for up to $15,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an aviation program center.

(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Highline College for up to $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the maintenance and grounds building.

(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the main building.

(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate and expand the Myklebust gymnasium.

(j) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Tacoma Community College for up to $12,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to expand a health and wellness center.

(k) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla Community College for up to $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a workforce and business development center.

(l) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bellevue College for up to $45,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct student housing.

(m) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Pierce College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase and renovate student housing at the Fort Steilacoom campus.

(n) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane Falls Community College for up to $19,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the gymnasium.

(o) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley College for up to $6,200,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a recreation center.

(12) Washington state patrol: Enter into a financing contract for up to $13,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to replace the fire training academy burn building; however, local agencies that use the burn building must have indicated support for required fee increases to pay for the debt service for the financing contract. Indication of support means at least sixty percent of local agencies which have used the facility within the prior ten years support the fee increase.

(13) Department of corrections: Enter into a financing contract for up to $2,163,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves for the remodel of the correctional industry's food factory.

Sec. 6003. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION—ART WORK ALLOWANCE. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210.

(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding $200,000 by colleges or universities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027.

(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of any public building by a state agency identified in RCW 43.17.020 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 43.17.200.

(4) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts commission during the 2015-2017 biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended solely for direct acquisition of works of art. Art allocations not expended within the ensuing two biennia will lapse. The commission may use up to $100,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces in the state art collection pursuant to RCW 28A.335.210.

(5) The executive director of the arts commission shall appoint a study group to review the operations of the one-half of one percent for works of art purchased or commissioned as required by RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200. The findings of the review must be reported annually to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by ((August)) September 15th. The review must include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) Projects purchased or commissioned per biennium; (b) partner agencies; (c) funding sources by fiscal year; (d) artwork costs; (e) administrative costs; (f) collection care costs; and (g) project status.

Sec. 6004. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

JLARC WWRP & STATE LAND ACQUISITION STUDY. (1) The joint legislative audit and review committee must conduct a review of state and local efforts to protect and conserve habitat and expand outdoor recreation since 1990.

(2) The review has two objectives:

(a) To determine what existing or potential objective outcome measures can be used to evaluate the success of major regulatory programs or state expenditures that are intended to protect and conserve habitat and expand outdoor recreation; and

(b) To compare the amount of habitat lands protected through acquisitions and easements with the amount of lands protected through the major regulatory programs within three counties west of the cascades and three counties east of the cascades.

(3) The review must include state expenditures and local and federal expenditures used to match state funding in the following programs:

(a) Salmon recovery funding board expenditures;

(b) Puget Sound acquisition and restoration;

(c) Puget Sound estuary and salmon restoration;

(d) The Washington wildlife and recreation program;

(e) State parks and recreation commission expenditures that expand recreational lands and facilities;

(f) Trust land transfer program and other expenditures by the department of natural resources that protect habitat or expand recreation; and

(g) Other state expenditures that expand recreational lands and facilities.

(((3))) (4) The review must also include the following regulatory programs:

(a) Growth management regulations regarding critical areas;

(b) Wetland restrictions;

(c) Shoreline management rules;

(d) Forest practices regulation; and

(e) Hydraulic project approval program.

(((4))) (5) The review must identify other objective benefits provided by each of the included programs, such as public safety, habitat protection, environmental quality, public health, protection of ((intrastructure)) infrastructure, and economic development.

(((5))) (6) The review must also examine a sample of recreation and habitat land acquisition by state agencies within the past ten years to determine whether the state agencies have a land stewardship program for the land parcels, what that program entails, and the extent of compliance with that program. Land stewardship includes, but is not limited to, restoring or developing the land to meet the objectives of the acquisition, suppressing invasive weeds, securing the property to prevent damage, and maintaining the land to prevent wildfires.

(((6))) (7) In undertaking the review, the joint legislative audit and review committee may contract with experts in measuring the outcomes of regulatory and funding programs to protect and conserve habitat.

(((7))) (8) By December 1, ((2016)) 2017, the joint legislative audit and review committee must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the senate and the house of representatives that presents information and findings from the study. The report is to include recommendations for accountability measures for determining the achievement of intended outcomes for protecting, acquiring, and improving habitat and recreation lands and facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6005. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program and State Land Acquisition Study (92000003)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6006. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:

In addition to the provisions of RCW 43.88.030, the office of financial management shall require life cycle cost analysis to be prepared as part of any proposal to acquire, construct, or lease all new state office buildings and warehouses to establish the economic viability of the project and prove its benefit to Washington state taxpayers. A life cycle cost analysis must be prepared on all projects or buildings greater than 20,000 square feet. A life cycle cost analysis must be performed at the earliest time possible and must be completed before funding may be allocated for any part of the project including but not limited to: Design, demolition of existing facilities, site preparation or construction and includes projects using a design-build construction model. The life cycle cost analysis must be performed by the office of financial management or the department of enterprise services and must be performed in a transparent manner with all stakeholders entitled to participate. All results of the life cycle cost analysis must be verified by an independent real estate industry consultant. Funding for the life cycle cost analysis must also include funding for review by real estate industry consultants. Included in the life cycle cost analysis and in reporting the cost per square foot, the agencies must include all moneys relating to the development of the project including but not limited to: (1) Predesign; (2) design; (3) consultants; (4) demolition; (5) construction moving costs; (6) tenant relocation costs; (7) parking costs; (8) ongoing maintenance; (9) future capital improvements expected during the term of the lease or building ownership including but not limited to: Windows, carpet, heating, ventilation and air conditioning system replacement, and painting; (10) the economic value and impact of local property taxes; (11) value of the land; and (12) other related costs by both state-owned and privately-owned facilities.

Sec. 6007. RCW 70.148.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 993 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The pollution liability insurance program trust account is established in the custody of the state treasurer. All funds appropriated for this chapter and all premiums collected for reinsurance shall be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter including payment of costs of administering the pollution liability insurance and underground storage tank community assistance programs. Expenditures for payment of administrative and operating costs of the agency are subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW and may be made only after appropriation by statute. No appropriation is required for other expenditures from the account.

(2) Each calendar quarter, the director shall report to the insurance commissioner the loss and surplus reserves required for the calendar quarter. The director shall notify the department of revenue of this amount by the fifteenth day of each calendar quarter.

(3) Each calendar quarter the director shall determine the amount of reserves necessary to fund commitments made to provide financial assistance under RCW 70.148.130 to the extent that the financial assistance reserves do not jeopardize the operations and liabilities of the pollution liability insurance program. The director shall notify the department of revenue of this amount by the fifteenth day of each calendar quarter. The director may immediately establish an initial financial assistance reserve of five million dollars from available revenues. The director may not expend more than fifteen million dollars for the financial assistance program.

(4) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the pollution liability insurance program trust account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

(5) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the pollution liability insurance program trust account to the underground storage tank revolving account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

(6) This section expires July 1, 2020.

Sec. 6008. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7037 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Public works assistance account—state: For transfer

to the water pollution control revolving account, up to

$6,000,000 for fiscal year 2016 and up to $6,000,000 for

fiscal year 2017. . . .$12,000,000

Public works assistance account—state: For transfer

to the drinking water assistance account, up to $4,000,000

for fiscal year 2016 and up to $4,000,000 for fiscal

year 2017. . . .$8,000,000

Pollution liability insurance program trust

account—state: For transfer to the underground storage

tank revolving account. . . .$10,000,000

Sec. 6009. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
STATE TREASURER TRANSFER AUTHORITY

State toxics control account: For transfer to the

environmental legacy ((trust)) stewardship account. . . .$24,000,000

Local toxics control account: For transfer to the

environmental legacy ((trust)) stewardship account. . . .$30,000,000

(1) As directed by the department of ecology in consultation with the office of financial management, the state treasurer shall transfer amounts among the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account as needed during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium to maintain positive account balances in all three accounts.

(2) As directed by the department of ecology in consultation with the office of financial management, the state treasurer shall transfer amounts from the cleanup settlement account established in RCW 70.105D.130 to the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account or the environmental legacy stewardship account to maintain positive account balances up to an amount not to exceed (($13,000,000)) $26,000,000 that must be considered an inter fund loan that must be repaid with interest to the cleanup settlement account in three equal repayments in fiscal years 2018, 2019, and 2020.

(3) If, after using the inter-fund transfer authority granted in this section, the department of ecology determines that further reductions are needed to maintain positive account balances in the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account, the department is authorized to delay the start of clean-up projects based on acuity of need, readiness to proceed, cost-efficiency, or need to ensure geographic distribution. If the department uses this authority, the department must submit a prioritized list of projects that may be delayed to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6010. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:

To the extent that any appropriation authorizes expenditures of state funds from the state building construction account, or from any other capital project account in the state treasury, for a capital project or program that is specified to be funded with proceeds from the sale of bonds, the legislature declares that any such expenditures for that project or program made prior to the issue date of the applicable bonds are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of those bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of such appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6011. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:

Until June 30, 2027, the director of the department of enterprise services is granted authority to transfer and convey real property, known as the former northern state hospital site, to the port of Skagit upon the director's determination that such a transfer is appropriate and in furtherance of the interest of the state. Should legal requirements to provide behavioral health services at other locations fail to be met, having made diligent efforts to do so, the state may extend the leases with the current behavioral health tenants for the minimum time needed to meet such requirements with due diligence. The director shall consult with the office of financial management. This transfer is not subject to the requirements of RCW 43.09.210.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6012. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:

BELATED CLAIMS. The agencies and institutions of the state may expend moneys appropriated in this act, upon approval of the office of financial management, for the payment of supplies and services furnished to the agency or institution in prior fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6013. A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

The dairy nutrient infrastructure account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from repayment of loans made by the state conservation commission for dairy nutrient management demonstration projects must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for dairy nutrient management demonstration projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6014. The following acts or parts of acts are repealed:

(1) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1072 (uncodified); and

(2) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5074 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6015. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---