BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that it is in the public interest to present students with the opportunity to engage in a voluntary educational program designed to stimulate student interest in clean energy technologies that will provide affordable, reliable, low-emission energy for Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.30 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The clean energy education program is established and shall be administered by the director of the Washington State University extension energy program.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Clean energy technologies" means any established or experimental energy generation technology that may be investigated for the purpose of finding innovative methods for generating affordable, reliable, low-emission energy, and includes, but is not limited to, energy generation from wind, solar, geothermal, biogas, wave or tidal, biomass, nuclear, and hydroelectric technologies, and technologies that may reduce emissions from energy generation from fossil fuels.

(b) "Director" means the director of the Washington State University extension energy program or the director's designee.

(c) "Eligible student" means a student in grades nine through twelve in Washington.

(3) By July 1, 2017, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for administering the clean energy education program, the director shall:

(a) Develop a series of workshops open to voluntary participation by eligible students focusing on a variety of clean energy technologies, including examining scientific and economic forces that influence research, development, and deployment of clean energy technologies in Washington. The clean energy education program must include opportunities for students to produce and showcase research and work product;

(b) Develop workshops that feature a broad variety of clean energy technologies for the purpose of presenting a diverse range of ideas to students. In developing the workshops, the director shall seek the advice and recommendations of individuals and organizations active in the field of energy technology, including universities, utilities, nonprofit and for-profit companies, state and local government agencies, industry associations, joint operating agencies, national laboratories located in Washington, and other knowledgeable individuals and organizations. The director shall retain authority for developing content for the workshops under this subsection;

(c) Develop a process for including individuals active in the field of energy technology as voluntary participants in the workshops developed under this section. Individuals selected to participate in workshops are not employees or agents of the state or any of its political subdivisions. This subsection (3)(c) does not create any civil liability on the part of the state or any of its political subdivisions, officers, employees, or agents for actions taken by individuals not affiliated with the Washington State University extension energy program participating in a workshop;

(d) Develop a strategy for publicizing workshops created under this section to eligible students and their teachers; and

(e) Develop an application process for eligible students to participate in the workshops created under this section. The director may develop criteria for prioritizing students, including but not limited to grade point averages, completion of relevant courses, and participation in relevant activities.

(4) The clean energy education program account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from appropriations by the legislature, gifts, grants, or donations received for the program by the director must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of the clean energy education program. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(5) The director may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to implement the clean energy education program consistent with this act.

(6) By December 15th of each year workshops are offered, the director must report to the legislature on the number and location of workshops held, the content of the workshops, and the number and ages of students who attended. The director may include any other information in the report that can assist the legislature in determining the effectiveness of the program.

--- END ---