BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.330.040 and 1993 c 280 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall supervise and administer the activities of the department and shall advise the governor and the legislature with respect to community and economic development matters affecting the state.

(2) In addition to other powers and duties granted to the director, the director shall have the following powers and duties:

(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(b) Act for the state in the initiation of or participation in any multigovernmental program relative to the purpose of this chapter;

(c) Accept and expend gifts and grants, whether such grants be of federal or other funds;

(d) Appoint such deputy directors, assistant directors, and up to seven special assistants as may be needed to administer the department. These employees are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW;

(e) Prepare and submit budgets for the department for executive and legislative action;

(f) Submit recommendations for legislative actions as are deemed necessary to further the purposes of this chapter;

(g) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other functions necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(h) Delegate powers, duties, and functions as the director deems necessary for efficient administration, but the director shall be responsible for the official acts of the officers and employees of the department; and

(i) Perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

(3) When federal or other funds are received by the department, they shall be promptly transferred to the state treasurer and thereafter expended only upon the approval of the director. The department must track the amount of federal economic development funding received and disbursed along with any required state, local, or other matching requirements and annually provide the information to the economic development committees of the house of representatives and the senate.

(4) The director may request information and assistance from all other agencies, departments, and officials of the state, and may reimburse such agencies, departments, or officials if such a request imposes any additional expenses upon any such agency, department, or official.

(5) The director shall, in carrying out the responsibilities of office, consult with governmental officials, private groups, and individuals and with officials of other states. All state agencies and their officials and the officials of any political subdivision of the state shall cooperate with and give such assistance to the department, including the submission of requested information, to allow the department to carry out its purposes under this chapter.

(6) The director may establish additional advisory or coordinating groups with the legislature, within state government, with state and other governmental units, with the private sector and nonprofit entities or in specialized subject areas as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(7) The internal affairs of the department shall be under the control of the director in order that the director may manage the department in a flexible and intelligent manner as dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless specifically limited by law, the director shall have complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The director may create such administrative structures as the director deems appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law, and the director may employ such personnel as may be necessary in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided by law.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.330.050 and 2014 c 112 s 110 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall be responsible for promoting community and economic development within the state by assisting the state's communities to increase the quality of life of their citizens and their economic vitality, and by assisting the state's businesses to maintain and increase their economic competitiveness, while maintaining a healthy environment. Community and economic development efforts shall include: Efforts to increase economic opportunity; local planning to manage growth; the promotion and provision of affordable housing and housing-related services; providing public infrastructure; business and trade development; assisting firms and industrial sectors to increase their competitiveness; fostering the development of minority and women-owned businesses; facilitating technology development, transfer, and diffusion; community services and advocacy for low-income persons; and public safety efforts. The department shall have the following general functions and responsibilities:

(1) Provide advisory assistance to the governor, other state agencies, and the legislature on community and economic development matters and issues;

(2) Assist the governor in coordinating the activities of state agencies that have an impact on local government and communities;

(3) Cooperate with the legislature and the governor in the development and implementation of strategic plans for the state's community and economic development efforts;

(4) Solicit private and federal grants for economic and community development programs and administer such programs in conjunction with other programs assigned to the department by the governor or the legislature. To maximize the impact of federal funding for economic development, the department must coordinate with federal and state public research facilities to leverage other federal funding coming to the state for research, development, innovation of new technologies, and transfer of technology to the private sector to promote business development and jobs in Washington;

(5) Cooperate with and provide technical and financial assistance to local governments, businesses, and community-based organizations serving the communities of the state for the purpose of aiding and encouraging orderly, productive, and coordinated development of the state, and, unless stipulated otherwise, give additional consideration to local communities and individuals with the greatest relative need and the fewest resources;

(6) Participate with other states or subdivisions thereof in interstate programs and assist cities, counties, municipal corporations, governmental conferences or councils, and regional planning commissions to participate with other states and provinces or their subdivisions;

(7) Hold public hearings and meetings to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(8) Conduct research and analysis in furtherance of the state's economic and community development efforts including maintenance of current information on market, demographic, and economic trends as they affect different industrial sectors, geographic regions, and communities with special economic and social problems in the state; and

(9) Develop a schedule of fees for services where appropriate.

--- END ---