BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that Washington's small businesses are critical to the state's economic health and vitality, and the time business owners spend interacting with multiple state agencies takes time away from running or growing their business.

(2) The legislature further finds that implementing a one-stop integrated system that allows businesses to complete their state government business in a customized, more efficient, and more effective way will greatly improve the business customer experience, reduce the time it takes businesses to conduct their interactions with state government, and increase compliance with state regulations.

(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to monitor the progress towards development and implementation of the one-stop business portal, and encourages agencies to develop systems and processes that are consistent with implementing a one-stop business portal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By November 30, 2016, the office of the chief information officer must provide the economic development committees of the legislature a plan for implementing a one-stop integrated system for business interactions with government. The plan must specify how the office of the chief information officer and other state agencies intend to collaborate with the business community in order to receive business feedback and use business recommendations in the development of the one-stop business portal. At a minimum, the following state agencies must collaborate with the office of the chief information officer in developing the one-stop business portal: The department of revenue, the department of labor and industries, the secretary of state, the employment security department, the department of commerce, and the office of regulatory assistance.

(2) The office of the chief information officer must submit a progress report on the one-stop integrated system to the economic development committees of the legislature by January 1st of each year, beginning with January 1, 2017. The progress report must also specify how the office of the chief information officer and other state agencies are collaborating with the business community and using business recommendations in the development of the one-stop business portal.

--- END ---