BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.21F.088 and 2010 c 271 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state shall use the following principles to guide development and implementation of the state's energy strategy and to meet the goals of RCW 43.21F.010:

(a) Pursue all cost-effective energy efficiency and conservation as the state's preferred energy resource, consistent with state law;

(b) Ensure that the state's energy system meets the health, welfare, and economic needs of its citizens with particular emphasis on meeting the needs of low-income and vulnerable populations;

(c) Maintain and enhance economic competitiveness by ensuring an affordable and reliable supply of energy resources and by supporting clean energy technology innovation, access to clean energy markets worldwide, and clean energy business and workforce development;

(d) Reduce dependence on fossil fuel energy sources through improved efficiency and development of cleaner energy sources, such as bioenergy, low-carbon energy sources, and natural gas, and leveraging the indigenous resources of the state for the production of clean energy;

(e) Improve efficiency of transportation energy use through advances in vehicle technology, increased system efficiencies, development of electricity, biofuels, and other clean fuels, and regional transportation planning to improve transportation choices;

(f) Meet the state's statutory greenhouse gas limits and environmental requirements as the state develops and uses energy resources;

(g) Build on the advantage provided by the state's clean regional electrical grid by expanding and integrating additional carbon-free and carbon-neutral generation, and improving the transmission capacity serving the state;

(h) Make state government a model for energy efficiency, use of clean and renewable energy, and greenhouse gas-neutral operations; ((and))

(i) Maintain and enhance our state's existing energy infrastructure; and

(j) Encourage carbon sequestration.

(2) The department shall:

(a) During energy shortage emergencies, give priority in the allocation of energy resources to maintaining the public health, safety, and welfare of the state's citizens and industry in order to minimize adverse impacts on their physical, social, and economic well-being;

(b) Develop and disseminate impartial and objective energy information and analysis, while taking full advantage of the capabilities of the state's institutions of higher education, national laboratory, and other organizations with relevant expertise and analytical capabilities;

(c) Actively seek to maximize federal and other nonstate funding and support to the state for energy efficiency, renewable energy, emerging energy technologies, and other activities of benefit to the state's overall energy future; and

(d) Monitor the actions of all agencies of the state for consistent implementation of the state's energy policy including applicable statutory policies and goals relating to energy supply and use.

--- END ---