BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the International Plumbing Code has innovative and modern technical methods, devices, and improvements that are nationally recognized standards which reduce construction and maintenance costs, improve building efficiencies, and benefit the safety and welfare of building owners, occupants, and the general public. The legislature further finds that the International Plumbing Code is a beneficial and appropriate companion code to the correlated and coordinated suite of building codes that Washington has adopted. The legislature finds that using the coordinated set of international codes allows cost savings in building construction and redevelopment, thus helping ensure affordable rents, mortgages, and leases. Therefore, the legislature recognizes the International Plumbing Code as published by the International Code Council, Inc., for use in the state as an alternative to the current plumbing code.

Sec. 2. RCW 19.27.031 and 2015 c 11 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, there shall be in effect in all counties and cities the state building code which shall consist of the following codes which are hereby adopted by reference:

(1)(a) The International Building Code, published by the International Code Council, Inc.;

(b) The International Residential Code, published by the International Code Council, Inc.;

(2) The International Mechanical Code, published by the International Code Council, Inc., except that the standards for liquefied petroleum gas installations shall be NFPA 58 (Storage and Handling of Liquefied Petroleum Gases) and ANSI Z223.1/NFPA 54 (National Fuel Gas Code);

(3) The International Fire Code, published by the International Code Council, Inc., including those standards of the National Fire Protection Association specifically referenced in the International Fire Code: PROVIDED, That, notwithstanding any wording in this code, participants in religious ceremonies shall not be precluded from carrying hand-held candles;

(4)(a) Except as provided in RCW 19.27.170, the Uniform Plumbing Code and Uniform Plumbing Code Standards, published by the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials: PROVIDED, That any provisions of such code affecting sewers or fuel gas piping are not adopted; and

(b) As an alternative code, and not in addition to the code in (a) of this subsection, the International Plumbing Code, published by the International Code Council, Inc., with the exception of sections 104.4, 108.7, and 109 and Appendix A of such Code, which are not adopted;

(5) The rules adopted by the council establishing standards for making buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by individuals with disabilities or elderly persons as provided in RCW 70.92.100 through 70.92.160; and

(6) The state's climate zones for building purposes are designated in RCW 19.27A.020(3) and may not be changed through the adoption of a model code or rule.

In case of conflict among the codes enumerated in subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section, the first named code shall govern over those following.

The codes enumerated in this section shall be adopted by the council as provided in RCW 19.27.074. The council shall solicit input from first responders to ensure that firefighter safety issues are addressed during the code adoption process.

The council may issue opinions relating to the codes at the request of a local official charged with the duty to enforce the enumerated codes.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.106.050 and 2013 c 23 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department, with the advice of the advisory board, shall prepare a written examination to be administered to applicants for certificates of competency for journey level plumber and specialty plumber. The examination shall be constructed to determine:

(a) Whether the applicant possesses varied general knowledge of the technical information and practical procedures that are identified with the trade of journey level plumber or specialty plumber; and

(b) Whether the applicant is familiar with the applicable plumbing codes, including the International Plumbing Code as defined in RCW 19.27.031(4)(b), and the administrative rules of the department pertaining to plumbing and plumbers.

(2) The department, with the consent of the advisory board, may enter into a contract with a nationally recognized testing agency to develop, administer, and score any examinations required by this chapter. All applicants shall, before taking an examination, pay the required examination fee. The department shall set the examination fee by contract with a nationally recognized testing agency. The fee shall cover but not exceed the costs of preparing and administering the examination and the materials necessary to conduct the practical elements of the examination. The department shall approve training courses and set the fees for training courses for examinations provided by this chapter.

(3) An examination to determine the competency of an applicant for a domestic water pumping system specialty plumbing certificate as defined by RCW 18.106.010(10)(c) must be established by the department in consultation with the advisory board by December 31, 2006. The department may include an examination for appropriate electrical safety and technical requirements as required by RCW 19.28.191 with the examination required by this section. The department, in consultation with the advisory board, may accept the certification by a professional or trade association or other acceptable entity as meeting the examination requirement of this section. Individuals who can provide evidence to the department prior to January 1, 2007, that they have been employed in the pump and irrigation business as defined by RCW 18.106.010(10)(c) for not less than four thousand hours in the most recent four calendar years shall be issued the appropriate certificate by the department upon receiving such documentation and applicable fees. The department shall establish a single document for those who have received both the plumbing specialty certification defined by this subsection and have also met the certification requirements for a pump and irrigation or domestic pump specialty electrician, showing that the individual has received both certifications.

(4) The department shall certify the results of the examinations provided by this chapter, and shall notify the applicant in writing whether he or she has passed or failed. Any applicant who has failed the examination may retake the examination, upon the terms and after a period of time that the director shall set by rule. The director may not limit the number of times that a person may take the examination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The state building code council may not use any funding or resources to review or modify the 2015 version of the International Plumbing Code, published by the International Code Council, Inc.

--- END ---