BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

Sec. 101. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($33,485,000))

﻿ $33,527,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($34,953,000))

﻿ $34,969,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,918,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($70,356,000))

﻿ $70,414,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The joint select task force on nuclear energy created in chapter 221, Laws of 2014 is extended until December 1, 2017.

Sec. 102. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SENATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($22,997,000))

﻿ $23,817,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($25,771,000))

﻿ $26,646,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,748,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($50,516,000))

﻿ $52,211,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The joint select task force on nuclear energy created in chapter 221, Laws of 2014 is extended until December 1, 2017.

Sec. 103. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

Performance Audits of Government—State Appropriation. . . .(($6,711,000))

﻿ $6,726,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may adjust the due dates for projects included on the committee's 2015-2017 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.

(2) The committee shall analyze the forest fire protection assessment established in chapter 76.04 RCW. The analysis shall include:

(a) The process the department of natural resources uses to determine the assessments;

(b) The statutory framework for assessing based on parcels and being considered forest land;

(c) The cost efficiency of the administrative processes to collect assessments and issue refunds;

(d) The rates of the assessment for forest fire protection, including the costs of county assessor participation;

(e) The historical relationship between the rates and protection expenditures or anticipated expenditures and eventual suppression expenditures;

(f) How other states assess for protection or suppression;

(g) Parcels assessed as forest lands that have become developed properties and are not covered, serviced, or taxed by a fire protection district.

A report on the results of the analysis with any findings and recommendations shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 2016.

Sec. 104. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 104 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

Performance Audits of Government—State Appropriation. . . .(($3,658,000))

﻿ $3,661,000

Sec. 105. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($9,277,000))

﻿ $9,278,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($9,729,000))

﻿ $9,728,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$19,006,000

Sec. 106. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$296,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$296,000

State Health Care Authority Administrative Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$394,000

Department of Retirement Systems Expense﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($4,631,000))

﻿ $4,550,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($5,617,000))

﻿ $5,536,000

Sec. 107. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 107 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($4,160,000))

﻿ $4,163,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($4,709,000))

﻿ $4,711,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($8,869,000))

﻿ $8,874,000

Sec. 108. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($3,835,000))

﻿ $4,050,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($4,288,000))

﻿ $4,535,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($8,123,000))

﻿ $8,585,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for deposit to the legislative oral history account under RCW 44.04.345.

Sec. 109. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPREME COURT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($7,491,000))

﻿ $7,562,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($7,594,000))

﻿ $7,628,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($15,085,000))

﻿ $15,190,000

Sec. 110. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 111 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE LAW LIBRARY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($1,570,000))

﻿ $1,583,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($1,577,000))

﻿ $1,590,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($3,147,000))

﻿ $3,173,000

Sec. 111. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($1,134,000))

﻿ $1,116,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($1,076,000))

﻿ $1,115,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,210,000))

﻿ $2,231,000

Sec. 112. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($16,866,000))

﻿ $16,985,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($17,292,000))

﻿ $17,299,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($34,158,000))

﻿ $34,284,000

Sec. 113. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($55,930,000))

﻿ $56,009,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($56,764,000))

﻿ $55,957,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,154,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$667,000

Judicial Information Systems Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$56,016,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$6,691,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($178,222,000))

﻿ $177,494,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $878,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $878,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $6,784,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation are provided solely for the information network hub project.

(2) $516,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacement of computer equipment, including servers, routers, and storage system upgrades.

(3) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

(4) $1,849,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacing computer equipment at state courts and state judicial agencies.

(5) $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for school districts for petitions to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. The administrator for the courts shall develop an interagency agreement with the superintendent of public instruction to allocate the funding provided in this subsection. Allocation of this money to school districts shall be based on the number of petitions filed. This funding includes amounts school districts may expend on the cost of serving petitions filed under RCW 28A.225.030 by certified mail or by personal service or for the performance of service of process for any hearing associated with RCW 28A.225.030.

(6)(a) $7,313,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $7,313,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per-petition processing costs.

(b) Each fiscal year during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate fiscal committees no later than 60 days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(7) $313,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation is provided solely for the content management system for the appellate courts.

(8) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the office of public guardianship for the purpose of providing guardianship services to low income and indigent alleged or actual incapacitated persons who were receiving services on July 10, 2013.

(9) $118,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 287, Laws of 2015 (Engrossed House Bill No. 1943).

(10) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the planning and design of a dependency court improvement demonstration program. The plan must be developed jointly with the one family one team public private partnership, with a private cash match of $75,000. If the cash match is not available by August 1, 2015, the administrative office of the courts will not be required to complete the planning and design of a dependency court improvement demonstration program. By January 1, 2016, the public private partnership shall provide to the appropriate committees of the legislature the program design, including ongoing administrative funding, and a statement of the public and private funding required in order to provide demonstration grants to up to four counties.

(11) $6,080,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for continued implementation of the superior court case management system project.

(12) $6,518,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for continued implementation of the superior court case management system. The steering committee for the superior court case management system, the office of administrator of the courts, and county clerks shall work with the case management system vendor to develop cost estimates for modifications to the superior court case management system to address security and document management concerns raised by county clerks. If the cost estimates are not provided to the fiscal committees of the legislature by January 1, 2016, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. Furthermore, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse if the superior court case management system is not live and fully functional in Franklin, Thurston, and Yakima counties by February 1, 2016.

(13) The existing steering committee for the superior court case management system shall continue oversight responsibilities throughout the various phases of the project to include, but not be limited to, vendor management, contract and deliverable management, assuring reasonable satisfaction of the business and technical needs at the local level, receipt of stakeholder feedback, and communication between the various stakeholder groups and the judicial information systems committee. Issues of significant scope, schedule or budget changes, and risk mitigation strategies must be escalated to the judicial information systems committee for consideration. In the event that a majority of the steering committee members cannot reach a decision, the issue must be escalated to the judicial information systems committee for consideration. The superior court case management system project steering committee may solicit input from user groups as deemed appropriate.

(14) The courts of limited jurisdiction case management system (CLJ-CMS) replacement project shall be guided by a project steering committee to provide project oversight throughout the various phases of the project to include, but not be limited to, vendor management, contract and deliverable management, assuring reasonable satisfaction of the business and technical needs at the local level, receipt of stakeholder feedback, and communication between the various stakeholder groups and the judicial information systems committee. The project steering committee shall be comprised of three members from the administrative office of the courts, two members from the district and municipal court judges association, three members from the district and municipal court management association, and two members from the misdemeanant corrections association. Issues of significant scope, schedule or budget changes, and risk mitigation strategies must be escalated to the judicial information systems committee for consideration. In the event that a majority of the project steering committee members cannot reach a decision, the issue must be escalated to the judicial information systems committee for consideration. The courts of limited jurisdiction case management system replacement project steering committee may solicit input from user groups as deemed appropriate.

(15) $3,789,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation is provided solely for preparation and procurement activities related to the courts of limited jurisdiction case management system (CLJ-CMS) replacement project. The appropriations are further conditioned that the CLJ-CMS replacement project be funded entirely from judicial information system account funds in future biennia. The amounts provided in this subsection for the CLJ-CMS replacement project shall not be expended prior to January 1, 2016. In addition, if the following activities are not complete by the dates provided, no further funds appropriated in this subsection shall be expended on the CLJ-CMS replacement project.

(a) Beginning April 1, 2016, and each calendar quarter thereafter, quality assurance reports for the CLJ-CMS replacement project shall be provided to the office of chief information officer for review and for posting on its information technology project dashboard.

(b) No later than July 1, 2016, the CLJ-CMS replacement project steering committee shall provide a report to the legislature on the status of the procurement process for a CLJ-CMS replacement project, including an affirmation that the project is designed to meet the business processes and requirements of all thirty-nine counties. In addition, the report shall include a statement from each court of limited jurisdiction of its intended use of the new CLJ-CMS.

(c) No later than January 1, 2017, the judicial information system committee must approve the publication of a request for proposal for the CLJ-CMS replacement project.

(d) Prior to any CLJ-CMS replacement project steering committee recommendation to the judicial information system committee of a preferred vendor and prior to the selection of an apparently successful vendor, the office of chief information officer must be allowed to review vendor submittals in response to the request for proposal. To better inform its selection, the office of chief information officer must provide to the CLJ-CMS replacement project steering committee an evaluation each vendor's proposed technology solution assessing its architecture, security, vendor experience and qualifications, project risks and risk management, and whether the technology solution represents the best value.

(16) $516,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the creation of the office of superior courts within the administrative office of the courts as provided in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6317. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection must be expended as directed by an oversight committee composed of members of the association of the superior court judges of the state of Washington for research, studies, policy, and legislative efforts to improve trial court services, family and juvenile justice, and best practices that improve public safety in the criminal justice system.

Sec. 114. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($37,096,000))

﻿ $37,557,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($37,364,000))

﻿ $37,809,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,648,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($78,108,000))

﻿ $79,014,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The amounts provided include funding for expert and investigative services in death penalty personal restraint petitions.

(2) $924,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $462,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for parents representation program costs related to increased parental rights termination filings from the department of social and health services permanency initiative.

(3) $451,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $915,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to increase payments for attorneys who contract with the office for indigent defense representation.

(4) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the purpose of improving the quality of trial court public defense services.

(5) $245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to implement chapter 117, Laws of 2015 (Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5486). Funds must be used to maintain the current programs in Grays Harbor/Pacific, King, Kitsap, Pierce, Snohomish, Spokane, and Thurston/Mason counties; expand services in three of these locations; provide for program administration; and to fund the first stage of an evaluation of the program to determine if the parents for parents program can be considered evidence-based.

Sec. 115. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 116 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($12,560,000))

﻿ $12,842,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($12,818,000))

﻿ $13,088,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$150,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,463,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($26,991,000))

﻿ $27,543,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and an amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 may be used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise eligible persons who are sixty years of age or older on matters authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k) regardless of household income or asset level.

(2) $498,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $499,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the child legal representation program. To achieve efficiencies and to manage within appropriated amounts, beginning January 1, 2016, the office is directed to implement the child legal representation program for children under RCW 13.34.100 using attorneys under contract directly with the office in a manner similar to the parents representation program at the office of public defense. The office must consult with counties, county courts, and the office of public defense prior to implementing this operational change.

Sec. 116. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 117 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($5,365,000))

﻿ $5,381,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($5,448,000))

﻿ $5,698,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($14,813,000))

﻿ $15,079,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,000,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account appropriation is provided solely for efforts to assist with currently active industrial recruitment efforts that will bring new jobs to the state or will retain headquarter locations of major companies currently housed in the state.

(2) $684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the office of the education ombuds.

(3) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the governor's office to contract with a consultant, in partnership with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and the centers for medicare and medicaid, to identify potential options for reevaluating the structure of the state psychiatric hospital system. The consultant shall work with local governments, providers, and behavioral health organizations to identify options and present recommendations to the office of financial management, the governor's office, and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2016.

Sec. 117. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($633,000))

﻿ $636,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($637,000))

﻿ $655,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$90,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,360,000))

﻿ $1,381,000

Sec. 118. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 119 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($2,368,000))

﻿ $2,411,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($2,379,000))

﻿ $2,433,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,747,000))

﻿ $4,844,000

Sec. 119. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 120 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($25,870,000))

﻿ $25,925,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($12,796,000))

﻿ $12,861,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$7,577,000

Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and Access﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($8,596,000))

﻿ $8,743,000

Charitable Organization Education Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$671,000

Local Government Archives Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($9,086,000))

﻿ $9,120,000

Election Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($8,865,000))

﻿ $4,387,000

Washington State Heritage Center Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$9,825,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($83,286,000))

﻿ $79,109,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,301,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.

(2)(a) $2,682,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,761,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and other events of statewide significance during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.

(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage.

(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;

(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.

(3) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to the funding for the library as a whole.

(4) $11,497,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the 2016 presidential primary election.

(5) $3,000,000 of the Washington state heritage center account—state appropriation is provided solely for state library programs. If House Bill No. 2195 (auditor's fees) is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. If the increase in auditor's fees generates less revenue than provided in this subsection, the secretary of state shall reduce expenditures so that amounts provided in this subsection do not exceed revenue generated from the increase in auditor's fees.

(6) $771,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $772,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the state library to purchase statewide online access to the information technology academy to allow public access to online courses and learning resources through public libraries.

(7) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funds for state election and voters' pamphlet costs of Senate Joint Resolution No. 8215 (voter approval of tax increases), Senate Joint Resolution No. 8211 (2/3 vote for tax increase), and other ballot measures.

Sec. 120. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($264,000))

﻿ $266,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($273,000))

﻿ $274,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($537,000))

﻿ $540,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office shall assist the department of enterprise services on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department of enterprise services shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.

Sec. 121. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 122 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($222,000))

﻿ $235,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($228,000))

﻿ $231,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($450,000))

﻿ $466,000

Sec. 122. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 123 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER

State Treasurer's Service Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($16,753,000))

﻿ $16,779,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $125,000 of the state treasurer's service account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2063 (better life experience program). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 123. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 124 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE AUDITOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$14,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($31,000))

﻿ $631,000

State Auditing Services Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($9,711,000))

﻿ $9,717,000

Performance Audit of Government Account—State

Appropriation. . . .(($1,531,000))

﻿ $1,855,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($11,287,000))

﻿ $12,217,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,531,000 of the performance audit of government account—state appropriation is provided solely for staff and related costs to verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits; and to assist the state special education safety net committee when requested.

(2) The legislature recognizes that changing technology has resulted in requests for electronic copies of records without corresponding changes in how the public records act allows for agencies to charge for those copies. The legislature recognizes the difficulty individual agencies face in determining the actual cost of providing both paper and electronic copies and finds it would be beneficial to agencies subject to the public records act, as well as requestors, to develop a standard and reasonable cost agencies may charge to provide records in either paper or electronic format. The state auditor shall, in consultation with the state chief information officer and attorney general, develop a methodology and conduct a study to establish an accurate cost estimate for providing paper and electronic copies of records in response to requests under the public records act. The state auditor shall also consult with local government agencies in developing and conducting the study. The state auditor shall report the results of this study to the legislature no later than March 1, 2016.

(3) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the auditor shall conduct an audit by June 30, 2017:

(a) Of the Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, and Idaho (WWAMI) medical school located in Spokane to determine the cost per student of medical education and to show the cost per student by fund source;

(b) To determine the cost per student for students from WWAMI partner states other than Washington and whether any Washington state funds or Washington resident student tuition is used to subsidize students from WWAMI partner states; and

(c) To determine the planned per student cost of medical education and to show the cost per student by fund source for the Washington State University medical school program.

(4) Some local governments have combined fees for commercial solid waste collection services with fees for the collection of source-separated recyclable materials from commercial entities, establishing a single bundled rate charged to all ratepayers that purports to provide free recycling collection services to commercial entities. The state auditor is directed to:

(a) Investigate whether such bundled rates result in the imposition of the solid waste collection tax on services related to material collected primarily for recycling and salvage in violation of RCW 82.18.010(3);

(b) Assess (i) whether the bundled rates result in payment of fees by ratepayers for services that they may not receive or need, and (ii) the amount of such excess payments; and

(c) Assess whether ordinances establishing bundled rates result in de facto regulation of commercial source-separated recycling collection services by local governments in violation of state law.

(5) $324,000 of the performance audit of government account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6583 (performance management system). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for a study on the Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, and Idaho medical school.

Sec. 124. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 126 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($11,408,000))

﻿ $11,409,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($11,740,000))

﻿ $8,288,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$6,930,000

New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,039,000

Legal Services Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($225,029,000))

﻿ $226,425,000

Tobacco Prevention and Control Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$273,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,065,000

Public Service((s)) Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($2,217,000))

﻿ $2,218,000

Child Rescue Fund—State Appropriation. . . .$500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($262,201,000))

﻿ $260,147,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management, the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown by division of division administration expenses.

(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney general shall notify the director of financial management and the chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.

(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.

(4) (($2,228,000)) $2,218,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the work of the public counsel section of the office of the attorney general.

(5) $353,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $353,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a grant to the Washington coalition of crime victim advocates to provide training, certification, and technical assistance for crime victim service center advocates.

(6) $1,196,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 70, Laws of 2015 (Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5052) (cannabis patient protection).

(7) $14,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2015 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5740) (extended foster care).

(8) $182,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 274, Laws of 2015 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1449) (oil transportation safety).

(9) $71,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1472 (chemical action plans), Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5056 (safer chemicals/action plans), Substitute Senate Bill No. 6131 (safer chemicals), or any of these. If none of these bills are enacted by July 10, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) Pursuant to chapter 247, Laws of 2015 (Second Substitute House Bill No. 1281) (sexual exploitation of a minor), the office of the attorney general may expend $500,000 from the child rescue fund—state appropriation, or an amount not to exceed actual revenues into the account.

(11) $240,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6396 (rules review). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 125. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($1,378,000))

﻿ $1,397,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($1,454,000))

﻿ $1,460,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,832,000))

﻿ $2,857,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 5999 (caseload forecast council). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 126. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($60,162,000))

﻿ $60,063,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($61,103,000))

﻿ $58,828,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($264,872,000))

﻿ $276,618,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($8,149,000))

﻿ $8,150,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($7,905,000))

﻿ $7,406,000

Drinking Water Assistance Administrative﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$487,000

Lead Paint Account—State Appropriation. . . .$181,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation. . . .$15,000

Home Security Fund Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($26,493,000))

﻿ $34,125,000

Affordable Housing for All Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($12,023,000))

﻿ $13,928,000

Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes﻿

Investigation and Prosecution Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,776,000

Low-Income Weatherization and Structural﻿

Rehabilitation Assistance Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($2,149,000))

﻿ $2,148,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($2,980,000))

﻿ $3,190,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($12,692,000))

﻿ $12,693,000

Prostitution Prevention and Intervention Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$45,000

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$791,000

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$10,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($5,607,000))

﻿ $2,804,000

Energy Freedom Account—State Appropriation. . . .$472,000

Financial Services Regulation Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$468,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account—State Appropriation. . . .$643,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$1,650,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($470,673,000))

﻿ $486,491,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the terms included in the original loan agreements.

(2) $945,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $945,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $12,541,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs, pursuant to chapter 69, Laws of 2015 (youth homelessness). Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $10,741,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract for services pursuant to RCW 13.32A.030 and 74.15.220 as recodified in chapter 69, Laws of 2015 (youth homelessness). The department shall contract and collaborate with service providers in a manner that maintains the availability and geographic representation of secure and semi-secure crisis residential centers and HOPE centers. To achieve efficiencies and increase utilization, the department shall allow the co-location of these centers, except that a youth may not be placed in a secure facility or the secure portion of a co-located facility except as specifically authorized by chapter 13.32A RCW as recodified in chapter 69, Laws of 2015 (youth homelessness);

(b) $1,800,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for transitional housing assistance or partial payments for rental assistance under the independent youth housing program;

(c) $512,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $511,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for street youth services; and

(d) $433,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $434,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for administration of the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs. The office must identify service gaps for youth and young adults who are homeless or at risk of homelessness. The office shall further lead efforts to improve data collection, help ensure services are available statewide, and assure that programs fulfill federal regulations and guidelines for preventing and ending youth homelessness.

(3) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a grant to resolution Washington to building statewide capacity for alternative dispute resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to litigation.

(4) $306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior volunteer program.

(5) The department shall administer its growth management act technical assistance and pass-through grants so that smaller cities and counties receive proportionately more assistance than larger cities or counties.

(6) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely as pass-through funding to Walla Walla Community College for its water and environmental center.

(7) $396,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $396,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Washington new Americans program.

(8) $2,801,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,801,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for associate development organizations. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the department shall consider an associate development organization's total resources when making contracting and fund allocation decisions, in addition to the schedule provided in RCW 43.330.086.

(9) (($234,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $233,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Washington asset building coalitions.

(10) $5,607,000)) $2,804,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center of Washington.

(((11))) (10) $2,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation and $1,000,000 of the affordable housing for all account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of commerce for services to homeless families through the Washington youth and families fund.

(((12))) (11) $5,000,000 of the home security account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department of commerce to provide emergency assistance to homeless families in the temporary assistance for needy families program.

(((13))) (12) $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the department to identify and invest in strategic growth areas, support key sectors, and align existing economic development programs and priorities. The department must consider Washington's position as the most trade dependent state when identifying priority investments. The department must engage states and provinces in the northwest as well as associate development organizations, small business development centers, chambers of commerce, ports, and other partners to leverage the funds provided. For each dollar expended the department must receive a one hundred percent match. The match may be provided by the department through nongeneral fund sources, or any partnering governments or organizations. Sector leads established by the department must include the industries of: (a) Tourism; (b) agriculture, wood products, and other natural resource industries; and (c) clean technology and renewable and nonrenewable energy. The department may establish these sector leads by hiring new staff, expanding the duties of current staff, or working with partner organizations and or other agencies to serve in the role of sector lead.

(((14))) (13) The department is authorized to suspend issuing any nonstatutorily required grants or contracts of an amount less than $1,000,000 per year.

(((15))) (14) The department is authorized to require an applicant to pay an application fee to cover the cost of reviewing the project and preparing an advisory opinion on whether a proposed electric generation project or conservation resource qualifies to meet mandatory conservation targets.

(((16))) (15) Within existing resources, the department shall provide administrative and other indirect support to the developmental disabilities council.

(((17))) (16) $546,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $512,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 68, Laws of 2015 (agricultural labor skills and safety).

(((18))) (17) $256,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $268,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 296, Laws of 2015 (small business retirement marketplace).

(((19))) (18) $1,677,000 of the financial fraud and identity theft crimes investigation and prosecution account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 65, Laws of 2015 (financial fraud and identity theft).

(((20) Within existing resources, the department of commerce shall examine the effects of incompatible land use surrounding military installations within Washington state and conduct a comparative analysis of best practices from other states to mitigate conflicts between local jurisdictions and neighboring military installations due to incompatible land use. The department shall submit its analysis to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2016.))

(19) $98,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the department of commerce to examine the effects of incompatible land use surrounding military installations within Washington state, and conduct a comparative analysis of best practices from other states to mitigate conflicts between local jurisdictions and neighboring military installations due to incompatible land use. The department of commerce must submit its analysis to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2016.

(((21))) (20) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the expansion of the long-term care ombuds program to meet the immediate needs of individuals by advocating on behalf of and protecting residents of long-term care facilities from abuse, neglect, and exploitation.

(((22))) (21) $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 273, Laws of 2015 (trafficking of persons).

(((23))) (22) $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 101, Laws of 2015 (trafficking of persons training).

(((24))) (23) $468,000 of the financial services regulation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the family prosperity account program.

(((25))) (24) $472,000 of the energy freedom account—state appropriation is provided solely for the energy office within the department of commerce.

(((26))) (25) $11,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $11,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 9, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (industrial/manufacturing facilities).

(((27))) (26) Within existing resources, the department of commerce shall consult with key crime victim services stakeholders to inform decisions about the funding distribution for federal fiscal years 2015-2017 victims of crime act victim assistance funding. These stakeholders must include, at a minimum, children's advocacy centers of Washington, Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, Washington coalition against domestic violence, Washington coalition of sexual assault programs, Washington coalition of crime victim advocates, at least one representative from a child health coalition, and other organizations as determined by the department. Funding distribution considerations shall include, but are not limited to, geographic distribution of services, underserved populations, age of victims, best practices, and the unique needs of individuals, families, youth, and children who are victims of crime.

(((28))) (27) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for grants to local governments, nonprofit organizations, and associate development organizations to assist workers and communities adversely impacted by recent closures of timber mills and forest product manufacturing facilities in Mason county. Funds may be used for workforce and economic development activities, including public infrastructure projects that will increase employment opportunities in the county.

(((29))) (28) $643,000 of the liquor excise tax account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department of commerce to provide fiscal note assistance to local governments.

(((30))) (29) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely as a grant to Klickitat county for a land use planner to process a backlog of permits that have not been processed by the Columbia river gorge commission due to lack of funds.

(((31))) (30) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to plan and develop a regional approach in southwest King county to provide day and hygiene shelter services to homeless populations. The plan will identify appropriate partners and a service model to meet regional needs; evaluate the establishment of a facility or facilities to provide day and hygiene services; and within the amounts provided work with existing providers to expand existing services to provide day and hygiene shelter services.

(((32))) (31) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for grants to Safe Yakima Valley and ((Associated Ministries)) Safe Streets of Tacoma to coordinate community efforts for the prevention of alcohol, tobacco, drug use and violence.

(((33))) (32) Within the amounts provided, the public works board may expend up to $250,000 of the public work assistance account—state appropriation for development of a curriculum and online delivery system in cooperation with the state board for community and technical colleges for public works managers.

(((34))) (33) $500,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5624 (financing essential public infrastructure). If Second Engrossed Senate Joint Resolution No. 8204 is not ratified at the November ((2015)) 2016 general election, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((35))) (34) The department must convene a work group of interested stakeholders to review the state's deed of trust act contained in Title 61 RCW. The work group should include, but not be limited to, representatives from financial institutions, loan servicing and trustee service companies, and advocacy groups representing homeowners and borrowers. The work group is tasked to review and make recommendations to ensure that the act remains a workable system for financial institutions, loan servicing companies, trustee, homeowners, and borrowers. A report on the review and recommendations is due to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2015. Up to $20,000 from the foreclosure fairness account may be used to defray the department's costs for convening and providing administrative and technical support to the work group.

(((36))) (35) $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the department to contract with the University of Washington women's center to conduct a study to research supply chain policies related to labor practices of small, medium, and large businesses. The study shall analyze whether or not there is a correlation between supply chain management practices that protect workers from human trafficking and unsafe working conditions and higher shareholder value and/or market share. The study will examine the impact of corporate sourcing practices in social media feedback and in customer satisfaction. The study shall provide case studies and best practices in ethical sourcing practices that protect workers. The study shall recommend how to evaluate and monitor supply chain management related to labor and vendor management practices of companies without bias. The study shall make recommendations on how the state can design legislation on global ethical sourcing practices that is comprehensive, pragmatic and enforceable. The study shall be presented to the house and senate commerce and labor committees no later than January 31, ((2016)) 2017.

(((37))) (36) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the northwest agriculture business center.

(37) $199,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6210 (achieving a better life experience program). To the greatest extent practicable, the department must conduct its administrative and outreach activities for the achieving a better life program in conjunction with the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund to reduce costs. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(38) $105,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6166 (incremental energy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(39) $1,506,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6497 (truancy reform). The funds are provided solely for costs of eighteen new HOPE beds and ten crisis residential centers beds as provided in the bill. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(40) $5,560,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation and $1,906,000 of the affordable housing for all account—state appropriation are provided solely for the consolidated homeless grant.

(41) $555,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for increasing street youth programs. Of the amount appropriated, $120,000 must be used to increase programs in south King county.

(42) $693,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6564 (protections for persons with developmental disabilities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 127. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($802,000))

﻿ $805,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($870,000))

﻿ $887,000

Lottery Administrative Account—State Appropriation. . . .$50,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,722,000))

﻿ $1,742,000

Sec. 128. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($19,280,000))

﻿ $11,954,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($19,623,000))

﻿ $10,011,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($38,321,000))

﻿ $38,821,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$498,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$310,000

Personnel Service Fund—State Appropriation. . . .(($8,609,000))

﻿ $8,623,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,497,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$536,000

Statewide Information Technology System Development

Revolving Account—State Appropriation. . . .$15,799,000

Office of Financial Management Central

Service Account—State Appropriation. . . .$14,695,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($104,654,000))

﻿ $102,744,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section represent a transfer of expenditure authority of $2,333,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,782,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2017 to the office of financial management to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5084 (all payer claims database).

(2) $13,799,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for prepayment of the debt service for the time, leave, and attendance system. The enterprise time, leave, and attendance project shall be discontinued, but the office and other state agencies may utilize acquired project assets for other purposes to the extent practicable.

(3) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1491 (early care and education system). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided one time solely to implement chapter 244, Laws of 2015 (college bound scholarship).

(5) $168,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $163,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to implement chapter 245, Laws of 2015 (outdoor recreation).

(6) $85,000 of the office of financial management central service account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for implementation of section 3 of Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5915 (dynamic fiscal notes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7)(a) Within funds appropriated in this section, the education data center created in RCW 43.41.400 shall complete an evaluation of the state need grant and submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2016. To the extent it is not duplicative of other studies, the report shall evaluate educational outcomes emphasizing degree completion rates at the postsecondary levels. The report shall study certain aspects of the state need grant program, including but not limited to:

(i) State need grant recipient grade point average and its relationship to positive outcomes, including but not limited to:

(A) Variance between community and technical colleges and the four-year institutions of higher education;

(B) Variance between state need grant recipients and students on the state need grant unserved waiting list; and

(C) Differentials between quarter or semester grade point averages and cumulative grade point averages.

(ii) Possible outcomes of requiring a minimum grade point average, per semester or quarter or cumulatively, for state need grant renewal.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2016, the student achievement council and all institutions of higher education eligible to participate in the state need grant shall ensure that data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of the state need grant program are promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible. The data to be reported must include but not be limited to:

(i) The number of state need grant recipients;

(ii) The number of students on the unserved waiting list of the state need grant;

(iii) Persistence and completion rates of state need grant recipients and students on the state need grant unserved waiting list, disaggregated by institutions of higher education;

(iv) State need grant recipients and students on state need grant unserved waiting list grade point averages; and

(v) State need grant program costs.

(c) The student achievement council shall submit student unit record data for the state need grant program applicants and recipients to the education data center.

Sec. 129. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 131 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS

Administrative Hearings Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($38,458,000))

﻿ $38,397,000

Sec. 130. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 132 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY

Lottery Administrative Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($28,427,000))

﻿ $28,386,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $690,000 of the lottery administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of the lottery's gaming systems vendor contract.

(2) No portion of this appropriation may be used for acquisition of gaming system capabilities that violates state law.

(3) Pursuant to RCW 67.70.040, the commission shall take such action necessary to reduce by $6,000,000 each fiscal year the total amount of compensation paid to licensed lottery sales agents. It is anticipated that the result of this action will reduce retail commissions to an average of 5.1 percent of sales.

Sec. 131. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 133 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($248,000))

﻿ $260,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($257,000))

﻿ $259,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($505,000))

﻿ $519,000

Sec. 132. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 134 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($250,000))

﻿ $254,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($252,000))

﻿ $260,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($502,000))

﻿ $514,000

Sec. 133. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 135 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS—OPERATIONS

Department of Retirement Systems Expense

Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($55,329,000))

﻿ $55,412,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $25,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement chapter 78, Laws of 2015 (SHB 1194).

Sec. 134. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 136 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($119,358,000))

﻿ $110,203,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($120,551,000))

﻿ $115,099,000

Financial Services Regulation Account—State

Appropriation. . . .(($5,000,000))

﻿ $10,000,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($6,556,000))

﻿ $6,591,000

Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$141,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$101,000

Business License Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($24,315,000))

﻿ $24,567,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($276,022,000))

﻿ $266,702,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($5,740,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $5,741,000)) $5,628,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and (($11,481,000)) $7,890,000 of the business license account—state appropriation are provided solely for the taxpayer legacy system replacement project.

(2) $487,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $582,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5186 (disabled veterans and seniors). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6211 (nonprofit homeownership development). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) The appropriation in this section provides funding for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6438 (tax and licensing administration).

Sec. 135. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 137 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($1,269,000))

﻿ $1,321,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($1,286,000))

﻿ $1,303,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,555,000))

﻿ $2,624,000

Sec. 136. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 138 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

OMWBE Enterprises Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($4,730,000))

﻿ $4,883,000

Sec. 137. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 139 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$300,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$227,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$4,572,000

Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($54,415,000))

﻿ $55,068,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($59,514,000))

﻿ $60,167,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $168,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 17, Laws of 2015 (HB 1172).

(2) $129,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 63, Laws of 2015 (HB 1077).

(3) $272,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 122, Laws of 2015 (SB 5717).

(4) $25,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 19, Laws of 2015 (SSB 5023).

(5) The commissioner shall identify mechanisms through rule-making that will enhance consumer information and protection, with the goal of formalizing policies that will ensure patient stability during the plan year, such as maintaining cost-sharing requirements.

(6) $143,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5180 (life insurance reserves). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $482,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Fifth Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5857 (pharmacy benefit managers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 138. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 140 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD

State Investment Board Expense Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($42,452,000))

﻿ $42,722,000

Sec. 139. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 141 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE LIQUOR AND CANNABIS BOARD

Dedicated Marijuana Fund—State

Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($7,367,000))

﻿ $7,431,000

Dedicated Marijuana Fund—State Appropriation

(FY 2017). . . .(($7,821,000))

﻿ $8,458,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($64,008,000))

﻿ $64,718,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,822,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$25,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($82,043,000))

﻿ $83,454,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,183,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,818,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2136 (marijuana market reforms) and Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5052 (cannabis patient protection). If either bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $376,000 of the liquor revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5280 (beer and cider sales). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $2,641,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional cigarette and tobacco enforcement. The liquor control board must provide additional cigarette and tobacco enforcement officers and pursue strategies to reduce the amount of smuggled, contraband, and otherwise untaxed cigarette and tobacco products in the state. The liquor control board must report the amount of untaxed cigarette and tobacco taxes recovered in comparison to past years to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2016, and January 1, 2017.

Sec. 140. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 142 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$176,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($11,324,000))

﻿ $16,323,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($39,041,000))

﻿ $38,027,000

Pipeline Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($2,050,000))

﻿ $1,989,000

Pipeline Safety Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,981,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($55,572,000))

﻿ $59,496,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The commission shall work with the Idaho public utilities commission and the public utility commission of Oregon to identify common regulatory functions that can be performed jointly, with the goal of formalizing an agreement that protects essential services while increasing regulatory effectiveness and efficiencies through economies of scale. The commission is authorized to enter into an agreement with such other state public utility commissions to work jointly in administering specified respective regulatory functions.

(2) $2,849,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 274, Laws of 2015 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1449) (oil transportation safety).

(3) $176,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the energy facility site evaluation council to conduct a study on the siting of small modular reactors in Washington.

(a) The study must include the following: (i) Identification of possible locations in the state where small modular reactors could be suitably located; (ii) identification of permits and studies that would need to be conducted in order to facilitate the siting of small modular reactors; and (iii) recommendations on how the siting and permitting process could be streamlined for small modular reactors.

(b) The energy facility site evaluation council shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by December 1, 2015.

(c) The energy facility site evaluation council may contract for services to assist in the study.

(d) For purposes of this subsection, "small modular reactor" means a scalable nuclear power plant using reactors that each have a gross power output no greater than three hundred megawatts electric, and where each reactor is designed for factory manufacturing and ease of transport, such as by truck, rail, or barge.

(4) $280,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6248 (transition of coal units). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 141. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$3,386,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$3,417,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$136,393,000

Enhanced 911 Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($57,917,000))

﻿ $56,578,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($21,749,000))

﻿ $40,851,000

Disaster Response Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($75,870,000))

﻿ $107,317,000

Military Department Rent and Lease Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$615,000

Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,886,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($303,233,000))

﻿ $352,443,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) ((Appropriations from the disaster response account—state appropriation and the disaster response account—federal appropriation may be spent only on disasters declared by the governor and with the approval of the office of financial management.)) The military department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees on October 1st and February 1st of each year detailing information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2015-2017 biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.

(2) $60,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following conditions: Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the Washington state interoperability executive committee.

(3) $1,000,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 274, Laws of 2015 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1449) (oil transportation safety).

(4) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the conditional scholarship program pursuant to chapter 28B.103 RCW.

(5) $5,000,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for financial assistance to counties to replace analog 911 telephone and network equipment with next generation 911 capable technology.

(6) $1,850,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely to Okanogan and Ferry counties to address deficiencies within their communications infrastructure for 911 dispatch. Funds will be used to replace failing radio dispatching hardware within 911 dispatch centers; build interoperable communications between each county's dispatch center such that each can serve as a back-up to the other; and build upon the existing wireless microwave network for 911 calls, dispatch centers, and first responder radio operations. Prior to releasing any state funds, the department will consult with the counties to determine if federal funds are available for any proposed expenditure and assist the counties with any application for such funds.

(7) $130,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a pilot program within King county to implement a mobile phone application that notifies persons trained in cardiopulmonary resuscitation of persons nearby who are having a cardiac emergency. The department may partner with the county, a city, a fire district, or a search and rescue organization for purposes of implementing the application and software-as-a-service in an existing computer-aided dispatch system. The department will report the results of the pilot program to the legislature by December 1, 2016.

(8) $5,679,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for transitioning to an internet protocol based next generation 911 network and increased network costs during the transition and hardware required for the new system. The department's activities and procurement is a major information technology project subject to oversight and review by the office of the chief information officer.

Sec. 142. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 144 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($1,845,000))

﻿ $1,866,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($1,944,000))

﻿ $2,024,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($1,143,000))

﻿ $1,209,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($3,577,000))

﻿ $3,628,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($8,509,000))

﻿ $8,727,000

Sec. 143. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 145 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY

Certified Public Accountants' Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($6,095,000))

﻿ $6,113,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $3,300,000 of the certified public accountants' account—state appropriation is provided solely for deposit into the certified public accounting transfer account to fund Washington-based colleges and universities for students pursuing degrees in accounting or taxation as provided in chapter 215, Laws of 2015 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5534).

Sec. 144. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 146 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($500,000))

﻿ $502,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $250,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations. The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding these funds for multiple death investigations involving an unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving multiple jurisdictions.

(2) $210,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in identifying human remains.

Sec. 145. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 147 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION

Horse Racing Commission Operating Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($3,654,000))

﻿ $3,617,000

Sec. 146. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 148 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($2,874,000))

﻿ $2,769,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($3,585,000))

﻿ $3,480,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$102,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($1,256,000))

﻿ $1,020,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$95,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($7,912,000))

﻿ $7,466,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($2,537,000)) $2,432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, (($3,243,000)) $3,138,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $1,584,000 from the fee charged to master contract vendors are provided solely for the payment of facilities and services charges, utilities and contracts charges, public and historic facilities charges, and capital projects surcharges allocable to the senate, house of representatives, statute law committee, legislative support services, joint legislative systems committee, and office of support services. The department shall allocate charges attributable to these agencies among the affected revolving funds. The department shall maintain an interagency agreement with these agencies to establish performance standards, prioritization of preservation and capital improvement projects, and quality assurance provisions for the delivery of services under this subsection. The legislative agencies named in this subsection shall continue to enjoy all of the same rights of occupancy and space use on the capitol campus as historically established.

(2) In accordance with RCW 46.08.172 and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase parking fees in fiscal years 2016 and 2017 as necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business.

(3) Before any agency may purchase a passenger motor vehicle as defined in RCW 43.19.560, the agency must have written approval from the director of the department of enterprise services.

(4) From the fee charged to master contract vendors, the department shall transfer to the office of minority and women's business enterprises in equal monthly installments $893,000 in fiscal year 2016 and $1,599,000 in fiscal year 2017.

(5) $95,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2136 (marijuana market reforms). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) The department shall make its lean transformation services available to the department of corrections to assist its implementation of the performance management system required by Substitute Senate Bill No. 6583 (performance management system). The department must provide its assistance at no charge to the department of corrections and, to the greatest extent practical, structure the joint effort to serve as a demonstration project for other state agencies to implement similar performance-based management systems.

Sec. 147. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 149 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS

Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'﻿

Administrative Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($1,013,000))

﻿ $1,011,000

Sec. 148. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 150 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($1,363,000))

﻿ $1,366,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($1,390,000))

﻿ $1,391,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,122,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$14,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,889,000))

﻿ $4,893,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Washington main street program.

Sec. 149. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 151 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AGENCY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$1,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$450,000

Consolidated Technology Services Revolving

Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($7,368,000))

﻿ $7,361,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($8,818,000))

﻿ $8,811,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) In conjunction with the office of the chief information officer's prioritization of proposed information technology expenditures, agency budget requests for proposed information technology expenditures shall include the following: The agency's priority ranking of each information technology request; the estimated cost for the current biennium; the estimated total cost of the request over all biennia; and the expected timeline to complete the request. The office of the chief information officer and the office of financial management may request agencies to include additional information on proposed information technology expenditure requests.

(2) $550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the office of the chief information officer to develop a statewide strategic business and technology architecture plan for time capture, payroll and payment processes, and eligibility and authorization processes for the department of early learning. In collaboration with the department of early learning the plan will identify and recommend whether existing systems, or planned systems, can and should be used to meet the department of early learning's business needs. A child care attendance and billing solution must be designed or modified to align with the statewide enterprise strategy once the strategic architecture is established. The plan shall be completed and delivered to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015.

(3) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to the office of the chief information officer for statewide technical oversight of information technology projects ((for time capture, payroll and payment processes, and eligibility and authorization processes. The office of the chief information officer shall identify where existing or proposed technology investments should be consolidated, identify when existing or proposed technology investments can be reused or leveraged to meet multi-agency needs, increase interoperability between agencies, and identify how redundant investments can be reduced overtime.)) or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, and eligibility, case management and authorization systems within the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of early learning, and the health care authority. As part of the technical oversight, the office of the chief information officer shall identify where existing or proposed technology investments should be consolidated, reused, or otherwise leveraged to meet multiagency needs or increase interoperability, increase alignment with statewide policies, standards, strategies, architectures, and reduce redundant investments over time.

(4) (($7,368,000)) $7,362,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1391 or Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5315 (aligning information technology functions). If neither bill is enacted by July 10, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART II

HUMAN SERVICES

Sec. 201. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.

(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(4) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for social services appointments as the one established for medical appointments in the health care authority. When contracting directly with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the department shall only contract with language access providers who are working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available, the department may use a language access provider who meets other certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including interpreters in other states.

(5) ((Information technology projects and proposed projects for time capture, payroll and payment processes, and eligibility and authorization systems within the department of social and health services are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer)) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department of social and health services are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

(6)(a) The department shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid expansion for clients applying for or receiving state funded services from the department and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the department shall coordinate with the health care authority to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(b) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. No later than October 1, 2015, the department shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for public assistance benefits.

(c) The department, in coordination with the health care authority, shall pursue a federal waiver to use supplemental nutrition assistance program eligibility, aged, blind, or disabled program eligibility, or temporary assistance for needy families eligibility, to enroll eligible persons into medicaid.

(7) In accordance with RCW 71.24.380, the health care authority and the department are authorized to purchase medical and behavioral health services through integrated contracts upon request of all of the county authorities in a regional service area to become an early adopter of fully integrated purchasing of medical and behavioral health services. The department may combine and transfer such amounts appropriated under sections 204, 208, and 213 of this act as may be necessary to fund early adopter contracts. The amount of medicaid funding transferred from each program may not exceed the average per capita cost assumed in this act for individuals covered by that program, actuarially adjusted for the health condition of persons enrolled, times the number of clients enrolled. The amount of non-medicaid funding transferred from sections 204 and 208 may not exceed the amount that would have been contracted with a behavioral health organization if the county authorities had not requested to become an early adopter of fully integrated purchasing. If any funding that this act provides solely for a specific purpose is transferred under this subsection, that funding must be used consistently with the provisions and conditions for which it was provided.

(8) In accordance with RCW 71.24.380, the department is authorized to purchase mental health and substance use disorder services through integrated contracts with behavioral health organizations. The department may combine and transfer such amounts appropriated under sections 204 and 208 of this act as may be necessary to finance these behavioral health organization contracts. If any funding that this act provides solely for a specific purpose is transferred under this subsection, that funding must be used consistently with the provisions and conditions for which it was provided.

(9)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2016, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year 2016 among programs after approval by the director of financial management. However, the department shall not transfer state moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 2016 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the long-term care, foster care, adoptions support, medical personal care, and child support programs, the department may transfer state moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department shall not transfer funds, and the director of financial management shall not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

(10) To facilitate the authority provided in subsection (7) and (8) of this section, and to ensure a new accounting structure is in place as of July 1, 2017, the department is authorized to create a new program for accounting purposes only that combines the mental health program and alcohol and substance abuse program allotments and expenditures.

Sec. 202. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($329,792,000))

﻿ $325,011,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($338,161,000))

﻿ $339,077,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($518,913,000))

﻿ $512,965,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,354,000

Domestic Violence Prevention Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,908,000

Child and Family Reinvestment Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$6,529,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,196,657,000))

﻿ $1,186,844,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Amounts appropriated in this section include funding for the department to establish basic foster care rates consistent with the settlement agreement in FPAWS v. Quigley.

(2) $668,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $668,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers. The center shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive, or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department shall not require case management as a condition of the contract.

(3) $253,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $253,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the costs of the eight existing hub home foster families that provide a foster care delivery model that includes a licensed hub home. Use of the hub home model is intended to support foster parent retention, improve child outcomes, and encourage the least restrictive community placements for children in out-of-home care.

(4) $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $109,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a receiving care center east of the Cascade mountains.

(5) $990,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $990,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for services provided through children's advocacy centers.

(6) $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 ((is)) and $1,351,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of performance-based contracts for family support and related services pursuant to RCW 74.13B.020.

(7) $5,865,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $2,564,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, $6,529,000 of the child and family reinvestment account—state appropriation, and $14,958,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, are provided solely to maintain family assessment response in children's administration field offices that began implementing family assessment response in the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.

(8) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a contract with a child advocacy center in Spokane to provide continuum of care services for children who have experienced abuse or neglect and their families.

(9) $668,000 of the domestic violence prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 275, Laws of 2015 (SSB 5631) (domestic violence victims).

(10) $2,996,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $3,434,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for 2017, and $844,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the children's administration to:

(a) Reduce the caseload ratios of social workers serving children in foster care to promote decreased lengths of stay and to make progress towards achievement of the Braam settlement caseload outcome;

(b) Support the closure of child protective services investigations within ninety days of intake, where appropriate; and

(c) Progress towards statewide expansion and support of the child protective services family assessment response pathway.

The children's administration must, in the manner it determines appropriate, balance expenditure of amounts provided in this subsection in a way that makes substantial investments in each of the three purposes in (a) through (c) of this subsection. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, no more than $1,600,000 may be used for the purpose of (b) of this subsection.

(11) From within amounts provided in this section, the department must develop options for extending childcare and other support services to families who have received CPS/FAR or child welfare services and have had their cases closed. The options must consider ways to prioritize funding for the use of these extended support services to reduce the possibility of the family reentering the CPS/FAR or child welfare services system. The options must also consider ways to minimize any possible liability resulting from the provision of these extended support services, and to ensure that families receiving extended services do not remain on the workload of CPS/FAR and child welfare case-carrying staff. The provision of extended services must not require ongoing monitoring of child safety by the department. The options must also consider ways to improve referral to other existing voluntary family support services after case closing, including working connections child care and other social, medical, educational, vocational, and economic services provided by the department, the department of early learning, the health care authority, the employment security department, the state board for community and technical colleges, and other community agencies. Such extended support services must not be a requirement of closing the family's CPS/FAR or child welfare services case. The department must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the possible and recommended options by October 1, 2016.

(12) $819,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 and $373,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2015 (SSB 5740) (extended foster care).

(((12))) (13) $784,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for early achievers tiered reimbursement for family home and center child care providers consistent with Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1491 (early care & education system). ((If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13))) (14) $539,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $540,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, $656,000 of the general fund private/local appropriation, and $253,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the children's administration to contract with an educational advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12 and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during the department's transition to performance-based contracts. Funding must be prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth, or regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested educational outreach services exist. The children's administration is encouraged to use private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.

(((14))) (15) The children's administration shall adopt policies to reduce the percentage of parents requiring supervised visitation, including clarification of the threshold for transition from supervised to unsupervised visitation prior to reunification. The children's administration shall submit the revised visitation policy to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015.

(((15))) (16) $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,461,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities for demonstration sites to improve the educational outcomes of students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW.

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the demonstration site established pursuant to the 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act, section 202(10), chapter 4, Laws of 2013, 2nd sp. sess.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for a second demonstration site. The children's administration, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the contracted nongovernmental entity or entities, shall select a second demonstration site that includes a school district or school districts with a significant number of dependent students. The second site must be implemented no earlier than July 1, 2016.

(c) The demonstration sites in this subsection must facilitate the educational progress and graduation of dependent youth by providing individualized education services and monitoring and supporting dependent youths' remediation needs, special education needs, and completion of education milestones. The contracts must be performance-based with a stated goal of improving the graduation rates of foster youth by two percent per year over five school year periods. The baseline for measurement for the existing site was established in the 2013-14 school year and remains applicable through the 2017-18 school year. The baseline for measurement for the site established in section 202(15)(b) must be established in the 2016-17 school year and remains applicable through the 2020-21 school year.

(d) The demonstration sites must develop and provide services aimed at improving the educational outcomes of foster youth. These services must include:

(i) Direct advocacy for foster youth to eliminate barriers to educational access and success;

(ii) Consultation with children's administration case workers to develop educational plans for and with participating youth;

(iii) Monitoring educational progress of participating youth;

(iv) Providing participating youth with school and local resources that may assist in educational access and success; and

(v) Coaching youth, caregivers, and social workers to advocate for dependent youth in the educational system.

(f) The contractor must report demonstration site outcomes to the department of social and health services and the office of the superintendent of public instruction by September 30, 2015, for the 2014-15 school year and by September 30, 2016, for the 2015-16 school year.

(g) The children's administration shall proactively refer all eligible students thirteen years or older within the demonstration site areas to the contractor for educational services.

(h) The contractor shall report to the legislature by September 30, 2015, for the 2014-15 school year and by September 30, 2016, for the 2015-16 school year on the number of eligible youth referred by the children's administration, the number of youth served, and the effectiveness of the demonstration site or sites in increasing graduation rates for dependent youth.

(((16))) (17) The children's administration, office of the superintendent of public instruction, and student achievement council shall collaborate with the office of the attorney general, other governmental agencies, advocacy organizations, and others as needed to report to the legislature by December 1, 2015, on strategies to permit supplemental education transition planning for dependent youth to be administered by the student achievement council and the demonstration sites to be administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction no later than June 30, 2016. The report shall assess the feasibility of transitioning the programs and recommend strategies to resolve data and information sharing barriers through legislative policy and professional practice.

(((17))) (18) $334,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $548,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $249,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for extended foster care services for eligible youth engaged in employment for eighty hours or more per month, pursuant to chapter 122, Laws of 2014.

(((18))) (19) The children's administration is encouraged to control exceptional reimbursement decisions so that the child's needs are met without excessive costs.

Sec. 203. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($92,849,000))

﻿ $92,242,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($90,583,000))

﻿ $90,592,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$3,464,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,985,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$196,000

Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,801,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($191,878,000))

﻿ $191,280,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.

(2) $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to implement community juvenile accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection may be used solely for community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants.

(3) $1,130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. Funding for this purpose in fiscal year 2017 is provided through a memorandum of understanding with the department of social and health services alcohol and substance abuse program. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a competitive basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.

(4) $3,123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,841,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts for the following juvenile justice programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy (institute) in its ((October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Functional family therapy, multi-systemic therapy, aggression replacement training and interagency coordination programs, or other programs with a positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's)) report((.)): "Inventory of Evidence-based, Research-based, and Promising Practices for Prevention and Intervention Services for Children and Juveniles in the Child Welfare, Juvenile Justice, and Mental Health Systems." Additional funding for this purpose in fiscal year 2017 is provided through a memorandum of understanding with the department of social and health services alcohol and substance abuse program. County juvenile courts shall apply to the juvenile rehabilitation administration for funding for program-specific participation and the administration shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.

(5) $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for expansion of the following treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation administration programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy in its ((October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Multidimensional treatment foster care, family integrated transitions, and aggression replacement training, or other programs with a positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's)) report((.)): "Inventory of Evidence-based, Research-based, and Promising Practices for Prevention and Intervention Services for Children and Juveniles in the Child Welfare, Juvenile Justice, and Mental Health Systems." The administration may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective manner.

(6)(a) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall administer a block grant((, rather than categorical funding, of consolidated juvenile service funds, community juvenile accountability act grants, the chemical dependency disposition alternative funds, the mental health disposition alternative, and the sentencing disposition alternative)) to county juvenile courts for the purpose of serving youth adjudicated in the county juvenile justice system. ((In making the block grant,)) Funds dedicated to the block grant include: Consolidated juvenile service (CJS) funds, community juvenile accountability act (CJAA) grants, chemical dependency disposition alternative (CDDA), mental health disposition alternative (MHDA), and suspended disposition alternative (SDA). The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall follow the following formula and will prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (i) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years old; (ii) fifteen percent for moderate and high-risk youth; (iii) twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (iv) seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (v) three percent for the chemical dependency disposition alternative; and (vi) two percent for the mental health and sentencing dispositional alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition alternative (SSODA) shall not be included in the block grant, but allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when approved by the juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee, based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.

(b) The juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight committee with equal representation from the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current available information. The committee will be cochaired by the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts, who will also have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to achieve its purpose. Initial members will include one juvenile court representative from the finance committee, the community juvenile accountability act committee, the risk assessment quality assurance committee, the executive board of the Washington association of juvenile court administrators, the Washington state center for court research, and a representative of the superior court judges association; two representatives from the juvenile rehabilitation administration headquarters program oversight staff, two representatives of the juvenile rehabilitation administration regional office staff, one representative of the juvenile rehabilitation administration fiscal staff and a juvenile rehabilitation administration division director. The committee may make changes to the formula categories other than the evidence-based program and disposition alternative categories if it is determined the changes will increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost benefit savings to the state. Long-term cost benefit must be considered. Percentage changes may occur in the evidence-based program or disposition alternative categories of the formula should it be determined the changes will increase evidence-based program or disposition alternative delivery and increase the cost benefit to the state. These outcomes will also be considered in determining when evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left separate.

(c) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts shall be responsible for collecting and distributing information and providing access to the data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the Washington state institute for public policy related to program and outcome data. The juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts will work collaboratively to develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and disposition alternatives.

(7) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts shall collect and distribute information related to program outcome and provide access to these data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation administration and Washington state institute for public policy. The agreements between administrative office of the courts, the juvenile courts, and the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall be executed to ensure that the juvenile rehabilitation administration receives the data that the juvenile rehabilitation administration identifies as needed to comply with this subsection. This includes, but is not limited to, information by program at the statewide aggregate level, individual court level, and individual client level for the purpose of the juvenile rehabilitation administration providing quality assurance and oversight for the locally committed youth block grant and associated funds and at times as specified by the juvenile rehabilitation administration as necessary to carry out these functions. The data shall be provided in a manner that reflects the collaborative work the juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile courts have developed regarding program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and disposition alternatives.

(8) $445,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $445,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild project.

(9) $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the juvenile detention alternatives initiative.

(10) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a grant program focused on criminal street gang prevention and intervention. The juvenile rehabilitation administration may award grants under this subsection. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall give priority to applicants who have demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal street gangs. Applicants composed of, at a minimum, one or more local governmental entities and one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations that have a documented history of creating and administering effective criminal street gang prevention and intervention programs may apply for funding under this subsection. Each entity receiving funds must report to the juvenile rehabilitation administration on the number and types of youth served, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.

(11) The juvenile rehabilitation institutions may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

Sec. 204. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($339,344,000))

﻿ $325,240,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($353,115,000))

﻿ $309,246,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($962,163,000))

﻿ $992,034,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$17,864,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2016). . . .$2,778,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2017). . . .$3,684,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,678,948,000))

﻿ $1,650,846,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) For the purposes of this subsection, the term "regional support networks," includes, effective April 1, 2016, behavioral health organizations which assume the duties of regional support networks pursuant to chapter 225, Laws of 2014 (2SSB 6312).

(b) (($16,631,000)) $11,631,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $13,761,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $17,918,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to reimburse regional support networks for increased utilization costs, as compared to utilization costs in fiscal year 2014, that are incurred in order to meet statutory obligations to provide individualized mental health treatment in appropriate settings to individuals who are detained or committed under the involuntary treatment act. Prior to distributing funds to a regional support network requesting reimbursement for costs relative to increased utilization, the department must receive adequate documentation of such increased utilization and costs. Regional support networks receiving funds for community hospitals or evaluation and treatment center beds under (p) of this subsection are only eligible for reimbursement that exceeds the total of their utilization costs in fiscal year 2014 and the costs of services provided with additional funds received under (p) of this subsection.

(c) $2,452,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $2,264,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $2,653,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 258, Laws of 2015 (E2SSB 5269) (involuntary treatment act). Regional support networks must use these amounts for involuntary treatment costs associated with implementation of this bill.

(d) $3,776,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $5,780,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $6,054,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 250, Laws of 2015 (E2SHB 1450) (involuntary outpatient treatment). Regional support networks must use these amounts for increases in community mental health treatment associated with implementation of this bill.

(e) $81,180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $81,180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for persons and services not covered by the medicaid program. To the extent possible, levels of regional support network spending shall be maintained in the following priority order: Crisis and commitment services; community inpatient services; and residential care services, including personal care and emergency housing assistance. These amounts includes a reduction of $4,715,000 for fiscal year 2016 and $4,715,000 for fiscal year 2017 associated with a funding shift that allows for increased federal participation for community inpatient stays that were previously ineligible for federal matching funds. This reduction will be distributed to regional support networks based on the same proportions that were added to regional support network capitation ranges specific to the waiver that allowed for federal funds to be used for community inpatient stays that were previously ineligible for federal matching funds. The department must allow regional support networks to use medicaid capitation payments to provide services to medicaid enrollees that are in addition to those covered under the state plan in accordance with the conditions established under federal regulations governing medicaid managed care contracts and subject to federal approval by the center for medicaid and medicare services.

(f) $6,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $6,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $7,620,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department and regional support networks to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided to regional support networks with PACT teams, the department shall consider the differences between regional support networks in the percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that are not reimbursable under medicaid. The department may allow regional support networks which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under section 204(1)(e) of this act. The department and regional support networks shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this section.

(g) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support networks at western state hospital shall be ((587)) 557 per day.

(h) From the general fund—state appropriations in this subsection, the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional support networks reimburse the aging and disability services administration for the general fund—state cost of medicaid personal care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(i) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly, rather than through contracts with regional support networks, for children's long-term inpatient facility services.

(j) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to continue performance-based incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support services for individuals with severe mental illness who were discharged from the state hospitals as part of the expanding community services initiative. These funds will be used to enhance community residential and support services provided by regional support networks through other state and federal funding.

(k) (($1,125,000)) $1,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and (($1,125,000)) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Spokane regional support network to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at eastern state hospital. Such services shall include:

(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;

(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient care or jail services;

(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating those individuals; and

(iv) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.

At least annually, the Spokane regional support network shall assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.

(l) $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane counties for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(m) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Chelan-Douglas behavioral health organization to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at eastern state hospital attributed to Grant county.

(n) Regional support networks may use local funds to earn additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients. Additionally, regional support networks may use a portion of the state funds allocated in accordance with (e) of this subsection to earn additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for medicaid.

(((n))) (o) $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for mental health services for mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon release from confinement.

(((o))) (p) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for the department to develop and phase in intensive mental health services for high needs youth consistent with the settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter.

(((p))) (q) $11,405,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $11,405,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $17,680,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for enhancement of community mental health services. The department must contract these funds for the operation of community programs in which the department determines there is a need for capacity that allows individuals to be diverted or transitioned from the state hospitals including but not limited to: (i) Community hospital or free standing evaluation and treatment services providing short-term detention and commitment services under the involuntary treatment act to be located in the geographic areas of the King regional support network, the Spokane regional support network outside of Spokane county, and the Thurston Mason regional support network; (ii) one new full program of an assertive community treatment team in the King regional support network and two new half programs of assertive community treatment teams in the Spokane regional support network and the Pierce regional support network; and (iii) three new recovery support services programs in the Grays Harbor regional support network, the greater Columbia regional support network, and the north sound regional support network. In contracting for community evaluation and treatment services, the department may not use these resources in facilities that meet the criteria to be classified under federal law as institutions for mental diseases. If the department is unable to come to a contract agreement with a designated regional support network for any of the services identified above, it may consider contracting for that service in another regional support network that has the need for such service.

(((q))) (r) The appropriations in this section include a reduction of $16,462,000 in general fund—state and $16,468,000 of general fund—federal expenditure authority. This reduction must be achieved by reducing regional support network medicaid rates for disabled adults, nondisabled adults, disabled children, and nondisabled children. No regional support network rate may be lowered below the low end of the rate range that is certified as actuarially sound. The department must work to develop updated minimum and maximum reserve levels that reflect the changes in the number of medicaid eligible individuals since reserve levels were originally set as well as the integration of substance use disorder services into managed care contracts funded within the amounts appropriated in this section. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015, that includes the revised minimum and maximum reserve levels for medicaid and nonmedicaid behavioral health organization contracts.

(((r) $1,394,000)) (s) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $1,394,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $2,020,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 7, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (2E2SSB 5177) (timeliness of competency evaluation and restoration services). Regional support networks must use the amounts for outpatient mental health treatment costs associated with implementation of the bill.

(t) $14,085,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $14,085,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for regional support networks to apply for through an application process overseen by and determined by the department. The process must fund both rural and urban projects. Regional support networks must apply for this funding for the development of specifically identified intensive community programs that allow individuals to be diverted or transitioned from the state hospitals and include in their applications specific measures for identifying the impact on their region.

(u) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 and $762,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for four housing support and step down services teams.

(v) The department shall reduce funding otherwise payable to regional support networks by $25,587,724 of the general fund—state in fiscal year 2017 from the nonmedicaid contracts and $18,023,697 of the general fund—state in fiscal year 2017 and $32,168,000 of the general fund—federal from the medicaid contracts. Each regional support network's reduction in funding shall be determined based on reserve and fund balances over contractual required amounts to include fifty percent of all funding marked as encumbered. Nothing in this process shall be considered a reduction to the rate structure as set through the actuarial process and approved by the centers on medicare and medicaid services and only serves to recoup funds previously paid and not spent through contract. As used in this subsection, "reserves" does not include capital project reserves established in accordance with state accounting and reporting standards before January 1, 2002. Appropriations in this section reflect these reductions.

(w) $1,700,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for a pilot project to put peer bridging staff into each regional support network as part of the state psychiatric liaison teams to promote continuity of service as individuals return to their communities. The department must collect and make available data on the impact of peer staff on state hospital discharges and community placements.

(x) The department shall require within its contracts with regional support networks that individuals within the state hospitals from their catchment area must be discharged within twenty-one days of being determined ready for discharge by the state hospital staff. On a quarterly basis, the department shall determine whether each regional support network is in compliance with this requirement. If a regional support network is determined to not be in compliance, the department shall require a corrective action plan as described in the contract, and if after the corrective action period the regional support network is still out of compliance, the department shall take remedial actions under the contract. The department shall also establish an exception process for certain individuals that are not discharged within twenty-one days. The department must exclude from the compliance calculations any individual determined to be an exception.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($170,364,000))

﻿ $175,537,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($181,757,000))

﻿ $204,020,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($162,866,000))

﻿ $165,516,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($56,669,000))

﻿ $49,742,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($571,656,000))

﻿ $594,815,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(b) $231,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $231,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a community partnership between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (2)(b) are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time community service officer at the city of Lakewood.

(c) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for payment to the city of Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state hospital and adjacent areas.

(d) $9,571,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $17,287,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency restoration services pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (SSB 5889) (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services). This funding must be used to increase the number of forensic beds at western state hospital to three hundred thirty and the number of forensic beds at eastern state hospital to one hundred twenty-five by June 30, 2017. Pursuant to chapter 7, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (2E2SSB 5177) (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services), the department may contract some of these amounts for services at alternative locations if the secretary determines that there is a need.

(e) $2,349,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,318,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency evaluation services for individuals who are in local jails pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (SSB 5889) (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services). This funding must be used solely to increase the number of staff providing competency evaluation services.

(f) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the department to hire an on-site safety compliance officer, stationed at western state hospital, to provide oversight and accountability of the hospital's response to safety concerns regarding the hospital's work environment.

(g) The department shall improve western state hospital patient and employee safety by opening an existing and funded civil ward by July 1, 2016, and another new civil ward by October 1, 2016, in order to implement Senate Bill No. 6656 (state hospital reform) and reduce the patients per ward while not decreasing the overall western state hospital capacity for civilly committed patients.

(h) For fiscal year 2017, the department shall hire two staff for western state hospital dedicated to discharge planning and coordination efforts between other parts of the department and with the regional support networks to more efficiently and properly discharge patients determined ready to go back to their communities.

(i) $791,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $1,357,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $188,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the unilateral implementation of targeted job classification compensation increases as set forth in section 903 of this act, effective December 1, 2015, at eastern and western state hospitals. The legislature recognizes that the compensation increases were necessitated by an emergency and an imminent jeopardy determination by the centers for medicare and medicaid services that relates to the safety and health of clients and employees.

(j) $611,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $2,264,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $250,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of a memorandum of understanding between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 1199nw amending the collective bargaining agreement under chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium as set forth in section 902 of this act, effective December 1, 2015, at eastern and western state hospitals and the child study treatment center. The legislature recognizes that the memorandum of understanding was necessitated by an emergency and an imminent jeopardy determination by the center for medicare and medicaid services that relates to the safety and health of clients and employees.

(k)(i) The governor's request to the legislature for funds to implement a memorandum of understanding reached between the governor and the union of physicians of Washington amending the coalition of unions collective bargaining agreement under chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium is rejected as a whole.

(ii) If a memorandum of understanding or agreement between the governor and the union of physicians of Washington can be reached by June 30, 2016, to fill current and future vacancies of psychiatrists with psychiatric nurse practitioners at western state hospital and eastern state hospital to achieve savings of $1,500,000, $964,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $1,611,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $352,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of a new memorandum of understanding to be reached between the governor and the union of physicians of Washington subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(A) The new memorandum of understanding is limited to the compensation and fringe benefits of extra duty pay, assignment pay, and continuing medical education.

(B) Extra duty pay for psychiatrists at western state hospital or eastern state hospital does not exceed 1.25 times the rate of pay and expires June 9, 2016.

(C) Assignment pay for psychiatrists and internists does not exceed ten percent and expires on June 30, 2017.

(D) Continuing medical education reimbursement does not exceed up to $5,000 for psychiatrists and does not exceed up to $3,000 for internists and each expires on June 30, 2017.

(iii) If a new memorandum of understanding or agreement that can be implemented within the funds provided in (ii) of this subsection (2)(k) and meets the conditions and limitations in (ii) of this subsection (2)(k) is reached between the governor and the union of physicians of Washington by June 30, 2016, funding for the memorandum of understanding or agreement shall be considered approved pursuant to RCW 41.80.010 and the parties shall execute the memorandum of understanding or agreement retroactive to December 1, 2015. The legislature recognizes that the new memorandum of understanding is necessitated by an emergency and an imminent jeopardy determination by the center for medicare and medicaid services that relates to the safety and health of clients and employees.

(iv) This section should not be implemented to allow psychiatric nurse practitioners to engage in activities or perform works and tasks that exceed their scope of practice.

(v) If a new memorandum of understanding or agreement that meets the conditions and limitations of this section is not reached by June 30, 2016, the amounts provided in (ii) of this subsection (2)(k) shall lapse.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$477,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$490,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($6,291,000))

﻿ $7,391,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($7,258,000))

﻿ $8,358,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $178,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence-based practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and implementation of evidence-based or promising practices. The institute must work with the department to develop a plan to seek private, federal, or other grant funding in order to reduce the need for state general funds.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($9,033,000))

﻿ $9,779,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($8,767,000))

﻿ $8,865,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($11,472,000))

﻿ $12,025,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$502,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($29,774,000))

﻿ $31,171,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) In accordance with RCW 43.20B.110, 43.135.055, and 71.24.035, the department is authorized to adopt license and certification fees in fiscal years 2016 and 2017 to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(b) In developing the new medicaid managed care rates under which the public mental health managed care system will operate, the department must seek to estimate the reasonable and necessary cost of efficiently and effectively providing a comparable set of medically necessary mental health benefits to persons of different acuity levels regardless of where in the state they live. The department must report to the office of financial management and to the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on its proposed new mental health managed care rate-setting approach by August 1, 2015, and again at least sixty days prior to implementation of new capitation rates.

(c) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for the department to continue to develop the child adolescent needs and strengths assessment tool and build workforce capacity to provide evidence based wraparound services for children, consistent with the settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter.

(d) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection, funding is provided for the department of social and health services to contract with an academic or independent consultant to conduct a workload study in accordance with the following:

(i) The study must examine the use of psychiatrists at the state psychiatric hospitals, the extent to which psychiatrics are deployed to practice at the top of their licensure, and the extent to which activities currently performed by psychiatrists could be appropriately supplemented or replaced by other professionals, including but not limited to psychiatric advanced registered nurse professionals, while providing quality services and meeting appropriate national and state accreditation standards.

(ii) The study must examine the applicability of alternative clinical care models, including the use of interdisciplinary health care teams comprising clinical and nonclinical staff to provide comprehensive psychiatric treatment and management for state psychiatric hospital patients.

(iii) The study must collect information from psychiatrists to identify factors other than compensation that are negatively impacting job retention and identify recommendations for addressing these issues.

(iv) The study must examine discharge procedures at western state hospital and eastern state hospital and examine how they are different and how these practices compare with recommended best practices or national standards of practice, especially in relation to the safety of patients and the public, good health and welfare outcomes, and the efficient use of resources. Specific obstacles must be identified and recommendations provided, including the value of standardization and optimal staffing practices.

(v) The consultant shall report to the department, the office of financial management, and the relevant legislative policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on the consultant's findings and recommendations by November 1, 2016.

Sec. 205. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($507,106,000))

﻿ $515,831,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($551,660,000))

﻿ $574,491,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($1,067,621,000))

﻿ $1,097,563,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$534,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,126,921,000))

﻿ $2,188,419,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(i) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes shall be $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2016 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2017. A processing fee of $2,750 shall be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable.

(ii) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities shall be $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2016 and $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2017.

(iii) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities shall be $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2016 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2017.

(c) $8,571,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $18,181,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $33,427,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

(d) The department shall reimburse with the exceptional care rate adult family homes that provided care solely to clients with HIV/AIDS on or before January 1, 2000, and continue to provide care solely to clients with HIV/AIDS. The department shall not reduce the exceptional care rate from the rate paid on October 1, 2013.

(e) $774,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $1,547,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $7,185,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a payment system that satisfies medicaid requirements regarding time reporting for W-2 providers. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(f) $1,184,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $2,483,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $4,638,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity impacts of the agreement between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw.

(g) The department is authorized to establish limited exemption criteria in rule to address RCW 74.39A.325 when a landline phone is not available to the employee.

(h) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(i) The department of social and health services shall increase the benchmark rates for community residential service businesses providing supported living, group home, and licensed staff residential services for people with developmental disabilities by sixty cents starting July 1, 2015, and by an additional sixty cents starting July 1, 2016.

(j) The department of social and health services shall standardize the administrative rate for community residential service businesses providing supported living, group home, and licensed staff residential services for people with developmental disabilities starting July 1, 2015.

(k) Community residential cost reports that are submitted by or on behalf of contracted agency providers are required to include information about agency staffing including health insurance, wages, number of positions, and turnover.

(l) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the developmental disabilities administration must prepare a report that describes options for modifying the current system of pre-vocational services for individuals with developmental disabilities. The developmental disabilities administration must not transition clients receiving pre-vocational services into integrated settings until the conclusion of the 2016 legislative session, unless there is a group supported employment, individual employment, or community access opportunity that is supported by the client and his or her legal representative. If a client transitions out of a congregate setting prior to December 1, 2016, then for each client, during the period before and after leaving the congregate setting, the report must describe the hours of service, hours worked, hourly wage, monthly earnings, authorized waiver services, and per capita expenditures. The report must be submitted to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature by January 1, 2016. At a minimum, the report must describe the following options:

(i) Modify the current system to ensure compliance with rules established by the centers for medicare and medicaid services;

(ii) Continue the current system without federal matching funds; and

(iii) Transition clients out of congregate settings and into integrated settings. Under this option, the report must describe an anticipated phase-out schedule and medicaid waiver services that could be authorized to mitigate the impact for transitioning clients.

(m) The department shall establish new rules and standards to ensure that adult family homes are monitored and licensed to meet the needs of young adults with a developmental disability. These adult family homes may require a package of services including specialized care assessment and planning, personal care, specialized environmental features, and accommodations.

(n) $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $800,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the development and implementation of eight enhanced respite beds across the state for children. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving, the opportunity for behavioral stabilization of the child, and the ability to partner with the state in the development of an individualized service plan that allows the child to remain in his or her family home. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report by January 2, 2016, and each year thereafter that provides information about the number of children who have used enhanced respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.

(o) $550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $700,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the development and implementation of eight community respite beds across the state for adults. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving and the opportunity for stabilization of the individual in a community-based setting as an alternative to using a residential habilitation center to provide planned or emergent respite. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report by January 2, 2016, and each year thereafter that provides information about the number of individuals who have used community respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.

(p) $1,303,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 and $869,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6564 (providing protections for persons with developmental disabilities). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($95,196,000))

﻿ $94,973,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($97,134,000))

﻿ $98,343,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($180,106,000))

﻿ $180,600,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$23,041,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($395,477,000))

﻿ $396,957,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) $721,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $721,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are for the department to fulfill its contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to provide transportation, building space, and other support services as are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of students living in residential habilitation centers.

(c) $558,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $558,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $1,074,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are for specialized services required by the centers for medicare and medicaid services as a result of preadmission screening and resident review assessments.

(d) $2,978,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $2,978,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $5,956,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are for additional staff to ensure compliance with centers for medicare and medicaid services requirements for habilitation, nursing care, staff safety, and client safety at the residential habilitation centers.

(e) The residential habilitation centers may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(f) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for respite services in an existing eight-bed cottage at Yakima valley school for individuals who are developmentally disabled and in need of crisis stabilization support.

(g) $824,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5243 (concerning services provided by residential habilitation centers). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($3,031,000))

﻿ $2,604,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($2,824,000))

﻿ $2,423,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($3,462,000))

﻿ $3,165,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($9,317,000))

﻿ $8,192,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($1,403,000))

﻿ $92,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($1,403,000))

﻿ $55,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($1,206,000))

﻿ $1,103,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,012,000))

﻿ $1,250,000

Sec. 206. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($923,349,000))

﻿ $911,216,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($1,005,649,000))

﻿ $1,026,811,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($2,376,289,000))

﻿ $2,384,002,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$33,990,000

Assisted Living Facility Temporary Management Account—Federal

Appropriation. . . .$500,000

Traumatic Brain Injury Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($3,396,000))

﻿ $3,968,000

Adult Family Home Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$500,000

Skilled Nursing Facility Safety Net Trust Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$133,360,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,476,033,000))

﻿ $4,494,347,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $178.87 for fiscal year 2016 and shall not exceed (($191.87)) $197.33 for fiscal year 2017, including the rate add-ons described in (a), (b), and (g) of this subsection. There will be no adjustments for economic trends and conditions in fiscal years 2016 and 2017. The economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to the component rate allocations established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW. When no economic trends and conditions factor for either fiscal year is defined in a biennial appropriations act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or compounded to the component rate allocations established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW.

(a) For fiscal year 2016 within the funds provided, the department shall continue to provide an add-on per medicaid resident day per facility not to exceed $1.57. The add-on shall be used to increase wages, benefits, and/or staffing levels for certified nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or benefits for dietary aides, housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other category of worker whose statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was less than $15 in calendar year 2008, according to cost report data. The add-on may also be used to address resulting wage compression for related job classes immediately affected by wage increases to low-wage workers. For fiscal year 2016 within funds provided, the department shall provide an additional add-on per medicaid resident day per facility not to exceed the industry weighted average rate of $2.44. The add-on shall be used to increase wages, benefits, and/or staffing levels for certified nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or benefits for dietary aides, housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other category of worker whose statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was less than $17 in calendar year 2012, according to cost report data. The department shall continue reporting requirements and a settlement process to ensure that the funds are spent according to this subsection.

(b) The department shall do a comparative analysis of the facility-based payment rates calculated on July 1, 2015, using the payment methodology defined in chapter 74.46 RCW and as funded in the omnibus appropriations act, excluding the low wage worker add-on found in (a) of this subsection, the rate add-ons for direct care, support services, and therapy care found in (g) of this subsection, the comparative add-on, acuity add-on, and safety net reimbursement, to the facility-based payment rates in effect June 30, 2010. For fiscal year 2016, if the facility-based payment rate calculated on July 1, 2015, is smaller than the facility-based payment rate on June 30, 2010, then the difference shall be provided to the individual nursing facilities as an add-on payment per medicaid resident day.

(c) During the comparative analysis performed in subsection (b) of this section, for fiscal year 2016, if it is found that the direct care rate for any facility calculated using the payment methodology defined in chapter 74.46 RCW and as funded in the omnibus appropriations act, excluding the low wage worker add-on found in (a) of this subsection, the rate add-ons for direct care, support services, and therapy care found in (g) of this subsection, the comparative add-on, acuity add-on, and safety net reimbursement, is greater than the direct care rate in effect on June 30, 2010, then the facility shall receive a ten percent direct care rate add-on to compensate that facility for taking on more acute clients than they have in the past.

(d) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.

(e) The rate add-on provided in (c) of this subsection is subject to the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW 74.46.022(6).

(f) If the waiver requested from the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services in relation to the safety net assessment is for any reason disapproved, (b), (c), (d), (g), and the fiscal year 2016 additional add-on in (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(g) For fiscal year 2016, the department shall provide the following rate add-ons per medicaid resident day:

(i) A direct care rate add-on of $3.63 per medicaid resident day;

(ii) A support services rate add-on of $1.12 per medicaid resident day; and

(iii) A therapy care rate add-on of $0.05 per patient day.

This subsection (1)(g) is subject to the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW 74.46.022(6).

(h) Beginning July 1, 2016, a nursing home provider's direct care rate shall be limited so that it does not exceed one hundred and eighteen percent of its base year's direct care allowable cost except if that provider is below the minimum staffing as set in RCW 74.42.360(2).

(2) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall issue no additional certificates of capital authorization for fiscal year 2016 and no new certificates of capital authorization for fiscal year 2017 and shall grant no rate add-ons to payment rates for capital improvements not requiring a certificate of need and a certificate of capital authorization for fiscal years 2016 and 2017.

(3) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(a) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes shall be $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2016 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2017. A processing fee of $2,750 shall be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable.

(b) $193,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely to the department to implement a new processing fee of $700 when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.

(c) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities shall be $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2016 and $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2017.

(((c))) (d) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities shall be $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2016 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2017.

(4) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients residing in nursing homes and paid for with state only funds into less restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the client's care needs.

(5) $19,747,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $41,807,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $76,770,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

(6) $1,840,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,877,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer services program. Funding shall be prioritized towards serving populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include senior citizens and persons with disabilities.

(7) $2,447,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $4,894,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $22,725,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a payment system that satisfies medicaid requirements regarding time reporting for W-2 providers. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(8) The department is authorized to establish limited exemption criteria in rule to address RCW 74.39A.325 when a landline phone is not available to the employee.

(9) $7,552,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $15,974,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $29,742,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity impacts of the agreement between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw.

(10) Within the amounts appropriated in this section of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal years 2016 and 2017, the department shall assist the legislature to continue the work of the joint legislative executive committee on planning for aging and disability issues that is established by this subsection.

(a) A joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability is continued, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) Four members of the senate, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members. Four members of the house of representatives, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members;

(ii) A member from the office of the governor, appointed by the governor;

(iii) The secretary of the department of social and health services or his or her designee;

(iv) The director of the health care authority or his or her designee;

(v) A member from disability rights Washington and a member from the long-term care ombuds;

(vi) The insurance commissioner or his or her designee, who shall serve as an ex officio member; and

(vii) Other agency directors or designees as necessary.

(b) The committee must make recommendations and continue to identify key strategic actions to prepare for the aging of the population in Washington, including state budget and policy options, by conducting at least, but not limited to, the following tasks:

(i) Identify strategies to better serve the health care needs of an aging population and people with disabilities to promote healthy living and palliative care planning;

(ii) Identify policy options to create financing mechanisms for long-term service and supports that allow individuals and families to meet their needs for service;

(iii) Identify policies to promote financial security in retirement, support people who wish to stay in the workplace longer, and expand the availability of workplace retirement savings plans;

(iv) Identify implementation strategies for the Bree collaborative palliative care and related guidelines;

(v) Review the regulation of continuing care retirement communities and ways to protect those who reside in them, including the consideration of effective disclosures to residents;

(vi) Identify the needs of older people and people with disabilities for high quality public and private guardianship services and information about assisted decision-making options;

(vii) Identify options for promoting client safety through residential care services and consider methods of protecting older people and people with disabilities from physical abuse and financial exploitation; and

(viii) Identify other policy options and recommendations to help communities adapt to the aging demographic in planning for housing, land use, and transportation.

(c) Staff support for the committee shall be provided by the office of program research, senate committee services, the office of financial management, and the department of social and health services.

(d) Within existing appropriations, the cost of meetings must be paid jointly by the senate, house of representatives, and the office of financial management. Joint committee expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees. The joint committee members may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter 44.04 RCW as appropriate. Advisory committee members may not receive compensation or reimbursement for travel and expenses.

(e) At least one committee meeting must be devoted to a discussion of strategies to improve the quality of care, client safety and well-being, and staff safety within all community and institutional settings. During the meeting, committee members must receive a comprehensive review of findings since fiscal year 2010 by the centers for medicare and medicaid services, and residential care services, in community settings, nursing homes, and each of the residential habilitation centers, with an emphasis on medical errors, inconsistencies between service plans and services provided, the use of restraints, and existence of hazardous environmental conditions.

(f) The committee shall issue an addendum report to the legislature by December 10, 2015, and issue final recommendations to the governor and relevant standing committees of the legislature by December 10, 2016. The addendum report to the legislature must include the following:

(i) A description of the oversight role for residential care services, the long-term care ombuds, the centers for medicare and medicaid services, and disability rights Washington;

(ii) From the provider perspective, and the perspective of a state agency, an overview of the process for reviewing and responding to findings by residential care services and the centers for medicare and medicaid services;

(iii) A description of the process for notifying the office of the governor and the legislature when problems with quality of care, client safety and well-being, or staff safety arise within community or institutional settings;

(iv) A compilation of findings since fiscal year 2010 by the centers for medicare and medicaid services, and residential care services, at the residential habilitation centers, nursing facilities, supported living, assisted living, group homes, companion homes, adult family homes, and all other community based providers;

(v) An annotated and detailed list of all responses to findings by the centers for medicare and medicaid services, and residential care services, specific to audits of the nursing facility at lakeland village since fiscal year 2010;

(vi) Review the regulation of continuing care retirement communities and ways to protect those who reside in them, including the consideration of effective disclosures to residents;

(vii) Identify the needs of older people and people with disabilities for high quality public and private guardianship services and information about assisted decision-making options;

(viii) Identify options for promoting client safety through residential care services and consider methods of protecting older people and people with disabilities from physical abuse and financial exploitation; and

(ix) A description of the method in place to ascertain the outcome of responses to findings.

(11) $5,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $5,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for services and support to individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind.

(12) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(13) The department shall reimburse with the exceptional care rate adult family homes that provided care solely to clients with HIV/AIDS on or before January 1, 2000, and continue to provide care solely to clients with HIV/AIDS. The department shall not reduce the exceptional care rate from the rate paid on October 1, 2013.

(14)(a) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $100,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation, and $200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department of social and health services to contract for an independent feasibility study and actuarial modeling of public and private options for leveraging private resources to help individuals prepare for long-term services and supports needs. The study must model two options: (i) A public long-term care benefit for workers, funded through a payroll deduction that would provide a time-limited long-term care insurance benefit; and (ii) a public-private reinsurance or risk-sharing model, with the purpose of providing a stable and ongoing source of reimbursement to insurers for a portion of their catastrophic long-term services and supports losses in order to provide additional insurance capacity for the state.

(b) The report must include input from the joint committee on aging and disability and other interested stakeholders. The report must also include an analysis of each option based on: (i) The expected costs and benefits for participants; (ii) the total anticipated number of participants; (iii) the projected savings to the state medicaid program, if any; and (iv) legal and financial risks to the state.

(c) The department must provide status updates to the joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability. The feasibility study and actuarial analysis shall be completed and submitted to the department of social and health services by December 20, 2016. The department shall submit a report, including the director's findings and recommendations based on the feasibility study and actuarial analysis, to the governor and the legislature by January 1, 2017.

(15) $6,195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $13,195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $20,288,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1274 (nursing home payment rates). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amounts in this subsection shall lapse.

(16) Within available funds, the aging and long term support administration must create a unit within adult protective services that specializes in the investigation of financial abuse allegations and self-neglect allegations.

(17) $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $114,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5877 (due process for adult family homes).

(18) $1,586,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 and $1,586,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6656 (state hospital reform). The department shall contract with a nursing home facility with an enhanced staffing model able to care for patients discharged from western state hospital. The department must identify and must discharge at least thirty patients from a geriatric ward at western state hospital to alternative settings by January 1, 2017, by utilizing qualified long-term service and support settings. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $3,095,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 and $3,095,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided within existing appropriations solely to exempt the five highest acuity resource utilization group categories (beginning with PC2 through PE2) from the adjustment to case mix index per RCW 74.46.485. Nursing homes shall be required to notify the department's identified home and community services division contact within 30 days of a medicaid resident being identified in one of the five lowest resource utilization group categories (beginning with PA1 through PC1). The department shall complete an assessment of those residents who desire to transition into a community setting. The department shall identify within 30 days whether an alternate setting of the client's choosing is available to meet the resident's needs. Nursing homes shall work collaboratively with the department to transition into the community at least ninety-six residents, assessed in the five lowest acuity resource utilization group categories (PA1 through PC1). For the first two quarters of fiscal year 2017, the downward adjustment shall be no greater than thirteen percent. If, after the first two quarters of fiscal year 2017, the department determines the nursing homes are not making sufficient progress towards moving ninety-six residents from the five lowest resource utilization group categories (PA1 through PC1) into the community, the department is authorized to increase the downward adjustment to no greater than twenty percent for the lowest four resource utilization group categories (PA1 through PB2).

(20) The department shall provide the legislature an analysis of expenditures for medicaid clients served in adult family homes and assisted living facilities by acuity level. The analysis shall include all services provided to medicaid clients in each care setting, including all services covered by the daily rate, and services provided in addition to the daily rate. The department shall submit the report to the legislature by November 15, 2016.

Sec. 207. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($408,958,000))

﻿ $401,046,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($445,239,000))

﻿ $407,891,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($1,272,294,000))

﻿ $1,301,320,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,950,000

Administrative Contingency Account—State Appropriation. . . .$17,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,128,441,000))

﻿ $2,129,207,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) (($168,201,000)) $162,482,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, (($194,020,000)) $163,463,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, ((and $738,086,000)) $769,626,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and the administrative contingency account—state appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. The department must create a WorkFirst budget structure that allows for transparent tracking of budget units and subunits of expenditures where these units and subunits are mutually exclusive from other department budget units. The budget structure must include budget units for the following: Cash assistance, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the program. Beginning July 1, 2016, the budget structure must provide separate budget units for cash and noncash assistance, as defined by the social security act, Title IV, for two-parent families eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. Within these budget units, the department must develop program index codes for specific activities and develop allotments and track expenditures using these codes. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature prior to adopting the new structure and no later than December 2015.

(b) (($316,849,000)) $316,460,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for assistance to clients, including grants, diversion cash assistance, and additional diversion emergency assistance including but not limited to assistance authorized under RCW 74.08A.210. The department may use state funds to provide support to working families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families but otherwise not receiving cash assistance.

(c) (($170,923,000)) $163,200,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection including all of the administrative contingency account—state appropriation are provided solely for WorkFirst job search, education and training activities, barrier removal services, limited English proficiency services, and tribal assistance under RCW 74.08A.040. The department must allocate this funding based on client outcomes and cost effectiveness measures.

(d) (($426,750,000)) $468,981,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.215.135. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(d), $22,040,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for implementation of Second Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1491 (early care and education system). The amounts provided in this subsection (d) are provided conditioned on the department of social and health services and the department of early learning taking additional actions to identify and reduce the backlog of overpayment cases related to public assistance programs, including the working connections child care program. The departments shall collaborate and create a plan to triage overpayment cases in a manner that identifies and prioritizes cases with large overpayments and likelihood of fraudulent activity. The departments shall provide a quarterly report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature detailing the specific actions taken as a result of this subsection (d).

(e) (($163,558,000)) $156,428,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for WorkFirst and working connections child care administration and overhead. Of amounts provided in this subsection (1)(g), $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for implementation of Second Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1491 (early care and education system).

(f) (($41,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $22,040,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1491 (early care and education system). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(f) shall lapse)) $7,500,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for WorkFirst and working connections child care administration and overhead, provided the department implements allowable policy and procedure changes designed to achieve the federally required TANF participation rate for two-parent families from within appropriated funds. The department may reallocate appropriations provided solely for purposes in (b) and (c) of this subsection if allowable policy and procedure changes require the reallocation. The department must not implement policy and procedure changes that will exceed current appropriations in this subsection (1). The amount provided in (f) of this subsection is the estimated amount of under-expenditure in (e) of this subsection based on carrying forward actual average FTE expenditures for October through December of 2015 throughout the remaining months of the fiscal biennium and is therefore available for use in achieving the TANF two-parent participation rate.

(g) The amounts in (b) through (((d))) (e) of this subsection shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified. However, the department may transfer up to 10 percent of funding between (b) through (((d))) (e) of this subsection. The department shall provide notification prior to any transfer to the office of financial management and to the appropriate legislative committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight task force. The approval of the director of financial management is required prior to any transfer under this subsection.

(h) Beginning July 1, 2016, and each calendar quarter thereafter, the department shall provide a maintenance of effort and TANF participation tracking report for temporary assistance for needy families to the office of financial management, the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, and the legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight task force. The report must detail the following maintenance of effort information for temporary assistance for needy families:

(i) An overview of federal rules related to maintenance of effort, excess maintenance of effort, participation rates for temporary assistance for needy families, and the child care development fund as it pertains to maintenance of effort and participation rates;

(ii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, provided for the previous federal fiscal year;

(iii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, for the current fiscal year, including changes in countable maintenance of effort from the previous year;

(iv) The status of reportable federal participation rate requirements, including any impact of excess maintenance of effort on participation targets;

(v) Potential new sources of maintenance of effort and progress to obtain additional maintenance of effort; and

(vi) A two-year projection for meeting federal block grant and contingency fund maintenance of effort, participation targets, and future reportable federal participation rate requirements.

(2) $1,657,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,657,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for naturalization services.

(3) $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services; and $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.

(4) On December 1, 2015, and annually thereafter, the department must report to the legislature on all sources of funding available for both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service type and funding source. The report must also include the number of clients served and outcome data for the clients.

(5) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to be one hundred percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program benefit amount.

(6) The department shall review clients receiving services through the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization funding through the department.

(7) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties to facilitate applications for veterans' services.

(8) The department must develop options for extending the duration of distribution of supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP) benefits beyond the current duration of the first 10 days of the month. The department must recommend a preferred option that minimizes the costs to implement the changes and minimizes the disruption for existing families receiving SNAP benefits. The department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature describing the options and recommendation by October 1, 2016.

Sec. 208. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($64,766,000))

﻿ $64,261,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($64,894,000))

﻿ $65,751,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($432,441,000))

﻿ $519,763,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$20,211,000

Criminal Justice Treatment Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($11,978,000))

﻿ $12,478,000

Problem Gambling Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,453,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2016). . . .$10,736,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2017). . . .$24,802,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($631,281,000))

﻿ $719,455,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department may contract with the University of Washington and community-based providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program or other specialized chemical dependency case management providers for pregnant, post-partum, and parenting women. For all contractors: (a) Service and other outcome data must be provided to the department by request; and (b) indirect charges for administering the program shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.

(2) In accordance with RCW 70.96A.090 and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to adopt fees for the review and approval of treatment programs in fiscal years 2016 and 2017 as necessary to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(3) $3,500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (from the substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant) is provided solely for the continued funding of existing county drug and alcohol use prevention programs.

(4) $421,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $873,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $1,787,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 50, Laws of 2015 (E2SHB 1450) (involuntary outpatient treatment). The department must use these amounts for increases in alcohol and substance abuse treatment associated with implementation of the bill.

(5) $200,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $200,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct cost-benefit evaluations of the implementation of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 (Initiative Measure No. 502).

(6) $500,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $500,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to design and administer the Washington state healthy youth survey and the Washington state young adult behavioral health survey.

(7) $395,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $396,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for increasing services to pregnant and parenting women provided through the parent child assistance program.

(8) $250,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $250,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a grant to the office of superintendent of public instruction to provide life skills training to children and youth in schools that are in high needs communities.

(9) $386,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $386,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to increase prevention and treatment services provided by tribes to children and youth.

(10) $683,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $2,684,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $1,900,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase residential treatment services for children and youth.

(11) $250,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $250,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for training and technical assistance for the implementation of evidence based, research based, and promising programs which prevent or reduce substance use disorders.

(12) $1,000,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,434,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for expenditure into the home visiting services account.

(13) $3,278,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for a memorandum of understanding with the department of social and health services juvenile rehabilitation administration to provide substance abuse treatment programs for juvenile offenders. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $1,130,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally-committed offenders. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award these funds as described in section 203(3) of this act.

(b) $282,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the expansion of evidence-based treatments and therapies as described in section 203(4) of this act.

(14) $2,500,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,500,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for grants to community-based programs that provide prevention services or activities to youth, including programs for school-based resource officers. These funds must be utilized in accordance with RCW 69.50.540.

(15) $54,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $252,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $2,232,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided for regional support networks to provide outpatient chemical dependency treatment for offenders enrolled in the medicaid program who are supervised by the department of corrections pursuant to a term of community supervision. Effective April 1, 2016, contracts with regional support networks must require that regional support networks include in their provider network specialized expertise in the provision of manualized, evidence-based chemical dependency treatment services for offenders. The department of corrections and the department of social and health services must develop a memorandum of understanding for department of corrections offenders on active supervision who are medicaid eligible and meet medical necessity for outpatient substance use disorder treatment. The agreement will ensure that treatment services provided are coordinated, do not result in duplication of services, and maintain access and quality of care for the individuals being served. The department of social and health services must provide all necessary data, access, and reports to the department of corrections for all department of corrections offenders that receive medicaid paid services.

(16) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, any amounts provided in this section that are used for case management services for pregnant and parenting women must be contracted directly between the department and providers rather than through contracts with behavioral health organizations. By December 1, 2016, the department must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the readiness for behavioral health organizations to assume the contracts for case management services for pregnant and parenting women.

(17) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for parenting education services focused on pregnant and parenting women.

(18) $500,000 of the criminal justice training account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase funding to Washington's drug court system through fiscal year 2017.

(19) Within existing appropriations, the department shall prioritize the prevention and treatment of intravenous opiate-based drug use.

(((19) $1,110,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of Washington for research on the short and long-term effects of marijuana use.

(20) $740,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the Washington State University for research on the short and long-term effects of marijuana use.))

(20) Within existing appropriations for fiscal year 2017, the department shall conduct a two-part study of substance use provider capacity and substance use provider outcomes in the state. The provider capacity report must provide information about publicly funded providers, including their number, geographical location, populations served, and treatment methodologies employed. The provider outcome report must examine variation in client outcome for these providers using statistical models to mitigate the impact of case mix. Where possible, outcomes must be aligned with specifications developed as directed by Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5732, (chapter 338, Laws of 2013) and Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1519 (chapter 320, Laws of 2013). The two reports shall be submitted to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 1, 2017.

(21) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department of social and health services and the health care authority must provide quarterly reports to the chairs of the house health care and wellness committee, the house early learning and human services committee, the senate health care committee, and the senate human services, mental health, and housing committee on the integration of mental health and chemical dependency treatment purchasing through behavioral health organizations and the southwest Washington early adopter model. These reports must include, but are not limited to, an update on reimbursement rates and contracts for providing residential chemical dependency treatment; the numbers of referrals and length of stay for patients referred to chemical dependency treatment; the timing of authorization and payment to providers; the compatibility of patient electronic medical record data between behavioral health organizations, managed care organizations in the southwest Washington regional service area, and providers; and the status of contracted providers. Behavioral health organizations and managed care organizations in the southwest Washington regional service area must be required to immediately report when notified that a provider is in jeopardy of closure. The department and the health care authority must immediately assess whether and take actions to ensure that the behavioral health organization or managed care plans impacted by the provider closure have an adequate transition plan to maintain an adequate network and provide access to medically necessary treatment services for enrollees. These reports shall begin April 1, 2016 and end on October 31, 2016.

Sec. 209. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($12,896,000))

﻿ $12,866,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($13,424,000))

﻿ $13,377,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($99,251,000))

﻿ $98,491,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($125,571,000))

﻿ $124,734,000

Sec. 210. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($37,680,000))

﻿ $39,490,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($37,266,000))

﻿ $40,852,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($74,946,000))

﻿ $80,342,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $78,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $78,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1059 (sexually violent predators).

(2) The department shall review its current food services for the special commitment center for opportunities to consolidate and centralize, emphasizing opportunities for increased efficiency. The department shall consider consolidating and centralizing the department's institutional food service by examining: (a) Consistent daily meals across institutions; (b) off-site meal preparation and cook-chill meals; and (c) increased use of the department of correction's correctional industries institutional food service. Any food service improvements must account for special diets and consistency with established dietary intakes of the food and nutrition board of the national research council.

(3) Within the amounts provided in this section, the special commitment center must explore entering into an interagency agreement with the University of Washington. The interagency agreement would allow the department to receive drug pricing under 340B of the public health services act for drug purchases associated with treating patients with hepatitis C or other diseases, whereby the university is acting as the covered entity or safety-net provider. In cooperation with the University of Washington, the special commitment center must provide an estimate of the fiscal impact of a successful agreement of this nature, to be included in the report provided to the legislature under section 606 of this act.

(4) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the implementation of a memorandum of understanding between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 1199nw amending the collective bargaining agreement under chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium as set forth in section 902 of this act, effective December 1, 2015, at the special commitment center. The legislature recognizes that the memorandum of understanding was necessitated by an emergency and an imminent jeopardy determination by the centers for medicare and medicaid services that relates to the safety and health of clients and employees.

(5) The special commitment center may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

Sec. 211. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($32,668,000))

﻿ $34,207,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($33,667,000))

﻿ $34,576,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($38,282,000))

﻿ $41,160,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$654,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($105,271,000))

﻿ $110,597,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a Washington state mentoring organization to continue its public-private partnerships to provide technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.

Sec. 212. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($64,440,000))

﻿ $70,857,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($61,766,000))

﻿ $67,894,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($53,238,000))

﻿ $58,577,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($179,444,000))

﻿ $197,328,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $8,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely to implement chapter 240, Laws of 2015 (extended foster care).

Sec. 213. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY

During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the health care authority shall provide support and data as required by the office of the state actuary in providing the legislature with health care actuarial analysis, including providing any information in the possession of the health care authority or available to the health care authority through contracts with providers, plans, insurers, consultants, or any other entities contracting with the health care authority.

((Information technology projects and proposed projects for time capture, payroll and payment processes, and eligibility and authorization systems within the health care authority are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer)) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the health care authority are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

The health care authority shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The health care authority may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the health care authority receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(1) MEDICAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($1,937,491,000))

﻿ $1,952,966,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($1,934,895,000))

﻿ $2,041,321,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($11,559,063,000))

﻿ $11,066,695,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($77,619,000))

﻿ $70,787,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$15,086,000

Hospital Safety Net Assessment Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$689,942,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation. . . .$18,491,000

((State Health Care Authority Administration Account—

State Appropriation. . . .$790,000))

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation. . . .$528,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2016). . . .(($5,351,000))

﻿ $7,791,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2017). . . .(($12,520,000))

﻿ $12,979,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($16,251,776,000))

﻿ $15,876,586,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $35,794,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $58,799,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for medicaid services based on the February caseload and medicaid forecasts contingent upon: (i) Transfer of the medicaid forecast function to the office of financial management, by July 1, 2016; (ii) the authority executing necessary, timely data sharing agreements with the office of the state actuary; (iii) the authority providing support and data as required by the office of the state actuary necessary in providing the legislature with health care actuarial analysis, including providing any information in the possession of the health care authority or available to the health care authority through contracts with providers, plans, insurers, consultants, or any other entities contracting with the health care authority; (iv) transfer of the administration of the managed care actuarial rate setting contract from the authority to the office of financial management; and (v) the authority consulting with the medical assistance forecast work group prior to accepting the actuarial contractor's managed care rate recommendations.

(b) $38,633,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the transfer of the categorically needy blind disabled and community options program entry system (COPES) populations from managed care to fee-for-service care effective July 1, 2016.

(c) $1,896,811,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,927,521,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for medicaid services and the medicaid program. However, the authority shall not accept or expend any federal funds received under a medicaid transformation demonstration waiver currently being sought under healthier Washington until specifically approved and appropriated by the legislature.

(d) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this subsection to implement the medicaid expansion as defined in the social security act, section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII).

(((b))) (e) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the health care authority pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that the cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(((c))) (f) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts, if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.

(((d))) (g) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.

(((e))) (h) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of the state's health care system.

(((f))) (i) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.

(((g))) (j) $4,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $4,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $8,522,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share hospital payments.

(((h))) (k) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall provide disproportionate share hospital payments to hospitals that provide services to children in the children's health program who are not eligible for services under Title XIX or XXI of the federal social security act due to their citizenship status.

(((i))) (l) $6,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.

(((j))) (m) The health care authority shall continue the inpatient hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and legislature by November 1, 2015, and by November 1, 2016, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2016 and fiscal year 2017, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount. The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with policies approved in the 2015-2017 biennial operating appropriations act and in effect on July 1, 2015, (b) one-half of the indigent assistance disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (c) all of the other disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match. If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount, the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within eleven months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested. (($16,664,000)) $14,014,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and (($8,170,000)) $9,700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for state grants for the participating hospitals.

(((k))) (n) The health care authority shall seek public-private partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to provide on-going support for outreach and education efforts under the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of 2009.

(((l))) (o) The health care authority shall target funding for maternity support services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco use, or African American or Native American race. The health care authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those services.

(((m))) (p) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall identify strategies to improve patient adherence to treatment plans for diabetes and implement these strategies as a pilot through one health home program to be identified by the authority. The authority shall report to the governor and legislature in December 2015 on patient outcomes and cost savings derived from new adherence strategies in the health home model and make recommendations for improving the strategies.

(((n))) (q) Managed care contracts must incorporate accountability measures that monitor patient health and improved health outcomes, and shall include an expectation that each patient receive a wellness examination that documents the baseline health status and allows for monitoring of health improvements and outcome measures.

(((o))) (r) $88,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account—state appropriation and $567,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement the conversion to the tenth version of the world health organization's international classification of diseases.

(((p))) (s) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide an adult dental benefit.

(((q))) (t) The health care authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(((r))) (u) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. No later than October 1, 2015, the health care authority shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for medical assistance benefits.

(((s))) (v) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $180,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit organization of a toll-free hotline that assists families to learn about and enroll in the apple health for kids program.

(((t))) (w) The appropriations in this section reflect savings and efficiencies by transferring children receiving medical care provided through fee-for-service to medical care provided through managed care.

(((u))) (x) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for primary care services provided by naturopathic physicians.

(((v))) (y) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall continue to provide coverage for pregnant teens that qualify under existing pregnancy medical programs, but whose eligibility for pregnancy related services would otherwise end due to the application of the new modified adjusted gross income eligibility standard.

(((w))) (z) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to remove the mental health visit limit and to provide the shingles vaccine and screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment benefits that are available in the medicaid alternative benefit plan in the classic medicaid benefit plan.

(((x))) (aa) $227,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $461,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $734,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5317 (enhanced autism screening - bright futures).

(((y))) (bb) $4,278,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation and $9,835,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2007 (emergency medical transportation).

(((z))) (cc) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall conduct a review of its adult dental program in cooperation with and utilizing resources from Washington dental services foundation. The authority shall develop a plan to implement an expanded oral health care program for adults with diabetes and pregnant women. A report summarizing the authority's implementation plan and an estimation of cost savings must be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015.

(((aa))) (dd) No more than (($1,175,000)) $452,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and no more than $723,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 may be expended for reimbursement for nonhospital based rural health clinics auditing costs to complete annual payment reconciliations for calendar years 2011-2013 as required under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a (bb)(5)(A). The department shall use the agreed-upon procedures to complete the reconciliations. Nonhospital-based clinics shall be reimbursed for the cost of auditing using the agreed-upon procedures for payment reconciliation for this time period only.

(((bb))) (ee) The appropriations in this section represent a transfer of expenditure authority of $2,333,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,782,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2017 to the office of financial management to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5084 (all payer claims database).

(((cc))) (ff) Pursuant to RCW 41.06.142(3), the authority shall implement a pilot program within existing resources to understand the nature and depth of potential fraud, waste, and abuse and the creation of operational efficiencies within the provider and beneficiary system. The pilot program shall examine streamlining provider enrollment and compliance within the current affordable care act screening requirements and include a post-enrollment review of those currently enrolled in medicaid to determine if there have been changes in demographics, including but not limited to becoming deceased, incarcerated, or residing out of state. The pilot program shall be conducted by the authority in partnership with a third-party vendor that uses national public records data as well as provider-specific data. The authority shall prepare a report to the governor and legislative fiscal committees by December 15, 2015.

(((dd))) (gg) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall conduct a review of its federally qualified health center encounter rates and rural health center encounter rates in comparison to current uniform medical plan rates for the same or similar services. The authority shall consult with the centers for medicare and medicaid services to determine whether federally qualified encounter rates may be adjusted to uniform medical plan rates as a reasonable proxy to cost. The authority must submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes which encounter rates exceed uniform medical rates, the amount by which the rates are exceeded, and the annual cost of paying above uniform medical rates. The report shall also include the steps the authority has taken with the centers for medicare and medicaid services to ensure that rates bear a reasonable relationship to costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities, including whether uniform medical plan or commercial rates may be considered a reasonable proxy to cost. The report must be submitted by January 1, 2016. By September 15, 2016, the authority is directed to directly consult with the centers for medicaid and medicare services to determine whether federally qualified encounter rates may be adjusted to uniform medical plan rates as a reasonable proxy to cost and resubmit the report to include the results of this consultation.

(((ee))) (hh) $1,035,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $965,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $1,846,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for customer service staff to reduce call wait times and improve the number of calls answered by the authority.

(((ff))) (ii) $386,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $361,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $2,018,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for additional staff to support timely resolution of eligibility-related issues for medicaid clients.

(((gg))) (jj)(i) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, $48,000 of the state health care authority administrative account—state appropriation, and $312,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to establish the bleeding disorder collaborative for care.

(ii) The collaborative must consist of three representatives from the authority, three representatives from the largest organization in Washington representing patients with bleeding disorders, two representatives from state designated bleeding disorder centers of excellence, and two representatives of federally funded hemophilia treatment centers based in Washington. The collaborative may invite the participation of other persons with expertise that may assist the collaborative in its responsibilities. The collaborative shall adopt a transparent process that allows for public comment prior to the final adoption of any evidence-based practice.

(iii) The collaborative shall:

(A) Identify and develop evidence-based practices to improve care to patients with bleeding disorders with specific attention to health care cost reduction. To the extent that evidence-based practices are unavailable, the collaborative shall research and create the practices or compile the necessary information. In the event that research on evidence is incomplete, the collaborative may consider research-based practices or emerging best practices;

(B) Make recommendations regarding the dissemination of the evidence-based practices to relevant health care professionals and support service providers and propose options for incorporating evidence-based practices into their treatment regimens; and

(C) Assist the authority in the development of a cost-benefit analysis regarding the use of evidence-based practices for specific populations in state-purchased health care programs.

(iv) The authority shall report to the governor and the legislature by September 1, 2016, regarding the evidence-based practices that have been developed, the clinical and fiscal implications of their implementation, and a strategy for disseminating the practices and incorporating their use among health care professionals in various state-financed health care programs.

(((hh))) (kk) The authority shall use revenue appropriated from the dedicated marijuana fund for contracts with community health centers under RCW 69.50.540 in lieu of general fund—state payments to community health centers for services provided to medical assistance clients, and it is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

(ll) In collaboration with the state hospital association, the authority shall develop and implement a process to review hospital cost report information for new, in-state hospital psychiatric inpatient services that have not had provider specific costs and determine the hospital-specific per diem rate as currently defined for existing providers of psychiatric inpatient services. As a result of this action, the authority shall not incur expenditures in the current biennium. The authority shall report to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature the following information no later than October 1, 2017:

(i) The number of potential new psychiatric beds;

(ii) The number of potential new psychiatric beds that were previously designated as acute beds;

(iii) The total estimated costs for all new potential psychiatric beds;

(iv) The potential savings derived from change in bed type usage; and

(v) The state fiscal years in which potential costs and savings are likely to incur.

(mm) To further the goals of better care, better health outcomes, and reduced per capita costs of health care, the authority shall review its reimbursement methods and rates for births performed at birth centers. The authority shall report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by October 15, 2016, with recommendations for adjusting reimbursement methods and levels, improving access to care, improving the cesarean section rate, and savings options for utilizing birth centers as an alternative to hospitals.

(nn) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall engage the resources necessary to issue a competitive request for proposal for the purpose of contracting out, by July 1, 2017, the administration of the medicaid dental program. The goals are to increase access to care by expanding the medicaid dental network, engage dental expertise in the administration, improve the provider and patient experience, align the benefit package with evidence-based care, and begin to test innovative models of delivery, consistent with the goals of the healthier Washington initiative. The authority shall contract with a third-party administrator with deep dental expertise, knowledge of the state, and one that can leverage a state-wide dental network in order to expedite and increase access to dental care quickly. Medicaid leadership should take steps to appropriately realign staff impacted by this proposal to other existing work in order to maximize productivity within the agency.

(oo) The authority shall submit reports to the governor and the legislature by September 15, 2016, and by September 15, 2017, that delineate the number of individuals in medicaid managed care, by carrier, age, gender, and eligibility category, receiving preventative services and vaccinations. The reports should include baseline and benchmark information from the previous two fiscal years and should be inclusive of, but not limited to, services recommended under the United States preventative services task force, advisory committee on immunization practices, early and periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment (EPSDT) guidelines, and other relevant preventative and vaccination medicaid guidelines and requirements.

(pp) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide an adult chiropractic benefit.

(qq) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6430 (continuity of care) to update the ProviderOne and HealthPlanFinder systems to allow suspension rather than termination of medical assistance benefits for persons who are incarcerated or committed to a state hospital subject to the same conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 705 (3) through (6) of this act.

(rr) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6488 (health care authority/federal waivers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(ss) Within amounts appropriated within this section, the authority is directed to increase reimbursement rates for licensed practical nurses and registered nurses providing skilled nursing services in a home setting by $10.00 per hour. This increase shall be offset by decreases in inpatient hospitalization. The authority is directed to work in collaboration with the home health association and the Washington state hospital association to develop a plan to show how improved access to home health nursing reduces potentially preventable readmissions, increases access to care, reduces hospital length of stay, and prevents overall hospital admissions for clients receiving private-duty nursing, medically intensive care, or home health benefits. The authority shall submit a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2016, with details of this plan.

(2) PUBLIC EMPLOYEES BENEFITS BOARD AND EMPLOYEE BENEFITS PROGRAMS

State Health Care Authority Administration Account—

State Appropriation. . . .(($38,983,000))

﻿ $39,708,000

The appropriation in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $162,000 of the state health care authority administration account—state appropriation is for the health care authority to work with participating employers to minimize employer penalties that may be incurred by employers not providing health benefit coverage for part-time employees that are defined as full-time employees under the employer shared responsibility provisions of the federal affordable care act.

(b) Appropriations in this section have been reduced to reflect the following changes: Funding has been reduced to reflect completion of Moore v. HCA litigation; the authority shall terminate its contract with its wellness vendor effective July 1, 2016, funding has been reduced accordingly; the authority must continue to operate a wellness program to meet the state's obligations under any collective bargaining agreement.

(c) The authority's current wellness program known as the smart health program has not achieved expected state savings or improvements in state employee health outcomes. The legislature requests that during its upcoming negotiations with the coalition of unions for a 2017-2019 health care agreement that the executive propose eliminating the $125.00 wellness incentive and the smart health program or allowing for the termination of any wellness program that fails to achieve a state employee participation rate of at least sixty percent.

(3) HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($5,872,000))

﻿ $5,897,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($5,146,000))

﻿ $5,231,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($40,427,000))

﻿ $49,510,000

Health Benefit Exchange Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($58,567,000))

﻿ $49,991,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($110,012,000))

﻿ $110,629,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The receipt and use of medicaid funds provided to the health benefit exchange from the health care authority are subject to compliance with state and federal regulations and policies governing the Washington apple health programs, including timely and proper application, eligibility, and enrollment procedures.

(b) $4,755,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation and $5,069,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the customer service call center.

(c) $577,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, $3,606,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation, and $1,389,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for in-person assisters and outreach to help individuals and families complete applications for health coverage.

(d) $1,417,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation and $8,218,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to fund the design, development, implementation, operation, and maintenance of the health benefit exchange's information technology systems.

(e) The authority shall require the exchange to submit to the authority and the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 30, 2015, and September 30, 2016, a detailed report including:

(i) Salaries of all current employees of the exchange, including starting salary, any increases received, and the basis for any increases; and

(ii) Salary, overtime, and compensation policies for staff of the exchange.

(f) The authority shall require the exchange to submit to the authority and the appropriate committees of the legislature on a monthly basis:

(i) A report of all expenses; and

(ii) Beginning and ending fund balances, by fund source; and

(iii) Any contracts or contract amendments signed by the exchange; and

(iv) An accounting of staff required to operate the exchange broken out by full time equivalent positions, contracted employees, temporary staff, and any other relevant designation that indicates the staffing level of the exchange.

(g)(i) By July 31, 2016, the authority shall make a payment of half the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 and half the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation to the health benefit exchange. By January 31, 2017, the authority shall make a payment of the remaining half of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 and the remaining half of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation to the health benefit exchange.

(ii) The exchange shall monitor actual to projected revenues and make necessary adjustments in expenditures or carrier assessments to ensure expenditures do not exceed actual revenues.

(iii) As the state designated medicaid agency, the authority is responsible for maximizing the recovery of federal medicaid dollars and the timely application and follow-up for obtaining federal approval of advanced planning documents (APD). The authority shall work with the exchange to submit an APD that maximizes the recovery of medicaid costs incurred by the exchange, including indirect administrative and operational costs, no later than sixty days after the enactment of the omnibus appropriations act each year.

(h) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, $116,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation, and $63,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for improvements to the health benefit exchange financial system.

Sec. 214. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($2,074,000))

﻿ $2,089,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($2,094,000))

﻿ $2,089,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,308,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($6,476,000))

﻿ $6,486,000

Sec. 215. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS

Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$10,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($20,857,000))

﻿ $20,851,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($20,857,000))

﻿ $20,851,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($41,724,000))

﻿ $41,712,000

Sec. 216. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($18,478,000))

﻿ $18,517,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($17,392,000))

﻿ $16,345,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($4,391,000))

﻿ $4,541,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation. . . .$148,000

24/7 Sobriety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$30,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$460,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .(($8,168,000))

﻿ $7,168,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($49,067,000))

﻿ $47,209,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, are provided to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW 9A.44.130. The association ((shall)) may use no more than $50,000 per fiscal year of the amounts provided on program management activities.

(2) $558,720 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely to purchase ammunition for the basic law enforcement academy. Jurisdictions shall reimburse to the criminal justice training commission the costs of ammunition, based on the average cost of ammunition per cadet, for cadets that they enroll in the basic law enforcement academy.

(3) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.

(4) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a school safety program. The commission, in collaboration with the school safety center advisory committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school administrators and school safety personnel hired after the effective date of this section.

(5) $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the school safety center within the commission. The safety center shall act as an information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a school district in Washington or in another state, coordinate activities relating to school safety, and review and approve manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training. Through an interagency agreement, the commission shall provide funding for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to continue to develop and maintain a school safety information web site. The school safety center advisory committee shall develop and revise the training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all school safety personnel. The commission shall provide research-related programs in school safety and security issues beneficial to both law enforcement and schools.

(6) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the costs of providing statewide advanced driving training with the use of a driving simulator.

(7) $644,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $595,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5311 (crisis intervention training).

(8) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the criminal justice training commission to develop and deliver research-based programs to instruct, guide, and support local law enforcement agencies in fostering the "guardian philosophy" of policing, which emphasizes de-escalating conflicts and reducing the use of force.

(9) $429,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $429,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for deposit into the nonappropriated Washington internet crimes against children account for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5215 (internet crimes against children).

Sec. 217. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($16,331,000))

﻿ $16,302,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($17,640,000))

﻿ $17,606,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$11,876,000

Asbestos Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,177,000

Electrical License Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($48,147,000))

﻿ $48,148,000

Farm Labor Contractor Account—State Appropriation. . . .$28,000

Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .(($938,000))

﻿ $971,000

Public Works Administration Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($6,360,000))

﻿ $6,500,000

Manufactured Home Installation Training Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$355,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($278,575,000))

﻿ $279,480,000

Accident Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$13,626,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($292,095,000))

﻿ $293,688,000

Medical Aid Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$3,186,000

Plumbing Certificate Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,784,000

Pressure Systems Safety Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$4,250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($696,368,000))

﻿ $698,977,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 100, Laws of 2015 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5897).

(2) $2,300,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 137, Laws of 2015 (Substitute House Bill No. 1496).

(3) $494,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation and $1,580,000 of the accident fund—state appropriation are provided solely for continuation of the logger safety initiative.

(4) $4,923,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation and $4,924,000 of the accident fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the first phase of the department's plan to replace its labor and industries industrial insurance information technology system subject to the same conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 705 (3) through (6) of this act.

(5) $3,548,000 of the electrical license account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a modern and mobile information technology system for its electrical inspection program subject to the same conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 705 (3) through (6) of this act.

(6) The department is directed under RCW 39.12.070 to adjust its fee schedule for statements of intent to pay prevailing wages and certification of affidavits of wages paid to remove or lower fees for contractors and subcontractors whose contract amounts are less than seven hundred fifty dollars beginning on January 1, 2016.

(7) $140,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 40, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. to create an electronic option for employers to submit prevailing wage surveys.

(8) $640,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely for a pilot program under which the department partners with an experienced firm to manage cases involving catastrophically injured workers.

(a) For each injured worker referred by the department, the firm must propose a contract identifying a case outcome, the treatment needed to achieve it, and a fixed price for doing so.

(b) If the department agrees to the contract: (i) The firm must assume responsibility at the fixed price for the medical management and payment of all medical costs until the outcome is achieved; (ii) the department retains the authority to approve or deny particular treatments; and (iii) the firm may require treatment providers to submit bills to it and must forward to the department a record of all payments made.

(c) The department must contract with the firm to manage at least twelve catastrophic cases in fiscal year 2017, provided there is at least that many cases where: (i) An injured worker elects to be served by the firm; and (ii) the fixed price proposed by the firm is lower than the amount the department would pay to achieve the identified outcome if it did not contract with the firm.

(d) The department must provide a written report on the pilot program to the appropriate committees of the legislature in December 2016.

(9) $50,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely for a task force on injured workers' independent medical exams.

(a) There shall be ten members of the task force including three from the business community, three from the labor community, two from independent medical examiners, and two industrial insurance health care providers.

(b) The task force shall:

(i) Collect and review specific, reliable data about the frequency and use of independent medical exams for both state fund exams and self-insurer exams;

(ii) Oversee a one-time survey of workers, employers, independent medical examiners, industrial insurance health care providers, and other critical stakeholders to identify areas of needed improvement;

(iii) Examine options for increased communication with injured workers regarding the purpose and need for independent medical exams;

(iv) Examine options for increased communication with claims adjusters and industrial insurance medical providers with the goal of decreasing the need for some independent medical exams;

(v) Review current independent medical exam certification and exam processes with the goal of recommending standard reporting protocols, a quality assurance standard for reports, and required training standards; and

(vi) Examine the statutes and regulations from other jurisdictions as they relate to reducing the frequency of independent medical exams.

(c) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the department. Any expenses of the task force must be paid out the appropriation provided from the medical aid account. The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2016.

Sec. 218. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) HEADQUARTERS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($1,806,000))

﻿ $1,809,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($1,835,000))

﻿ $1,852,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory﻿

Institutions Account—State Appropriation. . . .$10,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($3,651,000))

﻿ $3,671,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($5,449,000))

﻿ $5,459,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($5,465,000))

﻿ $5,521,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($3,599,000))

﻿ $3,625,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($4,597,000))

﻿ $4,618,000

Veteran Estate Management Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($1,154,000))

﻿ $623,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($20,264,000))

﻿ $19,846,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to provide crisis and emergency relief and education, training, and employment assistance to veterans and their families in their communities through the veterans innovation program.

(b) The creation of an automated exchange of information between the federal department of defense, federal veterans administration, and the Washington department of veterans affairs is the sole project for the Washington department of veterans affairs in the information technology pool. Ongoing funding may be provided for staffing, training, and subscription costs associated with a web-based software tool that has been configured to meet the business requirements of the Washington department of veterans affairs. Additional information technology projects, such as the complete automation of the Washington department of veterans affairs business processes through an enterprise case management system, are subject to future funding decisions by the legislature. The conditions and limitations in this subsection apply only if the specified project is funded from the information technology pool.

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($688,000))

﻿ $691,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($815,000))

﻿ $800,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($79,699,000))

﻿ $80,068,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($29,613,000))

﻿ $29,764,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($110,815,000))

﻿ $111,323,000

Sec. 219. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($57,875,000))

﻿ $57,822,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($58,931,000))

﻿ $59,749,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($548,374,000))

﻿ $563,916,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($151,143,000))

﻿ $151,172,000

Hospital Data Collection Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($231,000))

﻿ $331,000

Health Professions Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($115,892,000))

﻿ $120,503,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation. . . .$615,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems﻿

Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($11,226,000))

﻿ $9,226,000

Safe Drinking Water Account—State Appropriation. . . .$6,930,000

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($15,360,000))

﻿ $17,360,000

Waterworks Operator Certification—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,605,000

Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$357,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation. . . .$162,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,894,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($5,958,000))

﻿ $4,036,000

Medical Test Site Licensure Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($2,512,000))

﻿ $2,513,000

Youth Tobacco Prevention Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,281,000

Public Health Supplemental Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,244,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation. . . .$324,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation. . . .$53,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$968,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State

Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$7,500,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State

Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$7,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($999,935,000))

﻿ $1,019,061,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(2) $130,000 of the health professions state account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 118, Laws of 2015 (applied behavior analysis).

(3) $38,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $38,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the department of health, the department of social and health services, and the health care authority to continue to collaborate to submit a coordinated report on diabetes to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2017. The report on diabetes must include the following:

(a) An analysis of the financial impact and reach that diabetes of all types is having on programs administered by each agency and individuals enrolled in those programs, including:

(i) The number of individuals with diabetes that are impacted or covered by these programs;

(ii) The number of family members of individuals with diabetes that are impacted by these programs;

(iii) The financial toll or impact that diabetes and its complications places on these programs, and how the financial toll or impact compares to that of other chronic diseases and conditions;

(b) An assessment of the benefits of programs and activities implemented by the agencies to control and prevent diabetes, including documentation of the amount and source of the agencies' funding for these programs and activities;

(c) A description of the level of coordination existing between the agencies on activities, programmatic activities, and messaging on managing, treating, or preventing all forms of diabetes and its complications;

(d) The development of or revision to each agency's action plan for addressing the impact of diabetes together with a range of actionable items for either each agency or consideration by the legislature, or both. The plans must, at a minimum:

(i) Identify proposed action steps to reduce the impact of diabetes, prediabetes, and related diabetes complications, especially for medicaid populations;

(ii) Identify expected outcomes in subsequent biennia; and

(iii) Establish benchmarks for controlling and preventing relevant forms of diabetes and appropriate measures for success;

(e) An estimate of the costs, return on investment, and resources required to implement the plans identified in subsection (d) of this section.

(4) $30,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 259, Laws of 2015 (prescription drug monitoring).

(5) $4,015,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 70, Laws of 2015 (cannabis patient protection).

(6) $7,250,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $7,250,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a marijuana education and public health program and for tobacco prevention activities that target youth and populations with a high incidence of tobacco use.

(7) $250,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $250,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington poison center to help maintain national accreditation standards.

(8) $65,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $65,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure and regulatory program to supplement revenue from fees. The department shall charge no more than five hundred twenty-five dollars annually for new or renewed licenses for the midwifery program.

(9) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, each person subject to RCW 43.70.110(3)(c) is required to pay only one surcharge of up to twenty-five dollars annually for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112, regardless of how many professional licenses the person holds.

(10)(a) Within existing resources, the department of health shall compile a report on ambulatory surgical facilities to be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2016. The report shall determine:

(i) How many ambulatory centers are currently functioning in the state;

(ii) How many cases these centers receive annually;

(iii) How many of these centers are medicare certified;

(iv) How many of these centers are not medicare certified; and

(v) How many are also certified by an accrediting organization.

(b) The department shall not increase current annual fees for new or renewed licenses for ambulatory surgical facilities during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

(11)(a) The pharmacy quality assurance commission shall engage in a stakeholder process to develop statutory standards and protocols specific to long-term care pharmacies and shall submit the proposed statute to the senate health care committee and house health care and wellness committee no later than November 15, 2015.

(b) When inspecting and reviewing long-term care pharmacies, the pharmacy quality assurance commission and the department of health shall recognize the applicability of medication orders in long-term care facilities and recognize the essential relationship between the practitioner, the long-term care facility registered nurse, and the pharmacist in conveying chart orders to the long-term care pharmacy.

(12) $52,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2015 (victim interviews training).

(13) ((Information technology projects and proposed projects for time capture, payroll and payment processes, and eligibility and authorization systems within the department of health are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer)) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department of health are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

(14) $1,923,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1472 (chemical action plans), Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5056 (safer chemicals/action plans), Substitute Senate Bill No. 6131 (safer chemicals), or any of these. Within the amount provided in this subsection, $1,554,000 is provided solely for the department to conduct biomonitoring studies. If none of these bills is enacted by July 10, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the department of health to support Washington's healthiest next generation efforts by partnering with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, department of early learning, and other public and private partners as appropriate.

(16) $374,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6534 (maternal mortality review). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) Within the amounts appropriated from the health professions account—state, the department must manage its pending rule-making process related to the educational and training requirements for chemical dependency professionals to complete the rule-making by June 30, 2016.

(18) Within the amounts appropriated from the health professions account—state, the department must conduct a sunrise review under chapter 18.120 RCW by May 1, 2016, to evaluate the creation of a chemical dependency peer support specialist credential based on a sunrise proposal developed by the department of social and health services.

(19) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department must implement the 2014 Washington state hepatitis strategic plan, including but not limited to the implementation of the centers for disease control and prevention hepatitis C screening guidelines for persons born between 1945-1965 and other high risk groups, hepatitis C prevention, and hepatitis C case management.

Sec. 220. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

The appropriations to the department of corrections in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2016, after approval by the director of financial management and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year 2016 between programs. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any deviations from appropriation levels. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($59,039,000))

﻿ $59,189,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($59,768,000))

﻿ $59,969,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($118,807,000))

﻿ $119,158,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the support of a statewide council on mentally ill offenders that includes as its members representatives of community-based mental health treatment programs, current or former judicial officers, and directors and commanders of city and county jails and state prison facilities. The council will investigate and promote cost-effective approaches to meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental disorders who have a history of offending or who are at-risk of offending, including their mental health, physiological, housing, employment, and job training needs.

(b) Within existing resources, the department shall meet the requirements of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6583 (performance management system). By July 1, 2016, the department shall begin working with the department of enterprise services, lean transformation services to build its performance management system and begin reviewing development needs for a real-time, web-based tracking and reporting system.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($608,917,000))

﻿ $607,084,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($629,232,000))

﻿ $629,686,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$1,892,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .(($6,701,000))

﻿ $6,811,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$400,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,247,142,000))

﻿ $1,245,873,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, when contracts are established or renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and (ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare betterment account.

(b) The department may contract for up to 300 beds statewide to the extent that it is at no net cost to the department. The department shall calculate and report the average cost per offender per day, inclusive of all services, on an annual basis for a facility that is representative of average medium or lower offender costs. The duration of the contracts may be for up to four years. The department shall not pay a rate greater than $65 per day per offender for all costs associated with the offender while in the local correctional facility to include programming and health care costs, or the equivalent of $65 per day per bed including programming and health care costs for full units. The capacity provided at local correctional facilities must be for offenders whom the department of corrections defines as medium or lower security offenders. Programming provided for inmates held in local jurisdictions is included in the rate, and details regarding the type and amount of programming, and any conditions regarding transferring offenders must be negotiated with the department as part of any contract. Local jurisdictions must provide health care to offenders that meet standards set by the department. The local jail must provide all medical care including unexpected emergent care. The department must utilize a screening process to ensure that offenders with existing extraordinary medical/mental health needs are not transferred to local jail facilities. If extraordinary medical conditions develop for an inmate while at a jail facility, the jail may transfer the offender back to the department, subject to terms of the negotiated agreement. Health care costs incurred prior to transfer are the responsibility of the jail.

(c) $501,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $501,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the institution formerly known as the maple lane school in Rochester. The department may not house incarcerated offenders at the maple lane site until specifically directed to do so by the legislature.

(d) (($1,379,000)) $479,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, and $1,379,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the department to contract with Yakima county for the use of inmate bed capacity in lieu of prison beds operated by the state to meet prison capacity needs.

(e) The department shall review its policies and procedures for overtime usage throughout its prison custody system to identify efficiencies and best practices that will control costs. The department shall provide to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2015, a report that makes recommendations to reduce the department's overtime usage and reduces overall costs for prison personnel.

(f) In an effort to reduce its need for medium security beds, the department shall review options to meet capacity needs in the most cost-efficient manner without compromising safety. The department shall at a minimum review its policies that determine custody levels, including examining other states' policies and determine costs to convert any empty prison beds to medium security and possibilities to utilize local jail beds for this purpose. The department must evaluate the options on both a short-term and long-term basis against the cost and timing of any proposal to build a new prison facility. The department shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015.

(g) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department of corrections shall explore entering into an interagency agreement with the University of Washington. The interagency agreement would allow the department to receive drug pricing under 340B of the public health services act for drug purchases associated with treating patients with hepatitis C or other diseases, whereby the university is acting as the covered entity or safety-net provider. In cooperation with the University of Washington, the department must provide an estimate of the fiscal impact of a successful agreement of this nature, to be included in the report provided to the legislature under section 606 of this act.

(h) $711,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5105 (felony DUI).

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($152,893,000))

﻿ $157,010,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($156,050,000))

﻿ $155,571,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$995,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($309,938,000))

﻿ $313,576,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of corrections shall contract with local and tribal governments for the provision of jail capacity to house offenders who violate the terms of their community supervision. A contract shall not have a cost of incarceration in excess of $85 per day per offender. A contract shall not have a year-to-year increase in excess of three percent per year. The contracts may include rates for the medical care of offenders which exceed the daily cost of incarceration and the limitation on year-to-year increases, provided that medical payments conform to the department's offender health plan and pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are preapproved by department utilization management staff.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, specific funding is provided to implement Senate Bill No. 5070 (supervision of domestic violence offenders).

(c) The department shall engage in ongoing mitigation strategies to reduce the costs associated with community supervision violators, including improvements in data collection and reporting and alternatives to short-term confinement for low-level violators.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($6,273,000))

﻿ $6,600,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($6,369,000))

﻿ $6,469,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($12,642,000))

﻿ $13,069,000

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($45,308,000))

﻿ $44,016,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($41,572,000))

﻿ $39,931,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($86,880,000))

﻿ $83,947,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital or other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do so.

(6) OFFENDER CHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($45,498,000))

﻿ $54,480,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($46,845,000))

﻿ $53,308,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($92,343,000))

﻿ $107,788,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of corrections shall use funds appropriated in this subsection (6) for offender programming. The department shall develop and implement a written comprehensive plan for offender programming that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity model, are evidence-based, and have measurable outcomes. The department is authorized to discontinue ineffective programs and to repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities in the written plan.

(b) Effective April 1, 2016, the regional support networks must subcontract with providers that have specialized expertise in the provision of outpatient chemical dependency treatment services to offenders who have been sentenced by a superior court to a term of community supervision by the department of corrections. The department of corrections and the department of social and health services must develop a memorandum of understanding for offenders on active supervision by the department who are eligible for chemical dependency programming and to ensure that manualized evidence-based treatment services funded by these agencies are coordinated, do not result in duplication of services, and maintain access and quality of care for the individuals being served.

(c) The department of corrections shall implement and make necessary changes to policies and practices to assist eligible needs-assessed offenders within the community with access to outpatient chemical dependency treatment services through the behavioral health organizations and early adopters.

Sec. 221. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($2,290,000))

﻿ $2,287,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($2,297,000))

﻿ $2,721,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($23,186,000))

﻿ $23,145,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$60,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($27,833,000))

﻿ $28,213,000

Sec. 222. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($258,156,000))

﻿ $228,569,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($34,758,000))

﻿ $34,740,000

Unemployment Compensation Administration Account—﻿

Federal Appropriation. . . .(($285,849,000))

﻿ $290,640,000

Administrative Contingency Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($24,537,000))

﻿ $24,394,000

Employment Service Administrative Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($46,134,000))

﻿ $45,975,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$750,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($649,434,000))

﻿ $625,068,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,662,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is from amounts made available to the state by section 903(g) of the social security act (Reed act). This amount is provided solely for the replacement of the unemployment insurance tax information system for the employment security department. The amounts provided in this subsection is conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(2) $26,955,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available to the state by section 903(g) of the social security act (Reed act). This amount is provided solely for the replacement of the unemployment insurance benefit system for the employment security department. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief information officer.

(3) The department may implement a revised chart of accounts for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium following the receipt and approval of the reconstructed ten-year operating and capital expenditure plan by the office of financial management and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee. The proposed structure must reduce the department's structure from seven programs to four and better align the budget reporting structure with the department's current operational structure.

(4) The department is directed to maximize the use of federal funds. The department must update its budget annually to align expenditures with anticipated changes in projected revenues.

(5) $48,000 of the employment services administrative account—state appropriation is provided for costs associated with the second stage of the review and evaluation of the training benefits program as directed in section 15(2), chapter 4, Laws of 2011 (unemployment insurance program). This second stage shall be developed and conducted by the joint legislative audit and review committee and shall consist of further work on the process study and net-impact/cost-benefit analysis components of the evaluation.

(6) The department is prohibited from expending amounts appropriated in this section for implementation of chapter 49.86 RCW.

(7) $240,000 of the administrative contingency account—state appropriation is provided solely for the employment security department to contract with a center for workers in King county. The amount appropriated in this subsection shall be used by the contracted center for workers to support initiatives that generate high-skill, high-wage jobs; improve workforce and training systems; improve service delivery for dislocated workers; and build alliances with community and environmental organizations.

(8) $750,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account—state appropriation is provided solely for worker training, skills development, and other employment services for employees of trade-impacted industrial facilities pursuant to trade adjustment assistance decision 64764.

(End of part)

PART III

NATURAL RESOURCES

Sec. 301. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($455,000))

﻿ $464,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($474,000))

﻿ $476,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$32,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .(($895,000))

﻿ $906,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,856,000))

﻿ $1,878,000

Sec. 302. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($24,694,000))

﻿ $24,485,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($24,795,000))

﻿ $24,400,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$103,800,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$22,398,000

Reclamation Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($3,926,000))

﻿ $4,676,000

Flood Control Assistance Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($2,068,000))

﻿ $2,154,000

State Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$40,000

Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control—State

Appropriation . . . .(($13,163,000))

﻿ $13,224,000

State Drought Preparedness Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($204,000))

﻿ $872,000

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account (Water

Supply Facilities)—State Appropriation . . . .(($447,000))

﻿ $150,000

Aquatic Algae Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .$518,000

Water Rights Tracking System Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($46,000))

﻿ $446,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation . . . .$578,000

Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$547,000

Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$1,790,000

Water Rights Processing Account—State Appropriation . . . .$39,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($132,643,000))

﻿ $122,658,000

State Toxics Control Account—Private/Local

Appropriation . . . .$499,000

Local Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($4,628,000))

﻿ $4,528,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($41,644,000))

﻿ $44,436,000

Underground Storage Tank Account—State Appropriation . . . .$3,544,000

Biosolids Permit Account—State Appropriation . . . .$2,108,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation . . . .(($44,295,000))

﻿ $35,899,000

Hazardous Waste Assistance Account—State

Appropriation . . . .(($6,029,000))

﻿ $6,087,000

Radioactive Mixed Waste Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($14,900,000))

﻿ $15,850,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($3,284,000))

﻿ $3,984,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($8,594,000))

﻿ $8,653,000

Air Operating Permit Account—State Appropriation . . . .$3,231,000

Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account—State Appropriation . . . .$1,439,000

Oil Spill Response Account—State Appropriation . . . .$7,076,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration

Account—State Appropriation . . . .$579,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$493,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—Federal

Appropriation . . . .$2,337,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($476,376,000))

﻿ $463,518,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(2) $495,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation and $625,000 of the local toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of the local source control program by adding additional capacity in the Columbia River basin and Clark county.

(3) $310,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Spokane river regional toxics task force to address elevated levels of polychlorinated biphenyls in the Spokane river.

(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall conduct a stakeholder process with the department of fish and wildlife to develop recommendations to restructure the fees under RCW 90.16.050 and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015.

(5) $1,044,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 274, Laws of 2015 (ESHB 1449).

(6) $3,883,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1472 (chemical action plans), Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5056 (safer chemicals/action plans), Substitute Senate Bill No. 6131 (safer chemicals), or any of these. If none of these bills are enacted by July 10, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $134,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 144, Laws of 2015 (SHB 1851).

(8) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Walla Walla watershed management partnership to address water resource and management issues in the Walla Walla watershed.

(9)(a) $14,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $14,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are for activities within the water resources program.

(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for processing water right permit applications only if the department of ecology issues at least five hundred water right decisions in fiscal year 2016. If the department of ecology does not issue at least five hundred water right decisions in fiscal year 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse and remain unexpended. Permit decisions for the Columbia river basin count toward the five hundred water rights decisions under this subsection. The department of ecology shall submit a report to the office of financial management and the state treasurer by June 30, 2016, that documents whether five hundred water right decisions were issued in fiscal year 2016. For the purposes of this subsection, applications that are voluntarily withdrawn by an applicant do not count towards the five hundred water right decision requirement. For the purposes of water budget-neutral requests under chapter 173-539A WAC, multiple domestic connections authorized within a single water budget-neutral decision are considered one decision for the purposes of this subsection.

(10) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department must evaluate mitigation options for domestic water use in areas of the Yakima basin for which mitigation water is unavailable and access to water from water banks is unsuitable. The department must recommend solutions for providing mitigation water for domestic use in such areas. A report of the department's findings must be provided to the legislature by December 1, 2015.

(11) $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6589 (water storage/exempt wells). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $4,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6605 (solid waste/disease & pests). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the director of the department of ecology, working with the commissioner of public lands, must conduct a management review of the joint federal and state dredged material management program and recommend, as appropriate, actions designed to ensure that the program is functioning to facilitate the disposal of dredged material at open water disposal sites using methods that are protective of human health and the environment. The director and commissioner must report findings and proposed actions to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than November 1, 2016. The director and commissioner must consider input and perspectives from agencies that issue permits for open water disposal of dredged material in Puget Sound, including the department of natural resources, the department of ecology, the United States environmental protection agency, and the United States army corps of engineers. This review must include, but is not limited to: (a) The extent to which current operations, policies, and decisions of the dredged material management program provide for dredging actions necessary to maintain navigation and commerce; (b) determining what regulatory flexibility exists to allow open water disposal of dredged materials designed to protect human health and the environment; and (c) an evaluation of the dredged material management program's decision-making process and policies to ensure that regulatory flexibility is appropriately used and management oversight occurs.

(14) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the Clark county heritage farm for irrigation.

(15) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the department shall not retain fees in excess of the estimated amount necessary to cover the agency's administrative costs related to the mercury light stewardship program under chapter 70.275 RCW. The department shall refund any fees collected in excess of those administrative costs to any approved stewardship organization under chapter 70.275 RCW.

Sec. 303. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($10,578,000))

﻿ $10,558,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($10,475,000))

﻿ $6,190,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$6,920,000

Winter Recreation Program Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($3,280,000))

﻿ $3,305,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State Appropriation . . . .$228,000

Snowmobile Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($5,794,000))

﻿ $5,819,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation . . . .$363,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation . . . .(($116,707,000))

﻿ $120,983,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—Private/Local

Appropriation . . . .$318,000

Recreation Access Pass Account—State Appropriation. . . .$250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($154,663,000))

﻿ $154,934,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of the Northwest weather and avalanche center.

(2) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the commission to pay assessments charged by local improvement districts.

(3) $100,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation is provided solely for conducting noxious weed treatment and vegetation management on the John Wayne pioneer trail to protect adjacent land owners from noxious weeds with priority in areas where there is adjacent agricultural use. Control of noxious weeds must follow an integrated pest management approach including the use of biological, chemical, and mechanical control prescriptions in accordance with chapter 17.15 RCW and consistent with state and county weed board requirements. The commission must report on its progress in meeting this requirement to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 30, 2016.

(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the commission shall not accept reservations for the Lake Cascade shelter on Thanksgiving day.

(5) The appropriations in this section include specific funding for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5205 (complimentary discover pass).

(6) $250,000 of the recreation access pass account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission, using its authority under RCW 79A.05.055(3) and in partnership with the departments of fish and wildlife and natural resources, to coordinate a process to develop options and recommendations to improve consistency, equity, and simplicity in recreational access fee systems while accounting for the fiscal health and stability of public land management. The process must be collaborative and include other relevant agencies and appropriate stakeholders. The commission must contract with the William D. Ruckelshaus Center or another neutral third party to facilitate meetings and discussions with parties involved in the process; and provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2017. The process must analyze and make recommendations on:

(a) Opportunities for federal and state recreational permit fee coordination, including the potential for developing a system that allows a single pass to provide access to federal and state lands;

(b) Opportunities to enhance consistency in the way state and federal recreational access fees apply to various types of recreational users, including those that travel to public lands by motor vehicle, boat, bicycle, foot, or another method; and

(c) Opportunities to develop a comprehensive and consistent statewide approach to recreational fee discounts and exemptions to social and other groups including, but not limited to, disabled persons, seniors, disabled veterans, foster families, low-income residents, and volunteers. This analysis must examine the cost of such a program, and should consider how recreational fee discounts fit into the broader set of benefits provided by the state to these social groups. This includes a review of the efficacy, purpose and cost of existing recreational fee discounts and exemptions, as well as opportunities for new or modified social group discounts and exemptions. The departments of veterans affairs and social and health services must be included in this portion of the process.

Sec. 304. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($873,000))

﻿ $837,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($845,000))

﻿ $809,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$3,537,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$24,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation . . . .$488,000

Firearms Range Account—State Appropriation . . . .$37,000

Recreation Resources Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($3,349,000))

﻿ $3,242,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation . . . .$1,014,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($10,167,000))

﻿ $9,988,000

Sec. 305. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($2,123,000))

﻿ $2,148,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($2,164,000))

﻿ $2,175,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,287,000))

﻿ $4,323,000

Sec. 306. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($6,775,000))

﻿ $6,777,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($6,810,000))

﻿ $6,797,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$2,301,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation. . . .$7,600,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .$1,000,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation. . . .$8,800,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($24,486,000))

﻿ $33,275,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $7,600,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the voluntary stewardship program. This amount may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(2) $8,800,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely to protect water quality, stabilize soil, prevent crop damage, replace fencing, and help landowners recover from losses sustained from wildfire. $300,000 of this amount shall be provided to the Okanogan county noxious weed control board to control weeds and revegetate lands damaged by wildfires.

Sec. 307. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($37,559,000))

﻿ $37,793,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($36,622,000))

﻿ $36,661,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .(($113,009,000))

﻿ $113,896,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .(($61,447,000))

﻿ $61,641,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State Appropriation . . . .$424,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation . . . .(($11,500,000))

﻿ $11,590,000

Recreational Fisheries Enhancement—State

Appropriation . . . .(($2,975,000))

﻿ $2,985,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation. . . .$567,000

Warm Water Game Fish Account—State Appropriation . . . .$2,723,000

Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$849,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$219,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$775,000

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($111,251,000))

﻿ $116,758,000

Special Wildlife Account—State Appropriation . . . .$300,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal Appropriation . . . .$500,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$3,517,000

Wildlife Rehabilitation Account—State Appropriation . . . .$359,000

Hydraulic Project Approval Account—State Appropriation . . . .$668,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$2,814,000

Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid Recovery Account—

Federal Appropriation . . . .$5,001,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation . . . .$1,069,000

Oyster Reserve Land Account—State Appropriation . . . .$778,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($394,359,000))

﻿ $401,887,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $344,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 ((and)), $344,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $129,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation are provided solely to pay for emergency fire suppression costs. These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(2) $596,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $596,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for weed assessments and for payments in lieu of real property taxes to counties that elect to receive the payments for department owned game lands within the county.

(3) $300,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the aquatic invasive species and ballast water programs to address voluntary compliance and watercraft check stations and develop recommendations for future funding and the transition to new federal ballast water regulations. These recommendations shall be provided to the governor and legislature by June 1, 2016.

(4) Prior to submitting its 2017-2019 biennial operating and capital budget requests related to state fish hatcheries to the office of financial management, the department shall contract with the hatchery scientific review group (HSRG) to review the proposed requests. This review shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent with HSRG recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the requests based on their contributions to protecting wild salmonid stocks and meeting the recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate whether the proposed requests are being made in the most cost effective manner. The department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the office of financial management with its agency budget proposal.

(5) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a state match to support the Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the United States army corps of engineers((. Prior to implementation of any Puget Sound nearshore ecosystem restoration projects in Whatcom county, the department must consult with and seek, to the maximum extent practicable, consensus on those projects among appropriate landowners, federally recognized Indian tribes, agencies, and community and interest groups)) for activities and projects not within Whatcom county.

(6) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall identify additional opportunities for partnerships in order to keep fish hatcheries operational. Such partnerships shall aim to maintain fish production and salmon recovery with less reliance on state operating funds.

(7) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall conduct a stakeholder process with the department of ecology to develop recommendations to restructure the fees under RCW 90.16.050 and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015.

(8) The department shall maintain a working capital reserve in the nonrestricted portion of the state wildlife account of no more than five percent of projected expenses in the nonrestricted portion of the account.

(9) $72,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 274, Laws of 2015 (ESHB 1449).

(10) $352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $351,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 191, Laws of 2015 (SSB 5166).

(11) $438,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for wildland fire restoration activities on state wildlife areas.

(12) $546,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5583 (species status/fish and wildlife commission). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to the Northwest straits commission for assistance in conducting and evaluating the forage fish surveys in Puget Sound.

(14) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for payment of claims for confirmed cougar depredations on livestock.

(15) $100,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation is provided solely for ongoing department efforts to address elk hoof disease including monitoring prevalence in affected areas, evaluating survival of affected elk, and assessing management options in affected areas.

Sec. 308. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($51,961,000))

﻿ $51,416,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($54,771,000))

﻿ $48,725,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .(($27,133,000))

﻿ $30,079,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$2,372,000

Forest Development Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($53,463,000))

﻿ $53,620,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation . . . .(($4,806,000))

﻿ $6,647,000

Surveys and Maps Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($1,496,000))

﻿ $4,499,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation . . . .(($8,711,000))

﻿ $8,730,000

Resources Management Cost Account—State

Appropriation . . . .(($113,223,000))

﻿ $118,867,000

Surface Mining Reclamation Account—State

Appropriation . . . .(($3,926,000))

﻿ $3,950,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($5,000,000))

﻿ $163,155,000

Forest and Fish Support Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($9,011,000))

﻿ $10,128,000

Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$400,000

Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$34,000

Marine Resources Stewardship Trust Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$925,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation. . . .$5,438,000

Forest Practices Application Account—State

Appropriation . . . .(($1,763,000))

﻿ $1,967,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$1,004,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .$816,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation . . . .$696,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation . . . .$1,930,000

Community Forest Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$26,000

Agricultural College Trust Management Account—State

Appropriation . . . .(($2,864,000))

﻿ $2,873,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($351,743,000))

﻿ $518,297,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,420,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural college trust management account and are provided solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's agricultural college trust lands.

(2) (($21,055,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $21,055,000)) $15,530,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017((,)) and (($5,000,000)) $142,250,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation are provided solely for emergency fire suppression. ((The general fund—state appropriation and disaster response account—state appropriation provided in this subsection may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses. Agency indirect and administrative costs shall be allocated among the agency's remaining accounts and appropriations.)) The department of natural resources shall submit a quarterly report to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and planned expenditures from the disaster response account. This work shall be done in coordination with the military department.

(3) $5,000,000 of the forest and fish support account—state appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based, performance contracts with tribes to participate in the implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded may only contain indirect costs set at or below the rate in the contracting tribe's indirect cost agreement with the federal government. If federal funding for this purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $925,000 of the marine resources stewardship trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of priority marine management planning efforts including mapping activities, ecological assessment, data tools, and stakeholder engagement.

(5) $440,000 of the state general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $440,000 of the state general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for forest work crews that support correctional camps and are contingent upon continuing operations of the Naselle youth camp.

(6) (($2,947,000)) $2,390,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and (($2,947,000)) $2,390,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the department to carry out the forest practices adaptive management program pursuant to RCW 76.09.370 and the May 24, 2012, settlement agreement entered into by the department and the department of ecology. Scientific research must be carried out according to the master project schedule and work plan of cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research priorities adopted by the forest practices board. The forest practices board shall submit a report to the legislature following review, approval, and solicitation of public comment on the cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research master project schedule, to include: Cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research science and related adaptive management expenditure details, accomplishments, the use of cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research science in decision-making, and funding needs for the coming biennium. The report shall be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2016.

(7) $155,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for ongoing law enforcement, which the department may contract with local law enforcement agencies, and for noxious weed control, forest fire protection assessment, and other purchased services for the Teanaway community forest as provided in the Teanaway community forest management plan.

(8) The department shall maintain working capital reserves in the resource management cost account and the forest development account of no more than five percent of the amounts appropriated in each account.

(9) $337,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $311,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 182, Laws of 2015 (ESHB 2093).

(10) $569,000 of the disaster response account appropriation is provided solely for portable and mobile radios.

(11) $9,706,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6657 (wildfire management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $100,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for fuel reduction and creating firebreaks in and around the city of Walla Walla's mill creek watershed.

(13) $5,057 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Asotin county sheriff's office for the grizzly bear complex fire.

(14) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the department must continue to conduct outreach to and consult with relevant agencies, local governments, stakeholders, and interested legislators regarding the proposed aquatic reserve on state owned aquatic lands under Lake Kapowsin and potential alternative management approaches. During this time, the department may not establish the aquatic reserve.

Sec. 309. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($16,173,000))

﻿ $16,706,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($16,069,000))

﻿ $17,139,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .(($26,851,000))

﻿ $30,505,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$193,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation . . . .(($2,884,000))

﻿ $2,887,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($5,910,000))

﻿ $5,915,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation . . . .$73,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($68,153,000))

﻿ $73,418,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,108,445 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $6,102,905 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementing the food assistance program as defined in RCW 43.23.290.

(2) $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 106, Laws of 2015 (HB 1268).

(3) $575,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement a nutrient management training program for farmers that provides training in agronomic application of dairy nutrients, as defined in RCW 90.64.010. The department shall develop an accreditation process to track completion of training by individuals who apply manure. The department shall also offer to willing farms to review agronomic application of dairy nutrients, as defined in RCW 90.64.010, used in crop production, including when, where, and how much manure to apply to meet crop nutrient requirements and to protect waters of the state. These funds may also be used to increase inspection activities in watersheds, including those areas with impaired surface or ground water impairment. The department in consultation with interested stakeholders shall identify gaps in the manure management program, including existing rules and statutory language, and report on a strategy to address those gaps. This program shall be a two-year pilot and the department shall report to the governor and the legislature by December 31, 2015, June 30, 2016, and on June 30, 2017, on the level of participation and results of the program. In developing the curriculum for agronomic education and certification programs, the department will provide opportunity for input from interested parties including: Washington State University, state conservation commission, department of ecology, conservation district staff, representatives from agricultural, livestock, and crop organizations, environmental organizations, tribal government representatives, and certified crop advisers.

(4) $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely to analyze raw milk samples as required by chapter 15.36 RCW. The department shall report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2015, with recommendations for an assessment or a cost-recovery mechanism to support the department's activities associated with inspections and testing of raw milk samples.

(5) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for: (a) Assisting dairy farmers with deep soil sampling and record keeping; (b) assessing, analyzing, and reporting on lagoon storage on dairy farms in northern Puget Sound and Yakima basin counties; (c) working with Washington State University research and extension and the United States natural resources conservation service on improving effluent analysis and developing storage assessment tools and protocols to identify dairy lagoons and effluent storage systems that are a significant risk to state groundwater resources; and (d) providing engineering technical assistance to dairy farmers for effluent storage lagoon engineering to meet United States natural resources conservation service standards via conservation districts in northern Puget Sound and Yakima basin counties. The department of agriculture in cooperation with the department of ecology shall report to the legislature by July 1, 2017, with recommendations based on dairy lagoon and field assessments, including estimated public and private costs for reducing groundwater risk from lagoons and fields on dairy farms, and the role, scope, and associated costs of a state groundwater permit for dairy farmers.

(6) $145,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6206 (industrial hemp growing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6605 (solid waste/disease & pests). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 310. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust Account—State

Appropriation . . . .(($1,387,000))

﻿ $1,420,000

Sec. 311. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($2,319,000))

﻿ $2,332,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($2,338,000))

﻿ $2,348,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .(($9,895,000))

﻿ $9,949,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($2,109,000))

﻿ $2,117,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($701,000))

﻿ $705,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($17,362,000))

﻿ $17,451,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: By October 15, 2016, the Puget Sound partnership shall provide the governor a single, prioritized list of state agency 2017-2019 capital and operating budget requests related to Puget Sound restoration.

(End of part)

PART IV

TRANSPORTATION

Sec. 401. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($1,400,000))

﻿ $1,202,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($1,472,000))

﻿ $1,461,000

Architects' License Account—State Appropriation . . . .$1,007,000

Professional Engineers' Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($4,157,000))

﻿ $4,158,000

Real Estate Commission Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($11,524,000))

﻿ $11,528,000

Uniform Commercial Code Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($3,270,000))

﻿ $3,271,000

Real Estate Education Program Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$276,000

Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$1,837,000

Business and Professions Account—State

Appropriation . . . .(($18,218,000))

﻿ $18,375,000

Real Estate Research Account—State Appropriation . . . .$415,000

Geologists' Account—State Appropriation . . . .$53,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation . . . .$32,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($43,661,000))

﻿ $43,615,000

((The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $11,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5416 (vessel-related transactions). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 402. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PATROL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($39,855,000))

﻿ $41,038,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($38,094,000))

﻿ $39,107,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$16,074,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$3,070,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($6,508,000))

﻿ $6,440,000

Enhanced 911 Account—State Appropriation . . . .$3,230,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$3,532,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$1,443,000

Fire Service Trust Account—State Appropriation . . . .$131,000

Vehicle License Fraud Account—State Appropriation . . . .$255,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($8,000,000))

﻿ $36,754,000

Fire Service Training Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($9,997,000))

﻿ $11,608,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$54,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation . . . .$532,000

Fingerprint Identification Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$13,930,000

Sexually Oriented Business Fee Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$3,782,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($144,705,000))

﻿ $180,980,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $200,000 of the fire service training account—state appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12 construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide these services only to those districts that are located in counties without qualified review capabilities.

(2) $8,000,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964. The state patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall be done in coordination with the military department.

(3) $700,000 of the fire service training account—state appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship training program.

(4) $3,230,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for the first phase of the state patrol's plan to upgrade the criminal history system, and is subject to the same conditions, limitations and review provided in section 705 (4) through (6) of this act.

(5) $1,375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 247, Laws of 2015 (Substitute House Bill No. 1068).

(6) $3,200,000 of the fingerprint investigation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the second phase of the state patrol's plan to upgrade the criminal history system, and is subject to the same conditions, limitations and review provided in section 705 (4) through (6) of this act.

(7) Within amounts provided in this section, the Washington state patrol shall work with the consolidated technology services agency to explore the feasibility and appropriateness of using vacant data halls in the state data center as storage facilities for evidence collected by law enforcement agencies, including but not limited to the state patrol. The state patrol and the consolidated technology services agency shall develop a cost estimate for modifying the data center halls in order to fit this purpose. The state patrol shall submit a report on its findings to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015.

(8) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the state patrol to pay assessments charged by local improvement districts.

(End of part)

PART V

EDUCATION

Sec. 501. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($37,939,000))

﻿ $38,135,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($39,133,000))

﻿ $41,237,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$67,174,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .(($6,123,000))

﻿ $9,623,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$251,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$511,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$208,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($151,339,000))

﻿ $157,139,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($9,868,000)) $10,053,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and (($10,150,000)) $10,320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(a) The superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans civic education award.

(b) Districts shall report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction daily student unexcused absence data by school, using a uniform definition of unexcused absence as established by the superintendent.

(c) By September of each year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall produce an annual status report on implementation of the budget provisos in sections 501 and 513 of this act. The status report of each proviso shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: Purpose and objective, number of state staff funded by the proviso, number of contractors, status of proviso implementation, number of beneficiaries by year, list of beneficiaries, a comparison of budgeted funding and actual expenditures, other sources and amounts of funding, and proviso outcomes and achievements.

(d) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the secretary of state, shall update the program prepared and distributed under RCW 28A.230.150 for the observation of temperance and good citizenship day to include providing an opportunity for eligible students to register to vote at school.

(e) Districts shall annually report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction on: (i) The annual number of graduating high school seniors within the district earning the Washington state seal of biliteracy provided in RCW 28A.300.575; and (ii) the number of high school students earning competency-based high school credits for world languages by demonstrating proficiency in a language other than English. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year.

(2) $1,017,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and (($1,017,000)) $857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for activities associated with the implementation of new school finance systems required by chapter 236, Laws of 2010 (K-12 education funding) and chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (state's education system), including technical staff, systems reprogramming, and workgroup deliberations, including the quality education council and the data governance working group.

(3) $1,012,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,012,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the state board of education, including basic education assistance activities. Of these amounts, $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided for implementation of ((Initiative Measure No. 1240 (charter schools))) Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6194 (public non-common schools).

(4) $3,571,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and (($3,447,000)) $4,447,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to the professional educator standards board for the following:

(a) $1,050,000 in fiscal year 2016 and $1,050,000 in fiscal year 2017 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional educator standards board;

(b) $2,372,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and (($2,372,000)) $3,372,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are for grants to improve preservice teacher training and for funding of alternative routes to certification programs administered by the professional educator standards board. Alternative routes programs include the pipeline for paraeducators program, the retooling to teach conditional loan programs, and the recruiting Washington teachers program. Within this subsection (4)(b), up to $500,000 per fiscal year is available for grants to public or private colleges of education in Washington state to develop models and share best practices for increasing the classroom teaching experience of preservice training programs;

(c) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the professional educator standards board to develop educator interpreter standards and identify interpreter assessments that are available to school districts. Interpreter assessments should meet the following criteria: (A) Include both written assessment and performance assessment; (B) be offered by a national organization of professional sign language interpreters and transliterators; and (C) be designed to assess performance in more than one sign system or sign language. The board shall establish a performance standard, defining what constitutes a minimum assessment result, for each educational interpreter assessment identified. The board shall publicize the standards and assessments for school district use;

(d) $124,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 136, Laws of 2014 (paraeducator development).

(5) $266,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $266,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil rights.

(a) $5,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection shall be provided to the Washington state school directors association for the creation of a model policy and procedures for language access by limited-English proficient parents. In developing the model policy and procedures, the school directors association shall consider any guidance materials created by the United States department of justice, the United States department of education, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, regarding how school districts can effectively assess their language access needs and how to develop appropriately tailored language access plans. The model policy and procedures must at a minimum address:

(i) Guidance and procedures for timely and accurate identification of limited-English proficient parents and guardians and their language access needs;

(ii) A recommended process and procedures for when and how to access an interpreter;

(iii) A prohibition on the use of students or children as interpreters for school-related communications;

(iv) Procedures to ensure appropriate staff are aware of parents' or guardians' need for language assistance, including guidance for all school administrators, teachers, and other appropriate staff regarding when and how to access an interpreter or translation services in a timely manner; and

(v) A process for communicating with parents and guardians about their rights under federal and state law to be provided with accessible information that allows them to make informed choices regarding their child's education and how to access the resources and services available to them.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:

(i) Convene an advisory committee with representatives of parents, school administrators, school principals, classified and certificated staff, and other appropriate parties with interest in language access for limited-English parents to develop sample materials for school districts to disseminate to both school employees and parents regarding parents' rights under the model policy developed by the Washington state school directors' association and the resources available to assist parents and guardians in accessing the services available to them. The sample materials must be developed by July 1, 2016;

(ii) Maintain and have available upon request a list of school districts that have and have not adopted the Washington state school directors' association's model policy;

(iii) Adopt rules regarding school districts' communication of the language access policy and procedure to parents, students, employees, and volunteers; and

(iv) Publish to the agency web site a listing of language access services providers available to school districts, including but not limited to, the telephonic, in-person, or video-remote interpreter services vendors on contract with the state of Washington, including contact information and training programs that are available to support school districts in preparing employees for how to access and effectively use an interpreter.

(6) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the ongoing work of the education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.

(7) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on educational opportunity for military children).

(8) $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of ((Initiative Measure No. 1240 (charter schools))) Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6194 (public non-common schools).

(9) $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and research system (CEDARS).

(10) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for project citizen, a program sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and the center for civic education to promote participation in government by middle school students.

(11) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for collaborative schools for innovation and success authorized under chapter 53, Laws of 2012. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award $500,000 per year in funding for each collaborative school for innovation and success selected for participation in the pilot program during 2012.

(12) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 163, Laws of 2012 (foster care outcomes). The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually report each December on the implementation of the state's plan of cross-system collaboration to promote educational stability and improve education outcomes of foster youth.

(13) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 178, Laws of 2012 (open K-12 education resources).

(14) $93,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $93,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for chapter 185, Laws of 2011 (bullying prevention), which requires the office of the superintendent of public instruction to convene an ongoing workgroup on school bullying and harassment prevention. Within the amounts provided, $140,000 is for youth suicide prevention activities.

(15) $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 242, Laws of 2013 (state-tribal education compacts).

(16) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for competitive grants to school districts to increase the capacity of high schools to offer AP computer science courses. In making grant allocations, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must give priority to schools and districts in rural areas, with substantial enrollment of low-income students, and that do not offer AP computer science. School districts may apply to receive either or both of the following grants:

(a) A grant to establish partnerships to support computer science professionals from private industry serving on a voluntary basis as coinstructors along with a certificated teacher, including via synchronous video, for AP computer science courses; or

(b) A grant to purchase or upgrade technology and curriculum needed for AP computer science, as well as provide opportunities for professional development for classroom teachers to have the requisite knowledge and skills to teach AP computer science.

(17) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to convene a committee for the selection and recognition of Washington innovative schools. The committee shall select and recognize Washington innovative schools based on the selection criteria established by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in accordance with chapter 202, Laws of 2011 (innovation schools—recognition) and chapter 260, Laws of 2011 (innovation schools and zones).

(18) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Mobius science center to expand mobile outreach of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) education to students in rural, tribal, and low-income communities.

(19) $59,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to convene a task force to design a performance-based assistance and accountability system for the transitional bilingual instruction program. The office must submit a report with recommendations from the task force to the education and fiscal committees of the legislature by January 15, 2016.

(20) $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $131,000 of general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to perform on-going program reviews of alternative learning experience programs and dropout reengagement programs. The amounts provided in this subsection are sufficient for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to conduct ongoing consolidated program reviews of alternative learning experience programs and dropout reengagement programs established under chapter 20, Laws of 2010. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall include alternative learning education and dropout reengagement programs in its ongoing consolidated program reviews, as well as provide outreach and training to school districts regarding implementation of the programs. Findings from the program reviews will be used to support and prioritize the office of the superintendent of public instruction outreach and education efforts that assist school districts in implementing the programs in accordance with statute and legislative intent, as well as to support financial and performance audit work conducted by the office of the state auditor.

(21) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction for statewide implementation of career and technical education course equivalency frameworks authorized under RCW 28A.700.070 for math and science. This may include development of additional equivalency course frameworks, course performance assessments, and professional development for districts implementing the new frameworks. At least two of the science course frameworks must be in environmental science.

(22) $142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 103, Laws of 2014 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 6431) (youth suicide prevention).

(23) $208,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is provided solely to address additional audit resolutions and appeals in the alternative learning experience programs.

(24) $2,541,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,541,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a corps of nurses located at educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care to students, health education, and training for school staff.

(25) $210,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $210,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a nonviolence and leadership training program provided by the institute for community leadership.

(26) $1,221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.

(27) $2,549,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $3,360,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers scholarship and Washington higher education readiness program. The funds shall be used to: Support community involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer mentors with students selected as achievers scholars; and to identify and reduce barriers to college for low-income and underserved middle and high school students.

(28) $1,354,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,354,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for contracting with a college scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach to students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007.

(29) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $762,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation are provided solely for dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement programs, including the jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program, dropout prevention programs that provide student mentoring, and the building bridges statewide program. Starting in school year 2014-15, students in the foster care system or who are homeless shall be given priority by districts offering the jobs for America's graduates program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene staff representatives from high schools to meet and share best practices for dropout prevention. Of these amounts, $251,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, and $511,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the building bridges statewide program.

(30) $2,654,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,984,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills. State funding shall support the statewide administration of the inventory under RCW 28A.655.080(1) and the one-time implementation and training grants under RCW 28A.655.080(3) for schools implementing the inventory for the first time in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

(31) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to subsidize advanced placement exam fees and international baccalaureate class fees and exam fees for low-income students. To be eligible for the subsidy, a student must be either enrolled or eligible to participate in the federal free or reduced-price lunch program, and the student must have maximized the allowable federal contribution. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall set the subsidy in an amount so that the advanced placement exam fee does not exceed $15.00 and the combined class and exam fee for the international baccalaureate does not exceed $14.50.

(32) $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support district implementation of comprehensive guidance and planning programs consistent with RCW 28A.600.045.

(33) $2,864,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $3,758,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1546 (dual credit education opportunities).

(34) $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $54,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to convene a workgroup to recommend comprehensive benchmarks for developmentally appropriate interpersonal and decision-making knowledge and skills of social and emotional learning for grades kindergarten through high school that build upon what is being done in early learning. The workgroup shall submit recommendations to the education committees of the legislature, and the office of the governor by October 1, 2016.

(35) $122,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 3 (SHB No. 1813), Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (computer science).

(36)(a) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement a K-12 dual language expansion grant program to build and expand well-implemented, sustainable dual language programs and create state-level infrastructure dedicated to dual language instruction.

(b) The superintendent shall award grants to pairs of school districts for periods of two years. Each awarded pair must have one district with an established dual language program with a plan for expansion, and another district with the desire to implement a new dual language program.

(c) Grant funds may be used for professional development, supplemental materials, training, administrative staffing of the program, site visits, recruiting bilingual teachers and instructional aides, program evaluation, and coaching.

(37) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the urban school turnaround initiative as follows:

(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide grants of equal amounts to two schools that have previously received urban school turnaround initiative grants. The purpose of these grants is to assist the schools in maintaining gains made as a result of work completed under the original program, while also phasing out state funding support of the program.

(b) The office shall allocate the funds under this subsection (36) to the school district to be used exclusively in the selected schools. The district may not charge an overhead or indirect fee for the allocated funds or supplant other state, federal, or local funds in the selected schools. The school district shall use the funds for intensive supplemental instruction, services, and materials in the selected schools, including but not limited to professional development for school staff; updated curriculum, materials, and technology; extended learning opportunities for students; reduced class size; summer enrichment activities; school-based health clinics; and other research-based initiatives to dramatically turn around the performance and close the achievement gap in the schools. The office shall enter into an expenditure agreement with the school district under which any funds under this subsection (41) remaining unspent on August 31, 2017, shall be returned to the state. Priorities for the expenditure of the funds shall be determined by the leadership and staff of each school.

(38) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Kip Tokuda memorial Washington civil liberties public education program. The superintendent of public instruction shall award grants consistent with RCW 28A.300.410.

(39) $652,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the administration of the preliminary scholastic aptitude test to ninth and tenth grade participants in the college bound program. The superintendent of public instruction shall partner with a national nonprofit organization that offers the aptitude test and that will provide: (i) Early and annual feedback on student progress; (ii) detailed performance feedback connected to Washington's standards, instruction, and assessments; (iii) access to state-of-the-art learning tools including free, personalized practice; (iv) access to college and career planning tools; (v) personalized information packets to high-achieving, low-income students to increase the number of applications from this group of students to public four-year institutions of higher education and independent, nonprofit baccalaureate degree-granting institutions in Washington; and (vi) for income eligible students, the opportunity to take the preliminary scholastic aptitude test in eleventh grade at no cost, to take the scholastic aptitude test twice at no cost, and access to additional tools and score reports at no cost.

(40)(a) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for a grant to an entity that is exempt from taxation under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of the effective date of this section, that is affiliated and in good standing with a national congressionally chartered organization's standards under 36 U.S.C., subtitle II, part B, and that:

(i) Is facility-based and provides proven and tested recreational, educational, and character-building programs for children ages six to eighteen years of age;

(ii) Provides after school and summer programs in a minimum of fifty communities statewide, with youth development services available at least twenty hours weekly during the school year and for thirty hours weekly during summer programming;

(iii) Has adopted standards for care that at a minimum include staff ratios, staff training, health and safety standards, and mechanisms for assessing and enforcing the program's compliance with the standards;

(iv) Provides a process to receive and resolve parental complaints; and

(v) Conducts national criminal background checks for all employees and volunteers who work with children.

(b) The grant shall be used to pilot a program of academic, innovation, and mentoring. The purpose of the program is to enable eligible neighborhood youth development entities to provide out-of-school time programs for youth six to eighteen years of age that include educational services, mentoring, and linkages to positive, pro-social leisure and recreational activities. The programs must be designed for mentoring and academic enrichment that include at least two of the following three activity areas:

(i) Science, technology, engineering, and math (STEM);

(ii) Homework support and high-yield learning opportunities; and

(iii) Career exploration.

(c) The entity receiving the grant shall conduct the pilot in at least five communities statewide. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit a report to the appropriate education and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 31, 2015, and a final report by December 31, 2016. The report shall outline the programs established, target populations, and pre- and post-testing results.

(41) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to partner with a nonprofit organization providing music curriculum for kindergarten and first grade students and establish a grant program that provides start-up costs and materials for integrated music curriculum that links together other core curriculum. Preference shall be given to Title 1 schools, head start programs, early childhood education and assistance program sites, high poverty schools, schools with high mobility, and schools with low student achievement.

(42) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the computer science and education grant program to support the following three purposes: Train and credential teachers in computer sciences; provide and upgrade technology needed to learn computer science; and, for computer science frontiers grants to introduce students to and engage them in computer science. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must use the computer science learning standards adopted pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 1813 (computer science) in implementing the grant, to the extent possible. Additionally, grants provided for the purpose of introducing students to computer science are intended to support innovative ways to introduce and engage students from historically underrepresented groups, including girls, low-income students, and minority students, to computer science and to inspire them to enter computer science careers. Grant funds for the computer science and education grant program may be expended only to the extent that they are equally matched by private sources for the program, including gifts, grants, or endowments.

(43) $11,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $8,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6195 (basic education obligations). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(44) $134,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6243 (student mental health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(45) $907,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6408 (paraeducators). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(46) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to conduct a pilot program with one or more school districts to implement an emergency threat alert application that operates on desktop computers and mobile devices to notify: (a) The local law enforcement dispatch centers of the threat; (b) the closest geographically proximate state, county, and local patrol officers of the threat; and (c) the persons within the facility from where the alert originates of the threat. The pilot program shall utilize a communications portal connecting the person(s) sending the emergency threat alert; the local law enforcement dispatch centers; and the closest geographically proximate state, county, and local patrol officers via a software-as-a-service application. The office may partner with educational service districts, school districts, the state patrol, and other law enforcement entities for purposes of implementing the application and software-as-a-service in existing computer-aided dispatch systems. The office shall report the results of the pilot program to the education committees of the legislature by December 1, 2016.

Sec. 502. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($6,373,305,000))

﻿ $6,358,793,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($6,743,880,000))

﻿ $6,699,740,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State

Appropriation . . . .(($125,730,000))

﻿ $105,626,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($13,242,915,000))

﻿ $13,164,159,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as provided in the funding formulas and salary schedules in sections 502 and 503 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.

(c) From July 1, 2015, to August 31, 2015, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as provided in sections 502 and 503, chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess., as amended.

(d) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in September and on the first school day of each month October through June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district. Any school district concluding its basic education program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held in May in lieu of a June enrollment.

(e)(i) Funding provided in this part V of this act is sufficient to provide each full-time equivalent student with the minimum hours of instruction required under RCW 28A.150.220.

(ii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall align the agency rules defining a full-time equivalent student with the increase in the minimum instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220, as amended by the legislature in 2014.

(f) The superintendent shall adopt rules requiring school districts to report full-time equivalent student enrollment as provided in RCW 28A.655.210 and to carry out the requirement specified in subsections 2(c)(i)(B) and 2(c)(ii)(B) of this section.

(g) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, school districts must report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction the monthly actual average district-wide class size across each grade level of kindergarten, first grade, second grade, and third grade classes. The superintendent of public instruction shall report this information to the education and fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the senate by September 30th of each year.

(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years are determined using formula-generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.

(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW 28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, except that the allocation for guidance counselors in a middle school shall be 1.216 for the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, this enhancement is within the program of basic education. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW 28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(c)(i)(A) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of prototypical school on the following regular education average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection:

General education class size:

Grade

RCW 28A.150.260

2015-16

School Year

2016-17

School Year

Grade K

. . . .

22.00

19.00

Grade 1

. . . .

23.00

21.00

Grade 2

. . . .

24.00

22.00

Grade 3

. . . .

25.00

22.00

Grade 4

. . . .

27.00

27.00

Grades 5-6

. . . .

27.00

27.00

Grades 7-8

. . . .

28.53

28.53

Grades 9-12

. . . .

28.74

28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for laboratory science, career and technical education (CTE) and skill center programs average class size as provided in RCW 28A.150.260.

(B) For grades kindergarten through three, the superintendent shall allocate funding for class size reductions to the extent of, and in proportion to, the school district's demonstrated actual weighted average class size for grades kindergarten through three, down to the weighted average class size specified in subsection 2(c)(i)(A) of this section. At a minimum, the superintendent must allocate funding sufficient to fund a weighted average class size not to exceed 25.23 full-time equivalent students per teacher in these grades.

(ii)(A) For each level of prototypical school at which more than fifty percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, the superintendent shall allocate funding based on the following average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher:

General education class size in high poverty schools:

Grade

RCW 28A.150.260

2015-16

School Year

2016-17

School Year

Grade K

. . . .

18.00

17.00

Grade 1

. . . .

19.00

17.00

Grade 2

. . . .

22.00

18.00

Grade 3

. . . .

24.00

21.00

Grade 4

. . . .

27.00

27.00

Grades 5-6

. . . .

27.00

27.00

Grades 7-8

. . . .

28.53

28.53

Grades 9-12

. . . .

28.74

28.74

(B) For grades kindergarten through three, the superintendent shall allocate funding for class size reductions to the extent of, and in proportion to, the school district's demonstrated actual weighted average class size for grades kindergarten through three, down to the weighted average class size specified in subsection 2(c)(ii)(A) of this section. At a minimum, the superintendent must allocate funding sufficient to fund a weighted average class size not to exceed 25.23 full-time equivalent students per teacher in these grades.

(iii) The enhancements in this subsection (2)(c) are within the program of basic education.

(iv) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is 13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and

(v) Advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as general education schools in the same grade; and

(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and (a) of this subsection and is considered certificated instructional staff, except as provided in (d)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following combined rate per 1000 student full-time equivalent enrollment:

2015-16 School Year

2016-17 School Year

Career and Technical Education

3.07

3.07

Skill Center

3.41

3.41

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS

(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated administrative staff salaries for the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years for general education students are determined using the formula generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in each grade. The following prototypical school values shall determine the allocation for principals, assistance principals, and other certificated building level administrators:

Prototypical School Building:

Elementary School

. . . .

1.253

Middle School

. . . .

1.353

High School

. . . .

1.880

(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated school building-level administrator staff units at per student rates that are a multiple of the general education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following factors: Career and Technical Education students. . . .1.025

Skill Center students. . . .1.198

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and adjusted based on each district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade, except that the allocation for parent involvement coordinators in an elementary school shall be 0.0825 for the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, which enhancement is within the program of basic education.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS

In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and administrative staff units are provided for the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school year for the central office administrative costs of operating a school district, at the following rates:

(a) The total central office staff units provided in this subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b), by 5.3 percent.

(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.47 percent shall be allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3) of this section.

(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students, are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in (a) of this subsection.

(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student rates that exceed the general education rate established for students in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 1.46 percent in the 2015-16 school year and ((1.46)) 1.44 percent in the 2016-17 school year for career and technical education students, and 17.33 percent in the 2015-16 school year and ((17.33)) 17.31 percent in the 2016-17 school year for skill center students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 21.42 percent in the 2015-16 school year and 21.42 percent in the 2016-17 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 22.72 percent in the 2015-16 school year and 22.72 percent in the 2016-17 school year for classified salary allocations provided under subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the maintenance rate specified in section 504 of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows:

(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section; and

(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections (4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purpose of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated on the basis of 1,440 hours of work per year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS

Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC) incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.150.260.

(a) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component

2015-16

SCHOOL YEAR

2016-17

SCHOOL YEAR

Technology

$127.17

(($129.33)) $128.58

Utilities and Insurance

$345.55

(($351.43)) $349.36

Curriculum and Textbooks

$136.54

(($138.86)) $138.04

Other Supplies and Library Materials

$289.88

(($294.81)) $293.07

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated

and Classified Staff

$21.12

(($21.47)) $21.35

Facilities Maintenance

$171.19

(($174.10)) $173.06

Security and Central Office

$118.60

(($120.61)) $119.90

TOTAL BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$1,210.05

(($1,230.62)) $1,223.36

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,272.99 for the 2015-16 school year and (($1,294.63)) $1,286.99 for the 2016-17 school year.

(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and technical education programs generate a per student MSOC allocation of $1,431.65 for the 2015-16 school year and (($1,455.99)) $1,447.40 for the 2016-17 school year.

(d) Students in grades 9-12 generate per student FTE MSOC allocations in addition to the allocation provided in (a) of this subsection at the following rate:

MSOC Component

2015-16

SCHOOL YEAR

2016-17

SCHOOL YEAR

Technology

$36.57

(($37.19)) $36.97

Curriculum and Textbooks

$39.89

(($40.57)) $40.33

Other Supplies and Library Materials

$83.11

(($84.53)) $84.02

Instructional Professional Development for Certified

and Classified Staff

$6.65

(($6.76)) $6.73

TOTAL GRADE 9-12 BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$166.22

(($169.05)) $168.05

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS

For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, funding for substitute costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING

(a) Amounts provided in this section from July 1, 2015, to August 31, 2015, are adjusted to reflect provisions of chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess., as amended (allocation of funding for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident students.

(11) DROPOUT REENGAGEMENT PROGRAM

The superintendent shall adopt rules to require students claimed for general apportionment funding based on enrollment in dropout reengagement programs authorized under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.115 to meet requirements for at least weekly minimum instructional contact, academic counseling, career counseling, or case management contact. Districts must also provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the programs offered by the district or under contract with a provider, as well as accurate monthly headcount and full-time equivalent enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate enrollment counts of resident and nonresident students.

(12) VOLUNTARY ALL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS

Funding in this section is sufficient to fund voluntary all day kindergarten programs in qualifying schools in the 2015-16 school year and all schools in the 2016-17 school year, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315. Each kindergarten student who enrolls for the voluntary all-day program in a qualifying school shall count as one-half of one full-time equivalent student for purpose of making allocations under this section. Funding in this section provides all-day kindergarten programs for 71.88 percent of kindergarten enrollment in the 2015-16 school year and full funding in the 2016-17 school year, which enhancement is within the program of basic education.

(13) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND NECESSARY PLANTS

For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section on a per district basis.

(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:

(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and

(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;

(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:

(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated administrative staff unit;

(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half average annual full-time equivalent students;

(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this subsection;

(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;

(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified staff unit; and

(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under this subsection (12) shall generate additional MSOC allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC) allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental budget), adjusted annually for inflation.

(14) Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(15) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2016 and 2017 as follows:

(a) $620,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $631,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.

(b) $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for programs providing skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.

(16) $219,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $223,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for school district emergencies as certified by the superintendent of public instruction. Funding provided must be conditioned upon the written commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be awarded, if applicable. At the close of the fiscal year the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature on the allocations provided to districts and the nature of the emergency.

(17) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463, Laws of 2007.

(18) Students participating in running start programs may be funded up to a combined maximum enrollment of 1.2 FTE including school district and institution of higher education enrollment consistent with the running start course requirements provided in Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1546 (dual credit education opportunities). In calculating the combined 1.2 FTE, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may average the participating student's September through June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end dates for courses provided by the high school and higher education institution. Additionally, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the student achievement council, and the education data center, shall annually track and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of students participating in the running start program, including course load analyses at both the high school and community and technical college system.

(19) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (12) of this section, the following apply:

(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and

(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (12) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

(20)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic education and career and technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds. Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting purposes under this section.

(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported career and technical education program enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

(21) Funding in this section is sufficient to provide full general apportionment payments to school districts eligible for federal forest revenues as provided in RCW 28A.520.020. School districts receiving federal forest revenues shall not have their general apportionment reduced during the 2015-2017 biennium only.

Sec. 503. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($144,596,000))

﻿ $137,005,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($273,916,000))

﻿ $264,895,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($418,512,000))

﻿ $401,900,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding in this section is sufficient to provide a salary increase of 3.0 percent effective September 1, 2015, and 1.8 percent effective September 1, 2016. Of the salary increases provided in this section, the increases of 1.8 percent effective September 1, 2015, and of ((1.2)) 1.5 percent effective September 1, 2016, are provided as annual cost-of-living adjustments pursuant to ((Initiative Measure No. 732)) RCW 28A.400.205. The remaining portions of the salary increases are provided as a one-biennium salary increase for the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years as the state continues to review and revise state-funded salary allocations, and the increase expires August 31, 2017.

(2)(a) Additional salary adjustments as necessary to fund the base salaries for certificated instructional staff as listed for each district in LEAP Document 2, defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act.

(b) Additional salary adjustments to certain districts as necessary to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for certificated administrative staff as listed for each district in LEAP Document 2, defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act.

(c) Additional salary adjustments to certain districts as necessary to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for classified staff as listed for each district in LEAP Document 2, defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act.

(d) The appropriations in this subsection (1) include associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at 20.78 percent for the 2015-16 school year and 20.78 percent for the 2016-17 school year for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 19.22 percent for the 2015-16 school year and 19.22 percent for the 2016-17 school year for classified staff.

(e) The appropriations in this section include the increased or decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary allocation schedules and methodology in sections 502 and 503 of this act. Changes for special education result from changes in each district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for educational service districts and institutional education programs are determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections 502 and 503 of this act.

(f) The appropriations in this section include no salary adjustments for substitute teachers.

(3) The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is $768.00 per month for the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years. The appropriations in this section reflect the incremental change in cost of allocating rates of $780.00 per month for the 2015-16 school year and $780.00 per month for the 2016-17 school year.

(4) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.

Sec. 504. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($462,616,000))

﻿ $496,456,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($464,507,000))

﻿ $487,606,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($927,123,000))

﻿ $984,062,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for the transportation of eligible students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192. Funding in this section constitutes full implementation of RCW 28A.160.192, which enhancement is within the program of basic education. Students are considered eligible only if meeting the definitions provided in RCW 28A.160.160.

(b) For the 2015-16 ((and 2016-17)) school year((s)), the superintendent shall allocate funding for approved and operating charter schools as provided in RCW 28A.710.220(3) for September through November 2015. Per-student allocations for pupil transportation must be calculated using the allocation for the previous school year to the school district in which the charter school is located and the number of eligible students in the district, and must be distributed to the charter school based on the number of eligible students.

(c) From July 1, 2015 to August 31, 2015, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of students as provided in section 505, chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess., as amended.

(3) A maximum of $892,000 of this fiscal year 2016 appropriation and a maximum of $892,000 of the fiscal year 2017 appropriation may be expended for regional transportation coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.

(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district buses on the presales tax five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that school year.

(6) Funding levels in this section reflect waivers granted by the state board of education for four-day school weeks as allowed under RCW 28A.305.141.

(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually disburse payments for bus depreciation in August.

Sec. 505. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($814,541,000))

﻿ $801,787,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($864,715,000))

﻿ $851,007,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .(($476,539,000))

﻿ $483,539,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation . . . .$54,694,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,210,489,000))

﻿ $2,191,027,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure that special education students as a class receive their full share of the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and 504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an appropriate education for special education students under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall provide services through the special education excess cost allocation funded in this section.

(b) Funding provided within this section is sufficient for districts to provide school principals and lead special education teachers annual professional development on the best-practices for special education instruction and strategies for implementation. Districts shall annually provide a summary of professional development activities to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:

(i) Special education students are basic education students first;

(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the full basic education allocation; and

(iii) Special education students are basic education students for the entire school day.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.

(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(4)(a) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390, except that the calculation of the base allocation also includes allocations provided under section 502(4) for parent involvement coordinators in prototypical elementary schools and guidance counselors in prototypical middle schools as provided under section 502(2), which enhancement is within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2015 to August 31, 2015, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in section 507, chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess., as amended.

(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW 28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fund—state funded special education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent or 12.7 percent.

(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost services for special education students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW 28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units.

(7) (($23,679,000)) $20,691,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, (($28,092,000)) $24,473,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and (($29,574,000)) $27,350,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section. If the federal safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the federal appropriation in this subsection (7) in any fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of each school year, the superintendent shall recover safety net funds that were distributed prospectively but for which districts were not subsequently eligible.

(a) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, safety net funds shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (ESHB 2261).

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school year, except that the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in July of each school year for the Washington state school for the blind and for the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from the current school year.

(8) A maximum of $931,000 may be expended from the general fund—state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation and the special education program.

(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from educational service districts, and for staff development activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special education program.

(11) $255,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $256,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for two additional full-time equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to provide training and support to districts applying for safety net awards.

(12) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $100,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a special education family liaison position within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 506. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($8,219,000))

﻿ $8,208,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($8,205,000))

﻿ $8,200,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($16,424,000))

﻿ $16,408,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).

(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards and next generation science standards. Funding shall be distributed among the educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.

(3) The educational service districts, at the request of the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.305.130, may receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

Sec. 507. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($365,446,000))

﻿ $375,622,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($377,398,000))

﻿ $390,801,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($742,844,000))

﻿ $766,423,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time equivalent student is 4.27 percent from the 2014-15 school year to the 2015-16 school year and 1.09 percent from the 2015-16 school year to the 2016-17 school year.

Sec. 508. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($13,967,000))

﻿ $13,239,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($14,003,000))

﻿ $4,581,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$8,690,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($27,970,000))

﻿ $26,510,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund—state fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.

(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.

(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.

(5) (($685,000)) $757,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and (($685,000)) $757,000 of the ((general fund—state appropriation)) Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the department of social and health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections, programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and programs for juveniles operated by city and county jails.

(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 509. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($10,002,000))

﻿ $10,012,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($10,189,000))

﻿ $10,151,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($20,191,000))

﻿ $20,163,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c). In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i) Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the district's average staff mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act.

(b) From July 1, 2015, to August 31, 2015, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable students as provided in section 511, chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess., as amended.

(3) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the centrum program at Fort Worden state park.

Sec. 510. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR MISCELLANEOUS—NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .(($4,302,000))

﻿ $4,802,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,302,000))

﻿ $4,802,000

Sec. 511. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($120,121,000))

﻿ $116,893,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($122,191,000))

﻿ $131,145,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .(($94,180,000))

﻿ $99,280,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation . . . .$2,721,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation . . . .$1,613,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($340,826,000))

﻿ $351,652,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($33,620,000)) $29,137,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, (($34,504,000)) $36,648,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and (($15,868,000)) $16,268,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of the Washington state assessment system, including: (a) Development and implementation of retake assessments for high school students who are not successful in one or more content areas; and (b) development and implementation of alternative assessments or appeals procedures to implement the certificate of academic achievement. The superintendent of public instruction shall report quarterly on the progress on development and implementation of alternative assessments or appeals procedures. Within these amounts, the superintendent of public instruction shall contract for the early return of 10th grade student assessment results, on or around June 10th of each year. State funding to districts shall be limited to one collection of evidence payment per student, per content-area assessment. Within the amounts provided in this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall administer the biology collection of evidence. The alternative assessment method that consists of an evaluation of a collection of student work samples under RCW 28A.655.065 (5) and (6) is intended to provide an alternative way for students to meet the state standards for high school graduation purposes. To ensure that students are learning the state standards, prior to the collection of work samples being submitted to the state for evaluation, a classroom teacher or other educator must review the collection of work to determine whether the sample is likely to meet the minimum required score to meet the state standard.

(2) $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Washington state leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional partnership activities coordinated at the Pacific science center, including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal professional development, and school and community engagement events.

(3) $3,935,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $3,935,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of a new performance-based evaluation for certificated educators and other activities as provided in chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform) and chapter 35, Laws of 2012 (certificated employee evaluations).

(4) (($49,877,000)) $51,337,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and (($50,334,000)) $56,939,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,151 per teacher in the 2015-16 school year and a bonus of (($5,239)) $5,208 per teacher in the 2016-17 school year;

(b) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least 60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch;

(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications for bonuses under (b) of this subsection for less than one full school year receive bonuses in a prorated manner. All bonuses in this subsection will be paid in July of each school year. Bonuses in this subsection shall be reduced by a factor of 40 percent for first year NBPTS certified teachers, to reflect the portion of the instructional school year they are certified; and

(d) During the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, and within available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the national board for professional teaching standards may receive a conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in addition to compensation received under a district's salary schedule and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200. Recipients who fail to receive certification after three years are required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section in each school year.

(5) $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.

(6) $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to low-performing schools and school districts that are implementing comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.

(7) $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the development of a leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent organization to operate a state-of-the-art education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the state. Semiannually the independent organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and others to support the development and implementation of this program. Leadership academy partners shall include the state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator standards board, and others as the independent organization shall identify.

(8) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a statewide information technology (IT) academy program. This public-private partnership will provide educational software, as well as IT certification and software training opportunities for students and staff in public schools.

(9) $1,677,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,677,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for secondary career and technical education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008. If equally matched by private donations, $700,000 of the 2016 appropriation and $700,000 of the 2017 appropriation shall be used to support FIRST robotics programs. Of the amounts in this subsection, $100,000 of the fiscal year 2016 appropriation and $100,000 of the fiscal year 2017 appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of statewide supervision activities for career and technical education student leadership organizations.

(10) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for (a) staff at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in schools and districts across the state; and (b) grants of $2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year with professional development training for implementing integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in their schools.

(11) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for science, technology, engineering and mathematics lighthouse projects, consistent with chapter 238, Laws of 2010.

(12) $5,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $5,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a beginning educator support program. The program shall prioritize first year teachers in the mentoring program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for grant funding. The program provided by a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each beginning teacher aligned with professional certification; release time for mentors and new teachers to work together; and teacher observation time with accomplished peers. Funding may be used to provide statewide professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning educators.

(13) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for advanced project lead the way courses at ten high schools. To be eligible for funding in 2016, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2014-15 school year. The 2016 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2015-16 school year. To be eligible for funding in 2016, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2015-16 school year. The 2017 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2016-17 school year. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research and data center at the office of financial management shall track student participation and long-term outcome data.

(14) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for annual start-up or expansion grants for aerospace and manufacturing technical programs housed at four skill centers. The grants are provided for equipment and curriculum purchases. To be eligible for funding, the skill center must agree to provide regional high schools with access to a technology laboratory, expand manufacturing certificate and course offerings at the skill center, and provide a laboratory space for local high school teachers to engage in professional development in the instruction of courses leading to student employment certification in the aerospace and manufacturing industries. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall administer the grants in consultation with the center for excellence for aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing.

(15) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for annual start-up or expansion grants to six high schools to implement or expand the aerospace assembler program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research and data center at the office of financial management shall track student participation and long-term outcome data.

(16) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the provision of training for teachers in the performance-based teacher principal evaluation program.

(17) $7,235,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $9,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2013 (Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5329) (persistently failing schools).

(18) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to promote the financial literacy of students. The effort will be coordinated through the financial literacy public-private partnership.

(19) $99,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement a youth dropout prevention program that incorporates partnerships between community-based organizations, schools, food banks and farms or gardens. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall select one school district that must partner with an organization that is operating an existing similar program and that also has the ability to serve at least 40 students. Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, up to $10,000 may be used by the office of the superintendent of public instruction for administration of the program.

(20) $2,194,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,194,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to implement chapter 18, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5946) (strengthening student educational outcomes).

(21) (($1,061,000)) $856,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,061,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for chapter 184, Laws of 2013 (Second Substitute House Bill No. 1642) (academic acceleration) and other activities proven to increase rigorous course taking in K-12.

(22) $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for grants to high schools with existing international baccalaureate programs and enrollments of seventy percent or more students eligible for free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year to implement and sustain international baccalaureate programs.

(23) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for chapter 212, Laws of 2014 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 6074) (homeless student educational outcomes).

(((23))) (24) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for chapter 219, Laws of 2014 (Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6163) (expanded learning).

(((24))) (25) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for chapter 102, Laws of 2014 (Senate Bill No. 6424) (biliteracy seal).

(((25))) (26) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a nonprofit organization to integrate the state learning standards in English language arts, mathematics, and science with outdoor field studies and project-based and work-based learning opportunities aligned with the environmental, natural resource, and agricultural sectors.

(((26))) (27) $1,392,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for professional development and coaching for state-funded high school mathematics and science teachers. Training shall be provided in the 2015-16 school year by the science and mathematics coordinators at each educational service district. The professional development shall include instructional strategies and curriculum-specific training to improve outcomes for the statewide high school mathematics assessment or the high school biology assessment. The professional development provided may be broken up into shorter timeframes over the course of more than one day, but the aggregate amount of professional development provided shall be one full work day.

(28) Within the amounts provided in this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall obtain an existing student assessment inventory tool that is free and openly licensed and distribute the tool to every school district. Each school district shall use the student assessment inventory tool to identify all state-level and district-level assessments that are required of students. The state-required assessments should include: Reading proficiency assessments used for compliance with RCW 28A.320.202; the required statewide assessments under chapter 28A.655 RCW in grades three through eight and at the high school level in English language arts, mathematics, and science, as well as the practice and training tests used to prepare for them; and the high school end-of-course exams in mathematics under RCW 28A.655.066. District-required assessments should include: The second grade reading assessment used to comply with RCW 28A.300.320; interim smarter balanced assessments, if required; the measures of academic progress assessment, if required; and other required interim, benchmark, or summative standardized assessments, including assessments used in social studies, the arts, health, and physical education in accordance with RCW 28A.230.095, and for educational technology in accordance with RCW 28A.655.075. The assessments identified should not include assessments used to determine eligibility for any categorical program including the transitional bilingual instruction program, learning assistance program, highly capable program, special education program, or any formative or diagnostic assessments used solely to inform teacher instructional practices, other than those already identified. By October 15, 2016, each district shall report to the superintendent the amount of student time that is spent taking each assessment identified. By December 15, 2016, the superintendent shall summarize the information reported by the school districts and report to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate.

Sec. 512. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($118,057,000))

﻿ $118,648,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($121,869,000))

﻿ $124,498,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .$72,207,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($312,133,000))

﻿ $315,353,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual programs under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080, including programs for exited students, as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b) and the provisions of this section. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades kindergarten through twelve in school years 2015-16 and 2016-17; (ii) additional instruction of 3.0000 hours per week in school years 2015-16 and 2016-17 for the head count number of students who have exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within the previous two years based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment; (iii) fifteen transitional bilingual program students per teacher; (iv) 36 instructional weeks per year; (v) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (vi) the district's average staff mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act. Pursuant to RCW 28A.180.040(1)(g), the instructional hours specified in (a)(ii) of this subsection (2) are within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2015, to August 31, 2015, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual instruction programs as provided in section 514, chapter 4, Laws of 2013, 2nd sp. sess., as amended.

(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the following amounts: ((1.15)) 2.40 percent for school year 2015-16 and ((1.12)) 1.97 percent for school year 2016-17.

(4) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is for migrant education under Title I Part C and English language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the elementary and secondary education act.

(5) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual program students.

Sec. 513. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($223,440,000))

﻿ $224,311,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($227,490,000))

﻿ $228,338,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation . . . .(($448,468,000))

﻿ $494,468,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($899,398,000))

﻿ $947,117,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The general fund—state appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b)(i) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a), except that the allocation for the additional instructional hours shall be enhanced as provided in this section, which enhancements are within the program of the basic education. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (A) Additional instruction of 2.3975 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2015-16 school year and the 2016-17 school year; (B) fifteen learning assistance program students per teacher; (C) 36 instructional weeks per year; (D) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (E) the district's average staff mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act.

(ii) From July 1, 2015, to August 31, 2015, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in section 515, chapter 4, Laws of 2013, 2nd sp. sess., as amended.

(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12 for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or reduced-price lunch in the prior school year. The prior school year's October headcount enrollment for free and reduced-price lunch shall be as reported in the comprehensive education data and research system.

(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through the annual income verification process required by the national school lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the learning assistance program dated February, 2010.

(3) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act of 2001.

(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program.

(5) Within existing resources, during the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years, school districts are authorized to use funds allocated for the learning assistance program to also provide assistance to high school students who have not passed the state assessment in science.

Sec. 514. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through part V of this act are for allocations purposes only, unless specified by part V of this act, and do not entitle a particular district, district employee, or student to a specific service, beyond what has been expressly provided in statute. Part V of this act restates the requirements of various sections of Title 28A RCW. If any conflict exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control unless this act explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement. Any amounts provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts required by Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the program of basic education unless clearly stated by this act.

(2) To the maximum extent practicable, when adopting new or revised rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall attempt to seek legislative approval through the budget request process.

(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act, except as expressly provided in subsection (4) and (6) of this section.

(4) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2016, unless specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the director of financial management, the superintendent of public instruction may transfer state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2016 among the following programs to meet the apportionment schedule for a specified formula in another of these programs: General apportionment; employee compensation adjustments; pupil transportation; special education programs; institutional education programs; transitional bilingual programs; highly capable; and learning assistance programs.

(5) The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

(6) As required by RCW 28A.710.110 and Engrossed Second Senate Bill No. 6194 (public non-common schools), the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall transmit the charter school authorizer oversight fee for the charter school commission to the charter school oversight account.

(((5))) (7) State general fund appropriations distributed through Part V of this act for the operation and administration of charter schools as provided in chapter 28A.710 RCW shall not include state common school levy revenues collected under RCW 84.52.065.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PUBLIC NON-COMMON SCHOOLS

Washington opportunity pathways account—state

appropriation. . . .$28,515,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The superintendent shall distribute funding appropriated in this section to the following:

(a) Charter schools under chapter 28A.710 RCW as amended by Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6194 (public non-common schools);

(b) State-tribal education compacts under RCW 28A.715.040;

(c) The University of Washington under RCW 28A.185.040; and

(d) The military department under RCW 28A.150.310.

(2) Any enhancements, conditions, and limitations applicable to the funding formulas in chapter 28A.150 RCW and this part V of this act shall apply to the educational programs in this section.

(3) Funding is provided to reimburse charter schools for any loss of state revenue during the 2015-16 school year to the extent that: (a) The charter school was initially authorized under chapter 28A.710 RCW; (b) the school was providing public school services after December 1, 2015; and (c) the loss of state revenue was the direct result of the state supreme court decision in League of Women Voters, et al., v. Washington, Case No. 89714-0.

(4) The appropriations in this section include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

Sec. 516. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 517 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($490,000))

﻿ $497,000

((General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$336,000))

Charter Schools Oversight Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($737,000))

﻿ $400,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$546,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,563,000))

﻿ $1,443,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517. CHARTER SCHOOLS. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) Section 302, chapter . . . (E2SSB 6194), Laws of 2016;

(2) Section 303, chapter . . . (E2SSB 6194), Laws of 2016; and

(3) Section 304, chapter . . . (E2SSB 6194), Laws of 2016.

(End of part)

PART VI

HIGHER EDUCATION

Sec. 601. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 601 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The appropriations in sections 605 through 611 of this act are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) "Institutions" means the institutions of higher education receiving appropriations under sections 605 through 611 of this act.

(2) The legislature, the office of financial management, and other state agencies need consistent and accurate personnel data from institutions of higher education for policy planning purposes. Institutions of higher education shall report personnel data to the office of financial management for inclusion in the agency's data warehouse. Uniform reporting procedures shall be established by the office of financial management's office of the state human resources director for use by the reporting institutions, including provisions for common job classifications and common definitions of full-time equivalent staff. Annual contract amounts, number of contract months, and funding sources shall be consistently reported for employees under contract.

(3) In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards and the state board may waive all or a portion of operating fees for any student. State general fund appropriations shall not be provided to replace tuition and fee revenue foregone as a result of waivers granted under this subsection.

(4)(a) For institutions receiving appropriations in section 605 of this act, the only allowable salary increases provided are those with normally occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and staff retention, except as provided in Part IX of this act. In fiscal year 2016 and fiscal year 2017, the state board for community and technical colleges may use salary and benefit savings from faculty turnover to provide salary increments and associated benefits for faculty who qualify through professional development and training.

(b) For employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW, salary increases will be in accordance with the applicable collective bargaining agreement. However, an increase shall not be provided to any classified employee whose salary is above the approved salary range maximum for the class to which the employee's position is allocated.

(c) For each institution of higher education receiving appropriations under sections 606 through 611 of this act:

(i) The only allowable salary increases are those associated with normally occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and staff retention and as provided in Part IX of this act; and

(ii) Institutions may provide salary increases from other sources to instructional and research faculty at the universities and The Evergreen State College, exempt professional staff, teaching and research assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under chapter 41.80 RCW. Any salary increase granted under the authority of this subsection (4)(c)(ii) shall not be included in an institution's salary base for future state funding. It is the intent of the legislature that state general fund support for an institution shall not increase during the current or any future biennium as a result of any salary increases authorized under this subsection (4)(c)(ii).

(5) Fiscal or related staff for institutions receiving appropriations in sections 605 through 611 of this act shall form a technical tuition calculation work group with staff from the office of financial management including the education research and data center, nonpartisan legislative fiscal staff, and staff from legislative evaluation and accountability program. The work group shall determine key elements, definitions, assumptions, and drivers to forecast tuition revenue. By ((December 1, 2015)) January 8, 2016, the work group shall recommend a single methodology for budget, allotment, and budget scenario modeling purposes. The work group may consult with the caseload forecast council as needed.

(6) Within funds appropriated to institutions in sections 603 through 608 of this act, teacher preparation programs shall meet the requirements of RCW 28B.10.710 to incorporate information on the culture, history, and government of American Indian people in this state by integrating the curriculum developed and made available free of charge by the office of the superintendent of public instruction into existing programs or courses and may modify that curriculum in order to incorporate elements that have a regionally specific focus.

Sec. 602. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($626,297,000))

﻿ $627,343,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($646,381,000))

﻿ $648,871,000

Community/Technical College Capital Projects﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$17,548,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$96,108,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,386,334,000))

﻿ $1,389,870,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely as special funds for training and related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW 28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2016 and at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2017.

(2) $5,450,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for administration and customized training contracts through the job skills program. The state board shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these funds.

(3) $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for Seattle central college's expansion of allied health programs.

(4) (($16,672,000)) $17,059,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and (($17,027,000)) $17,506,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. For the 2016-17 academic year, if the total full-time equivalent annual average resident undergraduate enrollment for all community and technical colleges increases by more than one percent from the 2015-16 academic year, for purposes of calculating state funding for the tuition reduction backfill, only a one percent growth rate or all community and technical colleges' total preceding five-year average percentage full-time equivalent enrollment change, whichever is greater, may be used in calculating the backfill.

(5) $5,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year ((2014)) 2016 and $5,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year ((2015)) 2017 are provided solely for the student achievement initiative.

(6) $410,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, and (($410,000)) $860,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the expansion of the mathematics, engineering, and science achievement program. The state board shall report back to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the number of campuses and students served by December 31, 2018.

(7) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for Bellevue college to develop a baccalaureate of science degree in computer science. Subject to approval by the state board for community and technical colleges, in fiscal year 2016 Bellevue college shall develop a baccalaureate of science degree in computer science. This degree must be directed at high school graduates who may enroll directly as freshmen and transfer-oriented degree and professional and technical degree holders. Bellevue college will develop a plan for offering this new degree by no later than fall quarter 2016. With the exception of the amounts provided in this subsection, the plan must assume funding for this new degree will come through redistribution of the college's current per full-time enrollment funding. The plan shall be delivered to the state board by June 30, 2016.

(8) Pursuant to aerospace industry appropriations (chapter 1, Laws of 2013 3rd sp. sess.), $1,080,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for operating a fabrication composite wing incumbent worker training program to be housed at the Washington aerospace training and research center.

(9) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the state board to conduct a feasibility study for a potential new community and technical college in the Graham, Washington area.

(10) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the aerospace center of excellence currently hosted by Everett community college to:

(a) Increase statewide communications and outreach between industry sectors, industry organizations, businesses, K-12 schools, colleges, and universities;

(b) Enhance information technology to increase business and student accessibility and use of the center's web site; and

(c) Act as the information entry point for prospective students and job seekers regarding education, training, and employment in the industry.

(11) Community and technical colleges are not required to send mass mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts. Community and technical colleges shall consider lower cost alternatives, such as mailing postcards or brochures that direct individuals to online information and other ways of acquiring print catalogs.

(12) The state board for community and technical colleges shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(13)(a) The state board must provide quality assurance reports on the ctcLink project at the frequency directed by the office of chief information officer for review and for posting on its information technology project dashboard.

(b) The state board must develop a technology budget using a method similar to the state capital budget, identifying project costs, funding sources, and anticipated deliverables through each stage of the investment and across fiscal periods and biennia from project initiation to implementation. The budget must be updated at the frequency directed by the office of chief information officer for review and for posting on its information technology project dashboard.

(c) The state board must contract with an independent verification and validation consultant to review the software that currently exists to determine if configuration and integrations are complete and to evaluate readiness to move forward with the ctcLink project. The state board must define the consultant's scope of work in conjunction with the office of chief information officer and allow for independent reporting by the consultant to the office of chief information officer.

(d) The office of the chief information officer may suspend the ctcLink project at any time if the office of the chief information officer determines that the project is not meeting or is not expected to meet anticipated performance measures, implementation timelines, or budget estimates. Once suspension or termination occurs, the state board shall not make additional expenditures on the ctcLink project without approval of the chief information officer.

Sec. 603. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($278,887,000))

﻿ $278,086,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($312,687,000))

﻿ $316,832,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$27,998,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$3,010,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($392,000))

﻿ $492,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation. . . .$7,108,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation. . . .$6,730,000

Aquatic Land Enhancement Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,550,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2016). . . .$227,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2017). . . .$227,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($638,816,000))

﻿ $642,260,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the center for international trade in forest products in the college of forest resources.

(2) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for labor archives of Washington. The university shall work in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges.

(3) $8,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the family medicine residency network at the university to expand the number of residency slots available in Washington.

(4) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(5) $1,550,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state is provided solely for ocean acidification monitoring, forecasting, and research and for operation of the Washington ocean acidification center. By September 1, 2015, the center must provide a biennial work plan and begin quarterly progress reports to the Washington marine resources advisory council created under RCW 43.06.338.

(6) $6,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of degrees in the department of computer science and engineering at the Seattle campus.

(7) (($10,018,000)) $10,428,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and (($34,053,000)) $37,156,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. For the 2016-17 academic year, if the university's full-time equivalent annual average resident undergraduate enrollment increases by more than one percent from the 2015-16 academic year, for purposes of calculating state funding for the tuition reduction backfill, only a one percent growth rate or the university's preceding five-year average percentage full-time equivalent enrollment change, whichever is greater, may be used in calculating the backfill.

(8) $3,000,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account appropriation is provided solely to support the joint center for aerospace innovation technology.

(9) The University of Washington shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(10) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the latino health center.

(11) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the climate impacts group in the college of the environment.

(12) To the extent federal or private funding is available for this purpose, the center for education data and research at the University of Washington shall examine the relationship between participation in pension systems and teacher quality and mobility patterns in the state, including changes in the patterns that have occurred since the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium. The department of retirement systems shall facilitate University of Washington researchers' access to necessary individual-level data necessary to effectively conduct the study. The University of Washington shall ensure that no individually identifiable information will be disclosed at any time. An interim report on project findings must be completed by November 15, 2015, and a final report must be submitted to the governor and to the relevant committees of the legislature by October 15, 2016.

(13) (($3,600,000)) $2,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $5,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the continued operations of the Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, Idaho medical school program.

(14) Within the amounts provided in this section, the university must determine the feasibility of establishing inter-agency agreements with the department of corrections and the special commitment center within the department of social and health services to provide each entity with discount pricing on prescription hepatitis C medications or other prescription medications as allowed under section 340B of the public health services act. By January 1, 2016, the university must submit a report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature that includes the following:

(a) Description of the steps required to achieve institutional cooperation on 340B pricing;

(b) Identification of barriers to achieving such an agreement;

(c) Where possible, possible solutions to overcoming these barriers;

(d) Estimates of the fiscal impact of this agreement in the 2015-2017 and 2017-2019 fiscal biennia; and

(e) Timeline for implementation of such an agreement.

The inter-agency agreements must be in place prior to July 1, 2016, and the agreements must not jeopardize the University of Washington's current compliance status with 340B program rules and regulations.

(15) Within the funds appropriated in this section, the University of Washington shall:

(a) Review the scholarly literature on the short-term and long-term effects of marijuana use to assess if other states or private entities are conducting marijuana research in areas that may be useful to the state.

(b) Provide as part of its budget request for the 2017-2019 biennium:

(i) A list of intended marijuana research, including cost, duration, and scope;

(ii) Plans for partnerships with other universities, state agencies, or private entities, including entities outside the state, for purposes related to researching short-term and long-term effects of marijuana use.

(16) $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6519 (telemedicine). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6617 (alternative process awarding contracts). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $97,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6243 (social emotional/youth suicide). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 604. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($181,038,000))

﻿ $181,306,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($204,858,000))

﻿ $207,299,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$33,995,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$138,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$138,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($420,167,000))

﻿ $422,876,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a rural economic development and outreach coordinator.

(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(3) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal 2016 and $630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the creation of an electrical engineering program located in Bremerton. At full implementation, the university is expected to increase degree production by 25 new bachelor's degrees per year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (2) of this section.

(4) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the creation of software engineering and data analytic programs at the university center in Everett. At full implementation, the university is expected to enroll 50 students per academic year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (2) of this section.

(5) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for state match requirements related to the federal aviation administration grant.

(6) Washington State University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletic programs.

(7) (($8,714,000)) $8,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and (($25,266,000)) $27,068,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. For the 2016-17 academic year, if the university's full-time equivalent annual average resident undergraduate enrollment increases by more than one percent from the 2015-16 academic year, for purposes of calculating state funding for the tuition reduction backfill, only a one percent growth rate or the university's preceding five-year average percentage full-time equivalent enrollment change, whichever is greater, may be used in calculating the backfill.

(8) $1,098,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,402,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for development of a medical school in Spokane. Funding must support the development of the curriculum, the courses, the faculty, and the administrative structure required by the liaison committee on medical education.

(9) Within the funds appropriated in this section, Washington State University is required to provide administrative support to the sustainable aviation biofuels work group authorized under RCW 28B.30.904.

(10) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for the research and development of a marijuana breathalyzer.

(11) Within the funds appropriated in this section, Washington State University shall:

(a) Review the scholarly literature on the short-term and long-term effects of marijuana use to assess if other states or private entities are conducting marijuana research in areas that may be useful to the state.

(b) Provide as part of its budget request for the 2017-2019 biennium:

(i) A list of intended marijuana research, including cost, duration, and scope;

(ii) Plans for partnerships with other universities, state agencies, or private entities, including entities outside the state, for purposes related to researching short-term and long-term effects of marijuana use.

(12) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for a honey bee biology research position.

Sec. 605. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($38,603,000))

﻿ $38,646,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($47,498,000))

﻿ $48,080,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$16,598,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($102,699,000))

﻿ $103,324,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) At least $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and at least $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 must be expended on the Northwest autism center.

(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(3) Eastern Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(4) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation are provided solely for student success and advising programs that lead to increased degree completion.

(5) (($2,386,000)) $2,425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and (($9,171,000)) $9,698,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. For the 2016-17 academic year, if the university's full-time equivalent annual average resident undergraduate enrollment increases by more than one percent from the 2015-16 academic year, for purposes of calculating state funding for the tuition reduction backfill, only a one percent growth rate or the university's preceding five-year average percentage full-time equivalent enrollment change, whichever is greater, may be used in calculating the backfill.

Sec. 606. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($36,947,000))

﻿ $36,927,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($47,405,000))

﻿ $47,575,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$19,076,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($103,428,000))

﻿ $103,578,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) Central Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(3) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation are provided solely for student success and advising programs that lead to increased degree completion.

(4) (($2,757,000)) $2,740,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and (($10,632,000)) $10,826,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. For the 2016-17 academic year, if the university's full-time equivalent annual average resident undergraduate enrollment increases by more than one percent from the 2015-16 academic year, for purposes of calculating state funding for the tuition reduction backfill, only a one percent growth rate or the university's preceding five-year average percentage full-time equivalent enrollment change, whichever is greater, may be used in calculating the backfill.

Sec. 607. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($22,068,000))

﻿ $22,019,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($25,261,000))

﻿ $25,240,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$5,450,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($52,779,000))

﻿ $52,709,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 244, Laws of 2015 (college bound).

(2) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $32,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1491 (early care & education system). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) (($885,000)) $837,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and (($3,411,000)) $3,328,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. For the 2016-17 academic year, if the college's full-time equivalent annual average resident undergraduate enrollment increases by more than one percent from the 2015-16 academic year, for purposes of calculating state funding for the tuition reduction backfill, only a one percent growth rate or the college's preceding five-year average percentage full-time equivalent enrollment change, whichever is greater, may be used in calculating the backfill.

(4) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for the tuition metric study in Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for implementation of section 15 of chapter 269, Laws of 2015 (mental health/involuntary outpatient). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $295,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $295,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Washington state institute of public policy to contract with an objective, non-partisan, nationally known organization to examine policy options for increasing the availability of primary care services in rural Washington.

(7) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for student success and advising programs that lead to increased degree completion.

(8) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for The Evergreen State College to continue operations of the Longhouse Center and the Northwest Indian applied research institute.

(9) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to review existing research literature and begin a four-year study to evaluate outcomes regarding the cost effectiveness of FDA approved long-acting injectable medications that are indicated for the treatment of alcohol and opiate dependence. Any outcome evaluation will be focused on potential benefits to prison offenders being released into the community and the effects on recidivism. The institute shall submit a report summarizing cost-effectiveness findings from the existing research literature to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2016.

(10) Notwithstanding other provisions in this section, the board of directors for the Washington state institute for public policy may adjust due dates for projects included on the institute's 2015-2017 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.

(11) The Evergreen State College shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(12) $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6408 (paraeducator certification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 608. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 611 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($53,332,000))

﻿ $53,392,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($66,059,000))

﻿ $66,818,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$13,720,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($133,111,000))

﻿ $133,930,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) $910,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 ((and $630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are)) is provided solely for the creation of a computer and information systems security program located at Olympic college - Poulsbo. The university is expected to enroll 30 students each academic year beginning in fiscal year 2017. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the educational data centers as required in (1) of this section.

(3) Western Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(4) (($3,656,000)) $3,726,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and (($14,087,000)) $14,818,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program). If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. For the 2016-17 academic year, if the university's full-time equivalent annual average resident undergraduate enrollment increases by more than one percent from the 2015-16 academic year, for purposes of calculating state funding for the tuition reduction backfill, only a one percent growth rate or the university's preceding five-year average percentage full-time equivalent enrollment change, whichever is greater, may be used in calculating the backfill.

(5) $630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for student success and advising programs that lead to increased degree completions.

Sec. 609. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 612 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($5,528,000))

﻿ $5,507,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($5,631,000))

﻿ $5,634,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$4,859,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($16,018,000))

﻿ $16,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section include specific funding for the purposes of implementing Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6601 (Washington college savings program).

Sec. 610. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($260,978,000))

﻿ $255,029,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($244,061,000))

﻿ $238,213,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$11,798,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$300,000

Aerospace Training Student Loan Account—State

Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$104,000

Washington Opportunity Expansion Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$6,000,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$33,670,000

Health Professional Loan Repayment Scholarship

Program Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,720,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State﻿

Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($175,000,000))

﻿ $93,010,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$89,186,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($727,527,000))

﻿ $729,030,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($230,217,000)) $224,268,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, (($212,760,000)) $207,016,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, $12,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, ((and $135,000,000)) $82,451,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, and $78,215,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for student financial aid payments under the state need grant, implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program), and state work study programs including up to four percent administrative allowance for the state work study program.

(2) Changes made to the state need grant program in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium are continued in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, awards given to private institutions shall be the same amount as the prior year.

(3) Changes made to the state work study program in the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia are continued in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium including maintaining the increased required employer share of wages; adjusted employer match rates; discontinuation of nonresident student eligibility for the program; and revising distribution methods to institutions by taking into consideration other factors such as off-campus job development, historical utilization trends, and student need.

(4) Within the funds appropriated in this section, eligibility for the state need grant includes students with family incomes at or below 70 percent of the state median family income (MFI), adjusted for family size, and shall include students enrolled in three to five credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits. Awards for students with incomes between 51 and 70 percent of the state median shall be prorated at the following percentages of the award amount granted to those with incomes below 51 percent of the MFI: 70 percent for students with family incomes between 51 and 55 percent MFI; 65 percent for students with family incomes between 56 and 60 percent MFI; 60 percent for students with family incomes between 61 and 65 percent MFI; and 50 percent for students with family incomes between 66 and 70 percent MFI.

(5) Of the amounts provided in subsection (1) of this section, $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided for the council to process an alternative financial aid application system pursuant to RCW 28B.92.010.

(6)(a) Students who are eligible for the college bound scholarship shall be given priority for the state need grant program. These eligible college bound students whose family incomes are in the 0-65 percent median family income ranges must be awarded the maximum state need grant for which they are eligible under state policies and may not be denied maximum state need grant funding due to institutional policies or delayed awarding of college bound scholarship students. The council shall provide directions to institutions to maximize the number of college bound scholarship students receiving the maximum state need grant for which they are eligible with a goal of 100 percent coordination. Institutions shall identify all college bound scholarship students to receive state need grant priority. If an institution is unable to identify all college bound scholarship students at the time of initial state aid packaging, the institution should reserve state need grant funding sufficient to cover the projected enrollments of college bound scholarship students.

(b) In calculating the college bound award, public institutions of higher education are subject to the conditions and limitations in RCW 28B.15.102 and shall not utilize college bound funds to offset tuition costs from rate increases in excess of levels authorized in section 603, chapter 50, Laws of 2011.

(((6))) (7) $21,670,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation ((and $40,000,000)), $10,561,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, and $10,969,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the college bound scholarship program, implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5954 (college affordability program), and may support scholarships for summer session.

(((7))) (8) $2,236,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $2,236,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the passport to college program. The maximum scholarship award is up to $5,000. The board shall contract with a nonprofit organization to provide support services to increase student completion in their postsecondary program and shall, under this contract, provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal years 2016 and 2017 for this purpose.

(((8))) (9) $20,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $21,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to meet state match requirements associated with the opportunity scholarship program. The legislature will evaluate subsequent appropriations to the opportunity scholarship program based on the extent that additional private contributions are made, program spending patterns, and fund balance.

(((9))) (10) $3,825,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $3,825,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for expenditure into the health professionals loan repayment and scholarship program account. These amounts and $1,720,000 appropriated from the health professionals loan repayment and scholarship program account must be used to increase the number of licensed primary care health professionals to serve in licensed primary care health professional critical shortage areas. The office of student financial assistance and the department of health shall prioritize a portion of any nonfederal balances in the health professional loan repayment and scholarship fund for conditional loan repayment contracts with psychiatrists and with advanced registered nurse practitioners for work at one of the state-operated psychiatric hospitals. The office and department shall designate the state hospitals as health professional shortage areas if necessary for this purpose. The office shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to effectively incorporate three conditional loan repayments into the department's advanced psychiatric professional recruitment and retention strategies. The office may use these targeted amounts for other program participants should there be any remaining amounts after eligible psychiatrists and advanced registered nurse practitioners have been served. The office shall also work to prioritize loan repayments to professionals working at health care delivery sites that demonstrate a commitment to serving uninsured clients.

(((10))) (11) $56,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the council to design and implement a program that provides customized information to high-achieving (as determined by local school districts), low-income, high school students. "Low-income" means students who are from low-income families as defined by the education data center in RCW 43.41.400. For the purposes of designing, developing, and implementing the program, the council shall partner with a national entity that offers aptitude tests and shall consult with institutions of higher education with a physical location in Washington. The council shall implement the program no later than fall 2016, giving consideration to spring mailings in order to capture early action decisions offered by institutions of higher education and nonprofit baccalaureate degree-granting institutions. The information packet for students must include at a minimum:

(a) Materials that help students to choose colleges;

(b) An application guidance booklet;

(c) Application fee waivers, if available, for four-year institutions of higher education and independent nonprofit baccalaureate degree-granting institutions in the state that enable students receiving a packet to apply without paying application fees;

(d) Information on college affordability and financial aid that includes information on the net cost of attendance for each four-year institution of higher education and each nonprofit baccalaureate degree-granting institution, and information on merit and need-based aid from federal, state, and institutional sources; and

(e) A personally addressed cover letter signed by the governor and the president of each four-year institution of higher education and nonprofit baccalaureate degree-granting institution in the state.

(12) $6,000,000 of the opportunity expansion account—state appropriation is provided solely for the opportunity expansion program in RCW 28B.145.060. At the direction of the opportunity scholarship board, the council must distribute the funding provided in this subsection to institutions of higher education to increase the number of baccalaureate degrees produced in high employer demand and other programs of study.

Sec. 611. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 614 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($1,646,000))

﻿ $1,647,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$1,668,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($55,142,000))

﻿ $55,141,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$72,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$58,528,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium the board shall not designate recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence or recognize them at award ceremonies as provided in RCW 28C.04.535.

(2) The health workforce council of the state workforce training and education coordinating board, in partnership with work underway with the office of the governor, shall, within resources available for such purpose, but not to exceed $250,000, assess workforce shortages across behavioral health disciplines. The board shall create a recommended action plan to address behavioral health workforce shortages and to meet the increased demand for services now, and with the integration of behavioral health and primary care in 2020. The analysis and recommended action plan shall align with the recommendations of the adult behavioral health system task force and related work of the healthier Washington initiative. The board shall consider workforce data, gaps, distribution, pipeline, development, and infrastructure, including innovative high school, postsecondary, and postgraduate programs to evolve, align, and respond accordingly to our state's behavioral health and related and integrated primary care workforce needs. The board will submit preliminary recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by October 15, 2016. The board will continue its work and submit final recommendations in 2017.

Sec. 612. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($89,572,000))

﻿ $82,532,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($103,257,000))

﻿ $143,218,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($290,204,000))

﻿ $299,930,000

Opportunity Pathways Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($80,000,000))

﻿ $42,795,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$28,250,000

Home Visiting Services Account—State Appropriation. . . .$4,868,000

Home Visiting Services Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($25,250,000))

﻿ $25,249,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($621,401,000))

﻿ $626,842,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $44,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, (($44,800,000)) $82,005,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, $24,250,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and (($80,000,000)) $42,795,000 of the opportunity pathways account appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education and assistance program. These amounts shall support at least 11,691 slots in fiscal year 2016 and 11,691 slots in fiscal year 2017. Of these amounts, $10,284,000 is a portion of the biennial amount of state maintenance of effort dollars required to receive federal child care and development fund grant dollars.

(2) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely to develop and provide culturally relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers.

(3) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration, and other costs associated with child care subsidies. The department shall transfer a portion of this grant to the department of social and health services to fund the child care subsidies paid by the department of social and health services on behalf of the department of early learning.

(4) $1,434,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 is provided solely for expenditure into the home visiting services account. This funding is intended to meet federal maintenance of effort requirements and to secure private matching funds. Additional amounts are provided separately in part II of this act. The division of behavioral health and recovery must transfer these amounts into the home visiting services account.

(5)(a) (($153,717,000)) $153,244,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.215.135.

(b) In addition to groups that were given prioritized access to the working connections child care program effective March 1, 2011, the department shall also give prioritized access into the program to families in which a parent of a child in care is a minor who is not living with a parent or guardian and who is a full-time student in a high school that has a school-sponsored on-site child care center. The department will also give priority access to the working connections child care program to families in which a parent is participating in the family assessment response program or child protective services with the department of social and health services.

(6) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with the office of financial management and the department of social and health services shall report enrollments and active caseload for the working connections child care program to the legislative fiscal committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight task force on an agreed upon schedule. The report shall also identify the number of cases participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and working connections child care. The department must also report on the number of children served through contracted slots.

(7) (($1,194,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $1,926,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and $13,424,000)) $16,544,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation ((are)) is provided solely for the seasonal child care program. If federal sequestration cuts are realized, cuts to the seasonal child care program must be proportional to other federal reductions made within the department.

(8) $4,674,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, $2,522,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 and $2,152,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood intervention prevention services (ECLIPSE) program. The department shall contract for ECLIPSE services to provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment services to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children. Priority for services shall be given to children referred from the department of social and health services children's administration. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, $60,000 per fiscal year may be used by the department for administering the ECLIPSE program, if needed. The department must amend the state plan for the child care development block grant to allow use of a portion of those federal funds to support the general fund—federal appropriation in this subsection.

(9) $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $46,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1126 (fatality review). ((If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(10) (($28,637,000)) $24,723,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016, (($47,143,000)) $52,943,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017, and (($26,206,000)) $29,799,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1491 (early care and education system). ((If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $60,817,000 is for quality rating and improvement system activities, including but not limited to: Level two activities, technical assistance, coaching, rating, and quality improvement awards. The department shall place a 10 percent administrative overhead cap on any contract entered into with the University of Washington.

(b) $10,895,000 is for degree and retention incentives and scholarship and tuition reimbursements.

(c) (($14,192,000)) $18,841,000 is for level 2 payments and ((tiered reimbursement)) tiers 3, 4, and 5 payments for child care licensed family home and center providers. Additional amounts for licensed family home providers are provided separately in fiscal year 2016 as part of a collective bargaining agreement part IX of this act.

(11) $1,808,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $1,728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for reducing barriers for low-income providers to participate in the early achievers program consistent with Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1491 (early care and education system). ((If the bill is not enacted by July 10, 2015, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $2,000,000 is for need-based grants. Additional amounts for child care licensed family home providers are provided separately as part of a collective bargaining agreement part IX of this act.

(b) $1,336,000 is for the creation of a substitute pool.

(c) $200,000 is for the development of materials and assessments in provider and family home languages.

(12) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit entity experienced in the provision of promoting early literacy for children through pediatric office visits.

(13) $4,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for early intervention assessment and services.

(14) ((Information and technology investments and proposed projects for time capture, payroll, payment processes, and eligibility and authorization systems within the department)) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management and authorization systems within the department of early learning are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer. The department must collaborate with the office of the chief information officer to develop a strategic business and technology architecture plan for a child care attendance and billing system that supports a statewide architecture.

(15)(a)(i) The department of early learning is required to provide to the education research and data center, housed at the office of financial management, data on all state-funded early childhood programs. These programs include the early support for infants and toddlers, early childhood education and assistance program (ECEAP), and the working connections and seasonal subsidized childcare programs including license exempt facilities or family, friend, and neighbor care. The data provided by the department to the education research data center must include information on children who participate in these programs, including their name and date of birth, and dates the child received services at a particular facility.

(ii) ECEAP early learning professionals must enter any new qualifications into the department's professional development registry during the 2015-16 school year. By October 2017, the department must provide updated ECEAP early learning professional data to the education research data center.

(iii) The department must request federally funded head start programs to voluntarily provide data to the department and the education research data center that is equivalent to what is being provided for state-funded programs.

(iv) The education research and data center must provide an updated report on early childhood program participation and K-12 outcomes to the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee using available data by November 2015 for the school year ending in 2014 and again in March 2016 for the school year ending in 2015.

(b) The department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, must withhold payment for services to early childhood programs that do not report on the name, date of birth, and the dates a child received services at a particular facility.

(16) The department shall work with state and local law enforcement, federally recognized tribal governments, and tribal law enforcement to develop a process for expediting fingerprinting and data collection necessary to conduct background checks for tribal early learning and child care providers.

(17) Within the appropriations provided in this section, the department may procure information technology solutions that create savings and improve the efficiency of health and safety monitoring of child care providers and allow the department to meet the requirements of the federal child care development block grant (CCDBG) act of 2014 and the early start act. Amounts from appropriations provided solely for the purposes in subsection (10) of this section that can be tied to specific savings and efficiencies from within that subsection may be used for the purpose of this subsection.

Sec. 613. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 616 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($6,409,000))

﻿ $6,403,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($6,535,000))

﻿ $6,564,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$34,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($12,978,000))

﻿ $13,001,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the school to offer to students enrolled in grades nine through twelve for full-time instructional services at the Vancouver campus with the opportunity to participate in a minimum of one thousand eighty hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn twenty-four high school credits.

Sec. 614. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 617 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($9,953,000))

﻿ $10,014,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($10,086,000))

﻿ $10,101,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($20,039,000))

﻿ $20,115,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the center to offer to students enrolled in grades nine through twelve for full-time instructional services at the Vancouver campus with the opportunity to participate in a minimum of one thousand eighty hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn twenty-four high school credits.

Sec. 615. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 618 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($1,118,000))

﻿ $1,142,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($1,148,000))

﻿ $1,165,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,100,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$18,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,384,000))

﻿ $4,425,000

Sec. 616. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 619 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($2,352,000))

﻿ $2,397,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($2,412,000))

﻿ $2,476,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,764,000))

﻿ $4,873,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2016 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2017 are provided solely for the restoration of the Washington women's history consortium created in RCW 27.34.360. These amounts must be used for staff, professional archiving, public programs and exhibits, and information technology investments to enable the society to restore its central database of women's history.

Sec. 617. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 620 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($1,714,000))

﻿ $1,788,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .(($1,808,000))

﻿ $1,833,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($3,522,000))

﻿ $3,621,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The eastern Washington state historical society shall develop a plan for creating a performance-based partnership agreement between the state of Washington and the not-for-profit Northwest museum of arts and culture for implementation in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium. The plan at minimum shall include strategies to increase nonstate revenues for the operation of the museum and estimate the minimum amount of state funding necessary to preserve, maintain, and protect state-owned facilities and assets. The plan shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2016.

(End of part)

PART VII

SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 701. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($1,067,157,000))

﻿ $1,059,582,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($1,133,037,000))

﻿ $1,108,296,000

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation . . . .(($6,462,000))

﻿ $10,011,000

Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation . . . .$1,430,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$62,000

Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water Supply Development

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$82,000

State Taxable Building Construction

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$846,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,208,086,000))

﻿ $2,180,309,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

Sec. 702. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$1,400,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$1,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation . . . .(($1,301,000))

﻿ $2,013,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($6,000))

﻿ $16,000

Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water Supply

Development Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($11,000))

﻿ $18,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation. . . .(($53,000))

﻿ $171,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,171,000))

﻿ $5,018,000

Sec. 703. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 705 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT POOL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .(($17,000,000))

﻿ $15,677,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($8,000,000))

﻿ $12,157,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($60,168,000))

﻿ $73,857,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$148,000

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .$807,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($86,123,000))

﻿ $102,646,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for deposit to the information technology investment revolving account, hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the director of financial management or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. Funds in the account are provided solely for the information technology projects shown in this section or in LEAP omnibus document IT-2015, dated June 28, 2015, which is hereby incorporated by reference. To facilitate the transfer of moneys from other funds and accounts that are associated with projects contained in this section or in LEAP omnibus document IT-2015, dated June 28, 2015, the state treasurer is directed to transfer moneys from other funds and accounts in an amount not to exceed $807,000 to the information technology investment revolving account in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management.

(2) Agencies may apply to the office of financial management to receive funds from the information technology investment revolving account.

(a) When selecting projects for allocations from the account, sufficient funding must be reserved within the account to implement the following projects shown in LEAP omnibus document IT-2015 dated June 28, 2015:

(i) Public Disclosure Commission:

(A) PC Lease Program

(B) Customer Serv/Case Mgmt System

(C) Cloud Based Communication Svcs

(ii) Department of Social and Health Services:

(A) Align Funding with ICD-10 Imp.

(B) ESAR Phase II and III

(C) Interface with New EBT Vendor

(iii) Health Care Authority:

(A) ProviderOne O&M

(B) ProviderOne Stabilization

(C) ProviderOne Enhancements

(D) ProviderOne Contract Compliance

(E) ProviderOne Phase Two

(b) Funds must also be reserved to complete the ESAR consultation project at the department of social and health services and the IP overtime system at the health care authority.

(c) For the remaining projects shown in LEAP omnibus document IT-2015, preference must be given to projects that utilize a commercial off-the-shelf or software as a service technology solution.

(3) Allocations and allotments may be made only during discrete stages of projects, which at a minimum must include a planning stage, procurement stage, and implementation and integration stage. At least fourteen days prior to an allocation or allotment of funds to an agency, the office of financial management, jointly with the office of the chief information officer, must deliver to the legislative fiscal committees the following information for each project receiving an allocation from the account:

(a) A technology budget using a method similar to the state capital budget, identifying project costs, funding sources, and anticipated deliverables through each stage of the investment and across fiscal periods and biennia from project initiation to implementation. If the project affects more than one agency, a technology budget must be prepared for each agency;

(b) The technology implementation plan that includes:

(i) An organizational chart of the project management team that identifies team members and their roles and responsibilities;

(ii) The office of the chief information officer staff assigned to the project;

(iii) An implementation schedule covering activities, critical milestones, and deliverables at each stage of the project for the life of the project at each agency affected by the project; and

(iv) Performance measures used to determine that the project is on time, within budget, and meeting expectations for quality of work product.

(c) A letter from the office of the chief information officer certifying that:

(i) The project is consistent with the state's enterprise architecture and other policies developed by the office of the chief information officer;

(ii) The agency has the organizational capacity, preparedness, and leadership to implement the project successfully;

(iii) The agency has adequately assessed and minimized the risks inherent with the project;

(iv) The project has the management, staffing, and oversight resources needed for the cost, complexity, and risks associated with the project;

(v) The project has implementation schedules and performance measures for timeliness, deliverables, quality, and budget;

(vi) The agency has an adequate risk management plan that also enables the office of the chief information officer to assess, intervene, and take necessary action when performance measures are not being met; and

(vii) For any investment that does not use commercial off-the-shelf or software as a service technology solution, the proposed project represents the best business solution and should not be delayed.

(4) For any project that exceeds two million dollars in total funds to complete or requires more than one biennium to complete:

(a) Quality assurance for the project must report independently to the office of the chief information officer;

(b) The office of the chief information officer must review, and if necessary, revise the proposed project to ensure it is flexible and adaptable to advances in technology; and

(c) The agency must consult with the contracting division of the department of enterprise services for a review of all contracts and agreements related to the project's information technology procurements.

(5) The office of the chief information officer may suspend or terminate a project at any time if the office of the chief information officer determines that the project is not meeting or is not expected to meet anticipated performance measures. Once suspension or termination occurs, the agency shall not make additional expenditures on the project without approval of the state chief information officer. If a project is terminated, the office of financial management must terminate the agency's allocation from the information technology investment revolving account and the agency shall return any remaining funds to the account to be reallocated to other projects by the office of financial management.

(6) Any cost to administer or implement this section or for projects contained in LEAP omnibus document IT-2015, dated June 28, 2015, must be paid from the information technology investment revolving account. For any other information technology project made subject to the conditions, limitations, and review of this section, the cost to implement this section must be paid from the funds for that project.

Sec. 704. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 712 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—COUNTY CLERK LEGAL FINANCIAL OBLIGATION GRANTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016) . . . .$541,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .(($441,000))

﻿ $343,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($982,000))

﻿ $884,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: By October 1st of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall distribute the appropriations to the following county clerk offices in the amounts designated as grants for the collection of legal financial obligations pursuant to RCW 2.56.190:

County Clerk

FY 16

FY 17

Adams County Clerk

$2,103

(($1,714)) $1,333

Asotin County Clerk

$2,935

(($2,392)) $1,860

Benton County ((and Franklin County)) Clerk

$18,231

(($14,858)) $11,556

Chelan County Clerk

$7,399

(($6,030)) $4,690

Clallam County Clerk

$5,832

(($4,753)) $3,697

Clark County Clerk

$32,635

(($26,597)) $20,687

Columbia County Clerk

$384

(($313)) $243

Cowlitz County Clerk

$16,923

(($13,792)) $10,727

Douglas County Clerk

$3,032

(($2,471)) $1,922

Ferry County Clerk

$422

(($344)) $268

Franklin County Clerk

$5,486

(($4,471)) $3,477

Garfield County Clerk

$243

(($198)) $154

Grant County Clerk

$10,107

(($8,237)) $6,407

Grays Harbor County Clerk

$8,659

(($7,057)) $5,489

Island County Clerk

$3,059

(($2,493)) $1,939

Jefferson County Clerk

$1,859

(($1,515)) $1,178

King County Court Clerk

$119,290

(($97,266)) $75,651

Kitsap County Clerk

$22,242

(($18,127)) $14,099

Kittitas County Clerk

$3,551

(($2,894)) $2,251

Klickitat County Clerk

$2,151

(($1,753)) $1,363

Lewis County Clerk

$10,340

(($8,427)) $6,554

Lincoln County Clerk

$724

(($590)) $459

Mason County Clerk

$5,146

(($4,194)) $3,262

Okanogan County Clerk

$3,978

(($3,242)) $2,522

Pacific County Clerk

$2,411

(($1,965)) $1,528

Pend Orielle County Clerk

$611

(($498)) $387

Pierce County Clerk

$77,102

(($62,837)) $48,873

San Juan County Clerk

$605

(($493)) $383

Skagit County Clerk

$11,059

(($9,013)) $7,010

Skamania County Clerk

$1,151

(($938)) $730

Snohomish County Clerk

$38,143

(($31,086)) $24,178

Spokane County Clerk

$44,825

(($36,578)) $28,450

Stevens County Clerk

$2,984

(($2,432)) $1,892

Thurston County Clerk

$22,204

(($18,096)) $14,075

Wahkiakum County Clerk

$400

(($326)) $254

Walla Walla County Clerk

$4,935

(($4,022)) $3,128

Whatcom County Clerk

$20,728

(($16,893)) $13,139

Whitman County Clerk

$2,048

(($1,669)) $1,298

Yakima County Clerk

$25,063

(($20,426)) $15,887

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS

$541,000

(($441,000)) $343,000

Sec. 705. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 725 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—EMERGENCY DROUGHT RESPONSE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .(($14,000,000))

﻿ $9,500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for expenditure into the state drought preparedness account established in RCW 43.83B.430.

(2) The appropriation in this section shall be reduced by any expenditures for this purpose under Substitute Senate Bill No. 6125 (emergency drought response).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS

The following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund for fiscal year 2016, unless otherwise indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations for sundry claims.

(1) These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved by the director of the department of enterprise services, except as otherwise provided, for reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110, as follows:

(a) David Wozny, claim number 99970105. . . .$9,832

(b) Hugo Garibay, claim number 99970106. . . .$10,246

(c) Emery Christianson, claim number 99970107. . . .$7,445

(d) Anton Ehinger, claim number 99970108. . . .$6,726

(e) Alan Graham, claim number 99970109. . . .$5,495

(f) Joseph Compher, claim number 99970110. . . .$32,235

(g) Alex Hallowell, claim number 99970111. . . .$22,403

(h) James Clark, claim number 99970112. . . .$8,250

(i) David Hill, claim number 99970114. . . .$3,056

(j) David Maulen, claim number 99970113. . . .$19,726

(k) Stephen White, claim number 99970115. . . .$25,097

(l) Richard Brunhaver, claim number 99970116. . . .$14,079

(m) James Barnett, claim number 99970117. . . .$39,608

(n) Justin Carter, claim number 99970118. . . .$35,179

(o) Derrick Moore, claim number 99970119. . . .$23,474

(p) Joshua Bessey, claim number 99970120. . . .$66,600

(q) Jason Swanberg, claim number 99970121. . . .$7,905

(r) Max Willis, claim number 99970123. . . .$26,205

(s) Jesica Bush, claim number 99970124. . . .$22,990

(t) Rolondo Cavazos, claim number 99970125. . . .$32,438

(2) These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved by the director of the department of enterprise services, except as otherwise provided, for payment of compensation for wrongful convictions pursuant to RCW 4.100.060, as follows:

Michael Wheeler, claim number 99970122. . . .$466,711

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—HOOD CANAL AQUATIC REHABILITATION BOND ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$3,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is provided solely for expenditure into the hood canal aquatic rehabilitation bond account to ensure the account is not in deficit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—MOORE v. HCA SETTLEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$31,560,000

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .$7,784,000

Total Appropriated Funds. . . .$39,344,000

Nonappropriated Funds. . . .$40,656,000

TOTAL. . . .$80,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments made to agency and institution appropriations for expenditure into the special personnel litigation account, hereby created in the state treasury, for the purpose of paying the settlement in the four related Moore v. Health Care Authority lawsuits. To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the state treasurer shall transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or account to the special insurance contribution adjustment revolving account in accordance with LEAP omnibus document GZA2-2016, dated February 22, 2016. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified for all agencies to reflect these adjusted appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—PUBLIC EMPLOYEE INSURANCE BENEFITS LITIGATION SETTLEMENT

Special Personnel Litigation Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$80,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation is provided solely for the purposes of settling all claims in the litigation involving public employee insurance benefits eligibility, as set forth in the General Principles of Settlement. The litigation is composed of four cases, all captioned Moore, et. al. v. Health Care Authority and the State of Washington, of which one case is pending in Thurston county superior court and three cases are pending in King county superior court. The expenditure of this appropriation is contingent on a settlement agreement fully executed by June 30, 2016, and approval by the appropriate court with the related orders entered into by the court by June 30, 2016. In the event that these contingencies are not met, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710. LEAN MANAGEMENT STRATEGIES AND EFFICIENCY SAVINGS

2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 715 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OFFICE OF ATTORNEY GENERAL LEGAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$101,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$19,000

General Fund—Local/Private Appropriation. . . .$2,000

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .$88,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$210,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the office of attorney general's billing authority for legal services. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92E-2016, dated February 20, 2016, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$260,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$627,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$241,000

General Fund—Local/Private Appropriation. . . .$42,000

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .$875,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,045,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the central technology services' billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92J-2016, dated February 20, 2016, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$40,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .($456,000)

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .($93,000)

General Fund—Local/Private Appropriation. . . .($10,000)

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .($155,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .($674,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the department of enterprise services' billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92K-2016, dated February 20, 2016, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$3,431,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$3,494,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$752,000

General Fund—Local/Private Appropriation. . . .$94,000

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .$1,418,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$9,189,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the office of financial management's billing authority for central service functions. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92R-2016, dated February 20, 2016, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—DATA PROCESSING REVOLVING ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$2,520,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$2,544,000

General Fund—Local/Private Appropriation. . . .$133,000

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .$2,866,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$8,063,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the office of financial management's billing authority for charges to eliminate the residual deficit from the closure of the data processing revolving account transferred to the statewide information technology system development revolving account. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92N-2016, dated February 20, 2016, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CONTRIBUTIONS FOR EMPLOYEE HEALTH INSURANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .($5,702,000)

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .($1,057,000)

General Fund—Local/Private Appropriation. . . .($109,000)

Other Appropriated Funds. . . .($1,768,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .($8,636,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to adjust agency and institution appropriations to reflect the reductions in the state employer funding rate for health insurance consistent with the contribution rates included in sections 905, 906, and 907 of this act.

(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the state treasurer shall transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or account to the special insurance contribution adjustment revolving account in accordance with LEAP omnibus document JMPB-2016, dated February 19, 2016. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified for all agencies to reflect these adjusted appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION

Washington Horse Racing Commission Operating Account

Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .$175,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for deposit in fiscal year 2017 into the Washington horse racing commission operating reserve account created in Substitute Senate Bill No. 6285 (horse racing commission accounts). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—TEACHERS' RETIREMENT SYSTEM—CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2017) . . . .($75,400,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for adjustments to allocations to reflect the retirement system employer contribution rate changes resulting from Senate Bill No. 6668 (public retirement systems).

(2) The office of financial management shall reduce allotments for the office of the superintendent of public instruction by these amounts. The allotment reductions under this section shall be placed in unallotted status and remain unexpended.

(End of part)

PART VIII

OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 801. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance﻿

premium distributions. . . . .(($9,286,000))

﻿ $4,552,000

General Fund Appropriation for public utility﻿

district excise tax distributions. . . .(($56,598,000))

﻿ $57,861,000

General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting﻿

attorney distributions. . . .(($6,345,000))

﻿ $5,662,000

General Fund Appropriation for boating safety﻿

and education distributions. . . .$4,000,000

General Fund Appropriation for other tax﻿

distributions. . . .(($80,000))

﻿ $86,000

General Fund Appropriation for habitat conservation﻿

program distributions. . . .(($3,608,000))

﻿ $3,848,000

Death Investigations Account Appropriation for﻿

distribution to counties for publicly funded﻿

autopsies. . . .$3,135,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for﻿

harbor improvement revenue distribution. . . .$140,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for﻿

distribution to "timber" counties. . . .(($95,716,000))

﻿ $81,747,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation

When making the fiscal year 2016 and 2017

distributions to Grant county, the state

treasurer shall reduce the amount by $140,000

each year and distribute the remainder to the

county. This is the second and third of three

reductions that have been made to reimburse the

state for a nonqualifying extraordinary criminal

justice act payment made to Grant county in

fiscal year 2013. . . .(($86,648,000))

﻿ $86,178,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($33,601,000))

﻿ $33,493,000

City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for﻿

local government financial assistance﻿

distribution. . . .(($23,630,000))

﻿ $24,499,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor﻿

excise tax distribution. . . .(($50,125,000))

﻿ $49,785,000

Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Mitigation Account﻿

Appropriation for distribution to local taxing﻿

jurisdictions to mitigate the unintended revenue﻿

redistribution effect of the sourcing law﻿

changes. . . .(($47,558,000))

﻿ $46,842,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation﻿

for the Confederated Tribes of the Colville﻿

Reservation. . . .(($7,911,000))

﻿ $7,907,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation﻿

for the Spokane Tribe of Indians. . . .(($5,165,000))

﻿ $5,167,000

Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor﻿

profits distribution. . . .$98,876,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($711,160,000))

﻿ $513,869,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 802. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation. . . .(($2,156,000))

﻿ $2,170,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium in accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions); and chapter . . . (SSB 5105), Laws of 2015 (DUI penalties).

Sec. 803. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 803 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation. . . .(($1,437,000))

﻿ $1,446,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium to all cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions); and chapter . . . (SSB 5105), Laws of 2015 (DUI penalties).

Sec. 804. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 805 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to﻿

the state general fund, $10,000,000 for fiscal﻿

year 2016 and $10,000,000 for fiscal year 2017. . . .$20,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the streamlined sales﻿

and use tax account, (($23,864,000)) $23,478,000﻿

for fiscal year 2016 and (($23,694,000)) $23,364,000

for fiscal year 2017. . . .(($47,558,000))

﻿ $46,842,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account: For transfer to the

state general fund in an amount not to exceed

the amount determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540,

(($27,246,000)) $49,208,000 for fiscal year 2016

((and $76,538,000 for fiscal year 2017. . . .$103,784,000))

﻿ $49,208,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account: For transfer to the

state general fund in an amount not to exceed the

amount determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540,

$80,665,000 for fiscal year 2017. . . .$80,665,000

Dedicated Marijuana Fund Account for distribution to

the basic health plan trust account in an amount

not to exceed the amount determined pursuant to

RCW 69.50.540, (($53,507,000)) $100,615,000 for

fiscal year 2016 ((and $125,201,000 for fiscal

year 2017. . . .$178,708,000))

﻿ $100,615,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account: For transfer to the

basic health plan trust account in an amount not

to exceed the amount determined pursuant to RCW

69.50.540, $129,786,000 for fiscal year 2017. . . .$129,786,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state﻿

general fund, in an amount not to exceed the﻿

actual amount of the annual base payment to the﻿

tobacco settlement account for fiscal year

2016. . . .(($180,000,000))

﻿ $90,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed

the actual amount of the 2017 annual base payment

to the tobacco settlement account. . . .$90,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state﻿

general fund, in an amount not to exceed the

annual strategic contribution payment to the

tobacco settlement account for fiscal year 2016. . . .$26,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed

the annual strategic contribution payment to

the tobacco settlement account for fiscal year

2017. . . .$25,400,000

Life Sciences Discovery Fund: For transfer to the

state general fund for fiscal year 2016. . . .$11,000,000

Energy Freedom Account: For transfer to the state

general fund for fiscal year 2016, an amount

not to exceed the actual ending cash balance

of the fund. . . .$3,300,000

((Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to﻿

the marine resources stewardship trust account,﻿

$125,000 for fiscal year 2016. . . .$125,000))

State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the

clean up settlement account as repayment of the

loan provided in section 3022(2) chapter 2,

Laws of 2012, 2nd sp. sess. (ESB 6074 2012

supplemental capital budget), $643,000 for

fiscal year 2016 and $643,000 for fiscal

year 2017. . . .$1,286,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer

to the clean up settlement account as repayment

of the loan provided in section 3022(2) chapter

2, Laws of 2012, 2nd sp. sess. (ESB 6074 2012

supplemental capital budget), $643,000 for

fiscal year 2016 and $643,000 for fiscal

year 2017. . . .$1,286,000

Home Security Fund Account: For transfer to the

transitional housing operating and rent account,

$7,500,000 for fiscal year 2016. . . .$7,500,000

Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, $36,500,000 for fiscal

year 2016 and (($36,500,000)) $46,500,000 for fiscal

year 2017. . . .(($73,000,000))

﻿ $83,000,000

Criminal Justice Treatment Account: For transfer to

the state general fund $5,652,000 for fiscal

year 2016 and $5,651,000 for fiscal year 2017. . . .$11,303,000

Liquor Revolving Account: For transfer to the state

general fund, $3,000,000 for fiscal year 2016

and $3,000,000 for fiscal year 2017. . . .$6,000,000

Flood Control Assistance Account: For transfer

to the state general fund, (($1,000,000)) $1,350,000

for fiscal year 2016 and $1,000,000 for fiscal year

2017. . . .(($2,000,000))

﻿ $2,350,000

Law Enforcement Officers' and Firefighters' Plan 2

Retirement Fund: For transfer to the local law

enforcement officers' and firefighters'

retirement system benefits improvement account

for fiscal year 2016. . . .$15,779,000

Health Professionals Loan Repayment and Scholarship

Program Account: For transfer to the state general

fund, $500,000 for FY 2016 and $500,000 for FY 2017. . . .$1,000,000

Aerospace Training Student Loan Account: For

transfer to the state general fund, $1,000,000

for FY 2016 and $1,000,000 for FY 2017. . . .$2,000,000

Water Rights Processing Account: For transfer

to the State Drought Preparedness Account,

$334,000 for fiscal year 2016. . . .$332,000

Death Investigations Account: For transfer to

the Sexually Oriented Business Fee Account,

$1,732,000 for fiscal year 2017. . . .$1,732,000

Fingerprint Identification Account: For

transfer to the Sexually Oriented Business

Fee Account, $2,050,000 for fiscal year 2017. . . .$2,050,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account: For transfer to the state

general fund, $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2016. . . .$1,000,000

Marine Resources Stewardship Trust Account: For

transfer to the aquatic lands enhancement account,

$975,000 for fiscal year 2016. . . .$975,000

Underground Storage Tank Account: For transfer to

the environmental legacy stewardship account,

$250,000 for fiscal year 2016 and $250,000 for

fiscal year 2017. . . .$500,000

Vessel Response Account: For transfer to the

environmental legacy stewardship account,

$250,000 for fiscal year 2016. . . .$250,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account: For transfer to the

state general fund for fiscal year 2016, an amount

not to exceed the actual ending cash balance

of the fund. . . .$14,000,000

Performance Audit of Government Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, $5,000,000 for fiscal year

2016 and $5,000,000 for fiscal year 2017. . . .$10,000,000

Savings Incentive Account: For transfer to the state

general fund for fiscal year 2016, an amount attributable

to unspent agency credits excluding those

associated with legislative and judicial agencies. . . .$1,071,000

General Fund: For transfer to the disaster

response account for fiscal year 2016. . . .$172,744,000

Washington Housing Trust Account: For transfer

to the home security fund account. . . .$4,000,000

Washington Housing Trust Account: For transfer to

the general fund for fiscal year 2017. . . .$1,000,000

Employment Services Administrative Account: For

transfer to the administrative contingency

fund account for fiscal year 2017. . . .$8,500,000

OFM Labor Relations Service Account: For transfer

to the general fund for fiscal year 2017. . . .$1,000,000

Personnel Service Fund: For transfer to the

general fund for fiscal year 2017. . . .$500,000

Washington Real Estate Research Account: For

transfer to the general fund for fiscal year 2017. . . .$500,000

Professional Engineers' Account: For transfer

to the general fund for fiscal year 2017. . . .$500,000

Real Estate Commission Account: For transfer

to the general fund for fiscal year 2017. . . .$500,000

Health Professions Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, $500,000 for fiscal year 2017. . . .$500,000

It is the intent of the legislature to continue to transfer the excess balance from the criminal justice treatment account to the state general fund in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, consistent with policy in this omnibus appropriations act and in an amount not to exceed the projected fund balance.

It is the intent of the legislature to continue to transfer the excess balance from the state treasurer's service account to the state general fund in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, consistent with policy in this omnibus appropriations act and in an amount not to exceed the projected fund balance.

Sec. 805. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 806 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE GAMBLING COMMISSION

State Lottery Account: For transfer to gambling

revolving account . . . .$1,000,000

The transfer in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) ((The commission shall maintain working capital reserves in the gambling revolving account of no more than five percent of projected expenses in the account)) This funding is provided solely for the costs of enforcement of gambling activities, including but not limited to evaluation, analysis, and dissemination of information on individuals and groups who are suspected of being involved in illegal gambling and other associated crimes.

(2) The commission shall not approve any electronic raffle systems to conduct fifty-fifty raffles until the legislature has reviewed all impacts to the state lottery.

(End of part)

PART IX

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 901. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:

(1) Modifications to the collective bargaining agreement for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, as set forth in a memorandum of understanding, have been reached between the governor and the union of physicians of Washington, amending the coalition of unions collective bargaining agreement under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. The memorandum of understanding was necessitated by an emergency and an imminent jeopardy determination by the center for medicare and medicaid services that relates to the safety and health of clients and employees. Funding is provided for assignment pay, additional compensation for extra hours worked, and continuing medical education for physicians and psychiatrists. The legislature rejects the memorandum of understanding as a whole.

(2) If a memorandum of understanding or agreement between the governor and the union of physicians of Washington can be reached by June 30, 2016, to fill current and future vacancies of psychiatrists with psychiatric nurse practitioners at western state hospital and eastern state hospital to achieve savings of $1,500,000, funding is provided solely for the implementation of a new memorandum of understanding to be reached between the governor and the union of physicians of Washington related to compensation and fringe benefits subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The new memorandum of understanding is limited to the compensation and fringe benefits of extra duty pay, assignment pay, and continuing medical education;

(b) Extra duty pay for psychiatrists at western state hospital or eastern state hospital does not exceed 1.25 times the rate of pay and expires June 9, 2016;

(c) Assignment pay for psychiatrists and internists does not exceed ten percent and expires on June 30, 2017;

(d) Continuing medical education reimbursement does not exceed up to $5,000 for psychiatrists and does not exceed up to $3,000 for internists and each expires on June 30, 2017.

(3) If a new memorandum of understanding or agreement that meets the conditions and limitations in subsection (2) of this section is reached between the governor and the union of physicians of Washington by June 30, 2016, funding for the memorandum of understanding or agreement shall be considered approved pursuant to RCW 41.80.010, and the parties shall execute the memorandum of understanding or agreement retroactive to December 1, 2015. The legislature recognizes that the new memorandum of understanding is necessitated by an emergency and an imminent jeopardy determination by the center for medicare and medicaid services that relates to the safety and health of clients and employees.

(4) This section should not be implemented to allow psychiatric nurse practitioners to engage in activities or perform works and tasks that exceed their scope of practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--SEIU 1199NW

Modifications to the collective bargaining agreement for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, as set forth in memoranda of understanding have been reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 1199nw amending the collective bargaining agreement under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. The memoranda of understanding were necessitated by an emergency and an imminent jeopardy determination by the center for medicare and medicaid services that relates to the safety and health of clients and employees. Funding is provided for a new weekend schedule premium and a recruitment and retention incentive program for nurse classifications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
UNILATERAL IMPLEMENTATION DUE TO PENDING REPRESENTATION PETITION

Modifications to the collective bargaining agreement between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees general government for 2015-2017 are necessitated by an emergency and an imminent jeopardy determination by the center for medicare and medicaid services that relates to the safety and health of clients and employees. Due to pending representation petitions filed with the public employment relations commission, the governor may not bargain with the Washington federation of state employees, the united professional social workers, nor the union of Washington state psychologists for the classifications affected by modifications. Therefore, the state unilaterally implemented modifications to a collective bargaining agreement under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW and RCW 41.80.010(9) for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, necessitated by the emergency and imminent jeopardy determination by the center for medicare and medicaid services that relates to the safety and health of clients and employees.

The governor notified the Washington federation of state employees, the union of Washington state psychologists, and the united professional social workers that, due to business necessity, the state has unilaterally implemented modifications to a collective bargaining agreement under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW and RCW 41.80.010(9) for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, necessitated by the emergency and imminent jeopardy determination by the center for medicare and medicaid services that relates to the safety and health of clients and employees. Funding is provided for assignment pay for specific medical classes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
COMPENSATION—INSURANCE BENEFITS

Funding rates for employee insurance benefits were established in the 2015-2017 omnibus appropriations act for represented and nonrepresented employees. The funding rates adopted in that act assume the maintenance of reserves for the public employee benefits program. A reserve rate of seven percent for the premium stabilization account has been established by the legislature, which has been determined to be sufficient under RCW 41.05.140 for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

Sec. 905. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 932 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
COMPENSATION—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—SUPER COALITION—INSURANCE BENEFITS

An agreement has been reached for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium between the governor and the health care super coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. Appropriations in this act for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2015-2017 collective bargaining agreement and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan shall not exceed $840 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2016. For fiscal year 2017, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed (($894)) $882 per eligible employee.

(b) Except as provided by the parties' health care agreement, in order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065. The board shall collect a twenty-five dollar per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than fifty dollars per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for administrative expenditures.

(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2016 and 2017, the subsidy shall be up to $150.00 per month.

(3) All savings resulting from reduced claim costs or other factors identified after June 1, 2015, must be reserved for funding employee health benefits in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

Sec. 906. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 933 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
COMPENSATION—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE SUPER COALITION—INSURANCE BENEFITS

Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for represented employees outside the super coalition for health benefits, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan shall not exceed $840 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2016. For fiscal year 2017, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed (($894)) $882 per eligible employee.

(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065. The board shall collect a twenty-five dollar per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than fifty dollars per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for administrative expenditures.

(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2016 and 2017, the subsidy shall be up to $150.00 per month.

(3) All savings resulting from reduced claim costs or other factors identified after June 1, 2015, must be reserved for funding employee health benefits in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

Sec. 907. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 938 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
COMPENSATION—NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—INSURANCE BENEFITS

Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for nonrepresented state employee health benefits for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $840 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2016. For fiscal year 2017, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed (($894)) $882 per eligible employee.

(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require or make any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065. The board shall collect a twenty-five dollar per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than fifty dollars per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for administrative expenditures.

(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2016 and 2017, the subsidy shall be up to $150 per month.

(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120 the following amounts:

(a) For each full-time employee, $65.25 per month beginning September 1, 2015, and (($70.45)) $64.39 beginning September 1, 2016; and

(b) For each part-time employee, who at the time of the remittance is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or 41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for basic benefits, $65.25 each month beginning September 1, 2015, and (($70.45)) $64.39 beginning September 1, 2016, prorated by the proportion of employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the part-time employee receives. The remittance requirements specified in this subsection (3) shall not apply to employees of a technical college, school district, or educational service district who purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

(4) All savings resulting from reduced claim costs or other factors identified after June 1, 2015, must be reserved for funding employee health benefits in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

Sec. 908. RCW 18.20.430 and 2012 c 10 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

The assisted living facility temporary management account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from civil penalties imposed under this chapter must be deposited into the account. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the protection of the health, safety, welfare, or property of residents of assisted living facilities found to be deficient. Uses of the account include, but are not limited to:

(1) Payment for the costs of relocation of residents to other facilities;

(2) Payment to maintain operation of an assisted living facility pending correction of deficiencies or closure, including payment of costs associated with temporary management authorized under this chapter; and

(3) Reimbursement of residents for personal funds or property lost or stolen when the resident's personal funds or property cannot be recovered from the assisted living facility or third-party insurer.

During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the account may be expended for funding the costs associated with the assisted living program.

Sec. 909. RCW 18.43.150 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 954 are each amended to read as follows:

All fees collected under the provisions of RCW 18.43.050, 18.43.060, 18.43.080, 18.43.100, and 18.43.130 and fines collected under RCW 18.43.110 shall be paid into the professional engineers' account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury to be used to carry out the purposes and provisions of RCW 18.43.050, 18.43.060, 18.43.080, 18.43.100, 18.43.110, 18.43.120, 18.43.130, and all other duties required for operation and enforcement of this chapter. During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys from the professional engineers' account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 910. RCW 18.85.061 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 955 are each amended to read as follows:

All fees required under this chapter shall be set by the director in accordance with RCW 43.24.086 and shall be paid to the state treasurer. All fees paid under the provisions of this chapter shall be placed in the real estate commission account in the state treasury. All money derived from fines imposed under this chapter shall be deposited in the real estate education program account created in RCW 18.85.321. During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the real estate commission account.

Sec. 911. RCW 18.85.461 and 2015 c 175 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington real estate research account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the fee under RCW 18.85.451 shall be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of RCW 18.85.471.

(2) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys from the real estate research account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

(3) This section expires September 30, 2025.

Sec. 912. RCW 19.02.210 and 2013 c 144 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

The business license account is created in the state treasury. Unless otherwise indicated in RCW 19.02.075, all receipts from handling and business license delinquency fees must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation beginning in fiscal year 1993. Expenditures from the account may be used only to administer the business licensing service program. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, moneys from the business license account may be used for operations of the department of revenue.

Sec. 913. RCW 28B.115.130 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 212 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any funds appropriated by the legislature for the health professional loan repayment and scholarship program or any other public or private funds intended for loan repayments or scholarships under this program shall be placed in the account created by this section.

(2) The health professional loan repayment and scholarship program fund is created in custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the program shall be deposited into the fund. Only the office, or its designee, may authorize expenditures from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the health professional loan repayment and scholarship program fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 914. RCW 28B.122.050 and 2012 c 50 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The aerospace training student loan account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. No appropriation is required for expenditures of funds from the account for student loans. An appropriation is required for expenditures of funds from the account for costs associated with program administration by the office. The account is not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

(2) The office shall deposit into the account all moneys received for the program. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of moneys received for the program by the office, and receipts from participant repayments, including principal and interest.

(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for student loans to participants in the program established by this chapter and costs associated with program administration by the office.

(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the authorization of the office.

(5) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the aerospace training student loan account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 915. RCW 36.17.020 and 2008 c 309 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The county legislative authority of each county or a county commissioner or councilmember salary commission which conforms with RCW 36.17.024 is authorized to establish the salaries of the elected officials of the county. The state and county shall contribute to the costs of the salary of the elected prosecuting attorney as set forth in subsection (11) of this section. The annual salary of a county elected official shall not be less than the following:

(1) In each county with a population of one million or more: Auditor, clerk, treasurer, sheriff, members of the county legislative authority, and coroner, eighteen thousand dollars; and assessor, nineteen thousand dollars;

(2) In each county with a population of from two hundred ten thousand to less than one million: Auditor, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; clerk, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; treasurer, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; sheriff, nineteen thousand five hundred dollars; assessor, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; members of the county legislative authority, nineteen thousand five hundred dollars; and coroner, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars;

(3) In each county with a population of from one hundred twenty-five thousand to less than two hundred ten thousand: Auditor, sixteen thousand dollars; clerk, sixteen thousand dollars; treasurer, sixteen thousand dollars; sheriff, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; assessor, sixteen thousand dollars; members of the county legislative authority, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; and coroner, sixteen thousand dollars;

(4) In each county with a population of from seventy thousand to less than one hundred twenty-five thousand: Auditor, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; clerk, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; treasurer, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; assessor, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; sheriff, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; members of the county legislative authority, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; and coroner, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars;

(5) In each county with a population of from forty thousand to less than seventy thousand: Auditor, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; clerk, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; treasurer, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; assessor, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; sheriff, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; members of the county legislative authority, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; and coroner, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars;

(6) In each county with a population of from eighteen thousand to less than forty thousand: Auditor, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; clerk, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; assessor, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; and members of the county legislative authority, eleven thousand dollars;

(7) In each county with a population of from twelve thousand to less than eighteen thousand: Auditor, ten thousand one hundred dollars; clerk, ten thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, ten thousand one hundred dollars; assessor, ten thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, eleven thousand two hundred dollars; and members of the county legislative authority, nine thousand four hundred dollars;

(8) In each county with a population of from eight thousand to less than twelve thousand: Auditor, ten thousand one hundred dollars; clerk, ten thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, ten thousand one hundred dollars; assessor, ten thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, eleven thousand two hundred dollars; and members of the county legislative authority, seven thousand dollars;

(9) In each county with a population of from five thousand to less than eight thousand: Auditor, nine thousand one hundred dollars; clerk, nine thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, nine thousand one hundred dollars; assessor, nine thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, ten thousand five hundred dollars; and members of the county legislative authority, six thousand five hundred dollars;

(10) In each other county: Auditor, nine thousand one hundred dollars; clerk, nine thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, nine thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, ten thousand five hundred dollars; assessor, nine thousand one hundred dollars; and members of the county legislative authority, six thousand five hundred dollars;

(11)(a) For fiscal year 2017, the state of Washington shall contribute to counties with a population less than two hundred thousand an amount equal to one-half the salary of a superior court judge towards the salary of the elected prosecuting attorney. Upon receipt of the state contribution, a county shall continue to contribute towards the salary of the elected prosecuting attorney in an amount that equals or exceeds that contributed by the county in 2008.

(b) It is the intent of the legislature to continue the policy under (a) of this subsection into the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

Sec. 916. RCW 38.52.105 and 2010 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 901 are each amended to read as follows:

The disaster response account is created in the state treasury. Moneys may be placed in the account from legislative appropriations and transfers, federal appropriations, or any other lawful source. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for support of state agency and local government disaster response and recovery efforts and to reimburse the workers' compensation funds and self-insured employers under RCW 51.16.220. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the disaster response account to the state drought preparedness account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account to support expenditures related to a state drought declaration. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the disaster response account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, expenditures from the disaster response account may be used for military department operations and to support wildland fire suppression preparedness, prevention, and restoration activities by state agencies and local governments.

Sec. 917. RCW 41.06.280 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 968 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury, designated as the "personnel service fund," to be used by the office of financial management as a revolving fund for the payment of salaries, wages, and operations required for the administration of the provisions of this chapter, applicable provisions of chapter 41.04 RCW, and chapter 41.60 RCW. An amount not to exceed one and one-half percent of the salaries and wages for all positions in the classified service in each of the agencies subject to this chapter, except the institutions of higher education, shall be charged to the operations appropriations of each agency and credited to the personnel service fund as the allotments are approved pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW. Subject to the above limitations, the amount shall be charged against the allotments pro rata, at a rate to be fixed by the director from time to time which, together with income derived from services rendered under RCW 41.06.080, will provide the office of financial management with funds to meet its anticipated expenditures during the allotment period, including the training requirements in RCW 41.06.500 and 41.06.530. All revenues, net of expenditures, previously derived from services provided by the department of enterprise services under RCW 41.06.080 must be transferred to the enterprise services account.

The director shall fix the terms and charges for services rendered by the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 41.06.080, which amounts shall be credited to the personnel service fund and charged against the proper fund or appropriation of the recipient of such services on a monthly basis. Payment for services so rendered under RCW 41.06.080 shall be made on a monthly basis to the state treasurer and deposited in the personnel service fund.

Moneys from the personnel service fund shall be disbursed by the state treasurer by warrants on vouchers duly authorized by the office of financial management.

During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the personnel service fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 918. RCW 41.16.050 and 2007 c 218 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created and established in the treasury of each municipality a fund which shall be known and designated as the firefighters' pension fund, which shall consist of: (((1))) (a) All bequests, fees, gifts, emoluments, or donations given or paid thereto; (((2))) (b) twenty-five percent of all moneys received by the state from taxes on fire insurance premiums; (((3))) (c) taxes paid pursuant to the provisions of RCW 41.16.060; (((4))) (d) interest on the investments of the fund; and (((5))) (e) contributions by firefighters as provided ((for herein)) in this section. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the moneys received from the tax on fire insurance premiums under the provisions of this chapter shall be distributed in the proportion that the number of paid firefighters in the city, town, or fire protection district bears to the total number of paid firefighters throughout the state to be ascertained in the following manner: The secretary of the firefighters' pension board of each city, town, and fire protection district now or hereafter coming under the provisions of this chapter shall within thirty days after June 7, 1961, and on or before the fifteenth day of January thereafter, certify to the state treasurer the number of paid firefighters in the fire department in such city, town, or fire protection district. For any city or town annexed by a fire protection district at any time before, on, or after June 9, 1994, the city or town shall continue to certify to the state treasurer the number of paid firefighters in the city or town fire department immediately before annexation until all obligations against the firefighters' pension fund in the city or town have been satisfied. For the purposes of the calculation in this section, the state treasurer shall subtract the number certified by the annexed city or town from the number of paid firefighters certified by an annexing fire protection district. The state treasurer shall on or before the first day of June of each year deliver to the treasurer of each city, town, and fire protection district coming under the provisions of this chapter his or her warrant, payable to each city, town, or fire protection district for the amount due such city, town or fire protection district ascertained as herein provided and the treasurer of each such city, town, or fire protection district shall place the amount thereof to the credit of the firefighters' pension fund of such city, town, or fire protection district.

(2)(a) For fiscal year 2017, the state treasurer shall make no distribution to cities, towns, or fire protection districts.

(b) It is the intent of the legislature to continue the policy under (a) of this subsection into the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium as it investigates whether this distribution should continue or be modified or terminated.

Sec. 919. RCW 41.26.802 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 950 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By September 30, 2011, if the prior fiscal biennium's general state revenues exceed the previous fiscal biennium's revenues by more than five percent, subject to appropriation by the legislature, the state treasurer shall transfer five million dollars to the local public safety enhancement account.

(2) By September 30, 2017, and by September 30 of each odd-numbered year thereafter, if the prior fiscal biennium's general state revenues exceed the previous fiscal biennium's revenues by more than five percent, subject to appropriation by the legislature, the state treasurer shall transfer the lesser of one-third of the increase, or fifty million dollars, to the local public safety enhancement account.

(3) It is the intent of the legislature to fund the portion of the distribution in 2017 dedicated to the local law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system benefits improvement account through alternate means, which may include transfers from the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement fund.

Sec. 920. RCW 41.45.035 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 7 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1, 2001, the following long-term economic assumptions shall be used by the state actuary for the purposes of RCW 41.45.030:

(a) The growth in inflation assumption shall be 3.5 percent;

(b) The growth in salaries assumption, exclusive of merit or longevity increases, shall be 4.5 percent;

(c) The investment rate of return assumption shall be 8 percent; ((and))

(d) The growth in system membership assumption shall be 1.25 percent for the public employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system. The assumption shall be .90 percent for the teachers' retirement system; and

(e) From July 1, 2016, until July 1, 2017, the growth in system membership for the teachers' retirement system shall be 1.25 percent. It is the intent of the legislature to continue this growth rate assumption in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2009, the growth in salaries assumption for the public employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, and the Washington state patrol retirement system, exclusive of merit or longevity increases, shall be the sum of:

(a) The growth in inflation assumption in subsection (1)(a) of this section; and

(b) The productivity growth assumption of 0.5 percent.

(3) The following investment rate of return assumptions for the public employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, and the Washington state patrol retirement system, shall be used by the state actuary for the purposes of RCW 41.45.030:

(a) Beginning July 1, 2013, the investment rate of return assumption shall be 7.9 percent.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, the investment rate of return assumption shall be 7.8 percent.

(c) Beginning July 1, 2017, the investment rate of return assumption shall be 7.7 percent.

(d) For valuation purposes, the state actuary shall only use the assumptions in (a) through (c) of this subsection after the effective date in (a) through (c) of this subsection.

(e) By June 1, 2017, the state actuary shall submit to the council information regarding the experience and financial condition of each state retirement system, and make recommendations regarding the long-term investment rate of return assumptions set forth in this subsection. The council shall review this and such other information as it may require.

(4)(a) Beginning with actuarial studies done after July 1, 2003, changes to plan asset values that vary from the long-term investment rate of return assumption shall be recognized in the actuarial value of assets over a period that varies up to eight years depending on the magnitude of the deviation of each year's investment rate of return relative to the long-term rate of return assumption. Beginning with actuarial studies performed after July 1, 2004, the actuarial value of assets shall not be greater than one hundred thirty percent of the market value of assets as of the valuation date or less than seventy percent of the market value of assets as of the valuation date. Beginning April 1, 2004, the council, by affirmative vote of four councilmembers, may adopt changes to this asset value smoothing technique. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

(b) The state actuary shall periodically review the appropriateness of the asset smoothing method in this section and recommend changes to the council as necessary. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

Sec. 921. RCW 41.80.010 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 971 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of negotiating collective bargaining agreements under this chapter, the employer shall be represented by the governor or governor's designee, except as provided for institutions of higher education in subsection (4) of this section.

(2)(a) If an exclusive bargaining representative represents more than one bargaining unit, the exclusive bargaining representative shall negotiate with each employer representative as designated in subsection (1) of this section one master collective bargaining agreement on behalf of all the employees in bargaining units that the exclusive bargaining representative represents. For those exclusive bargaining representatives who represent fewer than a total of five hundred employees each, negotiation shall be by a coalition of all those exclusive bargaining representatives. The coalition shall bargain for a master collective bargaining agreement covering all of the employees represented by the coalition. The governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative or representatives are authorized to enter into supplemental bargaining of agency-specific issues for inclusion in or as an addendum to the master collective bargaining agreement, subject to the parties' agreement regarding the issues and procedures for supplemental bargaining. This section does not prohibit cooperation and coordination of bargaining between two or more exclusive bargaining representatives.

(b) This subsection (2) does not apply to exclusive bargaining representatives who represent employees of institutions of higher education, except when the institution of higher education has elected to exercise its option under subsection (4) of this section to have its negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's designee under the procedures provided for general government agencies in subsections (1) through (3) of this section.

(c) If five hundred or more employees of an independent state elected official listed in RCW 43.01.010 are organized in a bargaining unit or bargaining units under RCW 41.80.070, the official shall be consulted by the governor or the governor's designee before any agreement is reached under (a) of this subsection concerning supplemental bargaining of agency specific issues affecting the employees in such bargaining unit.

(3) The governor shall submit a request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions in the master collective bargaining agreement or for legislation necessary to implement the agreement. Requests for funds necessary to implement the provisions of bargaining agreements shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless such requests:

(a) Have been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1 prior to the legislative session at which the requests are to be considered; and

(b) Have been certified by the director of the office of financial management as being feasible financially for the state.

The legislature shall approve or reject the submission of the request for funds as a whole. The legislature shall not consider a request for funds to implement a collective bargaining agreement unless the request is transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060. If the legislature rejects or fails to act on the submission, either party may reopen all or part of the agreement or the exclusive bargaining representative may seek to implement the procedures provided for in RCW 41.80.090.

(4)(a)(i) For the purpose of negotiating agreements for institutions of higher education, the employer shall be the respective governing board of each of the universities, colleges, or community colleges or a designee chosen by the board to negotiate on its behalf.

(ii) A governing board of a university or college may elect to have its negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's designee under the procedures provided for general government agencies in subsections (1) through (3) of this section, except that:

(A) The governor or the governor's designee and an exclusive bargaining representative shall negotiate one master collective bargaining agreement for all of the bargaining units of employees of a university or college that the representative represents; or

(B) If the parties mutually agree, the governor or the governor's designee and an exclusive bargaining representative shall negotiate one master collective bargaining agreement for all of the bargaining units of employees of more than one university or college that the representative represents.

(iii) A governing board of a community college may elect to have its negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's designee under the procedures provided for general government agencies in subsections (1) through (3) of this section.

(b) Prior to entering into negotiations under this chapter, the institutions of higher education or their designees shall consult with the director of the office of financial management regarding financial and budgetary issues that are likely to arise in the impending negotiations.

(c)(i) In the case of bargaining agreements reached between institutions of higher education other than the University of Washington and exclusive bargaining representatives agreed to under the provisions of this chapter, if appropriations are necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of the bargaining agreements, the governor shall submit a request for such funds to the legislature according to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, except as provided in (c)(iii) of this subsection.

(ii) In the case of bargaining agreements reached between the University of Washington and exclusive bargaining representatives agreed to under the provisions of this chapter, if appropriations are necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of a bargaining agreement, the governor shall submit a request for such funds to the legislature according to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, except as provided in this subsection (4)(c)(ii) and as provided in (c)(iii) of this subsection.

(A) If appropriations of less than ten thousand dollars are necessary to implement the provisions of a bargaining agreement, a request for such funds shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless the request has been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1 prior to the legislative session at which the request is to be considered.

(B) If appropriations of ten thousand dollars or more are necessary to implement the provisions of a bargaining agreement, a request for such funds shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless the request:

(I) Has been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1 prior to the legislative session at which the request is to be considered; and

(II) Has been certified by the director of the office of financial management as being feasible financially for the state.

(C) If the director of the office of financial management does not certify a request under (c)(ii)(B) of this subsection as being feasible financially for the state, the parties shall enter into collective bargaining solely for the purpose of reaching a mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement necessary to address the absence of those requested funds. The legislature may act upon the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of the modified collective bargaining agreement if those provisions are agreed upon and submitted to the office of financial management and legislative budget committees before final legislative action on the biennial or supplemental operating budget by the sitting legislature.

(iii) In the case of a bargaining unit of employees of institutions of higher education in which the exclusive bargaining representative is certified during or after the conclusion of a legislative session, the legislature may act upon the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of the unit's initial collective bargaining agreement if those provisions are agreed upon and submitted to the office of financial management and legislative budget committees before final legislative action on the biennial or supplemental operating budget by the sitting legislature.

(5) There is hereby created a joint committee on employment relations, which consists of two members with leadership positions in the house of representatives, representing each of the two largest caucuses; the chair and ranking minority member of the house appropriations committee, or its successor, representing each of the two largest caucuses; two members with leadership positions in the senate, representing each of the two largest caucuses; and the chair and ranking minority member of the senate ways and means committee, or its successor, representing each of the two largest caucuses. The governor shall periodically consult with the committee regarding appropriations necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions in the master collective bargaining agreements, and upon completion of negotiations, advise the committee on the elements of the agreements and on any legislation necessary to implement the agreements.

(6) If, after the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of an agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.

(7) After the expiration date of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter, all of the terms and conditions specified in the collective bargaining agreement remain in effect until the effective date of a subsequently negotiated agreement, not to exceed one year from the expiration date stated in the agreement. Thereafter, the employer may unilaterally implement according to law.

(8) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, a collective bargaining agreement related to employee health care benefits negotiated between the employer and coalition pursuant to RCW 41.80.020(3) regarding the dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee shall be a separate agreement for which the governor may request funds necessary to implement the agreement. The legislature may act upon a 2013-2015 collective bargaining agreement related to employee health care benefits if an agreement is reached and submitted to the office of financial management and legislative budget committees before final legislative action on the biennial or supplemental operating appropriations act by the sitting legislature.

(9)(a) For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the governor may request funds to implement:

(i) Modifications to collective bargaining agreements as set forth in a memorandum of understanding negotiated between the employer and the service employees international union healthcare 1199nw, an exclusive bargaining representative, that was necessitated by an emergency situation or an imminent jeopardy determination by the center for medicare and medicaid services that relates to the safety or health of the clients, employees, or both the clients and employees.

(ii) Unilaterally implemented modifications to collective bargaining agreements, resulting from the employer being prohibited from negotiating with an exclusive bargaining representative due to a pending representation petition, necessitated by an emergency situation or an imminent jeopardy determination by the center for medicare and medicaid services that relates to the safety or health of the clients, employees, or both the clients and employees.

(iii) Modifications to collective bargaining agreements as set forth in a memorandum of understanding negotiated between the employer and the union of physicians of Washington, an exclusive bargaining representative, that was necessitated by an emergency situation or an imminent jeopardy determination by the center for medicare and medicaid services that relates to the safety or health of the clients, employees, or both the clients and employees. If the memorandum of understanding submitted to the legislature as part of the governor's budget document is rejected by the legislature, and the parties reach a new memorandum of understanding by June 30, 2016, within the funds, conditions, and limitations provided in section 204 of this act, the new memorandum of understanding shall be considered approved by the legislature and may be retroactive to December 1, 2015.

(b) For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may act upon the request for funds for modifications to a 2015-2017 collective bargaining agreement under (a)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection if funds are requested by the governor before final legislative action on the supplemental omnibus appropriations act by the sitting legislature.

(c) The request for funding made under this subsection and any action by the legislature taken pursuant to this subsection is limited to the modifications described in this subsection and may not otherwise affect the original terms of the 2015-2017 collective bargaining agreement.

(d) Subsections (3)(a) and (b) of this section do not apply to requests for funding made pursuant to this subsection.

Sec. 922. RCW 41.80.140 and 2002 c 354 s 322 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of financial management's labor relations service account is created in the custody of the state treasurer to be used as a revolving fund for the payment of labor relations services required for the negotiation of the collective bargaining agreements entered into under this chapter. An amount not to exceed one-tenth of one percent of the approved allotments of salaries and wages for all bargaining unit positions in the classified service in each of the agencies subject to this chapter, except the institutions of higher education, shall be charged to the operations appropriations of each agency and credited to the office of financial management's labor relations service account as the allotments are approved pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW. Subject to the above limitations, the amount shall be charged against the allotments pro rata, at a rate to be fixed by the director of financial management from time to time. Payment for services rendered under this chapter shall be made on a quarterly basis to the state treasurer and deposited into the office of financial management's labor relations service account.

(2) Moneys from the office of financial management's labor relations service account shall be disbursed by the state treasurer by warrants on vouchers authorized by the director of financial management or the director's designee. An appropriation is not required.

(3) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys from the office of financial management's labor relations service account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 923. RCW 43.10.220 and 2002 c 371 s 907 are each amended to read as follows:

The attorney general is authorized to expend from the antitrust revolving fund, created by RCW 43.10.210 through 43.10.220, such funds as are necessary for the payment of costs, expenses and charges incurred in the preparation, institution and maintenance of antitrust actions under the state and federal antitrust acts. During the ((2001-03)) 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the attorney general may expend from the antitrust revolving fund for the purposes of the consumer protection activities of the office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 924. A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW to read as follows:

The office of financial management central service account is created in the state treasury. The account is to be used by the office as a revolving fund for the payment of salaries, wages, and other costs required for the operation and maintenance of statewide budgeting, accounting, forecasting, and functions and activities in the office. All receipts from agency fees and charges for services collected from public agencies must be deposited into the account. The director shall fix the terms and charges to agencies based on each agency's share of the office statewide cost allocation plan for federal funds. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

Sec. 925. RCW 43.43.839 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 955 are each amended to read as follows:

The fingerprint identification account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from incremental charges of fingerprint checks requested for noncriminal justice purposes and electronic background requests shall be deposited in the account. Receipts for fingerprint checks by the federal bureau of investigation may also be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the cost of record checks. Only the chief of the state patrol or the chief's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. No appropriation is required for expenditures prior to July 1, 1997. After June 30, 1997, the account shall be subject to appropriation. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the fingerprint identification account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, funds in the account may be used for expenditures that support the criminal records management division of the state patrol. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, funds in the account may be used for expenditures related to the upgrade of the state patrol's criminal history system. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the fingerprint identification account to the sexually oriented business fee account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 926. RCW 43.43.944 and 2012 c 173 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The fire service training account is hereby established in the state treasury. The primary purpose of the account is firefighter training for both volunteer and career firefighters. The fund shall consist of:

(a) All fees received by the Washington state patrol for fire service training;

(b) All grants and bequests accepted by the Washington state patrol under RCW 43.43.940;

(c) Twenty percent of all moneys received by the state on fire insurance premiums; and

(d) General fund—state moneys appropriated into the account by the legislature.

(2) Moneys in the account may be appropriated for: (a) Fire service training; (b) school fire prevention activities within the Washington state patrol; and (c) the maintenance, operations, and capital projects of the state fire training academy. However, expenditures for purposes of (b) and (c) of this subsection may only be made to the extent that these expenditures do not adversely affect expenditures for the purpose of (a) of this subsection. The state patrol may use amounts appropriated from the fire service training account under this section to contract with the Washington state firefighters apprenticeship trust for the operation of the firefighter joint apprenticeship training program. The contract may call for payments on a monthly basis.

(3) Any general fund—state moneys appropriated into the account shall be allocated solely to the firefighter joint apprenticeship training program. The Washington state patrol may contract with outside entities for the administration and delivery of the firefighter joint apprenticeship training program.

(4) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the fire services training account may be used for the Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs of the Washington state patrol.

Sec. 927. RCW 43.70.320 and 2015 c 70 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created in the state treasury an account to be known as the health professions account. All fees received by the department for health professions licenses, registration, certifications, renewals, or examinations and the civil penalties assessed and collected by the department under RCW 18.130.190 shall be forwarded to the state treasurer who shall credit such moneys to the health professions account.

(2) All expenses incurred in carrying out the health professions licensing activities of the department and implementing and administering the medical marijuana authorization database established in RCW 69.51A.230 shall be paid from the account as authorized by legislative appropriation, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section. Any residue in the account shall be accumulated and shall not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the dedicated health professions account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

(3) The secretary shall biennially prepare a budget request based on the anticipated costs of administering the health professions licensing activities of the department which shall include the estimated income from health professions fees.

(4) The secretary shall, at the request of a board or commission as applicable, spend unappropriated funds in the health professions account that are allocated to the requesting board or commission to meet unanticipated costs of that board or commission when revenues exceed more than fifteen percent over the department's estimated six-year spending projections for the requesting board or commission. Unanticipated costs shall be limited to spending as authorized in subsection (3) of this section for anticipated costs.

Sec. 928. RCW 43.79.201 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 945 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account is hereby created, in the state treasury, into which account there shall be deposited all moneys arising from the sale, lease or transfer of the land granted by the United States government to the state for charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions by section 17 of the enabling act, or otherwise set apart for such institutions, except all moneys arising from the sale, lease, or transfer of that certain one hundred thousand acres of such land assigned for the support of the University of Washington by chapter 91, Laws of 1903 and section 9, chapter 122, Laws of 1893.

(2) If feasible, not less than one-half of all income to the charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions account shall be appropriated for the purpose of providing housing, including repair and renovation of state institutions, for persons with mental illness or developmental disabilities, or youth who are blind, deaf, or otherwise disabled. If moneys are appropriated for community-based housing, the moneys shall be appropriated to the department of commerce for the housing assistance program under chapter 43.185 RCW. During the ((2009-2011 and 2011-2013)) 2015-2017 fiscal ((biennia)) biennium, the legislature may transfer from the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 929. RCW 43.79.445 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 979 are each amended to read as follows:

There is established an account in the state treasury referred to as the "death investigations account" which shall exist for the purpose of receiving, holding, investing, and disbursing funds appropriated or provided in RCW 70.58.107 and any moneys appropriated or otherwise provided thereafter.

Moneys in the death investigations account shall be disbursed by the state treasurer once every year on December 31 and at any other time determined by the treasurer. The treasurer shall make disbursements to: The state toxicology laboratory, counties for the cost of autopsies, the state patrol for providing partial funding for the state dental identification system, the criminal justice training commission for training county coroners, medical examiners and their staff, and the state forensic investigations council. Funds from the death investigations account may be appropriated during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium for the activities of the state crime laboratory within the Washington state patrol. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the death investigations account to the sexually oriented business fee account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 930. RCW 43.79.460 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 908 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The savings incentive account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The account shall consist of all moneys appropriated to the account by the legislature. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures from the account.

(2) Within the savings incentive account, the state treasurer may create subaccounts to be credited with incentive savings attributable to individual state agencies, as determined by the office of financial management in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees. Moneys deposited in the subaccounts may be expended only on the authorization of the agency's executive head or designee and only for the purpose of one-time expenditures to improve the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of services to customers of the state, such as one-time expenditures for employee training, employee incentives, technology improvements, new work processes, or performance measurement. Funds may not be expended from the account to establish new programs or services, expand existing programs or services, or incur ongoing costs that would require future expenditures.

(3) For purposes of this section, "incentive savings" means state general fund appropriations that are unspent as of June 30th of a fiscal year, excluding any amounts included in across-the-board reductions under RCW 43.88.110 and excluding unspent appropriations for:

(a) Caseload and enrollment in entitlement programs, except to the extent that an agency has clearly demonstrated that efficiencies have been achieved in the administration of the entitlement program. "Entitlement program," as used in this section, includes programs for which specific sums of money are appropriated for pass-through to third parties or other entities;

(b) Enrollments in state institutions of higher education;

(c) Except for fiscal year 2011, a specific amount contained in a condition or limitation to an appropriation in the biennial appropriations act, if the agency did not achieve the specific purpose or objective of the condition or limitation;

(d) Debt service on state obligations; and

(e) State retirement system obligations.

(4) The office of financial management, after consulting with the legislative fiscal committees, shall report the amount of savings incentives achieved.

(5) For fiscal year 2010, the legislature may transfer from the savings incentive account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the fund balance of the account attributable to unspent state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2009. For fiscal year 2011, the legislature may transfer from the savings incentive account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the fund balance of the account attributable to unspent state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2010. For fiscal year 2011, the legislature may transfer from the savings incentive account to the state general fund eight million dollars or as much as reflects the fund balance of the account attributable to unspent agency credits prior to fiscal year 2009. Credits for legislative and judicial agencies are not included in this action, with the exception and upon consent of the supreme court, court of appeals, office of public defense, and office of civil legal aid.

(6) For fiscal years 2012 and 2013, the legislature may transfer from the savings incentive account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the fund balance of the account attributable to unspent general fund appropriations for fiscal years 2011 and 2012.

(7) For fiscal year 2016, the legislature may transfer from the savings incentive account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the fund balance of the account attributable to unspent agency credit. Credits for legislative and judicial agencies are not included in this action.

Sec. 931. RCW 43.83B.430 and 2011 c 5 s 911 are each amended to read as follows:

The state drought preparedness account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from appropriated funds designated for the account and funds transferred from the state emergency water projects revolving account must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for drought preparedness, including drought response. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the state drought preparedness account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account. The account may also accept revenue collected from emergency drought well related water service contracts.

Sec. 932. RCW 43.101.200 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 957 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All law enforcement personnel, except volunteers, and reserve officers whether paid or unpaid, initially employed on or after January 1, 1978, shall engage in basic law enforcement training which complies with standards adopted by the commission pursuant to RCW 43.101.080. For personnel initially employed before January 1, 1990, such training shall be successfully completed during the first fifteen months of employment of such personnel unless otherwise extended or waived by the commission and shall be requisite to the continuation of such employment. Personnel initially employed on or after January 1, 1990, shall commence basic training during the first six months of employment unless the basic training requirement is otherwise waived or extended by the commission. Successful completion of basic training is requisite to the continuation of employment of such personnel initially employed on or after January 1, 1990.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the commission shall provide the aforementioned training together with necessary facilities, supplies, materials, and the board and room of noncommuting attendees for seven days per week, except during the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia when the employing, county, city, or state law enforcement agency shall reimburse the commission for twenty-five percent of the cost of training its personnel. During fiscal year 2017, reimbursements shall be variable by the amount of cadets historically sent over the 2014 and 2015 fiscal years. Entities that have sent ten or more cadets shall reimburse for seventy-five percent of the cost of training their personnel, and entities that have sent six or more cadets shall reimburse for fifty percent of the cost of training their personnel. Additionally, to the extent funds are provided for this purpose, the commission shall reimburse to participating law enforcement agencies with ten or less full-time commissioned patrol officers the cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic law enforcement training: PROVIDED, That such reimbursement shall include only the actual cost of temporary replacement not to exceed the total amount of salary and benefits received by the replaced officer during his or her training period.

Sec. 933. RCW 43.110.030 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the department of commerce must contract for the provision of municipal research and services to cities, towns, and counties. Contracts for municipal research and services must be made with state agencies, educational institutions, or private consulting firms, that in the judgment of the department are qualified to provide such research and services. Contracts for staff support may be made with state agencies, educational institutions, or private consulting firms that in the judgment of the department are qualified to provide such support.

(2) Municipal research and services consists of:

(a) Studying and researching city, town, and county government and issues relating to city, town, and county government;

(b) Acquiring, preparing, and distributing publications related to city, town, and county government and issues relating to city, town, and county government;

(c) Providing educational conferences relating to city, town, and county government and issues relating to city, town, and county government;

(d) Furnishing legal, technical, consultative, and field services to cities, towns, and counties concerning planning, public health, utility services, fire protection, law enforcement, public works, and other issues relating to city, town, and county government; and

(e) Providing a list of all requirements imposed by all cities, towns, and counties on landlords or sellers of real property to provide information to a buyer or tenant pertaining to the subject property or the surrounding area. The list must be posted in a specific section on a web site maintained by the entity with which the department of commerce contracts for the provision of municipal research and services under this section, and must list by jurisdiction all applicable requirements. Cities, towns, and counties must provide information for posting on the web site in accordance with RCW 64.06.080.

(3) Requests for legal services by county officials must be sent to the office of the county prosecuting attorney. Responses by the department of commerce to county requests for legal services must be provided to the requesting official and the county prosecuting attorney.

(4) The department of commerce must coordinate with the association of Washington cities and the Washington state association of counties in carrying out the activities in this section.

(5)(a) For fiscal year 2017, the department of commerce may not contract for the provision of municipal research and services to cities, towns, and counties.

(b) It is the intent of the legislature to continue the policy under (a) of this subsection into the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium as it investigates whether contracts for municipal research and services under this section should continue or be modified or terminated.

Sec. 934. RCW 43.350.070 and 2011 c 5 s 916 are each amended to read as follows:

The life sciences discovery fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the board or the board's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be made only for purposes of this chapter. Administrative expenses of the authority, including staff support, may be paid only from the fund. Revenues to the fund consist of transfers made by the legislature from strategic contribution payments deposited in the tobacco settlement account under RCW 43.79.480, moneys received pursuant to contribution agreements entered into pursuant to RCW 43.350.030, moneys received from gifts, grants, and bequests, and interest earned on the fund. During the ((2009-2011)) 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to other state funds or accounts such amounts as represent the excess balance of the life sciences discovery fund.

Sec. 935. RCW 43.372.070 and 2013 c 318 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The marine resources stewardship trust account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from income derived from the investment of amounts credited to the account, any grants, gifts, or donations to the state for the purposes of marine management planning, marine spatial planning, data compilation, research, or monitoring, and any appropriations made to the account must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) Expenditures from the account may only be used for the purposes of marine management planning, marine spatial planning, research, monitoring, and implementation of the marine management plan.

(3) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, until July 1, 2016, expenditures from the account may only be used for the purposes of:

(a) Conducting ecosystem assessment and mapping activities in marine waters consistent with RCW 43.372.040(6) (a) and (c), with a focus on assessment and mapping activities related to marine resource uses and developing potential economic opportunities;

(b) Developing a marine management plan for the state's coastal waters as that term is defined in RCW 43.143.020; and

(c) Coordination under the west coast governors' agreement on ocean health, entered into on September 18, 2006, and other regional planning efforts consistent with RCW 43.372.030.

(4) Expenditures from the account on projects and activities relating to the state's coastal waters, as defined in RCW 43.143.020, must be made, to the maximum extent possible, consistent with the recommendations of the Washington coastal marine advisory council as provided in RCW 43.143.060. If expenditures relating to coastal waters are made in a manner that differs substantially from the Washington coastal marine advisory council's recommendations, the responsible agency receiving the appropriation shall provide the council and appropriate committees of the legislature with a written explanation.

(5) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the marine resources stewardship trust account to the aquatic lands enhancement account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 936. RCW 50.16.010 and 2014 c 221 s 920 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be maintained as special funds, separate and apart from all public moneys or funds of this state an unemployment compensation fund and an administrative contingency fund, which shall be administered by the commissioner exclusively for the purposes of this title, and to which RCW 43.01.050 shall not be applicable.

(2)(a) The unemployment compensation fund shall consist of:

(i) All contributions collected under RCW 50.24.010 and payments in lieu of contributions collected pursuant to the provisions of this title;

(ii) Any property or securities acquired through the use of moneys belonging to the fund;

(iii) All earnings of such property or securities;

(iv) Any moneys received from the federal unemployment account in the unemployment trust fund in accordance with Title XII of the social security act, as amended;

(v) All money recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by the fund;

(vi) All money credited to this state's account in the unemployment trust fund pursuant to section 903 of the social security act, as amended;

(vii) All money received from the federal government as reimbursement pursuant to section 204 of the federal-state extended compensation act of 1970 (84 Stat. 708-712; 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3304);

(viii) The portion of the additional penalties as provided in RCW 50.20.070(2) that is fifteen percent of the amount of benefits overpaid or deemed overpaid; and

(ix) All moneys received for the fund from any other source.

(b) All moneys in the unemployment compensation fund shall be commingled and undivided.

(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the administrative contingency fund shall consist of:

(i) All interest on delinquent contributions collected pursuant to this title;

(ii) All fines and penalties collected pursuant to the provisions of this title, except the portion of the additional penalties as provided in RCW 50.20.070(2) that is fifteen percent of the amount of benefits overpaid or deemed overpaid;

(iii) All sums recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by the fund; and

(iv) Revenue received under RCW 50.24.014.

(b) All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or assessed by a district court because of the violation of this title or rules adopted under this title shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW.

(c) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, moneys available in the administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014, shall be expended upon the direction of the commissioner, with the approval of the governor, whenever it appears to him or her that such expenditure is necessary solely for:

(i) The proper administration of this title and that insufficient federal funds are available for the specific purpose to which such expenditure is to be made, provided, the moneys are not substituted for appropriations from federal funds which, in the absence of such moneys, would be made available.

(ii) The proper administration of this title for which purpose appropriations from federal funds have been requested but not yet received, provided, the administrative contingency fund will be reimbursed upon receipt of the requested federal appropriation.

(iii) The proper administration of this title for which compliance and audit issues have been identified that establish federal claims requiring the expenditure of state resources in resolution. Claims must be resolved in the following priority: First priority is to provide services to eligible participants within the state; second priority is to provide substitute services or program support; and last priority is the direct payment of funds to the federal government.

(d)(i) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys available in the administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a), shall be expended as appropriated by the legislature for: (A) The cost of the job skills or worker retraining programs at the community and technical colleges and administrative costs at the state board for community and technical colleges; and (B) reemployment services such as business and project development assistance, local economic development capacity building, and local economic development financial assistance at the department of commerce. The remaining appropriation may be expended as specified in (c) of this subsection.

(ii) During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, moneys available in the administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a), shall be expended as appropriated by the legislature ((for)): (A) For the department of social and health services for employment and training services and programs in the WorkFirst program; (B) for the administrative costs of state agencies participating in the WorkFirst program; and (C) by the commissioner for the work group on agricultural and agricultural-related issues as provided in the 2013-2015 omnibus operating appropriations act. The remaining appropriation may be expended as specified in (c) of this subsection.

(4) Money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a) may only be expended, after appropriation, for the purposes specified in this section and RCW 50.62.010, 50.62.020, 50.62.030, 50.24.014, 50.44.053, and 50.22.010.

Sec. 937. RCW 66.08.190 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except for fiscal year 2017, prior to making distributions described in subsection (2) of this section, amounts must be retained to support allotments under RCW 43.88.110 from any legislative appropriation for municipal research and services. The legislative appropriation for such services must be in the amount specified under RCW 66.24.065.

(2) When excess funds are distributed during the months of June, September, December, and March of each year, all moneys subject to distribution must be disbursed to border areas, counties, cities, and towns as provided in RCW 66.24.065.

(3) The amount remaining after distributions under subsections (1) and (2) of this section must be deposited into the general fund.

(4) It is the intent of the legislature to continue the policy under subsection (1) of this section into the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium to cease the retaining of funds for municipal research and services as it investigates whether contracts for such services should continue or be modified or terminated.

Sec. 938. RCW 66.24.065 and 2012 c 2 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

The distribution of spirits license fees under RCW 66.24.630 and 66.24.055 through the liquor revolving fund to border areas, counties, cities, towns, and the municipal research center must be made in a manner that provides that each category of recipients receive, in the aggregate, no less than it received from the liquor revolving fund during comparable periods prior to December 8, 2011. An additional distribution of ten million dollars per year from the spirits license fees must be provided to border areas, counties, cities, and towns through the liquor revolving fund for the purpose of enhancing public safety programs. For fiscal year 2017, no distribution may be made for the municipal research center, and it is the intent of the legislature to continue this policy into the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium as it investigates whether contracts for such services should continue or be modified or terminated.

Sec. 939. RCW 69.50.530 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1101 are each amended to read as follows:

The dedicated marijuana account is created in the state treasury. All moneys received by the state liquor and cannabis board, or any employee thereof, from marijuana-related activities must be deposited in the account. Unless otherwise provided in chapter 4, Laws of 2015 2nd sp. sess., all marijuana excise taxes collected from sales of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products under RCW 69.50.535, and the license fees, penalties, and forfeitures derived under this chapter from marijuana producer, marijuana processor, marijuana researcher, and marijuana retailer licenses, must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may only be spent after appropriation. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the dedicated marijuana account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 940. RCW 69.50.540 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 967 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature must annually appropriate moneys in the dedicated marijuana account created in RCW 69.50.530 as follows:

(1) For the purposes listed in this subsection (1), the legislature must appropriate to the respective agencies amounts sufficient to make the following expenditures on a quarterly basis:

(a) Beginning July 1, 2015, one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars to the department of social and health services to design and administer the Washington state healthy youth survey, analyze the collected data, and produce reports, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, department of health, department of commerce, family policy council, and state liquor and cannabis board. The survey must be conducted at least every two years and include questions regarding, but not necessarily limited to, academic achievement, age at time of substance use initiation, antisocial behavior of friends, attitudes toward antisocial behavior, attitudes toward substance use, laws and community norms regarding antisocial behavior, family conflict, family management, parental attitudes toward substance use, peer rewarding of antisocial behavior, perceived risk of substance use, and rebelliousness. Funds disbursed under this subsection may be used to expand administration of the healthy youth survey to student populations attending institutions of higher education in Washington;

(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, fifty thousand dollars to the department of social and health services for the purpose of contracting with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct the cost-benefit evaluation and produce the reports described in RCW 69.50.550. This appropriation ends after production of the final report required by RCW 69.50.550;

(c) Beginning July 1, 2015, five thousand dollars to the University of Washington alcohol and drug abuse institute for the creation, maintenance, and timely updating of web-based public education materials providing medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use;

(d) An amount not less than one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the state liquor and cannabis board for administration of this chapter as appropriated in the omnibus appropriations act;

(e) Twenty-three thousand seven hundred fifty dollars to the department of enterprise services provided solely for the state building code council established under RCW 19.27.070, to develop and adopt fire and building code provisions related to marijuana processing and extraction facilities. The distribution under this subsection (1)(e) is for fiscal year 2016 only;

(2) From the amounts in the dedicated marijuana account after appropriation of the amounts identified in subsection (1) of this section, the legislature must appropriate for the purposes listed in this subsection (2) as follows:

(a)(i) Up to fifteen percent to the department of social and health services division of behavioral health and recovery for the development, implementation, maintenance, and evaluation of programs and practices aimed at the prevention or reduction of maladaptive substance use, substance use disorder, substance abuse or substance dependence, as these terms are defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, among middle school and high school-age students, whether as an explicit goal of a given program or practice or as a consistently corresponding effect of its implementation, mental health services for children and youth, and services for pregnant and parenting women; PROVIDED, That:

(A) Of the funds appropriated under (a)(i) of this subsection for new programs and new services, at least eighty-five percent must be directed to evidence-based or research-based programs and practices that produce objectively measurable results and, by September 1, 2020, are cost-beneficial; and

(B) Up to fifteen percent of the funds appropriated under (a)(i) of this subsection for new programs and new services may be directed to proven and tested practices, emerging best practices, or promising practices.

(ii) In deciding which programs and practices to fund, the secretary of the department of social and health services must consult, at least annually, with the University of Washington's social development research group and the University of Washington's alcohol and drug abuse institute.

(iii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of twenty-seven million seven hundred eighty-six thousand dollars, and for each subsequent fiscal year thereafter, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of twenty-five million five hundred thirty-six thousand dollars under this subsection (2)(a);

(b)(i) Up to ten percent to the department of health for the following, subject to (b)(ii) of this subsection (2):

(A) Creation, implementation, operation, and management of a marijuana education and public health program that contains the following:

(I) A marijuana use public health hotline that provides referrals to substance abuse treatment providers, utilizes evidence-based or research-based public health approaches to minimizing the harms associated with marijuana use, and does not solely advocate an abstinence-only approach;

(II) A grants program for local health departments or other local community agencies that supports development and implementation of coordinated intervention strategies for the prevention and reduction of marijuana use by youth; and

(III) Media-based education campaigns across television, internet, radio, print, and out-of-home advertising, separately targeting youth and adults, that provide medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use;

(B) The Washington poison control center; and

(C) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the funds appropriated under this subsection (2)(b) may be used for prevention activities that target youth and populations with a high incidence of tobacco use.

(ii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of seven million five hundred thousand dollars and for each subsequent fiscal year thereafter, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of nine million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars under this subsection (2)(b);

(c)(i) With the exception of the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, up to six-tenths of one percent to the University of Washington and four-tenths of one percent to Washington State University for research on the short and long-term effects of marijuana use, to include but not be limited to formal and informal methods for estimating and measuring intoxication and impairment, and for the dissemination of such research.

(ii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of two hundred seven thousand dollars and for each subsequent fiscal year, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of one million twenty-one thousand dollars to the University of Washington. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of one hundred thirty-eight thousand dollars and for each subsequent fiscal year thereafter, a minimum of six hundred eighty-one thousand dollars to Washington State University under this subsection (2)(c);

(d) Fifty percent to the state basic health plan trust account to be administered by the Washington basic health plan administrator and used as provided under chapter 70.47 RCW;

(e) Five percent to the Washington state health care authority to be expended exclusively through contracts with community health centers to provide primary health and dental care services, migrant health services, and maternity health care services as provided under RCW 41.05.220;

(f)(i) Up to three-tenths of one percent to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to fund grants to building bridges programs under chapter 28A.175 RCW.

(ii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, and each subsequent fiscal year, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of five hundred eleven thousand dollars to the office of the superintendent of public instruction under this subsection (2)(f); and

(g) At the end of each fiscal year, the treasurer must transfer any amounts in the dedicated marijuana account that are not appropriated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and this subsection (2) into the general fund, except as provided in (g)(i) of this subsection (2).

(i) Beginning in fiscal year 2018, if marijuana excise tax collections deposited into the general fund in the prior fiscal year exceed twenty-five million dollars, then each fiscal year the legislature must appropriate an amount equal to thirty percent of all marijuana excise taxes deposited into the general fund the prior fiscal year to the treasurer for distribution to counties, cities, and towns as follows:

(A) Thirty percent must be distributed to counties, cities, and towns where licensed marijuana retailers are physically located. Each jurisdiction must receive a share of the revenue distribution under this subsection (2)(g)(i)(A) based on the proportional share of the total revenues generated in the individual jurisdiction from the taxes collected under RCW 69.50.535, from licensed marijuana retailers physically located in each jurisdiction. For purposes of this subsection (2)(g)(i)(A), one hundred percent of the proportional amount attributed to a retailer physically located in a city or town must be distributed to the city or town.

(B) Seventy percent must be distributed to counties, cities, and towns ratably on a per capita basis. Counties must receive sixty percent of the distribution, which must be disbursed based on each county's total proportional population. Funds may only be distributed to jurisdictions that do not prohibit the siting of any state licensed marijuana producer, processor, or retailer.

(ii) Distribution amounts allocated to each county, city, and town must be distributed in four installments by the last day of each fiscal quarter.

(iii) By September 15th of each year, the state liquor and cannabis board must provide the state treasurer the annual distribution amount, if any, for each county and city as determined in (g)(i) of this subsection (2).

(iv) The total share of marijuana excise tax revenues distributed to counties and cities in (g)(i) of this subsection (2) may not exceed fifteen million dollars in fiscal years 2018 and 2019 and twenty million dollars per fiscal year thereafter.

For the purposes of this section, "marijuana products" means "useable marijuana," "marijuana concentrates," and "marijuana-infused products" as those terms are defined in RCW 69.50.101.

Sec. 941. RCW 70.105D.070 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 969 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7035 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control account are hereby created in the state treasury.

(2)(a) Moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 must be deposited as follows: Fifty-six percent to the state toxics control account under subsection (3) of this section and forty-four percent to the local toxics control account under subsection (4) of this section. When the cumulative amount of deposits made to the state and local toxics control accounts under this section reaches the limit during a fiscal year as established in (b) of this subsection, the remainder of the moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 during that fiscal year must be deposited into the environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170.

(b) The limit on distributions of moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 to the state and local toxics control accounts for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2013, is one hundred forty million dollars.

(c) In addition to the funds required under (a) of this subsection, the following moneys must be deposited into the state toxics control account: (i) The costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter 70.105A RCW; (ii) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter; and (iii) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by the legislature.

(3) Moneys in the state toxics control account must be used only to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the following activities:

(a) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;

(b) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;

(c) The hazardous waste clean-up program required under this chapter;

(d) State matching funds required under federal cleanup law;

(e) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;

(f) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling, or disposal of paint and hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and agriculture;

(g) Oil and hazardous materials spill prevention, preparedness, training, and response activities;

(h) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring programs;

(i) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;

(j) A public participation program;

(k) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will achieve both: (i) A substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur; and (ii) the prevention or mitigation of unfair economic hardship;

(l) Development and demonstration of alternative management technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management priorities of RCW 70.105.150;

(m) State agriculture and health programs for the safe use, reduction, recycling, or disposal of pesticides;

(n) Storm water pollution control projects and activities that protect or preserve existing remedial actions or prevent hazardous clean-up sites;

(o) Funding requirements to maintain receipt of federal funds under the federal solid waste disposal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.);

(p) Air quality programs and actions for reducing public exposure to toxic air pollution;

(q) Public funding to assist prospective purchasers to pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) if:

(i) The facility is located within a redevelopment opportunity zone designated under RCW 70.105D.150;

(ii) The amount and terms of the funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70.105D.040(5); and

(iii) The director has found the funding meets any additional criteria established in rule by the department, will achieve a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur, and will provide a public benefit in addition to cleanup commensurate with the scope of the public funding;

(r) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters;

(s) Appropriations to the local toxics control account or the environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170, if the legislature determines that priorities for spending exceed available funds in those accounts;

(t) During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the department of ecology's water quality, shorelands, environmental assessment, administration, and air quality programs;

(u) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, actions at the state conservation commission to improve water quality for shellfish;

(v) During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, actions at the University of Washington for reducing ocean acidification;

(w) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, for the University of Washington Tacoma soil remediation project;

(x) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics control account may be spent on projects in section 3160, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. and for transfer to the local toxics control account;

(y) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics control account may be transferred to the radioactive mixed waste account; and

(z) For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, forest practices regulation at the department of natural resources.

(4)(a) The department shall use moneys deposited in the local toxics control account for grants or loans to local governments for the following purposes in descending order of priority:

(i) Extended grant agreements entered into under (e)(i) of this subsection;

(ii) Remedial actions, including planning for adaptive reuse of properties as provided for under (e)(iv) of this subsection. The department must prioritize funding of remedial actions at:

(A) Facilities on the department's hazardous sites list with a high hazard ranking for which there is an approved remedial action work plan or an equivalent document under federal cleanup law;

(B) Brownfield properties within a redevelopment opportunity zone if the local government is a prospective purchaser of the property and there is a department-approved remedial action work plan or equivalent document under the federal cleanup law;

(iii) Storm water pollution source projects that: (A) Work in conjunction with a remedial action; (B) protect completed remedial actions against recontamination; or (C) prevent hazardous clean-up sites;

(iv) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;

(v) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;

(vi) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters; and

(vii) Appropriations to the state toxics control account or the environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170, if the legislature determines that priorities for spending exceed available funds in those accounts.

(b) Funds for plans and programs must be allocated consistent with the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW.

(c) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control account may also be used for local government storm water planning and implementation activities.

(d) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the local toxics control account to the state general fund, such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

(e) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department may use the following strategies when providing grants to local governments under this subsection:

(i) Enter into an extended grant agreement with a local government conducting remedial actions at a facility where those actions extend over multiple biennia and the total eligible cost of those actions exceeds twenty million dollars. The agreement is subject to the following limitations:

(A) The initial duration of such an agreement may not exceed ten years. The department may extend the duration of such an agreement upon finding substantial progress has been made on remedial actions at the facility;

(B) Extended grant agreements may not exceed fifty percent of the total eligible remedial action costs at the facility; and

(C) The department may not allocate future funding to an extended grant agreement unless the local government has demonstrated to the department that funds awarded under the agreement during the previous biennium have been substantially expended or contracts have been entered into to substantially expend the funds;

(ii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government conducting a remedial action that provides for periodic reimbursement of remedial action costs as they are incurred as established in the agreement;

(iii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government prior to it acquiring a property or obtaining necessary access to conduct remedial actions, provided the agreement is conditioned upon the local government acquiring the property or obtaining the access in accordance with a schedule specified in the agreement;

(iv) Provide integrated planning grants to local governments to fund studies necessary to facilitate remedial actions at brownfield properties and adaptive reuse of properties following remediation. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to: Environmental site assessments; remedial investigations; health assessments; feasibility studies; site planning; community involvement; land use and regulatory analyses; building and infrastructure assessments; economic and fiscal analyses; and any environmental analyses under chapter 43.21C RCW;

(v) Provide grants to local governments for remedial actions related to area-wide groundwater contamination. To receive the funding, the local government does not need to be a potentially liable person or be required to seek reimbursement of grant funds from a potentially liable person;

(vi) The director may alter grant matching requirements to create incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the following conditions exists:

(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship imposed by the clean-up liability;

(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development, public recreational opportunities, or habitat restoration opportunities that would not otherwise occur; or

(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and redevelopment of brownfield property under RCW 70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;

(vii) When pending grant applications under (e)(iv) and (v) of this subsection (4) exceed the amount of funds available, designated redevelopment opportunity zones must receive priority for distribution of available funds.

(f) To expedite multiparty clean-up efforts, the department may purchase remedial action cost-cap insurance. For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the local toxics control account may be spent on projects in sections 3024, 3035, 3036, and 3059, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

(5) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be spent only after appropriation by statute.

(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics control account may be used for: Natural disasters where there is no hazardous substance contamination; high performance buildings; solid waste incinerator facility feasibility studies, construction, maintenance, or operation; or after January 1, 2010, for projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound, funded in a competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310. However, this subsection does not prevent an appropriation from the state toxics control account to the department of revenue to enforce compliance with the hazardous substance tax imposed in chapter 82.21 RCW.

(7) Except during the 2011-2013 and the 2015-2017 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia, one percent of the moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 shall be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management priorities. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation that are not expended at the close of any biennium revert to the state toxics control account.

(8) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and performance. To accelerate both remedial action and economic recovery, the department may expedite the adoption of rules necessary to implement chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. using the expedited procedures in RCW 34.05.353. The department shall initiate the award of financial assistance by August 1, 2013. To ensure the adoption of rules will not delay financial assistance, the department may administer the award of financial assistance through interpretive guidance pending the adoption of rules through July 1, 2014.

(9) Except as provided under subsection (3)(k) and (q) of this section, nothing in chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. affects the ability of a potentially liable person to receive public funding.

(10) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium the local toxics control account may also be used for the centennial clean water program and for the storm water financial assistance program administered by the department of ecology.

Sec. 942. RCW 70.128.160 and 2015 c 266 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department is authorized to take one or more of the actions listed in subsection (2) of this section in any case in which the department finds that an adult family home provider has:

(a) Failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;

(b) Operated an adult family home without a license or under a revoked license;

(c) Knowingly or with reason to know made a false statement of material fact on his or her application for license or any data attached thereto, or in any matter under investigation by the department; or

(d) Willfully prevented or interfered with any inspection or investigation by the department.

(2) When authorized by subsection (1) of this section, the department may take one or more of the following actions:

(a) Refuse to issue a license;

(b) Impose reasonable conditions on a license, such as correction within a specified time, training, and limits on the type of clients the provider may admit or serve;

(c) Impose civil penalties of at least one hundred dollars per day per violation;

(d) Impose civil penalties of up to three thousand dollars for each incident that violates adult family home licensing laws and rules, including, but not limited to, chapters 70.128, 70.129, 74.34, and 74.39A RCW and related rules. Each day upon which the same or substantially similar action occurs is a separate violation subject to the assessment of a separate penalty;

(e) Impose civil penalties of up to ten thousand dollars for a current or former licensed provider who is operating an unlicensed home;

(f) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license; or

(g) Suspend admissions to the adult family home by imposing stop placement.

(3) When the department orders stop placement, the facility shall not admit any person until the stop placement order is terminated. The department may approve readmission of a resident to the facility from a hospital or nursing home during the stop placement. The department shall terminate the stop placement only after: (a) The violations necessitating the stop placement have been corrected; and (b) the provider exhibits the capacity to maintain correction of the violations previously found deficient. However, if upon the revisit the department finds new violations that the department reasonably believes will result in a new stop placement, the previous stop placement shall remain in effect until the new stop placement is imposed. In order to protect the home's existing residents from potential ongoing neglect, when the provider has been cited for a violation that is repeated, uncorrected, pervasive, or presents a threat to the health, safety, or welfare of one or more residents, and the department has imposed a stop placement, the department shall also impose a condition on license or other remedy to facilitate or spur prompter compliance if the violation has not been corrected, and the provider has not exhibited the capacity to maintain correction, within sixty days of the stop placement.

(4) Nothing in subsection (3) of this section is intended to apply to stop placement imposed in conjunction with a license revocation or summary suspension or to prevent the department from imposing a condition on license or other remedy prior to sixty days after a stop placement, if the department considers it necessary to protect one or more residents' well-being. After a department finding of a violation for which a stop placement has been imposed, the department shall make an on-site revisit of the provider within fifteen working days from the request for revisit, to ensure correction of the violation. For violations that are serious or recurring or uncorrected following a previous citation, and create actual or threatened harm to one or more residents' well-being, including violations of residents' rights, the department shall make an on-site revisit as soon as appropriate to ensure correction of the violation. Verification of correction of all other violations may be made by either a department on-site revisit or by written or photographic documentation found by the department to be credible. This subsection does not prevent the department from enforcing license suspensions or revocations. Nothing in this subsection shall interfere with or diminish the department's authority and duty to ensure that the provider adequately cares for residents, including to make departmental on-site revisits as needed to ensure that the provider protects residents, and to enforce compliance with this chapter.

(5) Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to department actions under this section, except that orders of the department imposing license suspension, stop placement, or conditions for continuation of a license are effective immediately upon notice and shall continue in effect pending a hearing, which must commence no later than sixty days after receipt of a request for a hearing. The time for commencement of a hearing may be extended by agreement of the parties or by the presiding officer for good cause shown by either party, but must commence no later than one hundred twenty days after receipt of a request for a hearing.

(6) A separate adult family home account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from civil penalties imposed under this chapter must be deposited into the account. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. The department shall use the special account only for promoting the quality of life and care of residents living in adult family homes. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the account may be expended for funding costs associated with the adult family home program.

(7) The department shall by rule specify criteria as to when and how the sanctions specified in this section must be applied. The criteria must provide for the imposition of incrementally more severe penalties for deficiencies that are repeated, uncorrected, pervasive, or present a threat to the health, safety, or welfare of one or more residents. The criteria shall be tiered such that those homes consistently found to have deficiencies will be subjected to increasingly severe penalties. The department shall implement prompt and specific enforcement remedies without delay for providers found to have delivered care or failed to deliver care resulting in problems that are repeated, uncorrected, pervasive, or present a threat to the health, safety, or welfare of one or more residents. In the selection of remedies, the health, safety, and well-being of residents must be of paramount importance.

Sec. 943. RCW 72.09.090 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

The correctional industries account is established in the state treasury. The department of corrections shall deposit in the account all moneys collected and all profits that accrue from the industrial and agricultural operations of the department and any moneys appropriated to the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only for expenses arising in the correctional industries operations.

The division's net profits from correctional industries' sales and contracts shall be reinvested, without appropriation, in the expansion and improvement of correctional industries. However, the secretary shall annually recommend that some portion of the profits from correctional industries be returned to the state general fund.

The secretary shall request appropriations or increased appropriations whenever it appears that additional money is needed to provide for the establishment and operation of a comprehensive correctional industries program. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate from the correctional industries account for increased caseload costs at the department of corrections such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 944. RCW 77.12.201 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 998 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative authority of a county may elect, by giving written notice to the director and the treasurer prior to January 1st of any year, to obtain for the following year an amount in lieu of real property taxes on game lands as provided in RCW 77.12.203. Upon the election, the county shall keep a record of all fines, forfeitures, reimbursements, and costs assessed and collected, in whole or in part, under this title for violations of law or rules adopted pursuant to this title, with the exception of the 2011-2013 ((and)), 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, and shall monthly remit an amount equal to the amount collected to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund. The election shall continue until the department is notified differently prior to January 1st of any year.

Sec. 945. RCW 82.08.170 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 976 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, during the months of January, April, July, and October of each year, the state treasurer must make the transfers required under subsections (2) and (3) of this section from the liquor excise tax fund and then the apportionment and distribution of all remaining moneys in the liquor excise tax fund to the counties, cities, and towns in the following proportions: (a) Twenty percent of the moneys in the liquor excise tax fund must be divided among and distributed to the counties of the state in accordance with the provisions of RCW 66.08.200; and (b) eighty percent of the moneys in the liquor excise tax fund must be divided among and distributed to the cities and towns of the state in accordance with the provisions of RCW 66.08.210.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, each fiscal quarter and prior to making the twenty percent distribution to counties under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the treasurer shall transfer to the liquor revolving fund created in RCW 66.08.170 sufficient moneys to fund the allotments from any legislative appropriations for county research and services as provided under chapter 43.110 RCW.

(3) During the months of January, April, July, and October of each year, the state treasurer must transfer two million five hundred thousand dollars from the liquor excise tax fund to the state general fund.

(4) During calendar year 2012, the October distribution under subsection (1) of this section and the July and October transfers under subsections (2) and (3) of this section must not be made. During calendar year 2013, the January, April, and July distributions under subsection (1) of this section and transfers under subsections (2) and (3) of this section must not be made.

(5) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the liquor excise tax fund may be appropriated for the local government fiscal note program in the department of commerce. It is the intent of the legislature to continue this policy in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

(6) For fiscal year 2017, no funds shall be transferred and no distribution shall be made for county research and services as provided under chapter 43.110 RCW, and it is the intent of the legislature to continue this policy into the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium as it investigates whether contracts for such services should continue or be modified or terminated.

Sec. 946. RCW 90.03.650 and 2010 c 285 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The water rights processing account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the fees collected under RCW 90.03.655, 90.03.665, and 90.44.540 must be deposited into the account. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may only be used to support the processing of water right applications for a new appropriation, change, transfer, or amendment of a water right as provided in this chapter and chapters 90.42 and 90.44 RCW or for the examination, certification, and renewal of certification of water right examiners as provided in RCW 90.03.665. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium the legislature may transfer from the water rights processing account to the state drought preparedness account.

Sec. 947. RCW 90.56.335 and 2003 c 264 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The vessel response account is created in the state treasury. Grants, gifts, and federal funds may be deposited into the account. Oil spill penalties assessed against ships under RCW 90.56.330 and 90.48.144 shall also be deposited into the account as well as the money distributed under RCW 46.68.020(2). Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. The department of ecology is authorized to utilize the vessel response account to preposition a dedicated rescue tug at the entrance to the Strait of Juan de Fuca to reduce the risk of major maritime accidents and oil spills on the outer coast and western strait. Prior to authorizing the rescue tug to respond to a distressed vessel, the department shall work with the United States coast guard and industry to determine if another capable, unencumbered commercial tug is available in the area that can respond. If such a tug can respond without increasing the risk of a casualty, it should be deployed as the tug of choice and the state-contracted rescue tug should not be taken off standby duty. The department is also authorized to spot charter tugs as needed during major storms and other high risk periods to protect maritime commerce and the environment anywhere in state waters.

The department shall not proceed with rule making related to emergency towing pursuant to chapter 88.46 RCW, so long as the deposit of the fee into the vessel response account under RCW 46.68.020(2) is continued and is appropriated for the purpose of the dedicated rescue tug.

During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the vessel response account to the environmental legacy stewardship account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 948. RCW 90.76.100 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 72 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The underground storage tank account is created in the state treasury. Money in the account may only be spent, subject to legislative appropriation, for the administration and enforcement of the underground storage tank program established under this chapter. The account shall contain:

(((1))) (a) All fees collected under RCW 90.76.090; and

(((2))) (b) All fines or penalties collected under RCW 90.76.080.

(2) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the underground storage tank account to the environmental legacy stewardship account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 949. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 950. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

--- END ---