BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 52.30 RCW to read as follows:

An employee of a fire protection district may volunteer for, or seek and accept part-time or paid on-call employment with, another fire protection district or municipal fire department if such volunteering or employment does not conflict with his or her performance of the original employment. No collective bargaining agreement made after the effective date of this section may prohibit the exercise of rights under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

An employee of a municipal fire department under this title or Title 35A RCW may volunteer for, or seek and accept part-time or paid on-call employment with, another municipal fire department or fire protection district if such volunteering or employment does not conflict with his or her performance of the original employment. No collective bargaining agreement made after the effective date of this section may prohibit the exercise of rights under this section.

--- END ---