BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.146.205 and 2015 c 229 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Application for a mortgage broker license under this chapter must be made to the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry and in the form prescribed by the director. The application must contain at least the following information:

(a) The name, address, date of birth, and social security number of the applicant, and any other names, dates of birth, or social security numbers previously used by the applicant, unless waived by the director;

(b) If the applicant is a partnership, association, or limited liability company the name, address, date of birth, and social security number of each general partner, principal, or member of the association, and any other names, dates of birth, or social security numbers previously used by the members, unless waived by the director;

(c) If the applicant is a corporation, the name, address, date of birth, and social security number of each officer, director, registered agent, and each principal stockholder, and any other names, dates of birth, or social security numbers previously used by the officers, directors, registered agents, and principal stockholders unless waived by the director;

(d) The street address, county, and municipality where the principal business office is to be located;

(e) The name, address, date of birth, and social security number of the applicant's designated broker, and any other names, dates of birth, or social security numbers previously used by the designated broker and a complete set of the designated broker's fingerprints taken by an authorized law enforcement officer; and

(f)(i) Such other information regarding the applicant's or designated broker's background, financial responsibility, experience, character, and general fitness as the director may require by rule.

(ii) The director may waive one or more requirements of this section or permit an applicant to submit other information in lieu of the required information.

(2) As a part of or in connection with an application for any license under this section, or periodically upon license renewal, the applicant must furnish information concerning his or her identity, including fingerprints for submission to the Washington state patrol, the federal bureau of investigation, the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry, or any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive this information for a state and national criminal history background check; personal history; experience; business record; purposes; and other pertinent facts, as the director may reasonably require. As part of or in connection with an application for a license under this chapter, the director is authorized to receive criminal history record information that includes nonconviction data as defined in RCW 10.97.030. The department may only disseminate nonconviction data obtained under this section to criminal justice agencies. This section does not apply to financial institutions regulated under chapters 31.12 and 31.13 RCW and Titles 30A, 32, and 33 RCW.

(3) In order to reduce the points of contact which the federal bureau of investigation may have to maintain, the director may use the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing information to the department of justice or any governmental agency.

(4) In order to reduce the points of contact which the director may have to maintain, the director may use the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry as a channeling agent for requesting and distributing information to and from any source so directed by the director.

(5) At the time of filing an application for a license under this chapter, each applicant must pay to the director through the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry the appropriate application fee in an amount determined by rule of the director in accordance with RCW 43.24.086 to cover, but not exceed, the cost of processing and reviewing the application. The director must deposit the moneys in the financial services regulation fund, unless the consumer services account is created as a dedicated, nonappropriated account, in which case the director must deposit the moneys in the consumer services account.

(6)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, each applicant for a mortgage broker's license must file and maintain a surety bond, in an amount which the director deems adequate to protect the public interest, executed by the applicant as obligor and by a surety company authorized to do a surety business in this state as surety. The bonding requirement as established by the director must take the form of a range of bond amounts which vary according to the annual loan origination volume of the licensee. The bond must run to the state of Washington as obligee, and must run first to the benefit of the borrower and then to the benefit of the state and any person or persons who suffer loss by reason of the applicant's or its loan originator's violation of any provision of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. The bond must be conditioned that the obligor as licensee will faithfully conform to and abide by this chapter and all rules adopted under this chapter, and must reimburse all persons who suffer loss by reason of a violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. Borrowers must be given priority over the state and other persons. The state and other third parties must be allowed to receive distribution pursuant to a valid claim against the remainder of the bond. In the case of claims made by any person or entity who is not a borrower, no final judgment may be entered prior to one hundred eighty days following the date the claim is filed. The bond must be continuous and may be canceled by the surety upon the surety giving written notice to the director of its intent to cancel the bond. The cancellation must be effective thirty days after the notice is received by the director. Whether or not the bond is renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued, or otherwise extended, replaced, or modified, including increases or decreases in the penal sum, it is considered one continuous obligation, and the surety upon the bond is not liable in an aggregate or cumulative amount exceeding the penal sum set forth on the face of the bond. In no event is the penal sum, or any portion thereof, at two or more points in time be added together in determining the surety's liability. The bond is not ((be [is not])) liable for any penalties imposed on the licensee((,)) including, but not limited to, any increased damages or attorneys' fees, or both, awarded under RCW 19.86.090. The applicant may obtain the bond directly from the surety or through a group bonding arrangement involving a professional organization comprised of mortgage brokers if the arrangement provides at least as much coverage as is required under this subsection.

(b) If the director determines that the bond required in (a) of this subsection is not reasonably available, the director must waive the requirements for such a bond. ((The mortgage recovery fund account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The director is authorized to charge fees to fund the account. All fees charged under this section, except those retained by the director for administration of the account, must be deposited into the mortgage recovery fund account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the same purposes as the surety bond as described in (a) of this subsection. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. A person entitled to receive payment from the mortgage recovery account may only receive reimbursement after a court of competent jurisdiction has determined the actual damages caused by the licensee. The director may determine by rule the procedure for recovery; the amount each mortgage broker must pay through the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry for deposit in the mortgage recovery account; and the amount necessary to administer the account.))

Sec. 2. RCW 43.330.418 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 609 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governor may take all appropriate steps to seek federal funding in order to maximize investment in broadband deployment and adoption in the state of Washington. Such steps may include the designation of a broadband deployment and adoption coordinator; review and prioritization of grant applications by public and private entities as directed by the national telecommunications and information administration, the rural utility services, and the federal communications commission; disbursement of block grant funding; and direction to state agencies to provide staffing as necessary to carry out this section. The authority for overseeing broadband adoption and deployment efforts on behalf of the state is vested in the department.

(2) The department may apply for federal funds and other grants or donations, ((may deposit such funds in the Washington community technology opportunity account created in RCW 43.330.415,)) may oversee implementation of federally funded or mandated broadband programs for the state, and may adopt rules to administer the programs. These programs may include but are not limited to the following:

(a) Engaging in periodic statewide surveys of residents, businesses, and nonprofit organizations concerning their use and adoption of high-speed internet, computer, and related information technology for the purpose of identifying barriers to adoption;

(b) Working with communities to identify barriers to the adoption of broadband service and related information technology services by individuals, nonprofit organizations, and businesses;

(c) Identifying broadband demand opportunities in communities by working cooperatively with local organizations, government agencies, and businesses;

(d) Creating, implementing, and administering programs to improve computer ownership, technology literacy, digital media literacy, and high-speed internet access for populations not currently served or underserved in the state. This may include programs to provide low-income families, community-based nonprofit organizations, nonprofit entities, and public entities that work in partnership with nonprofit entities to provide increased access to computers and broadband, with reduced cost internet access;

(e) Administering the community technology opportunity program under RCW 43.330.412 ((and 43.330.415));

(f) Creating additional programs to spur the development of high-speed internet resources in the state;

(g) Establishing technology literacy and digital inclusion programs and establishing low-cost hardware, software, and internet purchasing programs that may include allowing participation by community technology programs in state purchasing programs; and

(h) Developing technology loan programs targeting small businesses or businesses located in unserved and underserved areas.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.84.092 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 107 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust account, the diesel idle reduction account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle charging infrastructure account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, ((the public health services account,)) the high capacity transportation account, the state higher education construction account, ((the higher education construction account,)) the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the high occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the state wildlife account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, the state university permanent fund, and the state reclamation revolving account shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.

(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.95.165 and 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county or city siting a solid waste disposal facility shall review each potential site for conformance with the standards as set by the department for:

(a) Geology;

(b) Groundwater;

(c) Soil;

(d) Flooding;

(e) Surface water;

(f) Slope;

(g) Cover material;

(h) Capacity;

(i) Climatic factors;

(j) Land use;

(k) Toxic air emissions; and

(l) Other factors as determined by the department.

(2) The standards in subsection (1) of this section shall be designed to use the best available technology to protect the environment and human health, and shall be revised periodically to reflect new technology and information.

(3) Each county shall establish a local solid waste advisory committee to assist in the development of programs and policies concerning solid waste handling and disposal and to review and comment upon proposed rules, policies, or ordinances prior to their adoption. Such committees shall consist of a minimum of nine members and shall represent a balance of interests including, but not limited to, citizens, public interest groups, business, the waste management industry, and local elected public officials. The members shall be appointed by the county legislative authority. ((A county or city shall not apply for funds from the state and local improvements revolving account, Waste Disposal Facilities, 1980, under RCW 43.83.350, for the preparation, update, or major amendment of a comprehensive solid waste management plan unless the plan or revision has been prepared with the active assistance and participation of a local solid waste advisory committee.))

Sec. 5. RCW 72.72.030 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((There is hereby created, in the state treasury, an institutional impact account.)) The secretary of social and health services may reimburse political subdivisions for criminal justice costs incurred directly as a result of crimes committed by offenders residing in an institution as defined ((herein)) in RCW 72.72.020 under the jurisdiction of the secretary of social and health services. ((Such reimbursement shall be made to the extent funds are available from the institutional impact account.)) Reimbursements shall be limited to law enforcement, prosecutorial, judicial, and jail facilities costs which are documented to be strictly related to the criminal activities of the offender.

(2) The secretary of corrections may reimburse political subdivisions for criminal justice costs incurred directly as a result of crimes committed by offenders residing in an institution as defined ((herein)) in RCW 72.72.020 under the jurisdiction of the secretary of corrections. Such reimbursement shall be made to the extent funds are available ((from the institutional impact account)) from appropriations. Reimbursements shall be limited to law enforcement, prosecutorial, judicial, and jail facilities costs which are documented to be strictly related to the criminal activities of the offender.

Sec. 6. RCW 72.72.050 and 1983 c 279 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The state shall reimburse cities and counties for their expenses incurred directly as a result of their providing personnel and material pursuant to a contingency plan adopted under RCW 72.02.150. ((Reimbursement to cities and counties shall be expended solely from the institutional impact account within funds available in that account.)) If the costs of reimbursements to cities and counties exceed available funds, the secretary of corrections shall request the legislature to appropriate sufficient funds to enable the secretary of corrections to make full reimbursement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 38.40.220 (Military department active state service account) and 2008 c 44 s 1;

(2) RCW 43.63A.315 (Independent youth housing account) and 2007 c 316 s 7;

(3) RCW 43.72.902 (Public health services account) and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 916, 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 913, 1995 c 43 s 12, & 1993 c 492 s 470;

(4) RCW 43.83.310 (Higher education construction account) and 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 26, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 8, 1985 c 57 s 13, & 1979 ex.s. c 253 s 4;

(5) RCW 43.83.330 (State and local improvements revolving account—Definitions) and 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 34, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 43, 1985 c 57 s 44, & 1972 ex.s. c 127 s 3;

(6) RCW 43.83.320 (Higher education reimbursable short-term bond account) and 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 41, 2012 c 198 s 4, 1989 1st ex.s. c 14 s 13, 1988 c 36 s 22, 1986 c 103 s 1, & 1985 ex.s. c 4 s 2;

(7) RCW 43.83.350 (State and local improvements revolving account, Waste Disposal Facilities, 1980—Definitions) and 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 40, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 44, 1985 c 57 s 56, & 1980 c 159 s 3;

(8) RCW 43.330.094 (Tourism development and promotion account—Promotion of tourism industry) and 2011 c 5 s 913, 2009 c 565 s 6, 2007 c 228 s 202, 2003 c 153 s 4, & 1997 c 220 s 223;

(9) RCW 43.83.370 (Fisheries capital projects account) and 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 37 & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 132 s 4;

(10) RCW 43.167.040 (Community preservation and development authority account) and 2007 c 501 s 7;

(11) RCW 43.330.415 (Washington community technology opportunity account) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 608, 2009 c 509 s 8, & 2008 c 262 s 8; and

(12) RCW 70.146.100 (Water quality capital account—Expenditures) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 948 & 2007 c 233 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. RCW 43.83.310 is decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Any residual balance of funds remaining in any account eliminated in this act on the effective date of this section shall be transferred to the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. This act takes effect June 30, 2016.

--- END ---