BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any public utility district may organize, administer, and own a community solar project. A district-owned solar energy system must be voluntarily funded by the district's ratepayers where, in exchange for their financial support, the district gives contributors a payment or credit on their utility bill for the value of the electricity produced by the project.

(2) The solar energy system may be located on the premises of a retail electric residential, commercial, nonprofit organization, or local government customer of the district in Washington, or on property beyond the boundaries of the public utility district, provided that all such properties are maintained and operated subject to regulations the local government entity may prescribe.

(3) Public utility districts and joint operating agencies organized under chapter 43.52 RCW have the power and authority to enter into agreements with each other to construct and own a joint community solar project in order to maximize direct sunlight as an energy source through appropriate siting of solar energy systems.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.16.110 and 2011 c 179 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Administrator" means an owner and assignee of a community solar project as defined in subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section that is responsible for applying for the investment cost recovery incentive on behalf of the other owners and performing such administrative tasks on behalf of the other owners as may be necessary, such as receiving investment cost recovery incentive payments, and allocating and paying appropriate amounts of such payments to the other owners.

(2)(a) "Community solar project" means:

(i) A solar energy system that is capable of generating up to seventy-five kilowatts of electricity and is owned by local individuals, households, nonprofit organizations, or nonutility businesses that is placed on the property owned by a cooperating local governmental entity that is not in the light and power business or in the gas distribution business;

(ii) A utility-owned solar energy system that is capable of generating up to seventy-five kilowatts of electricity and that is voluntarily funded by the utility's ratepayers where, in exchange for their financial support, the utility gives contributors a payment or credit on their utility bill for the value of the electricity produced by the project; or

(iii) A solar energy system, placed on the property owned by a cooperating local governmental entity that is not in the light and power business or in the gas distribution business, that is capable of generating up to seventy-five kilowatts of electricity, and that is owned by a company whose members are each eligible for an investment cost recovery incentive for the same customer-generated electricity as provided in RCW 82.16.120.

(b) For the purposes of "community solar project" as defined in (a) of this subsection:

(i) "Company" means an entity that is:

(A)(I) A limited liability company;

(II) A cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW; or

(III) A mutual corporation or association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW; and

(B) Not a "utility" as defined in this subsection (2)(b); and

(ii) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of January 1, 2009; and

(iii) "Utility" means a light and power business, which includes a public utility district, an electric cooperative, or a mutual corporation, that provides electricity service.

(3) "Customer-generated electricity" means a community solar project or the alternating current electricity that is generated from a renewable energy system located in Washington and installed on an individual's, businesses', or local government's real property that is also provided electricity generated by a light and power business. Except for community solar projects, a system located on a leasehold interest does not qualify under this definition. Except for utility-owned community solar projects, "customer-generated electricity" does not include electricity generated by a light and power business with greater than one thousand megawatt hours of annual sales or a gas distribution business.

(4) "Economic development kilowatt-hour" means the actual kilowatt-hour measurement of customer-generated electricity multiplied by the appropriate economic development factor.

(5) "Local governmental entity" means any unit of local government of this state including, but not limited to, counties, cities, towns, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations, special purpose districts, and school districts.

(6) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly into electricity without moving parts.

(7) "Renewable energy system" means a solar energy system, an anaerobic digester as defined in RCW 82.08.900, or a wind generator used for producing electricity.

(8) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source for use in the generation of electricity.

(9) "Solar inverter" means the device used to convert direct current to alternating current in a solar energy system.

(10) "Solar module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and providing a single direct current electrical output.

(11) "Stirling converter" means a device that produces electricity by converting heat from a solar source utilizing a stirling engine.

--- END ---