BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.18.280 and 2011 c 332 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A registered owner who has been awarded a Purple Heart medal by any branch of the United States armed forces, including the merchant marines and the women's air forces service pilots may apply to the department for special license plates for use on ((only one)) a motor vehicle required to display one or two license plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by the department, and owned by the qualified applicant. The applicant must:

(a) Be a resident of this state;

(b) Have been wounded during one of this nation's wars or conflicts identified in RCW 41.04.005;

(c) Have received an honorable discharge from the United States armed forces;

(d) Provide a copy of the armed forces document showing the recipient was awarded the Purple Heart medal;

(e) Be recorded as the registered owner of the motor vehicle on which the Purple Heart ((survivor)) license plate or plates will be displayed; and

(f) Pay all fees and taxes required by law for registering the motor vehicle.

(2) Purple Heart license plates must be issued without the payment of any special license plate fee for one motor vehicle. For other motor vehicles, qualified applicants may purchase Purple Heart license plates for the fee required under RCW 46.17.220(1)(p).

(3) Purple Heart license plates may be issued to the surviving spouse or domestic partner of a Purple Heart recipient who met the requirements in subsection (1) of this section. The surviving spouse or domestic partner must be a resident of this state. If the surviving spouse remarries or the surviving domestic partner marries or enters into a new domestic partnership, he or she must return the special license plates to the department within fifteen days and apply for regular license plates or another type of special license plate.

(4) A Purple Heart license plate or plates may be transferred from one motor vehicle to another motor vehicle owned by the Purple Heart recipient or the surviving spouse or domestic partner as described in subsection (3) of this section upon application to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.17.220 and 2014 c 77 s 2 and 2014 c 6 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application for a vehicle registration in chapter 46.16A RCW, the holder of a special license plate shall pay the appropriate special license plate fee as listed in this section.

PLATE TYPE

INITIAL FEE

RENEWAL FEE

DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) 4-H

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(b) Amateur radio license

$ 5.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.070

(c) Armed forces

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(d) Baseball stadium

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

Subsection (2) of this section

(e) Breast cancer awareness

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(f) Collector vehicle

$ 35.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.030

(g) Collegiate

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.430

(h) Endangered wildlife

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(i) Gonzaga University alumni association

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(j) Helping kids speak

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(k) Horseless carriage

$ 35.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.030

(l) Keep kids safe

$ 45.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(m) Law enforcement memorial

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(n) Military affiliate radio system

$ 5.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.070

(o) Music matters

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(p) Purple Heart

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(q) Professional firefighters and paramedics

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((q))) (r) Ride share

$ 25.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.030

(((r))) (s) Seattle Seahawks

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((s))) (t) Seattle Sounders FC

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((t))) (u) Seattle University

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((u))) (v) Share the road

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((v))) (w) Ski & ride Washington

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((w))) (x) Square dancer

$ 40.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.070

(((x))) (y) State flower

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((y))) (z) Volunteer firefighters

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((z))) (aa) Washington lighthouses

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((aa))) (bb) Washington state parks

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(((bb))) (cc) Washington's national parks

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((cc))) (dd) Washington's wildlife collection

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(((dd))) (ee) We love our pets

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((ee))) (ff) Wild on Washington

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(2) After deducting administration and collection expenses for the sale of baseball stadium license plates, the remaining proceeds must be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW 82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds to the state general fund.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.68.425 and 2014 c 77 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall:

(a) Collect special license plate fees established under RCW 46.17.220;

(b) Deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars for initial issue and two dollars for renewal issue for administration and collection expenses incurred by it; and

(c) Remit the remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report.

(2) The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle fund until the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of implementing the special license plate. Upon determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the state treasurer shall credit the remaining special license plate fees to the following accounts by special license plate type:

SPECIAL LICENSE PLATE TYPE

ACCOUNT

CONDITIONS FOR USE OF FUNDS

Armed forces

RCW 43.60A.140

((N/A)) As specified in RCW 43.60A.140(4)

Breast cancer awareness

RCW 43.70.327

Must be used only by the department of health for efforts consistent with the breast, cervical, and colon health program

Endangered wildlife

RCW 77.12.170

Must be used only for the department of fish and wildlife's endangered wildlife program activities

Keep kids safe

RCW 43.121.100

As specified in RCW 43.121.100

Purple Heart

RCW 43.60A.140

As specified in RCW 43.60A.140(4)

Washington state parks

RCW 79A.05.059

Provide public educational opportunities and enhancement of Washington state parks

Washington's wildlife collection

RCW 77.12.170

Only for the department of fish and wildlife's game species management activities

Wild on Washington

RCW 77.12.170

Dedicated to the department of fish and wildlife's watchable wildlife activities, as defined in RCW 77.32.560

Sec. 4. RCW 43.60A.140 and 2010 c 161 s 1106 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The veterans stewardship account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Disbursements of funds must be on the authorization of the director or the director's designee, and only for the purposes stated in subsection (4) of this section. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, funds are subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit expenditure of the funds.

(2) The department may request and accept nondedicated contributions, grants, or gifts in cash or otherwise, including funds generated by the issuance of the armed forces license plate collection under chapter 46.18 RCW.

(3) All receipts from the sale of armed forces license plates and Purple Heart license plates as required under RCW ((46.17.220(1)(b))) 46.68.425(2) must be deposited into the veterans stewardship account.

(4) All moneys deposited into the veterans stewardship account must be used by the department for activities that benefit veterans or their families, including but not limited to, providing programs and services for homeless veterans; establishing memorials honoring veterans; and maintaining a future state veterans' cemetery. Funds from the account may not be used to supplant existing funds received by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2017.

--- END ---