BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.24.100 and 1963 c 4 s 36.24.100 are each amended to read as follows:

If the jury finds that the person was killed and the party committing the homicide is ascertained by the inquisition, but is not in custody, the coroner shall ((issue a warrant for the arrest of the person charged, returnable forthwith to the nearest magistrate)) deliver the findings of the jury and all documents, testimony, and records generated, possessed, or used during the inquest to the prosecuting attorney of the county where the inquest was held.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 36.24.110 (Form of warrant) and 2009 c 549 s 4037 & 1963 c 4 s 36.24.110; and

(2) RCW 36.24.120 (Service of warrant) and 1963 c 4 s 36.24.120.

--- END ---