BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. RELATING TO ACCOUNTABILITY & REFORM. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 43.320.012 (Department of general administration and department of licensing equipment, records, funds transferred);

(2) RCW 43.320.013 (Department of general administration and department of licensing civil service employees transferred);

(3) RCW 43.320.014 (Department of general administration or department of licensing rules, business, contracts, and obligations continued);

(4) RCW 43.320.015 (Department of general administration and department of licensing—Validity of acts);

(5) RCW 43.320.016 (Apportionment of budgeted funds); and

(6) RCW 43.320.901 (Implementation—1993 c 472).

Sec. 2. RCW 43.320.017 and 1993 c 472 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

SECTION 1 CONFORMING AMENDMENT. Nothing contained in RCW 43.320.011 ((through 43.320.015)) may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until the expiration date of the current agreement or until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the Washington personnel resources board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. RELATING TO AGRICULTURE, WATER & RURAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 15.13.940 (Severability—1971 ex.s. c 33);

(2) RCW 15.14.920 (Severability—1961 c 83);

(3) RCW 15.15.900 (Effective date—1997 c 176);

(4) RCW 15.17.940 (Severability—1963 c 122); and

(5) RCW 15.19.900 (Severability—1998 c 154).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. RELATING TO COMMERCE & LABOR. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 50.06.010 (Purpose);

(2) RCW 50.13.010 (Legislative intent and recognition);

(3) RCW 50.13.910 (Legislative designation and placement);

(4) RCW 50.38.900 (Effective date—1982 c 43);

(5) RCW 50.38.902 (Effective date—1993 c 62);

(6) RCW 50.60.902 (Effective date—1983 c 207);

(7) RCW 50.65.905 (Effective date—1987 c 167); and

(8) RCW 50.70.902 (Effective date—1991 c 315).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. RELATING TO COMMERCE & LABOR. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 66.08.230 (Initial disbursement to wine commission—Repayment) and 1987 c 452 s 12;

(2) RCW 66.08.250 (Report on streamlining liquor tax collection) and 2013 c 95 s 2; and

(3) RCW 66.12.020 (Sales of liquor to board) and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 48.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. RELATING TO EARLY LEARNING & K-12 EDUCATION. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 28A.165.900 (Captions not law—2004 c 20);

(2) RCW 28A.315.075 (Effect of 1999 c 315—Existing provisions not affected);

(3) RCW 28A.315.901 (Part headings and captions not law—1999 c 315);

(4) RCW 28A.655.901 (Part headings and captions not law—1999 c 388);

(5) RCW 28A.700.901 (Part headings not law—2008 c 170); and

(6) RCW 28A.900.103 (Subheadings not law—1990 c 33).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. RELATING TO EARLY LEARNING & K-12 EDUCATION. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 28A.305.900 (Transfer of powers and duties—State board of education) and 2005 c 497 s 301;

(2) RCW 28A.305.901 (Transfer of powers and duties—Academic achievement and accountability commission) and 2005 c 497 s 302; and

(3) RCW 28A.630.005 (Pilot project to assist school-age children in short-term foster care) and 2002 c 326 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. RELATING TO ENERGY, ENVIRONMENT & TELECOMMUNICATIONS. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 70.94.505 (Woodsmoke emissions—Work group) and 2007 c 339 s 3;

(2) RCW 70.95N.270 (Reports) and 2006 c 183 s 28;

(3) RCW 70.104.070 (Pesticide incident reporting and tracking review panel—Intent) and 1989 c 380 s 67;

(4) RCW 70.104.090 (Pesticide panel—Responsibilities) and 1991 c 3 s 364 & 1989 c 380 s 69; and

(5) RCW 80.36.901 (Legislative review of 1985 c 450—1989 c 101) and 1989 c 101 s 18 & 1985 c 450 s 44.

Sec. 9. RCW 70.95.532 and 2010 c 247 s 704 are each amended to read as follows:

RELATING TO ENERGY, ENVIRONMENT & TELECOMMUNICATIONS. (1) All receipts from tire fees imposed under RCW 70.95.510, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, must be deposited in the waste tire removal account created under RCW 70.95.521. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used for the cleanup of unauthorized waste tire piles and measures that prevent future accumulation of unauthorized waste tire piles.

(2) On September 1st of odd-numbered years, the state treasurer must transfer any cash balance in excess of one million dollars from the waste tire removal account created under RCW 70.95.521 to the motor vehicle account for the purpose of road wear related maintenance on state and local public highways.

(((3) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer any cash balance in excess of one million dollars from the waste tire removal account to the motor vehicle account for the purpose of road wear-related maintenance on state and local public highways.))

Sec. 10. RCW 80.01.080 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 950 are each amended to read as follows:

RELATING TO ENERGY, ENVIRONMENT & TELECOMMUNICATIONS. There is created in the state treasury a public service revolving fund. Regulatory fees payable by all types of public service companies shall be deposited to the credit of the public service revolving fund. Except for expenses payable out of the pipeline safety account, all expense of operation of the Washington utilities and transportation commission shall be payable out of the public service revolving fund.

((During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public service revolving fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. SECTION 8 CONFORMING REPEALER. RCW 70.104.100 (Industrial insurance statutes not affected) and 1989 c 380 s 70 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. RELATING TO FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS & INSURANCE. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 21.20.886 (Rule making for small securities offerings) and 2014 c 144 s 5;

(2) RCW 31.04.501 (Implementation) and 2009 c 149 s 9; and

(3) RCW 48.102.190 (Existing viatical settlement licenses—July 26, 2009) and 2009 c 104 s 22.

Sec. 13. RCW 21.20.400 and 2003 c 288 s 3 and 2003 c 53 s 163 are each reenacted to read as follows:

RELATING TO FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS & INSURANCE. (1) Any person who willfully violates any provision of this chapter except RCW 21.20.350, or who willfully violates any rule or order under this chapter, or who willfully violates RCW 21.20.350 knowing the statement made to be false or misleading in any material respect, is guilty of a class B felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021(1)(b). However, a person may not be imprisoned for the violation of any rule or order if that person proves that he or she had no knowledge of the rule or order.

(2) Any person who knowingly alters, destroys, shreds, mutilates, or conceals a record, document, or other object, or attempts to do so, with the intent to impair the object's integrity or availability for use in an official proceeding under this chapter, is guilty of a class B felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021(1)(b) or punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred thousand dollars, or both. The fines paid under this subsection shall be deposited into the securities prosecution fund.

(3) No indictment or information may be returned under this chapter more than (a) five years after the violation, or (b) three years after the actual discovery of the violation, whichever date of limitation is later.

Sec. 14. RCW 48.18A.035 and 2008 c 217 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

RELATING TO FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS & INSURANCE. (((1))) Every individual variable contract issued shall have printed on its face or attached thereto a notice stating in substance that the policy owner shall be permitted to return the policy within ten days after it is received by the policy owner and to have the market value of the assets purchased by its premium, less taxes and investment brokerage commissions, if any, refunded, if, after examination of the policy, the policy owner is not satisfied with it for any reason. An additional ten percent penalty shall be added to any premium refund due which is not paid within thirty days of return of the policy to the insurer or insurance producer. If a policy owner pursuant to such notice returns the policy to the insurer at its home or branch office or to the insurance producer through whom it was purchased, it shall be void from the beginning and the parties shall be in the same position as if no policy had been issued.

(((2) No later than January 1, 2010, or when the insurer has used all of its existing paper variable contract forms which were in its possession on July 1, 2009, whichever is earlier, the notice required by subsection (1) of this section shall use the term insurance producer in place of agent.))

Sec. 15. RCW 48.25.140 and 2008 c 217 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

RELATING TO FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS & INSURANCE. (((1))) There shall be a provision that no insurance producer shall have the power or authority to waive, change, or alter any of the terms or conditions of any policy; except that, at the option of the insurer, the terms or conditions may be changed by an endorsement signed by a duly authorized officer of the insurer.

(((2) No later than January 1, 2010, or when the insurer has used all of its existing paper industrial life insurance contract forms which were in its possession on July 1, 2009, whichever is earlier, the notice required by subsection (1) of this section shall use the term insurance producer in place of agent.))

Sec. 16. RCW 48.29.015 and 2008 c 110 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

RELATING TO FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS & INSURANCE. (1) A title insurance agent shall maintain records of its title orders sufficient to indicate the source of the title orders.

(2) Every title insurance agent shall file with the commissioner annually by March 15th of each year for the previous calendar year, unless the commissioner for good cause shown extends the time for filing, a report, on a form prescribed by the commissioner, setting forth:

(a) The names and addresses of those persons, if any, who have had a financial interest in the title insurance agent during the calendar year, who are known or reasonably believed by the title insurance agent to be producers of title business or associates of producers; and

(b) The percent of title orders originating from each person who owns, or had owned during the preceding calendar year, a financial interest in the title insurance agent.

(3) Each title insurance agent shall keep current the information required by that portion of the report required by subsection (2)(a) of this section by reporting all changes or additions within fifteen days after the end of the month in which it learns of each change or addition.

(4) Each title insurance agent shall file that portion of the report required by subsection (2)(a) of this section with its application for a license.

(((5) Each title insurance agent licensed on June 12, 2008, shall file the report required under this section within thirty days after June 12, 2008.))

Sec. 17. RCW 21.20.880 and 2014 c 144 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any offer or sale of a security is exempt from RCW 21.20.040 through 21.20.300 and 21.20.327, except as expressly provided, if:

(a) The offering is first declared exempt by the director after:

(i) The issuer files the offering with the director; or

(ii) A portal working in collaboration with the director files the offering with the director on behalf of the issuer under RCW 21.20.883;

(b) The offering is conducted in accordance with the requirements of section 3(a)(11) of the securities act of 1933 and securities and exchange commission rule 147, 17 C.F.R. Sec. 230.147;

(c) The issuer is an entity organized and doing business in the state of Washington;

(d) Each investor provides evidence or certification of residency in the state of Washington at the time of purchase;

(e) The issuer files with the director an escrow agreement either directly or through a portal providing that all offering proceeds will be released to the issuer only when the aggregate capital raised from all investors equals or exceeds the minimum target offering, as determined by the director;

(f) The aggregate purchase price of all securities sold by an issuer pursuant to the exemption provided by this section does not exceed one million dollars during any twelve-month period;

(g) The aggregate amount sold to any investor by one or more issuers during the twelve-month period preceding the date of the sale does not exceed:

(i) The greater of two thousand dollars or five percent of the annual income or net worth of the investor, as applicable, if either the annual income or the net worth of the investor is less than one hundred thousand dollars; or

(ii) Ten percent of the annual income or net worth of the investor, as applicable, up to one hundred thousand dollars, if either the annual income or net worth of the investor is one hundred thousand dollars or more;

(h) The investor acknowledges by manual or electronic signature the following statement conspicuously presented at the time of sale on a page separate from other information relating to the offering: "I acknowledge that I am investing in a high-risk, speculative business venture, that I may lose all of my investment, and that I can afford the loss of my investment";

(i) The issuer reasonably believes that all purchasers are purchasing for investment and not for sale in connection with a distribution of the security; and

(j) The issuer and investor provide any other information reasonably requested by the director.

(2) Attempted compliance with the exemption provided by this section does not act as an exclusive election. The issuer may claim any other applicable exemption.

(3) For as long as securities issued under the exemption provided by this section are outstanding, the issuer shall provide a quarterly report to the issuer's shareholders and the director by making such report publicly accessible, free of charge, at the issuer's internet web site address within forty-five days of the end of each fiscal quarter. The report must contain the following information:

(a) Executive officer and director compensation, including specifically the cash compensation earned by the executive officers and directors since the previous report and on an annual basis, and any bonuses or other compensation, including stock options or other rights to receive equity securities of the issuer or any affiliate of the issuer, received by them; and

(b) A brief analysis by management of the issuer of the business operations and financial condition of the issuer.

(4) Securities issued under the exemption provided by this section may not be transferred by the purchaser during a one-year period beginning on the date of purchase, unless the securities are transferred:

(a) To the issuer of the securities;

(b) To an accredited investor;

(c) As part of a registered offering; or

(d) To a member of the family of the purchaser or the equivalent, or in connection with the death or divorce or other similar circumstances, in the discretion of the director.

(5) The director shall adopt disqualification provisions under which this exemption shall not be available to any person or its predecessors, affiliates, officers, directors, underwriters, or other related persons. The provisions shall be substantially similar to the disqualification provisions adopted by the securities and exchange commission pursuant to the requirements of section 401(b)(2) of the Jobs act of 2012 or, if none, as adopted in Rule 506 of Regulation D. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this exemption shall become available on June 12, 2014.

(6) Subject to RCW 21.20.450, the director may adopt, amend, or repeal rules to implement this section and RCW 21.20.883, including the establishment of filing and transaction fees sufficient to cover the costs of administering RCW 21.20.883 and this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. RELATING TO GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS & SECURITY. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 29A.04.903 (Effective date—2003 c 111);

(2) RCW 29A.04.904 (Severability—2004 c 271);

(3) RCW 29A.04.905 (Effective date—2004 c 271);

(4) RCW 42.30.920 (Severability—1971 ex.s. c 250);

(5) RCW 42.56.901 (Part headings not law—2005 c 274);

(6) RCW 42.56.902 (Effective date—2005 c 274); and

(7) RCW 42.56.903 (Effective date—2006 c 209).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. RELATING TO GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS & SECURITY. RCW 35.13A.0301 (Assumption of water-sewer district before July 1, 1999—Limitations) and 1998 c 326 s 3 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. RELATING TO HEALTH CARE. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 70.22.900 (Severability—1961 c 283);

(2) RCW 71A.10.805 (Headings in Title 71A RCW not part of law); and

(3) RCW 71A.10.900 (Severability—1988 c 176).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21. RELATING TO HEALTH CARE. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 70.22.005 (Transfer of duties to the department of health) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 246; and

(2) RCW 71A.20.190 (Developmental disability service system task force) and 2015 c 225 s 111 & 2011 1st sp.s. c 30 s 8.

Sec. 22. RCW 43.70.900 and 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

SECTION 21 CONFORMING AMENDMENT. All references to the secretary or department of social and health services in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the secretary or department of health when referring to the functions transferred in RCW 43.70.080, 18.104.005, 70.08.005, ((70.22.005,)) 70.24.005, 70.40.005, 70.41.005, and 70.54.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23. RELATING TO HIGHER EDUCATION. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 28B.65.010 (Legislative findings) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 72 s 2;

(2) RCW 28B.65.020 (Definitions) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 72 s 3;

(3) RCW 28B.65.030 (Washington state high-technology education and training program established—Goals) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 72 s 4;

(4) RCW 28B.65.040 (Washington high-technology coordinating board created—Members—Travel expenses) and 2012 c 229 s 539 & 1995 c 399 s 29;

(5) RCW 28B.65.050 (Board—Duties—Rules—Termination of board) and 2012 c 229 s 540, 1998 c 245 s 22, & 1995 c 399 s 30;

(6) RCW 28B.65.060 (Board—Staff support) and 1995 c 399 s 31, 1985 c 381 s 3, & 1983 1st ex.s. c 72 s 7;

(7) RCW 28B.65.070 (Board—Solicitation of private and federal support, gifts, conveyances, etc.) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 72 s 8;

(8) RCW 28B.65.080 (Consortium and baccalaureate degree training programs—Board recommendations—Requirements—Coordination) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 72 s 9;

(9) RCW 28B.65.110 (Statewide off-campus telecommunications system—Establishment by Washington State University for education in high-technology fields);

(10) RCW 28B.65.900 (Short title—1983 1st ex.s. c 72) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 72 s 1; and

(11) RCW 28B.65.905 (Effective date—1983 1st ex.s. c 72) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 72 s 18.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24. RELATING TO HUMAN SERVICES, MENTAL HEALTH & HOUSING. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 10.77.900 (Savings—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 117);

(2) RCW 10.77.910 (Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 117);

(3) RCW 10.77.920 (Chapter successor to chapter 10.76 RCW);

(4) RCW 10.77.930 (Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 117);

(5) RCW 71.05.900 (Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 142);

(6) RCW 71.05.910 (Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 142);

(7) RCW 71.05.920 (Section headings not part of the law);

(8) RCW 71.05.930 (Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 142);

(9) RCW 71.24.900 (Effective date—1967 ex.s. c 111);

(10) RCW 71.24.901 (Severability—1982 c 204);

(11) RCW 71.34.900 (Severability—1985 c 354); and

(12) RCW 71.34.901 (Effective date—1985 c 354).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25. RELATING TO HUMAN SERVICES, MENTAL HEALTH & HOUSING. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 2.56.031 (Juvenile offender information—Plan) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 61 & 1993 c 415 s 2;

(2) RCW 10.77.810 (Joint legislative audit and review committee assessment—Report) and 2012 c 256 s 9;

(3) RCW 10.77.820 (Washington state institute for public policy study—Report) and 2012 c 256 s 10; and

(4) RCW 71.24.055 (Children's mental health services—Children's access to care standards and benefit package—Recommendations to legislature) and 2014 c 225 s 47 & 2007 c 359 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26. RELATING TO LAW & JUSTICE. RCW 5.45.920 (Repeal of inconsistent provisions) is decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27. RELATING TO LAW & JUSTICE. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 2.56.250 (Revocation of concealed pistol licenses—Information transmittal—Work group) and 2010 c 274 s 601; and

(2) RCW 9.04.040 (Advertising cures of lost sexual potency—Evidence) and 1921 c 168 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28. RELATING TO LAW & JUSTICE. RCW 42.32.030 is recodified as a section in chapter 42.30 RCW.

Sec. 29. RCW 29A.04.510 and 2003 c 111 s 149 are each amended to read as follows:

SECTION 28 CONFORMING AMENDMENT. (1) The Washington state election administration and certification board is established and has the responsibilities and authorities prescribed by this chapter. The board is composed of the following members:

(a) The secretary of state or the secretary's designee;

(b) The state director of elections or the director's designee;

(c) Four county auditors appointed by the Washington state association of county auditors or their alternates who are county auditors designated by the association to serve as such alternates, each appointee and alternate to serve at the pleasure of the association;

(d) One member from each of the two largest political party caucuses of the house of representatives designated by and serving at the pleasure of the legislative leader of the respective caucus;

(e) One member from each of the two largest political party caucuses of the senate designated by and serving at the pleasure of the legislative leader of the respective caucus; and

(f) One representative from each major political party, designated by and serving at the pleasure of the chair of the party's state central committee.

(2) The board shall elect a chair from among its number; however, neither the secretary of state nor the state director of elections nor their designees may serve as the chair of the board. A majority of the members appointed to the board constitutes a quorum for conducting the business of the board. Chapter 42.30 RCW, the Open Public Meetings Act, and RCW 42.32.030 (as recodified by this act) regarding minutes of meetings, apply to the meetings of the board.

(3) Members of the board shall serve without compensation. The secretary of state shall reimburse members of the board, other than those who are members of the legislature, for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Members of the board who are members of the legislature shall be reimbursed as provided in chapter 44.04 RCW.

Sec. 30. RCW 35A.39.010 and 1995 c 21 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

SECTION 28 CONFORMING AMENDMENT. Every code city shall keep a journal of minutes of its legislative meetings with orders, resolutions and ordinances passed, and records of the proceedings of any city department, division or commission performing quasi-judicial functions as required by ordinances of the city and general laws of the state and shall keep such records open to the public as required by RCW 42.32.030 (as recodified by this act) and shall keep and preserve all public records and publications or reproduce and destroy the same as provided by Title 40 RCW. Each code city may duplicate and sell copies of its ordinances at fees reasonably calculated to defray the cost of such duplication and handling.

Sec. 31. RCW 44.05.080 and 2011 c 60 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

SECTION 28 CONFORMING AMENDMENT. In addition to other duties prescribed by law, the commission shall:

(1) Adopt rules pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to carry out the provisions of Article II, section 43 of the state Constitution and of this chapter, which rules shall provide that three voting members of the commission constitute a quorum to do business, and that the votes of three of the voting members are required for any official action of the commission;

(2) Act as the legislature's recipient of the final redistricting data and maps from the United States Bureau of the Census;

(3) Comply with requirements to disclose and preserve public records as specified in chapters 40.14 and 42.56 RCW;

(4) Hold open meetings pursuant to the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW;

(5) Prepare and disclose its minutes pursuant to RCW 42.32.030 (as recodified by this act);

(6) Be subject to the provisions of RCW 42.17A.700;

(7) Prepare and publish a report with the plan; the report will be made available to the public at the time the plan is published. The report will include but will not be limited to: (a) The population and percentage deviation from the average district population for every district; (b) an explanation of the criteria used in developing the plan with a justification of any deviation in a district from the average district population; (c) a map of all the districts; and (d) the estimated cost incurred by the counties for adjusting precinct boundaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32. RELATING TO NATURAL RESOURCES & PARKS. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.30.8351 (Progress report) and 2009 c 163 s 3;

(2) RCW 76.01.080 (Lacey compound—Light industrial facilities/land—Sale or exchange) and 2001 c 189 s 1;

(3) RCW 76.01.090 (Proposal for exchange or sale—Lacey compound site) and 2001 c 189 s 2;

(4) RCW 76.09.380 (Report to the legislature—Emergency rules—Permanent rules) and 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 205;

(5) RCW 77.12.605 (Whidbey Island game farm—Sale of property) and 1999 c 205 s 1;

(6) RCW 77.12.710 (Game fish production—Double by year 2000) and 1998 c 245 s 159, 1995 c 399 s 208, 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 70, & 1990 c 110 s 2;

(7) RCW 79A.20.005 (Findings) and 1992 c 153 s 2;

(8) RCW 79A.20.010 (Definitions) and 1992 c 153 s 3;

(9) RCW 79A.20.030 (Allocation and distribution of moneys) and 1994 c 264 s 30 & 1992 c 153 s 5;

(10) RCW 79A.20.900 (Short title) and 1992 c 153 s 1;

(11) RCW 79A.20.901 (Severability—1992 c 153) and 1992 c 153 s 7; and

(12) RCW 79A.20.902 (Captions not law—1992 c 153) and 1992 c 153 s 8.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33. RELATING TO TRADE & ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.31.088 (Business assistance center—ISO-9000 quality standards) and 1994 c 140 s 2;

(2) RCW 43.31.522 (Marketplace program—Definitions) and 2009 c 565 s 29, 2005 c 136 s 17, 1993 c 280 s 46, 1990 c 57 s 2, & 1989 c 417 s 2;

(3) RCW 43.31.524 (Marketplace program—Generally) and 1993 c 280 s 47, 1990 c 57 s 3, & 1989 c 417 s 3;

(4) RCW 43.31.800 (State international trade fairs—"Director" defined) and 2009 c 565 s 30, 1993 c 280 s 52, 1987 c 195 s 4, & 1965 c 148 s 2;

(5) RCW 43.31.805 (State trade fair fund) and 1998 c 345 s 3;

(6) RCW 43.31.810 (State international trade fairs—State aid eligibility requirements) and 1987 c 195 s 5, 1975 1st ex.s. c 292 s 3, & 1965 c 148 s 3;

(7) RCW 43.31.820 (State international trade fairs—Application for funds) and 1987 c 195 s 6, 1975 1st ex.s. c 292 s 4, & 1965 c 148 s 4;

(8) RCW 43.31.830 (State international trade fairs—Certification of fairs—Allotments—Division and payment from state trade fair fund) and 1993 c 280 s 53, 1987 c 195 s 7, 1975 1st ex.s. c 292 s 5, & 1965 c 148 s 5;

(9) RCW 43.31.832 (State trade fairs—Transfer of surplus funds in state trade fair fund to general fund—Expenditure) and 1985 c 466 s 34, 1981 2nd ex.s. c 2 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 292 s 8, & 1972 ex.s. c 93 s 2;

(10) RCW 43.31.833 (State trade fairs—Transfer of surplus funds in state trade fair fund to general fund—Construction) and 1987 c 195 s 8, 1985 c 466 s 35, & 1972 ex.s. c 93 s 3;

(11) RCW 43.31.834 (State trade fairs—Transfer of surplus funds in state trade fair fund to general fund—Construction) and 1985 c 466 s 36 & 1972 ex.s. c 93 s 4;

(12) RCW 43.31.840 (State international trade fairs—Post audit of participating fairs—Reports) and 1993 c 280 s 54, 1975 1st ex.s. c 292 s 6, & 1965 c 148 s 6; and

(13) RCW 43.31.850 (State international trade fairs—State international trade fair defined) and 1987 c 195 s 9, 1975 1st ex.s. c 292 s 7, & 1965 c 148 s 8.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34. RELATING TO TRANSPORTATION. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 47.01.141 (Biennial report) and 1987 c 505 s 49, 1984 c 7 s 75, 1977 c 75 s 68, & 1973 2nd ex.s. c 12 s 1;

(2) RCW 47.60.645 (Passenger ferry account) and 2009 c 8 s 504, 2008 c 45 s 2, 2006 c 332 s 1, & 1995 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 558;

(3) RCW 47.78.010 (High capacity transportation account) and 1997 c 457 s 513, 1991 sp.s. c 13 ss 66, 121, 1990 c 43 s 47, & 1987 c 428 s 1;

(4) RCW 82.44.180 (Transportation fund—Deposits and distributions) and 2013 c 251 s 9;

(5) RCW 82.80.040 (Street utility—Establishment) and 1991 c 141 s 1;

(6) RCW 82.80.050 (Street utility—Charges, credits) and 2006 c 301 s 5, 2000 c 103 s 21, & 1991 c 141 s 2; and

(7) RCW 82.80.060 (Use of other proceeds by utility) and 1991 c 141 s 3.

Sec. 35. RCW 47.06.110 and 2005 c 319 s 124 are each amended to read as follows:

SECTION 34 CONFORMING AMENDMENT. The state-interest component of the statewide multimodal transportation plan shall include a state public transportation plan that:

(1) Articulates the state vision of an interest in public transportation and provides quantifiable objectives, including benefits indicators;

(2) Identifies the goals for public transit and the roles of federal, state, regional, and local entities in achieving those goals;

(3) Recommends mechanisms for coordinating state, regional, and local planning for public transportation;

(4) Recommends mechanisms for coordinating public transportation with other transportation services and modes;

(5) Recommends criteria, consistent with the goals identified in subsection (2) of this section ((and with RCW 82.44.180 (2) and (3))), for existing federal authorizations administered by the department to transit agencies; and

(6) Recommends a statewide public transportation facilities and equipment management system as required by federal law.

In developing the state public transportation plan, the department shall involve local jurisdictions, public and private providers of transportation services, nonmotorized interests, and state agencies with an interest in public transportation, including but not limited to the departments of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce, social and health services, and ecology, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the office of the governor, and the office of financial management.

The department shall submit to the senate and house transportation committees by December 1st of each year, reports summarizing the plan's progress.

Sec. 36. RCW 82.42.090 and 1995 c 170 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

SECTION 34 CONFORMING AMENDMENT. All moneys collected by the director from the aircraft fuel excise tax as provided in RCW 82.42.020 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and shall be credited to the aeronautics account hereby created in the ((transportation fund of the)) state treasury. Moneys collected from the consumer or user of aircraft fuel from either the use tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 or the retail sales tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and credited to the state general fund.

Sec. 37. RCW 82.80.070 and 2005 c 319 s 139 are each amended to read as follows:

SECTION 34 CONFORMING AMENDMENT. (1) The proceeds collected pursuant to the exercise of the local option authority of RCW 82.80.010((,)) and 82.80.030((, and 82.80.050)) (hereafter called "local option transportation revenues") shall be used for transportation purposes only, including but not limited to the following: The operation and preservation of roads, streets, and other transportation improvements; new construction, reconstruction, and expansion of city streets, county roads, and state highways and other transportation improvements; development and implementation of public transportation and high capacity transit improvements and programs; and planning, design, and acquisition of right-of-way and sites for such transportation purposes. The proceeds collected from excise taxes on the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel under RCW 82.80.010 shall be used exclusively for "highway purposes" as that term is construed in Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution.

(2) The local option transportation revenues shall be expended for transportation uses consistent with the adopted transportation and land use plans of the jurisdiction expending the funds and consistent with any applicable and adopted regional transportation plan for metropolitan planning areas.

(3) Each local government with a population greater than eight thousand that levies or expends local option transportation funds, is also required to develop and adopt a specific transportation program that contains the following elements:

(a) The program shall identify the geographic boundaries of the entire area or areas within which local option transportation revenues will be levied and expended.

(b) The program shall be based on an adopted transportation plan for the geographic areas covered and shall identify the proposed operation and construction of transportation improvements and services in the designated plan area intended to be funded in whole or in part by local option transportation revenues and shall identify the annual costs applicable to the program.

(c) The program shall indicate how the local transportation plan is coordinated with applicable transportation plans for the region and for adjacent jurisdictions.

(d) The program shall include at least a six-year funding plan, updated annually, identifying the specific public and private sources and amounts of revenue necessary to fund the program. The program shall include a proposed schedule for construction of projects and expenditure of revenues. The funding plan shall consider the additional local tax revenue estimated to be generated by new development within the plan area if all or a portion of the additional revenue is proposed to be earmarked as future appropriations for transportation improvements in the program.

(4) Local governments with a population greater than eight thousand exercising the authority for local option transportation funds shall periodically review and update their transportation program to ensure that it is consistent with applicable local and regional transportation and land use plans and within the means of estimated public and private revenue available.

(5) In the case of expenditure for new or expanded transportation facilities, improvements, and services, priorities in the use of local option transportation revenues shall be identified in the transportation program and expenditures shall be made based upon the following criteria, which are stated in descending order of weight to be attributed:

(a) First, the project serves a multijurisdictional function;

(b) Second, it is necessitated by existing or reasonably foreseeable congestion;

(c) Third, it has the greatest person-carrying capacity;

(d) Fourth, it is partially funded by other government funds, such as from the state transportation improvement board, or by private sector contributions, such as those from the local transportation act, chapter 39.92 RCW; and

(e) Fifth, it meets such other criteria as the local government determines is appropriate.

(6) It is the intent of the legislature that as a condition of levying, receiving, and expending local option transportation revenues, no local government agency use the revenues to replace, divert, or loan any revenues currently being used for transportation purposes to nontransportation purposes.

(7) Local governments are encouraged to enter into interlocal agreements to jointly develop and adopt with other local governments the transportation programs required by this section for the purpose of accomplishing regional transportation planning and development.

(8) Local governments may use all or a part of the local option transportation revenues for the amortization of local government general obligation and revenue bonds issued for transportation purposes consistent with the requirements of this section.

(9) Subsections (1) through (8) of this section do not apply to a regional transportation investment district imposing a tax or fee under the local option authority of this chapter. Proceeds collected under the exercise of local option authority under this chapter by a district must be used in accordance with chapter 36.120 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38. SECTION 33 CONFORMING REPEALERS. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 82.14.046 (Sales and use tax equalization payments from local transit taxes) and 1998 c 321 s 37, 1995 c 298 s 1, & 1994 c 241 s 2; and

(2) RCW 82.50.510 (Remittance of tax to state—Distribution to cities, towns, counties, and schools) and 1998 c 321 s 24, 1991 c 199 s 227, 1990 c 42 s 322, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 75 s 1, & 1971 ex.s. c 299 s 66.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39. RELATING TO WAYS & MEANS. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 43.41.035 (Office of program planning and fiscal management redesignated office of financial management);

(2) RCW 43.41.940 (Central budget agency abolished);

(3) RCW 43.41.950 (Saving—1969 ex.s. c 239);

(4) RCW 43.41.980 (Severability—1969 ex.s. c 239);

(5) RCW 43.41.981 (Transfer of certain powers, duties, functions, and assets of the department of personnel);

(6) RCW 43.88.901 (Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 100);

(7) RCW 43.88.902 (Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 293);

(8) RCW 43.88.903 (Severability—1977 c 23); and

(9) RCW 43.88.910 (Effective date—1975 1st ex.s. c 293).

--- END ---