BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. Research has shown that taking folic acid before getting pregnant and in early pregnancy lowers the risk of having a baby with certain birth defects. This research finding led to the advice that all women who can get pregnant should take four hundred micrograms of folic acid daily. The United States preventive services task force recommends that all women planning or capable of pregnancy take a daily supplement containing folic acid prior to pregnancy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

The authority shall provide prenatal vitamins for all women that may become pregnant consistent with the United States preventive services task force recommendations. Programs not governed by 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(13) shall follow the task force recommendations in place upon the effective date of this section.

--- END ---