BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.32.010 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

((Words used in the singular in this chapter may also be applied to the plural of the persons and things; words importing the plural may be applied to the singular; words importing the masculine gender may be extended to females also; the term "commission" used in this chapter shall mean the Washington state dental quality assurance commission; and the term "secretary" shall mean the secretary of health of the state of Washington.)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Clinical" means the practice of dentistry as defined in RCW 18.32.020(1) (a) and (b).

(2) "Commission" means the Washington state dental quality assurance commission.

(3) "Dental practice" means a business operation that engages in the clinical practice of dentistry that does not include the activities specified in RCW 18.32.030.

(4) "Dental practice owner" means a dentist licensed under this chapter who owns a dental practice as a sole proprietor or a professional entity that owns a dental practice.

(5) "Nonclinical" means any activity that is not defined as the practice of dentistry in RCW 18.32.020(1) (a) and (b). Nonclinical activities include:

(a) Ownership or leasehold of any assets used by a dental practice, including real property, furnishings, equipment, instruments, materials, supplies, and inventory, but not including the dental practice or the dental records of patients;

(b) Employing or contracting for the services of personnel other than licensed dentists and licensed dental hygienists;

(c) Management of the business or administrative aspects of a dental practice, including as a sole provider of such management services; and

(d) Receiving fees for nonclinical services provided to a dental practice calculated as agreed to by the dental practice owner.

(6) "Professional entity" means a professional corporation or other entity that is wholly owned by one or more dentists licensed under this chapter and that is authorized to engage in the clinical practice of dentistry in this state.

(7) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.32.020 and 2011 c 336 s 477 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person practices dentistry, within the meaning of this chapter, who:

(((1))) (a) Represents himself or herself as being able to diagnose, treat, remove stains and concretions from teeth, operate or prescribe for any disease, pain, injury, deficiency, deformity, or physical condition of the human teeth, alveolar process, gums, or jaw((,)); or

(((2))) (b) Offers or undertakes by any means or methods to diagnose, treat, remove stains or concretions from teeth, operate or prescribe for any disease, pain, injury, deficiency, deformity, or physical condition of the same, or take impressions of the teeth or jaw((,)); or

(((3))) (c) Owns, maintains, or operates an office for the practice of dentistry((,)); or

(((4))) (d) Engages in any of the practices included in the curricula of recognized and approved dental schools or colleges((,)); or

(((5))) (e) Professes to the public by any method to furnish, supply, construct, reproduce, or repair any prosthetic denture, bridge, appliance, or other structure to be worn in the human mouth.

(2) The fact that a person uses any dental degree, or designation, or any card, device, directory, poster, sign, or other media whereby he or she represents himself or herself to be a dentist, shall be prima facie evidence that such person is engaged in the practice of dentistry.

(3) X-ray diagnosis as to the method of ((dental practice)) dentistry in which the diagnosis and examination is made of the normal and abnormal structures, parts, or functions of the human teeth, the alveolar process, maxilla, mandible or soft tissues adjacent thereto, is hereby declared to be the practice of dentistry. Any person other than a regularly licensed physician or surgeon who makes any diagnosis or interpretation or explanation, or attempts to diagnose or to make any interpretation or explanation of the registered shadow or shadows of any part of the human teeth, alveolar process, maxilla, mandible or soft tissues adjacent thereto by the use of X-ray is declared to be engaged in the practice of dentistry, medicine, or surgery.

(4) The practice of dentistry includes the performance of any dental or oral and maxillofacial surgery. "Oral and maxillofacial surgery" means the specialty of dentistry that includes the diagnosis and surgical and adjunctive treatment of diseases, injuries, and defects of the hard and soft tissues of the oral and maxillofacial region.

(5) The functions and activities permitted in RCW 18.32.675 and 18.32.030(11) are not the practice of dentistry as defined in subsection (1)(c) of this section. No corporation other than a professional entity may engage in the practice of dentistry.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.32.030 and 2012 c 23 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The following practices, acts, and operations are excepted from the operation of the provisions of this chapter:

(1) The rendering of dental relief in emergency cases in the practice of his or her profession by a physician or surgeon, licensed as such and registered under the laws of this state, unless the physician or surgeon undertakes to or does reproduce lost parts of the human teeth in the mouth or to restore or to replace in the human mouth lost or missing teeth;

(2) The practice of dentistry in the discharge of official duties by dentists in the United States federal services on federal reservations, including but not limited to the armed services, coast guard, public health service, veterans' bureau, or bureau of Indian affairs;

(3) Dental schools or colleges approved under RCW 18.32.040, and the practice of dentistry by students in accredited dental schools or colleges approved by the commission, when acting under the direction and supervision of Washington state-licensed dental school faculty;

(4) The practice of dentistry by licensed dentists of other states or countries while appearing as clinicians at meetings of the Washington state dental association, or component parts thereof, or at meetings sanctioned by them, or other groups approved by the commission;

(5) The use of roentgen and other rays for making radiographs or similar records of dental or oral tissues, under the supervision of a licensed dentist or physician;

(6) The making, repairing, altering, or supplying of artificial restorations, substitutions, appliances, or materials for the correction of disease, loss, deformity, malposition, dislocation, fracture, injury to the jaws, teeth, lips, gums, cheeks, palate, or associated tissues or parts; providing the same are made, repaired, altered, or supplied pursuant to the written instructions and order of a licensed dentist which may be accompanied by casts, models, or impressions furnished by the dentist, and the prescriptions shall be retained and filed for a period of not less than three years and shall be available to and subject to the examination of the secretary or the secretary's authorized representatives;

(7) The removal of deposits and stains from the surfaces of the teeth, the application of topical preventative or prophylactic agents, and the polishing and smoothing of restorations, when performed or prescribed by a dental hygienist licensed under the laws of this state;

(8) A qualified and licensed physician and surgeon or osteopathic physician and surgeon extracting teeth or performing oral surgery pursuant to the scope of practice under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW;

(9) The performing of dental operations or services by registered dental assistants and licensed expanded function dental auxiliaries holding a credential issued under chapter 18.260 RCW when performed under the supervision of a licensed dentist, or by other persons not licensed under this chapter if the person is licensed pursuant to chapter 18.29, 18.57, 18.71, or 18.79 RCW as it applies to registered nurses and advanced registered nurse practitioners, each while acting within the scope of the person's permitted practice under the person's license: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That such persons shall in no event perform the following dental operations or services unless permitted to be performed by the person under this chapter or chapters 18.29, 18.57, 18.71, 18.79 as it applies to registered nurses and advanced registered nurse practitioners, and 18.260 RCW:

(a) Any removal of or addition to the hard or soft tissue of the oral cavity;

(b) Any diagnosis of or prescription for treatment of disease, pain, deformity, deficiency, injury, or physical condition of the human teeth or jaws, or adjacent structure;

(c) Any administration of general or injected local anaesthetic of any nature in connection with a dental operation, including intravenous sedation;

(d) Any oral prophylaxis;

(e) The taking of any impressions of the teeth or jaw or the relationships of the teeth or jaws, for the purpose of fabricating any intra-oral restoration, appliance, or prosthesis; ((and))

(10) The performing of dental services described in RCW 18.350.040 by dental anesthesia assistants certified under chapter 18.350 RCW when working under the supervision and direction of an oral and maxillofacial surgeon or dental anesthesiologist; and

(11) Performing nonclinical activities.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.32.675 and 2003 c 53 s 124 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No corporation other than a professional entity shall practice dentistry or shall solicit through itself, or its agent, officers, employees, directors or trustees, dental patronage for any dentists or dental surgeon employed by any corporation: PROVIDED, That nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit a corporation from employing a dentist or dentists to render dental services to its employees: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That such dental services shall be rendered at no cost or charge to the employees; nor shall it apply to corporations or associations in which the dental services were originated and are being conducted upon a purely charitable basis for the worthy poor, nor shall it apply to corporations or associations furnishing ((information or clerical)) real property, furnishings, equipment, instruments, materials, supplies, inventory, or nonclinical services which can be furnished by persons not licensed to practice dentistry, to any person lawfully engaged in the practice of dentistry, when such dentist assumes full responsibility for such ((information and)) real property, furnishings, equipment, instruments, materials, supplies, inventory, or nonclinical services.

(2) Any corporation violating this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor, and each day that this chapter is violated shall be considered a separate offense.

--- END ---