BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.106.110 and 2013 c 23 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) There is created a state advisory board of plumbers, to be composed of ((seven)) nine members ((appointed by the director)). Two members shall be journey level plumbers, one member shall be a specialty plumber, three members shall be persons conducting a plumbing business, at least one of which shall be primarily engaged in a specialty plumbing business, ((and)) one member from the general public who is familiar with the business and trade of plumbing, one member from the plumbing code body recognized by Washington state law, and one member from the department of health.

(b) The secretary of the department of health shall appoint the member from the department of health, and the director of the department of labor and industries shall appoint all other members.

(2) The term of one journey level plumber expires July 1, 1995; the term of the second journey level plumber expires July 1, 2000; the term of the specialty plumber expires July 1, 2008; the term of one person conducting a plumbing business expires July 1, 1996; the term of the second person conducting a plumbing business expires July 1, 2000; the term of the third person conducting a plumbing business expires July 1, 2007; ((and)) the term of the public member expires July 1, 1997; the term of the member from the plumbing code body expires July 1, 2019; and the term of the member from the department of health expires July 1, 2017. Thereafter, upon the expiration of said terms, the ((director)) person named in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall appoint a new member to serve for a period of three years. However, to ensure that the board can continue to act, a member whose term expires shall continue to serve until his or her replacement is appointed. In the case of any vacancy on the board for any reason, the ((director)) person named in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall appoint a new member to serve out the term of the person whose position has become vacant.

(3) The advisory board shall carry out all the functions and duties enumerated in this chapter, as well as generally advise the department on all matters relative to enforcement of this chapter, including, but not limited to, plumbing industry promotion, standards of plumbing installations, consumer protection, and standards for protection of the public health.

(4) Each member of the advisory board shall receive travel expenses in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended for each day in which such member is actually engaged in attendance upon the meetings of the advisory board.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.106.270 and 1994 c 174 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person found to have committed an infraction under RCW 18.106.020 shall be assessed a monetary penalty of ((two hundred fifty)) five hundred dollars for the first infraction, and not more than ((one)) two thousand dollars for a second or subsequent infraction. The department shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for infractions imposed under this chapter.

(2) The administrative law judge may waive, reduce, or suspend the monetary penalty imposed for the infraction for good cause shown.

(3) Monetary penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the plumbing certificate fund.

--- END ---