BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

2015-2017 FISCAL BIENNIUM

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES—OPERATING

Sec. 101. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($476,000))

﻿ $488,000

Sec. 102. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Grade Crossing Protective Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($504,000))

﻿ $1,604,000

Sec. 103. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($2,268,000))

﻿ $2,296,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($110,000))

﻿ $115,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,378,000))

﻿ $2,411,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(((2))) (1) $835,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of financial management, from amounts set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to counties according to RCW 46.68.120(3), to contract with the Washington state association of counties to develop, implement, and report on transportation metrics associated with transportation system policy goals outlined in RCW 47.04.280. The Washington state association of counties, in cooperation with state agencies, must: Evaluate and implement opportunities to streamline reporting of county transportation financial data; expand reporting and collection of short-span bridge and culvert data; evaluate and report on the impact of increased freight and rail traffic on county roads; and to evaluate, implement, and report on the opportunities for improved capital project management and delivery.

(((3))) (2) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of financial management, from funds set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to counties according to RCW 46.68.120(3), to contract with the Washington state association of counties to work with the department of fish and wildlife to develop voluntary programmatic agreements for the maintenance, preservation, rehabilitation, and replacement of water crossing structures. A report must be presented to the legislature by December 31, 2016, on the implementation of developed voluntary programmatic agreements.

Sec. 104. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($1,212,000))

﻿ $1,240,000

Sec. 105. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($563,000))

﻿ $582,000

Sec. 106. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 107 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$100,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department must work with the Washington state association of counties to develop voluntary programmatic agreements for the maintenance, preservation, rehabilitation, and replacement of water crossing structures. Such programmatic agreements when agreed to by the department and participating counties are binding agreements for permitting, design, and mitigation of county water crossing structures.

(2) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation from cities' statewide fuel tax distributions under RCW 46.68.110(2) is provided solely for the department to implement activities of the fish passage barrier removal board created in RCW 77.95.160 by coordinating with cities to inventory and undertake predesign and scoping activities associated with barrier corrections on city streets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107. A new section is added to 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

The department must provide a detailed accounting of the revenues and expenditures of the self-insurance fund to the transportation committees of the legislature on December 31st and June 30th of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108. A new section is added to 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$131,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $131,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation from cities' statewide fuel tax distributions under RCW 46.68.110(2) is provided solely for the department to develop a framework with the department of transportation and the department of fish and wildlife for correcting fish passage barriers on city streets as compensatory mitigation for environmental impacts of transportation projects, as required in RCW 77.95.185(2)(a). In addition, the department must develop and implement an umbrella statewide in lieu fee program or other formal means to provide a streamlined mechanism to undertake priority local fish passage barrier corrections, as required in RCW 77.95.185(2)(c).

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES—OPERATING

Sec. 201. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($3,154,000))

﻿ $3,183,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($27,383,000))

﻿ $21,644,000

Highway Safety Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$118,000

School Zone Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$850,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($31,505,000))

﻿ $25,795,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The commission may continue to oversee pilot projects implementing the use of automated traffic safety cameras to detect speed violations within cities west of the Cascade mountains that have a population of more than one hundred ninety-five thousand and that are located in a county with a population of fewer than one million five hundred thousand. For the purposes of pilot projects in this subsection, no more than one automated traffic safety camera may be used to detect speed violations within any one jurisdiction.

(a) The commission shall comply with RCW 46.63.170 in administering the pilot projects.

(b) By January 1, 2017, any local authority that is operating an automated traffic safety camera to detect speed violations must provide a summary to the transportation committees of the legislature concerning the use of the cameras and data regarding infractions, revenues, and costs.

(2) $99,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter ((. . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5957))) 243, Laws of 2015 (pedestrian safety reviews). ((If chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5957), Laws of 2015 is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.))

(3) $6,500,000 of the highway safety account—federal appropriation is provided solely for federal funds that may be obligated to the commission pursuant to 23 U.S.C. Sec. 164 during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

(4) Within current resources, the commission must examine the declining revenue going to the school zone safety account with the goal of identifying factors contributing to the decline. By December 31, 2015, the commission must provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature that summarizes its findings and provides recommendations designed to ensure that the account is receiving all amounts that should be deposited into the account.

Sec. 202. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($969,000))

﻿ $1,000,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($2,283,000))

﻿ $2,459,000

County Arterial Preservation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($1,481,000))

﻿ $1,518,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,733,000))

﻿ $4,977,000

Sec. 203. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Transportation Improvement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($3,915,000))

﻿ $4,063,000

Sec. 204. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($1,727,000))

﻿ $2,222,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is for a consultant study of Washington state patrol recruitment and retention of troopers. The study must identify barriers to effective candidate recruitment, candidates' successful completion of training, and retention of trained troopers of various tenure. The study must provide:

(i) An overview of current attrition rates;

(ii) Options and strategies on reducing the average number of trooper positions that are vacant;

(iii) Identification of best practices for recruitment and retention of law enforcement officers;

(iv) Recommendations to improve existing recruitment and selection programs;

(v) Recommendations for where salary and benefit adjustments should be targeted to most effectively address recruitment and retention challenges;

(vi) Recommendations regarding changes to the training and education program; and

(vii) Other recommendations for cost-effective personnel strategies.

(b) The joint transportation committee shall issue a report of its findings to the house and senate transportation committees by December 14, 2015. The Washington state patrol shall work with the consultant to identify costs for each recommendation.

(2)(a) $125,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is for a study of Washington state weigh station planning, placement, and operations by the Washington state patrol and department of transportation as they relate to roadway safety and preservation. The study must:

(i) Provide a high-level overview of commercial vehicle enforcement programs, with a focus on weigh stations, including both state and federal funding programs. This overview must include a description of how the Washington state patrol and department of transportation allocate these state and federal funds.

(ii) Review Washington state patrol and department of transportation planning related to weigh station location and operation, and the extent to which their efforts complement, coordinate with, or overlap each other;

(iii) Identify best practices in the funding, placement, and operation of weigh stations;

(iv) Review plans by the department of transportation and Washington state patrol to reopen a Federal Way area southbound weigh station;

(v) Recommend changes in state statutes, policy, or agency practices and rules to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of weigh station funding, placement, and operation, including potential savings to be achieved by adopting the changes; and

(vi) Review whether it is cost-effective or more efficient to place future weigh stations in the median of a highway instead of placing two individual weigh stations on either side of a highway.

(b) The joint transportation committee must issue a report of its findings and recommendations to the house of representatives and senate transportation committees by December 14, 2015.

(3) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, from the cities' statewide fuel tax distributions under RCW 46.68.110(2), is for a study to be conducted in 2016 to identify prominent road-rail conflicts, recommend a corridor-based prioritization process for addressing the impacts of projected increases in rail traffic, and identify areas of state public policy interest, such as the critical role of freight movement to the Washington economy and the state's competitiveness in world trade. The study must consider the results of the updated marine cargo forecast due to be delivered to the joint transportation committee on December 1, 2015. In conducting the study, the joint transportation committee must consult with the department of transportation, the freight mobility strategic investment board, the utilities and transportation commission, local governments, and other relevant stakeholders. The joint transportation committee must issue a report of its recommendations and findings by December 1, 2016.

(4) The legislature intends for the joint transportation committee to undertake a study during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium of consolidating rail employee safety and regulatory functions in the utilities and transportation commission. The joint transportation committee should review the information provided by the utilities and transportation commission ((as required under section 102 of this act)) and should provide recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature regarding such a consolidation of rail employee safety and regulatory functions.

(5) Within existing resources, during the interim periods between regular sessions of the legislature, the joint transportation committee shall include on its agendas work sessions on the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project. These work sessions must include a report on current progress of the project, timelines for completion, outstanding claims, the financial status of the project, and any other information necessary for the legislature to maintain appropriate oversight of the project. The parties invited to present may include the department of transportation, the Seattle tunnel partners, and other appropriate stakeholders. The joint transportation committee shall have at least two such work sessions before December 31, 2015.

(6) $450,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is for the design-build contracting review study established in chapter 18, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. The department of transportation must provide technical assistance, as necessary.

(7) The joint transportation committee must study the issues surrounding minority and women-owned business contracting related to the transportation sector. The study should identify any best practices adopted in other states that encourage participation by minority and women-owned businesses. The joint transportation committee, with direction from the executive committee, may form a legislative task force at the conclusion of the study to help to inform the legislature of any best practices identified from other states that encourage minority and women-owned businesses' participation in the transportation sector.

(8) The joint transportation committee must complete an independent analysis on repurposing the eastside rail corridor for Interstate 405 South expansion and long-term rail resiliency in partnership with regional transit and trail development. The study must include engagement with the department of transportation, King county, Puget Sound regional council, sound transit, and the Northwest seaports alliance. The study must include an analysis of the following:

(a) The potential construction savings, expedited project delivery, and reduced wear and tear on local highways for Interstate 405 widening from south Bellevue to Renton through use of a rehabilitated rail corridor rather than diesel dump trucks;

(b) In partnership with sound transit's EastLink Bellevue tunnel construction project, a comparison of diesel emissions from diesel dump truck construction operation versus the rehabilitation of existing track and potential use of natural gas locomotion;

(c) The feasibility of embedded rail in future paved corridor segments for use by emergency vehicles and interim bus rapid transit during construction of Interstate 405;

(d) A state "Rail Resiliency Easement" from Renton to Snohomish including potential future embedding of track in a paved transit/trail corridor south of Totem Lake and current track upgrades from Totem Lake to Snohomish for temporary heavy haulage post-seismic events affecting Interstate 5 and existing rail main lines;

(e) A reconnection to accommodate rail and trail purposes of the Wilburton Tunnel rail segment that was removed in the 2008 WSDOT South Bellevue Interstate 405 expansion; and

(f) The potential rail labor employment benefits, costs of rail rehabilitation, and potential for temporary construction access through negotiated easements to the BNSF and/or Union Pacific main line at Tukwila from Renton.

The joint transportation committee must issue a report of its recommendations and findings by December 1, 2017. Pending the results of this study, the state requests a delay in removal of existing trackage by local government corridor owners scheduled for 2016 and 2017.

Sec. 205. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($2,452,000))

﻿ $2,517,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$500,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$112,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,564,000))

﻿ $3,129,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely to continue evaluating a road usage charge as an alternative to the motor vehicle fuel tax to fund investments in transportation. The evaluation must include monitoring and reviewing work that is underway in other states and nationally. The commission may coordinate with the department of transportation to jointly pursue any federal or other funds that are or might become available and eligible for road usage charge pilot projects. The commission must reconvene the road usage charge steering committee, with the same membership authorized in chapter 222, Laws of 2014, and report to the governor's office and the transportation committees of the house of representatives and the senate by December 15, 2015.

(2) $150,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to use an outside survey firm to conduct three transportation surveys during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. The commission must consult with the joint transportation committee when deciding on the survey topics and design to ensure the survey results will deliver the data, information, and analysis for future transportation policy and strategic planning decisions in a manner useful to the legislature.

(3) In accordance with the rule-making authority provided under chapter 34.05 RCW and pursuant to the authority granted to the commission under RCW 47.56.850 and 47.56.880, the legislature deems it necessary, for preservation of the general welfare, that the commission as the tolling authority further define by rule the hours and days of operation and high occupancy vehicle passenger requirements for the express toll lanes on Interstate 405. The commission, in consultation with the department of transportation, shall consider the goals of reducing travel time in the corridor and maintaining sufficient revenue to pay for Interstate 405 express toll lane operating costs, with a focus on reducing the cost of traveling within the express toll lanes in the Interstate 405 corridor on weekends, holidays, and evenings.

(4)(a) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely to advance the work completed since 2011 in evaluating a road usage charge as an alternative to the motor vehicle fuel tax to fund future investments in transportation by completing the work necessary to launch a road usage charge pilot project, with all implementation details for a pilot project identified and incorporated into a pilot project implementation plan.

(i) Pilot project implementation preparation must include identification of all essential agency roles and responsibilities for the pilot project, a selection of the technologies and methodologies to be included, a target number of participants and participant characteristics, rigorous specific evaluation criteria by which the pilot project will be assessed, a communication plan for the pilot project that consists of a participant recruitment plan and a plan for communicating information about the launch and ongoing progress of the pilot project, and pilot project expenditure and revenue estimates.

(ii) In developing the road usage charge pilot project implementation plan, the commission shall consult and coordinate with the department of transportation, the department of licensing, the department of revenue, and the office of the state treasurer to establish participation and coordination parameters for the project.

(b) The commission shall coordinate with the department of transportation to jointly pursue any federal or other funds that are or might become available to fund a road usage charge pilot project. Where feasible, grant application content prepared by the commission must reflect the direction provided by the road usage charge steering committee on the preferred road usage charge pilot project approach. One or more grant applications may be developed as part of the road usage charge pilot project implementation plan development work, but the pilot project implementation plan must nevertheless include any details necessary for a full launch of the pilot project not required to be included in any grant application.

(c) The commission shall reconvene the road usage charge steering committee, with the same membership authorized in chapter 222, Laws of 2014, as well as the addition of a representative from the Puget Sound regional council, and may obtain guidance from the steering committee when it reaches key pilot project implementation plan development milestones. The commission must provide a report on the road usage charge pilot project implementation plan that includes all implementation details for a road usage charge pilot project to the governor's office and the transportation committees of the house of representatives and the senate by November 1, 2016.

Sec. 206. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($979,000))

﻿ $1,024,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely to conduct a study of freight infrastructure needs, including an update of the long-term marine cargo forecast. The board must work with the Washington public ports association to evaluate: (1) Forecasted cargo movement by commodity, type, and mode of land transport; and (2) current and projected freight infrastructure capacity needs. A report on the study must be delivered to the joint transportation committee by December 1, 2015.

Sec. 207. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

State Patrol Highway Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($407,771,000))

﻿ $416,485,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($12,779,000))

﻿ $13,291,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($3,631,000))

﻿ $3,823,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($1,323,000))

﻿ $1,304,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$276,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($425,780,000))

﻿ $435,179,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed employment providing traffic control services to the department of transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol must be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol.

(2) $510,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the ignition interlock program at the Washington state patrol to provide funding for two staff to work and provide support for the program in working with manufacturers, service centers, technicians, and participants in the program.

(3) $23,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter ((. . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1276))) 3, Laws of 2015 2nd sp. sess. (impaired driving). ((If chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1276), Laws of 2015 is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.))

(4) $150,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for an organizational assessment of the Washington state patrol.

(5) $760,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 6084), Laws of 2016 (accident report record fees). If chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 6084), Laws of 2016 is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(6) $5,000,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for compensation increases for Washington state patrol troopers, sergeants, lieutenants, and captains. This increase is not subject to interest arbitration and is for salary and benefits that are in addition to the current interest arbitration award. It is the intent of the legislature that Substitute Senate Bill No. 6547 provide the revenue to support the ongoing costs associated with the compensation increases identified in this subsection in order to provide the means necessary to recruit and retain state patrol officers in subsequent biennia.

Sec. 208. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$34,000

License Plate Technology Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$3,200,000

Motorcycle Safety Education Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($4,442,000))

﻿ $4,488,000

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($949,000))

﻿ $1,001,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($183,610,000))

﻿ $201,441,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$3,573,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($86,014,000))

﻿ $92,024,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$362,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,544,000

Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($5,133,000))

﻿ $5,142,000

Department of Licensing Services Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($6,575,000))

﻿ $6,672,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($295,436,000))

﻿ $319,481,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($24,212,000)) $30,954,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation and $3,200,000 of the license plate technology account—state appropriation are provided solely for business and technology modernization. The department and the state chief information officer or his or her designee must provide a joint project status report to the transportation committees of the legislature on at least a calendar quarter basis. The report must include, but is not limited to: Detailed information about the planned and actual scope, schedule, and budget; status of key vendor and other project deliverables; and a description of significant changes to planned deliverables or system functions over the life of the project. Project staff will periodically brief the committees or the committees' staff on system security and data protection measures.

(2) $5,059,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacing prorate and fuel tax computer systems used to administer interstate licensing and the collection of fuel tax revenues.

(3) $3,714,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of an updated central issuance system.

(4) $3,082,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for exam and licensing activities, including the workload associated with providing driver record abstracts, and is subject to the following additional conditions and limitations:

(a) The department may furnish driving record abstracts only to those persons or entities expressly authorized to receive the abstracts under Title 46 RCW;

(b) The department may furnish driving record abstracts only for an amount that does not exceed the specified fee amounts in RCW 46.52.130 (2)(e)(v) and (4); and

(c) The department may not enter into a contract, or otherwise participate in any arrangement, with a third party or other state agency for any service that results in an additional cost, in excess of the fee amounts specified in RCW 46.52.130 (2)(e)(v) and (4), to statutorily authorized persons or entities purchasing a driving record abstract.

(5) The department when modernizing its computer systems must place personal and company data elements in separate data fields to allow the department to select discrete data elements when providing information or data to persons or entities outside the department. This requirement must be included as part of the systems design in the department's business and technology modernization. A person's photo, social security number, or medical information must not be made available through public disclosure or data being provided under RCW 46.12.630 or 46.12.635.

(6) Within existing resources and in consultation with the traffic safety commission, the Washington state patrol, and a representative of the insurance industry and the professional driving school association, the department must review options and make recommendations on strategies for addressing young and high-risk drivers. The recommendations must consider the findings of Washington state's strategic highway safety plan, Target Zero, and must include an analysis of expanding traffic safety education to eighteen to twenty-four year olds that have not taken a traffic safety course and drivers that have been convicted of high-risk behavior, such as driving under the influence of drugs and alcohol and reckless driving. An overview of the work conducted and the recommendations are due to the transportation committees of the legislature and the governor by December 31, 2015.

(7) $57,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter ((. . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1157))) 1, Laws of 2015 ((or chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5025), Laws of 2015)) 2nd sp. sess. (quick title service fees). ((If both chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1157), Laws of 2015 and chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5025), Laws of 2015 are not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.))

(8) $283,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation and $33,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of chapter ((. . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1276))) 3, Laws of 2015 2nd sp. sess. (impaired driving). ((If chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1276), Laws of 2015 is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(9) $63,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5656), Laws of 2015 (distracted driving). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5656), Laws of 2015 is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.))

(9) $4,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 44, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. (transportation revenue).

(10) $335,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of a pilot program authorizing the department to issue nondomiciled commercial drivers' licenses and commercial learners' permits pursuant to the specific procedures and restrictions provided in section 701 of this act.

(11) $2,421,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for costs necessary to accommodate increased demand for enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards. The office of financial management shall place the entire amount provided in this subsection in unallotted status. The office of financial management may release portions of the funds when it determines that average wait times have increased by more than two minutes based on wait time and volume data provided by the department compared to average wait times and volume during the month of December 2015. The department and the office of financial management shall evaluate the use of these funds on a monthly basis and periodically report to the transportation committees of the legislature on average wait times and volume data for enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards.

(12) $43,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 6200), Laws of 2016 (Washington's fish collection license plate). If chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 6200), Laws of 2016 is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(13) $163,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6236), Laws of 2016 (24/7 sobriety program). If chapter . . . (Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6236), Laws of 2016 is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(14) $29,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 6254), Laws of 2016 (Purple Heart license plate). If chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 6254), Laws of 2016 is not enacted by June 30, 2016, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

Sec. 209. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE—PROGRAM B

High Occupancy Toll Lanes Operations Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($2,688,000))

﻿ $3,185,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($503,000))

﻿ $510,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($39,543,000))

﻿ $39,029,000

State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($6,703,000))

﻿ $6,008,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($25,660,000))

﻿ $26,636,000

Interstate 405 Express Toll Lanes Operations﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($9,931,000))

﻿ $15,552,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($85,028,000))

﻿ $90,920,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,300,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation and $8,157,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of addressing unforeseen operations and maintenance costs on the Tacoma Narrows bridge and the state route number 520 bridge, respectively. The office of financial management shall place the amounts provided in this section, which represent a portion of the required minimum fund balance under the policy of the state treasurer, in unallotted status. The office may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for operations and maintenance purposes have been exhausted.

(2) $4,778,000 of the state route number 520 civil penalties account—state appropriation and $2,065,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation are provided solely for expenditures related to the toll adjudication process. The department shall report on the civil penalty process to the office of financial management and the house of representatives and senate transportation committees by the end of each calendar quarter. The reports must include a summary table for each toll facility that includes: The number of notices of civil penalty issued; the number of recipients who pay before the notice becomes a penalty; the number of recipients who request a hearing and the number who do not respond; workload costs related to hearings; the cost and effectiveness of debt collection activities; and revenues generated from notices of civil penalty.

(3) The department shall make detailed quarterly expenditure reports available to the transportation commission and to the public on the department's web site using current department resources. The reports must include a summary of toll revenue by facility on all operating toll facilities and high occupancy toll lane systems, and an itemized depiction of the use of that revenue.

(4) $3,100,000 of the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account—state appropriation, $1,498,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, and (($1,291,000)) $1,802,000 of the high occupancy toll lanes operations account—state appropriation are provided solely for the operation and maintenance of roadside toll collection systems.

(5) (($6,831,000)) $12,202,000 of the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for operational costs related to the express toll lane facility, including the customer service center vendor, transponders, credit card fees, printing and postage, rent, office supplies, telephone and communications equipment, computers, and vehicle operations. Within the amount provided in this subsection, the department must, to the greatest extent possible, without adding additional tolling gantries, continue to expand the length of the access and exit points to the express toll lanes, clarify signage and striping to eliminate confusion, and make other operational and customer service improvements to enhance the public's use of the toll facility. The office of financial management shall place $5,371,000 of the amount provided in this subsection in unallotted status. The office of financial management may release funds to the department on a monthly basis beginning July 1, 2016; however, the amount to be released monthly must be calculated to address the department's projected expenditure need based on the previous month's actual expenditures, financial statement, actual toll transaction experience, and actual revenue collections for the Interstate 405 express toll lanes facility. Prior to releasing any funding from unallotted status, the office of financial management shall notify the joint transportation committee of the amount to be released and provide the documentation used in determining the amount.

(6) $250,000 of the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the identification and prioritization of projects that will help reduce congestion and provide added capacity on the Interstate 405 tolling corridor between state route number 522 and Interstate 5.

(7) $56,000 of the high occupancy toll lanes operations account—state appropriation, $1,124,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, and $596,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop a request for proposals for a new tolling customer service center. The department must address the replacement of the Wave2Go ferry ticketing system that is reaching the end of its useful life by developing functional and technical requirements that integrate Washington state ferries ticketing into the new tolling division customer service center toll collection system. The department shall continue to report quarterly to the governor, legislature, and state auditor on: (a) The department's effort to mitigate risk to the state, (b) the development of a request for proposals, and (c) the overall progress towards procuring a new tolling customer service center. The department shall release a request for proposals for a new tolling customer service toll collection system by December 1, 2016. As part of its 2017-2019 biennial budget submittal, the department shall include a request for funds to procure and implement the new tolling customer service toll collection system.

(((7))) (8) The department shall make detailed quarterly reports to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature on the following:

(a) The use of consultants in the tolling program, including the name of the contractor, the scope of work, the type of contract, timelines, deliverables, any new task orders, and any extensions to existing consultant contracts;

(b) The nonvendor costs of administering toll operations, including the costs of staffing the division, consultants and other personal service contracts required for technical oversight and management assistance, insurance, payments related to credit card processing, transponder purchases and inventory management, facility operations and maintenance, and other miscellaneous nonvendor costs; and

(c) The vendor-related costs of operating tolled facilities, including the costs of the customer service center, cash collections on the Tacoma Narrows bridge, electronic payment processing, and toll collection equipment maintenance, renewal, and replacement.

(((8))) (9) $5,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for membership dues for the alliance for toll interoperability.

(((9) $1,925,000)) (10) $1,230,000 of the state route number 520 civil penalties account—state appropriation ((is)) and $695,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter ((. . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5481))) 292, Laws of 2015 (tolling customer service reform) to improve integration between the Good to Go! electronic tolling system with the pay-by-mail system through increased communication with customers and improvements to the Good to Go! web site allowing customers to manage all of their toll accounts regardless of method of payment. Within the amounts provided, the department must include in the request for proposals for a new customer service center the requirement that the new tolling customer service center link to the vehicle records system of the department of licensing to enable vehicle record updates that relate to tolling customer accounts to occur between the two systems seamlessly. The department must work with the department of licensing to develop the appropriate specifications to include in the request for proposals to allow the new tolling customer service center to link to the vehicle records system without cost to the department of licensing and report to the transportation committees of the legislature when the appropriate specifications have been completed. By June 30, 2017, the department shall report how many people with Good to Go! accounts were issued civil penalties for each toll facility and whether the number was reduced each fiscal year in the biennium. The department shall also report on the number of customer contacts that occur, number of civil penalties reduced or waived, the amount of the total civil penalties that are waived, and the number of customers that are referred to the administrative law judge process during the biennium.

Sec. 210. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY—PROGRAM C

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,460,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($67,458,000))

﻿ $69,041,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,883,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,460,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$263,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($73,524,000))

﻿ $75,107,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,460,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation and $1,460,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation are provided solely for maintaining the department's project management reporting system.

(2) As part of its 2017-2019 biennial budget submittal, and in coordination with the office of financial management and the office of the chief information officer, the department shall submit a timeline and funding plan for the labor system replacement project. The plan must identify a timeline and all one-time and ongoing costs for the integration of all headquarters, regional, and marine employees into the new labor system.

Sec. 211. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND CONSTRUCTION—PROGRAM D—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($27,098,000))

﻿ $27,609,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$34,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($27,132,000))

﻿ $27,643,000

Sec. 212. 2015 3rd sp.s c 43 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—AVIATION—PROGRAM F

Aeronautics Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($8,143,000))

﻿ $8,628,000

Aeronautics Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$4,100,000

Aeronautics Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$60,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($12,303,000))

﻿ $12,788,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($4,137,000)) $4,557,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for airport investment studies and the airport aid grant program, which provides competitive grants to public airports for pavement, safety, maintenance, planning, and security. ((Of this amount, $637,000 lapses if chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5324), Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. (aircraft excise taxes) is not enacted by July 31, 2015, chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 6057) Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. (relating to revenue) is not enacted by July 31, 2015, and an expenditure to the aeronautics account is not provided in the 2015-2017 omnibus appropriations act by July 31, 2015.))

Sec. 213. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT—PROGRAM H

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($52,070,000))

﻿ $53,661,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$500,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($52,820,000))

﻿ $54,411,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The real estate services division of the department must recover the cost of its efforts from sale proceeds and fund additional future sales from those proceeds.

(2) The legislature recognizes that the trail known as the Rocky Reach Trail, and its extensions, serve to separate motor vehicle traffic from pedestrians and bicyclists, increasing motor vehicle safety on state route number 2 and the coincident section of state route number 97. Consistent with chapter 47.30 RCW and pursuant to RCW 47.12.080, the legislature declares that transferring portions of WSDOT Inventory Control (IC) No. 2-09-04686 containing the trail and associated buffer areas to the Washington state parks and recreation commission is consistent with the public interest. The legislature directs the department to transfer the property to the Washington state parks and recreation commission.

(a) The department must be paid fair market value for any portions of the transferred real property that is later abandoned, vacated, or ceases to be publicly maintained for trail purposes.

(b) Prior to completing the transfer in this subsection (2), the department must ensure that provisions are made to accommodate private and public utilities and any facilities that predate the department's acquisition of the property, at no cost to those entities. Prior to completing the transfer, the department shall also ensure that provisions, by fair market assessment, are made to accommodate other private and public utilities and any facilities that have been legally allowed by permit or other instrument.

(c) The department may sell any adjoining property that is not necessary to support the Rocky Reach Trail and adjacent buffer areas only after the transfer of trail-related property to the Washington state parks and recreation commission is complete. Adjoining property owners must be given the first opportunity to acquire such property that abuts their property, and applicable boundary line or other adjustments must be made to the legal descriptions for recording purposes.

Sec. 214. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS—PROGRAM K

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($582,000))

﻿ $600,000

Electric Vehicle Charging Infrastructure

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,600,000

The appropriations in this section ((is)) are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The economic partnerships program must continue to explore retail partnerships at state-owned park and ride facilities, as authorized in RCW 47.04.295.

(2) Within the amounts provided in this section, the economic partnership program shall consult with the department's tolling division and participate in the division's ongoing efforts to reduce the costs associated with the Tacoma Narrows bridge. This participation must include examining opportunities for the state to contract with one or more private sector partners to collect tolls and provide services to drivers crossing the bridge.

(3) $1,000,000 of the electric vehicle charging infrastructure account—state appropriation is provided solely for the purpose of capitalizing the Washington electric vehicle infrastructure bank as provided in chapter 44, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. (transportation revenue).

Sec. 215. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE—PROGRAM M

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,000,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($397,329,000))

﻿ $418,462,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$7,000,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation. . . .(($1,768,000))

﻿ $1,235,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$4,448,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($410,545,000))

﻿ $432,145,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($2,605,000)) $6,091,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for utility fees assessed by local governments as authorized under RCW 90.03.525 for the mitigation of storm water runoff from state highways.

(2) $4,448,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the state route number 520 floating bridge. These funds must be used in accordance with RCW 47.56.830(3).

(3) (($1,768,000)) $1,235,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the new Tacoma Narrows bridge. These funds must be used in accordance with RCW 47.56.830(3).

(4) When regional transit authority construction activities are visible from a state highway, the department shall allow the regional transit authority to place safe and appropriate signage informing the public of the purpose of the construction activity.

(5) The department must make signage for low-height bridges a high priority.

(6) $25,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Northwest avalanche center for an additional forecaster. However, the amount in this subsection is contingent on the state parks and recreation commission receiving funding for its portion of the Northwest avalanche center forecaster in the omnibus appropriations act. If this funding is not provided by June 30, 2016, the appropriation provided in this subsection lapses.

(7) $1,000,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for safety improvements and operations relating to homeless encampments along Interstate 5 between milepost 162 and milepost 165.

Sec. 216. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRAFFIC OPERATIONS—PROGRAM Q—OPERATING

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation. . . .$30,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($51,572,000))

﻿ $57,622,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,050,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($53,872,000))

﻿ $59,952,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or provide congestion relief. The department shall prioritize low-cost enhancement projects on a statewide rather than regional basis. By September 1st of each even-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all low-cost enhancement projects prioritized on a statewide rather than regional basis completed in the prior year.

(2) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the department shall continue a pilot program that expands private transportation providers' access to high occupancy vehicle lanes. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, the following vehicles must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway if the vehicle has the capacity to carry eight or more passengers, regardless of the number of passengers in the vehicle: (a) Auto transportation company vehicles regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; (b) passenger charter carrier vehicles regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; (c) private nonprofit transportation provider vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; and (d) private employer transportation service vehicles. For purposes of this subsection, "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees. Nothing in this subsection is intended to authorize the conversion of public infrastructure to private, for-profit purposes or to otherwise create an entitlement or other claim by private users to public infrastructure.

(3) The legislature recognizes that congestion is increasing on southbound Interstate 5 in Lynnwood, between the Lynnwood transit center and the Mountlake Terrace freeway station, and that allowing transit buses to operate on the shoulder would provide congestion relief and more reliable travel times. Therefore, the department shall, within existing resources, implement a transit bus shoulder operations pilot project on southbound Interstate 5 in Lynnwood, between the Lynnwood transit center and the Mountlake Terrace freeway station. The department shall make all necessary changes to handle the increased traffic and provide a ten-foot shoulder for the transit bypass.

(4) $30,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to create and install motorist information sign panels for the Jerry Taylor Veterans Plaza in Sunnyside along the state-owned right-of-way near exits 63, 67, and 69 on Interstate 182 and on state route number 241 near the junction with Yakima Valley highway and to install supplemental directional signs as permitted by the affected local government and in accordance with the "Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices" and chapter 47.36 RCW.

Sec. 217. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT—PROGRAM S

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($27,842,000))

﻿ $29,625,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($280,000))

﻿ $1,205,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,131,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($29,253,000))

﻿ $31,961,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $288,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for enhanced disadvantaged business enterprise outreach to increase the pool of disadvantaged businesses available for department contracts and to collaborate with the department of labor and industries to recruit women and persons of color to participate in existing transportation apprenticeship programs. The department must submit a status report on disadvantaged business enterprise outreach and apprenticeship recruitment to the transportation committees of the legislature by November 15, 2015.

(2) $3,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the headquarters communications office. Within the amount provided in this subsection, the department shall complete the web content management system and upgrade the department's web site.

(3) $750,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant program that makes awards for the following: (a) Support for nonproject agencies, churches, and other entities to help provide outreach to populations underrepresented in the current apprenticeship programs; (b) preapprenticeship training; and (c) child care, transportation, and other supports that are needed to help women and minorities enter and succeed in apprenticeship. The department must report on grants that have been awarded and the amount of funds disbursed by December 1, 2016, and annually thereafter.

Sec. 218. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH—PROGRAM T

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($21,374,000))

﻿ $22,567,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($24,885,000))

﻿ $26,342,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$662,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,809,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($49,830,000))

﻿ $52,480,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $368,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the purchase of an economic impact model. The department shall work with appropriate local jurisdictions to improve consistency between existing and planned transportation demand models. The department shall report back to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by December 31, 2015, with any recommendations requiring legislative action.

(2) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely for a corridor sketching initiative to support the department in implementing least-cost planning at the corridor level. Initial corridors must include state route number 195, Interstate 5 between Bellingham and the vicinity of Mount Vernon, state route number 160 in the vicinity of Port Orchard, and state route number 28 in the vicinity of East Wenatchee.

(3) Within existing resources, the department shall conduct a traffic and access study of the intersection of the Interurban trail and state route number 104. Options to improve safety at this location must include consideration of a pedestrian and bike overcrossing.

(4) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely for freight planning and updating the freight mobility plan component of the multimodal transportation plan. The freight mobility plan must include a list of projects prioritized for investments according to contribution to the movement of goods within and through all freight corridors. The freight mobility plan must include projects regardless of jurisdictional sponsorship. The prioritized list of freight investments must be provided to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by June 1, 2017.

Sec. 219. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES—PROGRAM U

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($75,700,000))

﻿ $74,666,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$500,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($3,243,000))

﻿ $3,115,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($79,443,000))

﻿ $78,281,000

((The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department of enterprise services must provide a detailed accounting of the revenues and expenditures of the self-insurance fund to the transportation committees of the legislature on December 31st and June 30th of each year.))

Sec. 220. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION—PROGRAM V

State Vehicle Parking Account—State Appropriation. . . .$754,000

Regional Mobility Grant Program Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($60,000,000))

﻿ $74,976,000

Rural Mobility Grant Program Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($17,000,000))

﻿ $20,438,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($50,546,000))

﻿ $72,930,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($3,242,000))

﻿ $3,588,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($131,542,000))

﻿ $172,686,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($35,000,000)) $41,250,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of transportation. Of this amount:

(a) (($7,500,000)) $8,750,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers must be based on need, including the availability of other providers of service in the area, efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost effectiveness of trips provided.

(b) (($27,500,000)) $32,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit agency must, to the greatest extent practicable, have a maintenance of effort for special needs transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies must be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response service and route deviated service in calendar year 2013 as reported in the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2013" published by the department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than thirty percent of these distributions.

(2) (($17,000,000)) $20,438,000 of the rural mobility grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to aid small cities in rural areas as prescribed in RCW 47.66.100.

(3)(a) (($6,000,000)) $6,969,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (i) Public transit agencies to add vanpools or replace vans; and (ii) incentives for employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; operating costs for public transit agencies are not eligible for funding under this grant program. Additional employees may not be hired from the funds provided in this section for the vanpool grant program, and supplanting of transit funds currently funding vanpools is not allowed. The department shall encourage grant applicants and recipients to leverage funds other than state funds.

(b) At least $1,600,000 of the amount provided in this subsection must be used for vanpool grants in congested corridors.

(c) $400,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is provided solely for the purchase of additional vans for use by vanpools serving or traveling through the Joint Base Lewis-McChord I-5 corridor between mile post 116 and 127.

(4) (($10,000,000)) $18,242,000 of the regional mobility grant program account—state appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the regional mobility grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2015-2)) 2016-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((May 26, 2015)) February 22, 2016, Program - Public Transportation Program (V).

(5)(a) (($50,000,000)) $56,250,000 of the regional mobility grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for the regional mobility grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2015-2)) 2016-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((May 26, 2015)) February 22, 2016, Program - Public Transportation Program (V). The department shall review all projects receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project that has been awarded funds, but does not report activity on the project within one year of the grant award, must be reviewed by the department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The department shall promptly close out grants when projects have been completed, and any remaining funds must be used only to fund projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection. The department shall provide annual status reports on December 15, 2015, and December 15, 2016, to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the projects receiving the grants. It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate funds through the regional mobility grant program only for projects that will be completed on schedule. A grantee may not receive more than twenty-five percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection. The department shall not approve any increases or changes to the scope of a project for the purpose of a grantee expending remaining funds on an awarded grant.

(b) In order to be eligible to receive a grant under (a) of this subsection during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, a transit agency must establish a process for private transportation providers to apply for the use of park and ride facilities. For purposes of this subsection, (i) "private transportation provider" means: An auto transportation company regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; a passenger charter carrier regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; a private nonprofit transportation provider regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; or a private employer transportation service provider; and (ii) "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees.

(6) Funds provided for the commute trip reduction (CTR) program may also be used for the growth and transportation efficiency center program.

(7) $5,670,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and $754,000 of the state vehicle parking account—state appropriation are provided solely for CTR grants and activities.

(8) $200,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is contingent on the timely development of an annual report summarizing the status of public transportation systems as identified under RCW 35.58.2796.

(9)(a) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Everett connector service for Island and Skagit transit agencies. The amount provided in this subsection is contingent on Island Transit charging fares that achieve a farebox recovery ratio similar to comparable transit systems.

(b) The amount provided in (a) of this subsection must be held in unallotted status until the office of financial management determines that fares have been both adopted and implemented by Island Transit that achieve a farebox recovery ratio similar to comparable transit systems. Island Transit must notify the office of financial management when it has met the requirements of this subsection.

(10)(a) $13,890,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2016-3 as developed February 22, 2016. Except as provided otherwise in this subsection, funds must first be used for projects that are identified as priority one projects. As additional funds become available or if a priority one project is delayed, funding must be provided to priority two projects. If a higher priority project is bypassed, it must be funded when the project is ready. The department must submit a report annually with its budget submittal that, at a minimum, includes information about the listed transit projects that have been funded and projects that have been bypassed, including an estimated time frame for when the bypassed project will be funded.

(b) $831,000 of the amount provided in (a) of this subsection is provided solely for Skagit transit system enhancements for expenditure in 2015-2017.

(c) $2,300,000 of the amount provided in (a) of this subsection is provided solely for Island transit's tri-county connector service for expenditure in 2015-2017.

(11) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for transit coordination grants.

(12) $484,000 of the regional mobility grant program account—state appropriation is reappropriated for the Intercity Transit, Tumwater/DuPont/Lakewood Express Bus Service project (20130023), in addition to the amounts identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (5) of this section.

Sec. 221. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—MARINE—PROGRAM X

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($483,637,000))

﻿ $477,220,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—Federal

Appropriation. . . .$5,908,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$121,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($483,758,000))

﻿ $483,249,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of financial management budget instructions require agencies to recast enacted budgets into activities. The Washington state ferries shall include a greater level of detail in its 2015-2017 supplemental and 2017-2019 omnibus transportation appropriations act requests, as determined jointly by the office of financial management, the Washington state ferries, and the transportation committees of the legislature. This level of detail must include the administrative functions in the operating as well as capital programs.

(2) Until a reservation system is operational on the San Juan islands inter-island route, the department shall provide the same priority loading benefits on the San Juan islands inter-island route to home health care workers as are currently provided to patients traveling for purposes of receiving medical treatment.

(3) For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the department may enter into a distributor controlled fuel hedging program and other methods of hedging approved by the fuel hedging committee.

(4) (($87,036,000)) $78,306,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for auto ferry vessel operating fuel in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, which reflect cost savings from a reduced biodiesel fuel requirement and, therefore, is contingent upon the enactment of section 701 ((of this act)), c 10, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. The amount provided in this subsection represents the fuel budget for the purposes of calculating any ferry fare fuel surcharge.

(5) When purchasing uniforms that are required by collective bargaining agreements, the department shall contract with the lowest cost provider.

(6) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the department shall not operate a winter sailing schedule for a time period longer than twelve weeks.

(7) $496,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for ferry terminal traffic control at the Fauntleroy ferry terminal. The department shall utilize existing contracts to provide a uniformed officer to assist with ferry terminal traffic control at the Fauntleroy ferry terminal.

(8) (($1,151,000)) $1,309,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for improvements to the reservation system. The department shall actively encourage ferry reservation customers to use the online option for making and changing reservations and shall not use these funds for call center staff.

(9) $30,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the marine division assistant secretary's designee to the board of pilotage commissioners, who serves as the board chair. As the agency chairing the board, the department shall direct the board chair, in his or her capacity as chair, to require that the report to the governor and chairs of the transportation committees required under RCW 88.16.035(1)(f) be filed by September 1, 2015, and annually thereafter, and that the report include the establishment of policies and procedures necessary to increase the diversity of pilots, trainees, and applicants, including a diversity action plan. The diversity action plan must articulate a comprehensive vision of the board's diversity goals and the steps it will take to reach those goals.

(10) $5,908,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—federal appropriation is provided solely for vessel maintenance.

Sec. 222. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—RAIL—PROGRAM Y—OPERATING

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($58,744,000))

﻿ $59,473,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local

Appropriation. . . .$45,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($58,789,000))

﻿ $59,518,000

Sec. 223. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($8,986,000))

﻿ $9,324,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,567,000

Multiuse Roadway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$131,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($11,684,000))

﻿ $12,022,000

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES—CAPITAL

Sec. 301. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Freight Mobility Investment Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($8,852,000))

﻿ $10,777,000

Freight Mobility Multimodal Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($9,937,000))

﻿ $11,859,000

Freight Mobility Multimodal Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,320,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($2,250,000))

﻿ $2,765,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation . . . .$83,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$3,250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($25,692,000))

﻿ $30,054,000

Sec. 302. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($5,310,000))

﻿ $5,990,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $250,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for unforeseen emergency repairs on facilities.

(2) $560,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of the roofs of the Shelton academy multipurpose building, Tacoma district office building, Kennewick detachment building, and Ridgefield and Plymouth weigh station buildings.

(3) $150,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for upgrades to scales at Goldendale required to meet current certification requirements.

(4) $2,350,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for funding to repair and replace the academy asphalt emergency vehicle operation course.

(5) $500,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacement of generators at Marysville, Baw Faw, Gardner, Pilot Rock, and Ridpath.

(6) $150,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for painting and caulking in several locations.

(7) $350,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for pavement preservation at the Wenatchee district office and the Spokane district office.

(8) $700,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for energy upgrades at two district offices and two detachments.

(9) $300,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for repair of the academy training tank.

(10) $130,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for communication site roof repair to reroof equipment shelters at radio communication sites statewide.

(11) $275,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of the broadcast tower at the Steptoe Butte radio communications site.

(12) $100,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the dry-pipe fire suppression system rebuild at the Marysville district office.

(13) $175,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the construction of the weatherproof enclosure of the emergency generator at the Whiskey Ridge radio communications site.

Sec. 303. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($46,000,000))

﻿ $56,094,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$10,706,000

County Arterial Preservation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($31,250,000))

﻿ $32,344,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($87,956,000))

﻿ $99,144,000

Sec. 304. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Small City Pavement and Sidewalk Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($3,931,000))

﻿ $4,301,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$10,000,000

Transportation Improvement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($179,452,000))

﻿ $249,988,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$3,313,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($193,383,000))

﻿ $267,602,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for:

(((1))) (a) The arterial preservation program to help low tax-based, medium-sized cities preserve arterial pavements;

(((2))) (b) The small city pavement program to help cities meet urgent preservation needs; and

(((3))) (c) The small city low-energy street light retrofit demonstration program.

(2) $3,313,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the complete streets program.

Sec. 305. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—FACILITIES—PROGRAM D—(DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)—CAPITAL

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($211,000))

﻿ $1,043,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($4,270,000))

﻿ $6,801,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation. . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,481,000))

﻿ $27,844,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $211,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation is provided solely for completion of a new traffic management center in Shoreline, Washington. By September 30, 2015, the department shall report to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on the resulting vacancy rate of the existing regional headquarters building in Shoreline, plans to consolidate department staff into the building, and the schedule for terminating the current lease of the Goldsmith building in Seattle, and provide an update on future plans to consolidate agency staff within the region.

(2) $10,000,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for a new Olympic region maintenance and administration facility to be located on the department-owned site at the intersection of Marvin Road and 32nd Avenue. The property purchase was approved by the 2005 legislature for the site of the new Olympic region and the land was acquired by the department in August 2005. The department must work with the office of financial management's facilities oversight program to develop a revised predesign for a new Olympic region facility, with an estimated total cost of no more than forty million dollars. Priority must be given to accommodating the maintenance and operations functions of the Olympic region. The department must provide a copy of the revised predesign to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 2015.

Sec. 306. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—IMPROVEMENTS—PROGRAM I

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($21,388,000))

﻿ $19,181,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($1,075,309,000))

﻿ $1,065,758,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($64,991,000))

﻿ $66,474,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($251,313,000))

﻿ $319,314,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($167,259,000))

﻿ $177,022,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($104,366,000))

﻿ $79,064,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($367,792,000))

﻿ $368,121,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$104,801,000

State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties Account—

State Appropriation. . . .(($15,000,000))

﻿ $14,000,000

((Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation. . . .$50,110,000))

Special Category C Account—State Appropriation. . . .$6,000,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation. . . .$230,925,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,228,329,000))

﻿ $2,450,660,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2015-1)) 2016-1 as developed ((May 26, 2015)) February 22, 2016, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601 of this act.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2015-2)) 2016-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((May 26, 2015)) February 22, 2016, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, additional congressional action not related to a specific project or purpose, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities. However, no additional federal funds may be allocated to the I-5/Columbia River Crossing project (400506A).

(3) Within the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, the department may transfer funds between programs I and P, except for funds that are otherwise restricted in this act.

(4) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation includes up to (($104,366,000)) $78,885,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.861.

(5) The transportation partnership account—state appropriation includes up to (($508,793,000)) $546,651,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(6) (($3,700,000)) $4,359,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the I-5/JBLM Early Corridor Design project (300596S) to complete an environmental impact statement for a project that creates additional general purpose lanes on Interstate 5 in the Joint Base Lewis-McChord corridor. The design of this project must be high occupancy vehicle lane ready for a future connection to the Interstate 5 high occupancy vehicle lane system that currently terminates in Tacoma.

(7) (($346,263,000)) $267,071,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, (($15,300,000)) $55,389,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, (($154,263,000)) $156,423,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation, (($69,479,000)) $45,400,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation, (($50,110,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation,)) and (($4,346,000)) $2,139,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 99/Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement project (809936Z).

(8) $17,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation ((is)) and $1,676,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation are provided solely for transit mitigation for the SR 99/Viaduct Project - Construction Mitigation project (809940B). The transportation partnership account—state appropriation must be placed in unallotted status and may only be released by the office of financial management for unpaid invoices from the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.

(9) Within existing resources, during the regular sessions of the legislature, the department of transportation shall participate in work sessions, before the transportation committees of the house of representatives and senate, on the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project. These work sessions must include a report on current progress of the project, timelines for completion, outstanding claims, the financial status of the project, and any other information necessary for the legislature to maintain appropriate oversight of the project. The parties invited to present may include the department of transportation, the Seattle tunnel partners, and other appropriate stakeholders.

(10) (($13,881,000)) $22,191,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, (($9,753,000)) $5,576,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation, $42,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, $6,000,000 of the special category C account—state appropriation, $368,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, $13,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation, and (($6,348,000)) $12,976,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the US 395/North Spokane Corridor project (600010A). Any future savings on the project must stay on the US 395/Interstate 90 corridor and be made available to the current phase of the North Spokane corridor project or any future phase of the project in 2015-2017.

(11) (($46,894,000)) $34,732,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, (($10,317,000)) $7,329,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation, and (($1,000)) $56,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the I-405/Kirkland Vicinity Stage 2 - Widening project (8BI1002). This project must be completed as soon as practicable as a design-build project. Any future savings on this project or other Interstate 405 corridor projects must stay on the Interstate 405 corridor and be made available to either the I-405/SR 167 Interchange - Direct Connector project (140504C) or the I-405 Renton to Bellevue project in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

(12)(a) The SR 520 Bridge Replacement and HOV project (8BI1003) is supported over time from multiple sources, including a $300,000,000 TIFIA loan, $923,000,000 in Garvee bonds, toll revenues, state bonds, interest earnings, and other miscellaneous sources.

(b) The state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation includes up to (($343,505,000)) $343,834,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.879 and 47.10.886.

(c) The state route number 520 corridor account—federal appropriation includes up to $104,801,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.879 and 47.10.886.

(d) (($82,195,000)) $126,937,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, $104,801,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—federal appropriation, and (($367,792,000)) $368,121,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 520 Bridge Replacement and HOV project (8BI1003). Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection (12)(d), (($232,598,000)) $233,243,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation must be put into unallotted status and is subject to review by the office of financial management. The director of the office of financial management shall consult with the joint transportation committee prior to making a decision to allot these funds.

(e) When developing the financial plan for the project, the department shall assume that all maintenance and operation costs for the new facility are to be covered by tolls collected on the toll facility and not by the motor vehicle account.

(13) (($15,000,000)) $14,000,000 of the state route number 520 civil penalties account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue to work with the Seattle department of transportation in their joint planning, design, right-of-way acquisition, outreach, and operation of the remaining west side elements including, but not limited to, the Montlake lid, the bicycle/pedestrian path, the effective network of transit connections, and the Portage Bay bridge of the SR 520 Bridge Replacement and HOV project.

(14) (($548,000)) $1,056,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation and (($19,000)) $38,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for the 31st Ave SW Overpass Widening and Improvement project (L1100048).

(15) The legislature finds that there are sixteen companies involved in wood preserving in the state that employ four hundred workers and have an annual payroll of fifteen million dollars. Prior to the department's switch to steel guardrails, ninety percent of the twenty-five hundred mile guardrail system was constructed of preserved wood and one hundred ten thousand wood guardrail posts were produced annually for state use. Moreover, the policy of using steel posts requires the state to use imported steel. Given these findings, where practicable, and until June 30, 2017, the department shall include the design option to use wood guardrail posts, in addition to steel posts, in new guardrail installations. The selection of posts must be consistent with the agency design manual policy that existed before December 2009.

(16) For urban corridors that are all or partially within a metropolitan planning organization boundary, for which the department has not initiated environmental review, and that require an environmental impact statement, at least one alternative must be consistent with the goals set out in RCW 47.01.440.

(17) The department shall itemize all future requests for the construction of buildings on a project list and submit them through the transportation executive information system as part of the department's 2016 budget submittal. It is the intent of the legislature that new facility construction must be transparent and not appropriated within larger highway construction projects.

(18) (($59,438,000)) $56,736,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, $572,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, and (($388,000)) $1,085,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for fish passage barrier and chronic deficiency improvements (0BI4001).

(19) Any new advisory group that the department convenes during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium must consider the interests of the entire state of Washington.

(20) ((Practical design offers targeted benefits to a state transportation system within available fiscal resources. This delivers value not just for individual projects, but for the entire system. Applying practical design standards will also preserve and enhance safety and mobility. The department shall implement a practical design strategy for transportation design standards. By June 30, 2016, the department shall report to the governor and the house of representatives and senate transportation committees on where practical design has been applied or is intended to be applied in the department and the cost savings resulting from the use of practical design. This subsection takes effect if chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 2012), Laws of 2015 is not enacted by June 30, 2015.)) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire connecting Washington account appropriation is provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2016-1 as developed February 22, 2016, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I).

(21) It is the intent of the legislature that for the I-5 JBLM Corridor Improvements project (M00100R), the department shall actively pursue $50,000,000 in federal funds to pay for this project to supplant state funds in the future. $50,000,000 in connecting Washington account funding must be held in unallotted status during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. These funds may only be used after the department has provided notice to the office of financial management that it has exhausted all efforts to secure federal funds from the federal highway administration and the department of defense.

(22) Of the amounts allocated to the Puget Sound Gateway project (M00600R) in LEAP Transportation Document 2016-1 as developed February 22, 2016, $4,000,000 must be used to complete the bridge connection at 28th/24th Street over state route number 509 in the city of SeaTac. The bridge connection must be completed prior to other construction on the state route number 509 segment of the project.

(23) In making budget allocations to the Puget Sound Gateway project, the department shall implement the project's construction as a single corridor investment. The department shall develop a coordinated corridor construction and implementation plan for state route number 167 and state route number 509 in collaboration with affected stakeholders. Specific funding allocations must be based on where and when specific project segments are ready for construction to move forward and investments can be best optimized for timely project completion. Emphasis must be placed on avoiding gaps in fund expenditures for either project.

(24) It is the intent of the legislature that, for the I-5/North Lewis County Interchange project (L2000204), the department develop and design the project with the objective of significantly improving access to the industrially zoned properties in north Lewis county. The design must consider the county's process of investigating alternatives to improve such access from Interstate 5 that began in March 2015.

(25) $1,500,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to complete an interchange justification report (IJR) for the U.S. 2 trestle, covering the state route number 204 and 20th Street interchanges at the end of the westbound structure.

(a) The department shall develop the IJR in close collaboration with affected local jurisdictions, including Snohomish county and the cities of Everett, Lake Stevens, Marysville, Snohomish, and Monroe.

(b) Within the amount provided for the IJR, the department must address public outreach and the overall operational approval of the IJR.

(c) The department shall complete the IJR by July 1, 2018.

(26) As provided in section 405, chapter 44, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. (transportation revenue), it is the intent of the legislature that repayment of sales tax for the new Tacoma Narrows bridge be deferred until the twenty-fourth year after the date certified by the department of revenue as the date on which the state route number 16 corridor project is operationally complete. Of the state funding from the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account for the SR 16/Repayment of Sales Tax for New Tacoma Narrows Bridge project (TNB001A), $57,627,000 is moved to the 2031-2033 fiscal biennium.

(27) It is the intent of the legislature that $100,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation for the I-90/Eastside Restripe Shoulders project (L2000201) in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium be used instead for local street overlay in North Bend.

Sec. 307. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PRESERVATION—PROGRAM P

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($12,057,000))

﻿ $6,489,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($56,024,000))

﻿ $70,908,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($391,681,000))

﻿ $472,086,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($8,104,000))

﻿ $8,647,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($40,457,000))

﻿ $28,032,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$4,564,000

Recreational Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($1,509,000))

﻿ $2,194,000

High Occupancy Toll Lanes Operations Account—State

Appropriation. . . .(($800,000))

﻿ $1,000,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation. . . .(($720,000))

﻿ $1,730,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation. . . .$79,963,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($515,916,000))

﻿ $675,613,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2015-1)) 2016-1 as developed ((May 26, 2015)) February 22, 2016, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601 of this act.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2015-2)) 2016-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((May 26, 2015)) February 22, 2016, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, additional congressional action not related to a specific project or purpose, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities. However, no additional federal funds may be allocated to the I-5/Columbia River Crossing project (400506A).

(3) Within the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, the department may transfer funds between programs I and P, except for funds that are otherwise restricted in this act.

(4) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation includes up to (($38,492,000)) $28,032,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.861.

(5) The department shall examine the use of electric arc furnace slag for use as an aggregate for new roads and paving projects in high traffic areas and report back to the legislature by December 1, 2015, on its current use in other areas of the country and any characteristics that can provide greater wear resistance and skid resistance in new pavement construction.

(6) (($39,000,000)) $38,142,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation ((is)) and $858,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for the preservation of structurally deficient bridges or bridges that are at risk of becoming structurally deficient. These funds must be used widely around the state of Washington. The department shall provide a report that identifies the scope, cost, and benefit of each project funded in this subsection as part of its 2016 agency budget request.

(7) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire connecting Washington account appropriation in this section is provided solely for the projects and activities as listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2016-1 as developed February 22, 2016, Program – Highway Preservation Program (P).

(8) It is the intent of the legislature that, with respect to the amounts provided for highway preservation from the connecting Washington account, the department consider the preservation and rehabilitation of concrete roadway on Interstate 5 from the Canadian border to the Oregon border to be a priority within the preservation program.

(9) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for extraordinary costs incurred from litigation awards, settlements, or dispute mitigation activities not eligible for funding from the self-insurance fund. The amount provided in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until the department submits a request to the office of financial management that includes documentation detailing litigation-related expenses. The office of financial management may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for litigation awards, settlements, and dispute mitigation activities have been exhausted.

(10) It is the intent of the legislature that $30,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation for the SR 241/Mabton Bridge project (L2000174) in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium be used instead in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium for the purposes of section 216(4) of this act.

Sec. 308. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRAFFIC OPERATIONS—PROGRAM Q—CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($5,898,000))

﻿ $7,190,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($6,132,000))

﻿ $7,567,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$200,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($12,230,000))

﻿ $14,957,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($791,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for project 000005Q as state matching funds for federally selected competitive grants or congressional earmark projects. These moneys must be placed into reserve status until such time as federal funds are secured that require a state match.))

(1) The department shall set aside a sufficient portion of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation for federally selected competitive grants or congressional earmark projects that require matching state funds. State funds set aside as matching funds for federal projects must be accounted for in project 000005Q and remain in unallotted status until needed for those federal projects.

(2) $350,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the installation of a traffic light at the intersection of state route number 240 and Hagen Road in Kennewick and is added to the LEAP transportation document identified in section 306(2) of this act. It is the intent of the legislature that the department complete the project in this subsection instead of the SR 240/Jadwin Ave to I-182 - Install Traffic Cameras project (524001Q).

(3) The department shall implement Senate Joint Memorial No. 8019 within existing resources if Senate Joint Memorial No. 8019 is enacted by the legislature by June 30, 2016, and the Washington state transportation commission takes action to name the facility per Senate Joint Memorial No. 8019 by June 30, 2017.

Sec. 309. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION—PROGRAM W

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($40,347,000))

﻿ $55,745,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($126,515,000))

﻿ $153,647,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($10,331,000))

﻿ $3,730,000

((Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,734,000))

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($81,583,000))

﻿ $122,089,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation. . . .$66,805,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($261,510,000))

﻿ $402,016,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2015-2)) 2016-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((May 26, 2015)) February 22, 2016, Program - Washington State Ferries Capital Program (W).

(2) (($73,000,000)) $90,545,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation is provided solely for the acquisition of a 144-car vessel (L1000063). The department shall use as much already procured equipment as practicable on the 144-car vessels.

(3) (($40,617,000)) $46,989,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—federal appropriation and (($608,000)) $490,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Mukilteo ferry terminal (952515P). It is the intent of the legislature, over the sixteen-year investment program, to provide $155,000,000 in funds to complete the Mukilteo Terminal Replacement project (952515P). These funds are identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section. To the greatest extent practicable and within available resources, the department shall design the new terminal to be a net zero energy building. To achieve this goal, the department shall evaluate using highly energy efficient equipment and systems, and the most appropriate renewable energy systems for the needs and location of the terminal.

(4) (($4,000,000)) $6,000,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for emergency capital repair costs (999910K). Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.

(5) Consistent with RCW 47.60.662, which requires the Washington state ferry system to collaborate with passenger-only ferry and transit providers to provide service at existing terminals, the department shall ensure that multimodal access, including for passenger-only ferries and transit service providers, is not precluded by any future terminal modifications.

(6) If the department pursues a conversion of the existing diesel powered Issaquah class fleet to a different fuel source or engine technology or the construction of a new vessel powered by a fuel source or engine technology that is not diesel powered, the department must use a design-build procurement process.

(7) Funding is included in the future biennia of the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section for future vessel purchases. Given that the recent purchase of new vessels varies from the current long range plan, the department shall include in its updated long range plan revised estimates for new vessel costs, size, and purchase time frames. Additionally, the long range plan must include a vessel retirement schedule and associated reserve vessel policy recommendations.

(8) $325,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the ferry system to participate in the development of one account-based system for customers of both the ferry system and tolling system. The current Wave2Go ferry ticketing system is reaching the end of its useful life and the department is expected to develop a replacement account-based system as part of the new tolling division customer service center toll collection system.

(9) Within existing resources, the department must evaluate the feasibility of utilizing the federal EB-5 immigrant investor program for financing the construction of a safety of life at sea (SOLAS) certificated vessel for the Anacortes-Sidney ferry route. The department must establish a group that includes, but is not limited to, the department of commerce and entities or individuals experienced with vessel engineering and EB-5 financing for assistance in evaluating the applicability of the EB-5 immigrant investor program. The department must deliver a report containing the results of the evaluation to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by December 1, 2015.

(10) It is the intent of the legislature, over the sixteen-year investment program, to provide $331,557,000 in funds to complete the Seattle Terminal Replacement project (900010L), including: (a) Design work and selection of a preferred plan, (b) replacing timber pilings with pilings sufficient to support a selected terminal design, (c) replacing the timber portion of the dock with a new and reconfigured steel and concrete dock, and (d) other staging and construction work as the amount allows. These funds are identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(11) It is the intent of the legislature, over the sixteen-year new investment program, to provide $122,000,000 in state funds to complete the acquisition of a fourth 144-car vessel (L2000109). These funds are identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(12) $300,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely to issue a request for proposals and purchase pilot program customer counting equipment. By June 30, 2017, the department must report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature on the most effective way to use technology to count ferry passengers.

(13) $1,387,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—federal appropriation and $1,352,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction—state appropriation are provided solely for installation of security access control and video monitoring systems, and for enhancing wireless network capacity to handle higher security usage, increase connectivity between vessels and land-based facilities, and isolate the security portion of the network from regular business (project 998925A).

(14) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation includes up to $5,424,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.861.

Sec. 310. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—RAIL—PROGRAM Y—CAPITAL

Essential Rail Assistance Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($820,000))

﻿ $1,384,000

Transportation Infrastructure Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($7,033,000))

﻿ $7,154,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($12,759,000))

﻿ $36,980,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($363,318,000))

﻿ $492,217,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($383,930,000))

﻿ $537,735,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2015-2)) 2016-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((May 26, 2015)) February 22, 2016, Program - Rail Program (Y).

(2) $5,000,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation is provided solely for new low-interest loans approved by the department through the freight rail investment bank (FRIB) program. The department shall issue FRIB program loans with a repayment period of no more than ten years, and charge only so much interest as is necessary to recoup the department's costs to administer the loans. For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the department shall first award loans to 2015-2017 FRIB loan applicants in priority order, and then offer loans to 2015-2017 unsuccessful freight rail assistance program grant applicants, if eligible. If any funds remain in the FRIB program, the department may reopen the loan program and shall evaluate new applications in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 309, chapter 367, Laws of 2011. The department shall report annually to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on all FRIB loans issued.

(3)(a) (($4,514,000)) $5,484,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, $270,000 of the essential rail assistance account—state appropriation, and $455,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation are provided solely for new statewide emergent freight rail assistance projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $367,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation and $1,100,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely to reimburse Highline Grain, LLC for approved work completed on Palouse River and Coulee City (PCC) railroad track in Spokane county between the BNSF Railway Interchange at Cheney and Geiger Junction and must be administered in a manner consistent with freight rail assistance program projects. The value of the public benefit of this project is expected to meet or exceed the cost of this project in: Shipper savings on transportation costs; jobs saved in rail-dependent industries; and/or reduced future costs to repair wear and tear on state and local highways due to fewer annual truck trips (reduced vehicle miles traveled). The amounts provided in this subsection are not a commitment for future legislatures, but it is the legislature's intent that future legislatures will work to approve biennial appropriations until the full $7,337,000 cost of this project is reimbursed.

(4) (($363,191,000)) $487,297,000 of the multimodal transportation account—federal appropriation and (($5,740,000)) $13,679,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for expenditures related to passenger high-speed rail grants. Except for the Mount Vernon project (P01101A), the multimodal transportation account—state funds reflect no more than one and one-half percent of the total project funds, and are provided solely for expenditures that are not eligible for federal reimbursement.

(5)(a) (($550,000)) $1,114,000 of the essential rail assistance account—state appropriation ((and $305,000)), $766,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, and $68,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of the rehabilitation and maintenance of the Palouse river and Coulee City railroad line (F01111B).

(b) Expenditures from the essential rail assistance account—state in this subsection may not exceed the combined total of:

(i) Revenues deposited into the essential rail assistance account from leases and sale of property pursuant to RCW 47.76.290; and

(ii) Revenues transferred from the miscellaneous program account to the essential rail assistance account, pursuant to RCW 47.76.360, for the purpose of sustaining the grain train program by maintaining the Palouse river and Coulee City railroad.

(6) The department shall issue a call for projects for the freight rail assistance program, and shall evaluate the applications in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 309, chapter 367, Laws of 2011. By November 2016, the department shall submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.

Sec. 311. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z—CAPITAL

Highway Infrastructure Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($782,000))

﻿ $790,000

Highway Infrastructure Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($202,000))

﻿ $503,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($1,507,000))

﻿ $4,054,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($9,965,000))

﻿ $11,647,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($500,000))

﻿ $871,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($17,829,000))

﻿ $28,043,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($15,331,000))

﻿ $33,531,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation. . . .$47,669,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($46,116,000))

﻿ $127,108,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2015-2)) 2016-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((May 26, 2015)) February 22, 2016, Program - Local Programs Program (Z).

(2) The amounts identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced under subsection (1) of this section for pedestrian safety/safe routes to school are as follows:

(a) (($13,820,000)) $20,653,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and (($1,507,000)) $3,579,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation are provided solely for pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects (project L2000188).

(b) (($6,100,000)) $11,400,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, $1,750,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, and $6,750,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation are provided solely for newly selected safe routes to school projects. (($6,794,000)) $8,782,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, (($1,133,000)) $124,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, and (($3,215,000)) $4,897,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation are reappropriated for safe routes to school projects selected in the previous biennia (project L2000189). The department may consider the special situations facing high-need areas, as defined by schools or project areas in which the percentage of the children eligible to receive free and reduced-price meals under the national school lunch program is equal to, or greater than, the state average as determined by the department, when evaluating project proposals against established funding criteria while ensuring continued compliance with federal eligibility requirements.

(3) The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015, and December 1, 2016, on the status of projects funded as part of the pedestrian safety/safe routes to school grant program (0LP600P). The report must include, but is not limited to, a list of projects selected and a brief description of each project's status.

(4) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Edmonds waterfront at-grade train crossings alternatives analysis project (L2000135). The department shall work with the city of Edmonds and provide a preliminary report of key findings to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by December 1, 2015.

(5) $9,400,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for bicycle and pedestrian projects listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2016-4 as developed February 22, 2016. Funds must first be used for projects that are identified as priority one projects. As additional funds become available or if a priority one project is delayed, funding must be provided to priority two projects and then to priority three projects. If a higher priority project is bypassed, it must be funded in the first round after the project is ready. If funds become available as a result of projects being removed from this list or completed under budget, the department may submit additional bicycle and pedestrian safety projects for consideration by the legislature. The department must submit a report annually with its budget submittal that, at a minimum, includes information about the listed bicycle and pedestrian projects that have been funded and projects that have been bypassed, including an estimated time frame for when the project will be funded.

(6) Funding for the Guide Meridian Pedestrian Overpass project (L200198) is removed from the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(7) It is the intent of the legislature that $100,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation be provided for local street overlay in North Bend in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium and that this project be added to the list referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS

Sec. 401. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($2,559,000))

﻿ $2,779,000

Highway Bond Retirement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($1,169,927,000))

﻿ $1,178,351,000

Ferry Bond Retirement Account—State Appropriation. . . .$29,230,000

Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$16,129,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$559,000

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$25,837,000

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($62,885,000))

﻿ $72,880,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($719,000))

﻿ $482,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,307,286,000))

﻿ $1,326,247,000

Sec. 402. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($512,000))

﻿ $531,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($143,000))

﻿ $88,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($655,000))

﻿ $619,000

Sec. 403. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT TO BE PAID BY STATUTORILY PRESCRIBED REVENUE

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($200,637,000))

﻿ $200,215,000

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($12,455,000))

﻿ $12,009,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($213,092,000))

﻿ $212,224,000

Sec. 404. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For

motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to cities

and counties. . . .(($489,359,000))

﻿ $497,071,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405. A new section is added to 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation: For

distributions to cities and counties. . . .$12,500,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For

distributions to cities and counties. . . .$10,938,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$23,438,000

Sec. 406. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For

motor vehicle fuel tax refunds and statutory

transfers. . . .(($1,269,319,000))

﻿ $1,831,879,000

Sec. 407. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING—TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For motor vehicle fuel tax refunds and

transfers. . . .(($143,664,000))

﻿ $182,730,000

Sec. 408. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 407 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—ADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS

(1) Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound﻿

Ferry Operations Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

(2) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound

Capital Construction Account—State. . . .$12,000,000

(3) State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties﻿

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the﻿

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State. . . .(($916,000))

﻿ $1,631,000

(4) Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation:﻿

For transfer to the State Patrol Highway﻿

Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

(5) Highway Safety Account—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry﻿

Operations Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

(6) Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle﻿

Account—State. . . .$950,000

(7) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Puget Sound Capital Construction

Account—State. . . .(($12,000,000))

﻿ $18,000,000

(8) Rural Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Multimodal

Transportation Account—State. . . .$3,000,000,

(9) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry Operations

Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

(10) State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Connecting Washington Account—State. . . .$9,690,000

(11) Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Connecting Washington

Account—State. . . .$4,998,000

(12) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Connecting Washington Account—

State. . . .$25,781,000

(13) Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Connecting Washington

Account—State. . . .$596,000

(14) Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Connecting Washington

Account—State. . . .$2,270,000

(15) Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Multimodal Transportation

Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

(16) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Freight Mobility Investment

Account—State. . . .$1,922,000

(17) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Transportation Improvement

Account—State. . . .$2,188,000

(18) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Rural Arterial Trust Account—State. . . .$1,094,000

(19) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the County Arterial Preservation

Account—State. . . .$1,094,000

(20) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Freight Mobility

Multimodal Account—State. . . .$1,922,000

(21) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Regional Mobility

Grant Program Account—State. . . .$6,250,000

(22) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Rural Mobility

Grant Program Account—State. . . .$3,438,000

(23) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Electric Vehicle

Charging Infrastructure Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

(24) Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Connecting

Washington Account—State. . . .$59,000,000

(25) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Connecting

Washington Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

(26) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Aeronautics

Account—State. . . .$250,000

COMPENSATION

Sec. 501. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 728 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
TRANSPORTATION—WASHINGTON FEDERATION OF STATE EMPLOYEES

((Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$13,990,000

State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,093,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$23,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State Appropriation. . . .$55,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$2,273,000

Motorcycle Safety Education Account—State Appropriation. . . .$41,000

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation. . . .$34,000

Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$9,000

Department of Licensing Services Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$74,000

Aeronautics Account—State Appropriation. . . .$11,000

High Occupancy Toll Lanes Operations Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$8,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$86,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$26,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$42,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$17,765,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:))

(1) An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees general government under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for employees funded in the 2015-2017 omnibus transportation appropriations act, a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase or a one percent general wage increase plus twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective ((January)) July 1, 2016. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications, assignment pay for targeted job classifications, hazard pay for designated night crews, and geographic pay for designed areas. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in ((LEAP Transportation Document 713 - 2015T)) chapter . . ., Laws of 2016 (this act) to fund the provisions of this agreement.

(2) This section represents the results of the 2015-2017 collective bargaining process required under chapter 41.80 RCW. Provisions of the collective bargaining agreement contained in this section are described in general terms. Only major economic terms are included in the descriptions. These descriptions do not contain the complete contents of the agreement. The collective bargaining agreement contained in this section may also be funded by expenditures from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not provided. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in ((LEAP Transportation Document 713 - 2015T)) chapter . . ., Laws of 2016 (this act) to fund the provisions of this agreement.

Sec. 502. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 729 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
TRANSPORTATION—GENERAL WAGE INCREASE—STATE EMPLOYEES

((Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$5,854,000

State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation. . . .$819,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$22,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$5,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State Appropriation. . . .$488,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$696,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$128,000

Motorcycle Safety Education Account—State Appropriation. . . .$8,000

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation. . . .$21,000

Department of Licensing Services Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$13,000

Aeronautics Account—State Appropriation. . . .$48,000

High Occupancy Toll Lanes Operations Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$15,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$13,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation. . . .$237,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State Appropriation. . . .$42,000

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$32,000

County Arterial Preservation Account—State Appropriation. . . .$38,000

Transportation Improvement Account—State Appropriation. . . .$87,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$8,566,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:))

(1) Funding provided for state agency employee compensation for employees funded in the 2015-2017 omnibus transportation appropriations act who are not represented or who bargain under statutory authority other than chapter 41.80 or 47.64 RCW or RCW 41.56.473 or 41.56.475 is sufficient for general wage increases.

(2) Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, for all classified employees, as specified in subsection (1) of this section. Also included are employees in the Washington management service and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the director of the office of financial management. The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a three percent salary increase effective July 1, 2015, for executive, legislative, and judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected officials.

(3) Funding is provided for a general wage increase of one and eight-tenths percent or a one percent general wage increase plus twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective July 1, 2016, for all classified employees, as specified in subsection (1) of this section. Also included are employees in the Washington management service and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the director of the office of financial management. The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a one and eight-tenths percent salary increase effective July 1, 2016, for executive, legislative, and judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected officials. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in ((LEAP Transportation Document 713 - 2015T)) chapter . . ., Laws of 2016 (this act) to fund the provisions of this section.

Sec. 503. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 730 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
TRANSPORTATION—WPEA GENERAL GOVERNMENT

((Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$64,000

State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation. . . .$867,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$103,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,034,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:))

(1) An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington public employees association under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium and funded in the 2015-2017 omnibus transportation appropriations act. Funding is provided for employees funded in the 2015-2017 omnibus transportation appropriations act, a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase or a one percent general wage increase plus twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective ((January)) July 1, 2016. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in ((LEAP Transportation Document 713 - 2015T)) chapter . . ., Laws of 2016 (this act) to fund the provisions of this agreement.

(2) This section represents the results of the 2015-2017 collective bargaining process required under chapter 41.80 RCW. Provisions of the collective bargaining agreement contained in this section are described in general terms. Only major economic terms are included in the descriptions. These descriptions do not contain the complete contents of the agreement. The collective bargaining agreement contained in this section may also be funded by expenditures from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not provided. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in ((LEAP Transportation Document 713 - 2015T)) chapter . . ., Laws of 2016 (this act) to fund the provisions of this agreement.

Sec. 504. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 731 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
TRANSPORTATION—THE COALITION OF UNIONS AGREEMENT

((State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation. . . .$181,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:)) Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in ((LEAP Transportation Document 713 - 2015T)) chapter . . ., Laws of 2016 (this act) to fund the provisions of this agreement.

Sec. 505. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 732 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
TRANSPORTATION—TARGETED COMPENSATION INCREASES—NONREPRESENTED JOB CLASS SPECIFIC

((Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$36,000

State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation. . . .$26,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$14,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$12,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$4,000

Aeronautics Account—State Appropriation. . . .$4,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$8,000

Transportation Improvement Account—State Appropriation. . . .$4,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$108,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:)) Funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications for employees funded in the 2015-2017 omnibus transportation appropriations act, as specified by the office of financial management, of classified state employees, except those represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapters 41.80 and 47.64 RCW and RCW 41.56.473 and 41.56.475. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in ((LEAP Transportation Document 713 - 2015T)) chapter . . ., Laws of 2016 (this act) to fund the provisions of this agreement.

Sec. 506. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 733 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
TRANSPORTATION—COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—PTE LOCAL 17

((State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,973,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$361,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Private/Local

Appropriation. . . .$192,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,567,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,019,000

Aeronautics Account—State Appropriation. . . .$7,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$42,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$5,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$97,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$16,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$7,279,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:))

(1) An agreement has been reached between the governor and the professional and technical employees local seventeen under chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the negotiated three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase or a one percent general wage increase plus a flat twenty dollars per month, whichever is greater, effective July 1, 2016. The agreement also includes targeted job classification specific increases.

(2) This section represents the results of the 2015-2017 collective bargaining process required under chapter 41.80 RCW. Provisions of the collective bargaining agreement contained in this section are described in general terms. Only major economic terms are included in the descriptions. These descriptions do not contain the complete contents of the agreement. The collective bargaining agreement contained in this section may also be funded by expenditures from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not provided. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in ((LEAP Transportation Document 713 - 2015T)) chapter . . ., Laws of 2016 (this act) to fund the provisions of this agreement.

Sec. 507. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 734 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
TRANSPORTATION—COMPENSATION—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—INSURANCE BENEFITS

((Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .($771,000)

State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation. . . .($481,000)

State Patrol Highway Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .($11,000)

State Patrol Highway Account—Private/Local

Appropriation. . . .($5,000)

Motorcycle Safety Education Account—State

Appropriation. . . .($3,000)

High Occupancy Toll Lanes Operations Account—State

Appropriation. . . .($1,000)

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation. . . .($3,000)

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .($263,000)

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation. . . .($471,000)

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation. . . .($4,000)

Department of Licensing Services Account—State

Appropriation. . . .($3,000)

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation. . . .($6,000)

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation. . . .($3,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .($2,025,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:))

Collective bargaining agreements were reached for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium between the governor and the employee representatives under the provisions of chapters 41.80 and 41.56 RCW. Appropriations in this act for state agencies are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2015-2017 collective bargaining agreements and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan must not exceed $840 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2016. For fiscal year 2017, the monthly employer funding rate must not exceed $894 per eligible employee.

(b) Except as provided by the parties' health care agreement, in order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the public employees' benefits board must require any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065. The board shall collect a twenty-five dollar per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than fifty dollars per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(c) The health care authority must deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts must not be used for administrative expenditures.

(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board, must provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2016 and 2017, the subsidy must be up to $150.00 per month. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in ((LEAP Transportation Document 713 – 2015T)) chapter . . ., Laws of 2016 (this act) to fund the provisions of this agreement.

(3) All savings resulting from reduced claim costs or other factors identified after June 1, 2015, must be reserved for funding employee health benefits in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

Sec. 508. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 735 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
TRANSPORTATION—COMPENSATION—NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—INSURANCE BENEFITS

((Aeronautics Account—State Appropriation. . . .($3,000)

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .($241,000)

State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation. . . .($55,000)

High Occupancy Toll Lanes Operations Account—State

Appropriation. . . .($1,000)

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .($1,000)

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .($29,000)

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .($7,000)

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation. . . .($18,000)

Transportation Improvement Account—State

Appropriation. . . .($3,000)

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation. . . .($1,000)

County Arterial Preservation Account—State

Appropriation. . . .($1,000)

Department of Licensing Services Account—State

Appropriation. . . .($1,000)

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation. . . .($8,000)

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation. . . .($1,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .($370,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:)) Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for nonrepresented state employee health benefits for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan must not exceed $840 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2016. For fiscal year 2017, the monthly employer funding rate must not exceed $894 per eligible employee.

(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the public employees' benefits board must require any of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065. The board shall collect a twenty-five dollar per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than fifty dollars per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(c) The health care authority must deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts must not be used for administrative expenditures.

(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board, must provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2016 and 2017, the subsidy must be up to $150.00 per month. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in ((LEAP Transportation Document 713 - 2015T)) chapter . . ., Laws of 2016 (this act) to fund the provisions of this agreement.

(3) All savings resulting from reduced claim costs or other factors identified after June 1, 2015, must be reserved for funding employee health benefits in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

IMPLEMENTING PROVISIONS

Sec. 601. 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 601 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FUND TRANSFERS

(1) The transportation 2003 projects or improvements and the 2005 transportation partnership projects or improvements are listed in the LEAP list titled ((2015-1)) 2016-1 as developed ((May 26, 2015)) February 22, 2016, which consists of a list of specific projects by fund source and amount over a ten-year period. Current fiscal biennium funding for each project is a line-item appropriation, while the outer year funding allocations represent a ten-year plan. The department is expected to use the flexibility provided in this section to assist in the delivery and completion of all transportation partnership account and transportation 2003 account (nickel account) projects on the LEAP transportation documents referenced in this act. However, this section does not apply to the I-5/Columbia River Crossing project (400506A). For the 2015-2017 project appropriations, unless otherwise provided in this act, the director of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority between projects funded with transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriations, or transportation partnership account appropriations, in order to manage project spending and efficiently deliver all projects in the respective program under the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Transfers may only be made within each specific fund source referenced on the respective project list;

(b) Transfers from a project may not be made as a result of the reduction of the scope of a project or be made to support increases in the scope of a project;

(c) Each transfer between projects may only occur if the director of financial management finds that any resulting change will not hinder the completion of the projects as approved by the legislature. Until the legislature reconvenes to consider the 2016 supplemental omnibus transportation appropriations act, any unexpended 2013-2015 appropriation balance as approved by the office of financial management, in consultation with the legislative staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees, may be considered when transferring funds between projects;

(d) Transfers from a project may be made if the funds appropriated to the project are in excess of the amount needed to complete the project;

(e) Transfers may not occur for projects not identified on the applicable project list;

(f) Transfers may not be made while the legislature is in session; and

(g) Transfers between projects may be made, without the approval of the director of the office of financial management, by the department of transportation until the transfer amount by project exceeds two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or ten percent of the total project, whichever is less. These transfers must be reported quarterly to the director of financial management and the chairs of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees.

(2) At the time the department submits a request to transfer funds under this section, a copy of the request must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature.

(3) The office of financial management shall work with legislative staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees to review the requested transfers in a timely manner.

(4) The office of financial management shall document approved transfers and schedule changes in the transportation executive information system, compare changes to the legislative baseline funding and schedules identified by project identification number identified in the LEAP transportation documents referenced in this act, and transmit revised project lists to chairs of the transportation committees of the legislature on a quarterly basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602. A new section is added to 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 (uncodified) to read as follows:
BELATED CLAIMS

The agencies and institutions of the state may expend moneys appropriated in this act, upon approval of the office of financial management, for the payment of supplies and services furnished to the agency or institution in prior fiscal biennia.

MISCELLANEOUS 2015-2017 FISCAL BIENNIUM

NEW SECTION. Sec. 701. A new section is added to chapter 46.25 RCW to read as follows:

The department may create a nondomiciled commercial driver's license and commercial learner's permit pilot program. The pilot program must end by July 1, 2017.

(1) The department may issue a nondomiciled CLP or CDL to a person who meets one of the following criteria:

(a) Is domiciled in a foreign country as provided in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 383.23(b)(1) as it existed on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section; or

(b) Is domiciled in another state as provided in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 383.23(b)(2) as it existed on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section.

(2) A person applying for a nondomiciled CLP or CDL must:

(a) Surrender any nonresident or nondomiciled CLP or CDL issued by another state;

(b) Be in possession of a valid driver's license issued by this state or by his or her jurisdiction of domicile;

(c) Meet the requirements of 49 C.F.R. Sec. 383.71(f) as it existed on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section; and

(d) Be otherwise eligible and meet the applicable requirements for the issuance of a CLP or CDL under this chapter, including the payment of all appropriate fees.

(3) Before issuing a nondomiciled CLP or CDL, the department must establish the practical capability of disqualifying the person under the conditions applicable to a CLP or CDL issued to a resident of this state.

(4) A nondomiciled CLP or CDL issued under this section:

(a) Must be marked "non-domiciled" on the face of the document;

(b) Must include the information and be issued with the appropriate classifications, endorsements, and restrictions in the same manner as required for a CLP or CDL issued under this chapter;

(c) Must expire no later than a date as close as possible to: (i) The expiration of the individual's employment authorization document or authorized stay in the United States; or (ii) if there is no expiration date for the employment authorization document or authorized stay, one year from the date of issuance. Expiration dates are to be determined by the department within the constraints of the department's issuance system;

(d) Permits operation of a commercial motor vehicle to the same extent as a CLP or CDL issued under this chapter; and

(e) Is valid only when accompanied by a valid driver's license issued by this state or by the person's jurisdiction of domicile.

(5) A nondomiciled CLP or CDL issued to an individual who has temporary lawful status or valid employment authorization in the United States is valid only when accompanied by an unexpired employment authorization document issued by the United States citizenship and immigration services or an unexpired foreign passport accompanied by an approved I-94 form documenting the applicant's most recent admittance into the United States.

(6) A person who has been issued a nondomiciled CLP or CDL:

(a) Is subject to all applicable requirements for and disqualifications from operating a commercial motor vehicle as provided under this chapter and is subject to the withdrawal of driving privileges as provided by this title; and

(b) Must notify the department of the issuance of any disqualifications or license suspensions or revocations, whether in the United States or in the person's jurisdiction of domicile.

(7)(a) For the purposes of this section, "nondomiciled CLP or CDL" means a permit or license, respectively, issued under this section to a person who meets one of the following criteria:

(i) Is domiciled in a foreign country as provided in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 383.23(b)(1) as it existed on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section; or

(ii) Is domiciled in another state as provided in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 383.23(b)(2) as it existed on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section.

(b) The definition in (a) of this subsection applies exclusively to the use of the term in this chapter and is not to be applied in any other chapter of the Revised Code of Washington.

(8) This section expires July 1, 2017.

Sec. 702. RCW 46.25.070 and 2013 c 224 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The application for a commercial driver's license or commercial learner's permit must include the following:

(a) The full name and current mailing and residential address of the person;

(b) A physical description of the person, including sex, height, weight, and eye color;

(c) Date of birth;

(d) The applicant's social security number;

(e) The person's signature;

(f) Certifications including those required by 49 C.F.R. Sec. 383.71;

(g) The names of all states where the applicant has previously been licensed to drive any type of motor vehicle during the previous ten years;

(h) Any other information required by the department; and

(i) A consent to release driving record information to parties identified in chapter 46.52 RCW and this chapter.

(2) An applicant for a commercial driver's license or commercial learner's permit, and every licensee seeking to renew his or her license, must meet the requirements of 49 C.F.R. Sec. 383.71 as it existed on July 8, 2014, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section.

(3) An applicant for a hazardous materials endorsement must submit an application and comply with federal transportation security administration requirements as specified in 49 C.F.R. Part 1572.

(4) When a licensee changes his or her name, mailing address, or residence address, the person shall notify the department as provided in RCW 46.20.205.

(5) No person who has been a resident of this state for thirty days may drive a commercial motor vehicle under the authority of a commercial driver's license issued by another jurisdiction.

(6) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, for purposes of the nondomiciled commercial driver's license and commercial learner's permit pilot program created under section 701 of this act, an applicant for a nondomiciled CLP or CDL who is domiciled in a foreign country and who has not been issued a social security number is exempt from the requirement under subsection (1)(d) of this section.

Sec. 703. RCW 81.53.281 and 2014 c 222 s 702 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created in the state treasury a "grade crossing protective fund" to carry out the provisions of RCW 81.53.261, 81.53.271, 81.53.281, 81.53.291, and 81.53.295; for grants and/or subsidies to public, private, and nonprofit entities for rail safety projects authorized or ordered by the commission; and for personnel and associated costs related to supervising and administering rail safety grants and/or subsidies. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, funds in this account may also be used to conduct the study required under section 102, chapter 222, Laws of 2014. The commission shall transfer from the public service revolving fund's miscellaneous fees and penalties accounts moneys appropriated for these purposes as needed. At the time the commission makes each allocation of cost to said grade crossing protective fund, it shall certify that such cost shall be payable out of said fund. When federal-aid highway funds are involved, the department of transportation shall, upon entry of an order by the commission requiring the installation or upgrading of a grade crossing protective device, submit to the commission an estimate for the cost of the proposed installation and related work. Upon receipt of the estimate the commission shall pay to the department of transportation the percentage of the estimate specified in RCW 81.53.295, as now or hereafter amended, to be used as the grade crossing protective fund portion of the cost of the installation and related work.

The commission may adopt rules for the allocation of money from the grade crossing protective fund. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the commission may waive rules regarding local matching fund requirements, maximum awards for individual projects, and other application requirements as necessary to expedite the allocation of money from the grade crossing protective fund to address under-protected grade crossings as identified by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 201 (uncodified);

(2) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 202 (uncodified);

(3) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 203 (uncodified);

(4) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 204 (uncodified);

(5) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 205 (uncodified);

(6) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 206 (uncodified);

(7) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 207 (uncodified);

(8) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 301 (uncodified);

(9) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 302 (uncodified);

(10) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 303 (uncodified);

(11) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 304 (uncodified);

(12) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 305 (uncodified);

(13) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 306 (uncodified);

(14) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 307 (uncodified);

(15) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 308 (uncodified);

(16) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 309 (uncodified); and

(17) 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 401 (uncodified).

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 801. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---