BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. By December 1, 2016, the department of fish and wildlife must work cooperatively with its waterfowl advisory group and other appropriate stakeholders to: (1) Assess migratory bird permit fees and program needs through information such as: Current and past migratory bird permit revenue levels; trends in other funding sources that support projects that benefit migratory birds in Washington; program capacity for additional projects and activities; potential impacts of changed fees on license sales; and identified priority projects or other program activities; and (2) review options and recommendations on changes to the migratory bird permit fee, or other program changes, based on the results of this assessment. The assessment, options, and recommendations must be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. By December 1, 2016, the state auditor must audit the department of fish and wildlife's use of fees derived from the sale of migratory bird permits for compliance with statutory requirements. The audit must be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire June 30, 2017.

--- END ---