BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. Consumers of health care services can be burdened by increasing health care costs, especially for expensive specialty drugs and medications to treat serious chronic diseases. It is the intent of the legislature to minimize consumers' exposure to high cost sharing for prescription drugs by instituting a cap on individual prescription costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each health plan offered that provides coverage for prescription drugs shall provide a maximum cost sharing for a covered outpatient prescription drug. The copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing for an individual prescription for a supply up to thirty days shall not exceed one hundred dollars.

(2) For a nongrandfathered individual or small group health plan, the annual deductible for outpatient drugs, if any, shall not exceed five hundred dollars.

(3) The commissioner shall recommend a schedule and methodology for addressing inflationary increases that may be necessary.

(4) This section applies to health plans delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed on or after January 1, 2017.

--- END ---