BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Each state university, regional university, and state college jointly with the state board for community and technical colleges shall develop plans for facilitating the reverse transfer of academic credits from an institution of higher education to a community or technical college. The plan must include the following:

(a) A policy allowing eligible students the opportunity to transfer credits back to a community or technical college to use towards completion of a two-year academic transfer degree; and

(b) Procedures for notifying eligible students of their eligibility for participation in the reverse transfer program.

(2) As used in this section, "eligible students" includes all transfer students who enroll as degree-seeking students at a four-year institution of higher education before attaining an associate degree, but after completing sixty quarter credits or more of transferable coursework at a Washington community or technical college.

(3) The state board for community and technical colleges and each four-year institution of higher education shall adopt plans consistent with subsection (1) of this section by December 31, 2017.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2018.

--- END ---