BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.44.041 and 1997 c 198 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

No vehicle or combination of vehicles shall operate upon the public highways of this state with a gross load on any single axle in excess of twenty thousand pounds, or upon any group of axles in excess of that set forth in the following table, except that two consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry a gross load of thirty-four thousand pounds each, if the overall distance between the first and last axles of such consecutive sets of tandem axles is thirty-six feet or more.

The following table is based on the following formula:
W = 500((LN/N-1)+12N+36). W is the maximum weight in pounds (to the nearest 500 pounds) carried on any group of two (2) or more consecutive axles. L is the distance in feet between the extremes of any group of two (2) or more consecutive axles. N is the number of axles under consideration.

Distance in feet between the extremes of any group of 2 or more consecutive axles

Maximum load in pounds carried on any group of 2 or more consecutive axles

2

3

4

5

6

7

8

9

axles

axles

axles

axles

axles

axles

axles

axles

4

34,000

5

34,000

6

34,000

7

34,000

8 & less

34,000

34,000

more than 8

38,000

42,000

9

39,000

42,500

10

40,000

43,500

11

44,000

49,000

12

45,000

50,000

13

45,500

50,500

14

46,500

51,500

56,500

15

47,000

52,000

57,000

16

48,000

52,500

58,000

17

48,500

53,500

58,500

18

49,500

54,000

59,000

64,500

19

50,000

54,500

60,000

65,000

20

51,000

55,500

60,500

66,000

21

51,500

56,000

61,000

66,500

72,000

22

52,500

56,500

61,500

67,000

72,500

23

53,000

57,500

62,500

68,000

73,000

24

54,000

58,000

63,000

68,500

74,000

25

54,500

58,500

63,500

69,000

74,500

80,000

26

55,500

59,500

64,000

69,500

75,000

80,500

27

56,000

60,000

65,000

70,000

75,500

81,000

28

57,000

60,500

65,500

71,000

76,500

82,000

87,500

29

57,500

61,500

66,000

71,500

77,000

82,500

88,000

30

58,500

62,000

66,500

72,000

77,500

83,000

88,500

31

59,000

62,500

67,500

72,500

78,000

83,500

89,000

32

60,000

63,500

68,000

73,000

78,500

84,500

90,000

33

64,000

68,500

74,000

79,000

85,000

90,500

34

64,500

69,000

74,500

80,000

85,500

91,000

35

65,500

70,000

75,000

80,500

86,000

91,500

36

66,000

70,500

75,500

81,000

86,500

92,000

37

66,500

71,000

76,000

81,500

87,000

93,000

38

67,500

71,500

77,000

82,000

87,500

93,500

39

68,000

72,500

77,500

82,500

88,500

94,000

40

68,500

73,000

78,000

83,500

89,000

94,500

41

69,500

73,500

78,500

84,000

89,500

95,000

42

70,000

74,000

79,000

84,500

90,000

95,500

43

70,500

75,000

80,000

85,000

90,500

96,000

44

71,500

75,500

80,500

85,500

91,000

96,500

45

72,000

76,000

81,000

86,000

91,500

97,500

46

72,500

76,500

81,500

87,000

92,500

98,000

47

73,500

77,500

82,000

87,500

93,000

98,500

48

74,000

78,000

83,000

88,000

93,500

99,000

49

74,500

78,500

83,500

88,500

94,000

99,500

50

75,500

79,000

84,000

89,000

94,500

100,000

51

76,000

80,000

84,500

89,500

95,000

100,500

52

76,500

80,500

85,000

90,500

95,500

101,000

53

77,500

81,000

86,000

91,000

96,500

102,000

54

78,000

81,500

86,500

91,500

97,000

102,500

55

78,500

82,500

87,000

92,000

97,500

103,000

56

79,500

83,000

87,500

92,500

98,000

103,500

57

80,000

83,500

88,000

93,000

98,500

104,000

58

84,000

89,000

94,000

99,000

104,500

59

85,000

89,500

94,500

99,500

105,500

60

85,500

90,000

95,000

100,500

105,500

61

86,000

90,500

95,500

101,000

105,500

62

86,500

91,000

96,000

101,500

105,500

63

87,500

92,000

96,500

102,000

105,500

64

88,000

92,500

97,500

102,500

105,500

65

88,500

93,000

98,000

103,000

105,500

66

89,000

93,500

98,500

103,500

105,500

67

90,000

94,000

99,000

104,500

105,500

68

90,500

95,000

99,500

105,000

105,500

69

91,000

95,500

100,000

105,500

105,500

70

91,500

96,000

101,000

105,500

105,500

71

92,500

96,500

101,500

105,500

105,500

72

93,000

97,000

102,000

105,500

105,500

73

93,500

98,000

102,500

105,500

105,500

74

94,000

98,500

103,000

105,500

105,500

75

95,000

99,000

103,500

105,500

105,500

76

95,500

99,500

104,500

105,500

105,500

77

96,000

100,000

105,000

105,500

105,500

78

96,500

101,000

105,500

105,500

105,500

79

97,500

101,500

105,500

105,500

105,500

80

98,000

102,000

105,500

105,500

105,500

81

98,500

102,500

105,500

105,500

105,500

82

99,000

103,000

105,500

105,500

105,500

83

100,000

104,000

105,500

105,500

105,500

84

104,500

105,500

105,500

105,500

85

105,000

105,500

105,500

105,500

86 or more

105,500

105,500

105,500

105,500

When inches are involved: Under six inches take lower, six inches or over take higher. The maximum load on any axle in any group of axles shall not exceed the single axle or tandem axle allowance as set forth in the table above.

The maximum axle and gross weights specified in this section are subject to the braking requirements set up for the service brakes upon any motor vehicle or combination of vehicles as provided by law.

Loads of not more than eighty thousand pounds which may be legally hauled in the state bordering this state which also has a sales tax, are legal in this state when moving to a port district within four miles of the bordering state except on the interstate system. This provision does not allow the operation of a vehicle combination consisting of a truck tractor and three trailers.

Notwithstanding anything contained herein, a vehicle or combination of vehicles in operation on January 4, 1975, may operate upon the public highways of this state, including the interstate system within the meaning of section 127 of Title 23, United States Code, with an overall gross weight upon a group of two consecutive sets of dual axles which was lawful in this state under the laws, regulations, and procedures in effect in this state on January 4, 1975.

--- END ---