BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The office of the attorney general shall convene a work group of stakeholders to provide input and feedback on the development of a plan and program for the efficient statewide consolidation of an individual's traffic-based financial obligations imposed by courts of limited jurisdiction into a unified and affordable payment plan.

(2) The following must be invited to participate in the work group:

(a) The administrator for the courts or the administrator for the courts' designee;

(b) The director of the Washington state department of licensing or the director's designee;

(c) A district or municipal court judge, appointed by the district and municipal court judges' association;

(d) A prosecutor, appointed by the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, or the prosecutor's designee;

(e) A public defender, jointly appointed by the Washington defender association and the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers;

(f) A district or municipal court administrator or manager, appointed by the district and municipal court management association;

(g) A representative of a civil legal aid organization, appointed by the office of civil legal aid;

(h) The chief of the Washington state patrol or the chief's designee;

(i) A representative of a statewide association of police chiefs and sheriffs, selected by the association;

(j) The director of the Washington traffic safety commission or the director's designee;

(k) A representative of a statewide association of city governments, selected by the association;

(l) A representative of a statewide association of counties, selected by the association; and

(m) A representative of a statewide association of collection professionals.

(3) The work group shall convene as necessary.

(4) The stakeholder work group shall provide final feedback and recommendations to the office of the attorney general no later than September 15, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The office of the attorney general shall submit a report detailing its recommendations and the plan and program required by this act to the Washington state supreme court, the governor, and appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act expires December 31, 2017.

--- END ---