BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature declares and recognizes the importance of tribal cultural resources protection and intends to reinforce the obligations and commitments of the state made to tribal governments in the 1987 Washington state timber, fish, and wildlife agreement, the 1999 forests and fish report, and the cultural resource protection and management plans adopted by the participating caucuses of the timber, fish, and wildlife cultural resources roundtable.

(2) In order to fulfill the state's commitments to tribal cultural resources protection, the legislature recognizes that the state requires that a landowner must meet with a tribe upon the tribe's request and to incorporate into the application elements of protection that have been agreed upon between the landowner and the tribe.

(3) The legislature further recognizes that by incorporating the elements of the landowner and tribal agreement into the application, the state has enforcement authority over those conditions.

Sec. 2. RCW 76.09.010 and 2010 c 188 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature hereby finds and declares that the forest land resources are among the most valuable of all resources in the state; that a viable forest products industry is of prime importance to the state's economy; that it is in the public interest for public and private commercial forest lands to be managed consistent with sound policies of natural resource protection; that coincident with maintenance of a viable forest products industry, it is important to afford protection to forest soils, fisheries, wildlife, water quantity and quality, air quality, recreation, tribal cultural resources, and scenic beauty.

(2) The legislature further finds and declares it to be in the public interest of this state to create and maintain through the adoption of this chapter a comprehensive statewide system of laws and forest practices rules which will achieve the following purposes and policies:

(a) Afford protection to, promote, foster and encourage timber growth, and require such minimum reforestation of commercial tree species on forest lands as will reasonably utilize the timber growing capacity of the soil following current timber harvest;

(b) Afford protection to forest soils ((and)), public resources, and tribal cultural resources by utilizing all reasonable methods of technology in conducting forest practices;

(c) Recognize both the public and private interest in the profitable growing and harvesting of timber;

(d) Promote efficiency by permitting maximum operating freedom consistent with the other purposes and policies stated herein;

(e) Provide for regulation of forest practices so as to avoid unnecessary duplication in such rules;

(f) Provide for interagency input and intergovernmental and tribal coordination and cooperation;

(g) Achieve compliance with all applicable requirements of federal and state law with respect to nonpoint sources of water pollution from forest practices;

(h) To consider reasonable land use planning goals and concepts contained in local comprehensive plans and zoning regulations;

(i) Foster cooperation among managers of public resources, forest landowners, Indian tribes and the citizens of the state;

(j) Develop a watershed analysis system that addresses the cumulative effect of forest practices on, at a minimum, the public resources of fish, water, tribal cultural resources, and public capital improvements of the state and its political subdivisions; and

(k) Assist forest landowners in accessing market capital and financing for the ecosystem services provided to the public as a result of the protection of public resources.

(3) The legislature further finds and declares that it is also in the public interest of the state to encourage forest landowners to undertake corrective and remedial action to reduce the impact of mass earth movements and fluvial processes.

(4) The legislature further finds and declares that it is in the public interest that the applicants for state forest practices permits should assist in paying for the cost of review and permitting necessary for the environmental protection of these resources.

Sec. 3. RCW 76.09.020 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 1 s 212 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Adaptive management" means reliance on scientific methods to test the results of actions taken so that the management and related policy can be changed promptly and appropriately.

(2) "Appeals board" means the pollution control hearings board created by RCW 43.21B.010.

(3) "Application" means the application required pursuant to RCW 76.09.050.

(4) "Aquatic resources" includes water quality, salmon, other species of the vertebrate classes Cephalaspidomorphi and Osteichthyes identified in the forests and fish report, the Columbia torrent salamander (Rhyacotriton kezeri), the Cascade torrent salamander (Rhyacotriton cascadae), the Olympic torrent salamander (Rhyacotriton olympian), the Dunn's salamander (Plethodon dunni), the Van Dyke's salamander (Plethodon vandyke), the tailed frog (Ascaphus truei), and their respective habitats.

(5) "Board" means the forest practices board created in RCW 76.09.030.

(6) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.

(7) "Contiguous" means land adjoining or touching by common corner or otherwise. Land having common ownership divided by a road or other right-of-way shall be considered contiguous.

(8) "Conversion to a use other than commercial timber operation" means a bona fide conversion to an active use which is incompatible with timber growing and as may be defined by forest practices rules.

(9) "Date of receipt" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 43.21B.001.

(10) "Department" means the department of natural resources.

(11) "Ecosystem services" means the benefits that the public enjoys as a result of natural processes and biological diversity.

(12) "Ecosystem services market" means a system in which providers of ecosystem services can access financing or market capital to protect, restore, and maintain ecological values, including the full spectrum of regulatory, quasiregulatory, and voluntary markets.

(13) "Fill" means the placement of earth material or aggregate for road or landing construction or other similar activities.

(14) "Fish passage barrier" means any artificial instream structure that impedes the free passage of fish.

(15) "Forest land" means all land which is capable of supporting a merchantable stand of timber and is not being actively used for a use which is incompatible with timber growing. Forest land does not include agricultural land that is or was enrolled in the conservation reserve enhancement program by contract if such agricultural land was historically used for agricultural purposes and the landowner intends to continue to use the land for agricultural purposes in the future. As it applies to the operation of the road maintenance and abandonment plan element of the forest practices rules on small forest landowners, the term "forest land" excludes:

(a) Residential home sites, which may include up to five acres; and

(b) Cropfields, orchards, vineyards, pastures, feedlots, fish pens, and the land on which appurtenances necessary to the production, preparation, or sale of crops, fruit, dairy products, fish, and livestock exist.

(16) "Forest landowner" means any person in actual control of forest land, whether such control is based either on legal or equitable title, or on any other interest entitling the holder to sell or otherwise dispose of any or all of the timber on such land in any manner. However, any lessee or other person in possession of forest land without legal or equitable title to such land shall be excluded from the definition of "forest landowner" unless such lessee or other person has the right to sell or otherwise dispose of any or all of the timber located on such forest land.

(17) "Forest practice" means any activity conducted on or directly pertaining to forest land and relating to growing, harvesting, or processing timber, including but not limited to:

(a) Road and trail construction, including forest practices hydraulic projects that include water crossing structures, and associated activities and maintenance;

(b) Harvesting, final and intermediate;

(c) Precommercial thinning;

(d) Reforestation;

(e) Fertilization;

(f) Prevention and suppression of diseases and insects;

(g) Salvage of trees; and

(h) Brush control.

"Forest practice" shall not include preparatory work such as tree marking, surveying and road flagging, and removal or harvesting of incidental vegetation from forest lands such as berries, ferns, greenery, mistletoe, herbs, mushrooms, and other products which cannot normally be expected to result in damage to forest soils, timber, or public resources.

(18) "Forest practices hydraulic project" means a hydraulic project, as defined under RCW 77.55.011, that requires a forest practices application or notification under this chapter.

(19) "Forest practices rules" means any rules adopted pursuant to RCW 76.09.040.

(20) "Forest road," as it applies to the operation of the road maintenance and abandonment plan element of the forest practices rules on small forest landowners, means a road or road segment that crosses land that meets the definition of forest land, but excludes residential access roads.

(21) "Forest trees" does not include hardwood trees cultivated by agricultural methods in growing cycles shorter than fifteen years if the trees were planted on land that was not in forest use immediately before the trees were planted and before the land was prepared for planting the trees. "Forest trees" includes Christmas trees, but does not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods, as that term is defined in RCW 84.33.035.

(22) "Forests and fish report" means the forests and fish report to the board dated April 29, 1999.

(23) "Operator" means any person engaging in forest practices except an employee with wages as his or her sole compensation.

(24) "Person" means any individual, partnership, private, public, or municipal corporation, county, the department or other state or local governmental entity, or association of individuals of whatever nature.

(25) "Public resources" means water, fish and wildlife, and in addition shall mean capital improvements of the state or its political subdivisions.

(26) "Small forest landowner" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 76.09.450.

(27) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, of a commercial species, including Christmas trees. However, "timber" does not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods, as that term is defined in RCW 84.33.035.

(28) "Timber owner" means any person having all or any part of the legal interest in timber. Where such timber is subject to a contract of sale, "timber owner" shall mean the contract purchaser.

(29) "Tribal cultural resources" means the ancient and spiritual, present and future cultural materials, objects, or sites that are significant to and perpetuate the living culture and history of federally recognized tribes as identified by the tribe. Areas of tribal cultural resources may be identified to be areas of land that have been recorded by the department of archaeology and historic preservation as areas of high probability that an archaeological site is present.

(30) "Tribal cultural resources protection" means enforcement of elements of agreed upon plans resulting from the required tribal-landowner meetings under WAC 222-20-120(2). Those elements must be enforceable conditions of the forest practices act. When those conditions are violated, both the department and the department of archaeology and historic preservation may take enforcement actions and require remedies under corresponding state laws.

(31) "Unconfined channel migration zone" means the area within which the active channel of an unconfined stream is prone to move and where the movement would result in a potential near-term loss of riparian forest adjacent to the stream. Sizeable islands with productive timber may exist within the zone.

(((30))) (32) "Unconfined stream" means generally fifth order or larger waters that experience abrupt shifts in channel location, creating a complex floodplain characterized by extensive gravel bars, disturbance species of vegetation of variable age, numerous side channels, wall-based channels, oxbow lakes, and wetland complexes. Many of these streams have dikes and levees that may temporarily or permanently restrict channel movement.

--- END ---