BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 1.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any codified law or administrative law, including, but not limited to, any statute, ordinance, regulation, or rule, that is enacted, adopted, or otherwise established and made binding within the boundaries of the state of Washington that is irrelevant, outdated, overridden by more current law, in conflict with other provisions of law, or validly deemed unenforceable by a court of law with jurisdiction over any such laws may be submitted to the legislature for consideration of removal or repeal by both the house of representatives and the senate.

(2) Any such codified law or administrative law may be brought forth by a citizen of the state of Washington no less than sixty days prior to the beginning of any regular session requesting that the law be removed and repealed, and the law shall be placed upon a list that must be made available to all legislators for review during the interim. For each law submitted for removal and repeal the person submitting the law shall provide a detailed explanation describing in full why the specific law should be removed and repealed.

(3) The statute law committee, or the code reviser with the approval of the committee, shall make written recommendations to the legislature concerning any codified law or administrative law placed on the list, and shall, when requested by a legislator, prepare for submission to the legislature, legislation for removal or repeal of any of the codified laws or administrative laws on the list.

(4) All such proposed legislation shall be accompanied by an annotation so as to show the purposes, reasons, and history thereof.

--- END ---