BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.13.360 and 2013 c 205 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No later than December 30, ((2016)) 2019:

(a) In the demonstration sites selected under RCW 74.13.368(4)(a), child welfare services shall be provided by supervising agencies with whom the department has entered into performance-based contracts. Supervising agencies may enter into subcontracts with other licensed agencies; and

(b) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, and notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department may not directly provide child welfare services to families and children provided child welfare services by supervising agencies in the demonstration sites selected under RCW 74.13.368(4)(a).

(2) No later than December 30, ((2016)) 2019, for families and children provided child welfare services by supervising agencies in the demonstration sites selected under RCW 74.13.368(4)(a), the department is responsible for only the following:

(a) Monitoring the quality of services for which the department contracts under this chapter;

(b) Ensuring that the services are provided in accordance with federal law and the laws of this state, including the Indian child welfare act;

(c) Providing child protection functions and services, including intake and investigation of allegations of child abuse or neglect, emergency shelter care functions under RCW 13.34.050, and referrals to appropriate providers; and

(d) Issuing licenses pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.

(3) No later than December 30, ((2016)) 2019, for families and children provided child welfare services by supervising agencies in the demonstration sites selected under RCW 74.13.368(4)(a), the department may provide child welfare services only:

(a) For the limited purpose of establishing a control or comparison group as deemed necessary by the child welfare transformation design committee, with input from the Washington state institute for public policy, to implement the demonstration sites selected and defined pursuant to RCW 74.13.368(4)(a) in which the performance in achieving measurable outcomes will be compared and evaluated pursuant to RCW 74.13.370; or

(b) In an emergency or as a provider of last resort. The department shall adopt rules describing the circumstances under which the department may provide those services. For purposes of this section, "provider of last resort" means the department is unable to contract with a private agency to provide child welfare services in a particular geographic area or, after entering into a contract with a private agency, either the contractor or the department terminates the contract.

(4) For purposes of this chapter, on and after September 1, 2010, performance-based contracts shall be structured to hold the supervising agencies accountable for achieving the following goals in order of importance: Child safety; child permanency, including reunification; and child well-being.

(5) A federally recognized tribe located in this state may enter into a performance-based contract with the department to provide child welfare services to Indian children whether or not they reside on a reservation. Nothing in this section prohibits a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this state from providing child welfare services to its members or other Indian children pursuant to existing tribal law, regulation, or custom, or from directly entering into agreements for the provision of such services with the department, if the department continues to otherwise provide such services, or with federal agencies.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.13.370 and 2012 c 205 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Based upon the recommendations of the child welfare transformation design committee, including the two sets of outcomes developed by the committee under RCW 74.13.368(4)(b), the Washington state institute for public policy is to conduct a review of measurable effects achieved by the supervising agencies and compare those measurable effects with the existing services offered by the state. The report on the measurable effects shall be provided to the governor and the legislature no later than April 1, 2018.

(2) No later than December 1, 2014, the Washington state institute for public policy shall provide the legislature and the governor an initial report on the department's conversion to the use of performance-based contracts as provided in RCW 74.13B.020 and 74.13B.030. No later than ((June 30, 2016)) April 1, 2023, the Washington state institute for public policy shall provide the governor and the legislature with a second report on the extent to which the use of performance-based contracting has resulted in:

(a) Increased use of evidence-based, research-based, and promising practices; and

(b) Improvements in outcomes for children, including child safety, child permanency, including reunification, and child well-being.

(3) The department and network administrators shall respond to the Washington institute for public policy's request for data and other information with which to complete these reports in a timely manner.

(4) The Washington state institute for public policy must consult with a university-based child welfare research entity to evaluate performance-based contracting.

Sec. 3. RCW 74.13.372 and 2012 c 205 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Not later than June 1, ((2018)) 2023, the governor shall, based on the report by the Washington state institute for public policy, determine whether to expand chapter 520, Laws of 2009 to the remainder of the state or terminate chapter 520, Laws of 2009. The governor shall inform the legislature of his or her decision within seven days of the decision. The department shall, regardless of the decision of the governor regarding the delivery of child welfare services, continue to purchase services through the use of performance-based contracts.

--- END ---