BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.335 RCW to read as follows:

(1) After January 1, 2017, every school district board of directors must annually arrange for the inspection of all retractable basketball hoops owned by the school district according to the manufacturer's specifications and pursuant to rules adopted by the department of labor and industries under section 2 of this act.

(2) All inspections must be documented and are subject to enforcement by the department of labor and industries under chapter 49.17 RCW.

(3) Nothing in this section requires the department of labor and industries to conduct inspections of retractable basketball hoops.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By January 1, 2017, the department must establish rules adopting safety and health standards for the hardware associated with the operation of retractable basketball hoops including, but not limited to, cables, braces, safety straps, clamps, motors, winches, and hoist mechanisms. The rules may reference, incorporate, or apply current rules adopted by the department under this chapter.

(2) The department may require any necessary reports and carry out inspections to enforce the rules adopted under this section.

--- END ---