BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 79A.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When applying for funds for the acquisition of property owned by a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation or association, a state agency must include in its application a copy of the real estate excise tax affidavit associated with the nonprofit nature conservancy corporation or association's acquisition of the property, if an affidavit was required under chapter 82.45 RCW.

(2) When property is acquired by a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation or association after a state agency has submitted an application, the state agency must provide the board with a copy of the real estate excise tax affidavit associated with the nonprofit nature conservancy corporation or association's acquisition of the property, if an affidavit was required under chapter 82.45 RCW, as soon as is reasonably possible after the nonprofit nature conservancy corporation or association acquires the property.

(3) The board must maintain real estate excise tax affidavits submitted under this section, and make the affidavits available on the internet in the same manner as other project documents.

--- END ---