BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that Asian rice-based noodles and Korean rice cakes are cultural foods that possess different time-temperature safety standards from other foods sold for human consumption. The legislature finds that Asian rice-based noodles kept at room temperature are safe for consumption within four hours of the time that the product first comes out of hot holding at temperatures at or above one hundred thirty-five degrees, or when the product has a pH of 4.6 or below, a water activity of 0.85 or below, or has been determined by the department to not be a potentially hazardous food based on formulation and supporting laboratory documentation submitted to the department of health by the manufacturer. Further, the legislature finds that Korean rice cakes are safe for consumption within one day of manufacture.

(2)(a) This act is intended to direct the state board of health to consider new standards for time-temperature requirements of Asian rice-based noodles and Korean rice cakes intended for human consumption. Further, this act is intended to direct the state board of health to consider laws enacted by other states regarding standards for time-temperature and manufacturer package labeling requirements of Asian rice-based noodles and Korean rice cakes.

(b) The legislature does not intend to create a private right of action or claim on the part of any individual, entity, or agency against the state board of health, any contractor of the state board of health, or the department of health.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.20.145 and 2003 c 65 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state board shall consider the most recent version of the United States food and drug administration's food code for the purpose of adopting rules for food service.

(2)(a) In considering the adoption of rules for food service, the state board shall consider scientific data regarding time-temperature safety standards for Asian rice-based noodles and Korean rice cakes.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection (2):

(i) "Asian rice-based noodles" means a rice-based pasta that contains rice powder, water, wheat starch, vegetable cooking oil, and optional ingredients to modify the pH or water activity, or to provide a preservative effect. The ingredients do not include products derived from animals. The rice-based pasta is prepared by using a traditional method that includes cooking by steaming at not less than one hundred thirty degrees Fahrenheit, for not less than four minutes.

(ii) "Korean rice cake" means a confection that contains rice powder, salt, sugar, various edible seeds, oil, dried beans, nuts, dried fruits, and dried pumpkin. The ingredients do not include products derived from animals. The confection is prepared by using a traditional method that includes cooking by steaming at not less than two hundred seventy-five degrees Fahrenheit, for not less than five minutes, nor more than fifteen minutes.

--- END ---