BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.15.370 and 2014 c 48 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of unlawful recreational fishing in the first degree if:

(a) The person takes or possesses two times or more than the bag limit or possession limit of fish or shellfish allowed by any rule of the director or commission setting the amount of food fish, game fish, or shellfish that can be taken or possessed for noncommercial use;

(b) The person fishes in a fishway;

(c) The person shoots, gaffs, snags, snares, spears, dipnets, or stones fish or shellfish in state waters, or possesses fish or shellfish taken by such means, unless such means are authorized by express department rule;

(d) The person fishes for or possesses a fish listed as threatened or endangered in 50 C.F.R. Sec. 223.102 (2006) or Sec. 224.101 (2010), unless fishing for or possessing such fish is specifically allowed under federal or state law;

(e) The person possesses a white sturgeon measuring in excess of the maximum size limit as established by rules adopted by the department;

(f) The person possesses a green sturgeon of any size; or

(g)(i) The person possesses a wild salmon or wild steelhead during a season closed for wild salmon or wild steelhead.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection:

(A) "Wild salmon" means a salmon with an unclipped adipose fin, regardless of whether the salmon's ventral fin is clipped. A salmon is considered to have an unclipped adipose fin if it does not have a healed scar at the location of the clipped adipose fin.

(B) "Wild steelhead" means a steelhead with no fins clipped.

(2) Unlawful recreational fishing in the first degree is a gross misdemeanor.

(3) In addition to the penalties set forth in subsection (2) of this section, if a person is convicted of violating this section and the violation results in the death of fish listed in this subsection, the court shall require payment of the following amounts for each fish taken or possessed. This is a criminal wildlife penalty assessment that must be paid to the clerk of the court and distributed each month to the state treasurer for deposit in the fish and wildlife enforcement reward account created in RCW 77.15.425:

(a) White sturgeon longer than fifty-five inches in fork length, two thousand dollars;

(b) Green sturgeon, two thousand dollars; and

(c) Wild salmon or wild steelhead, five hundred dollars.

(4) If two or more persons are convicted under subsection (1) of this section, and subsection (3) of this section is applicable, the criminal wildlife penalty assessment must be imposed against the persons jointly and severally.

(5)(a) The criminal wildlife penalty assessment under subsection (3) of this section must be imposed regardless of and in addition to any sentence, fines, or costs otherwise provided for violating any provision of this section. The criminal wildlife penalty assessment must be included by the court in any pronouncement of sentence and may not be suspended, waived, modified, or deferred in any respect.

(b) This subsection may not be construed to abridge or alter alternative rights of action or remedies in equity or under common law or statutory law, criminal or civil.

(6) A defaulted criminal wildlife penalty assessment authorized under subsection (3) of this section may be collected by any means authorized by law for the enforcement of orders of the court or collection of a fine or costs, including but not limited to vacation of a deferral of sentencing or vacation of a suspension of sentence.

(7) The department shall revoke the fishing license and suspend the fishing privileges of a person assessed a criminal wildlife penalty assessment under this section until the penalty assessment is paid through the registry of the court in which the penalty assessment was assessed.

(8) The criminal wildlife penalty assessments provided in subsection (3) of this section must be doubled in the following instances:

(a) When a person commits a violation that requires payment of a criminal wildlife penalty assessment within five years of a prior gross misdemeanor or felony conviction under this title; or

(b) When the trier of fact determines that the person took or possessed the fish in question with the intent of bartering, selling, or otherwise deriving economic profit from the fish or fish parts.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.15.400 and 2012 c 176 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of wild birds in the second degree if the person hunts for wild birds and, whether or not the person possesses wild birds, the person has not purchased the appropriate hunting license, tags, stamps, and permits issued to Washington residents or nonresidents under chapter 77.32 RCW.

(2) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of wild birds in the second degree if the person takes or possesses less than two times the bag or possession limit of wild birds and the person:

(a) Owns, but does not have in the person's possession, all licenses, tags, stamps, and permits required under this title; or

(b) Violates any department rule regarding seasons, bag or possession limits, closed areas, closed times, or the manner or method of hunting or possession of wild birds.

(3) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of wild birds in the first degree if the person takes or possesses two times or more than the possession or bag limit for wild birds allowed by department rule.

(4)(a) Unlawful hunting of wild birds in the second degree is a misdemeanor.

(b) Unlawful hunting of wild birds in the first degree is a gross misdemeanor.

(5) In addition to the penalties set forth in this section, if a person, other than a youth as defined in RCW 77.08.010 for hunting purposes, violates a department rule that requires the use of nontoxic shot, upon conviction:

(a) The court shall require a payment of one thousand dollars as a criminal wildlife penalty assessment that must be paid to the clerk of the court and distributed to the state treasurer for deposit in the fish and wildlife enforcement reward account created in RCW 77.15.425. The criminal wildlife penalty assessment must be imposed regardless of and in addition to any sentence, fine, or costs imposed for violating this section. The criminal wildlife penalty assessment must be included by the court in any pronouncement of sentence and may not be suspended, waived, modified, or deferred in any respect; and

(b) The department shall revoke the hunting license of the person and order a suspension of small game hunting privileges for two years.

Sec. 3. RCW 77.15.420 and 2015 c 265 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If an adult offender is convicted of violating RCW 77.15.410 and that violation results in the death of wildlife listed in this section, the court shall require payment of the following amounts for each animal taken or possessed. This shall be a criminal wildlife penalty assessment that shall be paid to the clerk of the court and distributed each month to the state treasurer for deposit in the fish and wildlife enforcement reward account created in RCW 77.15.425.

(a)

Moose, mountain sheep, mountain goat, and all wildlife species classified as endangered by rule of the commission, except for mountain caribou and grizzly bear as listed under (d) of this subsection. . . .

$4,000

(b)

Elk, deer, black bear, and cougar. . . .

$2,000

(c)

Trophy animal elk and deer. . . .

$6,000

(d)

Mountain caribou, grizzly bear, and trophy animal mountain

sheep. . . .

$12,000

(2)(a) For the purpose of this section a "trophy animal" is:

(i) A buck deer with four or more antler points on both sides, not including eyeguards;

(ii) A bull elk with five or more antler points on both sides, not including eyeguards; or

(iii) A mountain sheep with a horn curl of three-quarter curl or greater.

(b) For purposes of this subsection, "eyeguard" means an antler protrusion on the main beam of the antler closest to the eye of the animal.

(3) If two or more persons are convicted of illegally possessing wildlife in subsection (1) of this section, the criminal wildlife penalty assessment shall be imposed on them jointly and severally.

(4) The criminal wildlife penalty assessment shall be imposed regardless of and in addition to any sentence, fines, or costs otherwise provided for violating any provision of this title. The criminal wildlife penalty assessment shall be included by the court in any pronouncement of sentence and may not be suspended, waived, modified, or deferred in any respect. This section may not be construed to abridge or alter alternative rights of action or remedies in equity or under common law or statutory law, criminal or civil.

(5) A defaulted criminal wildlife penalty assessment may be collected by any means authorized by law for the enforcement of orders of the court or collection of a fine or costs, including but not limited to vacation of a deferral of sentencing or vacation of a suspension of sentence.

(6) A person assessed a criminal wildlife penalty assessment under this section shall have his or her hunting license revoked and all hunting privileges suspended until the penalty assessment is paid through the registry of the court in which the penalty assessment was assessed. This revocation and suspension is in addition to and runs concurrently with any revocation and suspension required by law.

(7) The criminal wildlife penalty assessments provided in subsection (1) of this section shall be doubled in the following instances:

(a) When a person is convicted of spotlighting big game under RCW 77.15.450;

(b) When a person commits a violation that requires payment of a wildlife penalty assessment within five years of a prior gross misdemeanor or felony conviction under this title;

(c) When the trier of fact determines that the person took or possessed the animal in question with the intent of bartering, selling, or otherwise deriving economic profit from the animal or the animal's parts; or

(d) When the trier of fact determines that the person took the animal under the supervision of a licensed guide.

--- END ---