BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 88.40.011 and 2015 c 274 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Barge" means a vessel that is not self-propelled.

(2) "Bulk" means material that is stored or transported in a loose, unpackaged liquid, powder, or granular form capable of being conveyed by a pipe, bucket, chute, or belt system.

(3) "Cargo vessel" means a self-propelled ship in commerce, other than a tank vessel, fishing vessel, or a passenger vessel, of three hundred or more gross tons.

(4) "Covered vessel" means a tank vessel, cargo vessel, or passenger vessel.

(5) "Department" means the department of ecology.

(6) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.

(7)(a) "Facility" means any structure, group of structures, equipment, pipeline, or device, other than a vessel, located on or near the navigable waters of the state that transfers oil in bulk to or from any vessel with an oil carrying capacity over two hundred fifty barrels or pipeline, that is used for producing, storing, handling, transferring, processing, or transporting oil in bulk.

(b) A facility does not include any: (i) ((Railroad car,)) Motor vehicle((, or other rolling stock)) while transporting oil over the highways ((or rail lines)) of this state; (ii) retail motor vehicle motor fuel outlet; (iii) facility that is operated as part of an exempt agricultural activity as provided in RCW 82.04.330; (iv) underground storage tank regulated by the department or a local government under chapter 90.76 RCW; or (v) marine fuel outlet that does not dispense more than three thousand gallons of fuel to a ship that is not a covered vessel, in a single transaction.

(c) For the purposes of oil spill contingency planning in RCW 90.56.210 and financial responsibility in RCW 88.40.025, facility also means a railroad that transports oil as bulk cargo.

(8) "Fishing vessel" means a self-propelled commercial vessel of three hundred or more gross tons that is used for catching or processing fish.

(9) "Gross tons" means tonnage as determined by the United States coast guard under 33 C.F.R. section 138.30.

(10) "Hazardous substances" means any substance listed as of March 1, 2003, in Table 302.4 of 40 C.F.R. Part 302 adopted under section 102(a) of the federal comprehensive environmental response, compensation, and liability act of 1980, as amended by P.L. 99-499. The following are not hazardous substances for purposes of this chapter:

(a) Wastes listed as F001 through F028 in Table 302.4; and

(b) Wastes listed as K001 through K136 in Table 302.4.

(11) "Navigable waters of the state" means those waters of the state, and their adjoining shorelines, that are subject to the ebb and flow of the tide and/or are presently used, have been used in the past, or may be susceptible for use to transport intrastate, interstate, or foreign commerce.

(12) "Offshore facility" means any facility located in, on, or under any of the navigable waters of the state, but does not include a facility any part of which is located in, on, or under any land of the state, other than submerged land.

(13) "Oil" or "oils" means oil of any kind that is liquid at twenty-five degrees Celsius and one atmosphere of pressure and any fractionation thereof, including, but not limited to, crude oil, bitumen, synthetic crude oil, natural gas well condensate, petroleum, gasoline, fuel oil, diesel oil, biological oils and blends, oil sludge, oil refuse, and oil mixed with wastes other than dredged spoil. Oil does not include any substance listed as of March 1, 2003, in Table 302.4 of 40 C.F.R. Part 302 adopted under section 102(a) of the federal comprehensive environmental response, compensation, and liability act of 1980, as amended by P.L. 99-499.

(14) "Onshore facility" means any facility any part of which is located in, on, or under any land of the state, other than submerged land, that because of its location, could reasonably be expected to cause substantial harm to the environment by discharging oil into or on the navigable waters of the state or the adjoining shorelines.

(15)(a) "Owner or operator" means (i) in the case of a vessel, any person owning, operating, or chartering by demise, the vessel; (ii) in the case of an onshore or offshore facility, any person owning or operating the facility; and (iii) in the case of an abandoned vessel or onshore or offshore facility, the person who owned or operated the vessel or facility immediately before its abandonment.

(b) "Operator" does not include any person who owns the land underlying a facility if the person is not involved in the operations of the facility.

(16) "Passenger vessel" means a ship of three hundred or more gross tons with a fuel capacity of at least six thousand gallons carrying passengers for compensation.

(17) "Ship" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or other floating craft of any kind.

(18) "Spill" means an unauthorized discharge of oil into the waters of the state.

(19) "Tank vessel" means a ship that is constructed or adapted to carry, or that carries, oil in bulk as cargo or cargo residue, and that:

(a) Operates on the waters of the state; or

(b) Transfers oil in a port or place subject to the jurisdiction of this state.

(20) "Waters of the state" includes lakes, rivers, ponds, streams, inland waters, underground water, salt waters, estuaries, tidal flats, beaches and lands adjoining the seacoast of the state, sewers, and all other surface waters and watercourses within the jurisdiction of the state of Washington.

(21) "Certificate of financial responsibility" means an official written acknowledgment issued by the director or the director's designee that an owner or operator of a covered vessel or facility, or the owner of the oil, has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the director or the director's designee that the relevant entity has the financial ability to pay for costs and damages caused by an oil spill.

Sec. 2. RCW 88.40.020 and 2003 c 91 s 3 and 2003 c 56 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Any barge that transports hazardous substances in bulk as cargo, using any port or place in the state of Washington or the navigable waters of the state shall establish evidence of financial responsibility in the amount of the greater of five million dollars, or three hundred dollars per gross ton of such vessel.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) or (c) of this subsection, a tank vessel that carries oil as cargo in bulk shall demonstrate financial responsibility to pay at least five hundred million dollars. The amount of financial responsibility required under this subsection is one billion dollars after January 1, 2004.

(b) The director by rule may establish a lesser standard of financial responsibility for tank vessels of three hundred gross tons or less. The standard shall set the level of financial responsibility based on the quantity of cargo the tank vessel is capable of carrying. The director shall not set the standard for tank vessels of three hundred gross tons or less below that required under federal law.

(c) The owner or operator of a tank vessel who is a member of an international protection and indemnity mutual organization and is covered for oil pollution risks up to the amounts required under this section is not required to demonstrate financial responsibility under this chapter. The director may require the owner or operator of a tank vessel to prove membership in such an organization.

(3)(a) A cargo vessel or passenger vessel that carries oil as fuel shall demonstrate financial responsibility to pay at least three hundred million dollars. However, a passenger vessel that transports passengers and vehicles between Washington state and a foreign country shall demonstrate financial responsibility to pay the greater of at least six hundred dollars per gross ton or five hundred thousand dollars.

(b) The owner or operator of a cargo vessel or passenger vessel who is a member of an international protection and indemnity mutual organization and is covered for oil pollution risks up to the amounts required under this section is not required to demonstrate financial responsibility under this chapter. The director may require the owner or operator of a cargo vessel or passenger vessel to prove membership in such an organization.

(4) A fishing vessel while on the navigable waters of the state must demonstrate financial responsibility in the following amounts: (a) For a fishing vessel carrying predominantly nonpersistent product, one hundred thirty-three dollars and forty cents per incident, for each barrel of total oil storage capacity, persistent and nonpersistent product, on the vessel or one million three hundred thirty-four thousand dollars, whichever is greater; or (b) for a fishing vessel carrying predominantly persistent product, four hundred dollars and twenty cents per incident, for each barrel of total oil storage capacity, persistent product and nonpersistent product, on the vessel or six million six hundred seventy thousand dollars, whichever is greater.

(5) The ((documentation of financial responsibility shall demonstrate the ability of the document holder to meet state and federal financial liability requirements for the actual costs for removal of oil spills, for natural resource damages, and for necessary expenses)) certificate of financial responsibility is conclusive evidence that the person or entity holding the certificate is the party responsible for the specified vessel, facility, or oil for purposes of determining liability pursuant to this chapter.

(6) This section shall not apply to a covered vessel owned or operated by the federal government or by a state or local government.

Sec. 3. RCW 88.40.025 and 1991 c 200 s 704 are each amended to read as follows:

An onshore or offshore facility shall demonstrate financial responsibility in an amount determined by the department as necessary to compensate the state and affected counties and cities for damages that might occur during a reasonable worst case spill of oil from that facility into the navigable waters of the state. The department shall ((consider such matters as the amount of oil that could be spilled into the navigable waters from the facility, the cost of cleaning up the spilled oil, the frequency of operations at the facility, the damages that could result from the spill and the commercial availability and affordability of financial responsibility)) adopt by rule an amount that will be calculated by multiplying the reasonable per barrel cleanup and damage cost of spilled oil, times the worst case spill volume, as measured in barrels, calculated in the applicant's oil spill contingency plan. This section shall not apply to an onshore or offshore facility owned or operated by the federal government or by the state or local government.

Sec. 4. RCW 88.40.030 and 2000 c 69 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Financial responsibility required by this chapter may be established by any one of, or a combination of, the following methods acceptable to the department of ecology: (((1))) (a) Evidence of insurance; (((2))) (b) surety bonds; (((3))) (c) qualification as a self-insurer; ((or (4))) (d) guaranty; (e) letter of credit; (f) certificate of deposits; (g) protection and indemnity club membership; or (h) other evidence of financial responsibility. Any bond filed shall be issued by a bonding company authorized to do business in the United States. Documentation of such financial responsibility shall be kept on any covered vessel and filed with the department at least twenty-four hours before entry of the vessel into the navigable waters of the state. A covered vessel is not required to file documentation of financial responsibility twenty-four hours before entry of the vessel into the navigable waters of the state, if the vessel has filed documentation of financial responsibility with the federal government, and the level of financial responsibility required by the federal government is the same as or exceeds state requirements. The owner or operator of the vessel may file with the department a certificate evidencing compliance with the requirements of another state's or federal financial responsibility requirements if the state or federal government requires a level of financial responsibility the same as or greater than that required under this chapter.

(2) A certificate of financial responsibility may not have a term greater than one year.

Sec. 5. RCW 88.40.040 and 2003 c 56 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any vessel or facility required to have financial responsibility under this chapter to enter or operate ((on)) in Washington ((waters)) without meeting the requirements of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, except when necessary to avoid injury to the vessel's or facility's crew or passengers. Any vessel owner or operator that does not meet the financial responsibility requirements of this chapter and any rules prescribed thereunder or the federal oil pollution act of 1990 shall be reported by the department to the United States coast guard.

(2) ((The department shall enforce section 1016 of the federal oil pollution act of 1990 as authorized by section 1019 of the federal act.)) Upon notification of an oil spill or discharge or other action or potential liability, the director shall reevaluate the validity of the certificate of financial responsibility. If the director determines that, because of a spill outside of the state or some other action or potential liability, the holder of a certificate may not have the financial resources to pay damages for the oil spill or discharge or other action or potential liability and have resources remaining available to meet the requirements of this chapter, the director may suspend or revoke the certificate.

(3) An owner or operator of either more than one covered vessel or facility, or both is only required to obtain one certificate of financial responsibility for each vessel and facility owned or operated.

(4) If a person holds a certificate for more than one covered vessel or facility and a spill or spills occurs from one or more of those vessels or facilities for which the owner or operator may be liable for damages in an amount exceeding five percent of the financial resources reflected by the certificate, as determined by the director, the certificate is immediately considered inapplicable to any vessel or facility not associated with the spill. In that event, the owner or operator shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the director the amount of financial ability required pursuant to this chapter, as well as the financial ability to pay all damages that arise or have arisen from the spill or spills that have occurred.

Sec. 6. RCW 88.16.190 and 1994 c 52 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Any oil tanker, whether enrolled or registered, of greater than one hundred and twenty-five thousand deadweight tons shall be prohibited from proceeding beyond a point east of a line extending from Discovery Island light south to New Dungeness light.

(2) An oil tanker, whether enrolled or registered, of forty to one hundred and twenty-five thousand deadweight tons may proceed beyond the points enumerated in subsection (1) if such tanker possesses all of the following standard safety features:

(a) Shaft horsepower in the ratio of one horsepower to each two and one-half deadweight tons; and

(b) Twin screws; and

(c) Double bottoms, underneath all oil and liquid cargo compartments; and

(d) Two radars in working order and operating, one of which must be collision avoidance radar; and

(e) Such other navigational position location systems as may be prescribed from time to time by the board of pilotage commissioners:

PROVIDED, That, if such forty to one hundred and twenty-five thousand deadweight ton tanker is in ballast or is under escort of a tug or tugs with an aggregate shaft horsepower equivalent to five percent of the deadweight tons of that tanker, subsection (2) of this section shall not apply: PROVIDED FURTHER, That additional tug shaft horsepower equivalencies may be required under certain conditions as established by rule and regulation of the Washington utilities and transportation commission pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an oil tanker of greater than forty thousand deadweight tons may operate in the waters east of a line extending from Discovery Island light south to New Dungeness light and all points in the Puget Sound area, to the extent that these waters are within the territorial boundaries of Washington, only if the oil tanker is under the escort of a tug or tugs in compliance with the requirements of subsection (3) of this section.

(b) The state board of pilotage commissioners, in consultation with the department of ecology and relying on the results of vessel traffic risk assessments, shall adopt rules by November 1, 2017, to implement this subsection (1)(b). These rules may include tug escort requirements and other safety measures for oil tankers of greater than forty thousand deadweight tons, all articulated tug barges, and other towed waterborne vessels or barges. The geographic scope of the rules must be limited to the narrow channels of the San Juan Islands archipelago, including Rosario Strait, Haro Strait, Boundary Pass, and connected waterways. By November 1, 2018, the state board of pilotage commissioners must adopt tug escort requirements and other safety measures for the remaining areas of Puget Sound.

(c) In order to adopt a rule under this section, the state board of pilotage commissioners must determine that the results of a vessel traffic risk assessment provides evidence that the rules are necessary in order to achieve best achievable protection as defined in RCW 88.46.010.

(d) The state board of pilotage commissioners must consult with the United States coast guard, Puget Sound safety committee, tribes, ports, local governments, and other appropriate entities before adopting tug escort requirements and other safety measures for Puget Sound.

(2)(a) If an oil tanker, articulated tug barge, or other towed waterborne vessel or barge is in ballast, the tug escort requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section and any tug escort rules adopted pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section do not apply.

(b) If an oil tanker is a single-hulled oil tanker of greater than five thousand gross tons, the requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section do not apply and the oil tanker must instead comply with 33 C.F.R. Part 168, as it existed as of the effective date of this section.

(3)(a) Oil tankers of greater than forty thousand deadweight tons, all articulated tug barges, and other towed waterborne vessels or barges must ensure that any escort tugs they use have an aggregate shaft horsepower equivalent to at least five percent of the deadweight tons of the escorted oil tanker or articulated tug barge.

(b) The state board of pilotage commissioners may adopt rules to ensure that escort tugs have sufficient mechanical capabilities to provide for safe escort.

(c) Rules adopted on this subject must be designed to achieve best achievable protection as defined in RCW 88.46.010.

(4) A tanker assigned a deadweight of equal to or less than forty thousand deadweight tons at the time of construction or reconstruction as reported in Lloyd's Register of Ships is not subject to the provisions of RCW 88.16.170 through 88.16.190.

(5) The provisions adopted under this section may not include rules affecting pilotage. This section does not affect any existing authority to establish pilotage requirements.

(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Articulated tug barge" means a tank barge and a towing vessel joined by hinged or articulated fixed mechanical equipment affixed or connecting to the stern of the tank barge.

(b) "Oil tanker" means a self-propelled deep draft tank vessel designed to transport oil in bulk. "Oil tanker" does not include an articulated tug barge tank vessel.

(c) "Waterborne vessel or barge" means any ship, barge, or other watercraft capable of traveling on the navigable waters of this state and capable of transporting any crude oil or petroleum product in quantities of ten thousand gallons or more for purposes other than providing fuel for its motor or engine.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 90.56 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall evaluate and update planning standards for oil spill response equipment required under contingency plans required by this chapter in order to ensure access in the state to equipment that represents the best achievable protection to respond to a worst case spill and provide for continuous operation of oil spill response activities to the maximum extent practicable and without jeopardizing crew safety, as determined by the incident commander or the unified command.

(2) The department shall place the earliest priority upon updating standards that address the increased volume of different types of crude oil and that address a worst case spill from articulated tug barges and from other towed waterborne vessels or barges.

Sec. 8. RCW 90.56.370 and 2011 c 122 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person owning oil or having control over oil that enters the waters of the state in violation of RCW 90.56.320 shall be strictly liable, without regard to fault, for the damages to persons or property, public or private, caused by such entry.

(2) Damages for which responsible parties are liable under this section include loss of income, net revenue, the loss of means of producing income or revenue directly or indirectly attributable to oil entering waters of the state, lost real property when it is demonstrated to be a direct result of an oil spill, or an economic benefit resulting from an injury to or loss of real or personal property or natural resources.

(3) Damages for which responsible parties are liable under this section include damages provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section resulting from: (a) The use and deployment of chemical dispersants or from in situ burning in response to a violation of RCW 90.56.320; (b) any action conducted in response to a violation of RCW 90.56.320, including actions to collect, investigate, perform surveillance over, remove, contain, treat, or disperse oil discharged into waters of the state.

(4) In any action to recover damages resulting from the discharge of oil in violation of RCW 90.56.320, the owner or person having control over the oil shall be relieved from strict liability, without regard to fault, if that person can prove that the discharge was caused solely by:

(a) An act of war or sabotage;

(b) An act of God;

(c) Negligence on the part of the United States government; or

(d) Negligence on the part of the state of Washington.

(5) The liability established in this section shall in no way affect the rights which: (a) The owner or other person having control over the oil may have against any person whose acts may in any way have caused or contributed to the discharge of oil, or (b) the state of Washington may have against any person whose actions may have caused or contributed to the discharge of oil.

Sec. 9. RCW 82.23B.020 and 2015 c 274 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An oil spill response tax is imposed on the privilege of receiving: (a) Crude oil or petroleum products at a marine terminal within this state from a waterborne vessel or barge operating on the navigable waters of this state; or (b) crude oil or petroleum products at a bulk oil terminal within this state from a tank car. The tax imposed in this section is levied upon the owner of the crude oil or petroleum products immediately after receipt of the same into the storage tanks of a marine or bulk oil terminal from a tank car or waterborne vessel or barge at the rate of one cent per barrel of crude oil or petroleum product received.

(2) In addition to the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this section, an oil spill administration tax is imposed on the privilege of receiving: (a) Crude oil or petroleum products at a marine terminal within this state from a waterborne vessel or barge operating on the navigable waters of this state; or (b) crude oil or petroleum products at a bulk oil terminal within this state from a tank car. The tax imposed in this section is levied upon the owner of the crude oil or petroleum products immediately after receipt of the same into the storage tanks of a marine or bulk oil terminal from a tank car or waterborne vessel or barge at the rate of four cents per barrel of crude oil or petroleum product.

(3) In addition to the tax imposed in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, an additional oil response tax is imposed on the privilege of receiving crude oil at a marine or bulk oil terminal within this state from a vessel, barge, rail tank car, or pipeline. The tax imposed in this subsection (3) is levied upon the owner of the crude oil or petroleum products immediately after receipt of the same into the storage tanks of a marine or bulk oil terminal at the rate of one dollar per barrel of crude oil. Credit must be allowed against the taxes imposed under this subsection for any crude oil that is subsequently refined within this state.

(4) The taxes imposed by this chapter must be collected by the marine or bulk oil terminal operator from the taxpayer. If any person charged with collecting the taxes fails to bill the taxpayer for the taxes, or in the alternative has not notified the taxpayer in writing of the taxes imposed, or having collected the taxes, fails to pay them to the department in the manner prescribed by this chapter, whether such failure is the result of the person's own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond the person's control, he or she, nevertheless, is personally liable to the state for the amount of the taxes. Payment of the taxes by the owner to a marine or bulk oil terminal operator relieves the owner from further liability for the taxes.

(((4))) (5) Taxes collected under this chapter must be held in trust until paid to the department. Any person collecting the taxes who appropriates or converts the taxes collected is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the money required to be collected is not available for payment on the date payment is due. The taxes required by this chapter to be collected must be stated separately from other charges made by the marine or bulk oil terminal operator in any invoice or other statement of account provided to the taxpayer.

(((5))) (6) If a taxpayer fails to pay the taxes imposed by this chapter to the person charged with collection of the taxes and the person charged with collection fails to pay the taxes to the department, the department may, in its discretion, proceed directly against the taxpayer for collection of the taxes.

(((6))) (7) The taxes are due from the marine or bulk oil terminal operator, along with reports and returns on forms prescribed by the department, within twenty-five days after the end of the month in which the taxable activity occurs.

(((7))) (8) The amount of taxes, until paid by the taxpayer to the marine or bulk oil terminal operator or to the department, constitutes a debt from the taxpayer to the marine or bulk oil terminal operator. Any person required to collect the taxes under this chapter who, with intent to violate the provisions of this chapter, fails or refuses to do so as required and any taxpayer who refuses to pay any taxes due under this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(((8))) (9) Upon prior approval of the department, the taxpayer may pay the taxes imposed by this chapter directly to the department. The department must give its approval for direct payment under this section whenever it appears, in the department's judgment, that direct payment will enhance the administration of the taxes imposed under this chapter. The department must provide by rule for the issuance of a direct payment certificate to any taxpayer qualifying for direct payment of the taxes. Good faith acceptance of a direct payment certificate by a terminal operator relieves the marine or bulk oil terminal operator from any liability for the collection or payment of the taxes imposed under this chapter.

(((9))) (10) All receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this section must be deposited into the state oil spill response account, RCW 90.56.500. All receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (2) of this section shall be deposited into the oil spill prevention account, RCW 90.56.510. All receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (3) of this section must be deposited as follows:

(a) Fifty percent of the receipts must be deposited into the state oil spill response account, RCW 90.56.500; and

(b) Fifty percent of the receipts must be deposited into the oil refinery worker assistance account created in section 10 of this act.

(((10))) (11) Within forty-five days after the end of each calendar quarter, the office of financial management must determine the balance of the oil spill response account as of the last day of that calendar quarter. Balance determinations by the office of financial management under this section are final and may not be used to challenge the validity of any tax imposed under this chapter. The office of financial management must promptly notify the departments of revenue and ecology of the account balance once a determination is made. For each subsequent calendar quarter, the tax imposed by subsection (1) of this section shall be imposed during the entire calendar quarter unless:

(a) Tax was imposed under subsection (1) of this section during the immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent quarterly balance is more than nine million dollars; or

(b) Tax was not imposed under subsection (1) of this section during the immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent quarterly balance is more than eight million dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 82.23B RCW to read as follows:

(1) The oil refinery worker assistance account is created in the state treasury. Fifty percent of the receipts from the tax imposed under RCW 82.23B.020(3) must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) Moneys in the account may be expended to assist oil refinery workers whose jobs have been eliminated due to reductions in refining operations at the refinery at which they were employed, including reductions attributable to the export of crude oil received at the refinery that would otherwise be refined at the facility. The assistance may include but is not limited to training programs and related support services:

(a) Including financial aid, counseling, referral to training resources, job referral, and job development;

(b) That are consistent with the unified plan for workforce development;

(c) That provide increased educational opportunities for dislocated workers;

(d) That provide customized training opportunities for dislocated workers; and

(e) That provide increased enrollments and support services, including financial aid for those dislocated workers not receiving unemployment insurance benefits, that do not replace or supplant any existing enrollments, programs, support services, or funding sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 90.56 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each onshore and offshore oil refinery facility proposing to handle crude oil for export must revise the facility oil spill prevention plan required under RCW 90.56.200 and the facility oil spill contingency plan required under RCW 90.56.210 to specifically address all types of crude oil planned or anticipated to be handled at the facility, including crude oil from the Bakken oil fields as well as diluted bitumen crude from Canada. By December 31, 2018, the department must adopt by rule the required components of these plans addressing handling of crude oil for export and must require that the plans demonstrate best achievable protection from damages caused by the discharge of oil into the waters of the state or other casualty from the release, explosion, or ignition of the oil.

(2) No onshore or offshore refinery facility may handle crude oil for export without an oil spill prevention and contingency plan approved by the department.

--- END ---