BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature acknowledges that students who do not get enough sleep often suffer physical and mental health problems and a decline in academic performance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The Washington state institute for public policy shall conduct a study of the student achievement outcomes and other related outcomes when schools have later school day start times.

(2) The institute shall submit a report, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, to the relevant committees of the legislature by December 1, 2016.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act may be known and cited as the sandman act.

--- END ---