BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that technological advances have provided new unique equipment that may be utilized in a variety of purposes. These technological advances often outpace statutory protections. Unmanned aerial vehicles, commonly known as drones, may be used for nefarious purposes such as the delivery of drugs, weapons, or other contraband to state prison inmates. The legislature finds the private use of drones near state prisons are a danger to public safety. It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that private drones may not be used near state prisons by making their specific use criminal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 9A.76 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of a dangerous drone operation if the person knowingly operates a drone over or within one thousand feet of the perimeter of a correctional facility, as defined in RCW 72.09.015, without authorization from the department of corrections.

(2) A dangerous drone operation is a class C felony.

(3) This section does not apply to drone operations by federal, state, or local governmental agencies.

--- END ---