BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Part I

Real estate excise tax exemption for inheritance transfers

Sec. 101. RCW 82.45.197 and 2014 c 58 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to receive an exemption under RCW 82.45.010(3) (a) or (b) from the tax in this chapter on real property transferred as a result of ((inheritance under RCW 82.45.010(3)(a))) devise or inheritance or a transfer on death deed, the following documentation must be provided:

(1) If the property is being transferred under the terms of a community property agreement, a copy of the recorded agreement and a certified copy of the death certificate;

(2) If the property is being transferred under the terms of a trust instrument, a certified copy of the death certificate and a copy of the trust instrument showing the authority of the grantor;

(3) If the property is being transferred under the terms of a probated will, a certified copy of the letters testamentary or in the case of intestate administration, a certified copy of the letters of administration showing that the grantor is the court-appointed executor, executrix, or administrator, and a certified copy of the death certificate;

(4) In the case of joint tenants with right of survivorship and remainder interests, a certified copy of the death certificate that is recorded to perfect title;

(5) If the property is being transferred pursuant to a court order, a certified copy of the court order requiring the transfer, and confirming that the grantor is required to do so under the terms of the order;

(6) If the community property interest of the decedent is being transferred to a surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner absent the documentation set forth in subsections (1) through (5) of this section, a certified copy of the death certificate and a signed affidavit from the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner affirming that he or she is the sole and rightful heir to the property; or

(7)(a) If the real property is transferred to one or more heirs, as defined in RCW 11.02.005, by operation of law but absent the documentation set forth in subsections (1) through (6) of this section, a certified copy of the death certificate and a signed affidavit affirming that the transferee or transferees are the rightful heirs to the property.

(b)(i) When real property is transferred as described in (a) of this subsection (7) and the decedent-transferor had also inherited the property from his or her spouse or domestic partner but never transferred title to the property into the decedent-transferor's name, the transferee or transferees must provide: (A) A certified copy of the death certificates for the decedent-transferor and the spouse or domestic partner from whom the decedent-transferor inherited the real property; and (B) an affidavit affirming that the transferee or transferees are the rightful heirs to the property.

(ii) If the documentation described in (b)(i) of this subsection (7) is provided, the exemption under RCW 82.45.010(3)(a) will apply to the inheritance transfers to the decedent-transferor and to the transferee or transferees; or

(8) If the property is being transferred pursuant to a transfer on death deed, a certified copy of the death certificate is recorded to perfect title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102. Section 101 of this act does not apply to transfers for which a real estate excise tax affidavit form was filed with the county treasurer before the effective date of section 101 of this act.

Part II

Pet adoption fees

Sec. 201. RCW 82.04.040 and 2004 c 153 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, "sale" means any transfer of the ownership of, title to, or possession of property for a valuable consideration and includes any activity classified as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" under RCW 82.04.050. It includes lease or rental, conditional sale contracts, and any contract under which possession of the property is given to the purchaser but title is retained by the vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. It also includes the furnishing of food, drink, or meals for compensation whether consumed upon the premises or not. The term "sale" does not include the transfer of the ownership of, title to, or possession of an animal by an animal rescue organization in exchange for the payment of an adoption fee.

(2) "Casual or isolated sale" means a sale made by a person who is not engaged in the business of selling the type of property involved.

(3)(a) "Lease or rental" means any transfer of possession or control of tangible personal property for a fixed or indeterminate term for consideration. A lease or rental may include future options to purchase or extend. "Lease or rental" includes agreements covering motor vehicles and trailers where the amount of consideration may be increased or decreased by reference to the amount realized upon sale or disposition of the property as defined in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 7701(h)(1), as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003. The definition in this subsection (3) ((shall)) must be used for sales and use tax purposes regardless if a transaction is characterized as a lease or rental under generally accepted accounting principles, the United States internal revenue code, Washington state's commercial code, or other provisions of federal, state, or local law.

(b) "Lease or rental" does not include:

(i) A transfer of possession or control of property under a security agreement or deferred payment plan that requires the transfer of title upon completion of the required payments;

(ii) A transfer of possession or control of property under an agreement that requires the transfer of title upon completion of required payments, and payment of an option price does not exceed the greater of one hundred dollars or one percent of the total required payments; or

(iii) Providing tangible personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A condition of this exclusion is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (3)(b)(iii), an operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.

(4)(a) "Adoption fee" means an amount charged by an animal rescue organization to adopt an animal, except that "adoption fee" does not include any separately itemized charge for any incidental inanimate items provided to persons adopting an animal, including food, identification tags, collars, and leashes.

(b) "Animal care and control agency" means the same as in RCW 16.52.011 and also includes any similar entity operating outside of this state.

(c) "Animal rescue group" means a nonprofit organization exempt from federal income taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code as it exists on the effective date of this section, whose primary purpose is the placement of dogs, cats, or other animals that have been removed from an animal care and control agency or that have been surrendered, relinquished, or otherwise transferred to the animal rescue group.

(d) "Animal rescue organization" means an animal care and control agency or an animal rescue group.

Sec. 202. RCW 82.04.190 and 2015 c 169 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

"Consumer" means the following:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any article of tangible personal property irrespective of the nature of the person's business and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers other than for the purpose of:

(a) Resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of business;

(b) Incorporating such property as an ingredient or component of real or personal property when installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving, constructing, or decorating such real or personal property of or for consumers;

(c) Consuming such property in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or a new substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or as a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale;

(d) Consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(e) Satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7), if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty without intervening use by such person;

(2)(a) Any person engaged in any business activity taxable under RCW 82.04.290 or 82.04.2908; (b) any person who purchases, acquires, or uses any competitive telephone service, ancillary services, or telecommunications service as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than for resale in the regular course of business; (c) any person who purchases, acquires, or uses any service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2) (a) or (g), other than for resale in the regular course of business or for the purpose of satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7); (d) any person who makes a purchase meeting the definition of "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under RCW 82.04.050(15), other than for resale in the regular course of business; (e) any person who purchases or acquires an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7) other than for resale in the regular course of business; and (f) any person who is an end user of software. For purposes of this subsection (2)(f) and RCW 82.04.050(6), a person who purchases or otherwise acquires prewritten computer software, who provides services described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) and who will charge consumers for the right to access and use the prewritten computer software, is not an end user of the prewritten computer software;

(3) Any person engaged in the business of contracting for the building, repairing or improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington or by the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind as defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of such publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle by installing, placing or spreading the property in or upon the right-of-way of such street, place, road, highway, easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in or upon the site of such mass public transportation terminal or parking facility;

(4) Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of possession to or an easement in real property which is being constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or otherwise altered by a person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal corporations or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and county and city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property. Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this definition may be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";

(5) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of possession to personal property which is being constructed, repaired, improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered by a person engaged in business;

(6) Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing land and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person is a consumer within the meaning of this subsection in respect to tangible personal property incorporated into, installed in, or attached to such building or other structure by such person, except that consumer does not include any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, or any instrumentality thereof, if the investment project would qualify for sales and use tax deferral under chapter 82.63 RCW if undertaken by a private entity;

(7) Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment, the rental of which is exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this section may be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";

(8) Any person engaged in the business of cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development;

(9) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of possession of tangible personal property that, under the terms of an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7), has been repaired or is replacement property, but only with respect to the sale of or charge made for the repairing of the tangible personal property or the replacement property;

(10) Any person who purchases, acquires, or uses services described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) other than:

(a) For resale in the regular course of business; or

(b) For purposes of consuming the service described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) in producing for sale a new product, but only if such service becomes a component of the new product. For purposes of this subsection (10), "product" means a digital product, an article of tangible personal property, or the service described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c);

(11)(a) Any end user of a digital product or digital code. "Consumer" does not include any person who is not an end user of a digital product or a digital code and purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any digital product or digital code for purposes of consuming the digital product or digital code in producing for sale a new product, but only if the digital product or digital code becomes a component of the new product. A digital code becomes a component of a new product if the digital good or digital automated service acquired through the use of the digital code becomes incorporated into a new product. For purposes of this subsection, "product" has the same meaning as in subsection (10) of this section.

(b)(i) For purposes of this subsection, "end user" means any taxpayer as defined in RCW 82.12.010 other than a taxpayer who receives by contract a digital product for further commercial broadcast, rebroadcast, transmission, retransmission, licensing, relicensing, distribution, redistribution or exhibition of the product, in whole or in part, to others. A person that purchases digital products or digital codes for the purpose of giving away such products or codes will not be considered to have engaged in the distribution or redistribution of such products or codes and will be treated as an end user;

(ii) If a purchaser of a digital code does not receive the contractual right to further redistribute, after the digital code is redeemed, the underlying digital product to which the digital code relates, then the purchaser of the digital code is an end user. If the purchaser of the digital code receives the contractual right to further redistribute, after the digital code is redeemed, the underlying digital product to which the digital code relates, then the purchaser of the digital code is not an end user. A purchaser of a digital code who has the contractual right to further redistribute the digital code is an end user if that purchaser does not have the right to further redistribute, after the digital code is redeemed, the underlying digital product to which the digital code relates;

(12) Any person who provides services described in RCW 82.04.050(9). Any such person is a consumer with respect to the purchase, acquisition, or use of the tangible personal property that the person provides along with an operator in rendering services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(9). Any such person may also be a consumer under other provisions of this section;

(13) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses chemical sprays or washes for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, or who purchases feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials, is not a consumer of such items, but only to the extent that the items:

(a) Are used in relation to the person's participation in the federal conservation reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands reserve program, the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;

(b) Are for use by a farmer for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; or

(c) Are for use by a farmer to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land the farmer owns or leases while acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife; ((and))

(14) A regional transit authority is not a consumer with respect to labor, services, or tangible personal property purchased pursuant to agreements providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway equipment when a transit agency, as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services; and

(15) The term "consumer" does not include:

(a) An animal rescue organization with respect to animals under its care and control; and

(b) Any person with respect to an animal adopted by that person from an animal rescue organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203. Sections 201 and 202 of this act apply both prospectively and retroactively to July 1, 2015.

Part III

Technical corrections to 2015 legislation

Sec. 301. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 2303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

((Part VIII of this act expires July 1, 2019.)) (1) Sections 802 and 804, chapter 6, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. expire July 1, 2026;

(2) Section 803, chapter 6, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. expires January 1, 2026; and

(3) Section 805, chapter 6, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. expires January 1, 2031.

Sec. 302. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The legislature finds that a robust maritime industry is crucial for the state's economic vitality. The legislature further finds that:

(i) The joint task force for economic resilience of maritime and manufacturing established policy goals to continue efforts towards developing a robust maritime industry in the state;

(ii) The maritime industry has a direct and indirect impact on jobs in the state;

(iii) Many of the cities and towns impacted by the maritime industry are often small with limited resources to encourage economic growth, heavily relying on the maritime industry for local jobs and revenues in the community;

(iv) Keeping Washington competitive with other cruising destinations is essential to continue to build a robust maritime economy in the state; and

(v) Tax incentives are an imperative component to improve the state's overall competitiveness in this sector.

(b) Therefore, the legislature intends to:

(i) Bolster the maritime industry in the state by incentivizing larger vessel owners to use Washington waters for recreational boating to increase economic activity and jobs in coastal communities and inland water regions of the state;

(ii) Achieve this objective in a fiscally responsible manner and require analysis of specific metrics to ensure valuable state resources are being used to accomplish the intended goal; and

(iii) Provide limited, short-term tax relief to entity-owned nonresident vessel owners that currently are not afforded the same benefits as other nonresident vessel owners.

(2)(a) This subsection is the tax preference performance statement for the entity-owned nonresident vessel tax preference established in section 803 of this act. The performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(b) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended to accomplish the purposes indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(c) and one intended to improve the state's competitiveness with other nearby cruising destinations.

(c) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to increase economic activity and jobs related to the maritime industry by providing a tax preference for large entity-owned nonresident vessels to increase the length of time these vessels cruise Washington waters in turn strengthening the maritime economy in the state.

(d) To measure the effectiveness of the tax preference provided in part ((XII [VIII])) VIII of chapter 6, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. of this act in achieving the public policy objective in (c) of this subsection, the joint legislative audit and review committee must provide the following in a published evaluation of this tax preference by December 31, 2024:

(i) A comparison of the gross and taxable revenue generated by businesses that sell or provide maintenance or repair of vessels, prior to and after the enactment of this tax preference;

(ii) Analysis of retail sales taxes collected from the restaurant and service industries in coastal and inlet coastal jurisdictions, for both counties and cities, for periods prior to and after the enactment of this tax preference;

(iii) Employment and wage trends for businesses described in (d)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, for periods prior to and after the enactment of this tax preference;

(iv) Descriptive statistics for the number of permits sold each year in addition to the following information:

(A) The cost for each permit by strata of vessel length;

(B) The jurisdiction of ownership for the nonresident vessel; and

(C) The amount of use tax that would have been due based on the estimated value of the vessel;

(v) A comparison of the number of registered entity-owned and individually owned vessels registered in Washington prior to and after the enactment of this tax preference; and

(vi) Data and analysis for Washington's main cruising destination competitors, specifically looking at tax preferences provided in those jurisdictions, vessel industry income data, and any additional relevant information to compare Washington's maritime climate with its competitors.

(e) The provision of RCW 82.32.808(5) does not apply to this tax preference.

Sec. 303. RCW 82.70.040 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 414 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)(((i))) The department must keep a running total of all credits allowed under RCW 82.70.020 during each fiscal year. The department may not allow any credits that would cause the total amount allowed to exceed two million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars in any fiscal year.

(((ii) The department shall not allow any credits that would cause the total amount allowed to exceed one million five hundred thousand dollars in any fiscal year.))

(b) If the total amount of credit applied for by all applicants in any year exceeds the limit in this subsection, the department must ratably reduce the amount of credit allowed for all applicants so that the limit in this subsection is not exceeded. If a credit is reduced under this subsection, the amount of the reduction may not be carried forward and claimed in subsequent fiscal years.

(2)(a) Tax credits under RCW 82.70.020 may not be claimed in excess of the amount of tax otherwise due under chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW.

(b) ((Through June 30, 2005, a person with taxes equal to or in excess of the credit under RCW 82.70.020, and therefore not subject to the limitation in (a) of this subsection, may elect to defer tax credits for a period of not more than three years after the year in which the credits accrue.)) For credits approved by the department through June 30, 2015, the approved credit may be carried forward and used for tax reporting periods through December 31, 2016. Credits approved after June 30, 2015, must be used for tax reporting periods within the calendar year for which they are approved by the department and may not be carried forward to subsequent tax reporting periods. Credits carried forward as authorized by this subsection are subject to the limitation in subsection (1)(a) of this section for the fiscal year for which the credits were originally approved.

(3) No person may be approved for tax credits under RCW 82.70.020 in excess of one hundred thousand dollars in any fiscal year. This limitation does not apply to credits carried forward from prior years under subsection (2)(b) of this section.

(4) No person may claim tax credits after June 30, 2024.

(5) No person is eligible for tax credits under RCW 82.70.020 if the additional revenues for the multimodal transportation account created by chapter 361, Laws of 2003 are terminated.

Sec. 304. RCW 82.08.809 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 408 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of new passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles, which (a) are exclusively powered by a clean alternative fuel or (b) use at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and are capable of traveling at least thirty miles using only battery power.

(2) The seller must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section.

(3) As used in this section, "clean alternative fuel" means natural gas, propane, hydrogen, or electricity, when used as a fuel in a motor vehicle that meets the California motor vehicle emission standards in Title 13 of the California code of regulations, effective January 1, 2005, and the rules of the Washington state department of ecology.

(4)(a) A sale, other than a lease, is not exempt from sales tax as described under subsection (1) of this section if the selling price of the vehicle plus trade-in property of like kind exceeds thirty-five thousand dollars.

(b) For leased vehicles for which the lease agreement is signed on or after July 15, 2015, lease payments are not exempt from sales tax as described under subsection (1) of this section if the fair market value of the vehicle being leased exceeds thirty-five thousand dollars at the inception of the lease. For the purposes of this subsection (4)(b), "fair market value" has the same meaning as "value of the article used" in RCW 82.12.010 except that the term "fair market value" also includes the value of trade-in property of like kind.

(c) For leased vehicles for which the lease agreement was signed before July 1, 2015, lease payments due on or after July 15, 2015, ((lease payments)) are exempt from sales tax as described under subsection (1) of this section regardless of the vehicle's fair market value at the inception of the lease.

(5) On the last day of January, April, July, and October of each year, the state treasurer, based upon information provided by the department, must transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the general fund a sum equal to the dollar amount that would otherwise have been deposited into the general fund during the prior calendar quarter but for the exemption provided in this section. Information provided by the department to the state treasurer must be based on the best available data, except that the department may provide estimates of taxes exempted under this section until such time as retailers are able to report such exempted amounts on their tax returns. For purposes of this section, the first transfer for the calendar quarter after July 15, 2015, must be calculated assuming only those revenues that should have been deposited into the general fund beginning July 1, 2015.

(6) Lease payments due on or after July 1, 2019, are subject to the taxes imposed under this chapter.

(7) This section expires July 1, 2019.

Sec. 305. RCW 82.12.809 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 409 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, until July 1, 2019, the provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of new passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles, which (a) are exclusively powered by a clean alternative fuel or (b) use at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and are capable of traveling at least thirty miles using only battery power.

(2) The definitions in RCW 82.08.809 apply to this section.

(3) A taxpayer is not liable for the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 on the use, on or after July 1, 2019, of a passenger car, light duty truck, or medium duty passenger vehicle that is exclusively powered by a clean alternative fuel or uses at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and is capable of traveling at least thirty miles using only battery power, if the taxpayer used such vehicle in this state before July 1, 2019, and the use was exempt under this section from the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020.

(4)(a) For vehicles purchased on or after July 15, 2015, or for leased vehicles for which the lease agreement was signed on or after July 15, 2015, a vehicle is not exempt from use tax as described under subsection (1) of this section if the fair market value of the vehicle exceeds thirty-five thousand dollars at the time the tax is imposed for purchased vehicles, or at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles.

(b) For leased vehicles for which the lease agreement was signed before July 15, 2015, lease payments due on or after July 15, 2015, are exempt from use tax as described under subsection (1) of this section regardless of the vehicle's fair market value at the inception of the lease.

(5) On the last day of January, April, July, and October of each year, the state treasurer, based upon information provided by the department, must transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the general fund a sum equal to the dollar amount that would otherwise have been deposited into the general fund during the prior calendar quarter but for the exemption provided in this section. Information provided by the department to the state treasurer must be based on the best available data. For purposes of this section, the first transfer for the calendar quarter after July 15, 2015, must be calculated assuming only those revenues that should have been deposited into the general fund beginning July 1, 2015.

(6) Lease payments due on or after July 1, 2019, are subject to the taxes imposed under this chapter.

Sec. 306. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 2301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2015.

(2) Parts IV, ((VI,)) VIII, and XIX of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect September 1, 2015.

(3) Part X of this act takes effect October 1, 2016.

(4) Section 1105 of this act takes effect January 1, 2016.

(5) Except for section 2004 of this act, Part XX of this act takes effect January 1, 2019.

(6) Section 2004 of this act takes effect January 1, 2022.

Sec. 307. RCW 82.04.220 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 20 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and collected from every person that has a substantial nexus with this state a tax for the act or privilege of engaging in business activities. The tax is measured by the application of rates against value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income of the business, as the case may be.

(2) A person who has a substantial nexus with this state in any tax year under the provisions of RCW 82.04.067 will be deemed to have a substantial nexus with this state for the remainder of that year and the following tax year.

Sec. 308. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 30 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preference contained in section 2 ((of this act)), chapter 30, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(1) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended to provide tax relief for certain businesses or individuals, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(e).

(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to provide tax relief to senior citizens, disabled persons, and veterans. The legislature recognizes that property taxes impose a substantial financial burden on those with fixed incomes and that property tax relief programs have considerable value in addressing this burden. It is the legislature's intent to increase the current statutory static income thresholds which were last modified in 2004.

(3) ((The expansion of the items allowed to be deducted)) This tax preference is meant to be permanent and, therefore, not subject to the ten-year expiration provision in RCW 82.32.805(1)(a).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309. (1) Sections 303 and 306 of this act apply both prospectively and retroactively to July 1, 2015.

(2) Sections 304 and 305 of this act apply both prospectively and retroactively to July 15, 2015.

(3) Section 307 of this act applies both prospectively and retroactively to September 1, 2015.

Part IV

Automated sales suppression devices and phantom-ware

Sec. 401. RCW 82.32.670 and 2013 c 309 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Automated sales suppression devices, phantom-ware, electronic cash registers or point of sale systems used with automated sales suppression devices or phantom-ware, and any property constituting proceeds traceable to any violation of RCW 82.32.290(4) are considered contraband and are subject to seizure and forfeiture.

(b) Property subject to forfeiture under (a) of this subsection (1) may be seized by any agent of the department authorized to assess or collect taxes, or law enforcement officer of this state, upon process issued by any superior court or district court having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure without process may be made if:

(i) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant; or

(ii) The department or the law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of RCW 82.32.290(4) and exigent circumstances exist making procurement of a search warrant impracticable.

(2) Forfeiture authorized by this section is deemed to have commenced by the seizure. Notice of seizure must be given to the department if the seizure is made by a law enforcement officer without the presence of any agent of the department. The department must cause notice of the seizure and intended forfeiture to be served on the owner of the property seized, if known, and on any other person known by the department to have a right or interest in the seized property. Such service must be made within fifteen days following the seizure or the department's receipt of notification of the seizure. The notice may be served by any method authorized by law or court rule, by certified mail with return receipt requested, or electronically in accordance with RCW 82.32.135. Service by certified mail or electronic means is deemed complete upon mailing the notice, electronically sending the notice, or electronically notifying the person or persons entitled to the notice that the notice is available to be accessed by the person or persons, within the fifteen-day period following the seizure or the department's receipt of notification of the seizure.

(3) If no person notifies the department in writing of the person's claim of lawful ownership or right to lawful possession of the item or items seized within thirty days of the date of service of the notice of seizure and intended forfeiture, the item or items seized are deemed forfeited.

(4)(a) If any person notifies the department, in writing, of the person's claim of lawful ownership or lawful right to possession of the item or items seized within thirty days of the date of service of the notice of seizure and intended forfeiture, the person or persons must be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to the claim. The hearing must be before the director or the director's designee. A hearing and any administrative or judicial review is governed by chapter 34.05 RCW. The burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence is upon the person claiming to be the lawful owner or the person claiming to have the lawful right to possession of the item or items seized.

(b) The department must return the item or items to the claimant as soon as possible upon a determination that the claimant is the present lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession of the item or items seized.

(5) When property is sought to be forfeited on the ground that it constitutes proceeds traceable to a violation of RCW 82.32.290(4), the department must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the property constitutes proceeds traceable to a violation of RCW 82.32.290(4).

(6)(a) When automated sales suppression devices or phantom-ware voluntarily surrendered to an agent of the department, or property forfeited under this section, other than proceeds traceable to a violation of RCW 82.32.290(4), is no longer required for evidentiary purposes, the department may:

(i) Destroy or have the property destroyed;

(ii) Retain the property for training or other official purposes; or

(iii) Loan or give the property to any law enforcement or tax administration agency of any state, political subdivision or municipal corporation of a state, or the United States for training or other official purposes. For purposes of this subsection (6)(a)(iii), "state" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.462.

(b) When proceeds traceable to a violation of RCW 82.32.290(4) forfeited under this section are no longer required for evidentiary purposes, they must be deposited into the general fund.

(7) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section:

(a) "Automated sales suppression device" means a software program that falsifies the electronic records of electronic cash registers or other point of sale systems, including transaction data and transaction reports. The term includes the software program, any device that carries the software program, or an internet link to the software program.

(b) "Electronic cash register" means a device that keeps a register or supporting documents through the means of an electronic device or computer system designed to record transaction data for the purpose of computing, compiling, or processing sales transaction data in whatever manner.

(c) "Phantom-ware" means a programming option that is hidden, preinstalled, or installed-at-a-later-time in the operating system of an electronic cash register or other point of sale device, or hardwired into the electronic cash register or other point of sale device, and that can be used to create a virtual second till or may eliminate or manipulate transaction reports that may or may not be preserved in digital formats to represent the true or manipulated record of transactions in the electronic cash register or other point of sale device.

(d) "Transaction data" means information about sales transactions, including items purchased by a customer, the price for each item, a taxability determination for each item, a segregated tax amount for each of the taxed items, the amount of cash or credit tendered, the net amount returned to the customer in change, the date and time of the purchase, the name, address, and identification number of the vendor, and the receipt or invoice number of the transaction.

(e) "Transaction reports" means a report that includes information associated with sales transactions, taxes collected, media totals, and discount voids at an electronic cash register that can be printed on cash register tape at the end of a day or shift, or a report documenting every action at an electronic cash register or other point of sale device and that is stored electronically.

Part V

Annual surveys and reports for tax preferences

Sec. 501. RCW 82.32.534 and 2014 c 97 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Every person claiming a tax preference that requires a report under this section, except persons exempt from the provisions of this section, must file a complete annual report with the department. This section does not apply to persons who are not required to have an active tax registration with the department under the provisions of RCW 82.32.030, except when an annual report is required for a property tax preference that requires persons seeking the preference to apply to the department.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the report is due by April 30th of the year following any calendar year in which a person becomes eligible to claim the tax preference that requires a report under this section.

(c)(i) A tax preference of the type that is ordinarily reported on a tax return and that a person qualified for, but did not report on a previously filed tax return, may be claimed on an amended return filed after the due date for filing the report as provided in (b) of this subsection (1) and within the nonclaim period in RCW 82.32.060, if the person:

(A) Is current on its tax return filing obligations for reporting any taxes due under chapters 82.04, 82.08, or 82.16 RCW;

(B) Had an active tax registration with the department during the reporting period or periods covered by the amended return or returns;

(C) Has not previously claimed the same tax preference on an original or amended return; and

(D) Files a complete annual report or reports in compliance with this section with the amended return or returns.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(c), if multiple returns are filed for reporting periods within the same calendar year or two or more calendar years, only one report is required to be filed for each calendar year.

(iii) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1)(c)(iii), the provisions of this subsection (1)(c) apply beginning January 1, 2019, for amended returns filed for reporting periods in 2018 or later. However, if the department determines that it can sooner effectively and efficiently implement this subsection (1)(c), the department may accept amended returns before January 1, 2019, for reporting periods beginning no earlier than January 1st of the year immediately preceding the year during which the department begins accepting amended returns in accordance with this subsection (1)(c).

(d) The department may extend the due date for timely filing of annual reports under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.

(((b))) (e) The report must include information detailing employment, wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits for employment positions in Washington for the year that the tax preference was claimed. However, persons engaged in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes may report employment, wage, and benefit information per job at the manufacturing site for the year that the tax preference was claimed. The report must not include names of employees. The report must also detail employment by the total number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions for the year that the tax preference was claimed.

(((c) Persons receiving the benefit of the tax preference provided by RCW 82.16.0421 or claiming any of the tax preferences provided by RCW 82.04.2909, 82.04.4481, 82.08.805, 82.12.805, or 82.12.022(5) must indicate on the annual report the quantity of product produced in this state during the time period covered by the report.

(d))) (f) If a person filing a report under this section did not file a report with the department in the previous calendar year, the report filed under this section must also include employment, wage, and benefit information for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year for which a tax preference was claimed.

(2) As part of the annual report, the department may request additional information necessary to measure the results of, or determine eligibility for, the tax preference. The department must annually seek input on changes to the annual report from the joint legislative audit and review committee.

(3) Other than information requested under subsection (2) of this section, the information contained in an annual report filed under this section is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.

(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a tax preference that requires an annual report under this section but fails to submit a complete report by the due date or any extension under RCW 82.32.590, the department must declare the amount of the tax preference claimed for the previous calendar year to be immediately due and payable. The department must assess interest, but not penalties, on the amounts due under this subsection. The interest must be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter, retroactively to the date the tax preference was claimed, and accrues until the taxes for which the tax preference was claimed are repaid. Amounts due under this subsection are not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.

(b) If the tax preference is a property tax preference, the person is not required to repay the amount of the tax preference claimed for failing to timely submit an annual report under this section. However, the person is ineligible to claim the tax preference for taxes levied for collection in the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the report was due. The department must provide notice to the appropriate county assessor when a person is ineligible to claim a property tax preference pursuant to this subsection.

(5) The department must use the information from this section to prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must report these statistics to the legislature each year by December 1st. The department need not revise summary descriptive statistics for previous calendar years as a result of tax preferences claimed on amended returns.

(6) For the purposes of determining the identity of persons required to file an annual report as a result of claiming a property tax preference, beginning January 1, 2017, the assessor of the county in which the property receiving the benefit of the tax preference is located must provide written notice to the department that the tax preference has been claimed. Such notice must include the claimant's name, contact information if available, and the address, tax parcel number, or description of the property receiving the benefit of the tax preference. The assessor need not provide the notice required under this subsection (6), if the person is required to file an application with the department to claim the tax preference.

(7) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also includes the state ((and)), its departments and institutions, and any other entity that is subject to this section as a result of claiming or receiving the benefit of a tax preference.

(b) "Tax preference" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and includes only the tax preferences requiring a survey under this section.

Sec. 502. RCW 82.32.585 and 2014 c 97 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Every person claiming a tax preference that requires a survey under this section, except persons exempt from the provisions of this section, must file a complete annual survey with the department. This section does not apply to persons who are not required to have an active tax registration with the department under the provisions of RCW 82.32.030, except when an annual survey is required for a property tax preference that requires persons seeking the preference to apply to the department.

(((i))) (b)(i) Except as otherwise provided in (((a)(ii) of)) this subsection, the survey is due by April 30th of the year following any calendar year in which a person becomes eligible to claim the tax preference that requires a survey under this section.

(ii) If the tax preference is a deferral of tax, the first survey must be filed by April 30th of the calendar year following the calendar year in which the investment project is certified by the department as operationally complete, and a survey must be filed by April 30th of each of the seven succeeding calendar years.

(((b))) (c)(i) A tax preference of the type that is ordinarily reported on a tax return and that a person qualified for, but did not report on a previously filed tax return, may be claimed on an amended return filed after the due date for filing the survey as provided in (b)(i) of this subsection (1) and within the nonclaim period in RCW 82.32.060, if the person:

(A) Is current on its tax return filing obligations for reporting any taxes due under chapters 82.04, 82.08, or 82.16 RCW;

(B) Had an active tax registration with the department during the reporting period or periods covered by the amended return or returns;

(C) Has not previously claimed the same tax preference on an original or amended return; and

(D) Files a complete annual survey or surveys in compliance with this section with the amended return or returns.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(c), if multiple returns are filed for reporting periods within the same calendar year or two or more calendar years, only one survey is required to be filed for each calendar year.

(iii) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1)(c)(iii), the provisions of this subsection (1)(c) apply beginning January 1, 2019, for amended returns filed for reporting periods in 2018 or later. However, if the department determines that it can sooner effectively and efficiently implement this subsection (1)(c), the department may accept amended returns before January 1, 2019, for reporting periods beginning no earlier than January 1st of the year immediately preceding the year during which the department begins accepting amended returns in accordance with this subsection (1)(c).

(d) The department may extend the due date for timely filing of annual surveys under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.

(2)(a) ((The survey)) Surveys, other than surveys for property tax preferences, must include the amount of the tax preference claimed for the calendar year covered by the survey. For a person that claimed an exemption provided in RCW 82.08.025651 or 82.12.025651, the survey must include the amount of tax exempted under those sections in the prior calendar year for each general area or category of research and development for which exempt machinery and equipment and labor and services were acquired in the prior calendar year. For property tax preferences requiring a survey under this section, the survey must include an estimate of the amount of property tax savings provided by the tax preference. Such estimates must be based on existing property tax information maintained by the county assessor and treasurer, such as levy rates and assessed values.

(b) ((The survey)) All surveys under this section must also include the following information for employment positions in Washington, not to include names of employees, for the year that the tax preference was claimed:

(i) The number of total employment positions;

(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a percent of total employment;

(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three individuals may be combined with another wage band; and

(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.

(c) ((For persons claiming the tax preference provided under chapter 82.60 or 82.63 RCW, the survey must also include the number of new products or research projects by general classification, and the number of trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with activities at the investment project.

(d) For persons claiming the credit provided under RCW 82.04.4452, the survey must also include the qualified research and development expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit was claimed, the taxable amount during the calendar year for which the credit was claimed, the number of new products or research projects by general classification, the number of trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with the research and development activities for which the credit was claimed, and whether the tax preference has been assigned, and who assigned the credit. The definitions in RCW 82.04.4452 apply to this subsection (2)(d).

(e) For persons claiming the tax exemption in RCW 82.08.025651 or 82.12.025651, the survey must also include the general areas or categories of research and development for which machinery and equipment and labor and services were acquired, exempt from tax under RCW 82.08.025651 or 82.12.025651, in the prior calendar year.

(f))) If the person filing a survey under this section did not file a survey with the department in the previous calendar year, the survey filed under this section must also include the employment, wage, and benefit information required under (b)(i) through (iv) of this subsection for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year for which a tax preference was claimed.

(3) As part of the annual survey, the department may request additional information necessary to measure the results of, or determine eligibility for, the tax preference. The department must annually seek input on changes to the annual survey from the joint legislative audit and review committee.

(4) All information collected under this section, except the information required in subsection (2)(a) of this section, is deemed taxpayer information under RCW 82.32.330. Information required in subsection (2)(a) of this section is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section. If the amount of the tax preference claimed as reported on the survey is different than the amount actually claimed or otherwise allowed by the department based on the taxpayer's excise tax returns or other information known to the department, the amount actually claimed or allowed may be disclosed.

(5) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax reduced or saved is less than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the survey may request the department to treat the amount of the tax reduction or savings as confidential under RCW 82.32.330.

(6)(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a tax preference that requires an annual survey under this section but fails to submit a complete annual survey by the due date of the survey or any extension under RCW 82.32.590, the department must declare the amount of the tax preference claimed for the previous calendar year to be immediately due. If the tax preference is a deferral of tax, twelve and one-half percent of the deferred tax is immediately due. If the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee, the lessee is responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has received the economic benefit.

(b) The department must assess interest, but not penalties, on the amounts due under this subsection. The interest must be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter, retroactively to the date the tax preference was claimed, and accrues until the taxes for which the tax preference was claimed are repaid. Amounts due under this subsection are not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.

(c) If the tax preference is a property tax preference, the person is not required to repay the amount of the tax preference claimed for failing to timely submit an annual survey under this section. However, the person is ineligible to claim the tax preference for taxes levied for collection in the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the report was due. The department must provide notice to the appropriate county assessor when a person is ineligible to claim a property tax preference pursuant to this subsection.

(7) The department must use the information from this section to prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must report these statistics to the legislature each year by December 1st. The department need not revise summary descriptive statistics for previous calendar years as a result of tax preferences claimed on amended returns.

(8) For the purposes of determining the identity of persons required to file an annual survey as a result of claiming a property tax preference, beginning January 1, 2017, the assessor of the county in which the property receiving the benefit of the tax preference is located must provide written notice to the department that the tax preference has been claimed. Such notice must include the claimant's name, contact information if available, and the address, tax parcel number, or description of the property receiving the benefit of the tax preference. The assessor need not provide the notice required under this subsection (8), if the person is required to file an application with the department to claim the tax preference.

(9) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also includes the state and its departments and institutions.

(b) "Tax preference" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and includes only the tax preferences requiring a survey under this section.

Part VI

Miscellaneous technical corrections

Sec. 601. RCW 82.04.261 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 510 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (12), a surcharge is imposed on those persons who are subject to any of the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (12). Except as otherwise provided in this section, the surcharge is equal to 0.052 percent. The surcharge is added to the rates provided in RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (12) (a), (b), (c), and (d). The surcharge and this section expire July 1, 2024.

(2) All receipts from the surcharge imposed under this section must be deposited into the forest and fish support account created in RCW 76.09.405.

(3)(a) The surcharge imposed under this section is suspended if:

(i) Receipts from the surcharge total at least eight million dollars during any fiscal biennium; or

(ii) The office of financial management certifies to the department that the federal government has appropriated at least two million dollars for participation in forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington for any federal fiscal year.

(b)(i) The suspension of the surcharge under (a)(i) of this subsection (3) takes effect on the first day of the calendar month that is at least thirty days after the end of the month during which the department determines that receipts from the surcharge total at least eight million dollars during the fiscal biennium. The surcharge is imposed again at the beginning of the following fiscal biennium.

(ii) The suspension of the surcharge under (a)(ii) of this subsection (3) takes effect on the later of the first day of October of any federal fiscal year for which the federal government appropriates at least two million dollars for participation in forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington, or the first day of a calendar month that is at least thirty days following the date that the office of financial management makes a certification to the department under subsection (5) of this section. The surcharge is imposed again on the first day of the following July.

(4)(a) If, by October 1st of any federal fiscal year, the office of financial management certifies to the department that the federal government has appropriated funds for participation in forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington but the amount of the appropriation is less than two million dollars, the department must adjust the surcharge in accordance with this subsection.

(b) The department must adjust the surcharge by an amount that the department estimates will cause the amount of funds deposited into the forest and fish support account for the state fiscal year that begins July 1st and that includes the beginning of the federal fiscal year for which the federal appropriation is made, to be reduced by twice the amount of the federal appropriation for participation in forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington.

(c) Any adjustment in the surcharge takes effect at the beginning of a calendar month that is at least thirty days after the date that the office of financial management makes the certification under subsection (5) of this section.

(d) The surcharge is imposed again at the rate provided in subsection (1) of this section on the first day of the following state fiscal year unless the surcharge is suspended under subsection (3) of this section or adjusted for that fiscal year under this subsection.

(e) Adjustments of the amount of the surcharge by the department are final and may not be used to challenge the validity of the surcharge imposed under this section.

(f) The department must provide timely notice to affected taxpayers of the suspension of the surcharge or an adjustment of the surcharge.

(5) The office of financial management must make the certification to the department as to the status of federal appropriations for tribal participation in forest and fish report-related activities.

Sec. 602. RCW 82.04.334 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 512 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter does not apply to any sale of standing timber excluded from the definition of "sale" in RCW 82.45.010(3). The definitions in RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (12) apply to this section.

Sec. 603. RCW 82.04.43391 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 112 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax interest and fees on loans secured by commercial aircraft primarily used to provide routine air service and owned by:

(a) An air carrier, as defined in RCW ((82.42.030)) 82.42.010, which is primarily engaged in the business of providing passenger air service;

(b) An affiliate of such air carrier; or

(c) A parent entity for which such air carrier is an affiliate.

(2) The deduction authorized under this section is not available to any person who is physically present in this state as determined under RCW 82.04.067(6).

(3) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(a) "Affiliate" means a person is "affiliated," as defined in RCW 82.04.645, with another person; and

(b) "Commercial aircraft" means a commercial airplane as defined in RCW 82.32.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604. RCW 82.04.4483 (Credit—Programming or manufacturing software in rural counties) and 2010 c 114 s 119 & 2004 c 25 s 1 are each repealed.

Sec. 605. RCW 82.32.030 and 2011 c 298 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, if any person engages in any business or performs any act upon which a tax is imposed by the preceding chapters, he or she must, under such rules as the department prescribes, apply for and obtain from the department a registration certificate. Such registration certificate is personal and nontransferable and is valid as long as the taxpayer continues in business and pays the tax accrued to the state. In case business is transacted at two or more separate places by one taxpayer, a separate registration certificate for each place at which business is transacted with the public is required. Each certificate must be numbered and must show the name, residence, and place and character of business of the taxpayer and such other information as the department of revenue deems necessary and must be posted in a conspicuous place at the place of business for which it is issued. Where a place of business of the taxpayer is changed, the taxpayer must return to the department the existing certificate, and a new certificate will be issued for the new place of business. No person required to be registered under this section may engage in any business taxable hereunder without first being so registered. The department, by rule, may provide for the issuance of certificates of registration to temporary places of business.

(2) Unless the person is a dealer as defined in RCW 9.41.010, registration under this section is not required if the following conditions are met:

(a) A person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income of the business, from all business activities taxable under chapter 82.04 RCW, is less than twelve thousand dollars per year;

(b) The person's gross income of the business from all activities taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW is less than twelve thousand dollars per year;

(c) The person is not required to collect or pay to the department of revenue any other tax or fee ((which)) that the department is authorized to collect; and

(d) The person is not otherwise required to obtain a license subject to the ((master)) business license application procedure provided in chapter 19.02 RCW.

(3) All persons who agree to collect and remit sales and use tax to the department under the agreement must register through the central registration system authorized under the agreement. Persons required to register under subsection (1) of this section are not relieved of that requirement because of registration under this subsection (3).

(4) Persons registered under subsection (3) of this section who are not required to register under subsection (1) of this section and who are not otherwise subject to the requirements of chapter 19.02 RCW are not subject to the fees imposed by the department under the authority of RCW 19.02.075.

Sec. 606. RCW 84.34.108 and 2014 c 97 s 311 and 2014 c 58 s 28 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) When land has once been classified under this chapter, a notation of the classification must be made each year upon the assessment and tax rolls and the land must be valued pursuant to RCW 84.34.060 or 84.34.065 until removal of all or a portion of the classification by the assessor upon occurrence of any of the following:

(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove all or a portion of the classification;

(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership, except a transfer that resulted from a default in loan payments made to or secured by a governmental agency that intends to or is required by law or regulation to resell the property for the same use as before, making all or a portion of the land exempt from ad valorem taxation;

(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of classification continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or devisee of a deceased owner or transfer by a transfer on death deed does not, by itself, result in removal of classification. The notice of continuance must be on a form prepared by the department. If the notice of continuance is not signed by the new owner and attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all additional taxes, applicable interest, and penalty calculated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section become due and payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The auditor may not accept an instrument of conveyance regarding classified land for filing or recording unless the new owner has signed the notice of continuance or the additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty has been paid, as evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto by the treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the new assessed valuation calculated under subsection (4) of this section to the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board of equalization to hear these appeals;

(d)(i) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written notice and an opportunity to be heard, that all or a portion of the land no longer meets the criteria for classification under this chapter. The criteria for classification pursuant to this chapter continue to apply after classification has been granted.

(ii) The granting authority, upon request of an assessor, must provide reasonable assistance to the assessor in making a determination whether the land continues to meet the qualifications of RCW 84.34.020 (1) or (3). The assistance must be provided within thirty days of receipt of the request.

(2) Land may not be removed from classification because of:

(a) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements under RCW 76.13.120; or

(b) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW 76.09.040.

(3) Within thirty days after the removal of all or a portion of the land from current use classification under subsection (1) of this section, the assessor must notify the owner in writing, setting forth the reasons for the removal. The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal the removal to the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. The removal notice must explain the steps needed to appeal the removal decision, including when a notice of appeal must be filed, where the forms may be obtained, and how to contact the county board of equalization.

(4) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal, the assessor must revalue the affected land with reference to its true and fair value on January 1st of the year of removal from classification. Both the assessed valuation before and after the removal of classification must be listed and taxes must be allocated according to that part of the year to which each assessed valuation applies. Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, an additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty must be imposed, which are due and payable to the treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the amount of the additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty. As soon as possible, the assessor must compute the amount of additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty and the treasurer must mail notice to the owner of the amount thereof and the date on which payment is due. The amount of the additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty must be determined as follows:

(a) The amount of additional tax is equal to the difference between the property tax paid as "open space land," "farm and agricultural land," or "timberland" and the amount of property tax otherwise due and payable for the seven years last past had the land not been so classified;

(b) The amount of applicable interest is equal to the interest upon the amounts of the additional tax paid at the same statutory rate charged on delinquent property taxes from the dates on which the additional tax could have been paid without penalty if the land had been assessed at a value without regard to this chapter;

(c) The amount of the penalty is as provided in RCW 84.34.080. The penalty may not be imposed if the removal satisfies the conditions of RCW 84.34.070.

(5) Additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty become a lien on the land ((that)). The lien attaches at the time the land is removed from classification under this chapter and ((have)) has priority to and must be fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance, mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with which the land may become charged or liable. This lien may be foreclosed upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050. Any additional tax unpaid on the due date ((will thereupon become [is])) is delinquent as of the due date. From the date of delinquency until paid, interest must be charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.

(6) The additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty specified in subsection (4) of this section may not be imposed if the removal of classification pursuant to subsection (1) of this section resulted solely from:

(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other land located within the state of Washington;

(b)(i) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or (ii) sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of such power, said entity having manifested its intent in writing or by other official action;

(c) A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other such calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the landowner changing the use of the property;

(d) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by the county or city within which the land is located which disallows the present use of the land;

(e) Transfer of land to a church when the land would qualify for exemption pursuant to RCW 84.36.020;

(f) Acquisition of property interests by state agencies or agencies or organizations qualified under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes enumerated in those sections. At such time as these property interests are not used for the purposes enumerated in RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 the additional tax specified in subsection (4) of this section must be imposed;

(g) Removal of land classified as farm and agricultural land under RCW 84.34.020(2)(f);

(h) Removal of land from classification after enactment of a statutory exemption that qualifies the land for exemption and receipt of notice from the owner to remove the land from classification;

(i) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements under RCW 76.13.120;

(j) The creation, sale, or transfer of a conservation easement of private forest lands within unconfined channel migration zones or containing critical habitat for threatened or endangered species under RCW 76.09.040;

(k) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated as forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW, or classified under this chapter continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection (6)(k); or

(l)(i) The discovery that the land was classified under this chapter in error through no fault of the owner. For purposes of this subsection (6)(l), "fault" means a knowingly false or misleading statement, or other act or omission not in good faith, that contributed to the approval of classification under this chapter or the failure of the assessor to remove the land from classification under this chapter.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (6), the discovery that land was classified under this chapter in error through no fault of the owner is not the sole reason for removal of classification pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if an independent basis for removal exists. Examples of an independent basis for removal include the owner changing the use of the land or failing to meet any applicable income criteria required for classification under this chapter.

Sec. 607. RCW 82.04.280 and 2010 c 106 s 205 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of: (a) Printing materials other than newspapers, and of publishing periodicals or magazines; (b) building, repairing or improving any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used, primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind and including any readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the facilities of any public, private or cooperatively owned utility or railroad in the course of such building, repairing or improving, the cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the responsibility of the public authority whose street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired or improved; (c) extracting for hire or processing for hire, except persons taxable as extractors for hire or processors for hire under another section of this chapter; (d) operating a cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse, but not including the rental of cold storage lockers; (e) representing and performing services for fire or casualty insurance companies as an independent resident managing general agent licensed under the provisions of chapter 48.17 RCW; (f) radio and television broadcasting, excluding network, national and regional advertising computed as a standard deduction based on the national average thereof as annually reported by the federal communications commission, or in lieu thereof by itemization by the individual broadcasting station, and excluding that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state audience computed as a ratio to the station's total audience as measured by the 100 micro-volt signal strength and delivery by wire, if any; (g) engaging in activities which bring a person within the definition of consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the product for orderly marketing.

(b) "Storage warehouse" means a building or structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses, fruit warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage" facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual storage areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.

(c) "Periodical or magazine" means a printed publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated intervals at least once every three months, including any supplement or special edition of the publication.

Sec. 608. RCW 82.32.790 and 2010 c 114 s 201 and 2010 c 106 s 401 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) ((Section 206)) Section 401, chapter 106, Laws of 2010, sections 104, 110, 117, 123, 125, 129, 131, ((and)) 150, and 201, chapter 114, Laws of 2010, section ((3)) 9, chapter 461, Laws of 2009, section ((7)) 12, chapter 300, Laws of 2006, and sections ((4)) 1, 2, 3, 5 through 10, and 12, chapter 149, Laws of 2003 are contingent upon the siting and commercial operation of a significant semiconductor microchip fabrication facility in the state of Washington.

(b) For the purposes of this section:

(i) "Commercial operation" means the same as "commencement of commercial production" as used in RCW 82.08.965.

(ii) "Semiconductor microchip fabrication" means "manufacturing semiconductor microchips" as defined in RCW 82.04.426.

(iii) "Significant" means the combined investment of new buildings and new machinery and equipment in the buildings, at the commencement of commercial production, will be at least one billion dollars.

(2) ((Chapter 149, Laws of 2003 takes)) The sections referenced in subsection (1) of this section take effect the first day of the month in which a contract for the construction of a significant semiconductor fabrication facility is signed, as determined by the director of the department of revenue.

(3)(a) The department of revenue must provide notice of the effective date of the sections ((104, 110, 117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws of 2010[,] section 3, chapter 461, Laws of 2009, section 7, chapter 300, Laws of 2006, and section 4, chapter 149, Laws of 2003)) referenced in subsection (1) of this section to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed appropriate by the department.

(b) If, after making a determination that a contract has been signed and ((chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is)) the sections referenced in subsection (1) of this section are effective, the department discovers that commencement of commercial production did not take place within three years of the date the contract was signed, the department must make a determination that chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is no longer effective, and all taxes that would have been otherwise due are deemed deferred taxes and are immediately assessed and payable from any person reporting tax under RCW 82.04.240(2) or claiming an exemption or credit under ((section 2 or 5 through 10, chapter 149, Laws of 2003)) RCW 82.04.426, 82.04.448, 82.08.965, 82.12.965, 82.08.970, 82.12.970, or 84.36.645. The department is not authorized to make a second determination regarding the effective date of ((chapter 149, Laws of 2003)) the sections referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2010 c 106 s 206;

(2) 2009 c 461 s 3;

(3) 2006 c 300 s 7; and

(4) 2003 c 149 s 4.

Part VII

Private school bus operators

Sec. 701. RCW 82.16.010 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 702 are each amended to read as follows:

((For the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the context:)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Express business" means the business of carrying property for public hire on the line of any common carrier operated in this state, when such common carrier is not owned or leased by the person engaging in such business.

(2) "Gas distribution business" means the business of operating a plant or system for the production or distribution for hire or sale of gas, whether manufactured or natural.

(3) "Gross income" means the value proceeding or accruing from the performance of the particular public service or transportation business involved, including operations incidental thereto, but without any deduction on account of the cost of the commodity furnished or sold, the cost of materials used, labor costs, interest, discount, delivery costs, taxes, or any other expense whatsoever paid or accrued and without any deduction on account of losses.

(4) "Light and power business" means the business of operating a plant or system for the generation, production or distribution of electrical energy for hire or sale and/or for the wheeling of electricity for others.

(5) "Log transportation business" means the business of transporting logs by truck, except when such transportation meets the definition of urban transportation business or occurs exclusively upon private roads.

(6) "Motor transportation business" means the business (except urban transportation business) of operating any motor propelled vehicle by which persons or property of others are conveyed for hire, and includes, but is not limited to, the operation of any motor propelled vehicle as an auto transportation company (except urban transportation business), common carrier, or contract carrier as defined by RCW 81.68.010 and 81.80.010. However, "motor transportation business" does not mean or include: (a) A log transportation business; ((or)) (b) the transportation of logs or other forest products exclusively upon private roads or private highways; or (c) the operation of a school bus for student transportation purposes.

(7)(a) "Public service business" means any of the businesses defined in subsections (1), (2), (4), (6), (8), (9), (((10))) (11), (((12))) (13), and (((13))) (14) of this section or any business subject to control by the state, or having the powers of eminent domain and the duties incident thereto, or any business hereafter declared by the legislature to be of a public service nature, except telephone business and low-level radioactive waste site operating companies as redefined in RCW 81.04.010. It includes, among others, without limiting the scope hereof: Airplane transportation, boom, dock, ferry, pipe line, toll bridge, toll logging road, water transportation and wharf businesses. "Public service business" does not include the transportation of logs or other forest products exclusively upon private roads or private highways or the operation of a school bus for student transportation purposes.

(b) The definitions in this subsection (7)(b) apply throughout this subsection (7).

(i) "Competitive telephone service" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.065.

(ii) "Network telephone service" means the providing by any person of access to a telephone network, telephone network switching service, toll service, or coin telephone services, or the providing of telephonic, video, data, or similar communication or transmission for hire, via a telephone network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission system. "Network telephone service" includes the provision of transmission to and from the site of an internet provider via a telephone network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission system. "Network telephone service" does not include the providing of competitive telephone service, the providing of cable television service, the providing of broadcast services by radio or television stations, nor the provision of internet access as defined in RCW 82.04.297, including the reception of dial-in connection, provided at the site of the internet service provider.

(iii) "Telephone business" means the business of providing network telephone service. It includes cooperative or farmer line telephone companies or associations operating an exchange.

(iv) "Telephone service" means competitive telephone service or network telephone service, or both, as defined in (b)(i) and (ii) of this subsection.

(8) "Railroad business" means the business of operating any railroad, by whatever power operated, for public use in the conveyance of persons or property for hire. It ((shall)) does not, however, include any business herein defined as an urban transportation business.

(9) "Railroad car business" means the business of operating stock cars, furniture cars, refrigerator cars, fruit cars, poultry cars, tank cars, sleeping cars, parlor cars, buffet cars, tourist cars, or any other kinds of cars used for transportation of property or persons upon the line of any railroad operated in this state when such railroad is not owned or leased by the person engaging in such business.

(10) "School bus" means every vehicle with a seating capacity of more than ten persons, including the driver, used primarily to transport children to and from school or in connection with school activities. The term does not include buses operated by a transit authority as defined in RCW 9.91.025.

(11) "Telegraph business" means the business of affording telegraphic communication for hire.

(((11))) (12) "Tugboat business" means the business of operating tugboats, towboats, wharf boats or similar vessels in the towing or pushing of vessels, barges or rafts for hire.

(((12))) (13) "Urban transportation business" means the business of operating any vehicle for public use in the conveyance of persons or property for hire, insofar as (a) operating entirely within the corporate limits of any city or town, or within five miles of the corporate limits thereof, or (b) operating entirely within and between cities and towns whose corporate limits are not more than five miles apart or within five miles of the corporate limits of either thereof. Included herein, but without limiting the scope hereof, is the business of operating passenger vehicles of every type and also the business of operating cartage, pickup, or delivery services, including in such services the collection and distribution of property arriving from or destined to a point within or without the state, whether or not such collection or distribution be made by the person performing a local or interstate line-haul of such property. However, "urban transportation business" does not include the operation of a school bus for student transportation purposes.

(((13))) (14) "Water distribution business" means the business of operating a plant or system for the distribution of water for hire or sale.

(((14))) (15) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the term "tax year," "person," "value proceeding or accruing," "business," "engaging in business," "in this state," "within this state," "cash discount" and "successor" ((shall apply)) applies equally in the provisions of this chapter.

Part VIII

Estate tax return filing relief

Sec. 801. RCW 83.100.050 and 2008 c 181 s 504 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A Washington return must be filed if((: (a) A federal return is required to be filed; or (b) for decedents dying prior to January 1, 2006, the gross estate exceeds one million five hundred thousand dollars; or (c) for decedents dying on or after January 1, 2006, the gross estate exceeds two million dollars)) the gross estate equals or exceeds the applicable exclusion amount.

(2) If a Washington return is required as provided in subsection (1) of this section:

(a) A person required to file a federal return ((shall)) must file with the department on or before the date the federal return is required to be filed, including any extension of time for filing under subsection (4) or (6) of this section, a Washington return for the tax due under this chapter.

(b) If no federal return is required to be filed, a taxpayer ((shall)) must file with the department on or before the date a federal return would have been required to be filed, including any extension of time for filing under subsection (5) or (6) of this section, a Washington return for the tax due under this chapter.

(3) A Washington return delivered to the department by United States mail ((shall be)) is considered to have been received by the department on the date of the United States postmark stamped on the cover in which the return is mailed, if the postmark date is within the time allowed for filing the Washington return, including extensions.

(4) In addition to the Washington return required to be filed in subsection (2) of this section, a person((, if required to file a federal return, shall)) must file with the department on or before the date the federal return is or would have been required to be filed all supporting documentation for completed Washington return schedules, and, if a federal return has been filed a copy of the federal return ((along with all supporting documentation)). If the person required to file the federal return has obtained an extension of time for filing the federal return, the person ((shall)) must file the Washington return within the same time period and in the same manner as provided for the federal return. A copy of the federal extension ((shall)) must be filed with the department on or before the date the Washington return is due, not including any extension of time for filing, or within thirty days of issuance, whichever is later.

(5) A person may obtain an extension of time for filing the Washington return as provided by rule of the department, if the person is required to file a Washington return under subsection (2) of this section, but is not required to file a federal return.

(6) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer affected by the emergency, may extend the time for filing a Washington return under this section as the department deems proper.

Part IX

Clarifying that licensing information may not be disclosed for commercial purposes

Sec. 901. RCW 19.02.115 and 2013 c 144 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((For purposes of this section:)) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Disclose" means to make known to any person in any manner licensing information;

(b) "Licensing information" means any information created or obtained by the department in the administration of this chapter and chapters 19.80 and 59.30 RCW, which information relates to any person who: (i) Has applied for or has been issued a license or trade name; or (ii) has been issued an assessment or delinquency fee. Licensing information includes initial and renewal business license applications, and business licenses;

(c) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030 and also includes the state and the state's departments and institutions; and

(d) "State agency" means every Washington state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency.

(2) Licensing information is confidential and privileged, and except as authorized by this section, neither the department nor any other person may disclose any licensing information. Nothing in this chapter requires any person possessing licensing information made confidential and privileged by this section to delete information from such information so as to permit its disclosure.

(3) This section does not prohibit the department of revenue, or any other person receiving licensing information from the department under this subsection, from:

(a) Disclosing licensing information in a civil or criminal judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:

(i) In which the person about whom such licensing information is sought and the department, another state agency, or a local government are adverse parties in the proceeding; or

(ii) Involving a dispute arising out of the department's administration of chapter 19.80 or 59.30 RCW, or this chapter if the licensing information relates to a party in the proceeding;

(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the director prescribes by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, such licensing information regarding a license applicant or license holder to such license applicant or license holder or to such person or persons as that license applicant or license holder may designate in a request for, or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person, at the license applicant's or license holder's request, to the extent necessary to comply with a request for information or assistance made by the license applicant or license holder to such other person. However, licensing information not received from the license applicant or holder must not be so disclosed if the director determines that such disclosure would compromise any investigation or litigation by any federal, state, or local government agency in connection with the civil or criminal liability of the license applicant, license holder, or another person, or that such disclosure would identify a confidential informant, or that such disclosure is contrary to any agreement entered into by the department that provides for the reciprocal exchange of information with other government agencies, which agreement requires confidentiality with respect to such information unless such information is required to be disclosed to the license applicant or license holder by the order of any court;

(c) Publishing statistics so classified as to prevent the identification of particular licensing information;

(d) Disclosing licensing information for official purposes only, to the governor or attorney general, or to any state agency, or to any committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing with matters of taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of industry or the professions, or licensing;

(e) Permitting the department's records to be audited and examined by the proper state officer, his or her agents and employees;

(f) Disclosing any licensing information to a peace officer as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting attorney, for official purposes. The disclosure may be made only in response to a search warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless the disclosure is for the purpose of criminal tax or license enforcement. A peace officer or county prosecuting attorney who receives the licensing information may disclose that licensing information only for use in the investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the court proceeding for which the licensing information originally was sought;

(g) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with other licensing information, the name of a license applicant or license holder, entity type, registered trade name, business address, mailing address, unified business identifier number, list of licenses issued to a person through the business licensing system established in this chapter and their issuance and expiration dates, and the dates of opening of a business. This subsection may not be construed as giving authority to the department to give, sell, or provide access to any list of persons for any commercial purpose;

(h) Disclosing licensing information that is also maintained by another Washington state or local governmental agency as a public record available for inspection and copying under the provisions of chapter 42.56 RCW or is a document maintained by a court of record and is not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;

(i) Disclosing any licensing information when the disclosure is specifically authorized under any other section of the Revised Code of Washington;

(j) Disclosing licensing information to the proper officer of the licensing or tax department of any city, town, or county of this state, for official purposes. If the licensing information does not relate to a license issued by the city, town, or county requesting the licensing information, disclosure may be made only if the laws of the requesting city, town, or county grants substantially similar privileges to the proper officers of this state; or

(k) Disclosing licensing information to the federal government for official purposes.

(4) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, a state agency or local government agency may disclose licensing information relating to a license issued on its behalf by the department pursuant to this chapter if the disclosure is authorized by another statute, local law, or administrative rule.

(5) The department, any other state agency, or local government may refuse to disclose licensing information that is otherwise disclosable under subsection (3) of this section if such disclosure would violate federal law or any information sharing agreement between the state or local government and federal government.

(6) Any person acquiring knowledge of any licensing information in the course of his or her employment with the department and any person acquiring knowledge of any licensing information as provided under subsection (3)(d), (e), (f), (j), or (k) of this section, who discloses any such licensing information to another person not entitled to knowledge of such licensing information under the provisions of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If the person guilty of such violation is an officer or employee of the state, such person must forfeit such office or employment and is incapable of holding any public office or employment in this state for a period of two years thereafter.

Part X

Background investigations

Sec. 1001. RCW 82.01.060 and 2011 c 298 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of revenue, hereinafter in chapter 26, Laws of 1967 ex. sess. referred to as the director, through the department of revenue, hereinafter in chapter 26, Laws of 1967 ex. sess. referred to as the department, must:

(1) Assess and collect all taxes and administer all programs relating to taxes which are the responsibility of the tax commission at the time chapter 26, Laws of 1967 ex. sess. takes effect or which the legislature may hereafter make the responsibility of the director or of the department;

(2) Make, adopt and publish such rules as he or she may deem necessary or desirable to carry out the powers and duties imposed upon him or her or the department by the legislature. However, the director may not adopt rules after July 23, 1995, that are based solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose, on the enabling provisions of the statute establishing the agency, or on any combination of such provisions, for statutory authority to adopt any rule;

(3) Rules adopted by the tax commission before July 23, 1995, remain in force until such time as they may be revised or rescinded by the director;

(4) Provide by general regulations for an adequate system of departmental review of the actions of the department or of its officers and employees in the assessment or collection of taxes;

(5) Maintain a tax research section with sufficient technical, clerical and other employees to conduct constant observation and investigation of the effectiveness and adequacy of the revenue laws of this state and of the sister states in order to assist the governor, the legislature and the director in estimation of revenue, analysis of tax measures, and determination of the administrative feasibility of proposed tax legislation and allied problems;

(6) Recommend to the governor such amendments, changes in, and modifications of the revenue laws as seem proper and requisite to remedy injustice and irregularities in taxation, and to facilitate the assessment and collection of taxes in the most economical manner;

(7) Provide the opportunity for any person feeling aggrieved by any action taken against the person by the department in the administration of chapters 19.02, 19.80, and 59.30 RCW to request a review of the department's action. Such review may be conducted as a brief adjudicative proceeding under RCW 34.05.485 through 34.05.494;

(8)(a) Establish background investigation policies and requirements applicable to those department employees and contractors that are authorized by the department to access federal tax information. Such policies may include state and national-level background checks and must satisfy any specific background investigation standards established by the internal revenue service; and

(b) Ensure that the department complies with its background investigation policies and requirements.

Part XI

Revising the date by which the department of revenue is required to provide estimates of the amount of public forestland that is available for timber harvesting

Sec. 1101. RCW 84.33.089 and 2004 c 177 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department ((shall)) must estimate the number of acres of public forestland that are available for timber harvesting. The department ((shall)) must provide the estimates for each county and for each taxing district within each county by ((August 30th)) October 1st of each year except that the department may authorize a county, at the county's option, to make its own estimates for public forestland in that county. In estimating the number of acres, the department ((shall)) must use the best available information to include public land comparable to private land that qualifies as forestland for assessment purposes and exclude other public lands. The department is not required to update the estimates unless improved information becomes available. The department of natural resources ((shall)) must assist the department with these determinations by providing any data and information in the possession of the department of natural resources on public forestlands, broken out by county and legal description, including a detailed map of each county showing the location of the described lands. The data and information ((shall)) must be provided to the department by July 15th of each year. In addition, the department may contract with other parties to provide data or assistance necessary to implement this section.

(2) To accommodate the phase-in of the county forest excise tax on the harvest of timber from public lands as provided in RCW 84.33.051, the department ((shall)) must adjust its actual estimates of the number of acres of public forestland that are available for timber harvesting. The department ((shall)) must reduce its estimates for the following years by the following amounts:

(a) For calendar year 2005, 70 percent;

(b) For calendar year 2006, 62.5 percent;

(c) For calendar year 2007, 55 percent;

(d) For calendar year 2008, 47.5 percent;

(e) For calendar year 2009, 40 percent;

(f) For calendar year 2010, 32.5 percent;

(g) For calendar year 2011, 22.5 percent;

(h) For calendar year 2012, 15 percent;

(i) For calendar year 2013, 7.5 percent; and

(j) For calendar year 2014 and thereafter, the department ((shall)) may not reduce its estimates of the number of acres of public forestland that are available for timber harvesting.

Part XII

Miscellaneous

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1201. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to any provisions of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1202. (1) Sections 501 and 502 of this act take effect January 1, 2018, unless, before that date, legislation is enacted to repeal RCW 82.32.534 and 82.32.585 and establish a tax preference accountability reporting framework to replace the provisions governing annual reports and surveys in RCW 82.32.534 and 82.32.585.

(2) The department of revenue must provide written notice of the effective date of sections 501 and 502 of this act to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the department.

--- END ---