BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.240 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning July 1, 2017, no manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer may manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for use in this state children's products, as defined in RCW 70.240.010, or residential upholstered furniture, as defined in RCW 70.76.010, containing any of the following flame retardants in amounts greater than one thousand parts per million in any product component:

(1) TDCPP;

(2) TCEP;

(3) Decabromodiphenyl ether;

(4) HBCD; or

(5) Additive TBBPA.

--- END ---