BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.36.120 and 2009 c 333 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall establish:

(1) The form of affidavits or proof required to accompany all claims under this chapter;

(2) The process, time, and methods used to identify and assess damage, including the anticipated timeline for the initiation and conclusion of department action;

(3) How claims will be prioritized when available funds for reimbursement are limited;

(4) Timelines after the discovery of damage by which an owner must file a claim or notify the department;

(5) Protocols for an owner to follow if the owner wishes to undertake activities that would complicate the determination of damages, such as harvesting damaged crops;

(6) The process for determining damage assessments, including the role and selection of professional damage assessors ((and)). The department has the responsibility ((for)) to pay the full cost of reimbursing third-party assessors for their services;

(7) Timelines for a claimant to accept, reject, or appeal a determination made by the department;

(8) The identification of instances when an owner would be ineligible for compensation;

(9) An appeals process for an owner eligible for compensation under RCW 77.36.100 who is denied a claim or feels the compensation is insufficient; and

(10) Other policies necessary for administering this chapter.

--- END ---