BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 52.04.071 and 2011 c 10 s 82 are each amended to read as follows:

The county legislative authority or authorities shall by resolution call a special election to be held in the city, partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town ((and in the fire protection district)) at the next date according to RCW 29A.04.321, and shall cause notice of the election to be given as provided for in RCW 29A.52.355.

The election on the annexation of the city, partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town into the fire protection district shall be conducted by the auditor of the county or counties in which the city, partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town ((and the fire protection district)) are located in accordance with the general election laws of the state. The results thereof shall be canvassed by the canvassing board of the county or counties. No person is entitled to vote at the election unless he or she is a qualified elector in the city, partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town ((or unless he or she is a qualified elector within the boundaries of the fire protection district)). The ballot proposition shall be in substantially the following form:

"Shall the city, partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town of . . . . . . be annexed to and be a part of . . . . . . fire protection district?

YES . . . . . . . . . .

NO . . . . . . . . . . "

If a majority of the persons voting on the proposition in the city, partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town ((and a majority of the persons voting on the proposition in the fire protection district)) vote in favor thereof, the city, partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town shall be annexed and shall be a part of the fire protection district.

--- END ---