BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preferences contained in sections 2 and 3 of this act. This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(2) The legislature categorizes the tax preference in sections 2 and 3 of this act as one intended to create jobs, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(c).

(3) As part of its regular tax preference review, the joint legislative audit and review committee must evaluate whether these tax preferences have increased employment in the federal aviation administration (FAR) repair station sector. In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review, the joint legislative audit and review committee may refer to the annual report and annual survey for tax preferences that federal aviation administration part 145 repair stations are required to file with the department of revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to:

(a) Charges for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing of new buildings, made to: (i) An eligible maintenance repair operator engaged in the maintenance of airplanes; or (ii) a port district, political subdivision, or municipal corporation, if the new building is to be leased to an eligible maintenance repair operator engaged in the maintenance of airplanes.

(b) Sales of tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of such buildings during the course of the constructing; or

(c) Charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing, during the course of constructing such buildings, building fixtures not otherwise eligible for the exemption under RCW 82.08.02565.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "eligible maintenance repair operator" means a person classified by the federal aviation administration as a federal aviation regulation part 145 certificated repair station.

(3) The exemption under this section is available only when the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. Sellers making tax-exempt sales under this section must obtain an exemption certificate from the purchaser in a form and manner prescribed by the department. In lieu of an exemption certificate, a seller may capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate or the data elements for the seller's files.

(4) No application is necessary for the exemption in this section. However, in order to qualify under this section before starting construction, the port district, political subdivision, or municipal corporation must have entered into an agreement with an eligible maintenance and repair operator to build such a facility. A person claiming the exemption under this section is subject to all the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. In addition, the person must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(5) This section expires January 1, 2027.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of:

(a) Tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an ingredient or component in constructing new buildings for: (i) An eligible maintenance repair operator; or (ii) a port district, political subdivision, or municipal corporation, to be leased to an eligible maintenance repair operator; or

(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing, during the course of constructing such buildings, building fixtures not otherwise eligible for the exemption under RCW 82.08.02565.

(2) The eligibility requirements, conditions, and definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section, including the filing of a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(3) This section expires January 1, 2027.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2016.

--- END ---