BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

No policy of any agency may be enforced by an agency until and unless that policy has been adopted pursuant to this chapter and filed with the office of the code reviser pursuant to RCW 34.05.380.

--- END ---