BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.50.281 and 2009 c 536 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state board shall work with the leadership team, the Washington state apprenticeship and training council, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction to jointly develop, by June 30, 2010, curricula and training programs, to include on-the-job training, classroom training, and safety and health training, for the development of the skills and qualifications identified by the department of community, trade, and economic development under section 7 of this act.

(2) The board shall target a portion of any federal stimulus funding received to ensure commensurate capacity for high employer-demand programs of study developed under this section. To that end, the state board must coordinate with the department, the leadership team, the workforce board, or another appropriate state agency in the application for and receipt of any funding that may be made available through the federal youthbuild program, workforce ((investment)) innovation and opportunity act, job corps, or other relevant federal programs.

(3) The board shall provide an interim report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2011, and a final report by December 1, 2013, detailing the effectiveness of, and any recommendations for improving, the worker training curricula and programs established in this section.

(4) Existing curricula and training programs or programs provided by community and technical colleges in the state developed under this section must be recognized as programs of study under RCW 28B.50.273.

(5) Subject to available funding, the board may grant enrollment priority to persons who qualify for a waiver under RCW 28B.15.522 and who enroll in curricula and training programs provided by community or technical colleges in the state that have been developed in accordance with this section.

(6) The college board may prioritize workforce training programs that lead to a credential, certificate, or degree in green economy jobs. For purposes of this section, green economy jobs include those in the primary industries of a green economy including clean energy, high-efficiency building, green transportation, and environmental protection. Prioritization efforts may include but are not limited to: (a) Prioritization of the use of high employer-demand funding for workforce training programs in green economy jobs, if the programs meet minimum criteria for identification as a high-demand program of study as defined by the state board for community and technical colleges, however any additional community and technical college high-demand funding authorized for the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium and thereafter may be subject to prioritization; (b) increased outreach efforts to public utilities, education, labor, government, and private industry to develop tailored, green job training programs; and (c) increased outreach efforts to target populations. Outreach efforts shall be conducted in partnership with local workforce development councils.

(7) The definitions in RCW 43.330.010 apply to this section and RCW 28B.50.282.

Sec. 2. RCW 28C.04.410 and 2009 c 554 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 28C.04.390 and 28C.04.420.

(1) "Applicant" means an educational institution which has made application for a job skills grant under RCW 28C.04.390 and 28C.04.420.

(2) "Business and industry" means a private corporation, institution, firm, person, group, or association concerned with commerce, trades, manufacturing, or the provision of services within the state, or a public or nonprofit hospital licensed by the department of social and health services.

(3) "College board" means the state board for community and technical colleges under chapter 28B.50 RCW.

(4) "Dislocated worker" means an individual who meets the definition of dislocated worker contained in P.L. ((105-220, Sec. 101 on July 25, 1999)) 113-128 Sec. 3.

(5) "Educational institution" means a public secondary or postsecondary institution, an independent institution, or a private career school or college within the state authorized by law to provide a program of skills training or education beyond the secondary school level. Any educational institution receiving a job skills grant under RCW 28C.04.420 shall be free of sectarian control or influence as set forth in Article IX, section 4 of the state Constitution.

(6) "Equipment" means tangible personal property which will further the objectives of the supported program and for which a definite value and evidence in support of the value have been provided by the donor.

(7) "Financial support" means any thing of value which is contributed by business, industry, and others to an educational institution which is reasonably calculated to support directly the development and expansion of a particular program under RCW 28C.04.390 and 28C.04.420 and represents an addition to any financial support previously or customarily provided to such educational institutions by the donor. "Financial support" includes, but is not limited to, funds, equipment, facilities, faculty, and scholarships for matriculating students and trainees.

(8) "Job skills grant" means funding that is provided to an educational institution by the college board for the development or significant expansion of a program under RCW 28C.04.390 and 28C.04.420.

(9) "Job skills program" means a program of skills training or education separate from and in addition to existing vocational education programs and which:

(a) Provides short-term training which has been designated for specific industries;

(b) Provides training for prospective employees before a new plant opens or when existing industry expands;

(c) Includes training and retraining for workers already employed by an existing industry or business where necessary to avoid dislocation or where upgrading of existing employees would create new vacancies for unemployed persons;

(d) Serves areas with high concentrations of economically disadvantaged persons and high unemployment;

(e) Promotes the growth of industry clusters;

(f) Serves areas where there is a shortage of skilled labor to meet job demands; or

(g) Promotes the location of new industry in areas affected by economic dislocation.

(10) "Technical assistance" means professional and any other assistance provided by business and industry to an educational institution, which is reasonably calculated to support directly the development and expansion of a particular program and which represents an addition to any technical assistance previously or customarily provided to the educational institutions by the donor.

Sec. 3. RCW 28C.18.010 and 2013 c 39 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this title.

(1) "Adult basic education" means instruction designed to achieve mastery of skills in reading, writing, oral communication, and computation at a level sufficient to allow the individual to function effectively as a parent, worker, and citizen in the United States, commensurate with that individual's actual ability level, and includes English as a second language and preparation and testing services for a high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536.

(2) "Board" means the workforce training and education coordinating board.

(3) "Director" means the director of the workforce training and education coordinating board.

(4) "Industry skill panel" means a regional partnership of business, labor, and education leaders that identifies skill gaps in a key economic cluster and enables the industry and public partners to respond to and be proactive in addressing workforce skill needs.

(5) "Training system" means programs and courses of secondary vocational education, technical college programs and courses, community college vocational programs and courses, private career school and college programs and courses, employer-sponsored training, adult basic education programs and courses, programs and courses funded by the federal workforce ((investment)) innovation and opportunity act, programs and courses funded by the federal vocational act, programs and courses funded under the federal adult education act, publicly funded programs and courses for adult literacy education, and apprenticeships, and programs and courses offered by private and public nonprofit organizations that are representative of communities or significant segments of communities and provide job training or adult literacy services.

(6) "Vocational education" means organized educational programs offering a sequence of courses which are directly related to the preparation or retraining of individuals in paid or unpaid employment in current or emerging occupations requiring other than a baccalaureate or advanced degree. Such programs shall include competency-based applied learning which contributes to an individual's academic knowledge, higher-order reasoning, and problem-solving skills, work attitudes, general employability skills, and the occupational-specific skills necessary for economic independence as a productive and contributing member of society. Such term also includes applied technology education.

(7) "Workforce development council" means a local workforce ((investment)) development board as established in P.L. ((105-220 Sec. 117)) 113-128 Sec. 107.

(8) "Workforce skills" means skills developed through applied learning that strengthen and reinforce an individual's academic knowledge, critical thinking, problem solving, and work ethic and, thereby, develop the employability, occupational skills, and management of home and work responsibilities necessary for economic independence.

Sec. 4. RCW 28C.18.060 and 2014 c 112 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

The board, in cooperation with the operating agencies of the state training system and private career schools and colleges, shall:

(1) Concentrate its major efforts on planning, coordination evaluation, policy analysis, and recommending improvements to the state's training system;

(2) Advocate for the state training system and for meeting the needs of employers and the workforce for workforce education and training;

(3) Establish and maintain an inventory of the programs of the state training system, and related state programs, and perform a biennial assessment of the vocational education, training, and adult basic education and literacy needs of the state; identify ongoing and strategic education needs; and assess the extent to which employment, training, vocational and basic education, rehabilitation services, and public assistance services represent a consistent, integrated approach to meet such needs;

(4) Develop and maintain a state comprehensive plan for workforce training and education, including but not limited to, goals, objectives, and priorities for the state training system, and review the state training system for consistency with the state comprehensive plan. In developing the state comprehensive plan for workforce training and education, the board shall use, but shall not be limited to: Economic, labor market, and populations trends reports in office of financial management forecasts; joint office of financial management and employment security department labor force, industry employment, and occupational forecasts; the results of scientifically based outcome, net-impact and cost-benefit evaluations; the needs of employers as evidenced in formal employer surveys and other employer input; and the needs of program participants and workers as evidenced in formal surveys and other input from program participants and the labor community;

(5) In consultation with the student achievement council, review and make recommendations to the office of financial management and the legislature on operating and capital facilities budget requests for operating agencies of the state training system for purposes of consistency with the state comprehensive plan for workforce training and education;

(6) Provide for coordination among the different operating agencies and components of the state training system at the state level and at the regional level;

(7) Develop a consistent and reliable database on vocational education enrollments, costs, program activities, and job placements from publicly funded vocational education programs in this state;

(8)(a) Establish standards for data collection and maintenance for the operating agencies of the state training system in a format that is accessible to use by the board. The board shall require a minimum of common core data to be collected by each operating agency of the state training system;

(b) Develop requirements for minimum common core data in consultation with the office of financial management and the operating agencies of the training system;

(9) Establish minimum standards for program evaluation for the operating agencies of the state training system, including, but not limited to, the use of common survey instruments and procedures for measuring perceptions of program participants and employers of program participants, and monitor such program evaluation;

(10) Every two years administer scientifically based outcome evaluations of the state training system, including, but not limited to, surveys of program participants, surveys of employers of program participants, and matches with employment security department payroll and wage files. Every five years administer scientifically based net-impact and cost-benefit evaluations of the state training system;

(11) In cooperation with the employment security department, provide for the improvement and maintenance of quality and utility in occupational information and forecasts for use in training system planning and evaluation. Improvements shall include, but not be limited to, development of state-based occupational change factors involving input by employers and employees, and delineation of skill and training requirements by education level associated with current and forecasted occupations;

(12) Provide for the development of common course description formats, common reporting requirements, and common definitions for operating agencies of the training system;

(13) Provide for effectiveness and efficiency reviews of the state training system;

(14) In cooperation with the student achievement council, facilitate transfer of credit policies and agreements between institutions of the state training system, and encourage articulation agreements for programs encompassing two years of secondary workforce education and two years of postsecondary workforce education;

(15) In cooperation with the student achievement council, facilitate transfer of credit policies and agreements between private training institutions and institutions of the state training system;

(16) Develop policy objectives for the workforce ((investment)) innovation and opportunity act, P.L. ((105-220)) 113-128, or its successor; develop coordination criteria for activities under the act with related programs and services provided by state and local education and training agencies; and ensure that entrepreneurial training opportunities are available through programs of each local workforce ((investment)) development board in the state;

(17) Make recommendations to the commission of student assessment, the state board of education, and the superintendent of public instruction, concerning basic skill competencies and essential core competencies for K-12 education. Basic skills for this purpose shall be reading, writing, computation, speaking, and critical thinking, essential core competencies for this purpose shall be English, math, science/technology, history, geography, and critical thinking. The board shall monitor the development of and provide advice concerning secondary curriculum which integrates vocational and academic education;

(18) Establish and administer programs for marketing and outreach to businesses and potential program participants;

(19) Facilitate the location of support services, including but not limited to, child care, financial aid, career counseling, and job placement services, for students and trainees at institutions in the state training system, and advocate for support services for trainees and students in the state training system;

(20) Facilitate private sector assistance for the state training system, including but not limited to: Financial assistance, rotation of private and public personnel, and vocational counseling;

(21) Facilitate the development of programs for school-to-work transition that combine classroom education and on-the-job training, including entrepreneurial education and training, in industries and occupations without a significant number of apprenticeship programs;

(22) Include in the planning requirements for local workforce ((investment)) development boards a requirement that the local workforce ((investment)) development boards specify how entrepreneurial training is to be offered through the one-stop system required under the workforce ((investment)) innovation and opportunity act, P.L. ((105-220)) 113-128, or its successor;

(23) Encourage and assess progress for the equitable representation of racial and ethnic minorities, women, and people with disabilities among the students, teachers, and administrators of the state training system. Equitable, for this purpose, shall mean substantially proportional to their percentage of the state population in the geographic area served. This function of the board shall in no way lessen more stringent state or federal requirements for representation of racial and ethnic minorities, women, and people with disabilities;

(24) Participate in the planning and policy development of governor set-aside grants under P.L. 97-300, as amended;

(25) Administer veterans' programs, licensure of private vocational schools, the job skills program, and the Washington award for vocational excellence;

(26) Allocate funding from the state job training trust fund;

(27) Work with the director of commerce to ensure coordination among workforce training priorities and economic development and entrepreneurial development efforts, including but not limited to assistance to industry clusters;

(28) Conduct research into workforce development programs designed to reduce the high unemployment rate among young people between approximately eighteen and twenty-four years of age. In consultation with the operating agencies, the board shall advise the governor and legislature on policies and programs to alleviate the high unemployment rate among young people. The research shall include disaggregated demographic information and, to the extent possible, income data for adult youth. The research shall also include a comparison of the effectiveness of programs examined as a part of the research conducted in this subsection in relation to the public investment made in these programs in reducing unemployment of young adults. The board shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2008, and every two years thereafter. Where possible, the data reported to the legislative committees should be reported in numbers and in percentages;

(29) Adopt rules as necessary to implement this chapter.

The board may delegate to the director any of the functions of this section.

Sec. 5. RCW 28C.18.150 and 2009 c 151 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Workforce development councils, in partnership with local elected officials, shall develop and maintain a local unified plan for the workforce development system including, but not limited to, the local plan required by P.L. ((105-220, Title I)) 113-128 Sec. 108. The unified plan shall include a strategic plan that assesses local employment opportunities and skill needs, the present and future workforce, the current workforce development system, information on financial resources, diversity, goals, objectives, and strategies for the local workforce development system, and a system-wide financial strategy for implementing the plan. Local workforce development councils shall submit their strategic plans to the board for review and to the governor for approval.

(2) The strategic plan shall clearly articulate the connection between workforce and economic development efforts in the local area including the area industry clusters and the strategic clusters the community is targeting for growth. The plan shall include, but is not limited to:

(a) Data on current and projected employment opportunities in the local area;

(b) Identification of workforce investment needs of existing businesses and businesses considering location in the region, with special attention to industry clusters;

(c) Identification of educational, training, employment, and support service needs of job seekers and workers in the local area, including individuals with disabilities and other underrepresented talent sources;

(d) Analysis of the industry demand, potential labor force supply, and educational, employment, and workforce support available to businesses and job seekers in the region; and

(e) Collaboration with associate development organizations in regional planning efforts involving combined strategies around workforce development and economic development policies and programs. Combined planning efforts shall include, but not be limited to, assistance to industry clusters in the area.

(3) The board shall work with workforce development councils to develop implementation and funding strategies for purposes of this section.

Sec. 6. RCW 28C.18.164 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 24 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Opportunity internship consortia may apply to the board to offer an opportunity internship program.

(a) The board, in consultation with the Washington state apprenticeship and training council, may select those consortia that demonstrate the strongest commitment and readiness to implement a high quality opportunity internship program for low-income high school students. The board shall place a priority on consortia with demonstrated experience working with similar populations of students and demonstrated capacity to assist a large number of students through the progression of internship or preapprenticeship, high school graduation, postsecondary education, and retention in a high-demand occupation. The board shall place a priority on programs that emphasize secondary career and technical education and nonbaccalaureate postsecondary education; however, programs that target four-year postsecondary degrees are eligible to participate.

(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection (1), the board shall enter into a contract with each consortium selected to participate in the program. No more than ten consortia per year shall be selected to participate in the program, and to the extent possible, the board shall assure a geographic distribution of consortia in regions across the state emphasizing a variety of targeted industries. Each consortium may select no more than one hundred low-income high school students per year to participate in the program.

(ii) For fiscal years 2011 through 2013, the board shall enter into a contract with each consortium selected to participate in the program. No more than twelve consortia per year shall be selected to participate in the program, and to the extent possible, the board shall assure a geographic distribution of consortia in regions across the state emphasizing a variety of targeted industries. No more than five thousand low-income high school students per year may be selected to participate in the program.

(2) Under the terms of an opportunity internship program contract, an opportunity internship consortium shall commit to the following activities which shall be conducted using existing federal, state, local, or private funds available to the consortium:

(a) Identify high-demand occupations in targeted industries for which opportunity internships or preapprenticeships shall be developed and provided;

(b) Develop and implement the components of opportunity internships, including paid or unpaid internships or preapprenticeships of at least ninety hours in length in high-demand occupations with employers in the consortium, mentoring and guidance for students who participate in the program, assistance with applications for postsecondary programs and financial aid, and a guarantee of a job interview with a participating employer for all opportunity internship graduates who successfully complete a postsecondary program of study;

(c) Once the internship or preapprenticeship components have been developed, conduct outreach efforts to inform low-income high school students about high-demand occupations, the opportunity internship program, options for postsecondary programs of study, and the incentives and opportunities provided to students who participate in the program;

(d) Obtain appropriate documentation of the low-income status of students who participate in the program;

(e) Maintain communication with opportunity internship graduates of the consortium who enroll in postsecondary programs of study; and

(f) Submit an annual report to the board on the progress of and participation in the opportunity internship program of the consortium.

(3) Opportunity internship consortia are encouraged to:

(a) Provide paid opportunity internships or preapprenticeships, including during the summer months to encourage students to stay enrolled in high school;

(b) Work with high schools to offer opportunity internships as approved worksite learning experiences where students can earn high school credit;

(c) Designate the local workforce development council as fiscal agent for the opportunity internship program contract;

(d) Work with area high schools to incorporate the opportunity internship program into comprehensive guidance and counseling programs such as the navigation 101 program; and

(e) Coordinate the opportunity internship program with other workforce development and postsecondary education programs, including opportunity grants, the college bound scholarship program, federal workforce ((investment)) innovation and opportunity act initiatives, and college access challenge grants.

(4) The board shall seek federal funds that may be used to support the opportunity internship program, including providing the incentive payments under RCW 28C.18.168.

Sec. 7. RCW 50.20.250 and 2012 c 40 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that the establishment of a self-employment assistance program would assist unemployed individuals and create new businesses and job opportunities in Washington state. The department must inform all individuals eligible under the terms of RCW 50.20.010 of the availability of self-employment assistance and entrepreneurial training programs and of the training provisions of RCW 50.20.043 which would allow them to pursue commissioner-approved training. In addition, when individuals are identified as likely to exhaust benefits under RCW 50.20.011, and when individuals are otherwise eligible for commissioner-approved training under RCW 50.20.043, the department must inform such individuals of the opportunity to enroll in commissioner-approved self-employment assistance programs.

(2) An unemployed individual is eligible to participate in a self-employment assistance program if it has been determined that he or she:

(a) Is otherwise eligible for regular benefits as defined in RCW 50.22.010;

(b) Has been identified as likely to exhaust regular unemployment benefits under a profiling system established by the commissioner as defined in P.L. 103-152 or is otherwise eligible for commissioner-approved training under RCW 50.20.043; and

(c) Is enrolled in a self-employment assistance program that is approved by the commissioner, and includes entrepreneurial training, business counseling, technical assistance, and requirements to engage in activities relating to the establishment of a business and becoming self-employed.

(3) Individuals participating in a self-employment assistance program approved by the commissioner are eligible to receive their regular unemployment benefits.

(a) The requirements of RCW 50.20.010 and 50.20.080 relating to availability for work, active search for work, and refusal to accept suitable work are not applicable to an individual in the self-employment assistance program for the first fifty-two weeks of the individual's participation in the program. However, enrollment in a self-employment assistance program does not entitle the enrollee to any benefit payments he or she would not be entitled to had he or she not enrolled in the program.

(b) An individual who meets the requirements of this section is considered to be "unemployed" under RCW 50.04.310 and 50.20.010.

(4) An individual who fails to participate in his or her approved self-employment assistance program as prescribed by the commissioner is disqualified from continuation in the program.

(5) The commissioner must take all steps necessary in carrying out this section to assure collaborative involvement of interested parties in program development, and to ensure that the self-employment assistance programs meet all federal criteria for withdrawal from the unemployment fund. The commissioner may approve, as self-employment assistance programs, existing self-employment training programs available through community colleges, workforce ((investment)) development boards, or other organizations and is not obligated by this section to expend any departmental funds for the operation of self-employment assistance programs, unless specific funding is provided to the department for that purpose through federal or state appropriations.

(6) The commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 8. RCW 50.22.150 and 2009 c 353 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section applies to claims with an effective date before April 5, 2009.

(2) Subject to availability of funds, training benefits are available for an individual who is eligible for or has exhausted entitlement to unemployment compensation benefits and who:

(a) Is a dislocated worker as defined in RCW 50.04.075;

(b) Except as provided under subsection (3) of this section, has demonstrated, through a work history, sufficient tenure in an occupation or in work with a particular skill set. This screening will take place during the assessment process;

(c) Is, after assessment of demand for the individual's occupation or skills in the individual's labor market, determined to need job-related training to find suitable employment in his or her labor market. Beginning July 1, 2001, the assessment of demand for the individual's occupation or skill sets must be substantially based on declining occupation or skill sets identified in local labor market areas by the local workforce development councils, in cooperation with the employment security department and its labor market information division, under subsection (11) of this section;

(d) Develops an individual training program that is submitted to the commissioner for approval within sixty days after the individual is notified by the employment security department of the requirements of this section;

(e) Enters the approved training program by ninety days after the date of the notification, unless the employment security department determines that the training is not available during the ninety-day period, in which case the individual enters training as soon as it is available; and

(f) Is enrolled in training approved under this section on a full-time basis as determined by the educational institution, and is making satisfactory progress in the training as certified by the educational institution.

(3) Until June 30, 2002, the following individuals who meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section may, without regard to the tenure requirements under subsection (2)(b) of this section, receive training benefits as provided in this section:

(a) An exhaustee who has base year employment in the aerospace industry assigned the standard industrial classification code "372" or the North American industry classification system code "336411";

(b) An exhaustee who has base year employment in the forest products industry, determined by the department, but including the industries assigned the major group standard industrial classification codes "24" and "26" or any equivalent codes in the North American industry classification system code, and the industries involved in the harvesting and management of logs, transportation of logs and wood products, processing of wood products, and the manufacturing and distribution of wood processing and logging equipment; or

(c) An exhaustee who has base year employment in the fishing industry assigned the standard industrial classification code "0912" or any equivalent codes in the North American industry classification system code.

(4) An individual is not eligible for training benefits under this section if he or she:

(a) Is a standby claimant who expects recall to his or her regular employer;

(b) Has a definite recall date that is within six months of the date he or she is laid off; or

(c) Is unemployed due to a regular seasonal layoff which demonstrates a pattern of unemployment consistent with the provisions of RCW 50.20.015. Regular seasonal layoff does not include layoff due to permanent structural downsizing or structural changes in the individual's labor market.

(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Educational institution" means an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 or an educational institution as defined in RCW 28C.04.410, including equivalent educational institutions in other states.

(b) "Sufficient tenure" means earning a plurality of wages in a particular occupation or using a particular skill set during the base year and at least two of the four twelve-month periods immediately preceding the base year.

(c) "Training benefits" means additional benefits paid under this section.

(d) "Training program" means:

(i) An education program determined to be necessary as a prerequisite to vocational training after counseling at the educational institution in which the individual enrolls under his or her approved training program; or

(ii) A vocational training program at an educational institution:

(A) That is targeted to training for a high-demand occupation. Beginning July 1, 2001, the assessment of high-demand occupations authorized for training under this section must be substantially based on labor market and employment information developed by local workforce development councils, in cooperation with the employment security department and its labor market information division, under subsection (11) of this section;

(B) That is likely to enhance the individual's marketable skills and earning power; and

(C) That meets the criteria for performance developed by the workforce training and education coordinating board for the purpose of determining those training programs eligible for funding under Title I of P.L. ((105-220)) 113-128.

"Training program" does not include any course of education primarily intended to meet the requirements of a baccalaureate or higher degree, unless the training meets specific requirements for certification, licensing, or for specific skills necessary for the occupation.

(6) Benefits shall be paid as follows:

(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(iii) of this subsection, for exhaustees who are eligible under subsection (2) of this section, the total training benefit amount shall be fifty-two times the individual's weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits and extended benefits paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit year; or

(ii) For exhaustees who are eligible under subsection (3) of this section, for claims filed before June 30, 2002, the total training benefit amount shall be seventy-four times the individual's weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits and extended benefits paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit year; or

(iii) For exhaustees eligible under subsection (2) of this section from industries listed under subsection (3)(a) of this section, for claims filed on or after June 30, 2002, but before January 5, 2003, the total training benefit amount shall be seventy-four times the individual's weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits and extended benefits paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit year.

(b) The weekly benefit amount shall be the same as the regular weekly amount payable during the applicable benefit year and shall be paid under the same terms and conditions as regular benefits. The training benefits shall be paid before any extended benefits but not before any similar federally funded program.

(c) Training benefits are not payable for weeks more than two years beyond the end of the benefit year of the regular claim.

(7) The requirement under RCW 50.22.010(10) relating to exhausting regular benefits does not apply to an individual otherwise eligible for training benefits under this section when the individual's benefit year ends before his or her training benefits are exhausted and the individual is eligible for a new benefit year. These individuals will have the option of remaining on the original claim or filing a new claim.

(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, individuals who receive training benefits under this section or under any previous additional benefits program for training are not eligible for training benefits under this section for five years from the last receipt of training benefits under this section or under any previous additional benefits program for training.

(b) With respect to claims that are filed before January 5, 2003, an individual in the aerospace industry assigned the standard industrial code "372" or the North American industry classification system code "336411" who received training benefits under this section, and who had been making satisfactory progress in a training program but did not complete the program, is eligible, without regard to the five-year limitation of this section and without regard to the requirement of subsection (2)(b) of this section, if applicable, to receive training benefits under this section in order to complete that training program. The total training benefit amount that applies to the individual is seventy-four times the individual's weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit year in which the training program resumed and, if applicable, reduced by the amount of training benefits paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit year in which the training program commenced.

(9) An individual eligible to receive a trade readjustment allowance under chapter 2 of Title II of the Trade Act of 1974, as amended, shall not be eligible to receive benefits under this section for each week the individual receives such trade readjustment allowance. An individual eligible to receive emergency unemployment compensation, so called, under any federal law, shall not be eligible to receive benefits under this section for each week the individual receives such compensation.

(10) All base year employers are interested parties to the approval of training and the granting of training benefits.

(11) By July 1, 2001, each local workforce development council, in cooperation with the employment security department and its labor market information division, must identify high-demand occupations and occupations in declining employer demand. For the purposes of RCW 50.22.130 through 50.22.150 and section 9, chapter 2, Laws of 2000, "high-demand occupation" means an occupation with a substantial number of current or projected employment opportunities. Local workforce development councils must use state and locally developed labor market information. Thereafter, each local workforce development council shall update this information annually or more frequently if needed.

(12) The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 9. RCW 50.22.155 and 2011 c 4 s 9 and 2011 c 3 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after April 5, 2009, and before July 1, 2012:

(a) Subject to availability of funds, training benefits are available for an individual who is eligible for or has exhausted entitlement to unemployment compensation benefits when:

(i) The individual is a dislocated worker as defined in RCW 50.04.075 and, after assessment of the individual's labor market, occupation, or skills, is determined to need job-related training to find suitable employment in the individual's labor market. The assessment of demand for the individual's occupation or skill sets must be substantially based on declining occupation or skill sets and high-demand occupations identified in local labor market areas by the local workforce development councils in cooperation with the employment security department and its labor market information division; or

(ii) For claims with an effective date on or after September 7, 2009, the individual:

(A) Earned an average hourly wage in the individual's base year that is less than one hundred thirty percent of the state minimum wage and, after assessment, it is determined that the individual's earning potential will be enhanced through vocational training. The individual's average hourly wage is calculated by dividing the total wages paid by the total hours worked in the individual's base year;

(B) Served in the United States military or the Washington national guard during the twelve-month period prior to the application date, was honorably discharged from military service or the Washington national guard and, after assessment, is determined to need job-related training to find suitable employment in the individual's labor market;

(C) Is currently serving in the Washington national guard and, after assessment, is determined to need job-related training to find suitable employment in the individual's labor market; or

(D) Is disabled due to an injury or illness and, after assessment, is determined to be unable to return to his or her previous occupation and to need job-related training to find suitable employment in the individual's labor market.

(b)(i) The individual must develop an individual training program that is submitted to the commissioner for approval within ninety days after the individual is notified by the employment security department of the requirements of this section;

(ii) The individual must enter the approved training program by one hundred twenty days after the date of the notification, unless the employment security department determines that the training is not available during the one hundred twenty days, in which case the individual enters training as soon as it is available;

(iii) The department may waive the deadlines established under this subsection for reasons deemed by the commissioner to be good cause.

(c) The individual must be enrolled in training approved under this section on a full-time basis as determined by the educational institution, except that less than full-time training may be approved when the individual has a physical, mental, or emotional disability that precludes enrollment on a full-time basis.

(d) The individual must make satisfactory progress in the training as defined by the commissioner and certified by the educational institution.

(e) An individual is not eligible for training benefits under this section if he or she:

(i) Is a standby claimant who expects recall to his or her regular employer; or

(ii) Has a definite recall date that is within six months of the date he or she is laid off.

(f) The following definitions apply throughout this subsection (1) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(i) "Educational institution" means an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 or an educational institution as defined in RCW 28C.04.410, including equivalent educational institutions in other states.

(ii) "High-demand occupation" means an occupation with a substantial number of current or projected employment opportunities.

(iii) "Training benefits" means additional benefits paid under this section.

(iv) "Training program" means:

(A) An education program determined to be necessary as a prerequisite to vocational training after counseling at the educational institution in which the individual enrolls under his or her approved training program; or

(B) A vocational training program at an educational institution that:

(I) Is targeted to training for a high-demand occupation;

(II) Is likely to enhance the individual's marketable skills and earning power; and

(III) Meets the criteria for performance developed by the workforce training and education coordinating board for the purpose of determining those training programs eligible for funding under Title I of P.L. ((105-220)) 113-128.

"Training program" does not include any course of education primarily intended to meet the requirements of a baccalaureate or higher degree, unless the training meets specific requirements for certification, licensing, or for specific skills necessary for the occupation.

(g) Benefits shall be paid as follows:

(i) The total training benefit amount shall be fifty-two times the individual's weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits and extended benefits paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit year.

(ii) The weekly benefit amount shall be the same as the regular weekly amount payable during the applicable benefit year and shall be paid under the same terms and conditions as regular benefits.

(iii) Training benefits shall be paid before any extended benefits but not before any similar federally funded program. Effective July 3, 2011, training benefits shall be paid after any federally funded program.

(iv) Training benefits are not payable for weeks more than two years beyond the end of the benefit year of the regular claim. However, training benefits are not payable for weeks more than three years beyond the end of the benefit year of the regular claim when individuals are eligible for benefits in accordance with RCW 50.22.010 (2)(((c))) (b) or (3)(((c))) (b).

(h) The requirement under RCW 50.22.010(10) relating to exhausting regular benefits does not apply to an individual otherwise eligible for training benefits under this section when the individual's benefit year ends before his or her training benefits are exhausted and the individual is eligible for a new benefit year. These individuals will have the option of remaining on the original claim or filing a new claim.

(i) Individuals who receive training benefits under RCW 50.22.150 or this section are not eligible for training benefits under this section for five years from the last receipt of training benefits.

(j) An individual eligible to receive a trade readjustment allowance under chapter 2, Title II of the trade act of 1974, as amended, shall not be eligible to receive benefits under this section for each week the individual receives such trade readjustment allowance.

(k) An individual eligible to receive emergency unemployment compensation under any federal law shall not be eligible to receive benefits under this section for each week the individual receives such compensation.

(l) All base year employers are interested parties to the approval of training and the granting of training benefits.

(m) Each local workforce development council, in cooperation with the employment security department and its labor market information division, must identify occupations and skill sets that are declining and high-demand occupations and skill sets. Each local workforce development council shall update this information annually or more frequently if needed.

(2) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after July 1, 2012:

(a) Training benefits are available for an individual who is eligible for or has exhausted entitlement to unemployment compensation benefits when:

(i) The individual is a dislocated worker as defined in RCW 50.04.075 and, after assessment of the individual's labor market, occupation, or skills, is determined to need job-related training to find suitable employment in the individual's labor market. The assessment of demand for the individual's occupation or skill sets must be substantially based on declining occupation or skill sets and high-demand occupations identified in local labor market areas by the local workforce development councils in cooperation with the employment security department and its labor market information division; or

(ii) Subject to the availability of funds as specified in RCW 50.22.140, the individual:

(A) Earned an average hourly wage in the individual's base year that is less than one hundred thirty percent of the state minimum wage and, after assessment, it is determined that the individual's earning potential will be enhanced through vocational training. The individual's average hourly wage is calculated by dividing the total wages paid by the total hours worked in the individual's base year;

(B) Served in the United States military or the Washington national guard during the twelve-month period prior to the application date, was honorably discharged from military service or the Washington national guard and, after assessment, is determined to need job-related training to find suitable employment in the individual's labor market;

(C) Is currently serving in the Washington national guard and, after assessment, is determined to need job-related training to find suitable employment in the individual's labor market; or

(D) Is disabled due to an injury or illness and, after assessment, is determined to be unable to return to his or her previous occupation and to need job-related training to find suitable employment in the individual's labor market.

(b)(i) Except for an individual eligible under (a)(i) of this subsection, the individual must develop an individual training plan that is submitted to the commissioner for approval within ninety days after the individual is notified by the employment security department of the requirements of this section;

(ii) Except for an individual eligible under (a)(i) of this subsection, the individual must enroll in the approved training program by one hundred twenty days after the date of the notification, unless the employment security department determines that the training is not available during the one hundred twenty days, in which case the individual enters training as soon as it is available;

(iii) An individual eligible under (a)(i) of this subsection must submit an individual training plan and enroll in the approved training program prior to the end of the individual's benefit year;

(iv) The department may waive the deadlines established under (b)(i) and (ii) of this subsection for reasons deemed by the commissioner to be good cause.

(c) Except for an individual eligible under (a)(i) of this subsection, the individual must be enrolled in training approved under this section on a full-time basis as determined by the educational institution, except that less than full-time training may be approved when the individual has a physical, mental, or emotional disability that precludes enrollment on a full-time basis.

(d) The individual must make satisfactory progress in the training as defined by the commissioner and certified by the educational institution.

(e) An individual is not eligible for training benefits under this section if he or she:

(i) Is a standby claimant who expects recall to his or her regular employer; or

(ii) Has a definite recall date that is within six months of the date he or she is laid off.

(f) The following definitions apply throughout this subsection (2) unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(i) "Educational institution" means an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 or an educational institution as defined in RCW 28C.04.410, including equivalent educational institutions in other states.

(ii) "High-demand occupation" means an occupation with a substantial number of current or projected employment opportunities.

(iii) "Training benefits" means additional benefits paid under this section.

(iv) "Training program" means:

(A) An education program determined to be necessary as a prerequisite to vocational training after counseling at the educational institution in which the individual enrolls under his or her approved training program; or

(B) A vocational training program at an educational institution that:

(I) Is targeted to training for a high-demand occupation;

(II) Is likely to enhance the individual's marketable skills and earning power; and

(III) Meets the criteria for performance developed by the workforce training and education coordinating board for the purpose of determining those training programs eligible for funding under Title I of P.L. ((105-220)) 113-128.

"Training program" does not include any course of education primarily intended to meet the requirements of a baccalaureate or higher degree, unless the training meets specific requirements for certification, licensing, or for specific skills necessary for the occupation.

(g) Available benefits shall be paid as follows:

(i) The total training benefit amount shall be fifty-two times the individual's weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit year.

(ii) The weekly benefit amount shall be the same as the regular weekly amount payable during the applicable benefit year and shall be paid under the same terms and conditions as regular benefits.

(iii) Training benefits shall be paid after any federally funded program.

(iv) Training benefits are not payable for weeks more than two years beyond the end of the benefit year of the regular claim. However, training benefits are not payable for weeks more than three years beyond the end of the benefit year of the regular claim when individuals are eligible for benefits in accordance with RCW 50.22.010 (2)(((c))) (b) or (3)(((c))) (b).

(h) The requirement under RCW 50.22.010(10) relating to exhausting regular benefits does not apply to an individual otherwise eligible for training benefits under this section when the individual's benefit year ends before his or her training benefits are exhausted and the individual is eligible for a new benefit year. These individuals will have the option of remaining on the original claim or filing a new claim.

(i) Except for individuals eligible under (a)(i) of this subsection, individuals who receive training benefits under RCW 50.22.150 or this section are not eligible for training benefits under this section for five years from the last receipt of training benefits.

(j) An individual eligible to receive a trade readjustment allowance under chapter 2, Title II of the trade act of 1974, as amended, shall not be eligible to receive benefits under this section for each week the individual receives such trade readjustment allowance.

(k) An individual eligible to receive emergency unemployment compensation under any federal law shall not be eligible to receive benefits under this section for each week the individual receives such compensation.

(l) All base year employers are interested parties to the approval of training and the granting of training benefits.

(m) Each local workforce development council, in cooperation with the employment security department and its labor market information division, must identify occupations and skill sets that are declining and high-demand occupations and skill sets. Each local workforce development council shall update this information annually or more frequently if needed.

(3) The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 10. RCW 50.62.030 and 2012 c 40 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Job service resources must be used to assist with the reemployment of unemployed workers using the most efficient and effective means of service delivery. The job service program of the employment security department may undertake any program or activity for which funds are available and which furthers the goals of this chapter. These programs and activities must include, but are not limited to:

(a) Giving older unemployed workers and the long-term unemployed the highest priority for all services made available under this section. The employment security department must make the services provided under this chapter available to the older unemployed workers and the long-term unemployed as soon as they register under the employment assistance program;

(b) Supplementing basic employment services, with special job search and claimant placement assistance designed to assist unemployment insurance claimants to obtain employment;

(c) Providing employment services, such as recruitment, screening, and referral of qualified workers, to agricultural areas where these services have in the past contributed to positive economic conditions for the agricultural industry; and

(d) Providing otherwise unobtainable information and analysis to the legislature and program managers about issues related to employment and unemployment.

(2) Individuals who are eligible for services under the federal workforce ((investment)) innovation and opportunity act, P.L. ((105-220)) 113-128 or its successor(([,])), must be provided the opportunity to enroll in self-employment assistance or entrepreneurial training programs to prepare them for self-employment on the same basis as they are provided the opportunity to enroll in other training programs funded under the federal workforce ((investment)) innovation and opportunity act. The department must work with local workforce development councils to ensure that the contracting process with training providers is efficient and that the number of entrepreneurial training providers on the state's eligible training provider list is sufficient to meet demand. Each local workforce development council must:

(a) Notify all individuals eligible for services under the workforce ((investment)) innovation and opportunity act of the availability of self-employment assistance and entrepreneurial training; and

(b) Establish and implement a plan for expending workforce ((investment)) innovation and opportunity act funds on self-employment assistance and entrepreneurial training at a rate that is commensurate with either the demand for such services or the rate of self-employment within the council's workforce development area.

Sec. 11. RCW 74.15.020 and 2013 c 105 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter and RCW 74.13.031 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association, corporation, or facility which receives children, expectant mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities for control, care, or maintenance outside their own homes, or which places, arranges the placement of, or assists in the placement of children, expectant mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities for foster care or placement of children for adoption, and shall include the following irrespective of whether there is compensation to the agency or to the children, expectant mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities for services rendered:

(a) "Child-placing agency" means an agency which places a child or children for temporary care, continued care, or for adoption;

(b) "Community facility" means a group care facility operated for the care of juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185. A county detention facility that houses juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185 pursuant to a contract with the department is not a community facility;

(c) "Crisis residential center" means an agency which is a temporary protective residential facility operated to perform the duties specified in chapter 13.32A RCW, in the manner provided in RCW 74.13.032 through 74.13.036;

(d) "Emergency respite center" is an agency that may be commonly known as a crisis nursery, that provides emergency and crisis care for up to seventy-two hours to children who have been admitted by their parents or guardians to prevent abuse or neglect. Emergency respite centers may operate for up to twenty-four hours a day, and for up to seven days a week. Emergency respite centers may provide care for children ages birth through seventeen, and for persons eighteen through twenty with developmental disabilities who are admitted with a sibling or siblings through age seventeen. Emergency respite centers may not substitute for crisis residential centers or HOPE centers, or any other services defined under this section, and may not substitute for services which are required under chapter 13.32A or 13.34 RCW;

(e) "Foster-family home" means an agency which regularly provides care on a twenty-four hour basis to one or more children, expectant mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities in the family abode of the person or persons under whose direct care and supervision the child, expectant mother, or person with a developmental disability is placed;

(f) "Group-care facility" means an agency, other than a foster-family home, which is maintained and operated for the care of a group of children on a twenty-four hour basis;

(g) "HOPE center" means an agency licensed by the secretary to provide temporary residential placement and other services to street youth. A street youth may remain in a HOPE center for thirty days while services are arranged and permanent placement is coordinated. No street youth may stay longer than thirty days unless approved by the department and any additional days approved by the department must be based on the unavailability of a long-term placement option. A street youth whose parent wants him or her returned to home may remain in a HOPE center until his or her parent arranges return of the youth, not longer. All other street youth must have court approval under chapter 13.34 or 13.32A RCW to remain in a HOPE center up to thirty days;

(h) "Maternity service" means an agency which provides or arranges for care or services to expectant mothers, before or during confinement, or which provides care as needed to mothers and their infants after confinement;

(i) "Resource and assessment center" means an agency that provides short-term emergency and crisis care for a period up to seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays to children who have been removed from their parent's or guardian's care by child protective services or law enforcement;

(j) "Responsible living skills program" means an agency licensed by the secretary that provides residential and transitional living services to persons ages sixteen to eighteen who are dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW and who have been unable to live in his or her legally authorized residence and, as a result, the minor lived outdoors or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy by the minor. Dependent minors ages fourteen and fifteen may be eligible if no other placement alternative is available and the department approves the placement;

(k) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a community facility.

(2) "Agency" shall not include the following:

(a) Persons related to the child, expectant mother, or person with developmental disability in the following ways:

(i) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and including first cousins, second cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great;

(ii) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;

(iii) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons, and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state law;

(iv) Spouses of any persons named in (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection (2), even after the marriage is terminated;

(v) Relatives, as named in (a)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this subsection (2), of any half sibling of the child; or

(vi) Extended family members, as defined by the law or custom of the Indian child's tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, a person who has reached the age of eighteen and who is the Indian child's grandparent, aunt or uncle, brother or sister, brother-in-law or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or second cousin, or stepparent who provides care in the family abode on a twenty-four-hour basis to an Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4);

(b) Persons who are legal guardians of the child, expectant mother, or persons with developmental disabilities;

(c) Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or children, with or without compensation, where the parent and person providing care on a twenty-four-hour basis have agreed to the placement in writing and the state is not providing any payment for the care;

(d) A person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that provides placement or similar services to exchange students or international student exchange visitors or persons who have the care of an exchange student in their home;

(e) A person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that provides placement or similar services to international children who have entered the country by obtaining visas that meet the criteria for medical care as established by the United States citizenship and immigration services, or persons who have the care of such an international child in their home;

(f) Schools, including boarding schools, which are engaged primarily in education, operate on a definite school year schedule, follow a stated academic curriculum, accept only school-age children and do not accept custody of children;

(g) Hospitals licensed pursuant to chapter 70.41 RCW when performing functions defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW and assisted living facilities licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW;

(h) Licensed physicians or lawyers;

(i) Facilities approved and certified under chapter 71A.22 RCW;

(j) Any agency having been in operation in this state ten years prior to June 8, 1967, and not seeking or accepting moneys or assistance from any state or federal agency, and is supported in part by an endowment or trust fund;

(k) Persons who have a child in their home for purposes of adoption, if the child was placed in such home by a licensed child-placing agency, an authorized public or tribal agency or court or if a replacement report has been filed under chapter 26.33 RCW and the placement has been approved by the court;

(l) An agency operated by any unit of local, state, or federal government or an agency licensed by an Indian tribe pursuant to RCW 74.15.190;

(m) A maximum or medium security program for juvenile offenders operated by or under contract with the department;

(n) An agency located on a federal military reservation, except where the military authorities request that such agency be subject to the licensing requirements of this chapter.

(3) "Department" means the state department of social and health services.

(4) "Juvenile" means a person under the age of twenty-one who has been sentenced to a term of confinement under the supervision of the department under RCW 13.40.185.

(5) "Performance-based contracts" or "contracting" means the structuring of all aspects of the procurement of services around the purpose of the work to be performed and the desired results with the contract requirements set forth in clear, specific, and objective terms with measurable outcomes. Contracts may also include provisions that link the performance of the contractor to the level and timing of the reimbursement.

(6) "Probationary license" means a license issued as a disciplinary measure to an agency that has previously been issued a full license but is out of compliance with licensing standards.

(7) "Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard of care to be maintained by an agency.

(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

(9) "Street youth" means a person under the age of eighteen who lives outdoors or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy by the minor and who is not residing with his or her parent or at his or her legally authorized residence.

(10) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the state under RCW 74.15.090 or an Indian tribe under RCW 74.15.190 that has entered into a performance-based contract with the department to provide child welfare services.

(11) "Transitional living services" means at a minimum, to the extent funds are available, the following:

(a) Educational services, including basic literacy and computational skills training, either in local alternative or public high schools or in a high school equivalency program that leads to obtaining a high school equivalency degree;

(b) Assistance and counseling related to obtaining vocational training or higher education, job readiness, job search assistance, and placement programs;

(c) Counseling and instruction in life skills such as money management, home management, consumer skills, parenting, health care, access to community resources, and transportation and housing options;

(d) Individual and group counseling; and

(e) Establishing networks with federal agencies and state and local organizations such as the United States department of labor, employment and training administration programs including the workforce ((investment)) innovation and opportunity act which administers private industry councils and the job corps; vocational rehabilitation; and volunteer programs.

--- END ---