BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any peace officer has authority to assist the department with the supervisions of offenders.

(2) If a peace officer has reasonable cause to believe an offender is in violation of the terms of supervision, the peace officer may conduct a search as provided under RCW 9.94A.631, of the offender's person, automobile, or other personal property to search for evidence of the violation. A peace officer may assist a community corrections officer with a search of the offender's residence if requested to do so by the community corrections officer.

(3) Nothing in this section prevents a peace officer from arresting an offender for any new crime found as a result of the offender's arrest or search authorized by this section.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "peace officer" refers to a limited or general authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020.

--- END ---