BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of the legislature to retain individualized provisions of core services and accommodations at different institutions of higher education for students with disabilities while providing services to disabled students faster and more efficiently. The elimination of redundancy and streamlining of data gathering and sharing among institutions of higher education will ensure that students receive the services they need with minimal burden to the student.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The council of presidents shall convene a work group to develop a plan for removing obstacles for students with disabilities. The work group shall include:

(a) Representatives from the state board for community and technical colleges; the state college, regional universities, and state universities, each as defined in RCW 28B.10.016; the student achievement council; and statewide student associations; and

(b) At least two students with disabilities selected by statewide student associations.

(2) The plan shall focus on removing obstacles for students with disabilities transferring between institutions of higher education, including but not limited to: Standardizing medical documentation requirements, standardizing intake and review procedures, and developing best practices for institutions to provide outreach to and help prepare students for transmitting accommodations information and documentation to their next institution of higher education.

(3) The council of presidents shall provide the plan developed in subsection (2) of this section to the higher education committees of the legislature no later than December 31, 2016.

(4) This section expires August 1, 2017.

--- END ---