BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The institutions of higher education shall each adopt a plan, in consultation with the recognized student government of the institution, to increase student voter registration and voting in elections. Each plan shall:

(a) Ensure that all students receive information about voting and the opportunities available on campus to register to vote;

(b) Ensure that all students receive information about activities relating to voting that are prohibited by law and the penalties for those activities;

(c) Address the distribution and collection of voter registration applications and informational materials about online voter registration, during the first three weeks of each academic term;

(d) Require that voter registration applications and informational materials about online voter registration be made available in residence halls, campus bookstores, places where students register for classes, financial aid offices, and student adviser offices;

(e) Require college and institution administrators to communicate with faculty, staff, and students about deadlines for voter registration; and

(f) Include a campus-wide advertising campaign to advise students of the deadline for delivering ballots by mail.

(2) Each institution of higher education shall adopt the plan required by subsection (1) of this section not later than December 31, 2016. Beginning in 2018, and every subsequent two years thereafter, each institution of higher education shall revisit the plan required by subsection (1) of this section in consultation with the recognized student government of the institution.

(3) Each institution of higher education shall submit its plan to the higher education committees of the legislature by January 31, 2017.

--- END ---