BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The adult behavioral health system task force examined workforce issues related to behavioral health in 2015 and heard numerous concerns related to the shortage of professionals needed to staff the health care system, particularly the growing demand for chemical dependency professionals and for professionals who are dually licensed in chemical dependency and another field. This measure is intended to adopt recommendations made by the task force targeted to meet these needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The state workforce training and education coordinating board shall assess workforce shortages across primary care, behavioral health, and gerontology/long-term care. The board shall create an action plan to address the workforce shortages and to meet the increased demand for services now, and with the integration of behavioral health and primary care in 2020. The action plan must not only focus on behavioral health, but also access to primary care physicians across the state. The study must be prepared with consideration of the recommendations submitted in 2015 to the adult behavioral health system task force, and be completed no later than December 15, 2017.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.96A.020 and 2014 c 225 s 20 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of this chapter the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(2) "Approved treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program certified by the department of social and health services as meeting standards adopted under this chapter.

(3) "Behavioral health organization" means a county authority or group of county authorities or other entity recognized by the secretary in contract in a defined regional service area.

(4) "Behavioral health services" means mental health services as described in chapters 71.24 and 71.36 RCW and chemical dependency treatment services as described in this chapter.

(5) "Chemical dependency" means: (a) Alcoholism; (b) drug addiction; or (c) dependence on alcohol and one or more other psychoactive chemicals, as the context requires.

(6) "Chemical dependency program" means expenditures and activities of the department designed and conducted to prevent or treat alcoholism and other drug addiction, including reasonable administration and overhead.

(7) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(8) "Designated chemical dependency specialist" or "specialist" means a person designated by the behavioral health organization or by the county alcoholism and other drug addiction program coordinator designated under RCW 70.96A.310 to perform the commitment duties described in RCW 70.96A.140 and qualified to do so by meeting standards adopted by the department.

(9) "Director" means the person administering the substance use disorder program within the department.

(10) "Drug addiction" means a disease characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(11) "Emergency service patrol" means a patrol established under RCW 70.96A.170.

(12) "Gravely disabled by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals" or "gravely disabled" means that a person, as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by a repeated and escalating loss of cognition or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving care as essential for his or her health or safety.

(13) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a mental health facility, or a long-term alcoholism or drug treatment facility, or in confinement.

(14) "Incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals" means that a person, as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm to himself or herself, to any other person, or to property.

(15) "Incompetent person" means a person who has been adjudged incompetent by the superior court.

(16) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals.

(17) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.

(18) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:

(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on one's self; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon another, as evidenced by behavior that has caused the harm or that places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining the harm; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior that has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or

(b) The individual has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts.

(19) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care of a minor means a requested certified inpatient service that is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose, arrest, or alleviate a chemical dependency; or (b) prevent the progression of substance use disorders that endanger life or cause suffering and pain, or result in illness or infirmity or threaten to cause or aggravate a handicap, or cause physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive alternative available.

(20) "Minor" means a person less than eighteen years of age.

(21) "Parent" means the parent or parents who have the legal right to custody of the child. Parent includes custodian or guardian.

(22) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment.

(23) "Person" means an individual, including a minor.

(24) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means a physician or chemical dependency counselor as defined in rule by the department, who is empowered by a certified treatment program with authority to make assessment, admission, continuing care, and discharge decisions on behalf of the certified program.

(25) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and health services.

(26) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.

(27) "Treatment" means the broad range of emergency, withdrawal management, residential, and outpatient services and care, including diagnostic evaluation, chemical dependency education and counseling, peer support services, medical, psychiatric, psychological, and social service care, vocational rehabilitation and career counseling, which may be extended to persons with substance use disorders and their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons.

(28) "Treatment program" means an organization, institution, or corporation, public or private, engaged in the care, treatment, or rehabilitation of persons with substance use ((disorder[s])) disorders.

(29) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to property.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.96A.320 and 2014 c 225 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A county legislative authority, or two or more counties acting jointly, may establish an alcoholism and other drug addiction program. If two or more counties jointly establish the program, they shall designate one county to provide administrative and financial services.

(2) To be eligible for funds from the department for the support of the county alcoholism and other drug addiction program, the county legislative authority shall establish a county alcoholism and other drug addiction board under RCW 70.96A.300 and appoint a county alcoholism and other drug addiction program coordinator under RCW 70.96A.310.

(3) The county legislative authority may apply to the department for financial support for the county program of alcoholism and other drug addiction. To receive financial support, the county legislative authority shall submit a plan that meets the following conditions:

(a) It shall describe the prevention, early intervention, or recovery support services and activities to be provided;

(b) It shall include anticipated expenditures and revenues;

(c) It shall be prepared by the county alcoholism and other drug addiction program board and be adopted by the county legislative authority;

(d) It shall reflect maximum effective use of existing services and programs; and

(e) It shall meet other conditions that the secretary may require.

(4) The county may accept and spend gifts, grants, and fees, from public and private sources, to implement its program of alcoholism and other drug addiction.

(5) The department shall require that any agreement to provide financial support to a county that performs the activities of a service coordination organization for alcoholism and other drug addiction services must incorporate the expected outcomes and criteria to measure the performance of service coordination organizations as provided in chapter 70.320 RCW.

(6) The county may subcontract for withdrawal management, residential treatment, peer support services, or outpatient treatment with treatment programs that are approved treatment programs. The county may subcontract for other services with individuals or organizations approved by the department.

(7) To continue to be eligible for financial support from the department for the county alcoholism and other drug addiction program, an increase in state financial support shall not be used to supplant local funds from a source that was used to support the county alcoholism and other drug addiction program before the effective date of the increase.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The department of health shall conduct a sunrise review under chapter 18.120 RCW to evaluate the creation of a chemical dependency peer support specialist credential based on a sunrise proposal developed by the department of social and health services by May 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The department of health shall manage its pending rule-making process relating to the educational and training requirements for chemical dependency professionals in such a fashion in order to complete the rule making by June 30, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 3 and 4 of this act take effect January 1, 2017.

--- END ---