BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the record 2015 fire season saw over one million acres burned across the state. The legislature further finds that in addition to the devastating effect on our land and economy, wildfires destroyed four hundred ninety-nine structures, including three hundred seven primary residences, twenty-one commercial structures, and one hundred seventy-seven outbuildings. The legislature finds that the state must employ the best firefighting techniques, products, and technologies to prevent the unnecessary destruction of structures during future wildfire incidents.

(2) By December 31, 2016, the department of natural resources must report the following to the legislature:

(a) A complete list of the types of long-term fire retardants, foams, and gels used by the department;

(b) An overview of the department's criteria in determining when, where, and how to apply long-term fire retardants, foams, and gels;

(c) A list of each instance the department has used long-term fire retardants, foams, and gels in fire suppression activities in the last three years;

(d) A description of public outreach and education activities the department has conducted relating to the use of foams or gels to protect structures during wildfire incidents, if any;

(e) An analysis of national fire suppression best practices relating to the use of long-term fire retardants, foams, and gels;

(f) An examination of how to update the department's policy on the use of long-term fire retardants, foams, and gels to match the best practices identified in (e) of this subsection; and

(g) Recommendations for any legislative actions necessary to improve the protection of structures from wildfires.

--- END ---