BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.07 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The secretary of state may attest to the authenticity of the signature of a public official in the state of Washington.

(2) The secretary of state may attest to the authenticity, or certify a signature of, a notary public except as noted in subsection (3) of this section.

(3) The secretary of state may not certify or attest to the signature of a notary public on a document:

(a) Regarding allegiance to a government or jurisdiction;

(b) Relating to the relinquishment or renunciation of citizenship, sovereignty, military status, or world service authority; or

(c) Setting forth or implying for the bearer a claim of immunity from the laws of the jurisdictions of Washington, immunity from the laws of the state of Washington, or immunity from federal law.

(4) The secretary of state may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---