BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.07.173 and 1998 c 38 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary of state ((shall)) may accept and file in the secretary's office ((facsimile)) electronic transmissions of any documents authorized or required to be filed pursuant to Title 23, 23B, 24, or 25 RCW or chapter 18.100 RCW. The acceptance by the secretary of state is conditional upon the document being legible and otherwise satisfying the requirements of state law or rules with respect to form and content, including those established under RCW 43.07.170. If the document must be signed, that requirement ((is)) may be satisfied by ((a facsimile copy of the)) an electronic signature as defined in RCW 19.34.020.

(2) If a fee is required for filing the document, the secretary may reject the document for filing if the fee is not received before, or at the time of, receipt.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.07.190 and 1991 c 72 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

Where the secretary of state determines that a summary face sheet or cover sheet would expedite review of any documents made under Title 23B RCW, or chapter 18.100, 23.86, 23.90, 24.03, 24.06, 24.12, 24.20, 24.24, 24.36, ((or)) 25.10, or 25.15 RCW, the secretary of state may require the use of a summary face sheet or cover sheet that accurately reflects the contents of the attached document. The secretary of state may, by rule adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW, specify the required contents of any summary face sheet and the type of document or documents in which the summary face sheet will be required, in addition to any other filing requirements which may be applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.07.050 (Bureau of statistics—Secretary ex officio commissioner) and 2009 c 549 s 5028 & 1965 c 8 s 43.07.050;

(2) RCW 43.07.090 (Bureau of statistics—Power to obtain statistics—Penalty) and 2009 c 549 s 5029 & 1965 c 8 s 43.07.090;

(3) RCW 43.07.100 (Bureau of statistics—Information confidential—Penalty) and 1965 c 8 s 43.07.100;

(4) RCW 43.07.110 (Bureau of statistics—Deputy commissioner) and 2009 c 549 s 5030 & 1965 c 8 s 43.07.110; and

(5) RCW 43.07.205 (Contract to issue conditional federal employer identification numbers, credentials, and documents in conjunction with license applications) and 1997 c 51 s 3.

--- END ---