BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that all children and youth in Washington state are entitled to a basic education and to an equal opportunity to learn. The legislature recognizes that there are many causes of truancy and that truancy is an indicator of future school dropout and delinquent behavior. The legislature recognizes that early engagement of parents in the education process is an important measure in preventing truancy. It is the intent of the legislature to encourage the systematic identification of truant behavior as early as possible and to encourage the use of best practices and evidence-based interventions to reduce truant behavior in every school in Washington state. The legislature intends that schools, parents, juvenile courts, and communities share resources within and across school districts where possible to enhance the availability of best practices and evidence-based intervention for truant children and youth.

By taking a three-pronged approach and providing additional tools to schools, courts, communities, and families, the legislature hopes to reduce excessive absenteeism, strengthen family engagement with schools, involve communities, promote academic achievement, reduce educational opportunity gaps, and increase high school graduation rates.

First, with respect to absenteeism in general, the legislature intends to put in place consistent practices and procedures, beginning in kindergarten, pursuant to which schools share information with families about the importance of consistent attendance and the consequences of excessive absences, involve families early, and provide families with information, services, and tools that they may access to improve and maintain their children's school attendance.

Second, the legislature recognizes the success that has been had by school districts and county juvenile courts around the state that have worked in tandem with one another to establish truancy boards capable of prevention and intervention and that regularly stay truancy petitions in order to first allow these boards to identify barriers to school attendance, cooperatively solve problems, and connect students and their families with needed community-based services. While keeping petition filing requirements in place, the legislature intends to require an initial stay of truancy petitions in order to allow for appropriate intervention and prevention before using a court order to enforce attendance laws. The legislature also intends to encourage efforts by county juvenile courts and school districts to establish and maintain community truancy boards and to employ other best practices, including the provision of training for board members and other school and court personnel on trauma-informed approaches to discipline, the use of the Washington assessment of the risks and needs of students (WARNS) or other assessment tools to identify the specific needs of individual children, and the provision of evidence-based treatments that have been found to be effective in supporting at-risk youth and their families.

Third, the legislature recognizes that there are instances in which individual barriers to school attendance that have led to truancy may be best addressed by providing access to a bed in a HOPE center. The legislature further recognizes that even when a truant student is found in contempt of a court order to attend school, it is best practice that the truant student not be placed in juvenile detention but, where feasible and available, instead be placed in a crisis residential center. The legislature intends to increase the number of beds in HOPE centers and crisis residential centers in order to facilitate their use for truant students.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.225.005 and 2009 c 556 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each school within a school district shall inform the students and the parents of the students enrolled in the school about: The benefits of regular school attendance; the potential effects of excessive absenteeism, whether excused or unexcused, on academic achievement, and graduation and dropout rates; the school's expectations of the parents and guardians to ensure regular school attendance by the child; the resources available to assist the child and the parents and guardians; the role and responsibilities of the school; and the consequences of truancy, including the compulsory education requirements under this chapter. The school shall provide access to the information ((at least annually.)) before or at the time of enrollment of the child at a new school and at the beginning of each school year. If the school regularly and ordinarily communicates most other information to parents online, providing online access to the information required by this section satisfies the requirements of this section unless a parent or guardian specifically requests information to be provided in written form. Reasonable efforts must be made to enable parents to request and receive the information in a language in which they are fluent. A parent must date and acknowledge review of this information online or in writing before or at the time of enrollment of the child at a new school and at the beginning of each school year.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop a template that schools may use to satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) of this section and shall post the information on its web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.225 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in the event that a child in elementary school is required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010 or 28A.225.015(1) and has five or more excused absences in a single month during the current school year, or ten or more excused absences in the current school year, the school district shall schedule a conference or conferences with the parent and child at a time reasonably convenient for all persons included for the purpose of identifying the barriers to the child's regular attendance, and the supports and resources that may be made available to the family so that the child is able to regularly attend school. If a regularly scheduled parent-teacher conference day is to take place within thirty days of the absences, the school district may schedule this conference on that day. To satisfy the requirements of this section, the conference must include at least one school district employee such as a nurse, counselor, social worker, teacher, or community human services provider, except in those instances regarding the attendance of a child who has an individualized education program or a plan developed under section 504 of the rehabilitation act of 1973, in which case the reconvening of the team that created the program or plan is required.

(2) A conference pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is not required in the event of excused absences for which prior notice has been given to the school or a doctor's note has been provided and an academic plan is put in place so that the child does not fall behind.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.225.020 and 2009 c 266 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a child required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010 fails to attend school without valid justification, the public school in which the child is enrolled shall:

(a) Inform the child's ((custodial)) parent((, parents, or guardian)) by a notice in writing or by telephone whenever the child has failed to attend school after one unexcused absence within any month during the current school year. School officials shall inform the parent of the potential consequences of additional unexcused absences. If the ((custodial)) parent((, parents, or guardian)) is not fluent in English, the ((preferred practice is to)) school must make reasonable efforts to provide this information in a language in which the ((custodial)) parent((, parents, or guardian)) is fluent;

(b) Schedule a conference or conferences with the ((custodial)) parent((, parents, or guardian)) and child at a time reasonably convenient for all persons included for the purpose of analyzing the causes of the child's absences after two unexcused absences within any month during the current school year. If a regularly scheduled parent-teacher conference day is to take place within thirty days of the second unexcused absence, then the school district may schedule this conference on that day; and

(c) Take data-informed steps to eliminate or reduce the child's absences. These steps shall include the use of the Washington assessment of the risks and needs of students (WARNS), and where appropriate, providing an available approved best practice or research-based intervention, or both, consistent with the WARNS profile, adjusting the child's school program or school or course assignment, providing more individualized or remedial instruction, providing appropriate vocational courses or work experience, referring the child to a community truancy board, ((if available,)) requiring the child to attend an alternative school or program, or assisting the parent or child to obtain supplementary services that might eliminate or ameliorate the cause or causes for the absence from school. If the child's parent does not attend the scheduled conference, the conference may be conducted with the student and school official. However, the parent shall be notified of the steps to be taken to eliminate or reduce the child's absence.

(2) For purposes of this chapter, an "unexcused absence" means that a child:

(a) Has failed to attend the majority of hours or periods in an average school day or has failed to comply with a more restrictive school district policy; and

(b) Has failed to meet the school district's policy for excused absences.

(3) If a child transfers from one school district to another during the school year, the receiving school or school district shall include the unexcused absences accumulated at the previous school or from the previous school district for purposes of this section, RCW 28A.225.030, and 28A.225.015, along with a copy of any previous assessment as required under subsection (1)(c) of this section, history of any best practices or researched-based intervention previously provided to the child by the child's current school district, and a copy of the most dated truancy information inclusive of online or written acknowledgment by the parent and child, as provided for in RCW 28A.225.005.

(4) School districts with fewer than two hundred students may work cooperatively with other school districts, the county court, or the school district's educational service district to provide a community truancy board or other interventions approved by the juvenile court and associated screenings and services to its students.

Sec. 5. RCW 28A.225.025 and 2009 c 266 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of this chapter, "community truancy board" means a board composed of members of the local community in which the child attends school. ((Juvenile courts may establish and operate community truancy boards. If the juvenile court and the school district agree, a school district may)) All members of a community truancy board must receive training regarding the identification of barriers to school attendance, the use of the Washington assessment of the risks and needs of students (WARNS) or other assessment tools to identify the specific needs of individual children, trauma-informed approaches to discipline, evidence-based treatments that have been found effective in supporting at-risk youth and their families, and the specific services and treatment available in the particular school, court, community, and elsewhere. Pursuant to a memorandum of understanding between a school district and a juvenile court, all school districts must establish and operate a community truancy board under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court. ((Juvenile courts may create a community truancy board or may use other entities that exist or are created, such as diversion units. However, a diversion unit or other existing entity must agree before it is used as a truancy board.)) Duties of a community truancy board shall include, but not be limited to: Identifying barriers to school attendance, recommending methods for improving ((school)) attendance such as ((assisting the parent or the child to obtain supplementary services that might eliminate or ameliorate the causes for the absences or)) connecting students and their families with community services and evidence-based services such as functional family therapy, multisystemic therapy, and aggression replacement training, suggesting to the school district that the child enroll in another school, an alternative education program, an education center, a skill center, a dropout prevention program, or another public or private educational program, or referring a child to a HOPE center.

(2) The legislature finds that utilization of community truancy boards((, or other diversion units that fulfill a similar function,)) is the preferred means of intervention when preliminary methods ((of notice and parent conferences and taking appropriate steps)) to eliminate or reduce unexcused absences have not been effective in securing the child's attendance at school. The legislature intends to encourage and support the development and expansion of community truancy boards ((and other diversion programs which are effective in promoting school attendance and preventing the need for more intrusive intervention by the court)). All school districts must establish a community truancy board by August 1, 2017. Operation of a school truancy board does not excuse a district from the obligation of filing a petition within the requirements of RCW 28A.225.015(3).

Sec. 6. RCW 28A.225.030 and 2012 c 157 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a child under the age of seventeen is required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010 and if the actions taken by a school district under RCW 28A.225.020 are not successful in substantially reducing an enrolled student's absences from public school, not later than the seventh unexcused absence by a child within any month during the current school year or not later than the tenth unexcused absence during the current school year the school district shall file a petition and supporting affidavit for a civil action with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW 28A.225.010: (a) By the parent; (b) by the child; or (c) by the parent and the child. The petition must include a list of all interventions that have been attempted as set forth in RCW 28A.225.020, include a copy of any previous truancy assessment completed by the child's current school district, the history of approved best practices intervention or research-based intervention previously provided to the child by the child's current school district, and a copy of the most recent truancy information document signed by the parent and child, pursuant to RCW 28A.225.005. Except as provided in this subsection, no additional documents need be filed with the petition. Nothing in this subsection requires court jurisdiction to terminate when a child turns seventeen or precludes a school district from filing a petition for a child that is seventeen years of age.

(2) The district shall not later than the fifth unexcused absence in a month:

(a) Enter into an agreement with a student and parent that establishes school attendance requirements;

(b) Refer a student to a community truancy board((, if available,)) as defined in RCW 28A.225.025. The community truancy board shall enter into an agreement with the student and parent that establishes school attendance requirements and take other appropriate actions to reduce the child's absences; or

(c) File a petition under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The petition may be filed by a school district employee who is not an attorney.

(4) If the school district fails to file a petition under this section, the parent of a child with five or more unexcused absences in any month during the current school year or upon the tenth unexcused absence during the current school year may file a petition with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW 28A.225.010.

(5) Petitions filed under this section may be served by certified mail, return receipt requested. If such service is unsuccessful, or the return receipt is not signed by the addressee, personal service is required.

Sec. 7. RCW 28A.225.035 and 2012 c 157 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A petition for a civil action under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015 shall consist of a written notification to the court alleging that:

(a) The child has unexcused absences as described in RCW 28A.225.030(1) during the current school year;

(b) Actions taken by the school district have not been successful in substantially reducing the child's absences from school; and

(c) Court intervention and supervision are necessary to assist the school district or parent to reduce the child's absences from school.

(2) The petition shall set forth the name, date of birth, school, address, gender, race, and ethnicity of the child and the names and addresses of the child's parents, and shall set forth ((whether)) the languages in which the child and parent are fluent ((in English)), whether there is an existing individualized education program, and the child's current academic status in school.

(3) The petition shall set forth facts that support the allegations in this section and shall generally request relief available under this chapter and provide information about what the court might order under RCW 28A.225.090.

(4)(a) When a petition is filed under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015, it shall initially be stayed by the juvenile court.

(b) By August 1, 2017, the child and the child's parent must be referred to a community truancy board as described in RCW 28A.225.025.

(c) Between August 1, 2016, and July 31, 2017, intervention and prevention efforts must be employed to substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences. Intervention and prevention efforts under this subsection may include referral to an existing community truancy board, use of the Washington assessment of the risks and needs of students (WARNS) or other assessment tools to identify the specific needs of individual children, the provision of community-based services, and the provision of evidence-based treatments that have been found to be effective in supporting at-risk youth and their families. The school district must provide to the court a description of the intervention and prevention efforts to be employed to substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences, along with a timeline for completion.

(d) If intervention and prevention efforts under this subsection are unsuccessful at substantially reducing the child's unexcused absences within a reasonable time frame set by the school district, the stay shall be lifted and the juvenile court shall schedule a hearing at which the court shall consider the petition((, or if the court determines that a referral to an available community truancy board would substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences, the court may refer the case to a community truancy board under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court)).

(5) ((If)) When a referral is made to a community truancy board, the truancy board must meet with the child, a parent, and the school district representative and enter into an agreement with the petitioner and respondent regarding expectations and any actions necessary to address the child's truancy within twenty days of the referral. If the petition is based on RCW 28A.225.015, the child shall not be required to attend and the agreement under this subsection shall be between the truancy board, the school district, and the child's parent. The court may permit the truancy board or truancy prevention counselor to provide continued supervision over the student, or parent if the petition is based on RCW 28A.225.015.

(6) If the community truancy board fails to reach an agreement, or the parent or student does not comply with the agreement, the truancy board shall return the case to the juvenile court for a hearing.

(7)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions in subsection (4)(a) of this section, a hearing shall not be required if other actions by the court would substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences. When a juvenile court hearing is held, the court shall:

(i) Separately notify the child, the parent of the child, and the school district of the hearing. If the parent is not fluent in English, ((the preferred practice is for)) notice ((to)) should be provided in a language in which the parent is fluent as indicated on the petition pursuant to RCW 28A.225.030(1);

(ii) Notify the parent and the child of their rights to present evidence at the hearing; and

(iii) Notify the parent and the child of the options and rights available under chapter 13.32A RCW.

(b) If the child is not provided with counsel, the advisement of rights must take place in court by means of a colloquy between the court, the child if eight years old or older, and the parent.

(8)(a) The court may require the attendance of the child if eight years old or older, the parents, and the school district at any hearing on a petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030.

(b) The court may not issue a bench warrant for a child for failure to appear at a hearing on an initial truancy petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030. If there has been proper service, the court may instead enter a default order assuming jurisdiction under the terms specified in subsection (12) of this section.

(9) A school district is responsible for determining who shall represent the school district at hearings on a petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015.

(10) The court may permit the first hearing to be held without requiring that either party be represented by legal counsel, and to be held without a guardian ad litem for the child under RCW 4.08.050. At the request of the school district, the court shall permit a school district representative who is not an attorney to represent the school district at any future hearings.

(11) If the child is in a special education program or has a diagnosed mental or emotional disorder, the court shall inquire as to what efforts the school district has made to assist the child in attending school.

(12) If the allegations in the petition are established by a preponderance of the evidence, the court shall grant the petition and enter an order assuming jurisdiction to intervene for the period of time determined by the court, after considering the facts alleged in the petition and the circumstances of the juvenile, to most likely cause the juvenile to return to and remain in school while the juvenile is subject to this chapter. In no case may the order expire before the end of the school year in which it is entered.

(13)(a) If the court assumes jurisdiction, the school district shall periodically report to the court any additional unexcused absences by the child, actions taken by the school district, and an update on the child's academic status in school at a schedule specified by the court.

(b) The first report under this subsection (13) must be received no later than three months from the date that the court assumes jurisdiction.

(14) Community truancy boards and the courts shall coordinate, to the extent possible, proceedings and actions pertaining to children who are subject to truancy petitions and at-risk youth petitions in RCW 13.32A.191 or child in need of services petitions in RCW 13.32A.140.

(15) If after a juvenile court assumes jurisdiction in one county the child relocates to another county, the juvenile court in the receiving county shall, upon the request of a school district or parent, assume jurisdiction of the petition filed in the previous county.

Sec. 8. RCW 28A.225.090 and 2009 c 266 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A court may order a child subject to a petition under RCW 28A.225.035 to do one or more of the following:

(a) Attend the child's current school, and set forth minimum attendance requirements, ((including suspensions)) which shall not consider a suspension day as an unexcused absence;

(b) If there is space available and the program can provide educational services appropriate for the child, order the child to attend another public school, an alternative education program, center, a skill center, dropout prevention program, or another public educational program;

(c) Attend a private nonsectarian school or program including an education center. Before ordering a child to attend an approved or certified private nonsectarian school or program, the court shall: (i) Consider the public and private programs available; (ii) find that placement is in the best interest of the child; and (iii) find that the private school or program is willing to accept the child and will not charge any fees in addition to those established by contract with the student's school district. If the court orders the child to enroll in a private school or program, the child's school district shall contract with the school or program to provide educational services for the child. The school district shall not be required to contract for a weekly rate that exceeds the state general apportionment dollars calculated on a weekly basis generated by the child and received by the district. A school district shall not be required to enter into a contract that is longer than the remainder of the school year. A school district shall not be required to enter into or continue a contract if the child is no longer enrolled in the district;

(d) ((Be referred to a community truancy board, if available; or

(e))) Submit to ((testing for the use of controlled substances or alcohol based on a determination that such testing)) a substance abuse assessment if the court finds on the record that such assessment is appropriate to the circumstances and behavior of the child and will facilitate the child's compliance with the mandatory attendance law and, if any assessment, including a urinalysis test ordered under this subsection indicates the use of controlled substances or alcohol, order the minor to abstain from the unlawful consumption of controlled substances or alcohol and adhere to the recommendations of the ((drug)) substance abuse assessment at no expense to the school;

(e) Submit to a mental health evaluation or other diagnostic evaluation and adhere to the recommendations of the drug assessment, at no expense to the school, if the court finds on the court records that such evaluation is appropriate to the circumstances and behavior of the child, and will facilitate the child's compliance with the mandatory attendance law; or

(f) Submit to a temporary placement in a crisis residential center if the court determines there is an immediate health and safety concern, or a family conflict with the need for mediation.

(2) If the child fails to comply with the court order, the court may order the child to be subject to detention, as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), or may impose alternatives to detention such as community restitution. Failure by a child to comply with an order issued under this subsection shall not be subject to detention for a period greater than that permitted pursuant to a civil contempt proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW. Detention ordered under this subsection may be for no longer than seven days. Detention ordered under this subsection shall preferably be served at a secure crisis residential center close to the child's home rather than in a juvenile detention facility. A warrant of arrest for a child under this subsection may not be served on a child inside of school during school hours in a location where other students are present.

(3) Any parent violating any of the provisions of either RCW 28A.225.010, 28A.225.015, or 28A.225.080 shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars for each day of unexcused absence from school. The court shall remit fifty percent of the fine collected under this section to the child's school district. It shall be a defense for a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 to show that he or she exercised reasonable diligence in attempting to cause a child in his or her custody to attend school or that the child's school did not perform its duties as required in RCW 28A.225.020. The court may order the parent to provide community restitution instead of imposing a fine. Any fine imposed pursuant to this section may be suspended upon the condition that a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 shall participate with the school and the child in a supervised plan for the child's attendance at school or upon condition that the parent attend a conference or conferences scheduled by a school for the purpose of analyzing the causes of a child's absence.

(4) If a child continues to be truant after entering into a court-approved order with the truancy board under RCW 28A.225.035, the juvenile court shall find the child in contempt, and the court may order the child to be subject to detention, as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), or may impose alternatives to detention such as meaningful community restitution. Failure by a child to comply with an order issued under this subsection may not subject a child to detention for a period greater than that permitted under a civil contempt proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW.

(5) Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section shall not apply to a six or seven year old child required to attend public school under RCW 28A.225.015.

Sec. 9. RCW 43.185C.315 and 2015 c 69 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall establish HOPE centers that provide no more than seventy-five beds across the state and may establish HOPE centers by contract, within funds appropriated by the legislature specifically for this purpose. HOPE centers shall be operated in a manner to reasonably assure that street youth placed there will not run away. Street youth may leave a HOPE center during the course of the day to attend school or other necessary appointments, but the street youth must be accompanied by an administrator or an administrator's designee. The street youth must provide the administration with specific information regarding his or her destination and expected time of return to the HOPE center. Any street youth who runs away from a HOPE center shall not be readmitted unless specifically authorized by the street youth's placement and liaison specialist, and the placement and liaison specialist shall document with specific factual findings an appropriate basis for readmitting any street youth to a HOPE center. HOPE centers are required to have the following:

(((1))) (a) A license issued by the department of social and health services;

(((2))) (b) A professional with a master's degree in counseling, social work, or related field and at least one year of experience working with street youth or a bachelor of arts degree in social work or a related field and five years of experience working with street youth. This professional staff person may be contractual or a part-time employee, but must be available to work with street youth in a HOPE center at a ratio of one to every fifteen youth staying in a HOPE center. This professional shall be known as a placement and liaison specialist. Preference shall be given to those professionals cross-credentialed in mental health and chemical dependency. The placement and liaison specialist shall:

(((a))) (i) Conduct an assessment of the street youth that includes a determination of the street youth's legal status regarding residential placement;

(((b))) (ii) Facilitate the street youth's return to his or her legally authorized residence at the earliest possible date or initiate processes to arrange legally authorized appropriate placement. Any street youth who may meet the definition of dependent child under RCW 13.34.030 must be referred to the department of social and health services. The department of social and health services shall determine whether a dependency petition should be filed under chapter 13.34 RCW. A shelter care hearing must be held within seventy-two hours to authorize out-of-home placement for any youth the department of social and health services determines is appropriate for out-of-home placement under chapter 13.34 RCW. All of the provisions of chapter 13.32A RCW must be followed for children in need of services or at-risk youth;

(((c))) (iii) Interface with other relevant resources and system representatives to secure long-term residential placement and other needed services for the street youth;

(((d))) (iv) Be assigned immediately to each youth and meet with the youth within eight hours of the youth receiving HOPE center services;

(((e))) (v) Facilitate a physical examination of any street youth who has not seen a physician within one year prior to residence at a HOPE center and facilitate evaluation by a county-designated mental health professional, a chemical dependency specialist, or both if appropriate; and

(((f))) (vi) Arrange an educational assessment to measure the street youth's competency level in reading, writing, and basic mathematics, and that will measure learning disabilities or special needs;

(((3))) (c) Staff trained in development needs of street youth as determined by the department, including an administrator who is a professional with a master's degree in counseling, social work, or a related field and at least one year of experience working with street youth, or a bachelor of arts degree in social work or a related field and five years of experience working with street youth, who must work with the placement and liaison specialist to provide appropriate services on site;

(((4))) (d) A data collection system that measures outcomes for the population served, and enables research and evaluation that can be used for future program development and service delivery. Data collection systems must have confidentiality rules and protocols developed by the department;

(((5))) (e) Notification requirements that meet the notification requirements of chapter 13.32A RCW. The youth's arrival date and time must be logged at intake by HOPE center staff. The staff must immediately notify law enforcement and dependency caseworkers if a street youth runs away from a HOPE center. A child may be transferred to a secure facility as defined in RCW 13.32A.030 whenever the staff reasonably believes that a street youth is likely to leave the HOPE center and not return after full consideration of the factors set forth in RCW 43.185C.290(2)(a) (i) and (ii). The street youth's temporary placement in the HOPE center must be authorized by the court or the secretary of the department of social and health services if the youth is a dependent of the state under chapter 13.34 RCW or the department of social and health services is responsible for the youth under chapter 13.32A RCW, or by the youth's parent or legal custodian, until such time as the parent can retrieve the youth who is returning to home;

(((6))) (f) HOPE centers must identify to the department of social and health services any street youth it serves who is not returning promptly to home. The department of social and health services then must contact the missing children's clearinghouse identified in chapter 13.60 RCW and either report the youth's location or report that the youth is the subject of a dependency action and the parent should receive notice from the department of social and health services; and

(((7))) (g) Services that provide counseling and education to the street youth((; and)).

(((8))) (2) The department shall award contracts for the operation of HOPE center beds with the goal of facilitating the coordination of services provided for youth by such programs and those services provided by secure and semi-secure crisis residential centers.

(3) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the department must incrementally increase the number of available HOPE beds by at least seventeen beds in fiscal year 2017, at least seventeen beds in fiscal year 2018, and at least seventeen beds in fiscal year 2019, such that by July 1, 2019, seventy-five HOPE beds are established and operated throughout the state as set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

(4) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the beds available in HOPE centers shall be increased incrementally beyond the limit of seventy-five set forth in subsection (1) of this section. The additional capacity shall be distributed around the state based upon need and, to the extent feasible, shall be geographically situated so that HOPE beds are available across the state. In determining the need for increased numbers of HOPE beds in a particular county or counties, one of the considerations should be the volume of truancy petitions filed there.

Sec. 10. RCW 43.185C.320 and 2015 c 69 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

To be eligible for placement in a HOPE center, a minor must be either a street youth, as that term is defined in this chapter, or a youth who, without placement in a HOPE center, will continue to participate in increasingly risky behavior, including truancy. Youth may also self-refer to a HOPE center. Payment for a HOPE center bed is not contingent upon prior approval by the department; however, approval from the department of social and health services is needed if the youth is dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 43.185C RCW to read as follows:

Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the capacity available in crisis residential centers established pursuant to this chapter shall be increased incrementally by no fewer than ten beds per fiscal year through fiscal year 2019 in order to accommodate truant students found in contempt of a court order to attend school. The additional capacity shall be distributed around the state based upon need and, to the extent feasible, shall be geographically situated to expand the use of crisis residential centers as set forth in this chapter so they are available for use by all courts for housing truant youth.

Sec. 12. RCW 28A.165.005 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter is designed to: (a) Promote the use of data when developing programs to assist underachieving students and reduce disruptive behaviors in the classroom; and (b) guide school districts in providing the most effective and efficient practices when implementing supplemental instruction and services to assist underachieving students and reduce disruptive behaviors in the classroom.

(2) School districts implementing a learning assistance program shall focus first on addressing the needs of students:

(a) In grades kindergarten through four who are deficient in reading or reading readiness skills to improve reading literacy; and

(b) Referred to community truancy boards as defined in RCW 28A.225.025.

Sec. 13. RCW 28A.165.035 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning in the 2015-16 school year, expenditure of funds from the learning assistance program must be consistent with the provisions of RCW 28A.655.235.

(2) Use of best practices that have been demonstrated through research to be associated with increased student achievement magnifies the opportunities for student success. To the extent they are included as a best practice or strategy in one of the state menus or an approved alternative under this section or RCW 28A.655.235, the following are services and activities that may be supported by the learning assistance program:

(a) Extended learning time opportunities occurring:

(i) Before or after the regular school day;

(ii) On Saturday; and

(iii) Beyond the regular school year;

(b) Services under RCW 28A.320.190;

(c) Professional development for certificated and classified staff that focuses on:

(i) The needs of a diverse student population;

(ii) Specific literacy and mathematics content and instructional strategies; and

(iii) The use of student work to guide effective instruction and appropriate assistance;

(d) Consultant teachers to assist in implementing effective instructional practices by teachers serving participating students;

(e) Tutoring support for participating students;

(f) Outreach activities and support for parents of participating students, including employing parent and family engagement coordinators; ((and))

(g) Up to five percent of a district's learning assistance program allocation may be used for development of partnerships with community-based organizations, educational service districts, and other local agencies to deliver academic and nonacademic supports to participating students who are significantly at risk of not being successful in school to reduce barriers to learning, increase student engagement, and enhance students' readiness to learn. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must approve any community-based organization or local agency before learning assistance funds may be expended; and

(h) Up to two percent of a district's learning assistance program allocation may be used to fund community truancy board activities and student supports as described in RCW 28A.225.025.

(3) In addition to the state menu developed under RCW 28A.655.235, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene a panel of experts, including the Washington state institute for public policy, to develop additional state menus of best practices and strategies for use in the learning assistance program to assist struggling students at all grade levels in English language arts and mathematics and reduce disruptive behaviors in the classroom. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall publish the state menus by July 1, 2015, and update the state menus by each July 1st thereafter.

(4)(a) Beginning in the 2016-17 school year, except as provided in (b) of this subsection, school districts must use a practice or strategy that is on a state menu developed under subsection (3) of this section or RCW 28A.655.235.

(b) Beginning in the 2016-17 school year, school districts may use a practice or strategy that is not on a state menu developed under subsection (3) of this section for two school years initially. If the district is able to demonstrate improved outcomes for participating students over the previous two school years at a level commensurate with the best practices and strategies on the state menu, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall approve use of the alternative practice or strategy by the district for one additional school year. Subsequent annual approval by the superintendent of public instruction to use the alternative practice or strategy is dependent on the district continuing to demonstrate increased improved outcomes for participating students.

(c) Beginning in the 2016-17 school year, school districts may enter cooperative agreements with state agencies, local governments, or school districts for administrative or operational costs needed to provide services in accordance with the state menus developed under this section and RCW 28A.655.235.

(5) School districts are encouraged to implement best practices and strategies from the state menus developed under this section and RCW 28A.655.235 before the use is required.

Sec. 14. RCW 28A.655.235 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Beginning in the 2015-16 school year, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1), for any student who received a score of basic or below basic on the third grade statewide student assessment in English language arts in the previous school year, the school district must implement an intensive reading and literacy improvement strategy from a state menu of best practices established in accordance with subsection (3) of this section or an alternative strategy in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.

(b) Beginning August 1, 2017, the school district must implement a community truancy board as provided in RCW 28A.165.035.

(c) Reading and literacy improvement strategies for students with disabilities whose individualized education program includes specially designed instruction in reading or English language arts shall be as provided in the individualized education program.

(2)(a) Also beginning in the 2015-16 school year, in any school where more than forty percent of the tested students received a score of basic or below basic on the third grade statewide student assessment in English language arts in the previous school year, as calculated under this subsection (2), the school district must implement an intensive reading and literacy improvement strategy from a state menu of best practices established in accordance with subsection (3) of this section or an alternative strategy in accordance with subsection (4) of this section for all students in grades kindergarten through four at the school.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection (2), the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall exclude the following from the calculation of a school's percentage of tested students receiving a score of basic or below basic on the third grade statewide student assessment:

(i) Students enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction program unless the student has participated in the transitional bilingual instruction program for three school years;

(ii) Students with disabilities whose individualized education program specifies a different standard to measure reading performance than is required for the statewide student assessment; and

(iii) Schools with fewer than ten students in third grade.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene a panel of experts, including the Washington state institute for public policy, to develop a state menu of best practices and strategies for intensive reading and literacy improvement designed to assist struggling students in reaching grade level in reading by the end of fourth grade. The state menu must also include best practices and strategies to improve the reading and literacy of students who are English language learners and for system improvements that schools and school districts can implement to improve reading instruction for all students. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall publish the state menu by July 1, 2014, and update the state menu by each July 1st thereafter.

(4) School districts may use an alternative practice or strategy that is not on a state menu developed under subsection (3) of this section for two school years initially. If the district is able to demonstrate improved outcomes for participating students over the previous two school years at a level commensurate with the best practices and strategies on the state menu, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must approve use of the alternative practice or strategy by the district for one additional school year. Subsequent annual approval by the superintendent of public instruction to use the alternative practice or strategy is dependent on the district continuing to demonstrate an increase in improved outcomes for participating students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop recommendations as to how mandatory school attendance and truancy amelioration provisions under chapter 28A.225 RCW should be applied to online schools and report back to the relevant committees of the legislature by November 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By requiring an initial stay of truancy petitions for diversion to community truancy boards, the legislature intends to achieve the following outcomes:

(a) Increased access to community truancy boards and other truancy early intervention programs for parents and children throughout the state;

(b) Increased quantity and quality of truancy intervention and prevention efforts in the community;

(c) A reduction in the number of truancy petitions that result in further proceedings by juvenile courts, other than dismissal of the petition, after the initial stay and diversion to a community truancy board; and

(d) A reduction in the number of truancy petitions that result in a civil contempt proceeding or detention order.

(2) No later than January 1, 2021, the Washington state institute for public policy is directed to evaluate the effectiveness of chapter . . ., Laws of 2016 (this act). An initial report scoping of the methodology to be used to review chapter . . ., Laws of 2016 (this act) shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the legislature by January 1, 2018. The initial report must identify any data gaps that could hinder the ability of the institute to conduct its review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. Sections 12 through 14 of this act take effect September 1, 2016.

--- END ---