BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) In accordance with Article VII, section 12 of the state Constitution, if the governor declares a state of emergency resulting from a catastrophic event that necessitates government action to protect life or public safety, then for that fiscal year moneys may be withdrawn and appropriated from the budget stabilization account, via separate legislation setting forth the nature of the emergency and containing an appropriation limited to the purposes contained in the declaration, by a favorable vote of a majority of the members elected to each house of the legislature.

(2) As a result of ongoing and projected drought conditions, multiple early season wildfires, and the potential limits on firefighting resources in the state and western United States, on June 26, 2015, the governor proclaimed that a state of emergency existed in all of Washington's thirty-nine counties and directed that the plans and procedures of the Washington state comprehensive emergency management plan be implemented. In addition, the governor directed state agencies and departments to utilize state resources and to do everything reasonably possible to assist affected political subdivisions in an effort to respond to and recover from the incidents. The governor also ordered into active state service the organized militia of Washington state to include the National Guard and the State Guard, or such part thereof as may be necessary in the opinion of the Adjutant General, to perform such duties as directed by competent authority of the Washington military department in addressing this event. Additionally, the Washington state emergency operations center was instructed to coordinate all incident-related assistance to the affected areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Budget Stabilization Account Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$150,169,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely to pay for the department's fire suppression costs incurred during the 2015 fire season.

(2) These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Budget Stabilization Account Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$432,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely to pay for the department's fire suppression costs incurred during the 2015 fire season.

(2) These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Budget Stabilization Account Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$27,645,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964.

(2) These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 4 of this act are each added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---