BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.155.060 and 1988 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to aid the financing of public works projects, the board may:

(1) Make low-interest or interest-free loans to local governments from the public works assistance account or other funds and accounts for the purpose of assisting local governments in financing public works projects. The board may require such terms and conditions and may charge such rates of interest on its loans as it deems necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Money received from local governments in repayment of loans made under this section shall be paid into the public works assistance account for uses consistent with this chapter. In any fiscal year during which no new loans from the public works assistance account are authorized by the legislature, local governments owing repayment amounts during that fiscal year are authorized to not remit those payments, and the principal of those payments are forgiven. Local governments choosing to not make such payments must deposit the amount of the payment in the jurisdiction's capital projects account.

(2) Pledge money in the public works assistance account, or money to be received by the public works assistance account, to the repayment of all or a portion of the principal of or interest on obligations issued by local governments to finance public works projects. The board shall not pledge any amount greater than the sum of money in the public works assistance account plus money to be received from the payment of the debt service on loans made from that account, nor shall the board pledge the faith and credit or the taxing power of the state or any agency or subdivision thereof to the repayment of obligations issued by any local government.

(3) Create such subaccounts in the public works assistance account as the board deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(4) Provide a method for the allocation of loans and financing guarantees and the provision of technical assistance under this chapter.

All local public works projects aided in whole or in part under the provisions of this chapter shall be put out for competitive bids, except for emergency public works under RCW 43.155.065 for which the recipient jurisdiction shall comply with this requirement to the extent feasible and practicable. The competitive bids called for shall be administered in the same manner as all other public works projects put out for competitive bidding by the local governmental entity aided under this chapter.

--- END ---