BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 90.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall act on all water rights applications that rely on the reservations of water established in WAC 173-518-080 or 173-545-090, as those provisions existed on the effective date of this section. The legislature declares that the reservations of water established in WAC 173-518-080 and 173-545-090, as those provisions existed on the effective date of this section, are consistent with legislative intent and are specifically authorized to be maintained and implemented by the department.

(2) This section does not affect the department's authority to lawfully adopt, amend, or repeal any rule, including WAC 173-518-080 or 173-545-090.

(3) This section may not be construed to prejudice any reservation of water not referenced in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---