BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

Each month of September is declared the month of the kindergartener, and each elementary school is encouraged to determine a method to celebrate new kindergarteners as they begin their life in education.

--- END ---