BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 81.77.010 and 2007 c 234 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Motor vehicle" means any truck, trailer, semitrailer, tractor, or any self-propelled or motor driven vehicle used upon any public highway of this state for the purpose of transporting solid waste, for the collection or disposal, or both, of solid waste;

(2) "Public highway" means every street, road, or highway in this state;

(3) "Common carrier" means any person who collects and transports solid waste for disposal by motor vehicle for compensation, whether over regular or irregular routes, or by regular or irregular schedules;

(4) "Contract carrier" means all solid waste transporters not included under the terms "common carrier" and "private carrier," as defined in this section, and further, includes any person who under special and individual contracts or agreements transports solid waste by motor vehicle for compensation;

(5) "Private carrier" means a person who, in his or her own vehicle, transports solid waste purely as an incidental adjunct to some other established private business owned or operated by the person in good faith. A person who transports solid waste from residential sources in a vehicle designed or used primarily for the transport of solid waste is not a private carrier;

(6) "Vehicle" means every device capable of being moved upon a public highway and in, upon, or by which any solid waste is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway, except devices moved by human or animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rail or tracks;

(7) "Solid waste collection company" means every person or his or her lessees, receivers, or trustees, owning, controlling, operating, or managing vehicles used in the business of transporting solid waste for collection or disposal, or both, for compensation, except septic tank pumpers, over any public highway in this state as a "common carrier" or as a "contract carrier";

(8) "Solid waste collection" does not include collecting or transporting recyclable materials from a drop-box or recycling buy-back center, or collecting or transporting recyclable materials by or on behalf of a commercial or industrial generator of recyclable materials to a recycler for use or reclamation. Transportation of these materials is regulated under chapter 81.80 RCW;

(9) "Solid waste" means the same as defined under RCW 70.95.030, except for the purposes of this chapter "solid waste" does not include recyclable materials except for source separated recyclable materials specifically identified in the minimum levels of service established in a local solid waste management plan under RCW 70.95.092 and that are collected from residences on a scheduled or routine basis; and

(10) When the phrase "garbage and refuse" is used as a qualifying phrase or otherwise, it means "solid waste."

Sec. 2. RCW 81.77.140 and 1989 c 431 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a recycling company or nonprofit entity from collecting and transporting recyclable materials from a buy-back center((,)) or drop-box, ((or)) from a commercial or industrial generator of recyclable materials, on an unscheduled and nonroutine basis from a residential generator of recyclable materials when the recyclable materials collected are not specifically identified in the minimum levels of service established in a local solid waste management plan under RCW 70.95.092, or upon agreement with a solid waste collection company.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting a commercial or industrial generator of commercial recyclable materials from selling, conveying, or arranging for transportation of such material to a recycler for reuse or reclamation.

--- END ---