BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that Washington holds unique advantages setting it apart as a state where manufacturers can make products while maintaining a low emissions profile. These advantages include an abundance of electricity generated by technologies that do not emit greenhouse gases, low rates of fossil fuel consumption, and a multitude of approved practices by both public and private entities that cast Washington as an established leader in energy efficiency. Washington should be recognized for its potential to enhance job creation and the environment; therefore, the legislature finds that the state should evaluate all means for encouraging manufacturers to produce goods in Washington with a small carbon footprint. It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to establish a bipartisan task force to comprehensively review Washington's laws, regulations, and tax system with the goal of making recommendations to the legislature for leveraging Washington's clean energy economy to grow the state's manufacturing sector.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The task force on Washington's clean energy economy is established. The task force must consist of the following members: Eight legislators, with two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate appointed by the leaders of each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, and two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. Task force members must continue to serve as members of the task force until they are no longer members of the legislature or the task force expires. If a member of the task force vacates his or her membership on the task force, a new task force member must be appointed according to the appointment process established in this subsection.

(2) At its first official meeting, the task force must choose from among its members a chairperson and vice chairperson. Any task force member selected to serve as chairperson must be a member appointed to the task force by a leader of one of the two largest caucuses of the senate. Any task force member selected to serve as vice chairperson must be a member appointed to the task force by the speaker of the house of representatives.

(3) The task force must hold two meetings. The first meeting must be held at a suitable facility located in Whatcom county, to be determined by the chairperson. The second meeting must be held at a suitable facility located in Grant county, to be determined by the chairperson.

(4) The task force must receive the support of professional staff assigned to the task force by senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research.

(5) The task force must hold meetings, take testimony, order and review reports, and take any other action necessary for informing the task force's deliberations. Meetings of the task force must be open to the public.

(6) The task force must produce a report making recommendations to the legislature prior to the date on which the task force expires. The report must include recommendations for making changes to the state's energy, environmental, regulatory, and tax policies to enhance the health of Washington's manufacturing sector. No task force member is required to sign, support, or otherwise endorse the report or any part of it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act expires December 31, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---