BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 59.20.070 and 2012 c 213 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A landlord shall not:

(1) Deny any tenant the right to sell such tenant's mobile home, manufactured home, or park model within a park, or prohibit, in any manner, any tenant from posting on the tenant's manufactured/mobile home or park model, or on the rented mobile home lot, a commercially reasonable "for sale" sign or any similar sign designed to advertise the sale of the manufactured/mobile home or park model. In addition, a landlord shall not require the removal of the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model from the park because of the sale thereof. Requirements for the transfer of the rental agreement are in RCW 59.20.073. Nothing in this subsection prohibits a landlord from enforcing reasonable rules or restrictions regarding the placement of "for sale" signs on the tenant's manufactured/mobile home or park model, or on the rented mobile home lot, if (a) the main purpose of the rules or restrictions is to protect the safety of park tenants or residents and (b) the rules or restrictions comply with RCW 59.20.045. The landlord may restrict the number of "for sale" signs on the lot to two and may restrict the size of the signs to conform to those in common use by home sale businesses;

(2) Restrict the tenant's freedom of choice in purchasing goods or services but may reserve the right to approve or disapprove any exterior structural improvements on a mobile home space: PROVIDED, That door-to-door solicitation in the mobile home park may be restricted in the rental agreement. Door-to-door solicitation does not include public officials or candidates for public office meeting or distributing information to tenants in accordance with subsection (3) or (4) of this section;

(3) Prohibit the distribution of information or meetings by tenants of the mobile home park to discuss mobile home living and affairs, including political caucuses or forums for or speeches of public officials or candidates for public office, or meetings of organizations that represent the interest of tenants in the park, held in a tenant's home or any of the park community or recreation halls if these halls are open for the use of the tenants, conducted at reasonable times and in an orderly manner on the premises, nor penalize any tenant for participation in such activities;

(4) Prohibit a public official or candidate for public office from meeting with or distributing information to tenants in their individual mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models, nor penalize any tenant for participating in these meetings or receiving this information;

(5) Evict a tenant, terminate a rental agreement, decline to renew a rental agreement, increase rental or other tenant obligations, decrease services, or modify park rules in retaliation for any of the following actions on the part of a tenant taken in good faith:

(a) Filing a complaint with any federal, state, county, or municipal governmental authority relating to any alleged violation by the landlord of an applicable statute, regulation, or ordinance;

(b) Requesting the landlord to comply with the provision of this chapter or other applicable statute, regulation, or ordinance of the state, county, or municipality;

(c) Filing suit against the landlord for any reason;

(d) Participation or membership in any homeowners association or group;

(6) Charge to any tenant a utility fee in excess of actual utility costs or intentionally cause termination or interruption of any tenant's utility services, including water, heat, electricity, or gas, except when an interruption of a reasonable duration is required to make necessary repairs. For purposes of this subsection, a landlord's actual utility costs include all expenses incurred by the landlord to provide the utility to the tenant, including repair, replacement, maintenance, and administrative expenses;

(7) Remove or exclude a tenant from the premises unless this chapter is complied with or the exclusion or removal is under an appropriate court order; or

(8) Prevent the entry or require the removal of a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model for the sole reason that the mobile home has reached a certain age. Nothing in this subsection shall limit a landlords' right to exclude or expel a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model for any other reason, including but not limited to, failure to comply with fire, safety, and other provisions of local ordinances and state laws relating to mobile homes, manufactured homes, and park models, as long as the action conforms to this chapter or any other relevant statutory provision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is remedial and curative in nature and applies retroactively.

--- END ---