BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes the dedication and hard work of the Washington state patrol for the state of Washington in ensuring the safety of the highways and beyond. The legislature also recognizes the challenges that the state patrol is facing in the recruitment and retention of qualified individuals as state patrol officers. Therefore, the legislature proposes to provide ongoing funding to make the salaries and benefits of state patrol officers more competitive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

To ensure that it is adequately and thoroughly reaching potential recruits, the Washington state patrol must develop a comprehensive outreach and marketing strategic plan that expands on the success of current strategies and looks for ways to tap into groups or individuals that do not currently show an interest in the state patrol or law enforcement as a career. The plan must include, but is not limited to, expanding marketing and outreach efforts online and through other media outlets and expanding recruitment relationships in respective communities. The plan must also include polling applicants about their application. Results from the polling must be tracked to determine the success of each outreach method.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.68.030 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall forward all fees for vehicle registrations under chapters 46.16A and 46.17 RCW, unless otherwise specified by law, to the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit these moneys to the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.

(2) Proceeds from vehicle license fees and renewal vehicle license fees must be deposited by the state treasurer as follows:

(a) (($20.35)) $23.85 of each initial or renewal vehicle license fee must be deposited in the state patrol highway account in the motor vehicle fund, hereby created. Vehicle license fees, renewal vehicle license fees, and all other funds in the state patrol highway account must be for the sole use of the Washington state patrol for highway activities of the Washington state patrol, subject to proper appropriations and reappropriations.

(b) $2.02 of each initial vehicle license fee and $0.93 of each renewal vehicle license fee must be deposited each biennium in the Puget Sound ferry operations account.

(c) Any remaining amounts of vehicle license fees and renewal vehicle license fees that are not distributed otherwise under this section must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

(3) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the state patrol highway account to the connecting Washington account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the state patrol highway account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2017.

--- END ---