BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "The act" means the juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act (P.L. 93-415, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 5601 et seq.), as amended.

(2) "Partnership council" means the Washington state partnership council on juvenile justice created by section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The Washington state partnership council on juvenile justice is hereby created, with membership to conform to the requirements of the act. The partnership council is the state advisory group for the state of Washington under the act, and must comply with all federal requirements pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Secs. 5601–5681 and 42 U.S.C. Secs. 5781–5784.

(2) The partnership council shall serve in an advisory capacity to the governor as required by federal regulations, and shall provide information and recommendations to the governor on a regular basis.

(3) The partnership council is designated as the primary advisory state-planning group for matters pertaining to juvenile justice in Washington.

(4) The partnership council is the advisory board for all planning, administrative, and funding functions of the act and shall make subgrants for planning and improving juvenile justice consistent with the intent of the act.

(5) Additionally, the partnership council shall:

(a) Play a strong, proactive role, providing collaborative leadership and direction, and recommend innovative juvenile justice reforms and best practices for implementation;

(b) Establish priorities for the granting of federal juvenile delinquency and delinquency prevention funds;

(c) Submit annual recommendations for the improvement of the juvenile justice system to the administrator for the courts for review and comment, to the governor, and to the appropriate committees of the legislature;

(d) Promote efficient education, training, research, prevention, diversion, treatment, family reengagement, and rehabilitation programs in the areas of juvenile delinquency and improvement of the juvenile justice system;

(e) Promote partnerships with community employers to create new opportunities for skill development, job readiness and training, and engagement in the workforce for at-risk and system-involved youth;

(f) Promote partnerships with the educational system to increase effective responses to youth who have learning disabilities, or emotional, behavioral, and substance abuse issues both before and during involvement in the juvenile justice system;

(g) Promote strong transition and reentry programs for system-involved youth;

(h) Promote strategies to reduce the percentage of youth of color involved at each level of the juvenile justice system; and

(i) Develop and approve the state's three-year juvenile justice comprehensive plan and implement the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) The administrative office of the courts shall convene the partnership council and provide staff support, subject to the availability of federal funds.

(2) Additionally, the administrative office of the courts shall:

(a) Provide staffing, administrative support, and assume other responsibilities as requested to enable the partnership council to perform its functions;

(b) Provide background information and analysis of juvenile justice delinquency issues as needed;

(c) Monitor and evaluate the state's compliance with the act;

(d) Review the progress and the accomplishments of the juvenile justice and delinquency prevention projects funded under the state's three-year comprehensive plan; and

(e) Administer grants and other financial and technical assistance pursuant to federal regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The partnership council shall operate under its bylaws. Legislative members of the council are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) The partnership council shall be comprised of leaders who have extensive experience and knowledge in juvenile justice and who are able to affect or influence system reform and improve educational, vocational, and employment opportunities for youth across the continuum and address racial and ethnic disparities in the justice system. In making appointments, the governor shall ensure geographic, ethnic, and gender diversity with special consideration to representation of minority populations that are overrepresented in the juvenile justice system. A majority of the members of the partnership council must not be full-time employees of the federal, state, or local governments.

(2) The partnership council membership consists of the following twenty-five members, appointed by the governor:

(a) One general public member to serve as chair of the council, and who must not be a full-time employee of the federal, state, or local governments;

(b) One locally elected official representing general purpose local government;

(c) One representative of law enforcement;

(d) One representative of juvenile court administration;

(e) One representative of juvenile and family court judges;

(f) One representative of prosecuting attorneys;

(g) One representative of defense attorneys;

(h) One representative of the juvenile rehabilitation administration within the department of social and health services;

(i) One representative of public agencies engaged in children's mental health and concerned with delinquency prevention or treatment;

(j) One representative of private nonprofit organizations with a special focus on preserving and strengthening families, parent groups and parent self-help groups, youth development, delinquency prevention and treatment, neglected or dependent children, the quality of juvenile justice, education, and social services for children;

(k) One representative of volunteers who work with delinquents or potential delinquents;

(l) One representative of youth workers involved with programs that are alternatives to incarceration;

(m) One person with special experience and competence in addressing problems related to school violence and alternatives to suspension and expulsion;

(n) One person with special experience and competence in addressing problems related to learning disabilities, child abuse and neglect, and youth violence;

(o) One representative of Washington state tribes;

(p) One representative from the office of the governor;

(q) One representative from the state house of representatives;

(r) One representative from the state senate;

(s) One representative of private or public employers who help youth through job development, job skills and training, and opportunities to help them overcome barriers to obtaining and retaining employment;

(t) One person with special experience and competence in helping youth achieve a successful transition and reentry back to their communities; and

(u) Five members who are under the age of twenty-four at the time of appointment, three of whom must have been or are currently under the jurisdiction of the juvenile justice system.

(3) The governor shall designate one-third of the initial appointees to serve a one-year term, one-third of the initial appointees to serve a two-year term, and one-third of the initial appointees to serve a three-year term. Thereafter, all appointees, except appointments to serve out the remainder of an existing term, serve three-year terms and are eligible for reappointment at the discretion of the governor. Members may serve up to three full consecutive terms. If a member resigns before completing a term, the governor shall appoint a new member to serve out the remainder of that term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 5 of this act are each added to chapter 2.56 RCW.

--- END ---