BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.290 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning March 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, the secretary must report to the health care committees of the senate and house of representatives on HPV vaccine utilization. The report must include data from the previous calendar year on the following information:

(a) The number of doses of the HPV vaccine delivered to physicians and clinics ordering state-supplied HPV vaccines under this chapter;

(b) The number of doses of the HPV vaccine administered, broken down by whether one, two, or three doses of the vaccine have been administered;

(c) The age of the person receiving the vaccination;

(d) The gender of the person receiving the vaccination; and

(e) Whether the clinician has recommended the vaccination to a patient, broken down by age and gender for the patient.

(2) The report must include the information outlined in subsection (1) of this section in numbers that apply state-wide and broken down by county. It must also include recommendations for increasing utilization of the vaccine and ways to encourage and increase the number of clinician recommendations for the vaccine.

(3) As appropriate, the secretary may use other resources to complete this report such as information provided by the centers for disease control.

--- END ---