BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.46.240 and 2006 c 290 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, whoever knowingly transmits or receives gambling information by telephone, telegraph, radio, semaphore, the internet, a telecommunications transmission system, or similar means, or knowingly installs or maintains equipment for the transmission or receipt of gambling information shall be guilty of a class C felony subject to the penalty set forth in RCW 9A.20.021. However, this section shall not apply to such information transmitted or received or equipment installed or maintained relating to activities authorized by this chapter or to any act or acts in furtherance thereof when conducted in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and in accordance with the rules adopted under this chapter.

(2) A provider of networking services is not in violation of this section if the provider of networking services is not the information content provider.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "networking services" means security and availability benefits applied to the delivery of content provided by a third party.

--- END ---