BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the state route number 2 trestle is a critical east-west link for Snohomish county for the following reasons:

(1) The trestle directly serves Snohomish county's employment center and its aerospace manufacturing and supply cluster;

(2) The trestle carries seventy-three thousand vehicles per day and the westbound trestle experiences at least two hours of congestion each morning;

(3) Significant congestion and gridlock also exists at the east end of the trestle, with growing traffic volumes on the bridge structure from state route number 204, 20th Street, and state route number 9;

(4) An additional four hundred forty-six thousand people and two hundred forty-six thousand jobs are projected for Snohomish county by 2040, which will result in increased traffic congestion; and

(5) The trestle provides freight benefits to the region and the state by carrying over ten million tons of freight annually.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The legislature recognizes that the state route number 2 trestle is over forty years old and is susceptible to wind and earthquake damage. The legislature also recognizes that despite recent repairs to remove corrosion from the steel frame and reinforcing the girders on the underside of the trestle, the structure will ultimately have to be replaced.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The legislature acknowledges that cities in the vicinity of the state route number 2 trestle have formed a strong partnership to develop a long-term vision for the necessary improvements to the trestle. The legislature also recognizes that the regional development plan completed in 2011 by the Washington state department of transportation recognized that replacing the trestle will require significant lead time because of the complex environmental and constructability issues involved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The legislature expresses its intent to provide three million dollars to the Washington state department of transportation to conduct preliminary environmental, design, and cost estimate work to begin the initial work referenced in the route development plan and create an opportunity to leverage both future state and federal funding to ultimately replace the state route number 2 trestle.

--- END ---