BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department must develop a robust lean performance management plan as described in this section to be overseen by the governor in collaboration with the department. The department shall coordinate performance management activities between correctional facilities to develop common performance measures and frameworks that enhance the ability to compare performance between correctional facilities and aid in the standardization of practices between correctional facilities where appropriate.

(2) The department performance management plan shall conform to the Baldrige excellence framework most applicable to nonprofit government operations. The department must develop clear timelines and strategies related to development of performance management plans and report these to results Washington or its equivalent and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature within sixty days of the effective date of this section.

(3) The performance management plan must define the mission of the department and set goals for achievement. Goals should be expressed to the extent practicable in outcome-based, objective, and measurable forms that align with the stated objectives for a comprehensive system of corrections expressed in RCW 72.09.010. This section does not require the department to develop new mission statements and goals in place of its existing missions and goals if the missions and goals can be fit within the Baldrige excellence framework.

(4) The department must undergo a Baldrige assessment of its operations every two years until reaching a sixty percent Baldrige assessment score pursuant to subsection (5) of this section. Completed assessments and feedback must be transmitted to the office of financial management and relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature.

(5) The department must establish a goal of achieving a sixty percent Baldrige assessment score within seven years of its first Baldrige assessment. When a sixty percent score is achieved, the department must apply for a Malcolm Baldrige national quality award under 15 U.S.C. Sec. 3711a. If the department is unable to achieve this sixty percent goal, it must move to achieve certification under an internationally recognized quality management system, such as ISO 9001 or its equivalent, within seven years of the first Baldrige assessment, or as soon as practicable after the inability is identified. Nothing in this section prohibits the department from adopting an internationally recognized quality management system at an earlier date or in addition to its other activities.

(6) The department must work towards implementation of real-time, web-based tracking and reporting of department performance management activities.

(7) The department must provide a periodic report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature presenting information from the department performance management plan, including elements such as goals adopted for the reporting period, results of audits or assessments, progress towards achieving the objectives described in subsection (5) of this section, and fiscal savings attributable to performance management projects. The department may propose a schedule for the submission of this periodic report as part of its submission under subsection (2) of this section.

(8) Pursuant to chapter 43.09 RCW, the state auditor must conduct a performance audit of the department's management systems and metrics one year after their implementation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall study the application of the Baldrige quality management framework or an equivalent performance management system to its own activities and report its findings to the governor and relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Pursuant to chapter 43.09 RCW, the state auditor must conduct an immediate performance audit of the department of corrections' management system in place and report its findings to the governor and relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 3 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---