BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of ecology, in cooperation with the state department of health, Skagit county, tribes, and nonmunicipally owned public water systems in Skagit county, shall conduct a study to examine the feasibility of using effectively sized water storage to recharge the Skagit river basin when needed to meet minimum instream flows and provide noninterruptible water resources to users of permit exempt wells within the Skagit river basin.

(2) The department of ecology must submit a report of the study's findings to the standing committees of the legislature with oversight of water resources and fiscal issues by December 1, 2016.

(3) This section expires December 1, 2016.

--- END ---