BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that recommendations from the department of licensing, made in consultation with the Washington traffic safety commission, Washington state patrol, and other traffic safety partners, improve the safety of drivers on the highways in Washington state. The legislature further finds that these recommendations, upon implementation, result in fewer motor vehicle crashes. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to make our highways safe for all drivers by requiring habitual traffic offenders to attend a driver improvement course and by expanding the process of licensing and regulating drivers to include vehicle insurance verification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By December 31, 2016, the department, in consultation with the traffic safety commission and other traffic safety stakeholders, must develop a program for a driver improvement course for habitual offenders nearing suspension of their driving privilege. A habitual offender, as defined in RCW 46.65.020, nearing suspension must participate in the driver improvement course once it is made publicly available under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) By December 31, 2017, the department must contract with a local provider or providers for a driver improvement course to be offered to habitual offenders as described in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The department must develop options for a subsidy program for indigent people to access the driver improvement course. Financial assistance under the program may include a full or partial subsidy voucher. For the purposes of this section, indigency criteria must be determined by the department in consultation with a statewide organization that represents disadvantaged communities.

(4) The department must determine a fee for the driver improvement course, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, which must cover the cost of administering the course and the subsidy program. The fee must be collected by the local provider or providers from individuals attending the course, with a portion of the fee distributed to the department and deposited in the high-risk driver improvement account created in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW to read as follows:

The high-risk driver improvement account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from fees collected under section 2(4) of this act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the subsidy program of the driver improvement course under section 2(3) of this act. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. By December 31, 2016, the department of licensing, in consultation with the traffic safety commission and other traffic safety stakeholders, must develop and submit to the legislature a program for vehicle insurance verification as part of the process of licensing and regulating drivers in the state of Washington.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2013 c 251 s 5 and 2013 c 88 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury for cash management and cash balance purposes.

(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.

(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings credited to the investment income account to the state general fund except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.

(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the accessible communities account, the community and technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the county enhanced 911 excise tax account, the toll collection account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the high-risk driver improvement account, the industrial insurance rainy day fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the multiagency permitting team account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar pool account, the regional transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual development account program account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account, the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss account, the school for the blind account, the Millersylvania park trust fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund, and the radiation perpetual maintenance fund.

(c) The following accounts and funds must receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---