BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.32.060 and 2009 c 176 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If, upon receipt of an application by a taxpayer for a refund or for an audit of the taxpayer's records, or upon an examination of the returns or records of any taxpayer, it is determined by the department that within the statutory period for assessment of taxes, penalties, or interest prescribed by RCW 82.32.050 any amount of tax, penalty, or interest has been paid in excess of that properly due, the excess amount paid within, or attributable to, such period must be credited to the taxpayer's account or must be refunded to the taxpayer, at the taxpayer's option. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no refund or credit may be made for taxes, penalties, or interest paid more than four years prior to the beginning of the calendar year in which the refund application is made or examination of records is completed.

(2)(a) The execution of a written waiver under RCW 82.32.050 or 82.32.100 will extend the time for making a refund or credit of any taxes paid during, or attributable to, the years covered by the waiver if, prior to the expiration of the waiver period, an application for refund of such taxes is made by the taxpayer or the department discovers a refund or credit is due.

(b) A refund or credit must be allowed for an excess payment resulting from the failure to claim a bad debt deduction, credit, or refund under RCW 82.04.4284, 82.08.037, 82.12.037, 82.14B.150, or 82.16.050(5) for debts that became bad debts under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 166, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003, less than four years prior to the beginning of the calendar year in which the refund application is made or examination of records is completed.

(c) The department may, following the expiration of the waiver period, extend by another four years the time for making a refund or credit of any taxes paid by any assisted living facility licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW with a medicaid contract under chapter 74.39A RCW, or any nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW with a medicaid contract under chapter 74.46 RCW, if the taxpayer's application persuades the department, in its sole discretion, that the overpayment of taxes properly due may impair the ability of the facility to continue offering medicaid care; maintain staffing; or enhance staffing.

(3) Any such refunds must be made by means of vouchers approved by the department and by the issuance of state warrants drawn upon and payable from such funds as the legislature may provide. However, taxpayers who are required to pay taxes by electronic funds transfer under RCW 82.32.080 must have any refunds paid by electronic funds transfer if the department has the necessary account information to facilitate a refund by electronic funds transfer.

(4) Any judgment for which a recovery is granted by any court of competent jurisdiction, not appealed from, for tax, penalties, and interest which were paid by the taxpayer, and costs, in a suit by any taxpayer must be paid in the same manner, as provided in subsection (3) of this section, upon the filing with the department of a certified copy of the order or judgment of the court.

(a) Interest at the rate of three percent per annum must be allowed by the department and by any court on the amount of any refund, credit, or other recovery allowed to a taxpayer for taxes, penalties, or interest paid by the taxpayer before January 1, 1992. This rate of interest applies for all interest allowed through December 31, 1998. Interest allowed after December 31, 1998, must be computed at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2). The rate so computed must be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest for that calendar year.

(b) For refunds or credits of amounts paid or other recovery allowed to a taxpayer after December 31, 1991, the rate of interest must be the rate as computed for assessments under RCW 82.32.050(2) less one percent. This rate of interest applies for all interest allowed through December 31, 1998. Interest allowed after December 31, 1998, must be computed at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2). The rate so computed must be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest for that calendar year.

(5) Interest allowed on a credit notice or refund issued after December 31, 2003, must be computed as follows:

(a) If all overpayments for each calendar year and all reporting periods ending with the final month included in a notice or refund were made on or before the due date of the final return for each calendar year or the final reporting period included in the notice or refund:

(i) Interest must be computed from January 31st following each calendar year included in a notice or refund; or

(ii) Interest must be computed from the last day of the month following the final month included in a notice or refund.

(b) If the taxpayer has not made all overpayments for each calendar year and all reporting periods ending with the final month included in a notice or refund on or before the dates specified by RCW 82.32.045 for the final return for each calendar year or the final month included in the notice or refund, interest must be computed from the last day of the month following the date on which payment in full of the liabilities was made for each calendar year included in a notice or refund, and the last day of the month following the date on which payment in full of the liabilities was made if the final month included in a notice or refund is not the end of a calendar year.

(c) Interest included in a credit notice must accrue up to the date the taxpayer could reasonably be expected to use the credit notice, as defined by the department's rules. If a credit notice is converted to a refund, interest must be recomputed to the date the refund is issued, but not to exceed the amount of interest that would have been allowed with the credit notice.

--- END ---