BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.01.071 and 2007 c 516 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The transportation commission shall have the following functions, powers, and duties:

(1) To propose policies to be adopted by the governor and the legislature designed to assure the development and maintenance of a comprehensive and balanced statewide transportation system which will meet the needs of the people of this state for safe and efficient transportation services. Wherever appropriate, the policies shall provide for the use of integrated, intermodal transportation systems. The policies must be aligned with the goals established in RCW 47.04.280. To this end the commission shall:

(a) Develop transportation policies which are based on the policies, goals, and objectives expressed and inherent in existing state laws;

(b) Inventory the adopted policies, goals, and objectives of the local and area-wide governmental bodies of the state and define the role of the state, regional, and local governments in determining transportation policies, in transportation planning, and in implementing the state transportation plan;

(c) Establish a procedure for review and revision of the state transportation policy and for submission of proposed changes to the governor and the legislature; and

(d) Integrate the statewide transportation plan with the needs of the elderly and persons with disabilities, and coordinate federal and state programs directed at assisting local governments to answer such needs;

(2) To provide for the effective coordination of state transportation planning with national transportation policy, state and local land use policies, and local and regional transportation plans and programs;

(3) In conjunction with the provisions under RCW 47.01.075, to provide for public involvement in transportation designed to elicit the public's views both with respect to adequate transportation services and appropriate means of minimizing adverse social, economic, environmental, and energy impact of transportation programs;

(4) By December 2010, to prepare a comprehensive and balanced statewide transportation plan consistent with the state's growth management goals and based on the transportation policy goals provided under RCW 47.04.280 and applicable state and federal laws. The plan must reflect the priorities of government developed by the office of financial management and address regional needs, including multimodal transportation planning. The plan must, at a minimum: (a) Establish a vision for the development of the statewide transportation system; (b) identify significant statewide transportation policy issues; and (c) recommend statewide transportation policies and strategies to the legislature to fulfill the requirements of subsection (1) of this section. The plan must be the product of an ongoing process that involves representatives of significant transportation interests and the general public from across the state. Every four years, the plan shall be reviewed and revised, and submitted to the governor and the house of representatives and senate standing committees on transportation.

The plan shall take into account federal law and regulations relating to the planning, construction, and operation of transportation facilities;

(5) ((By December 2007, the office of financial management shall submit a baseline report on the progress toward attaining the policy goals under RCW 47.04.280 in the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium. By October 1, 2008, beginning with the development of the 2009-2011 biennial transportation budget, and by October 1st biennially thereafter, the office of financial management shall submit to the legislature and the governor a report on the progress toward the attainment by state transportation agencies of the state transportation policy goals and objectives prescribed by statute, appropriation, and governor directive. The report must, at a minimum, include the degree to which state transportation programs have progressed toward the attainment of the policy goals established under RCW 47.04.280, as measured by the objectives and performance measures established by the office of financial management under RCW 47.04.280;

(6))) To propose to the governor and the legislature prior to the convening of each regular session held in an odd-numbered year a recommended budget for the operations of the commission as required by RCW 47.01.061;

(((7))) (6) To adopt such rules as may be necessary to carry out reasonably and properly those functions expressly vested in the commission by statute;

(((8))) (7) To contract with the office of financial management or other appropriate state agencies for administrative support, accounting services, computer services, and other support services necessary to carry out its other statutory duties;

(((9))) (8) To conduct transportation-related studies and policy analysis to the extent directed by the legislature or governor in the biennial transportation budget act, or as otherwise provided in law, and subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose; and

(((10))) (9) To exercise such other specific powers and duties as may be vested in the transportation commission by this or any other provision of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

By October 1, 2016, and by October 1st biennially thereafter, the office of financial management shall review and comment prior to the department of transportation submitting to the legislature and the governor a report on the progress toward the attainment by state transportation agencies of the state transportation policy goals and objectives prescribed by statute, appropriation, and governor directive. The report must, at a minimum, include the degree to which state transportation programs have progressed toward the attainment of the policy goals established under RCW 47.04.280, as measured by the objectives and performance measures established under RCW 47.04.280.

Sec. 3. RCW 47.04.280 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 16 s 1 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 304 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to establish policy goals for the planning, operation, performance of, and investment in, the state's transportation system. The policy goals established under this section are deemed consistent with the benchmark categories adopted by the state's blue ribbon commission on transportation on November 30, 2000. Public investments in transportation should support achievement of these policy goals:

(a) Economic vitality: To promote and develop transportation systems that stimulate, support, and enhance the movement of people and goods to ensure a prosperous economy;

(b) Preservation: To maintain, preserve, and extend the life and utility of prior investments in transportation systems and services;

(c) Safety: To provide for and improve the safety and security of transportation customers and the transportation system;

(d) Mobility: To improve the predictable movement of goods and people throughout Washington state, including congestion relief and improved freight mobility;

(e) Environment: To enhance Washington's quality of life through transportation investments that promote energy conservation, enhance healthy communities, and protect the environment; and

(f) Stewardship: To continuously improve the quality, effectiveness, and efficiency of the transportation system.

(2) The powers, duties, and functions of state transportation agencies must be performed in a manner consistent with the policy goals set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) These policy goals are intended to be the basis for establishing detailed and measurable objectives and related performance measures.

(4) It is the intent of the legislature that the ((department of transportation establish)) office of financial management oversee the establishment of objectives and performance measures for the department and other state agencies with transportation-related responsibilities to ensure transportation system performance at local, regional, and state government levels progresses toward the attainment of the policy goals set forth in subsection (1) of this section. The department of transportation shall submit objectives and performance measures to the legislature for its review and shall provide copies of the same to the commission during each regular session of the legislature during an even-numbered year thereafter.

(5) A local or regional agency engaging in transportation planning may voluntarily establish objectives and performance measures to demonstrate progress toward the attainment of the policy goals set forth in subsection (1) of this section or any other transportation policy goals established by the local or regional agency. A local or regional agency engaging in transportation planning is encouraged to provide local and regional objectives and performance measures to be included with the objectives and performance measures submitted to the legislature pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

(6) This section does not create a private right of action.

Sec. 4. RCW 47.64.360 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 306 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of transportation shall complete a government management and accountability performance report that provides a baseline assessment of current performance on the performance measures identified in RCW 47.64.355 using final 2009-2011 data. This report must be presented to the legislature by November 1, 2011, through the attainment report required in ((RCW 47.01.071(5))) section 2 of this act and RCW 47.04.280.

(2) By December 31, 2012, and each year thereafter, the department of transportation shall complete a performance report for the prior fiscal year. This report must be reviewed by the office of financial management, which must provide comment on the report, and the joint transportation committee, prior to submitting the report to the legislature and governor.

(3) Management shall lead implementation of the performance measures in RCW 47.64.355.

--- END ---